So, that's it for all my stuff.
If you want, you could give me your key and I'll drop it off at Riggleman's.
All right.
Thanks.
Gary.
You know, there's a thousand things I...
I would have done differently.
Me, too.
Sort of, actually, when I see this space, I realise that if we didn't have such a big coffee table and that oversized couch
a pool table would have fit nicely.
Yeah.
Although the oversized couch did come in very useful the last couple of weeks, so...
Yes, it...
I guess.
Have a good trip.
Thanks.
Chicago is called the Second City because after the Great Chicago Fire of 1871,
Chicago was rebuilt on its ruins.
The city came back even bigger and stronger than it originally was.
So it's not really an insult, it's more of a badge of honour to be called...
The Second City!
Okay.
People, you might be able to get away with that reaction at work, but you are on vacation here.
If you can't blow it out here, then where the hell can you blow it out?
Ladies and gentlemen, show me that you mean it.
Do not make me ask you twice.
- Are you ready to see Chicago?
Yes!
- I said, are you ready to see Chicago?
Yes!
Are you ready to see Chicago?
Shondra, put this babe in the air.
Let's go!
There is a bar downstairs.
Please enjoy yourself.
I know it's early in the morning, but it is Chicago in the summer.
Who are we kidding?
It's fine.
Go get hopped up, make some bad decisions.
My jokes get better.
The buildings look bigger.
It's not so important that everything is finished.
It's important that everything is right.
Well, what time's the presentation?
All right, I'll pick up the rest of the stuff and I'll see you at 6:45.
Great.
Bye.
Brooke!
- Hi.
- Hi.
Wow.
- It's good to see you.
- It's good to see you.
I'd give you a hug, but my hands are kind of full with all the bags here.
- How've you been?
- I've been really good.
- How have you been?
- I've been good.
Yeah.
- You look great.
- Thank you.
- The hair's a little different.
Looks nice.
- Yeah?
Oh, yeah.
- You've lost some weight.
- Well, it's very deceiving, actually.
I've managed to become thin without having any real muscle on me whatsoever.
Very tough thing to accomplish, by the way.
I'm proud of myself.
- Well, you look terrific.
- Thanks.
- I heard your trip went really well.
- It did.
It went really well.
- Oh, good.
- It was fun.
It was amazing.
I saw so many amazing places.
It was just...
But, you know, you do realise how much you love home.
- It's good to have you back.
- Yeah.
It's good to be back.
- And the boat.
Congratulations on the boat.
- Thanks.
I'm waiting for it to get warm, and I'm gonna come by and take a ride.
Well, anytime you want.
It'll be on the house.
Come on by.
Well, I will, then.
I hope you do.
Definitely.
Well, I got to...
I'm going to a meeting, so...
I got to drop these bags off anyway, but it's really good to see you, Brooke.
- Really good to see you.
- Shouldn't...
- Sorry.
- I'm sorry.
I'm just saying we shouldn't wait so long the next time before we...
- Yeah.
...catch up.
- We have a lot more to talk about.
- Yeah.
So.
- Be good.
- Okay.
- Bye.
- Bye.
- For everyone, I'm Vince Vaughn.
- I'm Jennifer Aniston.
And we're on the Universal lot in a stage here doing the commentary for The Break-Up.
That's the Universal logo.
Wrigley Field, in the original screenplay, this was not in the movie.
In the original screenplay when we first turned it in, the movie started with me on the bus.
But this stuff was added to give a context for when the characters would meet, and an idea Jennifer had saying that, "Let's see them together, how they met,
"in order to sort of give a foundation for them when they went on their journey. "
'Cause it was sort of tough to sort of enter into the movie without really investing in the characters.
You know, seeing that they actually liked each other, why they liked each other.
- I don't know.
- It's up to you.
- I have no room to sit.
- I got no room to sit.
I'm sitting next to a guy who's sitting...
This is Jon Favreau.
We shot this one day at Wrigley Field while they were shooting, and then we shot one day...
I mean when they were playing and then one day when they were not playing.
Because I'm trying to relax and have a nice day.
And we improvise a lot of stuff and...
You can see what a good actress I am 'cause I'd never been to a game at Wrigley Field, so I was just acting right here.
There wasn't actually a game happening.
There's no ballplayers out there.
You were there the day that we shot when they were actually playing too, right?
- No, I wasn't.
- Oh, you weren't.
I was here on fake baseball game day.
- That's Eddie Martinez.
- Yeah.
There's a lot of good Chicago actors who played a lot of the secondary parts.
It was a great pool of talent.
And the other actor who played your boyfriend did a nice job as well.
Yes.
He did do a nice job.
He was a very sweet guy from Chicago.
- No.
Thank you.
- You can have one.
- That's okay.
- Go ahead.
You can have a hot dog.
- No, I don't want one.
- Excuse me, sir?
Would you mind passing the lady one of the hot dogs?
- I'm good, thanks.
- You don't have to share.
- You can have your own.
- Thanks.
That's really nice of you.
- Just have one, please.
- Okay, give me a hot dog.
Somebody give her a hot dog.
I got...
The big guy can't eat all of them.
Have one.
- Have you ever had one before?
- A hot dog?
At the ballpark?
We improvised a lot of this hot dog banter back and forth.
- Do you like mustard?
- No, I'm okay.
It's much better with a topping.
Here.
I'm just kidding, I'll give you two.
- That part, improv.
Very well done.
- Yes.
- Cheers!
- Thanks.
- Look at Favreau.
- This is improvised.
But we had a context that I gave her a hot dog.
And we just kind of played with it, like this was all improvised.
I'm trying to watch the game and have a hot dog.
Which is sort of like you, you know, it's that kind of thing where you see someone and you're really kind of smitten by them and you don't say anything and then you go home and you sort of regret not trying to communicate to them.
And then you have...
How many times did that actually happen to you?
A couple times and that's what made you realise you know, when you see someone just worth trying to talk to them because you don't want to have that feeling of not knowing if there could be something,
- if you're really taken by someone.
- Right.
So I really just played that I saw this girl and I was really wowed by her.
You know, didn't really have a game plan but really wanted to try to reach out and, you know, see if there was a chance for a connection.
Right.
Who's the guy with the tucked-in stuff?
Is that a boyfriend?
- I'm going.
- Do you think you'll marry him?
- What?
- 'Cause I know you've thought about it.
This stuff was mainly scripted here.
- No, this was improv we did here.
- No, this was written.
This is improvised, but...
And there was a speech that you had here that...
'Cause it seemed that long, about how long it took to get ready.
That's right.
Tommy Tuck-in and I called you "casually haggard."
- That's right.
I wrote that line.
- You did.
- Well, I'm gonna go.
- Okay.
Me, too.
But it seemed better in the editing room that you were just kind of overwhelmed.
Although you were sort of taken by it, you still wanted to keep moving.
Once you stopped and you sort of gave back a monologue it seemed like at that point you were already gonna say yes to him.
And at this point we decided not to do singles, remember?
This was the end of the...
This was the last shot of the day.
And this is improvised here.
- All improvised.
- But not the first part of it was.
- Look how stunned I am.
I'm in shock.
- Well, it works for the scene.
We always knew that we would kind of end with you saying, "That's not gonna happen."
- But I just kept going and going.
- There.
I got it in.
And these stills are great.
We shot these during the duration of the movie.
And this was supposed to be another tool to sort of show the relationship over the two years between when they met and where the movie begins.
And nothing tells a story better than a photo album.
If I can try to continue on what you're saying,
I think you're saying a picture tells a thousand words, Jennifer.
Yes, that's correct.
That's good.
That's good.
But we originally had a motion control thing where you kind of went through the condo where they're living and picked them up at different stages.
Like you saw them move in, then you saw them having dinner, then you saw them in the bathroom and as time passed.
But it just sort of slowed down the movie, so we pulled that out and just really went with just the pictures.
And the pictures, this is all stuff that we shot during filming.
It would be too much to sort of go to all the different locations where the pictures are shot or to strip the stage.
So, whenever we had an opportunity we would sort of put on the appropriate clothes and...
- Stand under a Christmas tree.
- Right.
Go to the 4th of July photos.
Okay, this cast is in town, let's set up a game night or let's set up poker night.
But it's amazing.
Jeremy Garelick actually gave this idea.
'Cause he has this sort of slide show in his computer with his fiancée and that's
- where we got inspired by that idea.
- That's right.
- That's Danny.
- That is my brother, Danny,
- the leprechaun.
- John O'Brien.
We're not at a concert there.
That's not my hand.
That's Vince's.
And the cow costume was something that I wore on Leno, my first time ever on a talk show, I wore the cow costume.
It was like a funny Halloween costume.
I always thought it was just a funny costume because it's so easy.
It's like not a lot of thought went into it.
You can just buy those.
Like a little kid would buy a costume and wear them.
And the pictures do a good job of telling the story, conveying that time has passed and they're in a relationship and that they've been to some events and stuff with each other.
That's what we were saying before that it sort of,
- a picture tells a thousand words.
- That's right.
All right, all right, everybody.
Welcome to Three Brothers Bus Tours.
Now, we just sort of pick up now, current day.
And you're gonna get the backstory.
And, originally, in the screenplay this was the first scene.
You just sort of meet Gary.
He is a tour bus driver.
Weird.
Not fun for anybody.
And there's extended scenes of this, there's a lot of material here that we shot, but as you're putting together the movie sometimes stuff can be really funny but if it goes on too long, overall it affects the pace.
So, you just really want to establish he's a tour bus driver, to be consistent with Wrigley Field.
He's a little bit out of the box with the things that he says and the concepts he comes up with.
And so you're still meeting him, learning what he does, but you still haven't established what the movie is about yet.
So, you're just trying to, in an efficient way, get a backstory, see him at work, get a little bit of character establishment and keep the movie moving.
And then there is a phone call that we have that...
Yeah, there's a phone call we had originally to tie them together where before I go on the bus, there's a phone call from Jennifer's character to mine.
And then that kind of bridged the two scenes.
Happy Holidays.
Marilyn Dean Gallery.
And then you meet, your character, Brooke.
That was my first day of filming, actually, that phone call.
...abstract bent.
Okay, bye-bye.
- And how much is it?
- $35,000.
Happy Holidays.
Marilyn Dean Gallery.
Hold, please.
- Will you excuse me for a moment?
- Sure.
Go ahead.
- Christopher?
- Yes, sweetie.
This is...
- Ivan and Justin are both very good actors.
- Really good actors.
Really sweet guys.
And now we're meeting your character and what she does.
She works at an art gallery.
And we sort of establish the relationship, obviously, with Justin, who is the secretary.
And they're obviously...
She likes him and there's a friendship and a working relationship there.
But he's a little bit out of the box.
He's a little out of the ordinary with what he's doing and she's sort of left in charge of the gallery and making sure that...
- Keeping him somewhat on corralled.
- Yeah.
Character establishment for him and also where we meet Ivan for the first time, and we just sort of meet Ivan.
He's a guy, character's name is Carson, who's shopping there for art.
We're seeing that Brooke's good at her job.
She's a salesperson.
She's engaging him.
And of course, later on in the movie he will pay off as a guy that could be a romantic interest...
- Potential.
- Yes.
... when things kind of get bad with Gary.
Now this is a new piece by Zakrzewska.
What do you think of this?
Couldn't say this name to save my life.
"Zakrzewska." We made that one up.
- Was that a made-up name?
- I think that was a real artist.
- That was?
Zakrzewska.
I can say it now.
- He's a real artist.
A lot of the pieces in the gallery were of real artists in the Chicago area.
We met a couple of them, actually, recently at the Chicago premiere.
Yeah, they came down.
But a lot of the art that you see in the film is actually real artists from the city that we wanted to use kind of local Chicago artists and showcase some of their art in the film.
- They were good sports.
- They were great.
You know, don't worry about who the artist is or how much it's worth.
I mean, you have to live with it every day.
You have to walk by it every day.
And you'll notice the cutting point here kind of establishes momentum for the film.
You kind of cut out on an idea that sets up the next scene.
- And scene.
- And that's just an exterior.
We debated whether you needed that exterior shot or not.
Why did you debate that?
Just to have a...
Because you could kind of go from, "It's kind of like picking a mate."
- You just cut right to...
- That scene.
... you at home preparing dinner and Gary coming in, and then the audience would get past it and go.
You have an establishing shot of the city, but when you think about it, it doesn't really tell you anything.
Just that you're leaving and now it's nighttime.
It shows a passage of time.
But if you cut on "mate" and just have him come home you'd get that she's cooking dinner and he's coming home.
Now, this was the beginning of...
We shot all this from this scene
- as we call the "12 lemon" scene...
- Yes.
... through the dinner scene and then the scene following.
We shot all in order which was great.
During rehearsal it was really great to lay all this down and lock it in in rehearsal.
It's like rehearsing a play.
So that once we got here we could just really let the cameras roll and have fun.
Exactly, we did.
We took the time in rehearsal to sort of challenge the lines, challenge the dialogue.
You know, you had some ideas to change some stuff,
I had some ideas, all the actors did.
So, we used the rehearsal time, so by the time it came to filming we were really prepared and...
Not finding stuff on the day which can slow things down.
Or finding good stuff on the day because we spent some rehearsal time
- kind of getting ready for it.
- Yeah.
And we were able to shoot, all the stuff you see in the condo was shot in order.
Which was helpful as actors obviously that you got to live the scene prior to the one that came next.
Some of the location stuff, obviously, we were not able to shoot all that in order, but all the stuff that happens inside this condo we were able to...
Shoot in order.
And Andrew Laws was the set designer.
- He did a great job, designing stuff.
- Look how beautiful it is.
And Eric Edwards our DP lit it just so beautifully.
And the movie has, unlike a lot of comedies that really look kind of watered down or you can tell if they're shot very quickly, this has a very real look to it and that's a real credit to both
Eric Edwards, the DP and to Peyton the director.
And we knew that the movie was comedic but would take a dramatic turn.
And so when you have a look right now, that's more dramatic than most comedies.
In a much more real-Iooking film, it's easier to kind of slip into the more dramatic stuff and not have it bump as much because you've already set up with the camera and the look of the movie that you're looking at a real movie
and not your typical sort of broad comedy.
I so prefer this.
Don't you, anyway?
The look of it?
Oh, yeah, it looks great.
They did a great job.
It's the Sistine Chapel, not the Sixteenth.
And the condo, we shot in an armoury, wasn't even on a sound stage.
Yeah.
This...
The condo we built in the armoury in Chicago.
And we built the whole set so we could sort of have control.
And the one thing I'd like to say about this scene we saw earlier, they're arguing and you can see there's a chink in the armour, but they were kind of playful.
He made a joke that she sort of laughed at.
You can tell he's sort of Tom Sawyer-ing his way out of any responsibilities, but the claws aren't out yet.
The second that this inning's over...
- Gary.
- There's one out already.
They're gonna be here in 20 minutes.
I think most people have had this discussion.
Most people have had this discussion many times.
Come on.
Oh, great!
They're here.
Okay.
Table's not set.
Dinner's not ready.
Would you please just let my parents in?
- I gotta jump in the shower.
- What?
And of course, he's gonna jump in the shower.
We had another line there.
Yeah, originally, at the top of the scene Gary did kind of a fake marriage proposal.
Where he kind of set the table up like he had an important announcement to make and then he said, "In case of an emergency
"there's fire exits on both sides of the hallway. "
- Too mean.
- It just came off a little bit too mean.
And it's so delicate too, just from taking one line out or adding a line in, how it would change your feeling towards the character for the entire...
And both characters, you know.
If you left too much in for Brooke, she'd come off too naggy.
If you left too many jokes in for Gary, he could come off too kind of mean.
So, it was really finding a balance.
But again the purpose of the film was unlike most romantic comedies, where people usually say the right thing or do the right thing and are really kind of presented as likable as possible, we want to take two very flawed characters
who didn't have the best grasp on everything, who were a little bit off-centred and watch two people that are more flawed go on to kind of the demise of a relationship.
And so you have Gary who's a little bit kind of not totally aware and not really comfortable showing his feelings and talking directly about how he's feeling.
He sort of masks or pretends like nothing bothers him.
And Brooke who is sort of trying to change Gary and sort of manipulate the situation through sort of tactics versus just coming out directly and communicating what it is that she wants or what she's getting or what she's not getting.
It's outstanding.
- Yeah, it really is nice.
- Okay, everybody.
- Time for the joke of the day.
Knock, knock.
- Dad.
Dad, come on.
- Who's there?
- Norma Lee.
Norma Lee, who?
Normally, I don't go around knocking on doors, but would you like to buy an encyclopaedia?
I got a joke.
I got a joke.
How's it going?
I got a joke for you.
What do you get when you cross a gay Eskimo and a black guy?
All right, look, I think we've had enough with the jokes for tonight.
And the point is, this is the classic kind of the two families are coming together.
They're from different worlds.
It's a little bit of pressure and uncomfortable for everyone.
We just have so many great actors.
That's my father there, Vernon.
He's been in Swingers and Made.
He's kind of my good luck charm.
That's his good luck charm.
Now, this is...
Do we think that this was the first time the families...
This is the first time, right?
I think in this scene he says, "Seeing we haven't had many times...
- Many times, right?
- "...with the family.
"What better way to break bread?"
But Vincent D'Onofrio is a great actor.
He really added a lot to his character.
She was great, who played his wife.
- Another great Chicago actress.
- She was fantastic.
And Michael Higgins obviously there from Best in Show and all the Christopher Guest movies.
He does a lot of improvisations that are always funny.
Cole Hauser is a terrific dramatic actor, plays my other brother.
- Of course Ann-Margret the legendary icon.
- Ann the legendary...
Which you say is your father's Christmas gift.
- Christmas come early.
- Yes.
And then the lady that plays your mom is an acting teacher.
- Yeah, Alderman.
- From Chicago.
Jane, and she's a good actress and she's also a casting director.
And she had a couple of lines in this scene that got cut out
- and she did a great job with it.
But...
- The first time you busted actually.
But it was married to the marriage proposal that went and so once that kind of false marriage proposal went then her lines went.
With my a cappella group, The Tone Rangers.
Although it's not as aggressive...
I don't know how this scene took three days to shoot.
And I don't know how Michael Higgins did it.
There was not one...
I don't know how you decided what to cut into this scene from him because it was endless.
- Well, everything he did was funny.
- Always.
But, you know, whenever you have this many people in a scene, and you have singing and you have him moving, there's a lot of coverage there.
You need to shoot the scene.
So it took a lot longer than your normal scene.
It took almost three days to shoot this scene.
And it's always great to have the uncomfortable pauses there where people aren't connecting but they're sort of trying to, they're just speaking different languages.
And what I'm talking about...
I'm glad that I shot my coverage on the third day 'cause I...
Let me just show you how it's done.
... sort of gotten my giggles out.
And again there's character backstory here.
You see that Gary doesn't have a father.
He has two brothers.
And then of course, Brooke is very tight with her brother.
And they're kind of more comfortable with music and expressing ideas and being vulnerable in situations.
Gary, on the kick drum.
Come, come.
That's Gary on the kick drum.
Go!
And Gary.
In the house.
- Come, come.
- I'm not with you.
Nothing better than your brother being completely inappropriate with your current boyfriend, and you just know there's no way.
This is an enjoyable moment.
Meantime, I've gotta talk to Brooke about something.
- It's called the bass line.
Excuse me.
- Okay.
Of course, it's great 'cause Michael Higgins is coming from a place where he loves this music and it's so fantastic he can't wait to share it with everyone else, and bring everyone together and find a way for the families to communicate.
And he just sort of assumes that this is gonna be a great time and everyone's gonna really love this and go with this.
Yes, Dennis.
And Gary here thinks that it's getting a little uncomfortable.
He's not sure what's happening but it's not his thing.
Move yourself
You always live your life
Never thinking of the future
Prove yourself
And there was lot of funny stuff on this as well.
And you'll see the editing style again.
We cut out before the scene is actually over with, you just sort of fill in how it must've ended.
You realise that Gary, the most important stuff, is not into it.
Brooke is kind of uncomfortable with how it's going.
You're every move you make
And Higgins is going full throttle.
So you could sort of carry the energy of how the dinner must've gone into this.
That Gary's exhausted and fried and not really sure what happened to him.
What was there?
Was there an ending on the...
There was an end.
Yeah, there's a thing that's actually on the DVD in extended scenes where I sort of put a stop to his singing and draw it to an end.
And although it's sort of funny...
- It's a little mean.
...it's just better for momentum.
- It wasn't mean at all.
- Wasn't it?
No, 'cause I think people can sort of relate that...
- Do we feel bad for Michael?
...you would wanna get out of it.
- We felt bad for Michael...
- A little bit, but I think it was funny.
But it's just about pacing, two minutes, you get that idea you just want to go to the next scene.
- Oh, it was such fun.
- Great.
- I love you.
- Great to see you.
I like it when Michael Higgins says, "You should come see me singing live."
And Gary says, "It was good to see you."
He's over it.
He's exhausted.
You saw him on the bus.
He feels that he did his duty, from his point of view that he was there, he was present, he put up with Michael's singing at dinner, and now he's gonna try to check out.
And, of course, Brooke is coming from a place of...
Yes, and feeling frustrated.
I cooked all day, I worked all day, cleaned the house and, you know, I would...
It's not unreasonable to want a little help.
...get them a little bit later.
I'm just gonna hit the streets here for a little bit.
Gary, come on, I don't want to do them later.
Let's just do them now.
It'll take 15 minutes.
Honey, I am so exhausted.
I just honestly want to relax for a little bit.
If I could just sit here, let my food digest, and just try to enjoy the quiet for a little bit.
Get some!
Get some!
Get some!
That's what happens.
This scene, actually, is completely scripted.
There was no...
Not even a little bit of straying from the text.
Yeah.
If there is, it's like one added line or something like that.
But this is virtually as scripted.
This scene was really...
We felt really strongly that this was really kind of perfect.
And if you would improvise when the scene was this long to begin with, you'd end up with a scene that was just way too long.
You just said that you want me to help you do the dishes.
- I want you to want to do the dishes.
- Why would I want to do dishes?
Why?
And then it sort of is the theme of the movie that these two people are not communicating well and they're sort of speaking different languages, they're not understanding what the other one wants.
- And neither one is feeling appreciated.
- Right.
And they're not really talking about the things that are actually going on.
Don't you call me crazy.
I am not crazy.
Here they're really talking about all the things now that they haven't been talking about.
And even in the "12 lemons" scene, it's like you sort of hold things in, you don't say things when they bother you.
And then the smallest thing can kind of ignite.
Break the camel's back.
Can light kind of an argument because you're putting a lot more focus and attention on the lemons or playing the video game, because it's really been a long buildup of a lot of those little events that you haven't addressed.
I do seem to remember doing something for you this morning without you asking.
And Gary trying not to argue and find sort of a way out of it.
But she's...
She's not having it.
She will not have it.
In the past, she might've let him off the hook but tonight it's sort of gone on too long, and she really wants to get her point across.
She's not feeling appreciated, she's not feeling understood.
And it's not okay anymore.
...likes flowers, Gary.
You said that you don't like flowers.
I'm supposed to take that to mean that you do like flowers?
No.
This is not about...
You're not...
God, you're not getting it.
You're not getting this, Gary, okay?
It's not about the lemons.
It's not about the flowers.
It's not about the dishes.
It's just about...
How many times...
And he truthfully isn't getting it.
Well, then she's not explaining it very clearly either.
She's sort of all over the place.
That's what was so great about this scene.
...flopping around for three hours.
It's like a medieval techno show.
It's a nightmare.
I sit there in a sweat.
The whole thing, I do, wondering when the hell's the goddamn nightmare gonna end.
- Go to a damn ballet.
- It's not about you loving the ballet, Gary.
It's about the person that you love loves the ballet and you wanting to spend time with that person.
Not when they're at the ballet.
And why don't you just know that?
We don't go anywhere together.
We just went to Ann Arbor.
Yeah, see there's the real issue.
To the Michigan-Notre Dame game.
Well, I think they're all kind of the real issues.
It's about not going anywhere together, it's about not helping clean up, it's about not helping prepare the meal.
And she sort of feels like he's not present at all.
And she just feels like she does a lot and he doesn't do it.
And now he doesn't feel like what he does is worth anything.
...so I can make enough money to support both of us...
He's trying to work and, I think, also Gary wishes he could provide and...
He's old-fashioned that way.
Sort of old-fashioned, feels like he's sort of falling short.
He's not really pulling his weight, that he's really been successful at his career.
And you can see kind of he feels sort of insecure...
All you do is nag me!
He's very honest in this moment.
"...you should probably go work out."
He sort of feels like he's falling short everywhere and he's tired of trying and not making her happy, and he's not understanding it.
Really?
Is that what you want, Gary?
- Is that what you want?
- Yeah.
- That's what you want?
- Yeah.
Fine.
Great.
Do whatever the hell you want.
You leave your socks all over this house, dress like a pig, play your stupid-ass video game.
I don't care, I'm done.
And she's gonna draw a line in the sand.
I'm done!
I don't deserve this.
I really do not deserve this.
I deserve somebody who gives a shit.
Just tired of just being the only one working on the relationship with some inconsiderate prick!
... and trying to make everything okay.
And it's gotten to a point where she can't pretend anymore.
It's not okay.
And I really like this moment here.
It's like they both kind of get to this point, and she's upset and she realises that she can't really give in because bad boundaries have been set.
And he's upset about the fact that, you know, he got upset and kind of played his hand very strongly.
And then she kind of responded by getting mad and going into the room and now he's sort of in this moment of thinking about going in there.
She's sort of hoping he comes in.
- And he doesn't.
- It's hard to sort of make that commitment to drawing a line in the sand and then...
If it's not what you're used to.
They both sort of feel like...
Gary feels like if he goes into the bedroom now to talk to her, you know, he's not really sure that that's the best thing to do.
This is where they start to stand in their corners.
She, of course, says, "I'm done.
I'm done."
But she was waiting by the door sort of hoping he came in.
And they're processing everything that just happened.
Addie, it just became so clear...
There was more phone call scenes that we've included in the DVD as well.
- Where she first originally...
Yeah.
- With the mom?
The mom calls her to thank her for dinner.
Ann-Margret which was great in the scene.
But again it was just...
And Richard calls and then we have...
And that sort of jumps to the different...
But it was just better to get on point which was this scene, which is really kind of the mission statement of the movie.
This is sort of...
Once this scene is in play you sort of know what the movie, what you're waiting to see happen.
At the end of the scene she says...
Even in the beginning she says,
"I didn't want to break up with him.
I just wanted him to participate. "
And she goes on to say,
"I just want him to come home and apologise. "
I just want him to care enough about this relationship to want to work on it.
That's what she wants.
She wants him to care enough about the relationship to want to work on it.
Of course, that's Peter Billingsley from the movie Christmas Story.
- Ralphie.
- Ralphie.
All grown up.
He was the executive producer on the movie.
- Long-time friend of Vince's.
- Yes.
And Joey Lauren Adams is a very good actress as well.
- Who plays Addie...
- Addie.
... who is Brooke's best friend.
Whose original name in the script was Margo.
No, it was something different before that.
He's got some changes to make and he's gonna...
He's gonna come home and apologise.
This last statement here is sort of, you know, what Brooke wants to have happen in the movie.
She just again...
Wants him to come home and apologise.
And wants him to go wanna work on the relationship, but she feels like it's gone too far.
"You're done with the relationship?"
So, Gary's coming here sort of searching for some advice.
I'm a little shocked.
I'm a little surprised.
And that's Jon Favreau, great actor.
This is another one where you set up two cameras and you guys just improved.
Yeah, some of these lines were in the script but we would diverge so there's some improvisation in this as well, and some of this we sort of planned.
But this is great, 'cause it's like Favreau sort of imposes on the situation his reality of what he went through in a relationship.
- Yeah.
He's projecting.
- He's projecting.
He had a situation with a girl and he found out she was cheating on him.
And she was kind of...
And he doesn't believe Gary.
Gary doesn't believe him that she's probably sleeping with someone.
Gary doesn't believe that she really wants to be out of the relationship.
And, of course, Johnny O thinks that she does because that's what happened to him.
...and I believe her.
Now, we gotta figure it out.
And you're gonna need a place to go.
And now, Gary's starting to listen to him.
Maybe he's right.
Maybe...
- I'm not moving out of the place.
- Oh, you're not moving out.
No.
I put money in the place.
I put half my money in the place.
And so Gary sort of falls into that kind of protective space of saying,
"I'm not moving out.
I'm not gonna...
Why would I be the one to move out?"
- "I'm fine with this." Yeah. "I don't care." - "I'm fine.
"I'm not hurt.
I'm okay.
I'm gonna win the battle...
- His walls are going up.
- "...of who gets to keep the place?" Yeah.
'Cause he doesn't want to be embarrassed in front of his friend, and Favreau sort of represents the male ego side of things.
Of, you know, worried about perception and how you're coming off.
I'll leave you a key.
And so now you know where sort of Gary's coming from.
He feels like Johnny O's informed him that she's probably gonna try to keep the place, and she probably already has a relationship going on, and he doesn't want to be more embarrassed than he is.
And then this is sort of both of their truce.
She's obviously not asleep, she's awake.
- Waiting.
- Waiting for him to come home.
And come in the room again, maybe.
He comes home.
He sort of thinks about going in the room.
But he remembers what, you know, Johnny O said.
And Johnny O, you know, told him, obviously, that she's probably sleeping with someone else.
"She's gonna probably try to keep the condo.
"You're not calling the shots here."
She hears him walk away from the door.
Of course, the score here is done by Jon Brion who's a great composer.
Such a beautiful tone.
And I think he really elevated the movie with the theme that he found.
It has sort of a bitter-sweet comedic feel to it but there's a bitter-sweetness to it as well.
And, again, I think this is kind of a very universal situation where communication breaks down and people are sort of being stubborn.
You feel too vulnerable to bring yourselves to sort of talk about everything and kind of air it out.
And as a result, they're both kind of sitting there waiting to see what the other one's gonna do, but not really happy with the fact of how things are.
And here you sort of see that Gary's sort of hurt over it.
- Yeah.
- And he's not okay with the situation.
And again, if they were to talk to each other after the break-up, they might have been in a different place but he sort of went to his friend to talk and his friend gave him bad advice that he responded to.
- Yeah.
- You know, I was thinking.
You know what you should do, is you should find somebody who looks like Brooke, but even hotter and, you know, bang the shit out of her.
What the hell's wrong with you?
More bad advice.
Well, it also shows that he's obviously been talking about it.
It's bothering Gary.
He doesn't agree with finding someone to sleep with.
It's not where his head's at.
And we establish the tour logs, obviously, which pay off later.
I'm going through a little bit of a life change here, Dennis.
I would really appreciate a little bit of sensitivity, please.
You see a little insensitive on the brother part.
Just about business and sort of set up for stuff to come later.
...but that has nothing to do with it.
Why don't you to talk us through this scene, Miss Aniston.
This is the scene where, day after, she's coming to work, and we obviously see now that it's spread like wildfire already.
Come here.
- From the scene that we deleted.
- Yeah.
But it still makes sense.
And there's Marilyn Dean, of course...
- There's Judy Davis.
...which is Judy Davis.
- It was your idea for the film.
- I was a big fan.
Big fan of Judy Davis for many years.
And we couldn't figure out who was gonna be the Marilyn Dean.
Remember the day after we had thought of her, too, there was a big article in the newspaper on her and her career.
We, sort of, felt like that was a good sign.
- She's a great actress.
- She's a great actress.
We were very happy she said yes.
- The Marilyn Dean Gallery.
- And of whom is that portrait?
It's so great, too, 'cause the central characters,
Brooke and Gary, are pretty centred people and it is sort of fun to see the eccentricities of the supporting cast with Michael Higgins and Judy.
And when you look like shit,
Marilyn Dean looks like shit, and now it is my business.
And when it comes to my business, I don't like anything that's distracting.
So, I want you to take the rest of the day off to be sad and then come back to work tomorrow ready to take care of business.
Got it?
And we're kind of informing the audience that she's sad by what Judy Davis is saying.
And this is the band Social Distortion which I've always been a fan of.
This was written in the original screenplay to be the song we were very glad that they...
- That was originally in there?
- Yeah.
And, of course, they had the argument over the pool table at dinner.
And now you got the poker on the background and he's moved a pool table in.
And, of course, Favreau's with him.
He wants to show Favreau that he's not gonna be pushed around.
But we know from the night before, with him in bed, that this is not what he really wants to have happen.
- And, of course, the great Jason Bateman.
- The great Jason Bateman.
And it does feel good.
I'm gonna go ahead and put the four ball in the corner pocket.
Nice.
Favreau's shirt says, "Pinche rio."
- What does it say?
- Kind of a poker term.
- Oh.
- In Spanish.
It's hard to shoot with someone standing...
Thank you.
All right, if this is how you want to play it.
Now this is additional photography.
We had a different scene in here originally with Joey on the beach with her two kids alone.
Her character was a little kind of extreme with kind of being extremely kind of self-help, and so we went back and thought we could get a big laugh here and, obviously, this was really funny.
And it kind of included Peter in the dynamic as well.
And she kind of gives advice, which is kind of sound advice,
- but Brooke's obviously upset and...
- Yeah.
It's like that...
- Gonna do what she wanna do anyway.
- Right.
You know, you're definitely not gonna tolerate it.
Right?
She sort of interprets the advice in a more extreme way.
Yeah, she does follow the advice.
It's just not...
- She thinks, "If a little's good, a lot's great."
- Yeah.
Yes.
That's that sort of cliché dynamic with girlfriends when, of course, they all want to give advice.
Great.
Perfect choice of music.
Alanis right here.
But, you know, when you're getting advice from your girlfriend, and the sound advice makes sense and everything but you really just want to do this sometimes.
Can't help yourself.
- I'm going to get a cab.
- I'll split it with you.
Favreau's look at him is sort of like, "Okay, this is the situation.
I was right."
Which is making Gary even more so believe that Favreau was right.
Yeah.
- I'm trying to make a point.
- And what is that point?
This is exposition which is important, though, what she says, you kind of get that she wants Gary back.
Still, it's not that she doesn't but she's trying to set boundaries.
She's trying to also sneak by her best friend that she kind of heeded the advice but not really.
And Joey's sort of surprised that it did work because obviously he showed up, so maybe there's something that works in her...
- A method to the madness.
- Yes.
Thanks for laying it out.
Gary, are you here for couples bowling?
She's kind of opening the door for him to apologise.
"Are you here for couples bowling?" And, "Is there something we should discuss?"
Like hoping he'd say, "Well, I'm sorry and I'm gonna try at the relationship. "
Yeah. "And I'm ready to be a couple again."
You know, but if you don't really kind of talk directly and put it on the table in a clear way what it is that you're after, with your actions that you may think are leading someone towards that
can be misinterpreted and start to spiral, and then they do an action, it just gets worse and worse.
And, of course, he's not understanding any of it.
- I don't believe him.
- He didn't understand any of the speech.
I don't have any idea what's happening.
I've come to play on the team.
I think that's really sincere.
He's just come to play.
- He knows.
- He doesn't know.
He doesn't understand what that speech meant.
He's listening to Johnny O.
He thinks that she might be with someone else.
She's trying to embarrass him.
She's trying to get him out of the condo.
He doesn't want to believe that but he's given over to listening to sort of Johnny O saying it's a possibility.
"If she's saying she doesn't want to be with you, I believe her. "
...get in the way of victory.
And I've made a commitment to this team.
Because he showed up to make it like it didn't bother him.
The only reason he showed up for the bowling team was to make it, like, to his friends, to sort of save face like he's okay if she doesn't want to be with him.
He's okay with it.
He made a commitment to the team.
You know what?
Let's just...
Why don't we let them decide?
And now they're kind of getting in petty stuff and it's kind of fun to do a comedic version of showing that.
But he really kind of thinks that, you know, he's a good bowler, they'll want him there.
Team vote here.
By a show of hands, just put it up when you make a decision, who here agrees with Brooke and thinks...
- And there's some funny stuff that we shot...
- I feel bad for Gary in this scene.
- I got to tell you.
- At the end of it, yeah.
The girls are kind of leading the vote here with the guys.
Peter doesn't really want him off the team because Peter wants to win a championship.
- His priorities are straight.
- But he's kind of in line with Joey.
Or Addie.
Band of Brothers.
You should rent it sometime.
Gary feels like the guys kind of betrayed him.
Good luck, everyone.
Still trying to play it off like it doesn't bother him.
- Like they don't get it.
- Oh, this is going to help.
I'm gonna need your shirt back.
Salt on a wound.
And this isn't really part of Brooke's plan.
This is kind of just Peter's character not wanting to jeopardise the entire season over this domestic dispute.
But actually, we know a guy named Gary.
And he's not as tall as you...
Peter Billingsley at the table read, when we were doing the table read, this character hadn't been cast yet.
And he blew everybody away, and I remember not knowing that Peter was a producer at the table read.
I don't think I'd met him yet.
And you thought they'd already cast him that part.
I thought, "Boy, they cast a winner.
He's fantastic. "
- Peter's a great actor.
- It was so funny.
It killed.
I hope your wrist snaps.
And then afterwards he shook my hand, after the table read, thanking me.
And I was wondering, "Why is this actor
"coming up and shaking my hand so officially. "
I always wanted Peter to play the part but the table reading kind of solidified it for everyone, which was great.
- Where's that?
Shirtless in the parking lot?
- Addie, you're not getting this.
Gary loves this bowling team.
He's hurt right now.
He's feeling pretty bad.
He's gonna go out there...
And, of course, she's kind of saying...
Addie said that, you know, on the phone call that Brooke kind of established that she wanted him to come home and apologise.
And she's not understanding Brooke's strategy here.
And Brooke's sort of laying out that by him realising that...
- He's lost the glue.
- Yeah.
That that will make him come home and realise how much he's missing.
And if he wants that life back, he's gonna have no choice but to change.
Cole Hauser's a good actor.
This scene was designed that he kind of went out to try to, you know, even convince himself that he could move on and, of course...
He's in a different environment, with techno music and nightclubs, than sort of when he was younger, what it was like out on the dating scene.
And it's a totally different world.
He's really a fish out of water here.
Lupus, I got to be totally...
I got to be honest with you.
I'm not feeling it here.
And he doesn't like it.
It's not his element.
How you doing, Buzz?
While you were on the inside locked up for the past two years, the game has changed.
And, of course, Lupus is referring to relationships as kind of being locked up, being in prison.
...when you were an outdoor cat...
And now that he's been in a relationship, he's kind of soft.
He's forgotten how to sort of approach girls.
This is kind of a play like on the Swingers and all that stuff with, you know, playing characters that was always kind of good.
Kind of liked talking to girls and hitting on girls.
And now, it's sort of, you know, Hauser's explaining,
Lupus, my brother's explaining that there's a whole different rule book now.
It's no longer like "the wait two days" and that kind of stuff, that it's the Internet and the TiVo.
And you just got to get to brass tacks and go do it.
And there were some other stuff in this scene that got cut out,
I think might be in the extended scenes as well, where he hits on this waitress in kind of an aggressive way and she turns him down.
And then he hits on these two girls in a kind of an aggressive way, and they turn him down.
And then, of course, Gary is done listening to his advice.
And then we cut out a thing where Gary walks through the club and actually goes and talks to a girl at the bar, which is a funny scene, which will be on the extended scenes as well, I believe.
And then afterwards when the girl walks away from him, after another guy comes up and really aggressive hits on her and the girl says yes, Gary looks out into the dance floor and Lupus is kind of making out with both the girls that turned him down,
which is very funny.
But it was just sort of a pacing thing, of moving the story in advance, of who the main story is about, which is Gary and Brooke.
You kind of got there that he went out and was sort of open to it.
Not that he really wanted to date anyone, but he sort of went out to see what it would be like.
And it seemed like it was, for pacing of this story, you want to get these two characters and advance the "A" story, which is these two characters.
And where are you sketching?
- In the living room.
- No, in my bedroom.
And I didn't say anything to you, Brooke.
And now they're starting to draw boundaries and it's starting to escalate.
You can't just waltz into my room and turn it into a damn art fair.
The playing field.
She was kind of waiting in his bedroom because she was hoping he'd come home and apologise.
She sort of planted herself to make it easy for him...
She set herself up.
Yeah.
... because she thought he'd come home after a bad night and apologise.
And, of course, he comes in even more protective and more trying to make it like it's not bothering him.
It starts to digress more.
- This was a fun scene to shoot.
- It was a fun scene.
Gary, it is 2:00 in the morning!
Of course, the Chicago Cubs again.
I don't know what to tell you, kid.
This is how I am when I'm single.
My hours start to get pretty strange.
Might be time for you to think about moving out.
And he's fighting the battle that Favreau established, that who's gonna win the condo.
And they're sort of on two different wavelengths of what's going on here.
I don't give a shit.
He took her kind of literal that she was done.
Her plan is backfiring.
- What the hell are you doing?
- You're not even gonna watch it!
- Don't tell me what I am or aren't not doing.
- Oh, what you are not, not doing?
- Go learn some English.
- Oh, I'm sorry.
I didn't have a grandfather on the board of some fancy college.
Key word being "was." Did he touch the Filipino exchange student?
And that's the improvise, the exchange student.
No, don't start with the family stuff.
Like your family's so perfect?
Your brother's a pervert!
Don't talk to me about the sexual habits of family members.
This is all scripted.
Jay Lavender and Jeremy Garelick, the writers, did a really good job of writing a lot of really funny stuff.
Really funny stuff.
Problems?
She slept with the entire Arizona Cardinals offensive line.
That's not problems.
And that's kind of an homage.
I was friends with a lot of the Arizona Cardinals offensive line years ago and a lot of them are no longer playing.
They're out of the NFL.
But I kind of put that in as an homage to some of my friends that did play for the Cardinals.
Richard is not gay.
And, of course...
Okay, lassie, I want you to listen to me and listen good.
I'm not saying he won't get married.
I'm not saying he won't even have kids.
But then one day his wife will come home, and then she'll find him with a guy named Majulio.
And again, it's like in relationships when you start arguing about family members, and that's really when you can kind of have a sore spot.
- It's like, you can say something...
- About your family.
... about you family members that isn't necessarily great, but as soon as your significant other says something...
- It's war.
...it turns into a fight.
- How beautiful, Chicago.
- It's a great city.
Of course, he was up, obviously, last night late and this is very early in the morning.
And you're not quite sure what's going on.
You don't know if this is score music or whatever, but it's, obviously, The Tone Rangers rehearsing down the hall.
And it's kind of waking him up.
He's trying to get comfortable and ignore it and sleep.
But she's following the rules that she can do whatever she wants
- in her room.
- In her room.
She's battling back and she's gonna fight him tooth and nail and win the kind of cold war and get him to apologise.
And he keeps taking it the other way, which is she's really trying to get rid of him.
- To get rid of him.
- But he's not gonna lose it.
And, of course, he's got the Polish stuff on the shirt again.
Grobowski.
He's Polish.
And there's a lot of Polish people in Chicago.
So I thought it would be authentic.
And you never really see a lot of Polish people in the movie.
I'm not Polish but I've always had a lot of Polish friends.
So I thought it would be fun to make Gary Polish.
Actually, Gary, this is Brooke's bedroom.
So, technically...
And these guys are all real a cappella singers.
They came and auditioned to form the band The Tone Rangers.
- They were great.
- They're fantastic.
You got 10 seconds to get out of here or I'm gonna break your damn magic whistle.
You understand what I'm saying to you?
Move this group...
And all the stunt stuff is done by my stunt, Joey Bucaro, who's been my stuntman for a long time.
He coordinated the whole movie.
He did a great job making that fight look really violent.
Really violent.
- Coming from Richard...
- You wouldn't expect it.
He's kind of like a really trained guy and Gary wasn't really expecting for there to be a fight.
He was just telling him to leave he wasn't even looking to hurt him and this guy kind of hits him in the throat and in the stomach and...
He got...
And he's waiting for her to see the work that she's done.
And he wants to kind of wait there and have her...
Then he kind of overdoes it with the ice on his neck, and maybe kind of put it in her face.
- This is one of my favourite scenes.
- This is a great scene.
We had fun shooting this.
And there's a lot of funny improv stuff, again, that's extended stuff in DVD, that's really funny when you see it and you just see sort of like abbreviated highlight version of it.
It's really funny.
But, again, when you're dealing with the overall pacing of the movie, you can stop for some funny stuff, but when it starts to become just about making jokes and not moving the story, it can affect the pacing even though it's funny in the moment.
- We had a lot of good jokes in this scene.
- A lot of...
You went off on the counter.
You had so much fun.
- Right.
- That's right!
We can make shit real uncomfortable around here.
- And we improvised a lot of this stuff, too.
- Yeah.
You're just embarrassed because Richard kicked your ass.
Richard did not kick my ass.
What Richard did was attack me when I was half asleep.
Really?
Is that how you see it?
There's a really big gap between getting your ass kicked...
And this here is all improvised.
...and having a dancing, singing sprite fool you with trickery and then strike your throat before you know that you're even in a fight.
And I wouldn't expect someone like you to understand that, because all you ever do is make moves from up in your ivy tower.
My ivory tower.
Wow.
You have officially gone off the reservation.
I'm an adult.
I talk through shit.
He ran out of ideas.
But this is her kind of Brer Rabbit.
She still wants to keep him engaged.
She knows...
She's trying to make him feel like, playing right into his ego.
Of course, he's gonna step in to wanting to host the game night.
- You want to host game night?
- I'm fine, Brooke.
I don't have any strangeness over what happened here today.
He tried to say he doesn't feel weird about what happened.
He's totally comfortable with everything's that's going on.
Nothing can embarrass him, nothing makes him uncomfortable.
- Great.
- Great.
- Fine.
- Fine.
And she's just baiting him into game night 'cause she's trying to keep him around to make him realise what he's losing.
She doesn't want to push him away.
- Hey, there's no food in there!
- So?
Well, people are gonna be here in an hour.
And, of course, she's trying to make him realise how much she does do in the relationship and how much he should appreciate her.
- So, this is sort of his answer to it.
- Yeah.
Like the baloney and the stuff, and he doesn't really clean up and...
He doesn't clean up a thing.
Puts it all in the cupboards.
We have only tap water because...
She does a good job, even just there, that actress, of just kind of like smiling politely in the catastrophe of everything.
And it's kind of fishing and sowing, and the girls are in the kitchen and the boys are playing pool.
You got to play by the rules.
It's your shot.
She's so good.
- Andrew.
- Oh, hi.
Whoa, whoa, whoa!
Hey, hey, hey!
And, of course, he kind of lost the bowling alley vote
- so he's gonna now try to...
- Right.
Re-enact.
... see if he can win this one and get them to leave here 'cause it's kind of his home turf.
He's trying to win at something.
Gary.
Who thinks that these two traitors should leave and not be a part of game night?
And maybe take their shirts off when they leave.
Raise your hand.
And it was Favreau's idea to always have...
Like in the beginning if you look at the opening pictures he's with different girls.
He just always wanted to be with different girls so he didn't have one consistent girlfriend throughout.
And this was improvised here.
This was Favreau's idea that he didn't know his girlfriend's name and he sort of forgot her name when she came over.
No.
We need the eight to count towards a running tally.
You know that.
Come on.
Show her whose side that you're on.
Put your hand in the air.
You know we need eight, though.
Come on.
Put your hand down.
It's not quite going the way he had planned.
Please don't touch my Ruffles.
But then he's gonna at least win the Ruffle thing.
He's not gonna let Peter Billingsley's character eat.
- A Ruffle.
- 'Cause those are
Gary's Ruffles and he's gonna win that one.
That's the one thing he did win is that Andrew's not allowed to eat his Ruffles.
Got your full bag of potato chips.
- A house.
- Home plate!
- Football!
Baseball!
Sports.
A house.
- A triangle.
It's algebra.
- Okay, it's a house.
- It's a house.
It's so great.
Every time I see these scenes I hear something different every time.
Fruit.
Oh, restaurant.
Or...
- No, chimney, chimney.
- Smoke...
- Oh, a house call.
- House call!
Oh!
House call!
Yeah, well, I thought it was a house call.
Have you had a lot of game nights that you've played where you'd have people over and play different games and compete with stuff?
Yeah.
Oh, yeah.
- What game...
- Pictionary, this one.
We played Pictionary, running charades.
And Pictionary was kind of made famous,
I remember that TVshow with Burt Reynolds.
Yeah.
- I heard you!
- Well, just keep it simple.
- Ready?
Wait.
Go!
- Here we go!
We're mind-melding.
Draw faster.
It doesn't have to be beautiful,
- just has to be something we can get.
- Shoe, shoe...
Shoe!
Shoe, shoe, shoe.
Shoeless Joe Jackson.
Draw something different.
No one's getting it.
- Shoe.
What, is that a smaller shoe?
- Baby shoe.
- Smaller shoe.
Baby shoes.
- Shoes.
Her whole thing here is she's an artist and works at an art gallery but she's not the best kind of Pictionary drawer.
And Gary really wants to win.
He's trying to win.
Stop pointing at the shoe and draw something different.
And this is really just sort of about the game and then he's really frustrated and of course they have a lot of tension with each other so it's kind of coming out a little more extreme than it should.
Everyone said "shoe" seven times.
It's a sock, asshole.
She's not gonna put up with it.
You call yourself an artist?
And now they start to digress even more and...
Another bit of improvising here.
And of course Gary as he gets everything wrong, says Picasso and it was Van Gogh that did it.
Just like the 16th Chapel versus Sistine Chapel.
Or "learn some English."
And you see through the friends, sort of reacting.
Jason Bateman is so great in this scene.
And this is really...
He's the realtor.
You established that in the pool table scene.
And it's almost like they're with a counsellor and this is like a therapy for a couples counselling and he's kind of a psychiatrist except for the fact that he's the realtor.
And it's really about the living situation, but it also kind of works as if he was a therapist who was gonna try to communicate between the couple.
Yeah.
Put an end to the madness.
But neither of them...
It's clear, that they...
You see them both sort of struggling with the reality.
And Gary's so off of Johnny O's advice trying to hold onto the condo and not be embarrassed, although what he really wants is to be back together with her.
...to pay me some sort of a penalty as compensation for
- the labour that I did all around the condo.
- What?
What?
What?
Pay you compensation for your labour?
We fixed this place up together.
That's not the apology that she wanted.
You went around with a sponge, and you went in the bathroom and you dotted foofy shit.
And it's kind of like the true thing, like when you have like a therapist there.
They're both trying to convince him that they're right.
Yeah.
They're having the person in the middle there and they start trying to convince him, like to get him to agree and tell the other person they're wrong.
Right.
The holes that you drilled in the wall there to hang up whatever that thing is called.
Oh, please.
Gary.
You're gonna have to cost money to fix that.
What I did, Brooke, has concrete value to the condo.
He's trying to get him to agree.
He's saying "Let's go on record.
We're dealing with the facts. "
- Have you seen...
- I did the new track lighting.
- That tile is the shittiest tile job.
- I did the plumbing!
- The plumbing!
- That's realty terms.
Okay.
Let's talk about your plumbing.
This is his plumbing.
We have two temperatures in our bathroom.
We get either scalding hot or we get frostbite.
- That's it.
That's all we get.
- It's my problem that she doesn't know how to pace a shower?
"Pace a shower."
I get one minute to take a shower.
- One minute?
- One minute of warmth?
And they're talking about the condo.
Thank God you're not in charge of keeping all the clocks in Chicago on time.
- This is basic logic.
- You are out of your mind.
You have lost it.
And now they're sort of throwing each other in the course.
Cheese and rice, you guys are gonna kill each other.
Now, let's just...
And this scene is really kind of, you know, exposition in a way because this is sort of the end of the first run which was sort of the condo being up for grabs.
Of course, her hoping that he comes back and apologises, and Gary goes on the mission after his conversation with Johnny O's character that he's gonna try to get the condo and get her to move out.
And this is really sort of the end of that run and then, you know, the next scene is the start of the new run.
And Jason does such a good job of making this really entertaining and really a fun, entertaining scene.
But, really, there's a lot of pipe being laid down in this scene that really is important to make sure that the audience is sort of understanding the story.
- That's great.
Thank you.
- That's great.
Thank you for that.
I wish I didn't have to, you know, but company policy says I cannot waive that.
- Not without his own agenda, also.
- No, of course.
In this situation, 'cause we're friends...
I love that hand move there.
No can do, though.
- "No can do."
- He's so good.
As soon as you can, I would love to get a set of keys from you guys.
You just drop them off.
Okay.
Great.
There they are.
And there's Gary's.
He'll show he's ready to go.
Making like nothing's bothering him.
You won't even know I'm here.
The good news is, should move quickly.
All right.
Okay to leave you two alone now?
Got to get back to Jen.
And Jason kind of added this line here.
Okay.
- "Okay."
- Leave them alone.
And they're both kind of left with each other, neither one willing to talk.
Getting worse.
- But a beautiful score again by Jon Brion.
- It's so beautiful.
Addie, if the condo sells, I think I'm gonna lose him.
Yeah, but game night was so light and fun, I'm really surprised to be hearing this.
Okay.
You know what?
That's not constructive.
Really.
I just...
Yeah, I need a new plan, Addie.
I don't...
I'm just kidding.
It's me.
I'm gonna have to call you back.
Whenever one of my friends is down, we all go on, like, happy patrol.
I was actually having a very serious conversation.
Sort of a misdirection here.
You think she's gonna get the information from Joey.
If you're happy and you know it Clap your hands
And Justin kind of in a funny way, kind of throws us off-story for a second.
Clap your hands
If you're happy and you know it You're going to smile to...
In the original script, this sort of pays off more that Justin likes to sing.
Obviously he's singing Happy Holidays when he answers the phone in the first scene.
And then he's singing again here.
And you'll see on the extended scenes that there's kind of a surprise with The Tone Rangers performing live at the end.
Then you see now that Justin is now a member of The Tone Rangers
- and, sort of, his dreams have been fulfilled.
- Found his calling.
Which was always funny, but we sort of found that when the characters walk away, it became a little more poignant with the emotional scenes and that your sort of "A" story was over.
And when you went to The Tone Rangers, although it was funny, it just bumped so quickly after those two walking away from each other that you weren't really in the mood for something that was kind of
that comedic at that time.
And this is a scene where now Brooke is...
Her job's very much on the line, so she now realises that if she sort of goes to Marilyn in a way that she needs her advice...
But I think what's most important for her is to get the advice.
- Yes, she's...
She'll go anywhere.
- She's really kind of desperate and she figures Marilyn Dean's like this strong, confident woman who's obviously...
Always with men.
Yeah.
We saw her smack the guy's ass earlier in the movie, that she would probably be able to give her the answer to what could save the relationship.
But what she first tried, Brooke, didn't work.
The kind of setting boundaries and fighting fire with fire and so now she's going, "Okay, well, this woman will probably know...
- Yeah.
- "...what's the right thing to do."
Yeah.
And her advice is this.
- That's it?
- Yeah.
Honey, this is not surrealism or cubism.
And we sort of as an audience think it probably will work because
Marilyn Dean's such a confident person who kind of just runs stuff like a businesswoman that you sort of feel like, "Okay, this probably will get good results. "
And of course, with Telly Savalas in...
Telly Savalas was your godfather.
I know.
And that was just a coincidence.
Then go show Gary your immaculate canvas and let him see another man eager to paint it.
Got it?
Sounds like good advice to me.
Got it?
- Coming from Marilyn Dean?
- Yeah.
And there was some stuff here that was kind of funny in this scene that we have in the extended scenes, too, where she kind of was naming different '70s TVstars.
She said...
The Baretta.
"The secret to living with someone is alternating between different '70s TVstars. "
"Who loves you baby?"
Who loves you, baby?
And the...
Dan Lebental came in, the editor, and did a great job with this whole sequence here.
And it was kind of his idea to kind of add the boxing and stuff to sell that joke and...
Jonathan Karp who's...
Came up and found this Telly Savalas song.
This is really Telly Savalas singing, "Who loves you, baby?"
"Who loves you?" Who knew?
- Which is a song he recorded.
- In the '70s.
The combination of the two of them really made this sequence really funny.
...terrorising his opponent.
Down he goes!
"Down he goes."
Slams him to the canvas.
- And there he is.
There's Telly.
- There's Telly.
"Who loves you baby?"
- This, I think I can sing this...
- "By now you ought to know."
... because we have the rights to it.
She's feeling good.
She's getting his attention.
This is working and he is
- affected by it.
- It worked.
You might recognise this next actor because he played in Wedding Crashers as Isla Fisher's younger brother.
- The artist.
- Who fell in love with you.
I really liked Keir and thought he was great and so when we were doing this
I thought he'd be a great guy to come over and kind of play the taxman.
He doesn't know what he's coming into.
Human bombs, he's not quite sure.
- He wasn't warned.
- What is happening.
Cool, baby, cool.
And, of course, this is Grand Theft Auto which a lot of people play.
We really wanted to make the video games, games that like, people really play a lot.
So, how do you and Brooke know each other?
He's kind of a little uncomfortable, just trying to make it normal.
Gary messing with him and he gets where Gary's coming from.
- That's a nice dress, Jennifer.
- Thank you, Vince.
Yeah.
All set.
All your clothes in the movie were really good.
Thank you very much.
So were yours.
- Just ignore him.
- But just two.
Three, she'll get sloppy.
Appropriate for our characters.
Oh, and fantasy role playing.
She's got a real thing for lifeguards.
Put some zinc oxide on your nose and she'll lose her mind.
It'll all be over with.
But this is kind of important, what comes up here, because although he's masking in front of everyone, you see, when he's alone, that it bothers him.
Of course, Jon Brion's scores echoes that he's processing it.
And this is a moment he obviously cares enough to see what's going on.
He's really surprised someone is coming over.
So it's making Favreau's stuff resonate even more.
And for her, it's working her part of the game.
- You can see he's kind of hurt by it.
- It's working as well.
Smith Wollensky is a restaurant in Chicago.
And it's actually shot inside Smith Wollensky.
And of course April 15th is when your taxes are due and she's sort of bored.
That sounds fascinating.
- Good evening.
- Hi.
Can I start you two off with something to drink?
Yeah, you know, we're gonna start with a couple of apple martinis, please.
She has no real intentions of dating these guys.
Well, you can just bring those, just in case.
What was I saying?
Oh, yeah, yeah, yeah.
She brought him over to sort of make Gary jealous.
So she's kind of stuck here now
- through her actions in a really kind of...
- But she has a plan, she has a plan.
Yeah, bad situation.
She has a plan definitely to get out of it.
And there it is.
A loyal friend.
This is now gonna mess up...
A lot of women now, from this point on, won't be able to use this.
- Technique, we've exposed it.
- This sort of, "Get me out of jail, quick."
- Okay, that's great.
- Wait.
What?
Oh, all right.
Listen, where...
Just don't move.
Where are you?
Have you ever done this?
Have you ever had somebody call you to get you out of something?
- I don't own a cell phone.
No.
- No, that's right.
But I would normally just meet someone out for a drink.
- I would never commit to a dinner, early on.
- Oh.
I wasn't really big on going on like formal dates.
Have you ever used the phone call?
Or the friend-save?
I've definitely had it or I've had somebody come by...
No.
No.
That's okay.
... early or show up just to say, you know they've stopped by and...
And just kind of...
You had a sign to give them whether or not
- the date was going all right.
- I needed them to leave or to stay.
Yeah.
Most times would they get the sign to stay or to leave?
Well, it didn't happen that often, but one time they showed up and I'd already gotten rid of the date.
So that didn't even who is really gonna make Gary jealous.
Can I just say something?
You sound a little jealous, Gary.
Why would I be jealous of some guy...
And again you see the editing style, you cut out before the scenes are over with.
You get the main purpose but there's no actual completion of the scene.
You kind of hold that point.
I love when we go into the world of the Grobowski brothers, too.
And again Gary, you know, you hear that Cole is sort of talking about...
Obviously he's jealous.
So obviously Gary's been talking about it, which lets you know that he does care.
It does bother him, obviously, 'cause he's talking about it.
And these scenes are important 'cause you see how the brothers don't really communicate well with each other.
They're not sensitive with each other.
And it sort of shows you where Gary comes from.
And they're not really kind of, you know...
Talk about feelings with each other.
They're all kind of really rough on each other.
They're kind of...
- They're like a pack of coyotes, yeah.
- A little loud.
Yeah.
Just to get heard, it seems that they just have to, one has to outtalk the other.
You want to cry, cry to Mom.
Nobody's crying.
I'm not crying.
- I just don't feel like hearing it.
- There's no feelings here.
This is about money.
And D'Onofrio does great.
He kind of added all the stuff with his character and all these kind of quirks and stuff, that really I think are great, which was not on the page, but when you're lucky enough to get someone like Vincent D'Onofrio as an actor,
you know he's really gonna elevate the stuff.
...you waste it on rent.
That's what sad is.
Oh, you're broke up.
You're confused, broken-hearted.
- The cleaning of his ears and that stuff.
- I know.
That was in it.
You see, Gary feels like his brothers are kind of laughing at him and they're teaming up on him.
Like any time you have feelings or kind of feel bad or vulnerable, it's a bad thing and you sort of get punished for it, see.
...confused.
- Are you finished?
- Look, I need the damn tour logs.
- The tour logs, again.
- Yes.
Gary's not showing up here, either.
Well, I really, really appreciate the heart to heart.
Sort of let you know it's not personal towards Brooke.
It's nothing that's malicious on his part.
It's just who he is.
You're still behind three months.
And those logs are imperative to insuring that our books are straight!
And this scene, kind of, in my mind,
I always saw mirroring a little bit the break-up scene.
I do, I do!
And I don't appreciate it...
- Poor Gary, he's just getting beat up.
- Yeah, Gary, kind of, when he gets cornered that he's not good enough or he's falling short, he kind of responds...
Like he's cornered and you see how mad he gets, trying to say he is doing something.
He doesn't feel like anyone kind of appreciates him.
He doesn't wanna realise that he's sort of falling short with stuff, and focus on the things that he is doing and not focus on all of the other things that he should be doing.
He generally doesn't know...
And that was the fun of this movie, again was, you know, taking more kind of flawed characters who aren't perfect and watching them go through this sort of demise of this relationship.
Of course, the secretary's just kind of sitting there.
She's used to these guys yelling.
It's not that big of a deal.
There's that city again.
How big's your TV, 'cause I wanna know if you can see what's happening.
Oh, wow.
You beat a 12-year-old.
Of course, the video games is kind of an escape for him.
That's the place where he goes, where he does have control and he does feel comfortable.
And now he's obviously beating a 12-year-old kid online.
A place where he can kind of feel comfortable.
It's also a real thorn for Brooke, the games.
'Cause at first, I'm sure it was something they probably did together and they loved to do it together and of course the thing that you fall in love usually becomes the thing that drives you crazy.
I'm gonna be just a few more seconds.
So, just sit down and relax.
Oh, yeah, no problem.
Geoff Stults was another guy you might recognise from Wedding Crashers.
He plays the groom in the scene where Isla Fisher's and Rachel McAdams' sister gets married, where me and Owen first meet the two girls.
Shut up!
Of course playing Madden is a very popular game.
And Gary being from Chicago plays the Bears.
And she thinks it's all going great now.
She brought over the right type of guy.
- All smug.
- And of course this is gonna be great.
And sort of good set up for when you come out and find the two of them playing together.
Gary's kind of coerced him into playing the game.
The ultimate thorn in her side.
Did you play games sometimes during your relationships?
Yeah, I did.
Well, you know, that's how my people like to handle their business.
Did they work out well or not well, usually?
- The game playing?
- Yeah.
Usually, it was a phase.
We'd go out.
We would...
Would it make things worse or did you ever get what you wanted through game-playing?
Never got what I wanted through game-playing.
- No?
- Never works.
Did you?
Ultimately, no.
But it was effective at times to sort of get what you thought you wanted.
Right.
It's a lot more work than just kind of being direct.
God, is that pretty.
Yeah, I'm a gentleman.
And sometimes it causes irreparable damage.
This was kind of fun, to go to jump cuts 'cause like time has passed and you just kind of go to some of the funny stuff that was said.
This is...
I loved...
I remember seeing this for the first time.
- It's just so funny.
- And of course the stuff he's saying is just insane.
Like he's humble.
He doesn't like to talk a lot and of course...
- All he's doing his talking.
- Yeah.
It's the kind of thing where literally
I play the game and its like, four hours go by.
That's an understatement, by the way, four hours.
And her game has sort of backfired on her.
She's kind of sitting there now and acting like it doesn't bother her.
'Cause I think I'm good enough to figure out how to beat myself.
"I'm good enough to figure out how to beat myself. "
Yes.
Because you know that when that moment comes that everything you've done up to that moment has prepared you for victory!
I can't take credit for it, Mike.
And the NFL song and it was kind of fun.
...these little digital guys with the big hearts.
Does it feel good to be a champion?
- And we improvised a lot of this.
- All of it was improvised here.
Some of it was written.
Most of it was improvised.
Hey, Brooke, are you ready to go now?
- Not a problem.
- He's kind of getting the best of it, Gary.
- Sure.
- Great.
Hey, Gary, thanks a lot, man.
It was great to meet you.
Absolutely, man.
Come on, Mike.
I know a great little martini bar.
And then she throws the apple martini thing on the way out, obviously.
Again we kind of sit with him for a little bit here.
And it's a private moment where the character can kind of be more vulnerable and you can see how he's feeling where he's not having to mask in front of people.
And it's out of that martini line, which is an idea that Scott Stuber actually had, who when we sold the movie to Universal, worked for Universal.
Then I asked him to come in and be a producer with me on the movie.
That was an idea he had that kind of happened around that time.
Now Gary's fighting back.
Gary's calling the girls.
That was Stuber's line?
- The Martini line.
- The Martini line?
Yeah, and for her to say it back, "I know a martini bar"
to kind of help justify him calling the girls up.
Oh, Northwestern.
God, Gary's hilarious.
Yeah, he's okay.
Now she's hearing from this guy how great he is.
And this was actually, literally my father's idea.
I had my dad read the screenplay early on.
And he said he thought it would be funny for her to come out and find the guy she brought over playing video games with me.
- Did he, really?
- That was my dad's idea.
- I didn't know that.
- Which was a really good idea.
Great idea.
That was my dad's contribution to the screenplay other than just playing...
Other than birthing you.
Hey, wait.
Tell Gary to call me.
Welcome, everyone...
And, of course, you know, where this stuff is concerned, of course,
Gary called the girls over to his apartment.
It's not like he went out to meet girls somewhere, that he really wanted to be with another girl.
He really doesn't but, you know, she's brought these dates home, and so he really is looking for her to come home and for her to see him with girls.
It's more important that she sees him with girls and sees that he has options.
And for him to feel like he doesn't care, that he doesn't care that she's going on all these dates.
Of course, he wants to make it like it's not bothering him and he can get girls, "You're not the only one who can date someone else. "
So he really doesn't have the intention of fooling around with them and even from the setup here you can see that they're gonna be playing poker which is kind of an innocent thing even though it's strip.
But then he also says there's gonna be a dance portion so if they're gonna play poker and then go dance, obviously he's prolonging any chance of there being intimacy.
Because he's hoping that she comes home and finds him there.
It's more important for him that she finds him with girls and he really isn't interested in kind of fooling around with the girls.
...soap out of your mouth.
We're gonna save that for when you're 12.
Mike was really, really good-looking.
I mean, he's a little bit of a goof, but Gary doesn't know that.
I like this 'cause you see that Joey's a mom and she's kind of, you know, past all this kind of dating stuff, and she's a good friend.
- She's trying to help her but she's...
- Getting a little fed up with her.
If you saw the look on his face...
- Brooke's convincing herself.
- And she's convincing herself.
You know, Joey's character says. "I'm not really sure.
I don't know.
I wasn't there. "
And she's just sort of really feels good about herself there,
Brooke, at the end that what she's doing is gonna work.
I always liked this 'cause people kind of expect a comedy piece here and this is where the movie takes its turn to become more of a dramatic in ways.
And of course, Gary is just kind of on the couch numbing himself.
He's not really engaged with the girl or fooling around with her.
She might be dancing and doing stuff but he's not really present.
And I think this look between the two of them really says a lot, too.
Says a lot.
There's another shot that we actually had cut out.
Yeah, we had a shot of Brooke, of your character, listening to the outside,
- but it just again for pacing seemed like...
- Slowed it down.
Just sort of keep the momentum going.
She wakes up and we sort of get our bearings and of course, "Great news." What is that?
That's that realtor setting up the fact that the condo's for sale but raises a question...
Now it's all going far.
And I always liked this 'cause there's something about it that's kind of sad and you feel bad but there's also something kind of funny about it, too, when you see him just kind of obviously
was bombed the night before and is just kind of sprawled out in the room in the mess and its ruins.
She now sees like, "Look, what this is all coming to.
- "This is just disaster."
- Going too far.
Kind of getting his bearings and remembering what happened and again in a private moment you can see sort of how he feels about it.
Kind of putting it all together, he gets the note, Riggleman called with the great news.
And there it is, the condo's resold.
Now that the condo's resold, now the movie has to go in another plot direction.
Because now the condo's resold.
What's next?
What the next thing?
You can see he's not happy about it.
It's not what he wants.
So, how does this work?
I'll bring the car around front...
And now we sort of introduce Carson as being romantically interested in you.
- Who we set up in earlier.
- In the beginning.
We check the light and the sun exposure.
- Oh.
Perfect.
- Yeah.
And Justin.
There were some other scenes here that you had a good idea to sort of, that...
We had you, after you talk to Justin, you go talk to Addie,
Joey's character, and sort of come with a game plan of what would happen.
But we sort of felt on reading the screenplay and doing it, originally your idea, that the game-playing had gone on so long, we were sort off past the game-playing and it would mean a lot more for Brooke to go on her accord and sort of take responsibility
and try to, on her own, without asking advice...
'Cause the advice had not taken her to really great places up until this point.
We were past sort of them playing games and she was now gonna be proactive and really, kind of, on her own decide what to do and try to do something more genuine.
Which was like get him out of the condo to come talk somewhere, to sort of hash it out and see where the relationship stood.
I'm not exactly innocent here.
Brooke, as an outsider...
And she takes accountability.
She says "I'm not innocent here either."
She knows that it's way out of hand.
She's a part of it getting out of hand.
And now she's not gonna get advice from Justin or Marilyn Dean or from Joey.
- Or Addie.
- She's just gonna go and...
- Meet him head-on and be honest.
...be a little vulnerable.
And she's still hedging a little bit.
It's not like she comes home and says, "Hey, we need to talk."
She says, "Hey, I got tickets to this concert a while ago. "
Obviously, she just got the tickets and made it like she got it a while ago.
So she's not a 100/% comfortable to say, "Hey, we need to talk."
But she is at least being more direct feeling like if she can get him out of the house...
- And out of the condo.
- Out of the condo.
And they could go to like a band that they both like and have some fun, it could make it a little bit of an easy segue to get to a place to say,
"What's going on here?
Let's put the cards on the table. "
And I feel like that's kind of Brooke's intention is to sort of have a real direct conversation with stuff even though she sort of hedges her way into it.
Yeah.
Baby steps.
So, you know, if you need any just help yourself.
Great.
Of course Gary's still not understanding when she says the tickets and stuff.
He's still assuming that she wants not to be dating him.
She broke up with him.
Listen, a while ago I got these tickets for the Old 97's tonight, and I completely forgot about it, so I...
- I always really liked this scene.
- I do, too.
You can see how much she really sort of is wanting him to connect with her.
It's the first time they actually just talk to each other, isn't it?
I mean, that they're...
This is much more real in tone than a lot of stuff that preceded it.
And once that strip poker happens, it really takes a tonal shift and becomes much more dramatic in tone than comedic.
Well, yes, and 2,000 other people.
I mean, she's so protective of herself.
You do a really nice job I think in this scene of having a lot of emotion underneath it and sort of masking it and you see that double cut there, that's great.
You can tell she really wants him to come.
And maybe if Gary said, "No, I don't want to come"
she would've just dived...
Jumped into the conversation right there and said, "Okay, look, Gary."
You know, but he says he's gonna go and she's just looking to kind of set up in a safe environment, for her to feel safe to sort of put her cards on the table and say, "What's happening?
"What's this all about?
What does this mean?
"The condo's sold now.
Are we really gonna move apart?
- "And here's what I wanted." You know.
- Yeah.
So, I'll just leave your ticket at Will Call.
- Good?
- Okay.
Okay.
Good, so they're gonna go and they're gonna have a date.
And he's kind of thinking about it like, "Why is she asking me?"
Yeah.
Riviera's a great club in Chicago and the Old 97's is a band I really like.
They were in the movie I did, Clay Pigeons, that I did, that David Dobkin, who directed Wedding Crashers, directed that.
And I found that band.
It was just a band that I liked.
And I went to David with them.
And their song, Timebomb, which is in this movie, opens...
Opening credit titles for Clay Pigeons, and so they seemed like a good band to use for this.
This is where Brooke's now setting herself up.
She...
She cares about what she looks like, she wants to look good, it's important to her, showing that it's kind of an important night.
- Yeah, she's getting dressed up.
- She's getting beers.
She's trying to make everything perfect for him to make it comfortable.
Yeah.
Yeah.
- She'll have a beer...
- Did you like shooting this scene?
I did like...
Well, this was...
I loved listening to the Old 97's.
That was fun.
Crowd scenes are always a bit intense to shoot 'cause there's organising all the people and it always looks so effortless.
Hello, everybody!
Good evening, Chicago.
We're the Old 97's.
- She's kind of wondering where he is.
- Where is he?
He's not there yet.
This is that Timebomb song that was also in Clay Pigeons.
Kind of "y'all-ternative music."
Country influence and some punk rock influence.
- Chicago flag in the background.
- I missed that.
Up high on the ceiling.
No, still not there.
Different song so obviously time's passed.
This is where Brooke starts to get her rude awakening.
Jon Brion's score does a nice job here as well.
It's a nice contrast with everyone kind of really psyched
- and having a great time and connecting.
- Having fun.
Yeah.
I think we've all had those moments of really feeling most alone sometimes in a sea of people that are really having fun and are energised and she's just sort of feeling very lonely in this really kind of energised place.
I mean, I think her truth is now becoming clear.
The reality of the situation is becoming very clear.
I think she feels also probably, in that moment, really foolish for like putting herself through that and not being respected once again.
When she comes home and finds him with those girls in the apartment and, you know, she's been trying to manipulate him but then ultimately he said yes to a concert, he doesn't show up, and I think she starts to feel like
the reality of the situation's the reality of the situation.
It's not about trying to change him.
She has to just kind of see it for what it is.
See it for what it is.
- Are you okay?
- I'm fine.
And I think this is genuinely a real surprise to Gary to find that she's really this upset or cares that much.
I just want to say I'm sorry that I missed the concert, and let me know what that ticket cost, I'll pay you back for it.
He really took at face value after talking to Johnny O that she really was breaking up.
- Doesn't want to be with him.
- Didn't want to be with him.
It sometimes takes all this game-playing and silly behaviour for two people to finally connect.
It doesn't fucking matter, okay?
And the truth comes out.
Or if you do all that game-playing and stuff, you sort of...
Really kind of a cautionary tale that even if you're in love and there's good stuff there, you can really numb it and damage a relationship by playing with each other's feelings and emotions and not being genuine
and really burn it out.
You broke up with me.
Then you have guys coming over here for dates, and all of a sudden you ask me to go to some concert.
Sort of explaining.
She's really upset and he's really sort of surprised by it.
I think this is where she really just sort of speaks her truth in the movie.
Yeah.
It's part her fault, too, but she doesn't really realise it.
She just doesn't know how it happened.
Our entire relationship
I've gone above and beyond for you, for us.
And all this is her fault, it's not his fault.
And I mean, I've cooked.
I've picked your shit up off the floor.
I've laid your clothes out for you like you were a four-year-old.
Her fault for allowing him to sort of do that.
Yeah, for just sort of, you know, you set your boundaries.
You know, you set the tone for what will be okay.
That's a funny thing 'cause it's like little steps happen that you just sort of make it okay, okay, okay.
Then all of a sudden you wake up and it's gone way far.
Yeah.
I don't feel you appreciate me.
And then you sort of full circle with the lemons.
It's like all of those sort of arguments just meet.
She just wants to feel like she's kind of appreciated.
Why didn't you just say that to me?
Gary, I've tried.
I've tried.
Yeah, but never like that.
You might've said some things that you meant to imply that, Brooke, but I'm not a mind reader.
Kind of a serious thing but it's also kind of funny, too, that he's saying that.
Because like, obviously, it is the first time she was direct.
And I think that's a good line though, when she says,
"You are who you are.
You're not someone...
I can't change you.
"I can't manipulate you." Obviously, accepting you for who you are.
And I think she's really kind of spent on it now.
She's not even necessarily just mad at him, she's mad at herself.
More mad at herself.
But I think the ship has sailed for her at this point, she's burnt out.
And she needs some time to just sort of process and now he realises that she kind of still cares and where they're at, and he's starting to hurt but he doesn't really know how to communicate
or how to get through it.
It's all kind of a lot for him.
I know.
Look, I know you feel bad, but, you know, what are you gonna do?
I mean, what does she expect, for me to want to go with the girl who dumped me?
I don't know.
She probably just wanted you, you know, to show her the respect of not standing her up or some shit, who knows?
Well, damn it.
I should have just said no in the first place.
I don't know why I called...
You know what?
It's her fault she got hurt.
You shouldn't even feel bad about it.
She should have expected it from you.
It's kind of like how real friends are with each other,
- they just kind of tell you.
- Tell it like it is.
Everybody likes you.
You're the quickest guy I know.
Anytime we go out, I have a blast.
All right?
But, you know, everybody who knows you knows you're gonna do what you want to do.
And if it's not what the other person...
But earlier in the movie Johnny O was saying, "She probably does
"kind of not want to be with you.
Maybe she's even sleeping with someone else.
"I'm not Columbo, but I bet she's the one who's gonna keep the condo
"and she's got plans."
When have we ever done something you didn't want to do?
And now he's coming, saying,
"Oh my God, this is the situation, she was crying
"and that stuff wasn't going on."
When's the last time we went to a Sox game?
The Sox.
Not when they're playing the Cubs, either.
We always do what you want to do and she always did...
I love this scene, too.
I love every scene in this.
Yeah.
Now that Johnny O really comes really clear with him and he says,
"You know, you're a selfish guy, not just with her, but with me,
"with everybody.
You're just looking out for yourself. "
And her big problem is that you really liked her.
I mean, she is the one girl you really liked.
And no matter what she did and how hard she tried, you were never gonna let your guard down.
That poor girl never stood a chance.
And again here you see him processing and it bothering him, and you sort it out.
I like this as kind of showing that she's moving on.
- Like she kind of...
- Yeah.
It shows her having some strength, that she's kind of really bummed out and she was really sad about, but she's gonna try to move forward...
- Get up and out.
...and do stuff.
That was my first day of shooting, right there.
This was kind of important, too, that this came before the dinner scene because it's not really about...
She's already made her mind up, she's resolved.
In her mind, she's spent.
She's numb, and she's addressing not just where the Gary relationship was concerned, but all relationships in her life.
She's gonna really put some clear stuff and of course there's a fun twist on it that Marilyn Dean's sketching a nude guy in the room.
So it's not just so sincere, but...
Oh, just get in here.
Nonetheless, she's kind of catered to Marilyn Dean.
Marilyn Dean's kind of been the dominant personality and she's over it.
She's gonna walk away and not work there.
It's not what she wants to be doing.
And she's just sort of taking control of her life.
Yeah.
And realising she doesn't want to be in relationships where they're not healthy or the boundaries aren't good or she doesn't feel respected.
Here's a blank cheque.
Write down a number, I don't want to know what it is, and go back to work.
And she's funny.
No, no.
It's not about that.
Not about the money.
I can't accept that.
Brooke.
She's walking away from the temptation.
Travis, get your gorgeous tuckus out of here.
It's not about getting paid a lot, she's just not doing what she wants to do.
She's not happy, she's not gonna stay in that situation.
I think Marilyn Dean, for the first time, really respects her.
Search out an establishment called the Padre Negro.
The black father.
Ask for a strapping young fellow named Alberto.
Compliments of M. Dean.
They have a moment of respect, equal...
I think that she's realising that, like, Marilyn Dean, kind of even though she walked away from her,
Marilyn Dean kind of sees her and respects her for the first time.
Your job will be right here waiting for you.
Sort of how it is with people like that who are kind of domineering and that make it like that when you kind of don't care and walk away,
- they sort of really want you, respect you.
- That's when they respect you.
So she's sort of resolved and she quit her job and she's moving on and she's obviously making plans for what her future will be and the type of relationship she'll be in.
And then of course, here you're to believe that maybe she's open now to Carson.
He seemed like a nice guy and...
- She's moving.
- She's moving on.
She's kind of burned out on him and he's like a nice guy and sort of left the audience here to believe that maybe they're dating and of course you come home and...
Hey.
I'm in here.
Gary's sort of processed everything and was trying to take responsibility for not being present for the whole film and she says she wants to, you know, show me that you care and here he is.
And now who's the guy there, and is it too late?
And again there were a couple of scenes that were in between.
That were prior to this, of Gary prepping and reading a self-help book and shopping for vegetables, but it sort of lent...
It was too comedic of a tone for where they were trying to go.
And it was more effective to just come straight to this scene.
It kind of got ahead of the scene when you saw him buying the groceries and cooking the meal and buying this self-help book.
Buying the self-help book kind of was like, okay, well, he read a self-help book and that led him to this.
So it was better that he kind of did it on his own.
And also it kind of killed some of the surprise when you came in and found that he made the dinner, you're with Brooke.
- Right.
- You're with Brooke when she quit her job, so now you come home and you find him as Brooke finds him.
Yeah, versus being ahead of Brooke.
It made this more powerful.
And, you know, when I saw you crying the other night, that was honestly the worst moment of my life.
And we know how hard this is for Gary, you can see how difficult it is for him to sort of say these things, it's very established how hard it is for him to kind of be vulnerable and not wanna look embarrassed.
...a lot of pain.
And the funny thing is, all I really want to do is make you happy.
And again, setting up from that scene that we pointed out earlier, when she calls her friend afterwards and says, "I just want him to apologise.
"I want him to show me that he cares."
- It's everything that she wanted.
- It's everything she wanted.
This was what, you know, the plot point one in kind of a screenwriting basic way was that she wants him to show her that he cares and that he apologises, takes responsibility and wants to try in a genuine way to work on the relationship.
And here she gets what she wants, but when it happens, it's too late.
- She's spent.
- Yeah.
And not just all his fault, but by both of their faults.
Both of them played a part in kind of numbing...
- Crumbling.
...and getting to this place.
And it would be too easy really to, at this point, for her to just say yes and go back, she wouldn't have learnt anything.
Well, not just that, I think that even if she did and he did, they probably would slip back into their old patterns soon even though they meant it.
Because it's hard to break them once you've established them.
I've missed you so much.
And she really is moved.
She knows how hard it is and she can tell that he really means this and that's what makes this moment all the more difficult for her, I think.
...whatever it is that I have to do to never hurt you again.
I love you and I'm sorry.
- It's everything she wanted to hear.
- So hard.
It's everything she wanted to hear.
And that's the issue.
- It would just be...
- But I think she had to ultimately say it to herself that she had to appreciate herself and she had to give herself those things and...
Right.
And what was she working so hard to make work, you know?
Was it that ideal of a relationship, you know?
Was it even the man?
What was it?
And I think for her, she has to step away and ask those questions and sort of just see what it is that she really wants.
I don't.
I just...
I don't know.
This is really honest here, when she says, "I don't have anything left to give."
I just, I think...
I don't know, but I don't think I have...
And you know she's in a really genuine place here because the easy thing to do, the old Brooke might have said
- okay even if she wasn't 100/% convinced.
- Just falling right back in.
But she really does sort of have to be honest and direct even if it's awkward now because that's how she feels.
And sometimes you gotta take a risk at the risk of losing, you know, the beloved in order to sort of get to the truth of it.
And that's sort of, I think, she knows it, too.
And for Gary it's not about pushing at this moment more.
He really loves her.
Oh, this is now beyond awkward.
And it's not about his own interest, he wants to respect what she says.
He hasn't really been respecting people's interests in doing whatever he wants.
And it's not about not fighting for her, or loving her enough to fight for, it's about loving her...
Enough to let her go.
... enough to sort of not overwhelm the situation, which is what you sort of saw at Wrigley Field.
He's very vulnerable.
This is what he was most afraid of, the whole movie, was being kind of vulnerable, being exposed, being out on a limb and being rejected.
And there it happens and he handles it with some character.
And she starts to go into the Carson I'm not dating, he's saying it's okay.
He sort of realises it's not about the other guy, whether she is or isn't, it's about the fact that this has kind of not been handled well and it's kind of burnt out.
This is a great shot here that Peyton redesigned, the director.
Sort of the closing out of him and the revealing of Carson.
Poor Carson, look at him.
He's just like, "This sucks."
- I'm sorry about that.
- No.
I'm sorry I imposed.
And of course here you realise that it's not about that she's open to dating Carson and wants to be with him.
It's not about her replacing a guy with another guy in her life.
Yeah.
It's really about finding some peace and some strength inside herself and she's not looking to just find someone else to make her okay, she's gonna make herself okay.
And as much as it's sort of a mislead as that she's not dating him, it's also really on story for her character that it's not about her finding someone to appreciate her and tell her she's great,
it's about her giving that to herself.
And there it is.
"I wanted him to come around and he did all of that. "
And she's sort of processing it and...
And if it would have happened sooner, maybe it would have been okay but with the journey that they went on and all the games...
And this is sort of just... in the vein of, Swingers or Made, in that this is the scene where you expect Favreau now to give the explanation of what he needs to do kind of in a real, on the nose way,
give a story point.
...that can't be traced back to either of us.
Give a story point of what you need to do now is find someone new and what you need to do now is work from the right place.
And instead it becomes about him wanting to put a hit on Carson.
And this entirely...
This is entirely improvised.
And we've included on the DVD as well a bunch of improvisations that accomplish the same thing.
And I went with the one that we sort of felt was the best and the funniest.
But there was other ones that were really funny and good, too, and you guys can watch and decide what you think was sort of the best one.
But we really sum up the story in a good way here, too, because Johnny O is coming from the male ego point of view, and worried about perception still.
And for the first time, at the end of this scene,
Gary's able to walk away from him not trying to convince
Johnny O of something different, but also not accepting what Johnny O says as a reality and let Johnny O think for himself.
He's able for the first time...
Every other scene, you leave Gary sitting alone in the bar after what Johnny O says, thinking about what Johnny O says.
And this time he walks away from Johnny O which is very symbolic of no longer caring so much or engaging in that sort of ego place or perception place.
It doesn't matter to him.
But the good news is we do that in a way that's really, really funny.
Yeah, really funny.
This is another one of my favourites.
So you accomplish kind of the really sincere moment that he goes there and he's no longer listening.
He's past it, he's grown past it, but you do it in a way that's really funny.
And of course Gary realises she didn't eat the dinner.
And he said, you know, the worst thing happened and it's okay, because it's better to sort of be honest and put yourself out there, than to just sort of run and protect yourself all the time
because you don't really learn anything from that.
You just sort of prolong stuff.
So, even though she rejected him, it felt great to have the strength to take that chance.
And that's something that he'll always have now and...
- And now he gets it.
- This is important.
Yeah, how he gets it.
He's going on and he's gonna right all of his wrongs.
And this lets you know that he really has learned the lessons from the journey 'cause this isn't about getting Brooke back, this is about doing the right thing by his brother and correcting the relationships that are still in his life
and the relationships that he still has and honouring those.
So he realises, from the failure of the relationship with Brooke, what it takes to really maintain a good relationship and how to be present in it, and how to be a partner, and be a friend in it.
This is a very different side of Gary
- that Dennis has not seen.
- That his brother is not used to.
And Dennis, you know, that was all D'Onofrio being awkward with the hug, that was entirely his idea.
And it just says so much and it's also really funny.
But versus Gary trying to explain or teach his brother, he's just gonna be accountable for what his part in the relationship is and says what he wants to say, whether it's comfortable or not, whether the brother is willing to accept it or not.
Gary knows that he needs to do what he feels right regardless of what the response of his brother will be.
So he tries to say it here and the brother kind of stops him.
He doesn't want to get into an emotional thing, but Gary then says, "I love you," and hugs him anyway because he wants to let him know that he cares about him.
D'Onofrio plays this so beautifully.
D'Onofrio's really happy that he did the logs but at the same time he's not comfortable with the intimacy and going there.
But he's gonna say what he needs to say anyway.
It's all right.
And he's not ready for it.
But you know that they're gonna be in a better place.
And what you saw in the dinner scene was really the end of the story.
Everything that happens after that is really the resolution.
How do the characters feel?
And how are they changed by this journey that they went on?
The empty condo.
You could really, almost even end the movie this way, after this scene.
But the place is empty.
So that's it for all my stuff.
If you want, you could give me your key and I'll drop it off at Riggleman's.
All right.
And I think at this point they're sort of equals in how they feel.
The one said no and the one pushed hard.
They sort of played the part that the other one needs played at that time.
But I think there's kind of a mutual feeling here.
And she takes accountability, which is really important.
Both of them do.
Me, too.
Sort of, actually, when I see this space...
I think this is important because the fact that they can sort of, even in a small way, sort of joke and laugh shows that they have some perspective and that they're okay.
And a lot of times in life, I think you do have to really love someone to go through something like this with them and they may not be the person that you end up with.
They're supposed to spend their life with.
But you're meant to learn some really important lessons from each other and you have to really have a love for someone to put up with it so long and then when you come out of it, hopefully the optimistic side is that you're better off in the future
and you don't have to learn the same lessons again.
Chicago is called the Second City.
And then some time has passed and you see that Gary is okay.
Chicago was rebuilt on its ruins.
The city came back even bigger...
He's living his dream.
He's gotten on the river.
And this was always so symbolic of Chicago.
Chicago was rebuilt after 1871.
So after a terrible fire and the city being burnt down, it came back bigger and stronger than it was before.
- That's your mom.
- That's my mom who said, "Second City,"
and this was the first movie I put her in.
I figured I put my dad in a couple, I should put my mom in one.
- You gotta give mom one.
- She's great.
I love my mom.
Do not make me ask you twice.
Are you ready to see Chicago?
And that was kind of...
The dialogue before that was about even after a fire, or something going bad, or something coming to an end, it can come back bigger and stronger if you learn the lessons form the mistakes you made the first time.
I know it's early in the morning, but it is Chicago in the summer.
Who are we kidding?
It's fine.
And we included on the DVD the original shot ending.
- And now we show more time pass.
- Time is passing.
And this scene means something very different to everybody.
But to us it really seemed like the most authentic thing, as we said, we felt the story was over.
It wasn't really about do they or don't they end up together.
It was really about they've both grown and learned and earned a better place from this.
And so if it is with each other they get back together, they'd really have a chance at it working this time.
And if it wasn't, whoever they went and met in the future, they'd have a real chance of that working.
And you see Brooke's together, she's on the phone, she's in control, she has a job.
It's really important that you can see that they were both okay.
Hi.
Genuinely happy to see each other.
And it is that moment where time goes by, you're in your new life, you're living stuff and then you see that person who you spent all this time with, who you really were close and intimate with.
And now you're really not a part of each other's lives anymore but you used to be so much and you're just sort of strangers on the street.
But you can see they're genuinely into each other.
There's still a love there.
They obviously haven't been talking a lot but they've been asking a lot about each other because...
- Looks nice.
- Yeah?
Oh, yeah.
You've lost some weight.
And this we did shoot later on after the movie was completed and it just, we felt really lucky that everything really fell into place.
That as time went on that Gary did sort of lose weight and did start to take better care of himself.
And he obviously heard about her, he's been keeping tabs, 'cause he knows that she went on a trip and then she obviously counters with the boat.
- She knows that he has the boat.
- So they've been, you know...
They've been asking about each other.
...realise how much you love home.
- It's good to have you back.
- Yeah.
It's good to be back.
And this is similar...
Some of this stuff is really improvised, too.
We set up two cameras at the same time and just...
We had some bullet points and lines that we were gonna say, but we also had the freedom to kind of play around with what that moment is when you run into that person and there's an awkwardness.
I loved that we got to do this.
We got to do that a couple of times, shooting simultaneous cameras.
Well, I got to...
I'm going to a meeting, so...
I got to drop these bags off anyway, but...
And of course they make plans.
Do they keep them?
Do they not?
And that's just a moment that happened during improvise where we started to talk at the same time which felt really real and authentic as well.
You have all those different emotions going on inside of you.
- Be good.
- Okay.
- Bye.
- Bye.
I think they're gonna...
She's gonna call him in a week.
Maybe two.
- But if they don't, it's okay, too.
- That's okay, too.
And this song is a great song, obviously.
We really got lucky and kind of found our way to this song when it just seemed to say everything that we wanted to say that it's gonna be a bright, sunshiny day.
And it...
Again it sort of...
They're both changed for the better from the experience, and they both are in a better place, and if they were to meet each other now, they would probably have had a great relationship.
Yeah.
But it took knowing each other and going through what they went through in order to get to a place where they could do that.
And so, you know, I've heard people say, "Well, yeah, they look back and,
"well, that look back is an appreciation of what they went through
"and then when they turn away, that's about what's to come for them
"together separately, although there will always be a love there. "
And other people say, "Well, that look back is really hopeful.
"That they really love each other and there is...
"Now that they're in a good place, they recognise that in each other,
"and they're gonna get back together." And I think it really is up to the person, to the viewer, and not in the cop-out way of saying it's not to be answered.
But again, the story of what happened with them when he cooks dinner is kind of the end of the story that this movie took place, telling.
And everything that happened afterwards is really the resolution and how they feel about it and so sort of less important of do they or don't they.
And like I said, more important of that they both learned and are better people because of the experience.
It's good when you can have a lot of discussions after the movie, anyway.
Well, I think I'm a better person for making the movie, Jennifer.
I think I'm a better person as well, Vincent.
And I wanna say thank you to you for being the person to take the journey of making the movie with me and I had a great time and I'm really proud of the movie and really proud to have shared it with you.
Really proud of it.
So happy to have shared it with you.
Thank you.
I hope you guys enjoyed The Break-Up and the commentary.
And I think we're gonna sign off now.
Well, you'll notice after this next song is actually The Tone Rangers singing Rainbow Connection.
And we'll also include the original scene and you'll see that what we shot is the, in my opinion, a better version of what we shot originally, but what happens with the two characters of running into each other and walking away from each other.
And this is actually Michael Higgins and The Tone Rangers singing.
Is the same thing, we just...
With some time spent, we were able to find a more mature, more authentic version of what that would be.
In the original version, they were on dates and it was intended to be in subtitles, some jokes, when they meet each other's dates.
And it just felt so kind of strange after having the second half of the movie, really the last fourth of the movie being so dramatic, it felt sort of jarring to sort of turn it into a joke,
- them running into each other...
- Yeah.
... because it really had a lot of weight to it.
And it seemed to be kind of a stronger decision that they would sort of be by themselves and run into each other and kind of choose to walk away at that moment versus having the dates there.
Both the dates in the scene that you will watch, did a good job and were good actors.
It was about what was best for these two characters in this story.
And of course, this song is the ultimate child-like optimism song and sort of the message of the movie and the filmmakers, and I think the actors as well, is that someday we'll find it.
And the belief in love and the belief in true love and that it's out there.
Not to sort of end on just a sad thing of like,
"Okay, well, it didn't work out for these two" but to say that it's out there in that it's out there for Gary and Brooke, whether it's together or separately.
- It's so beautiful.
- It's out there.
And, again, I have to thank the City of Chicago as the credits say that, for being so great.
The Illinois Film Commission and the Chicago Film Commission the Governor, the Mayor, and all the people that worked there for really making it possible for us to shoot there.
And Chicago is really one of the most important lead characters in the movie.
- Well, that's it.
- There we go.
- Thank you, Jen.
- Thanks, Vince.
(CROWD CHEERING)
- Come on, come on, come on.
- All right, here we go.
MAN:
Take a seat, buddy!
Come on.
It was a good play.
Are you gonna be like this all day?
I don't know.
Is it gonna be like this all day?
- I don't know.
- It's up to you.
- I have no room to sit.
- I got no room to sit.
I'm sitting next to a guy who's sitting like he's at home on the toilet with his legs spread.
Please don't crowd people.
Relax, please.
Look at me.
- I am relaxed.
- Look how I'm sitting.
- Why are you sitting like that?
- Because...
What do you think?
Why'd you wake me up for this shit?
Because I'm trying to relax and have a nice day.
Sweating in the sun like a Tijuana whore.
VENDOR:
Ice-cold soda!
Get your soda here!
VENDOR:
On the right.
Coming down there.
Pass that on down there.
Hey, hot dog guy, can I get six hot dogs down here, please?
- Right away.
- GARY:
And make it right, please.
You know, with the mustard and the ketchup and the relish.
Don't make me hit you up for more.
I thought we were going to Wiener Circle after this.
- We will.
- Then why are you getting hot dogs?
Pass this down, please.
You can keep the change.
Do you want one of the hot dogs?
GARY:
You can have a hot...
You want a hot dog?
Do you want a hot dog, miss?
- No.
Thank you.
- You can have one.
- That's okay.
- Go ahead.
You can have a hot dog.
- No, I don't want one.
- Excuse me, sir?
Would you mind passing the lady one of the hot dogs?
- I'm good, thanks.
- You don't have to share.
- You can have your own.
- Thanks.
That's really nice of you.
- Just have one, please.
- Okay, give me a hot dog.
Somebody give her a hot dog.
I got...
The big guy can't eat all of them.
Have one.
- Have you ever had one before?
- A hot dog?
- At the ballpark?
- I have.
I believe I have.
- Okay, good.
- Thank you.
- Well, enjoy this one.
- Thanks.
- Do you like mustard?
- No, I'm okay.
It's much better with a topping.
Here.
I'm just kidding, I'll give you two.
(CROWD CHEERING)
- Cheers!
- Thanks.
We'll share it.
It's a good dog.
I like the hot dog.
I know.
That's nice.
You have a problem with me eating a hot dog, guy?
I'm trying to watch the game and have a hot dog.
- I'll smack him in his head.
- No, just leave him alone.
- Hey, you want to go get a drink?
- No.
I'm with somebody, sorry.
Who?
The guy with the tucked-in shirt and the visor?
What, is that like a brother?
The guy was not your brother, then.
- Who is this guy?
- He's not my brother.
Who's this...
I'm getting mad now.
I'm jealous.
Who is this guy?
- Who are you?
- I don't know.
I'm kidding with you.
Who's the guy with the tucked-in stuff?
Is that a boyfriend?
Uh, it's...
- I'm going.
- Do you think you'll marry him?
- What?
- 'Cause I know you've thought about it.
The first time you laid eyes on him, you probably thought,
"I wonder if I could marry this guy in plaid shorts who tucks his shirt in.
No way."
Then when you kissed him, you said, "I can't believe it.
"I had a lot to drink tonight.
I'm kissing the tucked-in guy."
- My point is, if you're not gonna marry him...
- Yeah.
...and if it's not forever, then you really don't have anything to lose in taking me up on my offer.
- Uh-huh.
Well, I'm gonna go.
- Okay.
Me, too.
- Okay.
- To where?
On an ice-breaking first date?
- Well, no, I don't think...
- Listen.
If you want to stay off the market while you're with
I'm-not-the-one-but-I'm-comfortable, then you can do that.
But for all you know, I just offered you a get-out-of-bored-love-for-free card with no strings attached.
- God, you're crazy.
- No, I'm not crazy.
And a lot of times people go, "Oh, that's crazy,"
and then they go, "It's genius."
That's what happened when the person invented fire.
They burned that witch.
And guess what, then they got warm and they ate good stuff.
Now, where are we headed to?
Let's not make this weird,
- 'cause I'm not good on dates.
- No.
You know what?
I'm better just to kind of hang out and, if we don't have fun,
- I might go my separate way.
- Okay.
I'm not committing to anything.
I'll go hang out with you for a little bit.
- That's not gonna happen.
- But I can't say for sure.
(YOU'RE MY BEST FRIEND PLAYING)
GARY:
All right, all right, everybody.
Welcome to Three Brothers Bus Tours.
I'm brother number two.
It's good to have you here.
That's right, there's plenty of seats here up front.
I promise I won't bite.
I'm not a biter.
I'm psyched to have you here.
Okay, a couple quick ground rules.
Please don't jump off the bus.
Weird.
Not fun for anybody.
Also, no throwing objects at pedestrians, unless, of course, they deserve it.
Okay?
We are not at work today.
We are on vacation today.
And if you can't blow it out here on the big funny bus, where the hell can you?
I do split the tips with my driver, Shondra.
We don't want her back out turning tricks.
That was a weird time for everyone.
Seriously.
Honest to God.
And I was a customer.
Long time ago.
Come on, everybody, let's get loose!
I'm gonna ask you once.
Show me that you mean it.
Don't make me ask you twice.
Are you ready to see Chicago?
Are you ready to see Chicago?
That's what I'm talking about.
Shondra, put this baby in the air.
Let's get the blood flowing.
Let's get everyone up and let's loosen it up.
Coming up here, you're gonna notice one of the only buildings to survive the fire of 1871.
That is the original Chicago Water Tower and Pumping Station.
(PHONE RINGING)
CHRISTOPHER:
Happy Holidays.
Marilyn Dean Gallery.
The artist was inspired by the neoclassical movement.
CHRISTOPHER:
No, she doesn't.
But wanted to reflect it with an abstract bent.
CHRISTOPHER:
Okay, bye-bye.
- And how much is it?
- $35,000.
Happy Holidays.
Marilyn Dean Gallery.
Hold, please.
- Will you excuse me for a moment?
- Sure.
Go ahead.
- Christopher?
- Yes, sweetie.
- Hi, honey.
- Hi.
- Christmas was months ago.
- Don't remind me.
I miss it so much.
Yeah, I know.
But today is not a holiday.
I know for a fact that people like my spirit on the phone and they dig the energy that I give them.
Okay.
I'm just saying, I don't think Marilyn Dean will "dig" the energy.
Oh, no.
She's the one that told me to be creative.
So...
I know.
It's just...
Okay.
What is the next holiday coming?
The Fourth of July, is that what's next?
Well, if you want to get technical, there's Memorial Day, there's Flag Day.
Some people recognise Father's Day as a holiday.
I don't.
I get it.
I get it.
Well, on those days you can say, "Happy Holidays."
Every other day, "Good morning, good afternoon,
"good evening, Marilyn Dean Gallery." Okay?
Okay.
- I'm so sorry about that.
- Oh, no.
So, now this is a new piece by Zakrzewska.
What do you think of this?
- Can I be honest with you?
- Please.
Other than taking an art history class in college, which I pretty much slept through, I don't have the first clue about art or how to go about buying it.
I mean, like that painting.
I mean, I don't see the point in buying something that I could have done myself.
Yeah.
I completely agree with you.
You know, an art teacher of mine once said,
"Never buy a piece of art that you don't have to have."
You know, don't worry about who the artist is or how much it's worth.
I mean, you have to live with it every day.
You have to walk by it every day.
You know, you have to really love it.
You have to really appreciate it.
It's kind of like picking a mate.
(EXCLAIMING)
- GARY:
Hey, honey!
- Hi.
- How's it going?
- BROOKE:
It's good.
- Oh, wow.
You got a lot happening.
- I know.
- Very exciting.
- I am starving.
- Oh, careful.
That's really...
That's very hot.
- Oh, that's hot, hot, hot.
- Yep.
- Jesus.
Hey, honey, you've got to really...
You should get ready, okay?
- Oh, you look great.
- Thank you.
Got a lot of nice stuff.
Got a pizza.
- All kinds of stuff.
- Terrific.
I just need you to decide what to...
You know, I did everything.
(TV CLICKS)
(COMMENTATOR CHATTERING)
- Gary?
- Yeah?
- Oh, come on!
Really?
- You got three lemons.
What my baby wants, my baby gets.
You know that.
Yeah, but I wanted 12.
Baby wanted 12.
Why would you want 12 lemons?
Because I'm making a 12-lemon centrepiece.
So, no one's actually even eating them?
They're just show lemons?
Yeah.
They're just show lemons.
Shown in the centre of the table.
I'm glad you find that amusing, but I cannot fill a vase with only three lemons.
Well, can't you just use, like, maybe a drinking glass?
I'm not gonna use a drinking...
We could have a smaller version of a centrepiece.
I'm not gonna use a drinking glass for our centrepiece.
You know what?
I've got an idea.
Why don't we go ahead and scratch the centrepiece idea altogether, because the chicken that burnt my mouth could maybe use a little bit of lemon on top of it.
Guess what?
Now we've made a better meal versus something visually nice to look at.
What are you do...
What's happening here?
What are you doing?
What are you doing?
(STAMMERING) Oh, I had such a long day on the bus.
I need a little bit of down time.
My feet are killing me.
- Gary, come on, my feet are killing me, too.
- I'm exhausted.
I worked all day.
Went to the market.
I cleaned this entire condo and then I've been cooking for the last three hours.
Come on.
Help set the table.
- GARY:
Sweetheart.
- What?
You've done such a great job already.
Don't you want to finish it yourself and have that personal power of that accomplishment?
- Set the table.
- Listen to me.
Do you think that when Michelangelo, right, was painting the Sixteenth Chapel, that he said,
"Hey, guys, you know, I did pretty good on the first 15 chapels,
"but why don't you help me design this one?
"And maybe you could help me...
Give me a brush
"and you guys can grab brushes, and we can all make a great chapel." Uh-uh.
No, he didn't.
And you wanna know what the results were?
A masterpiece.
Okay.
It's the Sistine Chapel, not the Sixteenth, and I bet when Michelangelo asked for 12 brushes, they didn't bring him three.
Yeah.
Okay, all the talking is really starting to drain me, and now I'm gonna have to watch the highlights later to see what I missed here.
- Honey, look, Gary, just...
- Down time's important.
- Gary, please just take a shower, okay?
- Down time's important.
'Cause this is what I don't want to have happen.
I don't want the doorbell to ring.
I'm then forced to answer the door, entertain people, and I'm still cooking dinner.
- Yeah.
- Okay?
You're absolutely right.
Let's do that.
The second that this inning's over...
- Gary.
- There's one out all ready.
They're gonna be here in 20 minutes.
Baby, have you ever seen a shower of mine take more than four minutes?
Yes, I have.
Come on.
(DOORBELL RINGING)
Oh, great!
They're here.
Okay.
Table's not set.
Dinner's not ready.
Would you please just let my parents in?
- I gotta jump in the shower.
- What?
I gotta go.
Gary.
Gary.
(DOORBELL RINGING)
GARY:
Well, seeing how our families haven't had many opportunities to get to know one another, we figured, what better way than to break some bread?
So, everyone, thank you for coming and enjoy the meal.
- ALL:
Cheers.
- Cheers, honey.
- Mrs Grobowski.
Nice to meet you.
- Thank you.
DENNIS:
Cheer with the sons.
GARY:
Sweetheart, cheers to you.
Darling, I see that you put those Feng Shui books that I sent to you to good use.
- This place is so well balanced.
- Thanks, Mom.
Yeah, the energy in this place is just amazing.
WENDY:
Yes.
Well, the energy in the condo might be a little more amazing if we had a pool table.
Gary, we've already discussed that.
We're gonna get a pool table when we get a bigger place.
The place is plenty big now, if you wanted a pool table because...
- Gary.
- Yeah.
You could take the dining room table, go ahead and move her in the living room.
BROOKE:
Really?
GARY:
Plenty of room.
And put a dining room table in the living room?
Okay.
How do you...
I mean, what do you do with a dining room table?
- Eat on it.
- We'd have no furniture in the living...
- Where's the furniture go?
- All I'm saying is, it would be nice to be able to shoot some pool.
- Well, this isn't a dorm.
- Look, baby, I completely understand.
There's halls and stuff.
I mean, you can go...
We will wait and get a pool table when we have a bigger place.
Thank you.
- The food is outstanding.
- It is delicious food.
DENNIS:
It's outstanding.
- LUPUS:
Yeah, it really is nice.
- Okay, everybody.
- Time for the joke of the day.
Knock, knock.
- Dad.
Dad, come on.
- Who's there?
- Norma Lee.
Norma Lee, who?
Normally, I don't go around knocking on doors, but would you like to buy an encyclopaedia?
LUPUS:
I got a joke.
I got a joke.
(ALL CHUCKLING)
How's it going?
I got a joke for you.
What do you get when you cross a gay Eskimo and a black guy?
All right, look, I think we've had enough with the jokes for tonight.
Thank you, though.
Let's just talk with each other.
All right.
I saw that Three Brothers article in the Trib this week.
Sounds like you guys are up to some pretty exciting stuff.
Basically, our big goal is to try to take Chicago tourism by air, land and sea.
We're still in the ground phase with the buses.
But as soon as we get our infantry established,
- then we'll take it to the squids.
- Yeah.
- Boats.
Boats.
- Oh, boats.
As soon as we control the waterway, then we'll bring in air supports and then we'll pretty much control everything.
You know, Dennis, the way your face lights up when you describe your ambitions, it's really inspiring.
- Oh, thanks.
- Because I understand how you feel that passion.
RICHARD:
And sharing it with other people, I think that's what life's about.
I don't feel that about boats and squibs...
Squids?
- ALL:
Squids.
- Sorry.
- CAROL:
Yeah.
- But I do feel it about singing.
With my a cappella group, The Tone Rangers.
Although it's not as aggressive as your dream, it's really more of a brotherhood.
It's like a musical team.
It's like a symphony of guys.
Guy symphony.
And it's very hard to describe the true magic of a group of guys singing in perfect harmony.
It's transcendent.
But it's still very real.
I guess the best way to put it in words is just... (SINGING SINGLE NOTE)
Even that doesn't do it.
That doesn't do it because that's just one person.
And what I'm talking about is the pulse of the collective.
Oh, heck.
Let me just show you how it's done.
Dad, how about a little percussion?
- RICHARD:
Tap-tap-tappy.
- Tap-tap-tappy.
And, Mom, high-hat.
(HISSING)
RICHARD:
Good, Mom.
Excellent.
And Gary!
(RHYTHMICALLY) On the kick drum!
Come, come!
On the kick drum!
Come, come!
That's Gary!
Come, come with the kick drum.
Come!
Come, come with the kick drum.
Gary, on the kick drum.
Come, come.
That's Gary on the kick drum.
Go!
And Gary.
In the house.
- Come, come.
- I'm not with you.
Come, come.
With the kick drum.
Come, come.
I'm just not really the kick drum kind of guy.
I'd rather be just a listener and enjoy all the banging that he's doing and the...
You know, Gary, that's your prerogative.
That's your right, to listen.
Meantime, I've gotta talk to Brooke about something.
- It's called the bass line.
Excuse me.
- Okay.
(PITCH PIPE PLAYING)
(HUMMING RHYTHMICALLY)
(SCATTING)
(HISSING)
Good, Carol.
Good, Brooke.
(ALL SINGING)
RICHARD:
Yes, Dennis.
- (WHISPERING) Be nice.
- RICHARD:
Totally awesome.
(MIMICKING METALLIC CLANGING)
(SINGING) Move yourself
You always live your life
Never thinking of the future
Prove yourself
You are the move you make
Take your chances win or loser
See yourself
You're every step you take
You and you and that's the only way
- Shake
- WENDY:
Shake!
Shake yourself
You're every move you make
So the story goes
CAROL:
Thank you so much.
BROOKE:
Okay, bye.
WENDY:
Thank you so much.
- CAROL:
It was great to see you.
- Okay.
Come on.
- Have a good night.
- It was really nice, Gary.
- Nice to see you.
You, too.
- Good to see you guys.
- Thanks, Brookie.
- Oh, honey.
Thank you, sweetie.
- You're still my favourite singer.
- Stop it.
Love you, sis.
And I'd love for you to come to a live performance of The Tone Rangers singing live.
That's something you'd really enjoy.
- It was good seeing you.
- Okay.
- Thank you.
- All right.
- Bye, darling.
Thank you for such a...
- Okay.
Okay, Mom.
- We'll see you soon.
- Bye, dear.
Thanks, darling.
- See you later.
- Okay, buddy.
Oh, now, are you sure that we can't help you clean up?
- No, no.
I think we're gonna be great.
We'll...
- Yes?
So nice of you to offer, but we got it.
Thank you.
- Oh, it was such fun.
- Great.
- I love you.
- Great to see you.
- Good night, sweetie.
- Thank you so much.
I appreciate it.
Thank you so much.
- All right, guys.
- WENDY:
Bye-bye.
- Bye-bye.
- Thanks for coming.
Love you, too.
MAN ON TV:
Are you blind?
(HORN TOOTING)
Oh, no, no!
My demos!
(MAN ON TV SCREAMING)
- Well, I'm gonna go do the dishes.
- Cool.
- It'd be nice if you helped me.
- Damn it.
MAN:
Way to go!
No problem.
I'll get them a little bit later.
I'm just gonna hit the streets here for a little bit.
Gary, come on, I don't want to do them later.
Let's just do them now.
It'll take 15 minutes.
Honey, I am so exhausted.
I just honestly want to relax for a little bit.
If I could just sit here, let my food digest, and just try to enjoy the quiet for a little bit.
Get some!
Get some!
Get some!
That's what happens.
And we will...
You know, we can clean the dishes tomorrow.
Gary, you know I don't like waking up to a dirty kitchen.
- Who cares?
- I care!
All right?
I care!
I busted my ass all day cleaning this house and then cooking that meal.
And I worked today.
It would be nice if you said thank you and helped me with the dishes.
- Fine.
I'll help you do the damn dishes.
- Oh, come on.
You know what?
No.
See?
That's not what I want.
You just said that you want me to help you do the dishes.
- I want you to want to do the dishes.
- Why would I want to do dishes?
- Why?
- See, that's my whole point.
Let me see if I'm following this, okay?
Are you telling me that you're upset because I don't have a strong desire to clean dishes?
No.
I'm upset because you don't have a strong desire to offer to do the dishes.
- I just did.
- After I asked you!
- Jesus, Brooke, you're acting crazy again.
- Don't you call me crazy.
I am not crazy.
- I didn't call you crazy.
- You just did.
I didn't call you...
No, I didn't.
- I said you're acting crazy.
- You know what, Gary?
I asked you to do one thing today, one very simple thing, to bring me 12 lemons and you brought me three.
God damn it.
If I knew that it was gonna be this much trouble,
I would have brought home 24 lemons.
Even 100 lemons.
You know what I wish?
I wish everyone that was at that goddamn table had their own little private bag of lemons.
- Honest to God!
- Gary, it's not about the lemons.
Well, that's all you're talking about.
I'm just saying it'd be nice if you did things that I asked.
It would be even nicer if you did things without me having to ask you!
Well, I do seem to remember doing something for you this morning without you asking.
- Gary, come on.
- What?
I'm serious.
Come here.
- You know what?
I'm serious.
I really am.
- I am, too.
Come on.
You knew I was working today and I made that meal.
And you could have thought to yourself, you know, you could have said,
"Yeah, I think I'm gonna get Brooke some flowers."
You said on our very first date that you don't like flowers, that they're a waste of money.
Every girl likes flowers, Gary.
You said that you don't like flowers.
I'm supposed to take that to mean that you do like flowers?
No.
This is not about...
You're not...
God, you're not getting it.
You're not getting this, Gary, okay?
It's not about the lemons.
It's not about the flowers.
It's not about the dishes.
It's just about...
How many times do I have to drop hints about the ballet?
You know I can't stand...
Brooke, come here.
We've talked about the damn ballet.
I hate the goddamn ballet!
You got a bunch of dudes in tights flopping around for three hours.
It's like a medieval techno show.
It's a nightmare.
I sit there in a sweat.
The whole thing, I do, wondering when the hell's the goddamn nightmare gonna end.
- Go to a damn ballet.
- It's not about you loving the ballet, Gary.
It's about the person that you love loves the ballet and you wanting to spend time with that person.
Not when they're at the ballet.
- Okay.
Forget the ballet!
Forget the ballet!
- I will.
We don't go anywhere together.
- We just went to Ann Arbor together.
- To Ann Arbor.
To the Michigan-Notre Dame game.
You think screaming, drunk kids and leprechauns doing backflips, that's fun.
That's fun for me.
Come on, man.
I did that for you.
What do you...
How do you show up for me?
I'm up on the bus every goddamn day for you!
- Come on.
You...
- I'm busting my ass to be the best tour guide in the damn city, so I can make enough money to support both of us and hopefully you won't have to work one day.
- I want to work.
- All I ask, Brooke, is that you show a little bit of appreciation.
That I just get 20 minutes to relax when I come home, instead of being attacked with questions and nagged the whole damn time.
- You think that I nag you?
- That's all you do!
All you do is nag me!
"The bathroom's a mess." "Your belt doesn't match."
"Hey, Gary, you should probably go work out."
Nothing I ever do is ever good enough!
I just want to be left the hell alone!
Really?
Is that what you want, Gary?
- Is that what you want?
- Yeah.
- That's what you want?
- Yeah.
Fine.
Great.
Do whatever the hell you want.
You leave your socks all over this house, dress like a pig, play your stupid-ass video game.
I don't care, I'm done.
- What?
- I'm done!
I don't deserve this.
I really do not deserve this.
I deserve somebody who gives a shit.
I'm not spending one more second of this life with some inconsiderate prick!
You're a prick!
(DOOR SLAMMING)
(DOOR SHUTS)
Addie, it just became so clear tonight how much he takes me for granted.
- What happened?
- BROOKE:
Just the same old shit.
I asked him to do one thing and he didn't do it.
Then he complained that he had to do anything, and I just felt like I had no choice.
No, sweetie, you did have a choice, okay?
And it sounds like you made the right one.
You respected yourself.
But it's just not what I want.
I don't want to break up with him.
I don't.
I just want him to say thank you.
I want him to want to do the dishes.
I just want him to want to take me to the ballet.
I want him to get me 12 lemons!
You know...
I just want him to care enough about this relationship to want to work on it.
Okay, you know what?
I'm putting on my shoes
- and I'm gonna be there in 15 minutes.
- No, Ad.
Don't.
Please, I really don't want to see anybody.
I really don't.
But, look, I'm worried about you, okay?
And I can hear you in there banging around your dishes.
And I don't want you getting out your Clorox and your rubber gloves,
- and taking this out on the kitchen.
- Look, look, look.
Okay.
Tonight just...
It just got a little out of hand, and hopefully he's just gonna realise that he's got some changes to make and he's gonna...
He's gonna come home and apologise.
Okay?
That's what's gonna happen.
GARY:
I feel like, I don't...
You know, like, you dress however you want to dress.
You know, do whatever you want to do.
- I'm done with the relationship.
- Whatever.
So, it's just kind of, "You're done with the relationship?"
Well, you're obviously hurt about it.
- She got to you.
You're hurt.
- I'm not.
It's nothing to be ashamed of.
She hurt you.
Will you look at me?
I'm not heartbroken.
I'm a little shocked.
I'm a little surprised.
Gary, you're devastated.
Now, what's the name of the guy she's doing?
I'm gonna solve your problem.
What's his name?
- What are you talking about?
- Have you checked her e-mail?
I don't check e-mails.
I don't...
You can get a programme that records keystrokes.
It costs, like, 20 bucks.
Very easy to use.
Okay?
You get a password, you check her e-mail.
You find out everything about her.
That's how I found out about the Puerto Rican
- that Stacy was running around with.
- Okay.
You are reading a little too much into this situation.
There is no one she's running around with, okay?
We had a fight over the groceries I brought home.
You're probably right.
She's probably not sleeping with anybody.
- No.
Not what it's about.
- Okay.
- Maybe she's with another guy, maybe not.
- She's not.
I don't know.
I'm not Columbo.
Okay?
But what we do know is that she doesn't want to be with you anymore.
I mean, I hate to be shitty about it, and so cut and dry, but let's face it.
She says she doesn't want to be with you, and I believe her.
Now, we gotta figure it out.
And you're gonna need a place to go and lick your wounds while you get your head right over this thing.
I don't need a place to go and lick my wounds.
You're gonna stay with me.
- I'm not gonna hear it.
- Look it...
- I'm not moving out of the place.
- Oh, you're not moving out.
No.
I put money in the place.
I put half my money in the place.
You're obviously not the one calling the shots in this case.
Yeah, but I own the place.
- With her.
- Yeah.
But it's not up to her who gets to keep the goddamn place.
If you find out who she's sleeping with, maybe we could leverage it.
- I want you to listen to me.
- You listen to me.
- I'm gonna leave you a key.
- I don't need a key.
- Why?
- 'Cause she's gonna put...
She's gonna move out of the place, Johnny.
- Did she say she was moving out?
- She will.
She's gonna move out.
Oh, she's...
I'm gonna keep the place.
I'm not moving out of the place.
I'll leave you a key.
(DOOR OPENING)
(DOOR SHUTTING)
(TOOL WHIRRING)
- Hey, how's it going?
- LUPUS:
I almost got it.
- Yeah.
- You know, I was thinking.
You know what you should do, is you should find somebody who looks like Brooke, but even hotter and, you know, bang the shit out of her.
- What the hell's wrong with you?
- What?
- Logs.
- Just fix the damn engine.
- I am fixing the goddamn engine.
- I need your tour logs.
I'm off the clock, okay?
Well, I cannot file the quarterlies until I have your log.
I'm going through a little bit of a life change here, Dennis.
I would really appreciate a little bit of sensitivity, please.
CHRISTOPHER:
I know they're both French, but that has nothing to do with it.
Because Manet was earlier and...
No.
Monet and Manet are very different things.
I'm sorry, I beg to differ.
Excuse me, sir, can I have her call you back personally?
Yes.
Okay, thank you.
Sorry.
Brooke?
- I am so sorry.
- What?
Come here.
Oh, honey, your mom called and told me everything.
Oh, Jesus.
Good morning, Marilyn.
Morning.
I'll go water the plants.
I understand you had a long night.
Tell me everything.
BROOKE: "Everything." I couldn't possibly...
Then don't.
My time is pressing.
What I want is for you to take the rest of the day off.
Oh, no.
No, that's not necessary.
Who am I?
- Marilyn Dean.
- And where are we?
- The Marilyn Dean Gallery.
- And of whom is that portrait?
- That is Marilyn Dean.
- Yeah.
You know, your personal life is your personal life.
But you look like shit.
And when you look like shit,
Marilyn Dean looks like shit, and now it is my business.
And when it comes to my business, I don't like anything that's distracting.
So, I want you to take the rest of the day off to be sad and then come back to work tomorrow ready to take care of business.
Got it?
(ELEVATOR BELL DINGS)
(ROCK MUSIC BLARING)
(POOL BALLS CLACKING)
Oh, hey, Brooke.
How are you?
What the hell are you doing?
Well, my whole life, I always wanted my own place with my own pool table.
I finally got my own place, but you would not allow me to have a pool table.
I just kind of figured I'd rectify that today.
And it does feel good.
I'm gonna go ahead and put the four ball in the corner pocket.
Nice.
I'm sorry, can I...
A little room for the shooter, please?
It's hard to shoot with someone standing...
Thank you.
(POOL BALLS CLACKING)
Wow.
Well, I guess he feels threatened that you broke up with him and he's acting out.
Okay, look, Brooke, men are like children.
You know?
And they... (WHISPERING) Sweetie, it's a figure of speech.
It's Brooke.
And I love you so much.
And you're my man and you know that.
You're amazing.
I love you.
Listen, and they're gonna test boundaries to see what they can get away with.
I think there's three things that Gary needs to know.
One, this type of behaviour is not unnoticed.
Two, it's not acceptable.
And three, you know, you're definitely not gonna tolerate it.
Right?
Yes.
And Brooke, remember, we're always owning our actions, right?
And we're always healthy with it, yes?
Yes.
I don't wanna finish the game.
I got showings, okay?
I gotta buy the cookie spray.
I gotta clean up the dog.
(YOU OUGHTA KNOW BLARING)
And now I'm really leaving 'cause I don't want to hear that.
Okay?
Thank you for the pool.
Thank you for the snacks.
- I'm going to get a cab.
- I'll split it with you.
What are you, 12?
Brooke, that is not healthy.
- I'm trying to make a point.
- And what is that point?
My point's your point.
Your three points.
That it's not unnoticed, that it was not acceptable, and that it would definitely not be tolerated.
Not exactly what I meant.
Unbelievable.
- I knew it!
- Hey, gang.
Found my shirt on the floor.
Thanks for laying it out.
- Gary, are you here for couples bowling?
- Yeah.
Well, don't you think you and I should discuss something first?
Like what?
How your 47 average is killing us?
Okay.
Great.
No.
Gary, this is couples bowling.
And since you and I are no longer a couple, because you have chosen not to participate constructively in our relationship, we're now singles.
So, there's not room for two singles on the team.
Why do you look confused?
I don't have any idea what's happening.
I've come to play on the team.
Look, Gary, I just don't think it's a good idea for you and I to be around each other any more than we have to right now.
I completely agree.
Maybe you should go play some pinball.
- No, I think you should leave.
- Okay.
Brooke, when a man makes a commitment to a team, he honours that commitment.
He doesn't let emotions or personal issues get in the way of victory.
And I've made a commitment to this team.
- They don't want you here either, Gary.
- Yeah.
Sure, they don't.
They don't.
They're my friends.
- But you're not a strong bowler.
- That's not the point.
You know what?
Let's just...
Why don't we let them decide?
Gary, don't.
No.
Don't involve them, okay?
That's unnecessary.
- What's wrong, Castro?
- Castro?
Well, Castro doesn't let people vote as a team.
- Okay.
Ask them.
- Thank you.
Okay, everyone.
Team vote here.
By a show of hands, just put it up when you make a decision, who here agrees with Brooke and thinks I should leave the bowling team?
Shocker.
Band of Brothers.
You should rent it sometime.
Good luck, everyone.
Riding Miss Gutter Ball to the finals.
- Hey, Gary.
- Yeah.
- I'm gonna need your shirt back.
- What?
Well, we're gonna have to replace you, and you know we get docked 10 pins if everyone's not in matching Pin Shakers uniforms.
- My shirt says "Gary" on it.
- Granted.
But actually, we know a guy named Gary.
And he's not as tall as you, but he's a pretty good bowler.
I'm gonna have to request that I have my wrist guard back then.
I'm sorry.
That's mine.
Just give me the goddamn wrist guard, please.
Thank you.
I hope your wrist snaps.
Wow.
Okay?
You see that?
You know what I mean?
Yeah.
That was awesome.
You just had your ex-boyfriend, who you wish you were still dating, voted off the bowling team.
Well, I had to do that to get him right where I want him.
Where's that?
Shirtless in the parking lot?
Addie, you're not getting this.
Gary loves this bowling team.
He's hurt right now.
He's feeling pretty bad.
He's gonna go out there and he's gonna get drunk.
He's gonna make a complete fool of himself.
And he will be sitting there feeling pretty lonely and pretty pathetic, and then it's just gonna hit him.
What's gonna hit him?
That not only is he out a girlfriend, but his life is just falling apart piece by piece and maybe that life was pretty great.
And maybe I was the glue that was holding it all together.
And if he wants that life back, he's gonna have no choice but to change.
(MUSIC PLAYING)
- How about this, huh?
- I feel like we just found hell.
When did you start coming to knobby joints like this?
I might be the greatest you've ever seen, pal.
I'm conquering new frontiers.
Hello, babe.
Yeah, you've got to put up with the bad music and the $15 drinks, but this place is stacked with top-shelf, young, dumb ass.
All you gotta do is just separate the weaker ones from the herd.
Come on, I'll get you into the VIP.
- Can I get a couple drinks from you?
- Okay, L.G.
Lupus, I got to be totally...
I got to be honest with you.
I'm not feeling it here.
You're gonna like it in here.
You're gonna love it.
- I don't like it out here.
- Look, listen to me, will you, please?
How you doing, Buzz?
While you were on the inside locked up for the past two years, the game has changed.
(WOMEN CHEERING)
Do you remember when you were an outdoor cat and you used to have to hunt and kill for your food?
Well, you've become an indoor cat.
You've been getting your milk brought to you in a silver bowl, and guess what?
Now, you've been tossed back outside and the alley has changed.
For example, your MTV generation, your technology, your text message, your TiVo.
You name it.
People want their information faster.
People e-mail each other because they want to exchange information, Gar.
They don't want to connect, they want results.
- Okay.
- You gotta get to the message quicker.
Now, I want you to watch.
It's real simple.
Okay?
How you doing, ladies?
Now, here's what I'd like to do to you.
First, I'd like to get you naked.
And then I'm gonna take some Saran Wrap and I'm gonna wrap you up in it, head to toe.
Then I'm gonna cut out two holes.
One for your mouth, so you can breathe, obviously.
- And the other one...
- Asshole.
It could be a gorgeous evening for us, babe.
The pink is gorgeous.
Jesus, God.
Come here.
Lupus, listen to me.
I want you to listen to me.
There are our drinks.
You want your drink?
- No, I'm fine.
- Thank you.
The L.G. Thanks you.
Will you listen to me, please?
You're my brother and I love you very much, and maybe you do get laid tonight, but maybe you get arrested.
Arrested for what, babe?
Being awesome?
Come on, babe, listen.
You want to tell your jokes, tell your jokes.
But sooner or later you're gonna get hungry and you're gonna wanna eat.
And jokes might make you feel better, but they don't get you fed.
I'm gonna go take a lap.
(DOOR OPENING)
(DOOR SHUTTING)
- What are you doing?
- I'm sketching.
And where are you sketching?
- In the living room.
- No, in my bedroom.
And I didn't say anything to you, Brooke, when you so arrogantly claimed the bed without asking me, but you can't just waltz into my room and turn it into a damn art fair.
Gary, I've only taken up a little bit of space, so...
I don't care if you only took an inch.
There might not be a door here, but this is my domain.
Okay?
I don't go into your bedroom and set up a goddamn sawhorse.
Well, then what the hell is that pool table doing in the dining room?
Because that's a common area.
And that's where this belongs.
- Not in my room.
- Hey, what are you doing?
- It belongs in another common area.
- Gary.
People want to come home and they want to relax in their room.
Gary, it is 2:00 in the morning!
- Don't you drop my things.
- I don't know what to tell you, kid.
This is how I am when I'm single.
My hours start to get pretty strange.
Might be time for you to think about moving out.
Why would I...
No, I'm not moving anywhere.
Gary, just please turn the volume down.
Yeah, but I don't tell you what the hell to do in your room.
You can doodle.
You can dance.
You can bake a goddamn gingerbread house.
I don't give a shit.
But in my room, I want to relax and watch my highlights in complete surround-sound experience.
- What the hell are you doing?
- You're not even gonna watch it!
Don't tell me what I am or aren't not doing.
Oh, what you are not, not doing?
- Go learn some English.
- Oh, I'm sorry.
I didn't have a grandfather on the board of some fancy college.
Key word being "was." Did he touch the Filipino exchange student?
Did he not touch the exchange student?
- I don't know, Brooke.
I wasn't there.
- Okay.
No, don't start with the family stuff.
Like your family's so perfect?
Your brother's a pervert!
Don't talk to me about the sexual habits of family members.
What about your sister?
- My sister's been through a lot.
- Of dick.
There are some problems, Gary, but can we please just leave it...
Problems?
She slept with the entire Arizona Cardinals offensive line.
That's not problems.
That's she's the problem!
- She was on vacation!
- She was on vacation.
Don't even get me started, by the way, on your brother.
If I have to hear that guy sing just one more time,
I'd hang myself with wax dental floss.
Could the guy just come out of the closet, please?
Richard is not gay.
Okay, lassie, I want you to listen to me and listen good.
I'm not saying he won't get married.
I'm not saying he won't even have kids.
But then one day his wife will come home, and then she'll find him with a guy named Majulio, wearing leather helmets and clubbing each other to Yanni's greatest hits.
Yeah.
Right.
Whatever.
You're an infant.
Yeah, I'm an infant.
Go enjoy your room, Brooke, 'cause I'm gonna enjoy mine!
- Okay.
- You know what?
I might enjoy some pay-per-view options tonight.
It's gonna be a long one, sweetheart, and I got nothing to do mañana but sleep in.
(DOOR SLAMMING)
(BOOGIE NIGHTS PLAYING)
(SINGING) Boogie nights Ain't no doubt we are here to party
What are you doing?
Boogie nights Come on now, got to get it started
Ricky, you and the Get Along Gang leave or I'm gonna throw you out of here personally, you understand?
Actually, Gary, this is Brooke's bedroom.
So, technically, you don't have jurisdiction here, but I think it'd be really fun if you sang with us.
Come on, Gary.
I think you'll like it.
You got 10 seconds to get out of here or I'm gonna break your damn magic whistle.
You understand what I'm saying to you?
Move this group out of my house, now!
(EXCLAIMING)
(GRUNTING)
(ALL SINGING)
Gary, you can't take a pitch pipe out of a guy's hand when he's in the middle of a very funky groove.
You can get hurt doing something like that.
I'm tapping out, I'm tapping out!
Here we go.
From the bridge.
(SINGING) Party night Get on down with the sound of the music
Boogie nights Do it, do it
What kind of bullshit move was that?
- I'm sorry.
What?
What happened?
- Oh, don't be coy with me.
You sent that animal over here to attack me when I was hung over and weak.
Oh, no.
Look, all I know is The Tone Rangers, they needed someplace to rehearse, so I very clearly told Richard, "Stay in my room,"
which you explained to me was my space to do with what I want.
Is that how you want to play it?
'Cause I'll play it like that.
I'll play it like Lionel Richie.
All night long, lady.
Oh, yeah.
I'll call some guys from my neck of the woods.
And we're not talking, Brooke, about a couple of queens who know a few grapples.
We're talking about Polacks that don't have a goddamn future.
- Right.
- That's right!
We can make shit real uncomfortable around here, and that's what we're gonna do.
Please.
Come on.
You know what?
You're just embarrassed because Richard kicked your ass.
Richard did not kick my ass.
What Richard did was attack me when I was half asleep.
Really?
Is that how you see it?
There's a really big gap between getting your ass kicked and having a dancing, singing sprite fool you with trickery and then strike your throat before you know that you're even in a fight.
And I wouldn't expect someone like you to understand that, because all you ever do is make moves from up in your ivy tower.
Wow.
You have officially gone off the reservation.
I'm an adult.
I talk through shit.
He ran out of ideas.
God.
Listen, by the way, there's messages on the voice mail regarding game night, which is obviously not gonna happen, so you might want to call people and tell them that it's cancelled.
- Why would I cancel game night?
- Well, I mean...
If it's our turn to host game, I'm gonna host goddamn game night.
- You want to host game night?
- I'm fine, Brooke.
I don't have any strangeness over what happened here today.
Okay.
If there's anyone that should feel weird about seeing people, that's you, Tonya Harding.
Me?
I'm gonna honour my commitments.
- Great.
- Great.
- Fine.
- Fine.
- Let's do that.
- Let's do that.
Let's honour the commitment.
(WATER RUNNING)
- Hey, there's no food in there!
- BROOKE:
So?
Well, people are gonna be here in an hour.
What are they supposed to eat?
You're a big boy.
Figure it out.
Oh, great.
Well, that's what we got.
We have only tap water because, you know, Gary didn't shop.
BROOKE:
And we don't have any ice either 'cause he didn't fill the trays.
- That's trash.
It's your shot.
- What is your name again?
- Diane.
- Diane.
GARY:
Did you call?
JOHNNY O:
I called the five.
Well, yeah, but you didn't call the second ball, so that's trash, so it's your shot.
GARY:
You got to play by the rules.
It's your shot.
- Hi.
- Hi.
- Andrew.
- BROOKE:
Oh, hi.
Whoa, whoa, whoa!
Hey, hey, hey!
These two Benedict Arnolds aren't welcome in my condo.
- Who sent an invite to them?
- I'm sorry.
These are very loyal friends and they are always welcome in my condo.
Oh, really?
Why don't we take it to a vote and see who has the numbers this time?
GARY:
All right.
Show of hands here.
Who thinks that these two traitors should leave and not be a part of game night?
And maybe take their shirts off when they leave.
Raise your hand.
I know I feel that way.
Who else?
GARY:
Come on, Johnny O, put your hand up, please.
Come on.
Thank you.
You, Miss?
New girl.
Who's the girl?
What's her name?
What's her name?
- The girl you're with.
What's her name?
- Her name's Diane.
Oh, I'm sorry.
You might want to go ahead and touch some sky.
- Thank you.
Come on, Riggleman, please?
- What are you doing?
No.
We need the eight to count towards a running tally.
You know that.
Come on.
Show her whose side that you're on.
Put your hand in the air.
You know whose side I'm on.
You know we need eight, though.
Come on.
Put your hand down.
Please don't touch my Ruffles.
GARY:
Put that one back.
Those are my Ruffles.
Don't eat them, please.
Thank you.
- Oh, Gary.
- They're mine.
- Come on.
- Here we go.
All right.
- RIGGLEMAN:
Eyes front.
Ready?
- Hold on.
Get the timer going, please.
- Ready?
- GARY:
Now I gotta do it.
Go.
- ANDREW:
Okay.
- It's a brick.
- ADDIE:
Square.
Square.
- Box.
Box.
Corner.
Corner.
A dot in the corner.
- A house.
- Home plate!
JEN:
Football!
Baseball!
Sports.
A house.
ADDIE:
A triangle.
It's algebra.
- Okay, it's a house.
- ADDIE:
It's a house.
JEN:
It's a house.
ANDREW:
Two words.
JEN:
Banana?
ADDIE:
Chimney, chimney, chimney!
A fruit.
House.
Fruit.
Oh, restaurant.
Or...
ANDREW:
No, chimney, chimney.
ADDIE:
Smoke...
- JEN:
Oh, a house call.
- House call!
Oh!
House call!
Yeah, well, I thought it was a house call.
- Like a hotel, then it hit me it was a house.
- ADDIE:
Yeah!
You're terrific.
Absolutely terrific.
All right, beat that.
Okay, guys, listen.
The next one wins, okay?
So let's stay focused.
Let's stay calm.
We can do this.
High fives.
Let's go.
Come on.
Let's go.
Let's get a mind-meld.
Let's try and get a mind-meld, okay?
- GARY:
Here we go.
Let's go.
Mind-meld.
- I heard you!
- Don't over-think it.
Mind meld.
- ANDREW:
Ready?
- I heard you!
- Well, just keep it simple.
Shush.
- Ready?
Wait.
Go!
- Here we go!
We're mind-melding.
Draw faster.
It doesn't have to be beautiful,
- just has to be something we can get.
- Shoe, shoe...
Shoe!
Shoe, shoe, shoe.
Shoeless Joe Jackson.
Draw something different.
No one's getting it.
- Shoe.
What, is that a smaller shoe?
- JOHNNY O:
Baby shoe.
- Smaller shoe.
Baby shoes.
- JOHNNY O:
Shoes.
Baby shoes.
Smaller shoe.
Gumshoe.
GARY:
Smaller shoes.
DIANE:
Gumshoe?
Gumshoe?
- Running Olympics.
- JOHNNY O:
Inside the shoe.
- Inside a shoe.
A bubble...
- JOHNNY O:
Lining.
Stop pointing at the shoe.
We're not...
No one's guessing shoe.
Stop pointing at the shoe and draw something different.
(TIMER RINGING) Draw something different.
You...
Goddamn it!
No one's guessing shoe!
You drew a big shoe, then a small shoe, and no one got it.
You gotta draw something different.
Everyone said "shoe" seven times.
It's a sock, asshole.
- You call yourself an artist?
- Yes!
A three-year-old with a box of crayons could do a better job than this.
I'm sorry, I don't have the great talent of standing on top of a big red bus and pointing out architecture that other great men have built!
I'm the one who should be sorry, Brooke.
- I shouldn't sit here and pick on your art.
- No.
Because you got the nuts part down, Picasso.
GARY:
All you have to do is cut off your frigging ear.
BROOKE:
That's Van Gogh, you idiot!
And your insults are much more effective when they're accurate.
Don't talk to me about being goddamn accurate!
I can talk to you about anything that I want.
'Cause you couldn't even draw a sock.
You don't do anything right!
You're a lazy...
Everyone said, "Shoe, shoe, shoe!"
At first, I figured that the split was just something temporary, something that you two would work out and get past, but after tonight I think it's pretty clear that you two genuinely do not want to get back together.
- There's not a shot in hell.
- Gary.
- I'm just...
- I got you.
As your friend and as your realtor,
I'm not gonna leave here tonight until we decide what to do about this condo, because this living situation is obviously not working out.
Gary?
Well, the only logical thing that I can think of is for her to move out of the condo, and then to pay me some sort of a penalty as compensation for
- the labour that I did all around the condo.
- What?
What?
What?
Pay you compensation for your labour?
- We fixed this place up together.
- Are you nuts?
- Stop calling me nuts, I swear to God.
- I fixed the...
You went around with a sponge, and you went in the bathroom and you dotted foofy shit.
- That's what you're saying that I did?
- GARY:
There's no...
BROOKE:
That was...
That's called aesthetics.
It warmed this place up so it didn't look like an army barracks, which it was about to.
I'll tell you what it's called in his language, depreciated.
- That's what it's called.
- You don't even know what that means.
Unless the next buyer happens to have your same Zulu-voodoo-land taste.
- All right.
- Let me tell you something else.
It's gonna cost money to cover up the holes in the wall.
The holes that you drilled in the wall there to hang up whatever that thing is called.
Oh, please.
Gary.
GARY:
You're gonna have to cost money to fix that.
What I did, Brooke, has concrete value to the condo.
I added concrete...
Well, let's just go on record.
We're dealing with facts here.
I did the tiling in the bathroom.
- Have you seen...
- I did the new track lighting.
- That tile is the shittiest tile job.
- GARY:
I did the plumbing!
- The plumbing!
- That's realty terms.
Okay.
Let's talk about your plumbing.
This is his plumbing.
We have two temperatures in our bathroom.
We get either scalding hot or we get frostbite.
- That's it.
That's all we get.
- It's my problem that she doesn't know how to pace a shower?
GARY:
Now all of a sudden that's my fault.
I get one minute to take a shower.
- One minute?
- BROOKE:
One minute of warmth?
- Oh, Jesus.
One minute.
- That's it.
That's correct.
Thank God you're not in charge of keeping all the clocks in Chicago on time.
- This is basic logic.
- You are out of your mind.
You have lost it.
Let me explain this to you in plain chapter and verse.
Cheese and rice, you guys are gonna kill each other.
Now, let's just...
Realistically speaking, neither one of you can afford this mortgage on your own, okay?
And that's a shame, because this building will continue to increase in value.
I get nothing but phone calls about it, all right?
Waiting for a unit to open up.
So, as your realtor, the last thing I would suggest is selling.
But as your friend, I just, I don't see any other solution.
You take your halves, you go your separate ways, and you get on with your lives.
I know that selling is not the easiest thing, but I do think that it's the best.
And to be honest, this is a situation where I would just as soon not take a commission.
- That's great.
Thank you.
- That's great.
Thank you for that.
I wish I didn't have to, you know, but company policy says I cannot waive that.
But I was just...
You know, I'm saying in theory, you know.
In this situation, 'cause we're friends, I wish I could waive it.
No can do, though.
As soon as you can, I would love to get a set of keys from you guys.
You just drop them off.
Okay.
Great.
There they are.
I'll be bringing by people all week.
You won't even know I'm here.
The good news is, should move quickly.
All right.
Okay to leave you two alone now?
Got to get back to Jen.
Very excited about the win tonight.
Okay.
(DOOR OPENING)
(DOOR CLOSING)
BROOKE:
Addie, if the condo sells, I think I'm gonna lose him.
ADDIE ON PHONE:
Yeah, but game night was so light and fun,
I'm really surprised to be hearing this.
Okay.
You know what?
That's not constructive.
Really.
I just...
Yeah, I need a new plan, Addie.
I don't... (SNICKERING)
I'm just kidding.
It's me.
I'm gonna have to call you back.
Whenever one of my friends is down, we all go on, like, happy patrol.
I was actually having a very serious conversation.
(SINGING)
Christopher, do not sing.
(SINGING) If you're happy and you know it clap your hands
If you're happy and you know it Clap your hands
If you're happy and you know it You're going to smile to... (DOOR SLAMS)
Pack up your shit and go home.
Okay.
You know what?
This is not his fault.
He was just really trying to cheer me up and it...
Did I or did I not give you the day off to be sad?
- Yes.
But I...
- Well, today's not that day, and unfortunately for you, I can't afford to look weak.
No, please.
You have warned me so many times and you have yet to fire me.
I think you and I both know that to find and train somebody new, it's gonna cost you time, and it's gonna cost you money, and I don't think you want to spend either one of those.
Now, look, I'm just gonna take a wild guess here, but you don't become Marilyn Dean without knowing how to handle men.
Okay?
Now, just listen to my problem, tell me how to fix it, and then we'll all go back to work.
Okay.
What is this problem so severe that has caused you to blaspheme in the synagogue of Marilyn Dean?
Well, it's Gary.
I broke up with him in hopes that losing me would make him want to change, and that's, you know...
And I've just ended up pushing him, you know, farther and farther away.
- That's it?
- Yeah.
Honey, this is not surrealism or cubism, it's paint-by-numbers.
Go see Mischa, my personal waxer at the spa.
Ask her for the Telly Savalas.
The Telly Savalas.
Compliments of M. Dean.
Then go show Gary your immaculate canvas and let him see another man eager to paint it.
Got it?
- Got it?
- Uh-huh.
Ow!
Who loves you, baby?
ANNOUNCER ON TV:
Wow, impressive.
Three sharp hands landed.
What an amazing display of punching technique.
The crowd jumps.
That punch rocked him.
They sense he's on the verge of hitting the canvas.
The roaring for anticipation of a knockout.
We are witnessing a great fight.
He's displaying incredible rhythm with his hands.
Bulldog terrorising his opponent.
Down he goes!
Hard punch slams him to the canvas.
(WHO LOVES YA BABY PLAYING)
REFEREE:
One, two, three, four, five, six, seven, eight, nine, ten.
(BELL CLANGING)
It's over.
(DOORBELL RINGS)
(STAMMERING)
Is...
Did...
Is Brooke here?
I don't know.
(VIDEO GAME PLAYING)
- Brooke?
- BROOKE:
I'll be right there.
(EXPLOSIONS ON TV)
MAN:
Cool, baby, cool.
(SCREAMING)
So, how do you and Brooke know each other?
Well, how don't we know each other, you know what I mean?
- BROOKE:
Hi, Paul.
- Oh, hey.
Wow, you look great.
Thank you.
- BROOKE:
Are you ready to go?
- Yeah.
All set.
- So, it was great meeting you.
- Apple martinis.
- All right, come on.
- That normally does the trick.
- Just ignore him.
- But just two.
Three, she'll get sloppy.
You'll become a babysitter.
Oh, and fantasy role playing.
She's got a real thing for lifeguards.
Put some zinc oxide on your nose and she'll lose her mind.
It'll all be over with.
(DOOR CLOSES)
MAN:
Y'all want me to stop running?
I mean, the most challenging part of what I do is between February and April 15th.
That's what we in the biz like to call crunch time.
That sounds fascinating.
- Good evening.
- Hi.
Can I start you two off with something to drink?
Yeah, you know, we're gonna start with a couple of apple martinis, please.
No, you know what?
I'm gonna...
I'm just gonna start with a water.
Well, you can just bring those, just in case.
What was I saying?
Oh, yeah, yeah, yeah.
So, you know, it's not like it's all work and no play.
You know, I mean, after April 15th, that's what we in the biz like to call party time.
(CELL PHONE RINGING)
Excuse me.
Oh, I have to get this.
I'm so sorry.
Hello.
ADDIE:
Okay, is this when I'm supposed to call?
What?
What do you mean?
What?
Where?
What happened?
- Okay, that's great.
- Wait.
What?
Oh, all right.
Listen, where...
Just don't move.
Where are you?
- I'm sitting in my kitchen.
- Sitting?
Okay.
(STAMMERING) Don't move.
Don't...
I'm gonna be right there, honey.
I'm gonna be right there, okay?
- Is everything okay?
- Oh, my gosh.
That was my best friend.
She just had an accident and she...
She has this knee thing
- and she's just very fragile, and I have to go.
- What?
- I can give you a ride.
- No.
No.
That's okay.
I'm gonna grab a cab, so...
I'm so sorry.
I like your dress.
I think he's fascinating.
He's obviously read a lot of books.
Yeah.
Yeah, I bet he has.
He reads a lot of books because nobody wants to talk to him.
He's a friend of Andrew's who's always been polite.
It's the best I could do on such short notice, okay?
Well, you know what?
Polite is not gonna do it.
We've got to find somebody who is really gonna make Gary jealous.
LUPUS:
Can I just say something?
You sound a little jealous, Gary.
GARY:
Why would I be jealous of some guy with computer skills?
Let's say he doesn't have computer skills, but he's got a big old elephant hog on him?
Would that bother you or would you be okay with that?
Not nearly as much as the way that your mind works.
LUPUS:
My mind works great.
So, what's this bullshit I hear about you selling the condo?
Selling that condo is ludicrous.
I was waiting for when I was gonna get the how-Gary-always-screws-his-life-up speech again.
- This must be the right time.
- Look, you tell me,
- you just tell me, tell me.
- Is it happening now?
Yeah.
Okay.
Tell me how losing that asset is gonna get us on the river?
Go ahead, just tell me.
Tell me.
Somebody tell me.
What is this?
- What is this?
What is it?
What is it?
Hey!
- Don't patronise me.
- Helicopters.
- Helicopters.
Exactly!
How does losing the asset give us helicopters?
Dennis, I'm being totally serious with you.
I don't need this shit right now.
Hey, you want to cry, cry to Mom.
Nobody's crying.
I'm not crying.
- I just don't feel like hearing it.
- There's no feelings here.
This is about money and business.
Fine, you broke up.
You broke up.
Fine.
You know, sad.
Sad is, instead of putting $1,000 into your mortgage every month, you waste it on rent.
That's what sad is.
Oh, you're broke up.
You're confused, brokenhearted.
Heartbreak is not having that money as part of your net worth and then not saving the money, so that after taxes you can invest!
You know, you're confused.
- Are you finished?
- Look, I need the damn tour logs.
Yeah.
Well, I really, really appreciate the heart to heart.
It was a great talk, Dennis.
Thank you.
Oh, well, you're behind three months.
You're still behind three months.
And those logs are imperative to insuring that our books are straight!
I'll tell you what those logs are.
Those logs are bullshit is what they are!
You got the receipts.
Tally the goddamn things yourself!
I do, I do!
And I don't appreciate it, because it cuts into my time with my family.
I could be spending that time with my family instead of doing your books.
I already do the taxes.
I do the billing.
I do the hiring, the firing.
I do the maintenance.
Come on, what do you do?
What is it that you do?
- You do the tours!
- I am the talent, Dennis!
They sign up a month in advance to see me.
They'll wait in line for the next bus to see me!
All right?
So don't drain me with all this bullshit about the goddamn tour logs!
GARY:
How big's your TV?
BOY:
Oh, shut up!
How big's your TV, 'cause I wanna know if you can see what's happening.
Oh, wow.
You beat a 12-year-old.
I don't care if you're 12 years old.
You have more time in the day to play.
I live in the real world, my man,
(DOORBELL RINGING)
With bills and responsibilities.
GARY:
That's right.
You can't have a handle called Mad Dog Killer if you complain every time...
- Brooke?
- Hi, Mike.
- Hi.
- Come on in.
Hold on, Mom.
I'm coming.
Is your mom in the room with you?
'Cause I hope she can't see what's happening.
I hope she can't see what's happening.
I'm gonna be just a few more seconds.
So, just sit down and relax.
Oh, yeah, no problem.
GARY:
I'm sorry?
Yeah, why'd you do that?
You take the fun out of beating you, because you have an excuse to lose.
Get a life, dude.
Do you think it's possible that your mom won't love you anymore if she sees how bad you're losing in the game.
Shut up!
Okay.
All right.
GARY:
That's great.
You're gonna stay man-to-man with me.
What happens when I make a play?
(MIKE GROANING) Making plays, making plays!
Making plays!
Well, you know, that's how my people like to handle their business.
While your guys are out partying, mine are running routes.
Try to make a difference.
Mike?
I'm ready to go.
Oh, hey, do you mind if we finish the game?
We got a real nail-biter going here.
Yeah, sure.
Of course.
Great.
Awesome, all right?
- Touchdown.
- Oh, God, is that pretty.
God, is that pretty.
Yeah, I'm a gentleman.
I like to be humble.
I'm old school.
I don't like to talk a lot.
But at the same time, am I talented?
Tell me how you felt about what just happened there.
That's him going deep.
That's him going...
Work ethic.
Work ethic.
I could play this game forever.
- Oh, I could, too.
I love it, yeah.
- I love it, don't you?
I mean, it's the kind of thing where literally
I play the game and it's like, four hours go by.
Fate has me highly skilled and loaded with talent.
Oh...
'Cause I think I'm good enough to figure out how to beat myself.
GARY:
You push yourself.
You push yourself trying to achieve the impossible, because you know that when that moment comes that everything you've done up to that moment has prepared you for victory!
I can't take credit for it, Mike.
I got to thank these little digital guys with the big hearts.
Does it feel good to be a champion?
Yeah.
- Yeah, it feels good to be a champion.
- Good game.
Hey, Brooke, are you ready to go now?
- Oh, yeah, yeah.
Sure.
- MIKE:
Great.
Hey, Gary, thanks a lot, man.
It was great to meet you.
Absolutely, man.
Come on, Mike.
I know a great little martini bar.
(DOOR OPENING)
(DOOR CLOSES)
LUPUS:
Yo.
Hey, man, saddle up.
It's time to rope in some talent.
What's up?
What do you got?
My place.
Tonight.
Poker.
Call some girls up.
Your roommate is awesome.
Mmm.
Yeah, he's something.
- So, where did you go to law school?
- Oh, Northwestern.
God, Gary's hilarious.
Yeah, he's okay.
Okay?
I mean, the guy's all time.
But he's gonna take Chicago tourism by air, land and sea.
And he asked me to join his new bowling team.
I mean, how cool is that?
Mmm-hmm.
You know what?
I can't do this.
I'm so sorry.
Excuse me, would you please pull over?
Can you pull over, please?
Hey, wait.
Tell Gary to call me.
GARY:
Welcome, everyone, to the first annual Texas Hold'em No-Limit Strip Poker Tournament.
(GIRLS WHOOPING)
Now, per the e-mail that Lupus sent, we each have eight articles of clothing.
Now, if you want to bet, you take off an article of clothing, you put it in the centre.
If you win, you take back the clothes, you put back on what you bet.
The extras that other people bet will stay in front of you, much the same as chips would.
You can go all in at any point, but as I outlined, you must take off all your clothes to do so.
The game shall last an hour, maybe two, at which point we will begin the dance portion of the evening.
(ALL CHEERING)
GARY:
Let's get going here.
I need to see the blinds.
Small blind.
Big blind.
The blinds are one and one.
LUPUS:
Come on, ladies.
GARY:
All right.
- Oh, yeah.
- Let's get going here.
- Shuffle up and deal.
- All right.
I mean, just because they were playing video games, that doesn't mean it didn't bother him, right?
Honestly, Brooke, I wish I could tell you, but I wasn't there.
All right, Sally, get the soap out of your mouth.
We're gonna save that for when you're 12.
Mike was really, really good-looking.
I mean, he's a little bit of a goof, but Gary doesn't know that.
I mean, for all he knows, a sophisticated, really good-looking guy took me out on a date tonight.
I could be in bed with this guy right now for all he knows.
You know?
I'm telling you, if you saw the look on his face,
Mike got to him.
(CRAZY LITTLE THING CALLED LOVE PLAYING ON STEREO)
(PHONE RINGING)
Hello.
Hey, it's Riggleman.
Great news.
(GARY SNIFFING)
So, how does this work?
I'll bring the car around front and you wrap them up to go?
Oh, no, no.
We take care of everything.
We deliver it.
We hang it.
We check the light and the sun exposure.
- Oh.
Perfect.
- Yeah.
Listen, I don't want to be too forward, but would you like to have some dinner with me sometime?
I'm sorry.
I have a boyfriend.
- Of course.
- So...
- Well, he's a lucky man.
- BROOKE:
Oh, thank you.
I guess I will just have to keep it to home deliveries and gallery purchases.
Thank you, though.
See you.
- Have a good day, Brooke.
- You, too.
(DOOR OPENING)
(DOOR CLOSING)
Okay, are you out of your mind?
Gary's throwing Greek orgies in your living room and you're telling hot rich guys you have a boyfriend?
- Are you nuts?
- Hey, look.
I'm not exactly innocent here.
Brooke, as an outsider with some perspective, I really think you...
Christopher, stop.
Stop it.
I don't want to hear it.
This has already gotten way out of hand.
I know what I have to do now, all right?
I know what I have to do.
(COMMENTATOR CHATTERING)
(DOOR OPENING)
(DOOR SHUTTING)
Hi.
Hi.
- Did you get my note?
- Yeah.
Two weeks.
Yep.
I brought some boxes from work, so, you know, if you need any just help yourself.
Great.
Thanks.
Oh.
Listen, a while ago I got these tickets for the Old 97's tonight, and I completely forgot about it, so I...
You know, if you want to go.
Well, how many tickets did you get?
I got two.
How much do you want for them?
Oh, no, I'm going.
I'm going.
So, then it would just be the two of us?
Well, yes, and 2,000 other people.
I mean, it's not a big deal, but, you know, look, you know, I was going to invite Addie, but I just figured I'd gotten them for you, so...
Sure.
Why not?
Are you sure?
I mean, if you don't want them,
- I can definitely give them to somebody.
- No.
No, I'll be there.
That sounds...
It sounds great.
Okay.
All right.
It's at the Riv.
So, I'll just leave your ticket at Will Call.
- Good?
- Okay.
Okay.
- Yeah, so, there.
I'll just leave that for him.
- Okay, great.
- Okay, so.
- Gary Grobowski?
Grobowski, yeah.
He should be here in a minute.
- He's really...
He's oddly tall, so.
- Oh, okay.
Great.
- You won't miss him.
Thanks.
- All right, have a good night.
(ALL CHATTERING)
(ALL CHATTERING)
- Hi.
Can I get a beer, please?
- Sure.
Actually, make that two beers.
It's gonna be $8.
Excuse me.
Sorry.
(CROWD CHEERING)
MILLER:
Hello, everybody!
Good evening, Chicago.
We're the Old 97's.
(BAND PLAYING TIMEBOMB)
(BAND PLAYING SALOME)
(MELT SHOW PLAYING)
(LOCK CLICKING)
(DOOR OPENING)
(DOOR SHUTTING)
(KNOCKING)
Brooke?
- Are you up?
- Yeah.
- Are you okay?
- I'm fine.
- Are you sure?
- What's up?
What do you want?
I just want to say I'm sorry that I missed the concert, and let me know what that ticket cost, I'll pay you back for it.
Just leave me alone, Gary.
I planned on going to the concert.
It's just, I stopped by Johnny O's and we...
It doesn't fucking matter, okay?
Would you just leave my room and shut the door?
- Jesus.
- Please.
I didn't really know that the concert mattered all that much to you.
Exactly.
Hold on a second here.
Let me talk for a second.
Gary...
Brooke.
You broke up with me.
Then you have guys coming over here for dates, and all of a sudden you ask me to go to some concert.
I mean, I just figured that, you know.
Gary.
(SNIFFS)
I just...
I don't know how we got here.
Our entire relationship
I've gone above and beyond for you, for us.
And I mean, I've cooked.
I've picked your shit up off the floor.
I've laid your clothes out for you like you were a four-year-old.
I support you.
I supported you, your work.
If we ever had dinner or anything, I make the plans.
I take care of everything and I just don't feel like you appreciate any of it.
I don't feel you appreciate me.
And all I want is to...
Is for you to just show me that you care.
Why didn't you just say that to me?
Gary, I've tried.
I've tried.
Yeah, but never like that.
You might've said some things that you meant to imply that, Brooke, but I'm not a mind reader.
I doubt it would matter.
You are who you are.
Just leave me alone, okay?
Right now.
Just shut my door.
Listen.
All right, Gary, just, please.
Just leave the room.
- Listen to me.
- Gary, just...
- I don't want to be near you right now.
- Listen to me.
I just want to...
Please, just shut the door.
Please.
(SOBBING)
JOHNNY O:
I know.
Look, I know you feel bad, but, you know, what are you gonna do?
I mean, what does she expect, for me to want to go with the girl who dumped me?
I don't know.
She probably just wanted you, you know, to show her the respect of not standing her up or some shit, who knows?
Well, damn it.
I should have just said no in the first place.
I don't know why I called...
You know what?
It's her fault she got hurt.
You shouldn't even feel bad about it.
She should have expected it from you.
You're a fun guy, okay?
Everybody likes you.
You're the quickest guy I know.
Anytime we go out, I have a blast.
All right?
But, you know, everybody who knows you knows you're gonna do what you want to do.
And if it's not what the other person wants to do, well, that's their problem.
- That's bullshit.
- It's not bullshit.
There's plenty of times I do shit that I don't want to do.
- That's ridiculous.
No.
- Like when?
That's bullshit to say about me.
When have we ever done something you didn't want to do?
You know, I don't know, off the top of my head.
I don't keep score...
When's the last time we went to a Sox game?
The Sox.
Not when they're playing the Cubs, either.
We always do what you want to do and she always did what you want to do.
It's who you are.
Everybody thinks that you're their friend, okay?
But the fact of the matter is that there's not one person that I know that you trust enough to let close enough that they could hurt you.
And her big problem is that you really liked her.
I mean, she is the one girl you really liked.
And no matter what she did and how hard she tried, you were never gonna let your guard down.
That poor girl never stood a chance.
(BIRDS CHIRPING)
(AY COSITA LINDA PLAYING ON STEREO)
Marilyn?
- Marilyn?
- MARILYN:
Yeah.
I'm sorry.
I just...
MARILYN:
Oh, just get in here.
Oh, okay.
I'm sorry, excuse me.
Marilyn, I just...
I just wanted to let you know that today is gonna be my last day.
I'm gonna be travelling for a bit.
Here's a blank cheque.
Write down a number, I don't want to know what it is, and go back to work.
No, no.
It's not about that.
I can't accept that.
Brooke.
Travis, get your gorgeous tuckus out of here.
(SIGHS)
(STEREO STOPS PLAYING)
If you make it to Rome, search out an establishment called the Padre Negro.
Ask for a strapping young fellow named Alberto.
Compliments of M. Dean.
Well, thank you.
I appreciate that.
Yeah.
And, honey, take as long as you want, because when you're done, your job will be right here waiting for you.
And if you discover a path that doesn't lead back here...
Well, I hope you'll text.
I will.
(CHUCKLES)
And, like I said, the apartment's a mess, but I'm moving, so...
It's okay.
Relax about the place.
I don't care.
- Okay.
This'll just take a second.
- Okay.
(LA VEM A BAIANA PLAYING ON STEREO)
BROOKE:
Hello?
GARY:
Hey.
I'm in here.
Don't say anything.
I...
How're you doing?
Could I talk to you in private for a second?
You know what?
This is really not a good time, and obviously you have something happening here,
- so we'll just be in...
- No, no, I don't have anything going on.
This is actually for you.
- I'm just gonna wait outside.
- No, no.
Wait.
No, no.
Really.
It's okay.
I really can't do this right now.
Brooke, this whole thing has been really tough on me and I've tried to act like it hasn't been that tough on me, but the first Sunday after me and you broke up, it all kind of really hit me.
And I think it partially hit me because Sunday was sort of always our day that we would do stuff together.
But I didn't have any idea you still cared so much.
And, you know, when I saw you crying the other night, that was honestly the worst moment of my life.
Gary.
Let me just try to say some of these things here.
It's just...
Look,
I know that I've caused you a lot of pain.
And the funny thing is, all I really want to do is make you happy.
I just want to make you smile.
Now, I've had a lot of time to think about some of the things that went on, and I know, Brooke, that I don't always do the right thing or always say the right things,
but I am willing to try to do things differently.
And I'd be happy to go take a dance class.
Well, I would.
Honestly.
I would like to go do that.
Or go travel.
I mean, I'd even be willing to go to the ballet.
Although I would much rather do the dance class or take a trip somewhere.
But I realise that's not the point.
I realise that the point isn't that at all, because it's not really about doing things that you love to do always, but it is about doing things with the person that you love.
And I love you.
- Gary.
- Just give me one second here.
I've missed you so much.
(SOBBING)
I promise you, Brooke,
I will do whatever it is that I have to do to never hurt you again.
I love you and I'm sorry.
Okay, that's it.
That's all I...
- Oh, God.
- That's all I wanted to say, so you can go ahead now with anything that you're feeling to say.
I don't know what to say.
Just say whatever you feel inside.
I don't feel the same way.
I don't.
I just...
I don't know.
Oh, God.
I just, I think...
I don't know, but I don't think I have anything left to give.
I'm sorry.
I was hoping for...
It doesn't matter.
Oh, this is now beyond awkward.
There's some new guy standing out in the hallway and I think I'm gonna go.
Okay.
Thank you.
I made a dinner, and I don't know if it's any good or not, but you're welcome to have it.
Okay.
Gary, that's really...
That's not what you think that it is.
It's okay.
I'm gonna go take a walk.
(DOOR OPENING)
(DOOR CLOSING)
(ELEVATOR BELL DINGS)
- I'm sorry about that.
- No.
- I'm sorry I imposed.
- No, that's fine.
Please.
- So, what do you think?
- I think you're right.
- I think it's great.
- Good.
- Okay.
- Okay.
So,
I will have that wrapped up.
Packed up, sorry, and delivered.
Thank you for taking the time to show it to me, okay?
Sure.
- Yeah.
I'm gonna run.
- Okay, I'll walk you out.
No, no, no.
I can...
It's okay.
(DOOR OPENING)
(DOOR CLOSING)
GARY:
So, the thing that I was most afraid of happening happened and I don't regret it at all, because now she knows how I feel.
- Do you know what I mean?
- Yeah.
I think, what you got to do now is really think hard, because you have to find somebody
that can't be traced back to either of us to visit this guy.
What are you talking about?
I don't...
The guy who came with her.
I don't need anything to happen to the guy.
But if they could trace him back to either one of us...
- It's not about him.
I don't care about that.
...it's a problem.
- The guy, he's not a...
- They're not dumb.
Cops are smart, trust me.
- Okay, but he's not a problem to me.
- Right.
Listen to me.
Promise me that you're not gonna do anything.
I got you.
It's better if nobody...
You don't know anything.
- What are you talking about?
- I'll take care of it.
I don't want you to take care of anything.
John, do me a favour.
- I'm being serious with you.
- I know, I know.
Smart.
You're smart.
No, I'm not.
I'm being honest with you.
- I don't want anything to happen to him.
- Me, either.
Promise me you're not gonna have anyone do anything to this guy.
But you've gotta tell me exactly what you're gonna tell them, if the cops come to you.
Because if we tell a different story...
- Nothing.
Promise me one thing.
- We don't care...
John, I'm gonna go home.
I can't do this.
I'm exhausted.
Right, go home.
Just make sure your neighbours know you're going home.
Do me a favour.
They got phone records.
Make a couple phone calls tonight.
Especially around 10:00.
- Okay.
Please don't do anything.
- All right.
I don't mean it like...
I mean, honestly.
No, no, I got it.
For all you know, nothing's happening.
- I don't want anything to happen.
- Right.
Say it louder.
What are you doing here so early?
Hey.
- Everything okay with you and...
- Yeah, everything's gonna be great.
I just wanna get my day started, but I just wanted to say that
I'm sorry it took so long for me to...
I love you, Dennis.
It's all right.
It's okay.
I'm sorry.
I'm gonna go do the stuff.
So, that's it for all my stuff.
If you want, you could give me your key and I'll drop it off at Riggleman's.
All right.
Thanks.
Gary.
You know, there's a thousand things I...
I would have done differently.
Me, too.
Sort of, actually, when I see this space, I realise that if we didn't have such a big coffee table and that oversized couch
a pool table would have fit nicely.
Yeah.
Although the oversized couch did come in very useful the last couple of weeks, so...
Yes, it...
I guess.
Have a good trip.
Thanks.
GARY:
Chicago is called the Second City because after the Great Chicago Fire of 1871,
Chicago was rebuilt on its ruins.
The city came back even bigger and stronger than it originally was.
So it's not really an insult, it's more of a badge of honour to be called...
The Second City!
Okay.
People, you might be able to get away with that reaction at work, but you are on vacation here.
If you can't blow it out here, then where the hell can you blow it out?
Ladies and gentlemen, show me that you mean it.
Do not make me ask you twice.
- Are you ready to see Chicago?
- ALL:
Yes!
- I said, are you ready to see Chicago?
- ALL:
Yes!
Are you ready to see Chicago?
Shondra, put this babe in the air.
Let's go!
There is a bar downstairs.
Please enjoy yourself.
I know it's early in the morning, but it is Chicago in the summer.
Who are we kidding?
It's fine.
Go get hopped up, make some bad decisions.
My jokes get better.
The buildings look bigger.
It's not so important that everything is finished.
It's important that everything is right.
Well, what time's the presentation?
All right, I'll pick up the rest of the stuff and I'll see you at 6:45.
Great.
Bye.
GARY:
Brooke!
- Hi.
- Hi.
Wow.
(CHUCKLES)
- It's good to see you.
- It's good to see you.
I'd give you a hug, but my hands are kind of full with all the bags here.
- How've you been?
- I've been really good.
- How have you been?
- I've been good.
Yeah.
- You look great.
- Thank you.
- The hair's a little different.
Looks nice.
- Yeah?
Oh, yeah.
- You've lost some weight.
- Well, it's very deceiving, actually.
I've managed to become thin without having any real muscle on me whatsoever.
Very tough thing to accomplish, by the way.
I'm proud of myself.
- Well, you look terrific.
- Thanks.
- I heard your trip went really well.
- It did.
It went really well.
- Oh, good.
- It was fun.
It was amazing.
I saw so many amazing places.
It was just...
But, you know, you do realise how much you love home.
- It's good to have you back.
- Yeah.
It's good to be back.
- And the boat.
Congratulations on the boat.
- Thanks.
I'm waiting for it to get warm, and I'm gonna come by and take a ride.
Well, anytime you want.
It'll be on the house.
Come on by.
Well, I will, then.
I hope you do.
Definitely.
Well, I got to...
I'm going to a meeting, so...
I got to drop these bags off anyway, but it's really good to see you, Brooke.
- Really good to see you.
- Shouldn't...
- Sorry.
- I'm sorry.
I'm just saying we shouldn't wait so long the next time before we...
- Yeah.
...catch up.
- We have a lot more to talk about.
- Yeah.
So.
- Be good.
- Okay.
- Bye.
- Bye.
(I CAN SEE CLEARLY NOW PLAYING)
(RAINBOW CONNECTION PLAYING)
(CROWD CHEERING)
Come on, come on, come on.
All right, here we go.
MAN:
Take a seat, buddy!
Come on.
It was a good play.
Are you gonna be like this all day?
I don't know.
Is it gonna be like this all day?
I don't know.
It's up to you.
I have no room to sit.
I got no room to sit.
I'm sitting next to a guy who's sitting like he's at home on the toilet with his legs spread.
Please don't crowd people.
Relax, please.
Look at me.
I am relaxed.
Look how I'm sitting.
Why are you sitting like that?
Because...
What do you think?
Why'd you wake me up for this shit?
Because I'm trying to relax and have a nice day.
Sweating in the sun like a Tijuana whore.
VENDOR:
Ice-cold soda!
Get your soda here!
VENDOR:
On the right.
Coming down there.
Pass that on down there.
Hey, hot dog guy, can I get six hot dogs down here, please?
Right away.
GARY:
And make it right, please.
You know, with the mustard and the ketchup and the relish.
Don't make me hit you up for more.
I thought we were going to Wiener Circle after this.
We will.
Then why are you getting hot dogs?
Pass this down, please.
You can keep the change.
Do you want one of the hot dogs?
GARY:
You can have a hot...
You want a hot dog?
Do you want a hot dog, miss?
No.
Thank you.
You can have one.
That's okay.
Go ahead.
You can have a hot dog.
No, I don't want one.
Excuse me, sir?
Would you mind passing the lady one of the hot dogs?
I'm good, thanks.
You don't have to share.
You can have your own.
Thanks.
That's really nice of you.
Just have one, please.
Okay, give me a hot dog.
Somebody give her a hot dog.
I got...
The big guy can't eat all of them.
Have one.
Have you ever had one before?
A hot dog?
At the ballpark?
I have.
I believe I have.
Okay, good.
Thank you.
Well, enjoy this one.
Thanks.
Do you like mustard?
No, I'm okay.
It's much better with a topping.
Here.
I'm just kidding, I'll give you two.
(CROWD CHEERING)
Cheers!
Thanks.
We'll share it.
It's a good dog.
I like the hot dog.
I know.
That's nice.
You have a problem with me eating a hot dog, guy?
I'm trying to watch the game and have a hot dog.
I'll smack him in his head.
No, just leave him alone.
Hey, you want to go get a drink?
No.
I'm with somebody, sorry.
Who?
The guy with the tucked-in shirt and the visor?
What, is that like a brother?
The guy was not your brother, then.
Who is this guy?
He's not my brother.
Who's this...
I'm getting mad now.
I'm jealous.
Who is this guy?
Who are you?
I don't know.
I'm kidding with you.
Who's the guy with the tucked-in stuff?
Is that a boyfriend?
Uh, it's...
I'm going.
Do you think you'll marry him?
What?
'Cause I know you've thought about it.
The first time you laid eyes on him, you probably thought,
"I wonder if I could marry this guy in plaid shorts who tucks his shirt in.
No way."
Then when you kissed him, you said, "I can't believe it.
"I had a lot to drink tonight.
I'm kissing the tucked-in guy."
My point is, if you're not gonna marry him...
Yeah.
...and if it's not forever, then you really don't have anything to lose in taking me up on my offer.
Uh-huh.
Well, I'm gonna go.
Okay.
Me, too.
Okay.
To where?
On an ice-breaking first date?
Well, no, I don't think...
Listen.
If you want to stay off the market while you're with
I'm-not-the-one- but-I'm-comfortable, then you can do that.
But for all you know, I just offered you a get-out-of-bored-Iove- for-free card with no strings attached.
God, you're crazy.
No, I'm not crazy.
And a lot of times people go, "Oh, that's crazy,"
and then they go, "It's genius."
That's what happened when the person invented fire.
They burned that witch.
And guess what, then they got warm and they ate good stuff.
Now, where are we headed to?
Let's not make this weird, 'cause I'm not good on dates.
No.
You know what?
I'm better just to kind of hang out and, if we don't have fun,
I might go my separate way.
Okay.
I'm not committing to anything.
I'll go hang out with you for a little bit.
That's not gonna happen.
But I can't say for sure.
(YOU'RE MY BEST FRIEND PLAYING)
GARY:
All right, all right, everybody.
Welcome to Three Brothers Bus Tours.
I'm brother number two.
It's good to have you here.
That's right, there's plenty of seats here up front.
I promise I won't bite.
I'm not a biter.
I'm psyched to have you here.
Okay, a couple quick ground rules.
Please don't jump off the bus.
Weird.
Not fun for anybody.
Also, no throwing objects at pedestrians, unless, of course, they deserve it.
Okay?
We are not at work today.
We are on vacation today.
And if you can't blow it out here on the big funny bus, where the hell can you?
I do split the tips with my driver, Shondra.
We don't want her back out turning tricks.
That was a weird time for everyone.
Seriously.
Honest to God.
And I was a customer.
Long time ago.
Come on, everybody, let's get loose!
I'm gonna ask you once.
Show me that you mean it.
Don't make me ask you twice.
Are you ready to see Chicago?
Are you ready to see Chicago?
That's what I'm talking about.
Shondra, put this baby in the air.
Let's get the blood flowing.
Let's get everyone up and let's loosen it up.
Coming up here, you're gonna notice one of the only buildings to survive the fire of 1871.
That is the original Chicago Water Tower and Pumping Station.
(PHONE RINGING)
CHRISTOPHER:
Happy Holidays.
Marilyn Dean Gallery.
The artist was inspired by the neoclassical movement.
CHRISTOPHER:
No, she doesn't.
But wanted to reflect it with an abstract bent.
CHRISTOPHER:
Okay, bye-bye.
And how much is it?
$35,000.
Happy Holidays.
Marilyn Dean Gallery.
Hold, please.
Will you excuse me for a moment?
Sure.
Go ahead.
Christopher?
Yes, sweetie.
Hi, honey.
Hi.
Christmas was months ago.
Don't remind me.
I miss it so much.
Yeah, I know.
But today is not a holiday.
I know for a fact that people like my spirit on the phone and they dig the energy that I give them.
Okay.
I'm just saying, I don't think Marilyn Dean will "dig" the energy.
Oh, no.
She's the one that told me to be creative.
So...
I know.
It's just...
Okay.
What is the next holiday coming?
The Fourth of July, is that what's next?
Well, if you want to get technical, there's Memorial Day, there's Flag Day.
Some people recognize Father's Day as a holiday.
I don't.
I get it.
I get it.
Well, on those days you can say, "Happy Holidays."
Every other day, "Good morning, good afternoon,
"good evening, Marilyn Dean Gallery." Okay?
Okay.
I'm so sorry about that.
Oh, no.
So, now this is a new piece by Zakrzewska.
What do you think of this?
Can I be honest with you?
Please.
Other than taking an art history class in college, which I pretty much slept through, I don't have the first clue about art or how to go about buying it.
I mean, like that painting.
I mean, I don't see the point in buying something that I could have done myself.
Yeah.
I completely agree with you.
You know, an art teacher of mine once said,
"Never buy a piece of art that you don't have to have."
You know, don't worry about who the artist is or how much it's worth.
I mean, you have to live with it every day.
You have to walk by it every day.
You know, you have to really love it.
You have to really appreciate it.
It's kind of like picking a mate.
(EXCLAIMING)
GARY:
Hey, honey!
Hi.
How's it going?
BROOKE:
It's good.
Oh, wow.
You got a lot happening.
I know.
Very exciting.
I am starving.
Oh, careful.
That's really...
That's very hot.
Oh, that's hot, hot, hot.
Yep.
Jesus.
Hey, honey, you've got to really...
You should get ready, okay?
Oh, you look great.
Thank you.
Got a lot of nice stuff.
Got a pizza.
All kinds of stuff.
Terrific.
I just need you to decide what to...
You know, I did everything.
(TV CLICKS)
(COMMENTATOR CHATTERING)
Gary?
Yeah?
Oh, come on!
Really?
You got three lemons.
What my baby wants, my baby gets.
You know that.
Yeah, but I wanted 12.
Baby wanted 12.
Why would you want 12 lemons?
Because I'm making a 12-lemon centerpiece.
So, no one's actually even eating them?
They're just show lemons?
Yeah.
They're just show lemons.
Shown in the center of the table.
I'm glad you find that amusing, but I cannot fill a vase with only three lemons.
Well, can't you just use, like, maybe a drinking glass?
I'm not gonna use a drinking...
We could have a smaller version of a centerpiece.
I'm not gonna use a drinking glass for our centerpiece.
You know what?
I've got an idea.
Why don't we go ahead and scratch the centerpiece idea altogether, because the chicken that burnt my mouth could maybe use a little bit of lemon on top of it.
Guess what?
Now we've made a better meal versus something visually nice to look at.
What are you do...
What's happening here?
What are you doing?
What are you doing?
(STAMMERING) Oh, I had such a long day on the bus.
I need a little bit of down time.
My feet are killing me.
Gary, come on, my feet are killing me, too.
I'm exhausted.
I worked all day.
Went to the market.
I cleaned this entire condo and then I've been cooking for the last three hours.
Come on.
Help set the table.
GARY:
Sweetheart.
What?
You've done such a great job already.
Don't you want to finish it yourself and have that personal power of that accomplishment?
Set the table.
Listen to me.
Do you think that when Michelangelo, right, was painting the Sixteenth Chapel, that he said,
"Hey, guys, you know, I did pretty good on the first 15 chapels,
"but why don't you help me design this one?
"And maybe you could help me...
Give me a brush
"and you guys can grab brushes, and we can all make a great chapel." Uh-uh.
No, he didn't.
And you wanna know what the results were?
A masterpiece.
Okay.
It's the Sistine Chapel, not the Sixteenth, and I bet when Michelangelo asked for 12 brushes, they didn't bring him three.
Yeah.
Okay, all the talking is really starting to drain me, and now I'm gonna have to watch the highlights later to see what I missed here.
Honey, look, Gary, just...
Down time's important.
Gary, please just take a shower, okay?
Down time's important.
'Cause this is what I don't want to have happen.
I don't want the doorbell to ring.
I'm then forced to answer the door, entertain people, and I'm still cooking dinner.
Yeah.
Okay?
You're absolutely right.
Let's do that.
The second that this inning's over...
Gary.
There's one out all ready.
They're gonna be here in 20 minutes.
Baby, have you ever seen a shower of mine take more than four minutes?
Yes, I have.
Come on.
(DOORBELL RINGING) Oh, great!
They're here.
Okay.
Table's not set.
Dinner's not ready.
Would you please just let my parents in?
I gotta jump in the shower.
What?
(DOORBELL RINGING) I gotta go.
Gary.
Gary.
(DOORBELL RINGING)
GARY:
Well, seeing how our families haven't had many opportunities to get to know one another, we figured, what better way than to break some bread?
So, everyone, thank you for coming and enjoy the meal.
ALL:
Cheers.
Cheers, honey.
Mrs. Grobowski.
Nice to meet you.
Thank you.
DENNIS:
Cheer with the sons.
GARY:
Sweetheart, cheers to you.
Darling, I see that you put those Feng Shui books that I sent to you to good use.
This place is so well balanced.
Thanks, Mom.
Yeah, the energy in this place is just amazing.
WENDY:
Yes.
Well, the energy in the condo might be a little more amazing if we had a pool table.
Gary, we've already discussed that.
We're gonna get a pool table when we get a bigger place.
The place is plenty big now, if you wanted a pool table because...
Gary.
Yeah.
You could take the dining room table, go ahead and move her in the living room.
BROOKE:
Really?
GARY:
Plenty of room.
And put a dining room table in the living room?
Okay.
How do you...
I mean, what do you do with a dining room table?
Eat on it.
We'd have no furniture in the living...
Where's the furniture go?
All I'm saying is, it would be nice to be able to shoot some pool.
Well, this isn't a dorm.
Look, baby, I completely understand.
There's halls and stuff.
I mean, you can go...
We will wait and get a pool table when we have a bigger place.
Thank you.
The food is outstanding.
It is delicious food.
DENNIS:
It's outstanding.
LUPUS:
Yeah, it really is nice.
Okay, everybody.
Time for the joke of the day.
Knock, knock.
Dad.
Dad, come on.
Who's there?
Norma Lee.
Norma Lee, who?
Normally, I don't go around knocking on doors, but would you like to buy an encyclopedia?
LUPUS:
I got a joke.
I got a joke.
(ALL CHUCKLING) How's it going?
I got a joke for you.
What do you get when you cross a gay Eskimo and a black guy?
All right, look, I think we've had enough with the jokes for tonight.
Thank you, though.
Let's just talk with each other.
All right.
I saw that Three Brothers article in the Trib this week.
Sounds like you guys are up to some pretty exciting stuff.
Basically, our big goal is to try to take Chicago tourism by air, land and sea.
We're still in the ground phase with the buses.
But as soon as we get our infantry established, then we'll take it to the squids.
Yeah.
Boats.
Boats.
Oh, boats.
As soon as we control the waterway, then we'll bring in air supports and then we'll pretty much control everything.
You know, Dennis, the way your face lights up when you describe your ambitions, it's really inspiring.
Oh, thanks.
Because I understand how you feel that passion.
RICHARD:
And sharing it with other people, I think that's what life's about.
I don't feel that about boats and squibs...
Squids?
ALL:
Squids.
Sorry.
CAROL:
Yeah.
But I do feel it about singing.
With my a cappella group, The Tone Rangers.
Although it's not as aggressive as your dream, it's really more of a brotherhood.
It's like a musical team.
It's like a symphony of guys.
Guy symphony.
And it's very hard to describe the true magic of a group of guys singing in perfect harmony.
It's transcendent.
But it's still very real.
I guess the best way to put it in words is just... (SINGING SINGLE NOTE)
Even that doesn't do it.
That doesn't do it because that's just one person.
And what I'm talking about is the pulse of the collective.
Oh, heck.
Let me just show you how it's done.
Dad, how about a little percussion?
RICHARD:
Tap-tap-tappy.
Tap-tap-tappy.
And, Mom, high-hat.
(HISSING)
RICHARD:
Good, Mom.
Excellent.
And Gary!
(RHYTHMICALLY) On the kick drum!
Come, come!
On the kick drum!
Come, come!
That's Gary!
Come, come with the kick drum.
Come!
Come, come with the kick drum.
Gary, on the kick drum.
Come, come.
That's Gary on the kick drum.
Go!
And Gary.
In the house.
Come, come.
I'm not with you.
Come, come.
With the kick drum.
Come, come.
I'm just not really the kick drum kind of guy.
I'd rather be just a listener and enjoy all the banging that he's doing and the...
You know, Gary, that's your prerogative.
That's your right, to listen.
Meantime, I've gotta talk to Brooke about something.
It's called the bass line.
Excuse me.
Okay.
(PITCH PIPE PLAYING)
(HUMMING RHYTHMICALLY)
(SCATTING)
(HISSING)
Good, Carol.
Good, Brooke.
(ALL SINGING)
RICHARD:
Yes, Dennis.
(WHISPERING) Be nice.
RICHARD:
Totally awesome.
(MIMICKING METALLIC CLANGING)
Move yourself
You always live your life
Never thinking of the future
Prove yourself
You are the move you make
Take your chances win or loser
See yourself
You're every step you take
You and you and that's the only way
Shake WENDY:
Shake!
Shake yourself
You're every move you make
So the story goes
CAROL:
Thank you so much.
BROOKE:
Okay, bye.
WENDY:
Thank you so much.
CAROL:
It was great to see you.
Okay.
Come on.
Have a good night.
It was really nice, Gary.
Nice to see you.
You, too.
Good to see you guys.
Thanks, Brookie.
Oh, honey.
Thank you, sweetie.
You're still my favorite singer.
Stop it.
Love you, sis.
And I'd love for you to come to a live performance of The Tone Rangers singing live.
That's something you'd really enjoy.
It was good seeing you.
Okay.
Thank you.
All right.
Bye, darling.
Thank you for such a...
Okay.
Okay, Mom.
We'll see you soon.
Bye, dear.
Thanks, darling.
See you later.
Okay, buddy.
Oh, now, are you sure that we can't help you clean up?
No, no.
I think we're gonna be great.
We'II...
Yes?
So nice of you to offer, but we got it.
Thank you.
Oh, it was such fun.
Great.
I love you.
Great to see you.
Good night, sweetie.
Thank you so much.
I appreciate it.
Thank you so much.
All right, guys.
WENDY:
Bye-bye.
Bye-bye.
Thanks for coming.
Love you, too.
MAN ON TV:
Are you blind?
(HORN TOOTING)
Oh, no, no!
My demos!
(MAN ON TV SCREAMING)
Well, I'm gonna go do the dishes.
Cool.
It'd be nice if you helped me.
Damn it.
MAN:
Way to go!
No problem.
I'll get them a little bit later.
I'm just gonna hit the streets here for a little bit.
Gary, come on, I don't want to do them later.
Let's just do them now.
It'll take 15 minutes.
Honey, I am so exhausted.
I just honestly want to relax for a little bit.
If I could just sit here, let my food digest, and just try to enjoy the quiet for a little bit.
Get some!
Get some!
Get some!
That's what happens.
And we will...
You know, we can clean the dishes tomorrow.
Gary, you know I don't like waking up to a dirty kitchen.
Who cares?
I care!
All right?
I care!
I busted my ass all day cleaning this house and then cooking that meal.
And I worked today.
It would be nice if you said thank you and helped me with the dishes.
Fine.
I'll help you do the damn dishes.
Oh, come on.
You know what?
No.
See?
That's not what I want.
You just said that you want me to help you do the dishes.
I want you to want to do the dishes.
Why would I want to do dishes?
Why?
See, that's my whole point.
Let me see if I'm following this, okay?
Are you telling me that you're upset because I don't have a strong desire to clean dishes?
No.
I'm upset because you don't have a strong desire to offer to do the dishes.
I just did.
After I asked you!
Jesus, Brooke, you're acting crazy again.
Don't you call me crazy.
I am not crazy.
I didn't call you crazy.
You just did.
I didn't call you...
No, I didn't.
I said you're acting crazy.
You know what, Gary?
I asked you to do one thing today, one very simple thing, to bring me 12 lemons and you brought me three.
God damn it.
If I knew that it was gonna be this much trouble,
I would have brought home 24 lemons.
Even 100 lemons.
You know what I wish?
I wish everyone that was at that goddamn table had their own little private bag of lemons.
Honest to God!
Gary, it's not about the lemons.
Well, that's all you're talking about.
I'm just saying it'd be nice if you did things that I asked.
It would be even nicer if you did things without me having to ask you!
Well, I do seem to remember doing something for you this morning without you asking.
Gary, come on.
What?
I'm serious.
Come here.
You know what?
I'm serious.
I really am.
I am, too.
Come on.
You knew I was working today and I made that meal.
And you could have thought to yourself, you know, you could have said,
"Yeah, I think I'm gonna get Brooke some flowers."
You said on our very first date that you don't like flowers, that they're a waste of money.
Every girl likes flowers, Gary.
You said that you don't like flowers.
I'm supposed to take that to mean that you do like flowers?
No.
This is not about...
You're not...
God, you're not getting it.
You're not getting this, Gary, okay?
It's not about the lemons.
It's not about the flowers.
It's not about the dishes.
It's just about...
How many times do I have to drop hints about the ballet?
You know I can't stand...
Brooke, come here.
We've talked about the damn ballet.
I hate the goddamn ballet!
You got a bunch of dudes in tights flopping around for three hours.
It's like a medieval techno show.
It's a nightmare.
I sit there in a sweat.
The whole thing, I do, wondering when the hell's the goddamn nightmare gonna end.
Go to a damn ballet.
It's not about you loving the ballet, Gary.
It's about the person that you love loves the ballet and you wanting to spend time with that person.
Not when they're at the ballet.
Okay.
Forget the ballet!
Forget the ballet!
I will.
We don't go anywhere together.
We just went to Ann Arbor together.
To Ann Arbor.
To the Michigan-Notre Dame game.
You think screaming, drunk kids and leprechauns doing backflips, that's fun.
That's fun for me.
Come on, man.
I did that for you.
What do you...
How do you show up for me?
I'm up on the bus every goddamn day for you!
Come on.
You...
I'm busting my ass to be the best tour guide in the damn city, so I can make enough money to support both of us and hopefully you won't have to work one day.
I want to work.
All I ask, Brooke, is that you show a little bit of appreciation.
That I just get 20 minutes to relax when I come home, instead of being attacked with questions and nagged the whole damn time.
You think that I nag you?
That's all you do!
All you do is nag me!
"The bathroom's a mess." "Your belt doesn't match."
"Hey, Gary, you should probably go work out."
Nothing I ever do is ever good enough!
I just want to be left the hell alone!
Really?
Is that what you want, Gary?
Is that what you want?
Yeah.
That's what you want?
Yeah.
Fine.
Great.
Do whatever the hell you want.
You leave your socks all over this house, dress like a pig, play your stupid-ass video game.
I don't care, I'm done.
What?
I'm done!
I don't deserve this.
I really do not deserve this.
I deserve somebody who gives a shit.
I'm not spending one more second of this life with some inconsiderate prick!
You're a prick!
(DOOR SLAMMING)
(DOOR SHUTS)
Addie, it just became so clear tonight how much he takes me for granted.
What happened?
BROOKE:
Just the same old shit.
I asked him to do one thing and he didn't do it.
Then he complained that he had to do anything, and I just felt like I had no choice.
No, sweetie, you did have a choice, okay?
And it sounds like you made the right one.
You respected yourself.
But it's just not what I want.
I don't want to break up with him.
I don't.
I just want him to say thank you.
I want him to want to do the dishes.
I just want him to want to take me to the ballet.
I want him to get me 12 lemons!
You know...
I just want him to care enough about this relationship to want to work on it.
Okay, you know what?
I'm putting on my shoes and I'm gonna be there in 15 minutes.
No, Ad.
Don't.
Please, I really don't want to see anybody.
I really don't.
But, look, I'm worried about you, okay?
And I can hear you in there banging around your dishes.
And I don't want you getting out your Clorox and your rubber gloves, and taking this out on the kitchen.
Look, look, look.
Okay.
Tonight just...
It just got a little out of hand, and hopefully he's just gonna realize that he's got some changes to make and he's gonna...
He's gonna come home and apologize.
Okay?
That's what's gonna happen.
GARY:
I feel like, I don't...
You know, like, you dress however you want to dress.
You know, do whatever you want to do.
I'm done with the relationship.
Whatever.
So, it's just kind of, "You're done with the relationship?"
Well, you're obviously hurt about it.
She got to you.
You're hurt.
I'm not.
It's nothing to be ashamed of.
She hurt you.
Will you look at me?
I'm not heartbroken.
I'm a little shocked.
I'm a little surprised.
Gary, you're devastated.
Now, what's the name of the guy she's doing?
I'm gonna solve your problem.
What's his name?
What are you talking about?
Have you checked her e-mail?
I don't check e-mails.
I don't...
You can get a program that records keystrokes.
It costs, like, 20 bucks.
Very easy to use.
Okay?
You get a password, you check her e-mail.
You find out everything about her.
That's how I found out about the Puerto Rican that Stacy was running around with.
Okay.
You are reading a little too much into this situation.
There is no one she's running around with, okay?
We had a fight over the groceries I brought home.
You're probably right.
She's probably not sleeping with anybody.
No.
Not what it's about.
Okay.
Maybe she's with another guy, maybe not.
She's not.
I don't know.
I'm not Columbo.
Okay?
But what we do know is that she doesn't want to be with you anymore.
I mean, I hate to be shitty about it, and so cut and dry, but let's face it.
She says she doesn't want to be with you, and I believe her.
Now, we gotta figure it out.
And you're gonna need a place to go and lick your wounds while you get your head right over this thing.
I don't need a place to go and lick my wounds.
You're gonna stay with me.
I'm not gonna hear it.
Look it...
I'm not moving out of the place.
Oh, you're not moving out.
No.
I put money in the place.
I put half my money in the place.
You're obviously not the one calling the shots in this case.
Yeah, but I own the place.
With her.
Yeah.
But it's not up to her who gets to keep the goddamn place.
If you find out who she's sleeping with, maybe we could leverage it.
I want you to listen to me.
You listen to me.
I'm gonna leave you a key.
I don't need a key.
Why?
'Cause she's gonna put...
She's gonna move out of the place, Johnny.
Did she say she was moving out?
She will.
She's gonna move out.
Oh, she's...
I'm gonna keep the place.
I'm not moving out of the place.
I'll leave you a key.
(DOOR OPENING)
(DOOR SHUTTING)
(TOOL WHIRRING)
Hey, how's it going?
LUPUS:
I almost got it.
Yeah.
You know, I was thinking.
You know what you should do, is you should find somebody who looks like Brooke, but even hotter and, you know, bang the shit out of her.
What the hell's wrong with you?
What?
Logs.
Just fix the damn engine.
I am fixing the goddamn engine.
I need your tour logs.
I'm off the clock, okay?
Well, I cannot file the quarterlies until I have your log.
I'm going through a little bit of a life change here, Dennis.
I would really appreciate a little bit of sensitivity, please.
CHRISTOPHER:
I know they're both French, but that has nothing to do with it.
Because Manet was earlier and...
No.
Monet and Manet are very different things.
I'm sorry, I beg to differ.
Excuse me, sir, can I have her call you back personally?
Yes.
Okay, thank you.
Sorry.
Brooke?
I am so sorry.
What?
Come here.
Oh, honey, your mom called and told me everything.
Oh, Jesus.
Good morning, Marilyn.
Morning.
I'll go water the plants.
I understand you had a long night.
Tell me everything.
BROOKE: "Everything." I couldn't possibly...
Then don't.
My time is pressing.
What I want is for you to take the rest of the day off.
Oh, no.
No, that's not necessary.
Who am I?
Marilyn Dean.
And where are we?
The Marilyn Dean Gallery.
And of whom is that portrait?
That is Marilyn Dean.
Yeah.
You know, your personal life is your personal life.
But you look like shit.
And when you look like shit,
Marilyn Dean looks like shit, and now it is my business.
And when it comes to my business, I don't like anything that's distracting.
So, I want you to take the rest of the day off to be sad and then come back to work tomorrow ready to take care of business.
Got it?
(ELEVATOR BELL DINGS)
(ROCK MUSIC BLARING)
(POOL BALLS CLACKING)
Oh, hey, Brooke.
How are you?
What the hell are you doing?
Well, my whole life, I always wanted my own place with my own pool table.
I finally got my own place, but you would not allow me to have a pool table.
I just kind of figured I'd rectify that today.
And it does feel good.
I'm gonna go ahead and put the four ball in the corner pocket.
Nice.
I'm sorry, can I...
A little room for the shooter, please?
It's hard to shoot with someone standing...
Thank you.
(POOL BALLS CLACKING)
Wow.
Well, I guess he feels threatened that you broke up with him and he's acting out.
Okay, look, Brooke, men are like children.
You know?
And they... (WHISPERING) Sweetie, it's a figure of speech.
It's Brooke.
And I love you so much.
And you're my man and you know that.
You're amazing.
I love you.
Listen, and they're gonna test boundaries to see what they can get away with.
I think there's three things that Gary needs to know.
One, this type of behavior is not unnoticed.
Two, it's not acceptable.
And three, you know, you're definitely not gonna tolerate it.
Right?
Yes.
And Brooke, remember, we're always owning our actions, right?
And we're always healthy with it, yes?
Yes.
I don't wanna finish the game.
I got showings, okay?
I gotta buy the cookie spray.
I gotta clean up the dog.
(YOU OUGHTA KNOW PLAYING)
And now I'm really leaving 'cause I don't want to hear that.
Okay?
Thank you for the pool.
Thank you for the snacks.
I'm going to get a cab.
I'll split it with you.
What are you, 12?
Brooke, that is not healthy.
I'm trying to make a point.
And what is that point?
My point's your point.
Your three points.
That it's not unnoticed, that it was not acceptable, and that it would definitely not be tolerated.
Not exactly what I meant.
Unbelievable.
I knew it!
Hey, gang.
Found my shirt on the floor.
Thanks for laying it out.
Gary, are you here for couples bowling?
Yeah.
Well, don't you think you and I should discuss something first?
Like what?
How your 47 average is killing us?
Okay.
Great.
No.
Gary, this is couples bowling.
And since you and I are no longer a couple, because you have chosen not to participate constructively in our relationship, we're now singles.
So, there's not room for two singles on the team.
Why do you look confused?
I don't have any idea what's happening.
I've come to play on the team.
Look, Gary, I just don't think it's a good idea for you and I to be around each other any more than we have to right now.
I completely agree.
Maybe you should go play some pinball.
No, I think you should leave.
Okay.
Brooke, when a man makes a commitment to a team, he honors that commitment.
He doesn't let emotions or personal issues get in the way of victory.
And I've made a commitment to this team.
They don't want you here either, Gary.
Yeah.
Sure, they don't.
They don't.
They're my friends.
But you're not a strong bowler.
That's not the point.
You know what?
Let's just...
Why don't we let them decide?
Gary, don't.
No.
Don't involve them, okay?
That's unnecessary.
What's wrong, Castro?
Castro?
Well, Castro doesn't let people vote as a team.
Okay.
Ask them.
Thank you.
Okay, everyone.
Team vote here.
By a show of hands, just put it up when you make a decision, who here agrees with Brooke and thinks I should leave the bowling team?
Shocker.
Band of Brothers.
You should rent it sometime.
Good luck, everyone.
Riding Miss Gutter Ball to the finals.
Hey, Gary.
Yeah.
I'm gonna need your shirt back.
What?
Well, we're gonna have to replace you, and you know we get docked 10 pins if everyone's not in matching Pin Shakers uniforms.
My shirt says "Gary" on it.
Granted.
But actually, we know a guy named Gary.
And he's not as tall as you, but he's a pretty good bowler.
I'm gonna have to request that I have my wrist guard back then.
I'm sorry.
That's mine.
Just give me the goddamn wrist guard, please.
Thank you.
I hope your wrist snaps.
Wow.
Okay?
You see that?
You know what I mean?
Yeah.
That was awesome.
You just had your ex-boyfriend, who you wish you were still dating, voted off the bowling team.
Well, I had to do that to get him right where I want him.
Where's that?
Shirtless in the parking lot?
Addie, you're not getting this.
Gary loves this bowling team.
He's hurt right now.
He's feeling pretty bad.
He's gonna go out there and he's gonna get drunk.
He's gonna make a complete fool of himself.
And he will be sitting there feeling pretty lonely and pretty pathetic, and then it's just gonna hit him.
What's gonna hit him?
That not only is he out a girlfriend, but his life is just falling apart piece by piece and maybe that life was pretty great.
And maybe I was the glue that was holding it all together.
And if he wants that life back, he's gonna have no choice but to change.
(MUSIC PLAYING)
How about this, huh?
I feel like we just found hell.
When did you start coming to knobby joints like this?
I might be the greatest you've ever seen, pal.
I'm conquering new frontiers.
Hello, babe.
Yeah, you've got to put up with the bad music and the $15 drinks, but this place is stacked with top-shelf, young, dumb ass.
All you gotta do is just separate the weaker ones from the herd.
Come on, I'll get you into the VIP.
Can I get a couple drinks from you?
Okay, L.G.
Lupus, I got to be totally...
I got to be honest with you.
I'm not feeling it here.
You're gonna like it in here.
You're gonna love it.
I don't like it out here.
Look, listen to me, will you, please?
How you doing, Buzz?
While you were on the inside locked up for the past two years, the game has changed.
(WOMEN CHEERING)
Do you remember when you were an outdoor cat and you used to have to hunt and kill for your food?
Well, you've become an indoor cat.
You've been getting your milk brought to you in a silver bowl, and guess what?
Now, you've been tossed back outside and the alley has changed.
For example, your MTV generation, your technology, your text message, your TiVo.
You name it.
People want their information faster.
People e-mail each other because they want to exchange information, Gar.
They don't want to connect, they want results.
Okay.
You gotta get to the message quicker.
Now, I want you to watch.
It's real simple.
Okay?
How you doing, ladies?
Now, here's what I'd like to do to you.
First, I'd like to get you naked.
And then I'm gonna take some Saran Wrap and I'm gonna wrap you up in it, head to toe.
Then I'm gonna cut out two holes.
One for your mouth, so you can breathe, obviously.
And the other one...
Asshole.
It could be a gorgeous evening for us, babe.
The pink is gorgeous.
Jesus, God.
Come here.
Lupus, listen to me.
I want you to listen to me.
There are our drinks.
You want your drink?
No, I'm fine.
Thank you.
The L.G. thanks you.
Will you listen to me, please?
You're my brother and I love you very much, and maybe you do get laid tonight, but maybe you get arrested.
Arrested for what, babe?
Being awesome?
Come on, babe, listen.
You want to tell your jokes, tell your jokes.
But sooner or later you're gonna get hungry and you're gonna wanna eat.
And jokes might make you feel better, but they don't get you fed.
I'm gonna go take a lap.
(DOOR OPENING)
(DOOR SHUTTING)
What are you doing?
I'm sketching.
And where are you sketching?
In the living room.
No, in my bedroom.
And I didn't say anything to you, Brooke, when you so arrogantly claimed the bed without asking me, but you can't just waltz into my room and turn it into a damn art fair.
Gary, I've only taken up a little bit of space, so...
I don't care if you only took an inch.
There might not be a door here, but this is my domain.
Okay?
I don't go into your bedroom and set up a goddamn sawhorse.
Well, then what the hell is that pool table doing in the dining room?
Because that's a common area.
And that's where this belongs.
Not in my room.
Hey, what are you doing?
It belongs in another common area.
Gary.
People want to come home and they want to relax in their room.
Gary, it is 2:00 in the morning!
Don't you drop my things.
I don't know what to tell you, kid.
This is how I am when I'm single.
My hours start to get pretty strange.
Might be time for you to think about moving out.
Why would I...
No, I'm not moving anywhere.
Gary, just please turn the volume down.
Yeah, but I don't tell you what the hell to do in your room.
You can doodle.
You can dance.
You can bake a goddamn gingerbread house.
I don't give a shit.
But in my room, I want to relax and watch my highlights in complete surround-sound experience.
What the hell are you doing?
You're not even gonna watch it!
Don't tell me what I am or aren't not doing.
Oh, what you are not, not doing?
Go learn some English.
Oh, I'm sorry.
I didn't have a grandfather on the board of some fancy college.
Key word being "was." Did he touch the Filipino exchange student?
Did he not touch the exchange student?
I don't know, Brooke.
I wasn't there.
Okay.
No, don't start with the family stuff.
Like your family's so perfect?
Your brother's a pervert!
Don't talk to me about the sexual habits of family members.
What about your sister?
My sister's been through a lot.
Of dick.
There are some problems, Gary, but can we please just leave it...
Problems?
She slept with the entire Arizona Cardinals offensive line.
That's not problems.
That's she's the problem!
She was on vacation!
She was on vacation.
Don't even get me started, by the way, on your brother.
If I have to hear that guy sing just one more time,
I'd hang myself with wax dental floss.
Could the guy just come out of the closet, please?
Richard is not gay.
Okay, lassie, I want you to listen to me and listen good.
I'm not saying he won't get married.
I'm not saying he won't even have kids.
But then one day his wife will come home, and then she'll find him with a guy named Majulio, wearing leather helmets and clubbing each other to Yanni's greatest hits.
Yeah.
Right.
Whatever.
You're an infant.
Yeah, I'm an infant.
Go enjoy your room, Brooke, 'cause I'm gonna enjoy mine!
Okay.
You know what?
I might enjoy some pay-per-view options tonight.
It's gonna be a long one, sweetheart, and I got nothing to do mañana but sleep in.
(DOOR SLAMMING)
(BOOGIE NIGHTS PLAYING)
(SINGING) Boogie nights Ain't no doubt we are here to party
What are you doing?
Boogie nights Come on now, got to get it started
Ricky, you and the Get Along Gang leave or I'm gonna throw you out of here personally, you understand?
Actually, Gary, this is Brooke's bedroom.
So, technically, you don't have jurisdiction here, but I think it'd be really fun if you sang with us.
Come on, Gary.
I think you'll like it.
You got 10 seconds to get out of here or I'm gonna break your damn magic whistle.
You understand what I'm saying to you?
Move this group out of my house, now!
(EXCLAIMING)
(GRUNTING)
(ALL SINGING)
Gary, you can't take a pitch pipe out of a guy's hand when he's in the middle of a very funky groove.
You can get hurt doing something like that.
I'm tapping out, I'm tapping out!
Here we go.
From the bridge.
(SINGING) Party night Get on down with the sound of the music
Boogie nights Do it, do it
What kind of bullshit move was that?
I'm sorry.
What?
What happened?
Oh, don't be coy with me.
You sent that animal over here to attack me when I was hung over and weak.
Oh, no.
Look, all I know is The Tone Rangers, they needed someplace to rehearse, so I very clearly told Richard, "Stay in my room,"
which you explained to me was my space to do with what I want.
Is that how you want to play it?
'Cause I'll play it like that.
I'll play it like Lionel Richie.
All night long, lady.
Oh, yeah.
I'll call some guys from my neck of the woods.
And we're not talking, Brooke, about a couple of queens who know a few grapples.
We're talking about Polacks that don't have a goddamn future.
Right.
That's right!
We can make shit real uncomfortable around here, and that's what we're gonna do.
Please.
Come on.
You know what?
You're just embarrassed because Richard kicked your ass.
Richard did not kick my ass.
What Richard did was attack me when I was half asleep.
Really?
Is that how you see it?
There's a really big gap between getting your ass kicked and having a dancing, singing sprite fool you with trickery and then strike your throat before you know that you're even in a fight.
And I wouldn't expect someone like you to understand that, because all you ever do is make moves from up in your ivy tower.
Wow.
You have officially gone off the reservation.
I'm an adult.
I talk through shit.
He ran out of ideas.
God.
Listen, by the way, there's messages on the voice mail regarding game night, which is obviously not gonna happen, so you might want to call people and tell them that it's canceled.
Why would I cancel game night?
Well, I mean...
If it's our turn to host game, I'm gonna host goddamn game night.
You want to host game night?
I'm fine, Brooke.
I don't have any strangeness over what happened here today.
Okay.
If there's anyone that should feel weird about seeing people, that's you, Tonya Harding.
Me?
I'm gonna honor my commitments.
Great.
Great.
Fine.
Fine.
Let's do that.
Let's do that.
Let's honor the commitment.
(WATER RUNNING)
Hey, there's no food in there!
BROOKE:
So?
Well, people are gonna be here in an hour.
What are they supposed to eat?
You're a big boy.
Figure it out.
Oh, great.
Well, that's what we got.
We have only tap water because, you know, Gary didn't shop.
BROOKE:
And we don't have any ice either 'cause he didn't fill the trays.
That's trash.
It's your shot.
What is your name again?
Diane.
Diane.
GARY:
Did you call?
JOHNNY O:
I called the five.
Well, yeah, but you didn't call the second ball, so that's trash, so it's your shot.
GARY:
You got to play by the rules.
It's your shot.
Hi.
Hi.
Andrew.
BROOKE:
Oh, hi.
Whoa, whoa, whoa!
Hey, hey, hey!
These two Benedict Arnolds aren't welcome in my condo.
Who sent an invite to them?
I'm sorry.
These are very loyal friends and they are always welcome in my condo.
Oh, really?
Why don't we take it to a vote and see who has the numbers this time?
GARY:
All right.
Show of hands here.
Who thinks that these two traitors should leave and not be a part of game night?
And maybe take their shirts off when they leave.
Raise your hand.
I know I feel that way.
Who else?
GARY:
Come on, Johnny O, put your hand up, please.
Come on.
Thank you.
You, Miss?
New girl.
Who's the girl?
What's her name?
What's her name?
The girl you're with.
What's her name?
Her name's Diane.
Oh, I'm sorry.
You might want to go ahead and touch some sky.
Thank you.
Come on, Riggleman, please?
What are you doing?
No.
We need the eight to count towards a running tally.
You know that.
Come on.
Show her whose side that you're on.
Put your hand in the air.
You know whose side I'm on.
You know we need eight, though.
Come on.
Put your hand down.
Please don't touch my Ruffles.
GARY:
Put that one back.
Those are my Ruffles.
Don't eat them, please.
Thank you.
Oh, Gary.
They're mine.
Come on.
Here we go.
All right.
RIGGLEMAN:
Eyes front.
Ready?
Hold on.
Get the timer going, please.
Ready?
GARY:
Now I gotta do it.
Go.
ANDREW:
Okay.
It's a brick.
ADDIE:
Square.
Square.
Box.
Box.
Corner.
Corner.
A dot in the corner.
A house.
Home plate!
JEN:
Football!
Baseball!
Sports.
A house.
ADDIE:
A triangle.
It's algebra.
Okay, it's a house.
ADDIE:
It's a house.
JEN:
It's a house.
ANDREW:
Two words.
JEN:
Banana?
ADDIE:
Chimney, chimney, chimney!
A fruit.
House.
Fruit.
Oh, restaurant.
Or...
ANDREW:
No, chimney, chimney.
ADDIE:
Smoke...
JEN:
Oh, a house call.
House call!
(TIMER RINGING) Oh!
House call!
Yeah, well, I thought it was a house call.
Like a hotel, then it hit me it was a house.
ADDIE:
Yeah!
You're terrific.
Absolutely terrific.
All right, beat that.
Okay, guys, listen.
The next one wins, okay?
So let's stay focused.
Let's stay calm.
We can do this.
High fives.
Let's go.
Come on.
Let's go.
Let's get a mind-meld.
Let's try and get a mind-meld, okay?
GARY:
Here we go.
Let's go.
Mind-meld.
I heard you!
Don't over-think it.
Mind meld.
ANDREW:
Ready?
I heard you!
Well, just keep it simple.
Shush.
Ready?
Wait.
Go!
Here we go!
We're mind-melding.
Draw faster.
It doesn't have to be beautiful, just has to be something we can get.
Shoe, shoe...
Shoe!
Shoe, shoe, shoe.
Shoeless Joe Jackson.
Draw something different.
No one's getting it.
Shoe.
What, is that a smaller shoe?
JOHNNY O:
Baby shoe.
Smaller shoe.
Baby shoes.
JOHNNY O:
Shoes.
Baby shoes.
Smaller shoe.
Gumshoe.
GARY:
Smaller shoes.
DIANE:
Gumshoe?
Gumshoe?
Running Olympics.
JOHNNY O:
Inside the shoe.
Inside a shoe.
A bubble...
JOHNNY O:
Lining.
Stop pointing at the shoe.
We're not...
No one's guessing shoe.
Stop pointing at the shoe and draw something different.
(TIMER RINGING) Draw something different.
You...
Goddamn it!
No one's guessing shoe!
You drew a big shoe, then a small shoe, and no one got it.
You gotta draw something different.
Everyone said "shoe" seven times.
It's a sock, asshole.
You call yourself an artist?
Yes!
A three-year-old with a box of crayons could do a better job than this.
I'm sorry, I don't have the great talent of standing on top of a big red bus and pointing out architecture that other great men have built!
I'm the one who should be sorry, Brooke.
I shouldn't sit here and pick on your art.
No.
Because you got the nuts part down, Picasso.
GARY:
All you have to do is cut off your frigging ear.
BROOKE:
That's Van Gogh, you idiot!
And your insults are much more effective when they're accurate.
Don't talk to me about being goddamn accurate!
I can talk to you about anything that I want.
'Cause you couldn't even draw a sock.
You don't do anything right!
You're a lazy...
Everyone said, "Shoe, shoe, shoe!"
At first, I figured that the split was just something temporary, something that you two would work out and get past, but after tonight I think it's pretty clear that you two genuinely do not want to get back together.
There's not a shot in hell.
Gary.
I'm just...
I got you.
As your friend and as your realtor,
I'm not gonna leave here tonight until we decide what to do about this condo, because this living situation is obviously not working out.
Gary?
Well, the only logical thing that I can think of is for her to move out of the condo, and then to pay me some sort of a penalty as compensation for the labor that I did all around the condo.
What?
What?
What?
Pay you compensation for your labor?
We fixed this place up together.
Are you nuts?
Stop calling me nuts, I swear to God.
I fixed the...
You went around with a sponge, and you went in the bathroom and you dotted foofy shit.
That's what you're saying that I did?
GARY:
There's no...
BROOKE:
That was...
That's called aesthetics.
It warmed this place up so it didn't look like an army barracks, which it was about to.
I'll tell you what it's called in his language, depreciated.
That's what it's called.
You don't even know what that means.
Unless the next buyer happens to have your same Zulu-voodoo-land taste.
All right.
Let me tell you something else.
It's gonna cost money to cover up the holes in the wall.
The holes that you drilled in the wall there to hang up whatever that thing is called.
Oh, please.
Gary.
GARY:
You're gonna have to cost money to fix that.
What I did, Brooke, has concrete value to the condo.
I added concrete...
Well, let's just go on record.
We're dealing with facts here.
I did the tiling in the bathroom.
Have you seen...
I did the new track lighting.
That tile is the shittiest tile job.
GARY:
I did the plumbing!
The plumbing!
That's realty terms.
Okay.
Let's talk about your plumbing.
This is his plumbing.
We have two temperatures in our bathroom.
We get either scalding hot or we get frostbite.
That's it.
That's all we get.
It's my problem that she doesn't know how to pace a shower?
GARY:
Now all of a sudden that's my fault.
I get a minute to take a shower.
One minute?
BROOKE:
One minute of warmth?
Oh, Jesus.
One minute.
That's it.
That's correct.
Thank God you're not in charge of keeping all the clocks in Chicago on time.
This is basic logic.
You are out of your mind.
You have lost it.
Let me explain this to you in plain chapter and verse.
Cheese and rice, you guys are gonna kill each other.
Now, let's just...
Realistically speaking, neither one of you can afford this mortgage on your own, okay?
And that's a shame, because this building will continue to increase in value.
I get nothing but phone calls about it, all right?
Waiting for a unit to open up.
So, as your realtor, the last thing I would suggest is selling.
But as your friend, I just, I don't see any other solution.
You take your halves, you go your separate ways, and you get on with your lives.
I know that selling is not the easiest thing, but I do think that it's the best.
And to be honest, this is a situation where I would just as soon not take a commission.
That's great.
Thank you.
That's great.
Thank you for that.
I wish I didn't have to, you know, but company policy says I cannot waive that.
But I was just...
You know, I'm saying in theory, you know.
In this situation, 'cause we're friends, I wish I could waive it.
No can do, though.
As soon as you can, I would love to get a set of keys from you guys.
You just drop them off.
Okay.
Great.
There they are.
I'll be bringing by people all week.
You won't even know I'm here.
The good news is, should move quickly.
All right.
Okay to leave you two alone now?
Got to get back to Jen.
Very excited about the win tonight.
Okay.
(DOOR OPENING)
(DOOR CLOSING)
BROOKE:
Addie, if the condo sells, I think I'm gonna lose him.
ADDIE ON PHONE:
Yeah, but game night was so light and fun,
I'm really surprised to be hearing this.
Okay.
You know what?
That's not constructive.
Really.
I just...
Yeah, I need a new plan, Addie.
I don't... (SNICKERING)
I'm just kidding.
It's me.
I'm gonna have to call you back.
Whenever one of my friends is down, we all go on, like, happy patrol.
I was actually having a very serious conversation.
(SINGING) Christopher, do not sing.
(SINGING) If you're happy and you know it Clap your hands
If you're happy and you know it Clap your hands
If you're happy and you know it You're going to smile to... (DOOR SLAMS)
Pack up your shit and go home.
Okay.
You know what?
This is not his fault.
He was just really trying to cheer me up and it...
Did I or did I not give you the day off to be sad?
Yes.
But I...
Well, today's not that day, and unfortunately for you, I can't afford to look weak.
No, please.
You have warned me so many times and you have yet to fire me.
I think you and I both know that to find and train somebody new, it's gonna cost you time, and it's gonna cost you money, and I don't think you want to spend either one of those.
Now, look, I'm just gonna take a wild guess here, but you don't become Marilyn Dean without knowing how to handle men.
Okay?
Now, just listen to my problem, tell me how to fix it, and then we'll all go back to work.
Okay.
What is this problem so severe that has caused you to blaspheme in the synagogue of Marilyn Dean?
Well, it's Gary.
I broke up with him in hopes that losing me would make him want to change, and that's, you know...
And I've just ended up pushing him, you know, farther and farther away.
That's it?
Yeah.
Honey, this is not surrealism or cubism, it's paint-by-numbers.
Go see Mischa, my personal waxer at the spa.
Ask her for the Telly Savalas.
The Telly Savalas.
Compliments of M. Dean.
Then go show Gary your immaculate canvas and let him see another man eager to paint it.
Got it?
Got it?
Uh-huh.
Ow!
Who loves you, baby?
ANNOUNCER ON TV:
Wow, impressive.
Three sharp hands landed.
What an amazing display of punching technique.
The crowd jumps.
That punch rocked him.
They sense he's on the verge of hitting the canvas.
The roaring for anticipation of a knockout.
We are witnessing a great fight.
He's displaying incredible rhythm with his hands.
Bulldog terrorizing his opponent.
Down he goes!
Hard punch slams him to the canvas.
(WHO LOVES YA BABY PLAYING)
REFEREE:
One, two, three, four, five, six, seven, eight,
(BELL CLANGING) nine, ten.
It's over.
(DOORBELL RINGS)
(STAMMERING)
Is...
Did...
Is Brooke here?
I don't know.
(VIDEO GAME PLAYING)
Brooke?
BROOKE:
I'll be right there.
(EXPLOSIONS ON TV)
MAN:
Cool, baby, cool.
(SCREAMING)
So, how do you and Brooke know each other?
Well, how don't we know each other, you know what I mean?
BROOKE:
Hi, Paul.
Oh, hey.
Wow, you look great.
Thank you.
BROOKE:
Are you ready to go?
Yeah.
All set.
So, it was great meeting you.
Apple martinis.
All right, come on.
That normally does the trick.
Just ignore him.
But just two.
Three, she'll get sloppy.
You'll become a babysitter.
Oh, and fantasy role playing.
She's got a real thing for lifeguards.
Put some zinc oxide on your nose and she'll lose her mind.
It'll all be over with.
(DOOR CLOSES)
MAN:
Y'all want me to stop running?
I mean, the most challenging part of what I do is between February and April 15th.
That's what we in the biz like to call crunch time.
That sounds fascinating.
Good evening.
Hi.
Can I start you two off with something to drink?
Yeah, you know, we're gonna start with a couple of apple martinis, please.
No, you know what?
I'm gonna...
I'm just gonna start with a water.
Well, you can just bring those, just in case.
What was I saying?
Oh, yeah, yeah, yeah.
So, you know, it's not like it's all work and no play.
You know, I mean, after April 15th, that's what we in the biz like to call party time.
(CELL PHONE RINGING)
Excuse me.
Oh, I have to get this.
I'm so sorry.
Hello.
ADDIE:
Okay, is this when I'm supposed to call?
What?
What do you mean?
What?
Where?
What happened?
Okay, that's great.
Wait.
What?
Oh, all right.
Listen, where...
Just don't move.
Where are you?
I'm sitting in my kitchen.
Sitting?
Okay.
(STAMMERING) Don't move.
Don't...
I'm gonna be right there, honey.
I'm gonna be right there, okay?
Is everything okay?
Oh, my gosh.
That was my best friend.
She just had an accident and she...
She has this knee thing and she's just very fragile, and I have to go.
What?
I can give you a ride.
No.
No.
That's okay.
I'm gonna grab a cab, so...
I'm so sorry.
I like your dress.
I think he's fascinating.
He's obviously read a lot of books.
Yeah.
Yeah, I bet he has.
He reads a lot of books because nobody wants to talk to him.
He's a friend of Andrew's who's always been polite.
It's the best I could do on such short notice, okay?
Well, you know what?
Polite is not gonna do it.
We've got to find somebody who is really gonna make Gary jealous.
LUPUS:
Can I just say something?
You sound a little jealous, Gary.
GARY:
Why would I be jealous of some guy with computer skills?
Let's say he doesn't have computer skills, but he's got a big old elephant hog on him?
Would that bother you or would you be okay with that?
Not nearly as much as the way that your mind works.
LUPUS:
My mind works great.
So, what's this bullshit I hear about you selling the condo?
Selling that condo is ludicrous.
I was waiting for when I was gonna get the how-Gary-always- screws-his-life-up speech again.
This must be the right time.
Look, you tell me, you just tell me, tell me.
Is it happening now?
Yeah.
Okay.
Tell me how losing that asset is gonna get us on the river?
Go ahead, just tell me.
Tell me.
Somebody tell me.
What is this?
What is this?
What is it?
What is it?
Hey!
Don't patronize me.
Helicopters.
Helicopters.
Exactly!
How does losing the asset give us helicopters?
Dennis, I'm being totally serious with you.
I don't need this shit right now.
Hey, you want to cry, cry to Mom.
Nobody's crying.
I'm not crying.
I just don't feel like hearing it.
There's no feelings here.
This is about money and business.
Fine, you broke up.
You broke up.
Fine.
You know, sad.
Sad is, instead of putting $1,000 into your mortgage every month, you waste it on rent.
That's what sad is.
Oh, you're broke up.
You're confused, brokenhearted.
Heartbreak is not having that money as part of your net worth and then not saving the money, so that after taxes you can invest!
You know, you're confused.
Are you finished?
Look, I need the damn tour logs.
Yeah.
Well, I really, really appreciate the heart to heart.
It was a great talk, Dennis.
Thank you.
Oh, well, you're behind three months.
You're still behind three months.
And those logs are imperative to insuring that our books are straight!
I'll tell you what those logs are.
Those logs are bullshit is what they are!
You got the receipts.
Tally the goddamn things yourself!
I do, I do!
And I don't appreciate it, because it cuts into my time with my family.
I could be spending that time with my family instead of doing your books.
I already do the taxes.
I do the billing.
I do the hiring, the firing.
I do the maintenance.
Come on, what do you do?
What is it that you do?
You do the tours!
I am the talent, Dennis!
They sign up a month in advance to see me.
They'll wait in line for the next bus to see me!
All right?
So don't drain me with all this bullshit about the goddamn tour logs!
GARY:
How big's your TV?
BOY:
Oh, shut up!
How big's your TV, 'cause I wanna know if you can see what's happening.
Oh, wow.
You beat a 12-year-old.
I don't care if you're 12 years old.
You have more time in the day to play.
I live in the real world, my man,
(DOORBELL RINGING) with bills and responsibilities.
GARY:
That's right.
You can't have a handle called Mad Dog Killer if you complain every time...
Brooke?
Hi, Mike.
Hi.
Come on in.
Hold on, Mom.
I'm coming.
Is your mom in the room with you?
'Cause I hope she can't see what's happening.
I hope she can't see what's happening.
I'm gonna be just a few more seconds.
So, just sit down and relax.
Oh, yeah, no problem.
GARY:
I'm sorry?
Yeah, why'd you do that?
You take the fun out of beating you, because you have an excuse to lose.
Get a life, dude.
Do you think it's possible that your mom won't love you anymore if she sees how bad you're losing in the game.
Shut up!
Okay.
All right.
GARY:
That's great.
You're gonna stay man-to-man with me.
What happens when I make a play?
(MIKE GROANING) Making plays, making plays!
Making plays!
Well, you know, that's how my people like to handle their business.
While your guys are out partying, mine are running routes.
Try to make a difference.
Mike?
I'm ready to go.
Oh, hey, do you mind if we finish the game?
We got a real nail-biter going here.
Yeah, sure.
Of course.
Great.
Awesome, all right?
Touchdown.
Oh, God, is that pretty.
God, is that pretty.
Yeah, I'm a gentleman.
I like to be humble.
I'm old school.
I don't like to talk a lot.
But at the same time, am I talented?
Tell me how you felt about what just happened there.
That's him going deep.
That's him going...
Work ethic.
Work ethic.
I could play this game forever.
Oh, I could, too.
I love it, yeah.
I love it, don't you?
I mean, it's the kind of thing where literally
I play the game and it's like, four hours go by.
Fate has me highly skilled and loaded with talent.
Oh...
'Cause I think I'm good enough to figure out how to beat myself.
GARY:
You push yourself.
You push yourself trying to achieve the impossible, because you know that when that moment comes that everything you've done up to that moment has prepared you for victory!
I can't take credit for it, Mike.
I got to thank these little digital guys with the big hearts.
Does it feel good to be a champion?
Yeah.
Yeah, it feels good to be a champion.
Good game.
Hey, Brooke, are you ready to go now?
Oh, yeah, yeah.
Sure.
MIKE:
Great.
Hey, Gary, thanks a lot, man.
It was great to meet you.
Absolutely, man.
Come on, Mike.
I know a great little martini bar.
(DOOR OPENING)
(DOOR CLOSES)
LUPUS:
Yo.
Hey, man, saddle up.
It's time to rope in some talent.
What's up?
What do you got?
My place.
Tonight.
Poker.
Call some girls up.
Your roommate is awesome.
Mmm.
Yeah, he's something.
So, where did you go to law school?
Oh, Northwestern.
God, Gary's hilarious.
Yeah, he's okay.
Okay?
I mean, the guy's all time.
But he's gonna take Chicago tourism by air, land and sea.
And he asked me to join his new bowling team.
I mean, how cool is that?
Mmm-hmm.
You know what?
I can't do this.
I'm so sorry.
Excuse me, would you please pull over?
Can you pull over, please?
Hey, wait.
Tell Gary to call me.
GARY:
Welcome, everyone, to the first annual Texas Hold'em No-Limit Strip Poker Tournament.
(GIRLS WHOOPING)
Now, per the e-mail that Lupus sent, we each have eight articles of clothing.
Now, if you want to bet, you take off an article of clothing, you put it in the center.
If you win, you take back the clothes, you put back on what you bet.
The extras that other people bet will stay in front of you, much the same as chips would.
You can go all in at any point, but as I outlined, you must take off all your clothes to do so.
The game shall last an hour, maybe two, at which point we will begin the dance portion of the evening.
(ALL CHEERING)
GARY:
Let's get going here.
I need to see the blinds.
Small blind.
Big blind.
The blinds are one and one.
LUPUS:
Come on, ladies.
GARY:
All right.
Oh, yeah.
Let's get going here.
Shuffle up and deal.
All right.
I mean, just because they were playing video games, that doesn't mean it didn't bother him, right?
Honestly, Brooke, I wish I could tell you, but I wasn't there.
All right, Sally, get the soap out of your mouth.
We're gonna save that for when you're 12.
Mike was really, really good-Iooking.
I mean, he's a little bit of a goof, but Gary doesn't know that.
I mean, for all he knows, a sophisticated, really good-Iooking guy took me out on a date tonight.
I could be in bed with this guy right now for all he knows.
You know?
I'm telling you, if you saw the look on his face,
Mike got to him.
(CRAZY LITTLE THING CALLED LOVE PLAYING ON STEREO)
(PHONE RINGING)
Hello.
Hey, it's Riggleman.
Great news.
(GARY SNIFFING)
So, how does this work?
I'll bring the car around front and you wrap them up to go?
Oh, no, no.
We take care of everything.
We deliver it.
We hang it.
We check the light and the sun exposure.
Oh.
Perfect.
Yeah.
Listen, I don't want to be too forward, but would you like to have some dinner with me sometime?
I'm sorry.
I have a boyfriend.
Of course.
So...
Well, he's a lucky man.
BROOKE:
Oh, thank you.
I guess I will just have to keep it to home deliveries and gallery purchases.
Thank you, though.
See you.
Have a good day, Brooke.
You, too.
(DOOR OPENING)
(DOOR CLOSING)
Okay, are you out of your mind?
Gary's throwing Greek orgies in your living room and you're telling hot rich guys you have a boyfriend?
Are you nuts?
Hey, look.
I'm not exactly innocent here.
Brooke, as an outsider with some perspective, I really think you...
Christopher, stop.
Stop it.
I don't want to hear it.
This has already gotten way out of hand.
I know what I have to do now, all right?
I know what I have to do.
(COMMENTATOR CHATTERING)
(DOOR OPENING)
(DOOR SHUTTING)
Hi.
Hi.
Did you get my note?
Yeah.
Two weeks.
Yep.
I brought some boxes from work, so, you know, if you need any just help yourself.
Great.
Thanks.
Oh.
Listen, a while ago I got these tickets for the Old 97's tonight, and I completely forgot about it, so I...
You know, if you want to go.
Well, how many tickets did you get?
I got two.
How much do you want for them?
Oh, no, I'm going.
I'm going.
So, then it would just be the two of us?
Well, yes, and 2,000 other people.
I mean, it's not a big deal, but, you know, look, you know, I was going to invite Addie, but I just figured I'd gotten them for you, so...
Sure.
Why not?
Are you sure?
I mean, if you don't want them,
I can definitely give them to somebody.
No.
No, I'll be there.
That sounds...
It sounds great.
Okay.
All right.
It's at the Riv.
So, I'll just leave your ticket at Will Call.
Good?
Okay.
Okay.
Yeah, so, there.
I'll just leave that for him.
Okay, great.
Okay, so.
Gary Grobowski?
Grobowski, yeah.
He should be here in a minute.
He's really...
He's oddly tall, so.
Oh, okay.
Great.
You won't miss him.
Thanks.
All right, have a good night.
(ALL CHATTERING)
(ALL CHATTERING)
Hi.
Can I get a beer, please?
Sure.
Actually, make that two beers.
It's gonna be $8.
Excuse me.
Sorry.
(CROWD CHEERING)
MILLER:
Hello, everybody!
Good evening, Chicago.
We're the Old 97's.
(BAND PLAYING TIMEBOMB)
(BAND PLAYING SALOME)
(MELT SHOW PLAYING)
(LOCK CLICKING)
(DOOR OPENING)
(DOOR SHUTTING)
(KNOCKING)
Brooke?
Are you up?
Yeah.
Are you okay?
I'm fine.
Are you sure?
What's up?
What do you want?
I just want to say I'm sorry that I missed the concert, and let me know what that ticket cost, I'll pay you back for it.
Just leave me alone, Gary.
I planned on going to the concert.
It's just, I stopped by Johnny O's and we...
It doesn't fucking matter, okay?
Would you just leave my room and shut the door?
Jesus.
Please.
I didn't really know that the concert mattered all that much to you.
Exactly.
Hold on a second here.
Let me talk for a second.
Gary...
Brooke.
You broke up with me.
Then you have guys coming over here for dates, and all of a sudden you ask me to go to some concert.
I mean, I just figured that, you know.
Gary.
(SNIFFS)
I just...
I don't know how we got here.
Our entire relationship
I've gone above and beyond for you, for us.
And I mean, I've cooked.
I've picked your shit up off the floor.
I've laid your clothes out for you like you were a four-year-old.
I support you.
I supported you, your work.
If we ever had dinner or anything, I make the plans.
I take care of everything and I just don't feel like you appreciate any of it.
I don't feel you appreciate me.
And all I want is to...
Is for you to just show me that you care.
Why didn't you just say that to me?
Gary, I've tried.
I've tried.
Yeah, but never like that.
You might've said some things that you meant to imply that, Brooke, but I'm not a mind reader.
I doubt it would matter.
You are who you are.
Just leave me alone, okay?
Right now.
Just shut my door.
Listen.
All right, Gary, just, please.
Just leave the room.
Listen to me.
Gary, just...
I don't want to be near you right now.
Listen to me.
I just want to...
Please, just shut the door.
Please.
(SOBBING)
JOHNNY O:
I know.
Look, I know you feel bad, but, you know, what are you gonna do?
I mean, what does she expect, for me to want to go with the girl who dumped me?
I don't know.
She probably just wanted you, you know, to show her the respect of not standing her up or some shit, who knows?
Well, damn it.
I should have just said no in the first place.
I don't know why I called...
You know what?
It's her fault she got hurt.
You shouldn't even feel bad about it.
She should have expected it from you.
You're a fun guy, okay?
Everybody likes you.
You're the quickest guy I know.
Anytime we go out, I have a blast.
All right?
But, you know, everybody who knows you knows you're gonna do what you want to do.
And if it's not what the other person wants to do, well, that's their problem.
That's bullshit.
It's not bullshit.
There's plenty of times I do shit that I don't want to do.
That's ridiculous.
No.
Like when?
That's bullshit to say about me.
When have we ever done something you didn't want to do?
You know, I don't know, off the top of my head.
I don't keep score...
When's the last time we went to a Sox game?
The Sox.
Not when they're playing the Cubs, either.
We always do what you want to do and she always did what you want to do.
It's who you are.
Everybody thinks that you're their friend, okay?
But the fact of the matter is that there's not one person that I know that you trust enough to let close enough that they could hurt you.
And her big problem is that you really liked her.
I mean, she is the one girl you really liked.
And no matter what she did and how hard she tried, you were never gonna let your guard down.
That poor girl never stood a chance.
(BIRDS CHIRPING)
(AY COSITA LINDA PLAYING ON STEREO)
Marilyn?
Marilyn?
MARILYN:
Yeah.
I'm sorry.
I just...
MARILYN:
Oh, just get in here.
Oh, okay.
I'm sorry, excuse me.
Marilyn, I just...
I just wanted to let you know that today is gonna be my last day.
I'm gonna be traveling for a bit.
Here's a blank check.
Write down a number, I don't want to know what it is, and go back to work.
No, no.
It's not about that.
I can't accept that.
Brooke.
Travis, get your gorgeous tuckus out of here.
(SIGHS)
(STEREO STOPS PLAYING)
If you make it to Rome, search out an establishment called the Padre Negro.
Ask for a strapping young fellow named Alberto.
Compliments of M. Dean.
Well, thank you.
I appreciate that.
Yeah.
And, honey, take as long as you want, because when you're done, your job will be right here waiting for you.
And if you discover a path that doesn't lead back here...
Well, I hope you'll text.
I will.
(CHUCKLES)
And, like I said, the apartment's a mess, but I'm moving, so...
It's okay.
Relax about the place.
I don't care.
Okay.
This'll just take a second.
Okay.
(LA VEM A BAIANA PLAYING ON STEREO)
BROOKE:
Hello?
GARY:
Hey.
I'm in here.
Don't say anything.
I...
How're you doing?
Could I talk to you in private for a second?
You know what?
This is really not a good time, and obviously you have something happening here, so we'll just be in...
No, no, I don't have anything going on.
This is actually for you.
I'm just gonna wait outside.
No, no.
Wait.
No, no.
Really.
It's okay.
I really can't do this right now.
Brooke, this whole thing has been really tough on me and I've tried to act like it hasn't been that tough on me, but the first Sunday after me and you broke up, it all kind of really hit me.
And I think it partially hit me because Sunday was sort of always our day that we would do stuff together.
But I didn't have any idea you still cared so much.
And, you know, when I saw you crying the other night, that was honestly the worst moment of my life.
Gary.
Let me just try to say some of these things here.
It's just...
Look,
I know that I've caused you a lot of pain.
And the funny thing is, all I really want to do is make you happy.
I just want to make you smile.
Now, I've had a lot of time to think about some of the things that went on, and I know, Brooke, that I don't always do the right thing or always say the right things,
but I am willing to try to do things differently.
And I'd be happy to go take a dance class.
Well, I would.
Honestly.
I would like to go do that.
Or go travel.
I mean, I'd even be willing to go to the ballet.
Although I would much rather do the dance class or take a trip somewhere.
But I realize that's not the point.
I realize that the point isn't that at all, because it's not really about doing things that you love to do always, but it is about doing things with the person that you love.
And I love you.
Gary.
Just give me one second here.
I've missed you so much.
(SOBBING)
I promise you, Brooke,
I will do whatever it is that I have to do to never hurt you again.
I love you and I'm sorry.
Okay, that's it.
That's all I...
Oh, God.
That's all I wanted to say, so you can go ahead now with anything that you're feeling to say.
I don't know what to say.
Just say whatever you feel inside.
I don't feel the same way.
I don't.
I just...
I don't know.
Oh, God.
I just, I think...
I don't know, but I don't think I have anything left to give.
I'm sorry.
I was hoping for...
It doesn't matter.
Oh, this is now beyond awkward.
There's some new guy standing out in the hallway and I think I'm gonna go.
Okay.
Thank you.
I made a dinner, and I don't know if it's any good or not, but you're welcome to have it.
Okay.
Gary, that's really...
That's not what you think that it is.
It's okay.
I'm gonna go take a walk.
(DOOR OPENING)
(DOOR CLOSING)
(ELEVATOR BELL DINGS)
I'm sorry about that.
No.
I'm sorry I imposed.
No, that's fine.
Please.
So, what do you think?
I think you're right.
I think it's great.
Good.
Okay.
Okay.
So,
I will have that wrapped up.
Packed up, sorry, and delivered.
Thank you for taking the time to show it to me, okay?
Sure.
Yeah.
I'm gonna run.
Okay, I'll walk you out.
No, no, no.
I can...
It's okay.
(DOOR OPENING)
(DOOR CLOSING)
GARY:
So, the thing that I was most afraid of happening happened and I don't regret it at all, because now she knows how I feel.
Do you know what I mean?
Yeah.
I think, what you got to do now is really think hard, because you have to find somebody
that can't be traced back to either of us to visit this guy.
What are you talking about?
I don't...
The guy who came with her.
I don't need anything to happen to the guy.
But if they could trace him back to either one of us...
It's not about him.
I don't care about that.
...it's a problem.
The guy, he's not a...
They're not dumb.
Cops are smart, trust me.
Okay, but he's not a problem to me.
Right.
Listen to me.
Promise me that you're not gonna do anything.
I got you.
It's better if nobody...
You don't know anything.
What are you talking about?
I'll take care of it.
I don't want you to take care of anything.
John, do me a favor.
I'm being serious with you.
I know, I know.
Smart.
You're smart.
No, I'm not.
I'm being honest with you.
I don't want anything to happen to him.
Me, either.
Promise me you're not gonna have anyone do anything to this guy.
But you've gotta tell me exactly what you're gonna tell them, if the cops come to you.
Because if we tell a different story...
Nothing.
Promise me one thing.
We don't care...
John, I'm gonna go home.
I can't do this.
I'm exhausted.
Right, go home.
Just make sure your neighbors know you're going home.
Do me a favor.
They got phone records.
Make a couple phone calls tonight.
Especially around 10:00.
Okay.
Please don't do anything.
All right.
I don't mean it like...
I mean, honestly.
No, no, I got it.
For all you know, nothing's happening.
I don't want anything to happen.
Right.
Say it louder.
What are you doing here so early?
Hey.
Everything okay with you and...
Yeah, everything's gonna be great.
I just wanna get my day started, but I just wanted to say that
I'm sorry it took so long for me to...
I love you, Dennis.
(GASPING) It's all right.
It's okay.
I'm sorry.
I'm gonna go do the stuff.
So, that's it for all my stuff.
If you want, you could give me your key and I'll drop it off at Riggleman's.
All right.
Thanks.
Gary.
You know, there's a thousand things I...
I would have done differently.
Me, too.
Sort of, actually, when I see this space, I realize that if we didn't have such a big coffee table and that oversized couch
a pool table would have fit nicely.
Yeah.
Although the oversized couch did come in very useful the last couple of weeks, so...
Yes, it...
I guess.
Have a good trip.
Thanks.
GARY:
Chicago is called the Second City because after the Great Chicago Fire of 1871,
Chicago was rebuilt on its ruins.
The city came back even bigger and stronger than it originally was.
So it's not really an insult, it's more of a badge of honor to be called...
The Second City!
Okay.
People, you might be able to get away with that reaction at work, but you are on vacation here.
If you can't blow it out here, then where the hell can you blow it out?
Ladies and gentlemen, show me that you mean it.
Do not make me ask you twice.
Are you ready to see Chicago?
ALL:
Yes!
I said, are you ready to see Chicago?
ALL:
Yes!
Are you ready to see Chicago?
Shondra, put this babe in the air.
Let's go!
There is a bar downstairs.
Please enjoy yourself.
I know it's early in the morning, but it is Chicago in the summer.
Who are we kidding?
It's fine.
Go get hopped up, make some bad decisions.
My jokes get better.
The buildings look bigger.
It's not so important that everything is finished.
It's important that everything is right.
Well, what time's the presentation?
All right, I'll pick up the rest of the stuff and I'll see you at 6:45.
Great.
Bye.
GARY:
Brooke!
Hi.
Hi.
Wow.
(CHUCKLES)
It's good to see you.
It's good to see you.
I'd give you a hug, but my hands are kind of full with all the bags here.
How've you been?
I've been really good.
How have you been?
I've been good.
Yeah.
You look great.
Thank you.
The hair's a little different.
Looks nice.
Yeah?
Oh, yeah.
You've lost some weight.
Well, it's very deceiving, actually.
I've managed to become thin without having any real muscle on me whatsoever.
Very tough thing to accomplish, by the way.
I'm proud of myself.
Well, you look terrific.
Thanks.
I heard your trip went really well.
It did.
It went really well.
Oh, good.
It was fun.
It was amazing.
I saw so many amazing places.
It was just...
But, you know, you do realize how much you love home.
It's good to have you back.
Yeah.
It's good to be back.
And the boat.
Congratulations on the boat.
Thanks.
I'm waiting for it to get warm, and I'm gonna come by and take a ride.
Well, anytime you want.
It'll be on the house.
Come on by.
Well, I will, then.
I hope you do.
Definitely.
Well, I got to...
I'm going to a meeting, so...
I got to drop these bags off anyway, but it's really good to see you, Brooke.
Really good to see you.
Shouldn't...
Sorry.
I'm sorry.
I'm just saying we shouldn't wait so long the next time before we...
Yeah.
...catch up.
We have a lot more to talk about.
Yeah.
So.
Be good.
Okay.
Bye.
Bye.
(I CAN SEE CLEARLY NOW PLAYING)
(RAINBOW CONNECTION PLAYING)
THE END
Come on, come on, come on.
All right, here we go.
Take a seat, buddy!
Come on.
It was a good play.
Are you gonna be like this all day?
I don't know.
Is it gonna be like this all day?
I don't know.
It's up to you.
I have no room to sit.
I got no room to sit.
I'm sitting next to a guy who's sitting like he's at home on the toilet with his legs spread.
Please don't crowd people.
Relax, please.
Look at me.
I am relaxed.
Look how I'm sitting.
Why are you sitting like that?
Because...
What do you think?
Why'd you wake me up for this shit?
Because I'm trying to relax and have a nice day.
Sweating in the sun like a Tijuana whore.
Ice-cold soda!
Get your soda here!
On the right.
Coming down there.
Pass that on down there.
Hey, hot dog guy, can I get six hot dogs down here, please?
Right away.
And make it right, please.
You know, with the mustard and the ketchup and the relish.
Don't make me hit you up for more.
I thought we were going to Wiener Circle after this.
We will.
Then why are you getting hot dogs?
Pass this down, please.
You can keep the change.
Do you want one of the hot dogs?
You can have a hot...
You want a hot dog?
Do you want a hot dog, miss?
No.
Thank you.
You can have one.
That's okay.
Go ahead.
You can have a hot dog.
No, I don't want one.
Excuse me, sir?
Would you mind passing the lady one of the hot dogs?
I'm good, thanks.
You don't have to share.
You can have your own.
Thanks.
That's really nice of you.
Just have one, please.
Okay, give me a hot dog.
Somebody give her a hot dog.
I got...
The big guy can't eat all of them.
Have one.
Have you ever had one before?
A hot dog?
At the ballpark?
I have.
I believe I have.
Okay, good.
Thank you.
Well, enjoy this one.
Thanks.
Do you like mustard?
No, I'm okay.
It's much better with a topping.
Here.
I'm just kidding, I'll give you two.
Cheers!
Thanks.
We'll share it.
It's a good dog.
I like the hot dog.
I know.
That's nice.
You have a problem with me eating a hot dog, guy?
I'm trying to watch the game and have a hot dog.
I'll smack him in his head.
No, just leave him alone.
Hey, you want to go get a drink?
No.
I'm with somebody, sorry.
Who?
The guy with the tucked-in shirt and the visor?
What, is that like a brother?
The guy was not your brother, then.
Who is this guy?
He's not my brother.
Who's this...
I'm getting mad now.
I'm jealous.
Who is this guy?
Who are you?
I don't know.
I'm kidding with you.
Who's the guy with the tucked-in stuff?
Is that a boyfriend?
Uh, it's...
I'm going.
Do you think you'll marry him?
What?
'Cause I know you've thought about it.
The first time you laid eyes on him, you probably thought,
"I wonder if I could marry this guy in plaid shorts who tucks his shirt in.
No way."
Then when you kissed him, you said, "I can't believe it.
"I had a lot to drink tonight.
I'm kissing the tucked-in guy."
My point is, if you're not gonna marry him...
Yeah.
...and if it's not forever, then you really don't have anything to lose in taking me up on my offer.
Uh-huh.
Well, I'm gonna go.
Okay.
Me, too.
Okay.
To where?
On an ice-breaking first date?
Well, no, I don't think...
Listen.
If you want to stay off the market while you're with
I'm-not-the-one- but-I'm-comfortable, then you can do that.
But for all you know, I just offered you a get-out-of-bored-love- for-free card with no strings attached.
God, you're crazy.
No, I'm not crazy.
And a lot of times people go, "Oh, that's crazy,"
and then they go, "It's genius."
That's what happened when the person invented fire.
They burned that witch.
And guess what, then they got warm and they ate good stuff.
Now, where are we headed to?
Let's not make this weird, 'cause I'm not good on dates.
No.
You know what?
I'm better just to kind of hang out and, if we don't have fun,
I might go my separate way.
Okay.
I'm not committing to anything.
I'll go hang out with you for a little bit.
That's not gonna happen.
But I can't say for sure.
All right, all right, everybody.
Welcome to Three Brothers Bus Tours.
I'm brother number two.
It's good to have you here.
That's right, there's plenty of seats here up front.
I promise I won't bite.
I'm not a biter.
I'm psyched to have you here.
Okay, a couple quick ground rules.
Please don't jump off the bus.
Weird.
Not fun for anybody.
Also, no throwing objects at pedestrians, unless, of course, they deserve it.
Okay?
We are not at work today.
We are on vacation today.
And if you can't blow it out here on the big funny bus, where the hell can you?
I do split the tips with my driver, Shondra.
We don't want her back out turning tricks.
That was a weird time for everyone.
Seriously.
Honest to God.
And I was a customer.
Long time ago.
Come on, everybody, let's get loose!
I'm gonna ask you once.
Show me that you mean it.
Don't make me ask you twice.
Are you ready to see Chicago?
Are you ready to see Chicago?
That's what I'm talking about.
Shondra, put this baby in the air.
Let's get the blood flowing.
Let's get everyone up and let's loosen it up.
Coming up here, you're gonna notice one of the only buildings to survive the fire of 1871.
That is the original Chicago Water Tower and Pumping Station.
Happy Holidays.
Marilyn Dean Gallery.
The artist was inspired by the neoclassical movement.
No, she doesn't.
But wanted to reflect it with an abstract bent.
Okay, bye-bye.
And how much is it?
$35,000.
Happy Holidays.
Marilyn Dean Gallery.
Hold, please.
Will you excuse me for a moment?
Sure.
Go ahead.
Christopher?
Yes, sweetie.
Hi, honey.
Hi.
Christmas was months ago.
Don't remind me.
I miss it so much.
Yeah, I know.
But today is not a holiday.
I know for a fact that people like my spirit on the phone and they dig the energy that I give them.
Okay.
I'm just saying, I don't think Marilyn Dean will "dig" the energy.
Oh, no.
She's the one that told me to be creative.
So...
I know.
It's just...
Okay.
What is the next holiday coming?
The Fourth of July, is that what's next?
Well, if you want to get technical, there's Memorial Day, there's Flag Day.
Some people recognize Father's Day as a holiday.
I don't.
I get it.
I get it.
Well, on those days you can say, "Happy Holidays."
Every other day, "Good morning, good afternoon,
"good evening, Marilyn Dean Gallery.
" Okay?
Okay.
I'm so sorry about that.
Oh, no.
So, now this is a new piece by Zakrzewska.
What do you think of this?
Can I be honest with you?
Please.
Other than taking an art history class in college, which I pretty much slept through, I don't have the first clue about art or how to go about buying it.
I mean, like that painting.
I mean, I don't see the point in buying something that I could have done myself.
Yeah.
I completely agree with you.
You know, an art teacher of mine once said,
"Never buy a piece of art that you don't have to have."
You know, don't worry about who the artist is or how much it's worth.
I mean, you have to live with it every day.
You have to walk by it every day.
You know, you have to really love it.
You have to really appreciate it.
It's kind of like picking a mate.
Hey, honey!
Hi.
How's it going?
It's good.
Oh, wow.
You got a lot happening.
I know.
Very exciting.
I am starving.
Oh, careful.
That's really...
That's very hot.
Oh, that's hot, hot, hot.
Yep.
Jesus.
Hey, honey, you've got to really...
You should get ready, okay?
Oh, you look great.
Thank you.
Got a lot of nice stuff.
Got a pizza.
All kinds of stuff.
Terrific.
I just need you to decide what to...
You know, I did everything.
Gary?
Yeah?
Oh, come on!
Really?
You got three lemons.
What my baby wants, my baby gets.
You know that.
Yeah, but I wanted 12.
Baby wanted 12.
Why would you want 12 lemons?
Because I'm making a 12-lemon centerpiece.
So, no one's actually even eating them?
They're just show lemons?
Yeah.
They're just show lemons.
Shown in the center of the table.
I'm glad you find that amusing, but I cannot fill a vase with only three lemons.
Well, can't you just use, like, maybe a drinking glass?
I'm not gonna use a drinking...
We could have a smaller version of a centerpiece.
I'm not gonna use a drinking glass for our centerpiece.
You know what?
I've got an idea.
Why don't we go ahead and scratch the centerpiece idea altogether, because the chicken that burnt my mouth could maybe use a little bit of lemon on top of it.
Guess what?
Now we've made a better meal versus something visually nice to look at.
What are you do...
What's happening here?
What are you doing?
What are you doing?
Oh, I had such a long day on the bus.
I need a little bit of down time.
My feet are killing me.
Gary, come on, my feet are killing me, too.
I'm exhausted.
I worked all day.
Went to the market.
I cleaned this entire condo and then I've been cooking for the last three hours.
Come on.
Help set the table.
Sweetheart.
What?
You've done such a great job already.
Don't you want to finish it yourself and have that personal power of that accomplishment?
Set the table.
Listen to me.
Do you think that when Michelangelo, right, was painting the Sixteenth Chapel, that he said,
"Hey, guys, you know, I did pretty good on the first 15 chapels,
"but why don't you help me design this one?
"And maybe you could help me...
Give me a brush
"and you guys can grab brushes, and we can all make a great chapel." Uh-uh.
No, he didn't.
And you wanna know what the results were?
A masterpiece.
Okay.
It's the Sistine Chapel, not the Sixteenth, and I bet when Michelangelo asked for 12 brushes, they didn't bring him three.
Yeah.
Okay, all the talking is really starting to drain me, and now I'm gonna have to watch the highlights later to see what I missed here.
Honey, look, Gary, just...
Down time's important.
Gary, please just take a shower, okay?
Down time's important.
'Cause this is what I don't want to have happen.
I don't want the doorbell to ring.
I'm then forced to answer the door, entertain people, and I'm still cooking dinner.
Yeah.
Okay?
You're absolutely right.
Let's do that.
The second that this inning's over...
Gary.
There's one out all ready.
They're gonna be here in 20 minutes.
Baby, have you ever seen a shower of mine take more than four minutes?
Yes, I have.
Come on.
Oh, great!
They're here.
Okay.
Table's not set.
Dinner's not ready.
Would you please just let my parents in?
I gotta jump in the shower.
What?
I gotta go.
Gary.
Gary.
Well, seeing how our families haven't had many opportunities to get to know one another, we figured, what better way than to break some bread?
So, everyone, thank you for coming and enjoy the meal.
Cheers.
Cheers, honey.
Mrs. Grobowski.
Nice to meet you.
Thank you.
Cheer with the sons.
Sweetheart, cheers to you.
Darling, I see that you put those Feng Shui books that I sent to you to good use.
This place is so well balanced.
Thanks, Mom.
Yeah, the energy in this place is just amazing.
Yes.
Well, the energy in the condo might be a little more amazing if we had a pool table.
Gary, we've already discussed that.
We're gonna get a pool table when we get a bigger place.
The place is plenty big now, if you wanted a pool table because...
Gary.
Yeah.
You could take the dining room table, go ahead and move her in the living room.
Really?
Plenty of room.
And put a dining room table in the living room?
Okay.
How do you...
I mean, what do you do with a dining room table?
Eat on it.
We'd have no furniture in the living...
Where's the furniture go?
All I'm saying is, it would be nice to be able to shoot some pool.
Well, this isn't a dorm.
Look, baby, I completely understand.
There's halls and stuff.
I mean, you can go...
We will wait and get a pool table when we have a bigger place.
Thank you.
The food is outstanding.
It is delicious food.
It's outstanding.
Yeah, it really is nice.
Okay, everybody.
Time for the joke of the day.
Knock, knock.
Dad.
Dad, come on.
Who's there?
Norma Lee.
Norma Lee, who?
Normally, I don't go around knocking on doors, but would you like to buy an encyclopedia?
I got a joke.
I got a joke.
How's it going?
I got a joke for you.
What do you get when you cross a gay Eskimo and a black guy?
All right, look, I think we've had enough with the jokes for tonight.
Thank you, though.
Let's just talk with each other.
All right.
I saw that Three Brothers article in the Trib this week.
Sounds like you guys are up to some pretty exciting stuff.
Basically, our big goal is to try to take Chicago tourism by air, land and sea.
We're still in the ground phase with the buses.
But as soon as we get our infantry established, then we'll take it to the squids.
Yeah.
Boats.
Boats.
Oh, boats.
As soon as we control the waterway, then we'll bring in air supports and then we'll pretty much control everything.
You know, Dennis, the way your face lights up when you describe your ambitions, it's really inspiring.
Oh, thanks.
Because I understand how you feel that passion.
And sharing it with other people, I think that's what life's about.
I don't feel that about boats and squibs...
Squids?
Squids.
Sorry.
Yeah.
But I do feel it about singing.
With my a cappella group, The Tone Rangers.
Although it's not as aggressive as your dream, it's really more of a brotherhood.
It's like a musical team.
It's like a symphony of guys.
Guy symphony.
And it's very hard to describe the true magic of a group of guys singing in perfect harmony.
It's transcendent.
But it's still very real.
I guess the best way to put it in words is just...
Even that doesn't do it.
That doesn't do it because that's just one person.
And what I'm talking about is the pulse of the collective.
Oh, heck.
Let me just show you how it's done.
Dad, how about a little percussion?
Tap-tap-tappy.
Tap-tap-tappy.
And, Mom, high-hat.
Good, Mom.
Excellent.
And Gary!
On the kick drum!
Come, come!
On the kick drum!
Come, come!
That's Gary!
Come, come with the kick drum.
Come!
Come, come with the kick drum.
Gary, on the kick drum.
Come, come.
That's Gary on the kick drum.
Go!
And Gary.
In the house.
Come, come.
I'm not with you.
Come, come.
With the kick drum.
Come, come.
I'm just not really the kick drum kind of guy.
I'd rather be just a listener and enjoy all the banging that he's doing and the...
You know, Gary, that's your prerogative.
That's your right, to listen.
Meantime, I've gotta talk to Brooke about something.
It's called the bass line.
Excuse me.
Okay.
Good, Carol.
Good, Brooke.
Yes, Dennis.
Be nice.
Totally awesome.
Move yourself
You always live your life
Never thinking of the future
Prove yourself
You are the move you make
Take your chances win or loser
See yourself
You're every step you take
You and you and that's the only way
Shake Shake!
Shake yourself
You're every move you make
So the story goes
Thank you so much.
Okay, bye.
Thank you so much.
It was great to see you.
Okay.
Come on.
Have a good night.
It was really nice, Gary.
Nice to see you.
You, too.
Good to see you guys.
Thanks, Brookie.
Oh, honey.
Thank you, sweetie.
You're still my favorite singer.
Stop it.
Love you, sis.
And I'd love for you to come to a live performance of The Tone Rangers singing live.
That's something you'd really enjoy.
It was good seeing you.
Okay.
Thank you.
All right.
Bye, darling.
Thank you for such a...
Okay.
Okay, Mom.
We'll see you soon.
Bye, dear.
Thanks, darling.
See you later.
Okay, buddy.
Oh, now, are you sure that we can't help you clean up?
No, no.
I think we're gonna be great.
We'll...
Yes?
So nice of you to offer, but we got it.
Thank you.
Oh, it was such fun.
Great.
I love you.
Great to see you.
Good night, sweetie.
Thank you so much.
I appreciate it.
Thank you so much.
All right, guys.
Bye-bye.
Bye-bye.
Thanks for coming.
Love you, too.
Are you blind?
Oh, no, no!
My demos!
Well, I'm gonna go do the dishes.
Cool.
It'd be nice if you helped me.
Damn it.
Way to go!
No problem.
I'll get them a little bit later.
I'm just gonna hit the streets here for a little bit.
Gary, come on, I don't want to do them later.
Let's just do them now.
It'll take 15 minutes.
Honey, I am so exhausted.
I just honestly want to relax for a little bit.
If I could just sit here, let my food digest, and just try to enjoy the quiet for a little bit.
Get some!
Get some!
Get some!
That's what happens.
And we will...
You know, we can clean the dishes tomorrow.
Gary, you know I don't like waking up to a dirty kitchen.
Who cares?
I care!
All right?
I care!
I busted my ass all day cleaning this house and then cooking that meal.
And I worked today.
It would be nice if you said thank you and helped me with the dishes.
Fine.
I'll help you do the damn dishes.
Oh, come on.
You know what?
No.
See?
That's not what I want.
You just said that you want me to help you do the dishes.
I want you to want to do the dishes.
Why would I want to do dishes?
Why?
See, that's my whole point.
Let me see if I'm following this, okay?
Are you telling me that you're upset because I don't have a strong desire to clean dishes?
No.
I'm upset because you don't have a strong desire to offer to do the dishes.
I just did.
After I asked you!
Jesus, Brooke, you're acting crazy again.
Don't you call me crazy.
I am not crazy.
I didn't call you crazy.
You just did.
I didn't call you...
No, I didn't.
I said you're acting crazy.
You know what, Gary?
I asked you to do one thing today, one very simple thing, to bring me 12 lemons and you brought me three.
God damn it.
If I knew that it was gonna be this much trouble,
I would have brought home 24 lemons.
Even 100 lemons.
You know what I wish?
I wish everyone that was at that goddamn table had their own little private bag of lemons.
Honest to God!
Gary, it's not about the lemons.
Well, that's all you're talking about.
I'm just saying it'd be nice if you did things that I asked.
It would be even nicer if you did things without me having to ask you!
Well, I do seem to remember doing something for you this morning without you asking.
Gary, come on.
What?
I'm serious.
Come here.
You know what?
I'm serious.
I really am.
I am, too.
Come on.
You knew I was working today and I made that meal.
And you could have thought to yourself, you know, you could have said,
"Yeah, I think I'm gonna get Brooke some flowers."
You said on our very first date that you don't like flowers, that they're a waste of money.
Every girl likes flowers, Gary.
You said that you don't like flowers.
I'm supposed to take that to mean that you do like flowers?
No.
This is not about...
You're not...
God, you're not getting it.
You're not getting this, Gary, okay?
It's not about the lemons.
It's not about the flowers.
It's not about the dishes.
It's just about...
How many times do I have to drop hints about the ballet?
You know I can't stand...
Brooke, come here.
We've talked about the damn ballet.
I hate the goddamn ballet!
You got a bunch of dudes in tights flopping around for three hours.
It's like a medieval techno show.
It's a nightmare.
I sit there in a sweat.
The whole thing, I do, wondering when the hell's the goddamn nightmare gonna end.
Go to a damn ballet.
It's not about you loving the ballet, Gary.
It's about the person that you love loves the ballet and you wanting to spend time with that person.
Not when they're at the ballet.
Okay.
Forget the ballet!
Forget the ballet!
I will.
We don't go anywhere together.
We just went to Ann Arbor together.
To Ann Arbor.
To the Michigan-Notre Dame game.
You think screaming, drunk kids and leprechauns doing backflips, that's fun.
That's fun for me.
Come on, man.
I did that for you.
What do you...
How do you show up for me?
I'm up on the bus every goddamn day for you!
Come on.
You...
I'm busting my ass to be the best tour guide in the damn city, so I can make enough money to support both of us and hopefully you won't have to work one day.
I want to work.
All I ask, Brooke, is that you show a little bit of appreciation.
That I just get 20 minutes to relax when I come home, instead of being attacked with questions and nagged the whole damn time.
You think that I nag you?
That's all you do!
All you do is nag me!
"The bathroom's a mess." "Your belt doesn't match."
"Hey, Gary, you should probably go work out."
Nothing I ever do is ever good enough!
I just want to be left the hell alone!
Really?
Is that what you want, Gary?
Is that what you want?
Yeah.
That's what you want?
Yeah.
Fine.
Great.
Do whatever the hell you want.
You leave your socks all over this house, dress like a pig, play your stupid-ass video game.
I don't care, I'm done.
What?
I'm done!
I don't deserve this.
I really do not deserve this.
I deserve somebody who gives a shit.
I'm not spending one more second of this life with some inconsiderate prick!
You're a prick!
Addie, it just became so clear tonight how much he takes me for granted.
What happened?
Just the same old shit.
I asked him to do one thing and he didn't do it.
Then he complained that he had to do anything, and I just felt like I had no choice.
No, sweetie, you did have a choice, okay?
And it sounds like you made the right one.
You respected yourself.
But it's just not what I want.
I don't want to break up with him.
I don't.
I just want him to say thank you.
I want him to want to do the dishes.
I just want him to want to take me to the ballet.
I want him to get me 12 lemons!
You know...
I just want him to care enough about this relationship to want to work on it.
Okay, you know what?
I'm putting on my shoes and I'm gonna be there in 15 minutes.
No, Ad.
Don't.
Please, I really don't want to see anybody.
I really don't.
But, look, I'm worried about you, okay?
And I can hear you in there banging around your dishes.
And I don't want you getting out your Clorox and your rubber gloves, and taking this out on the kitchen.
Look, look, look.
Okay.
Tonight just...
It just got a little out of hand, and hopefully he's just gonna realize that he's got some changes to make and he's gonna...
He's gonna come home and apologize.
Okay?
That's what's gonna happen.
I feel like, I don't...
You know, like, you dress however you want to dress.
You know, do whatever you want to do.
I'm done with the relationship.
Whatever.
So, it's just kind of, "You're done with the relationship?"
Well, you're obviously hurt about it.
She got to you.
You're hurt.
I'm not.
It's nothing to be ashamed of.
She hurt you.
Will you look at me?
I'm not heartbroken.
I'm a little shocked.
I'm a little surprised.
Gary, you're devastated.
Now, what's the name of the guy she's doing?
I'm gonna solve your problem.
What's his name?
What are you talking about?
Have you checked her e-mail?
I don't check e-mails.
I don't...
You can get a program that records keystrokes.
It costs, like, 20 bucks.
Very easy to use.
Okay?
You get a password, you check her e-mail.
You find out everything about her.
That's how I found out about the Puerto Rican that Stacy was running around with.
Okay.
You are reading a little too much into this situation.
There is no one she's running around with, okay?
We had a fight over the groceries I brought home.
You're probably right.
She's probably not sleeping with anybody.
No.
Not what it's about.
Okay.
Maybe she's with another guy, maybe not.
She's not.
I don't know.
I'm not Columbo.
Okay?
But what we do know is that she doesn't want to be with you anymore.
I mean, I hate to be shitty about it, and so cut and dry, but let's face it.
She says she doesn't want to be with you, and I believe her.
Now, we gotta figure it out.
And you're gonna need a place to go and lick your wounds while you get your head right over this thing.
I don't need a place to go and lick my wounds.
You're gonna stay with me.
I'm not gonna hear it.
Look it...
I'm not moving out of the place.
Oh, you're not moving out.
No.
I put money in the place.
I put half my money in the place.
You're obviously not the one calling the shots in this case.
Yeah, but I own the place.
With her.
Yeah.
But it's not up to her who gets to keep the goddamn place.
If you find out who she's sleeping with, maybe we could leverage it.
I want you to listen to me.
You listen to me.
I'm gonna leave you a key.
I don't need a key.
Why?
'Cause she's gonna put...
She's gonna move out of the place, Johnny.
Did she say she was moving out?
She will.
She's gonna move out.
Oh, she's...
I'm gonna keep the place.
I'm not moving out of the place.
I'll leave you a key.
Hey, how's it going?
I almost got it.
Yeah.
You know, I was thinking.
You know what you should do, is you should find somebody who looks like Brooke, but even hotter and, you know, bang the shit out of her.
What the hell's wrong with you?
What?
Logs.
Just fix the damn engine.
I am fixing the goddamn engine.
I need your tour logs.
I'm off the clock, okay?
Well, I cannot file the quarterlies until I have your log.
I'm going through a little bit of a life change here, Dennis.
I would really appreciate a little bit of sensitivity, please.
I know they're both French, but that has nothing to do with it.
Because Manet was earlier and...
No.
Monet and Manet are very different things.
I'm sorry, I beg to differ.
Excuse me, sir, can I have her call you back personally?
Yes.
Okay, thank you.
Sorry.
Brooke?
I am so sorry.
What?
Come here.
Oh, honey, your mom called and told me everything.
Oh, Jesus.
Good morning, Marilyn.
Morning.
I'll go water the plants.
I understand you had a long night.
Tell me everything.
"Everything." I couldn't possibly...
Then don't.
My time is pressing.
What I want is for you to take the rest of the day off.
Oh, no.
No, that's not necessary.
Who am I?
Marilyn Dean.
And where are we?
The Marilyn Dean Gallery.
And of whom is that portrait?
That is Marilyn Dean.
Yeah.
You know, your personal life is your personal life.
But you look like shit.
And when you look like shit,
Marilyn Dean looks like shit, and now it is my business.
And when it comes to my business, I don't like anything that's distracting.
So, I want you to take the rest of the day off to be sad and then come back to work tomorrow ready to take care of business.
Got it?
Oh, hey, Brooke.
How are you?
What the hell are you doing?
Well, my whole life, I always wanted my own place with my own pool table.
I finally got my own place, but you would not allow me to have a pool table.
I just kind of figured I'd rectify that today.
And it does feel good.
I'm gonna go ahead and put the four ball in the corner pocket.
Nice.
I'm sorry, can I...
A little room for the shooter, please?
It's hard to shoot with someone standing...
Thank you.
Wow.
Well, I guess he feels threatened that you broke up with him and he's acting out.
Okay, look, Brooke, men are like children.
You know?
And they...
Sweetie, it's a figure of speech.
It's Brooke.
And I love you so much.
And you're my man and you know that.
You're amazing.
I love you.
Listen, and they're gonna test boundaries to see what they can get away with.
I think there's three things that Gary needs to know.
One, this type of behavior is not unnoticed.
Two, it's not acceptable.
And three, you know, you're definitely not gonna tolerate it.
Right?
Yes.
And Brooke, remember, we're always owning our actions, right?
And we're always healthy with it, yes?
Yes.
I don't wanna finish the game.
I got showings, okay?
I gotta buy the cookie spray.
I gotta clean up the dog.
And now I'm really leaving 'cause I don't want to hear that.
Okay?
Thank you for the pool.
Thank you for the snacks.
I'm going to get a cab.
I'll split it with you.
What are you, 12?
Brooke, that is not healthy.
I'm trying to make a point.
And what is that point?
My point's your point.
Your three points.
That it's not unnoticed, that it was not acceptable, and that it would definitely not be tolerated.
Not exactly what I meant.
Unbelievable.
I knew it!
Hey, gang.
Found my shirt on the floor.
Thanks for laying it out.
Gary, are you here for couples bowling?
Yeah.
Well, don't you think you and I should discuss something first?
Like what?
How your 47 average is killing us?
Okay.
Great.
No.
Gary, this is couples bowling.
And since you and I are no longer a couple, because you have chosen not to participate constructively in our relationship, we're now singles.
So, there's not room for two singles on the team.
Why do you look confused?
I don't have any idea what's happening.
I've come to play on the team.
Look, Gary, I just don't think it's a good idea for you and I to be around each other any more than we have to right now.
I completely agree.
Maybe you should go play some pinball.
No, I think you should leave.
Okay.
Brooke, when a man makes a commitment to a team, he honors that commitment.
He doesn't let emotions or personal issues get in the way of victory.
And I've made a commitment to this team.
They don't want you here either, Gary.
Yeah.
Sure, they don't.
They don't.
They're my friends.
But you're not a strong bowler.
That's not the point.
You know what?
Let's just...
Why don't we let them decide?
Gary, don't.
No.
Don't involve them, okay?
That's unnecessary.
What's wrong, Castro?
Castro?
Well, Castro doesn't let people vote as a team.
Okay.
Ask them.
Thank you.
Okay, everyone.
Team vote here.
By a show of hands, just put it up when you make a decision, who here agrees with Brooke and thinks I should leave the bowling team?
Shocker.
Band of Brothers.
You should rent it sometime.
Good luck, everyone.
Riding Miss Gutter Ball to the finals.
Hey, Gary.
Yeah.
I'm gonna need your shirt back.
What?
Well, we're gonna have to replace you, and you know we get docked 10 pins if everyone's not in matching Pin Shakers uniforms.
My shirt says "Gary" on it.
Granted.
But actually, we know a guy named Gary.
And he's not as tall as you, but he's a pretty good bowler.
I'm gonna have to request that I have my wrist guard back then.
I'm sorry.
That's mine.
Just give me the goddamn wrist guard, please.
Thank you.
I hope your wrist snaps.
Wow.
Okay?
You see that?
You know what I mean?
Yeah.
That was awesome.
You just had your ex-boyfriend, who you wish you were still dating, voted off the bowling team.
Well, I had to do that to get him right where I want him.
Where's that?
Shirtless in the parking lot?
Addie, you're not getting this.
Gary loves this bowling team.
He's hurt right now.
He's feeling pretty bad.
He's gonna go out there and he's gonna get drunk.
He's gonna make a complete fool of himself.
And he will be sitting there feeling pretty lonely and pretty pathetic, and then it's just gonna hit him.
What's gonna hit him?
That not only is he out a girlfriend, but his life is just falling apart piece by piece and maybe that life was pretty great.
And maybe I was the glue that was holding it all together.
And if he wants that life back, he's gonna have no choice but to change.
How about this, huh?
I feel like we just found hell.
When did you start coming to knobby joints like this?
I might be the greatest you've ever seen, pal.
I'm conquering new frontiers.
Hello, babe.
Yeah, you've got to put up with the bad music and the $15 drinks, but this place is stacked with top-shelf, young, dumb ass.
All you gotta do is just separate the weaker ones from the herd.
Come on, I'll get you into the VIP.
Can I get a couple drinks from you?
Okay, L.G.
Lupus, I got to be totally...
I got to be honest with you.
I'm not feeling it here.
You're gonna like it in here.
You're gonna love it.
I don't like it out here.
Look, listen to me, will you, please?
How you doing, Buzz?
While you were on the inside locked up for the past two years, the game has changed.
Do you remember when you were an outdoor cat and you used to have to hunt and kill for your food?
Well, you've become an indoor cat.
You've been getting your milk brought to you in a silver bowl, and guess what?
Now, you've been tossed back outside and the alley has changed.
For example, your MTV generation, your technology, your text message, your TiVo.
You name it.
People want their information faster.
People e-mail each other because they want to exchange information, Gar.
They don't want to connect, they want results.
Okay.
You gotta get to the message quicker.
Now, I want you to watch.
It's real simple.
Okay?
How you doing, ladies?
Now, here's what I'd like to do to you.
First, I'd like to get you naked.
And then I'm gonna take some Saran Wrap and I'm gonna wrap you up in it, head to toe.
Then I'm gonna cut out two holes.
One for your mouth, so you can breathe, obviously.
And the other one...
Asshole.
It could be a gorgeous evening for us, babe.
The pink is gorgeous.
Jesus, God.
Come here.
Lupus, listen to me.
I want you to listen to me.
There are our drinks.
You want your drink?
No, I'm fine.
Thank you.
The L.G. thanks you.
Will you listen to me, please?
You're my brother and I love you very much, and maybe you do get laid tonight, but maybe you get arrested.
Arrested for what, babe?
Being awesome?
Come on, babe, listen.
You want to tell your jokes, tell your jokes.
But sooner or later you're gonna get hungry and you're gonna wanna eat.
And jokes might make you feel better, but they don't get you fed.
I'm gonna go take a lap.
What are you doing?
I'm sketching.
And where are you sketching?
In the living room.
No, in my bedroom.
And I didn't say anything to you, Brooke, when you so arrogantly claimed the bed without asking me, but you can't just waltz into my room and turn it into a damn art fair.
Gary, I've only taken up a little bit of space, so...
I don't care if you only took an inch.
There might not be a door here, but this is my domain.
Okay?
I don't go into your bedroom and set up a goddamn sawhorse.
Well, then what the hell is that pool table doing in the dining room?
Because that's a common area.
And that's where this belongs.
Not in my room.
Hey, what are you doing?
It belongs in another common area.
Gary.
People want to come home and they want to relax in their room.
Gary, it is 2:00 in the morning!
Don't you drop my things.
I don't know what to tell you, kid.
This is how I am when I'm single.
My hours start to get pretty strange.
Might be time for you to think about moving out.
Why would I...
No, I'm not moving anywhere.
Gary, just please turn the volume down.
Yeah, but I don't tell you what the hell to do in your room.
You can doodle.
You can dance.
You can bake a goddamn gingerbread house.
I don't give a shit.
But in my room, I want to relax and watch my highlights in complete surround-sound experience.
What the hell are you doing?
You're not even gonna watch it!
Don't tell me what I am or aren't not doing.
Oh, what you are not, not doing?
Go learn some English.
Oh, I'm sorry.
I didn't have a grandfather on the board of some fancy college.
Key word being "was.
" Did he touch the Filipino exchange student?
Did he not touch the exchange student?
I don't know, Brooke.
I wasn't there.
Okay.
No, don't start with the family stuff.
Like your family's so perfect?
Your brother's a pervert!
Don't talk to me about the sexual habits of family members.
What about your sister?
My sister's been through a lot.
Of dick.
There are some problems, Gary, but can we please just leave it...
Problems?
She slept with the entire Arizona Cardinals offensive line.
That's not problems.
That's she's the problem!
She was on vacation!
She was on vacation.
Don't even get me started, by the way, on your brother.
If I have to hear that guy sing just one more time,
I'd hang myself with wax dental floss.
Could the guy just come out of the closet, please?
Richard is not gay.
Okay, lassie, I want you to listen to me and listen good.
I'm not saying he won't get married.
I'm not saying he won't even have kids.
But then one day his wife will come home, and then she'll find him with a guy named Majulio, wearing leather helmets and clubbing each other to Yanni's greatest hits.
Yeah.
Right.
Whatever.
You're an infant.
Yeah, I'm an infant.
Go enjoy your room, Brooke, 'cause I'm gonna enjoy mine!
Okay.
You know what?
I might enjoy some pay-per-view options tonight.
It's gonna be a long one, sweetheart, and I got nothing to do mañana but sleep in.
Boogie nights Ain't no doubt we are here to party
What are you doing?
Boogie nights Come on now, got to get it started
Ricky, you and the Get Along Gang leave or I'm gonna throw you out of here personally, you understand?
Actually, Gary, this is Brooke's bedroom.
So, technically, you don't have jurisdiction here, but I think it'd be really fun if you sang with us.
Come on, Gary.
I think you'll like it.
You got 10 seconds to get out of here or I'm gonna break your damn magic whistle.
You understand what I'm saying to you?
Move this group out of my house, now!
Gary, you can't take a pitch pipe out of a guy's hand when he's in the middle of a very funky groove.
You can get hurt doing something like that.
I'm tapping out, I'm tapping out!
Here we go.
From the bridge.
Party night Get on down with the sound of the music
Boogie nights Do it, do it
What kind of bullshit move was that?
I'm sorry.
What?
What happened?
Oh, don't be coy with me.
You sent that animal over here to attack me when I was hung over and weak.
Oh, no.
Look, all I know is The Tone Rangers, they needed someplace to rehearse, so I very clearly told Richard, "Stay in my room,"
which you explained to me was my space to do with what I want.
Is that how you want to play it?
'Cause I'll play it like that.
I'll play it like Lionel Richie.
All night long, lady.
Oh, yeah.
I'll call some guys from my neck of the woods.
And we're not talking, Brooke, about a couple of queens who know a few grapples.
We're talking about Polacks that don't have a goddamn future.
Right.
That's right!
We can make shit real uncomfortable around here, and that's what we're gonna do.
Please.
Come on.
You know what?
You're just embarrassed because Richard kicked your ass.
Richard did not kick my ass.
What Richard did was attack me when I was half asleep.
Really?
Is that how you see it?
There's a really big gap between getting your ass kicked and having a dancing, singing sprite fool you with trickery and then strike your throat before you know that you're even in a fight.
And I wouldn't expect someone like you to understand that, because all you ever do is make moves from up in your ivy tower.
Wow.
You have officially gone off the reservation.
I'm an adult.
I talk through shit.
He ran out of ideas.
God.
Listen, by the way, there's messages on the voice mail regarding game night, which is obviously not gonna happen, so you might want to call people and tell them that it's canceled.
Why would I cancel game night?
Well, I mean...
If it's our turn to host game, I'm gonna host goddamn game night.
You want to host game night?
I'm fine, Brooke.
I don't have any strangeness over what happened here today.
Okay.
If there's anyone that should feel weird about seeing people, that's you, Tonya Harding.
Me?
I'm gonna honor my commitments.
Great.
Great.
Fine.
Fine.
Let's do that.
Let's do that.
Let's honor the commitment.
Hey, there's no food in there!
So?
Well, people are gonna be here in an hour.
What are they supposed to eat?
You're a big boy.
Figure it out.
Oh, great.
Well, that's what we got.
We have only tap water because, you know, Gary didn't shop.
And we don't have any ice either 'cause he didn't fill the trays.
That's trash.
It's your shot.
What is your name again?
Diane.
Diane.
Did you call?
I called the five.
Well, yeah, but you didn't call the second ball, so that's trash, so it's your shot.
You got to play by the rules.
It's your shot.
Hi.
Hi.
Andrew.
Oh, hi.
Whoa, whoa, whoa!
Hey, hey, hey!
These two Benedict Arnolds aren't welcome in my condo.
Who sent an invite to them?
I'm sorry.
These are very loyal friends and they are always welcome in my condo.
Oh, really?
Why don't we take it to a vote and see who has the numbers this time?
All right.
Show of hands here.
Who thinks that these two traitors should leave and not be a part of game night?
And maybe take their shirts off when they leave.
Raise your hand.
I know I feel that way.
Who else?
Come on, Johnny O, put your hand up, please.
Come on.
Thank you.
You, Miss?
New girl.
Who's the girl?
What's her name?
What's her name?
The girl you're with.
What's her name?
Her name's Diane.
Oh, I'm sorry.
You might want to go ahead and touch some sky.
Thank you.
Come on, Riggleman, please?
What are you doing?
No.
We need the eight to count towards a running tally.
You know that.
Come on.
Show her whose side that you're on.
Put your hand in the air.
You know whose side I'm on.
You know we need eight, though.
Come on.
Put your hand down.
Please don't touch my Ruffles.
Put that one back.
Those are my Ruffles.
Don't eat them, please.
Thank you.
Oh, Gary.
They're mine.
Come on.
Here we go.
All right.
Eyes front.
Ready?
Hold on.
Get the timer going, please.
Ready?
Now I gotta do it.
Go.
Okay.
It's a brick.
Square.
Square.
Box.
Box.
Corner.
Corner.
A dot in the corner.
A house.
Home plate!
Football!
Baseball!
Sports.
A house.
A triangle.
It's algebra.
Okay, it's a house.
It's a house.
It's a house.
Two words.
Banana?
Chimney, chimney, chimney!
A fruit.
House.
Fruit.
Oh, restaurant.
Or...
No, chimney, chimney.
Smoke...
Oh, a house call.
House call!
Oh!
House call!
Yeah, well, I thought it was a house call.
Like a hotel, then it hit me it was a house.
Yeah!
You're terrific.
Absolutely terrific.
All right, beat that.
Okay, guys, listen.
The next one wins, okay?
So let's stay focused.
Let's stay calm.
We can do this.
High fives.
Let's go.
Come on.
Let's go.
Let's get a mind-meld.
Let's try and get a mind-meld, okay?
Here we go.
Let's go.
Mind-meld.
I heard you!
Don't over-think it.
Mind meld.
Ready?
I heard you!
Well, just keep it simple.
Shush.
Ready?
Wait.
Go!
Here we go!
We're mind-melding.
Draw faster.
It doesn't have to be beautiful, just has to be something we can get.
Shoe, shoe...
Shoe!
Shoe, shoe, shoe.
Shoeless Joe Jackson.
Draw something different.
No one's getting it.
Shoe.
What, is that a smaller shoe?
Baby shoe.
Smaller shoe.
Baby shoes.
Shoes.
Baby shoes.
Smaller shoe.
Gumshoe.
Smaller shoes.
Gumshoe?
Gumshoe?
Running Olympics.
Inside the shoe.
Inside a shoe.
A bubble...
Lining.
Stop pointing at the shoe.
We're not...
No one's guessing shoe.
Stop pointing at the shoe and draw something different.
Draw something different.
You...
Goddamn it!
No one's guessing shoe!
You drew a big shoe, then a small shoe, and no one got it.
You gotta draw something different.
Everyone said "shoe" seven times.
It's a sock, asshole.
You call yourself an artist?
Yes!
A three-year-old with a box of crayons could do a better job than this.
I'm sorry, I don't have the great talent of standing on top of a big red bus and pointing out architecture that other great men have built!
I'm the one who should be sorry, Brooke.
I shouldn't sit here and pick on your art.
No.
Because you got the nuts part down, Picasso.
All you have to do is cut off your frigging ear.
That's Van Gogh, you idiot!
And your insults are much more effective when they're accurate.
Don't talk to me about being goddamn accurate!
I can talk to you about anything that I want.
'Cause you couldn't even draw a sock.
You don't do anything right!
You're a lazy...
Everyone said, "Shoe, shoe, shoe!"
At first, I figured that the split was just something temporary, something that you two would work out and get past, but after tonight I think it's pretty clear that you two genuinely do not want to get back together.
There's not a shot in hell.
Gary.
I'm just...
I got you.
As your friend and as your realtor,
I'm not gonna leave here tonight until we decide what to do about this condo, because this living situation is obviously not working out.
Gary?
Well, the only logical thing that I can think of is for her to move out of the condo, and then to pay me some sort of a penalty as compensation for the labor that I did all around the condo.
What?
What?
What?
Pay you compensation for your labor?
We fixed this place up together.
Are you nuts?
Stop calling me nuts, I swear to God.
I fixed the...
You went around with a sponge, and you went in the bathroom and you dotted foofy shit.
That's what you're saying that I did?
There's no...
That was...
That's called aesthetics.
It warmed this place up so it didn't look like an army barracks, which it was about to.
I'll tell you what it's called in his language, depreciated.
That's what it's called.
You don't even know what that means.
Unless the next buyer happens to have your same Zulu-voodoo-land taste.
All right.
Let me tell you something else.
It's gonna cost money to cover up the holes in the wall.
The holes that you drilled in the wall there to hang up whatever that thing is called.
Oh, please.
Gary.
You're gonna have to cost money to fix that.
What I did, Brooke, has concrete value to the condo.
I added concrete...
Well, let's just go on record.
We're dealing with facts here.
I did the tiling in the bathroom.
Have you seen...
I did the new track lighting.
That tile is the shittiest tile job.
I did the plumbing!
The plumbing!
That's realty terms.
Okay.
Let's talk about your plumbing.
This is his plumbing.
We have two temperatures in our bathroom.
We get either scalding hot or we get frostbite.
That's it.
That's all we get.
It's my problem that she doesn't know how to pace a shower?
Now all of a sudden that's my fault.
I get a minute to take a shower.
One minute?
One minute of warmth?
Oh, Jesus.
One minute.
That's it.
That's correct.
Thank God you're not in charge of keeping all the clocks in Chicago on time.
This is basic logic.
You are out of your mind.
You have lost it.
Let me explain this to you in plain chapter and verse.
Cheese and rice, you guys are gonna kill each other.
Now, let's just...
Realistically speaking, neither one of you can afford this mortgage on your own, okay?
And that's a shame, because this building will continue to increase in value.
I get nothing but phone calls about it, all right?
Waiting for a unit to open up.
So, as your realtor, the last thing I would suggest is selling.
But as your friend, I just, I don't see any other solution.
You take your halves, you go your separate ways, and you get on with your lives.
I know that selling is not the easiest thing, but I do think that it's the best.
And to be honest, this is a situation where I would just as soon not take a commission.
That's great.
Thank you.
That's great.
Thank you for that.
I wish I didn't have to, you know, but company policy says I cannot waive that.
But I was just...
You know, I'm saying in theory, you know.
In this situation, 'cause we're friends, I wish I could waive it.
No can do, though.
As soon as you can, I would love to get a set of keys from you guys.
You just drop them off.
Okay.
Great.
There they are.
I'll be bringing by people all week.
You won't even know I'm here.
The good news is, should move quickly.
All right.
Okay to leave you two alone now?
Got to get back to Jen.
Very excited about the win tonight.
Okay.
Addie, if the condo sells, I think I'm gonna lose him.
Yeah, but game night was so light and fun,
I'm really surprised to be hearing this.
Okay.
You know what?
That's not constructive.
Really.
I just...
Yeah, I need a new plan, Addie.
I don't...
I'm just kidding.
It's me.
I'm gonna have to call you back.
Whenever one of my friends is down, we all go on, like, happy patrol.
I was actually having a very serious conversation.
Christopher, do not sing.
If you're happy and you know it Clap your hands
If you're happy and you know it Clap your hands
If you're happy and you know it You're going to smile to...
Pack up your shit and go home.
Okay.
You know what?
This is not his fault.
He was just really trying to cheer me up and it...
Did I or did I not give you the day off to be sad?
Yes.
But I...
Well, today's not that day, and unfortunately for you, I can't afford to look weak.
No, please.
You have warned me so many times and you have yet to fire me.
I think you and I both know that to find and train somebody new, it's gonna cost you time, and it's gonna cost you money, and I don't think you want to spend either one of those.
Now, look, I'm just gonna take a wild guess here, but you don't become Marilyn Dean without knowing how to handle men.
Okay?
Now, just listen to my problem, tell me how to fix it, and then we'll all go back to work.
Okay.
What is this problem so severe that has caused you to blaspheme in the synagogue of Marilyn Dean?
Well, it's Gary.
I broke up with him in hopes that losing me would make him want to change, and that's, you know...
And I've just ended up pushing him, you know, farther and farther away.
That's it?
Yeah.
Honey, this is not surrealism or cubism, it's paint-by-numbers.
Go see Mischa, my personal waxer at the spa.
Ask her for the Telly Savalas.
The Telly Savalas.
Compliments of M. Dean.
Then go show Gary your immaculate canvas and let him see another man eager to paint it.
Got it?
Got it?
Uh-huh.
Ow!
Who loves you, baby?
Wow, impressive.
Three sharp hands landed.
What an amazing display of punching technique.
The crowd jumps.
That punch rocked him.
They sense he's on the verge of hitting the canvas.
The roaring for anticipation of a knockout.
We are witnessing a great fight.
He's displaying incredible rhythm with his hands.
Bulldog terrorizing his opponent.
Down he goes!
Hard punch slams him to the canvas.
One, two, three, four, five, six, seven, eight, nine, ten.
It's over.
Is...
Did...
Is Brooke here?
I don't know.
Brooke?
I'll be right there.
Cool, baby, cool.
So, how do you and Brooke know each other?
Well, how don't we know each other, you know what I mean?
Hi, Paul.
Oh, hey.
Wow, you look great.
Thank you.
Are you ready to go?
Yeah.
All set.
So, it was great meeting you.
Apple martinis.
All right, come on.
That normally does the trick.
Just ignore him.
But just two.
Three, she'll get sloppy.
You'll become a babysitter.
Oh, and fantasy role playing.
She's got a real thing for lifeguards.
Put some zinc oxide on your nose and she'll lose her mind.
It'll all be over with.
Y'all want me to stop running?
I mean, the most challenging part of what I do is between February and April 15th.
That's what we in the biz like to call crunch time.
That sounds fascinating.
Good evening.
Hi.
Can I start you two off with something to drink?
Yeah, you know, we're gonna start with a couple of apple martinis, please.
No, you know what?
I'm gonna...
I'm just gonna start with a water.
Well, you can just bring those, just in case.
What was I saying?
Oh, yeah, yeah, yeah.
So, you know, it's not like it's all work and no play.
You know, I mean, after April 15th, that's what we in the biz like to call party time.
Excuse me.
Oh, I have to get this.
I'm so sorry.
Hello.
Okay, is this when I'm supposed to call?
What?
What do you mean?
What?
Where?
What happened?
Okay, that's great.
Wait.
What?
Oh, all right.
Listen, where...
Just don't move.
Where are you?
I'm sitting in my kitchen.
Sitting?
Okay.
Don't move.
Don't...
I'm gonna be right there, honey.
I'm gonna be right there, okay?
Is everything okay?
Oh, my gosh.
That was my best friend.
She just had an accident and she...
She has this knee thing and she's just very fragile, and I have to go.
What?
I can give you a ride.
No.
No.
That's okay.
I'm gonna grab a cab, so...
I'm so sorry.
I like your dress.
I think he's fascinating.
He's obviously read a lot of books.
Yeah.
Yeah, I bet he has.
He reads a lot of books because nobody wants to talk to him.
He's a friend of Andrew's who's always been polite.
It's the best I could do on such short notice, okay?
Well, you know what?
Polite is not gonna do it.
We've got to find somebody who is really gonna make Gary jealous.
Can I just say something?
You sound a little jealous, Gary.
Why would I be jealous of some guy with computer skills?
Let's say he doesn't have computer skills, but he's got a big old elephant hog on him?
Would that bother you or would you be okay with that?
Not nearly as much as the way that your mind works.
My mind works great.
So, what's this bullshit I hear about you selling the condo?
Selling that condo is ludicrous.
I was waiting for when I was gonna get the how-Gary-always- screws-his-life-up speech again.
This must be the right time.
Look, you tell me, you just tell me, tell me.
Is it happening now?
Yeah.
Okay.
Tell me how losing that asset is gonna get us on the river?
Go ahead, just tell me.
Tell me.
Somebody tell me.
What is this?
What is this?
What is it?
What is it?
Hey!
Don't patronize me.
Helicopters.
Helicopters.
Exactly!
How does losing the asset give us helicopters?
Dennis, I'm being totally serious with you.
I don't need this shit right now.
Hey, you want to cry, cry to Mom.
Nobody's crying.
I'm not crying.
I just don't feel like hearing it.
There's no feelings here.
This is about money and business.
Fine, you broke up.
You broke up.
Fine.
You know, sad.
Sad is, instead of putting $1,000 into your mortgage every month, you waste it on rent.
That's what sad is.
Oh, you're broke up.
You're confused, brokenhearted.
Heartbreak is not having that money as part of your net worth and then not saving the money, so that after taxes you can invest!
You know, you're confused.
Are you finished?
Look, I need the damn tour logs.
Yeah.
Well, I really, really appreciate the heart to heart.
It was a great talk, Dennis.
Thank you.
Oh, well, you're behind three months.
You're still behind three months.
And those logs are imperative to insuring that our books are straight!
I'll tell you what those logs are.
Those logs are bullshit is what they are!
You got the receipts.
Tally the goddamn things yourself!
I do, I do!
And I don't appreciate it, because it cuts into my time with my family.
I could be spending that time with my family instead of doing your books.
I already do the taxes.
I do the billing.
I do the hiring, the firing.
I do the maintenance.
Come on, what do you do?
What is it that you do?
You do the tours!
I am the talent, Dennis!
They sign up a month in advance to see me.
They'll wait in line for the next bus to see me!
All right?
So don't drain me with all this bullshit about the goddamn tour logs!
How big's your TV?
Oh, shut up!
How big's your TV, 'cause I wanna know if you can see what's happening.
Oh, wow.
You beat a 12-year-old.
I don't care if you're 12 years old.
You have more time in the day to play.
I live in the real world, my man, with bills and responsibilities.
That's right.
You can't have a handle called Mad Dog Killer if you complain every time...
Brooke?
Hi, Mike.
Hi.
Come on in.
Hold on, Mom.
I'm coming.
Is your mom in the room with you?
'Cause I hope she can't see what's happening.
I hope she can't see what's happening.
I'm gonna be just a few more seconds.
So, just sit down and relax.
Oh, yeah, no problem.
I'm sorry?
Yeah, why'd you do that?
You take the fun out of beating you, because you have an excuse to lose.
Get a life, dude.
Do you think it's possible that your mom won't love you anymore if she sees how bad you're losing in the game.
Shut up!
Okay.
All right.
That's great.
You're gonna stay man-to-man with me.
What happens when I make a play?
Making plays, making plays!
Making plays!
Well, you know, that's how my people like to handle their business.
While your guys are out partying, mine are running routes.
Try to make a difference.
Mike?
I'm ready to go.
Oh, hey, do you mind if we finish the game?
We got a real nail-biter going here.
Yeah, sure.
Of course.
Great.
Awesome, all right?
Touchdown.
Oh, God, is that pretty.
God, is that pretty.
Yeah, I'm a gentleman.
I like to be humble.
I'm old school.
I don't like to talk a lot.
But at the same time, am I talented?
Tell me how you felt about what just happened there.
That's him going deep.
That's him going...
Work ethic.
Work ethic.
I could play this game forever.
Oh, I could, too.
I love it, yeah.
I love it, don't you?
I mean, it's the kind of thing where literally
I play the game and it's like, four hours go by.
Fate has me highly skilled and loaded with talent.
Oh...
'Cause I think I'm good enough to figure out how to beat myself.
You push yourself.
You push yourself trying to achieve the impossible, because you know that when that moment comes that everything you've done up to that moment has prepared you for victory!
I can't take credit for it, Mike.
I got to thank these little digital guys with the big hearts.
Does it feel good to be a champion?
Yeah.
Yeah, it feels good to be a champion.
Good game.
Hey, Brooke, are you ready to go now?
Oh, yeah, yeah.
Sure.
Great.
Hey, Gary, thanks a lot, man.
It was great to meet you.
Absolutely, man.
Come on, Mike.
I know a great little martini bar.
Yo.
Hey, man, saddle up.
It's time to rope in some talent.
What's up?
What do you got?
My place.
Tonight.
Poker.
Call some girls up.
Your roommate is awesome.
Mmm.
Yeah, he's something.
So, where did you go to law school?
Oh, Northwestern.
God, Gary's hilarious.
Yeah, he's okay.
Okay?
I mean, the guy's all time.
But he's gonna take Chicago tourism by air, land and sea.
And he asked me to join his new bowling team.
I mean, how cool is that?
Mmm-hmm.
You know what?
I can't do this.
I'm so sorry.
Excuse me, would you please pull over?
Can you pull over, please?
Hey, wait.
Tell Gary to call me.
Welcome, everyone, to the first annual Texas Hold 'em No-Limit Strip Poker Tournament.
Now, per the e-mail that Lupus sent, we each have eight articles of clothing.
Now, if you want to bet, you take off an article of clothing, you put it in the center.
If you win, you take back the clothes, you put back on what you bet.
The extras that other people bet will stay in front of you, much the same as chips would.
You can go all in at any point, but as I outlined, you must take off all your clothes to do so.
The game shall last an hour, maybe two, at which point we will begin the dance portion of the evening.
Let's get going here.
I need to see the blinds.
Small blind.
Big blind.
The blinds are one and one.
Come on, ladies.
All right.
Oh, yeah.
Let's get going here.
Shuffle up and deal.
All right.
I mean, just because they were playing video games, that doesn't mean it didn't bother him, right?
Honestly, Brooke, I wish I could tell you, but I wasn't there.
All right, Sally, get the soap out of your mouth.
We're gonna save that for when you're 12.
Mike was really, really good-looking.
I mean, he's a little bit of a goof, but Gary doesn't know that.
I mean, for all he knows, a sophisticated, really good-looking guy took me out on a date tonight.
I could be in bed with this guy right now for all he knows.
You know?
I'm telling you, if you saw the look on his face,
Mike got to him.
Hello.
Hey, it's Riggleman.
Great news.
So, how does this work?
I'll bring the car around front and you wrap them up to go?
Oh, no, no.
We take care of everything.
We deliver it.
We hang it.
We check the light and the sun exposure.
Oh.
Perfect.
Yeah.
Listen, I don't want to be too forward, but would you like to have some dinner with me sometime?
I'm sorry.
I have a boyfriend.
Of course.
So...
Well, he's a lucky man.
Oh, thank you.
I guess I will just have to keep it to home deliveries and gallery purchases.
Thank you, though.
See you.
Have a good day, Brooke.
You, too.
Okay, are you out of your mind?
Gary's throwing Greek orgies in your living room and you're telling hot rich guys you have a boyfriend?
Are you nuts?
Hey, look.
I'm not exactly innocent here.
Brooke, as an outsider with some perspective, I really think you...
Christopher, stop.
Stop it.
I don't want to hear it.
This has already gotten way out of hand.
I know what I have to do now, all right?
I know what I have to do.
Hi.
Hi.
Did you get my note?
Yeah.
Two weeks.
Yep.
I brought some boxes from work, so, you know, if you need any just help yourself.
Great.
Thanks.
Oh.
Listen, a while ago I got these tickets for the Old 97's tonight, and I completely forgot about it, so I...
You know, if you want to go.
Well, how many tickets did you get?
I got two.
How much do you want for them?
Oh, no, I'm going.
I'm going.
So, then it would just be the two of us?
Well, yes, and 2,000 other people.
I mean, it's not a big deal, but, you know, look, you know, I was going to invite Addie, but I just figured I'd gotten them for you, so...
Sure.
Why not?
Are you sure?
I mean, if you don't want them,
I can definitely give them to somebody.
No.
No, I'll be there.
That sounds...
It sounds great.
Okay.
All right.
It's at the Riv.
So, I'll just leave your ticket at Will Call.
Good?
Okay.
Okay.
Yeah, so, there.
I'll just leave that for him.
Okay, great.
Okay, so.
Gary Grobowski?
Grobowski, yeah.
He should be here in a minute.
He's really...
He's oddly tall, so.
Oh, okay.
Great.
You won't miss him.
Thanks.
All right, have a good night.
Hi.
Can I get a beer, please?
Sure.
Actually, make that two beers.
It's gonna be $8.
Excuse me.
Sorry.
Hello, everybody!
Good evening, Chicago.
We're the Old 97's.
Brooke?
Are you up?
Yeah.
Are you okay?
I'm fine.
Are you sure?
What's up?
What do you want?
I just want to say I'm sorry that I missed the concert, and let me know what that ticket cost, I'll pay you back for it.
Just leave me alone, Gary.
I planned on going to the concert.
It's just, I stopped by Johnny O's and we...
It doesn't fucking matter, okay?
Would you just leave my room and shut the door?
Jesus.
Please.
I didn't really know that the concert mattered all that much to you.
Exactly.
Hold on a second here.
Let me talk for a second.
Gary...
Brooke.
You broke up with me.
Then you have guys coming over here for dates, and all of a sudden you ask me to go to some concert.
I mean, I just figured that, you know.
Gary.
I just...
I don't know how we got here.
Our entire relationship
I've gone above and beyond for you, for us.
And I mean, I've cooked.
I've picked your shit up off the floor.
I've laid your clothes out for you like you were a four-year-old.
I support you.
I supported you, your work.
If we ever had dinner or anything, I make the plans.
I take care of everything and I just don't feel like you appreciate any of it.
I don't feel you appreciate me.
And all I want is to...
Is for you to just show me that you care.
Why didn't you just say that to me?
Gary, I've tried.
I've tried.
Yeah, but never like that.
You might've said some things that you meant to imply that, Brooke, but I'm not a mind reader.
I doubt it would matter.
You are who you are.
Just leave me alone, okay?
Right now.
Just shut my door.
Listen.
All right, Gary, just, please.
Just leave the room.
Listen to me.
Gary, just...
I don't want to be near you right now.
Listen to me.
I just want to...
Please, just shut the door.
Please.
I know.
Look, I know you feel bad, but, you know, what are you gonna do?
I mean, what does she expect, for me to want to go with the girl who dumped me?
I don't know.
She probably just wanted you, you know, to show her the respect of not standing her up or some shit, who knows?
Well, damn it.
I should have just said no in the first place.
I don't know why I called...
You know what?
It's her fault she got hurt.
You shouldn't even feel bad about it.
She should have expected it from you.
You're a fun guy, okay?
Everybody likes you.
You're the quickest guy I know.
Anytime we go out, I have a blast.
All right?
But, you know, everybody who knows you knows you're gonna do what you want to do.
And if it's not what the other person wants to do, well, that's their problem.
That's bullshit.
It's not bullshit.
There's plenty of times I do shit that I don't want to do.
That's ridiculous.
No.
Like when?
That's bullshit to say about me.
When have we ever done something you didn't want to do?
You know, I don't know, off the top of my head.
I don't keep score...
When's the last time we went to a Sox game?
The Sox.
Not when they're playing the Cubs, either.
We always do what you want to do and she always did what you want to do.
It's who you are.
Everybody thinks that you're their friend, okay?
But the fact of the matter is that there's not one person that I know that you trust enough to let close enough that they could hurt you.
And her big problem is that you really liked her.
I mean, she is the one girl you really liked.
And no matter what she did and how hard she tried, you were never gonna let your guard down.
That poor girl never stood a chance.
Marilyn?
Marilyn?
Yeah.
I'm sorry.
I just...
Oh, just get in here.
Oh, okay.
I'm sorry, excuse me.
Marilyn, I just...
I just wanted to let you know that today is gonna be my last day.
I'm gonna be traveling for a bit.
Here's a blank check.
Write down a number, I don't want to know what it is, and go back to work.
No, no.
It's not about that.
I can't accept that.
Brooke.
Travis, get your gorgeous tuckus out of here.
If you make it to Rome, search out an establishment called the Padre Negro.
Ask for a strapping young fellow named Alberto.
Compliments of M. Dean.
Well, thank you.
I appreciate that.
Yeah.
And, honey, take as long as you want, because when you're done, your job will be right here waiting for you.
And if you discover a path that doesn't lead back here...
Well, I hope you'll text.
I will.
And, like I said, the apartment's a mess, but I'm moving, so...
It's okay.
Relax about the place.
I don't care.
Okay.
This'll just take a second.
Okay.
Hello?
Hey.
I'm in here.
Don't say anything.
I...
How're you doing?
Could I talk to you in private for a second?
You know what?
This is really not a good time, and obviously you have something happening here, so we'll just be in...
No, no, I don't have anything going on.
This is actually for you.
I'm just gonna wait outside.
No, no.
Wait.
No, no.
Really.
It's okay.
I really can't do this right now.
Brooke, this whole thing has been really tough on me and I've tried to act like it hasn't been that tough on me, but the first Sunday after me and you broke up, it all kind of really hit me.
And I think it partially hit me because Sunday was sort of always our day that we would do stuff together.
But I didn't have any idea you still cared so much.
And, you know, when I saw you crying the other night, that was honestly the worst moment of my life.
Gary.
Let me just try to say some of these things here.
It's just...
Look,
I know that I've caused you a lot of pain.
And the funny thing is, all I really want to do is make you happy.
I just want to make you smile.
Now, I've had a lot of time to think about some of the things that went on, and I know, Brooke, that I don't always do the right thing or always say the right things,
but I am willing to try to do things differently.
And I'd be happy to go take a dance class.
Well, I would.
Honestly.
I would like to go do that.
Or go travel.
I mean, I'd even be willing to go to the ballet.
Although I would much rather do the dance class or take a trip somewhere.
But I realize that's not the point.
I realize that the point isn't that at all, because it's not really about doing things that you love to do always, but it is about doing things with the person that you love.
And I love you.
Gary.
Just give me one second here.
I've missed you so much.
I promise you, Brooke,
I will do whatever it is that I have to do to never hurt you again.
I love you and I'm sorry.
Okay, that's it.
That's all I...
Oh, God.
That's all I wanted to say, so you can go ahead now with anything that you're feeling to say.
I don't know what to say.
Just say whatever you feel inside.
I don't feel the same way.
I don't.
I just...
I don't know.
Oh, God.
I just, I think...
I don't know, but I don't think I have anything left to give.
I'm sorry.
I was hoping for...
It doesn't matter.
Oh, this is now beyond awkward.
There's some new guy standing out in the hallway and I think I'm gonna go.
Okay.
Thank you.
I made a dinner, and I don't know if it's any good or not, but you're welcome to have it.
Okay.
Gary, that's really...
That's not what you think that it is.
It's okay.
I'm gonna go take a walk.
I'm sorry about that.
No.
I'm sorry I imposed.
No, that's fine.
Please.
So, what do you think?
I think you're right.
I think it's great.
Good.
Okay.
Okay.
So,
I will have that wrapped up.
Packed up, sorry, and delivered.
Thank you for taking the time to show it to me, okay?
Sure.
Yeah.
I'm gonna run.
Okay, I'll walk you out.
No, no, no.
I can...
It's okay.
So, the thing that I was most afraid of happening happened and I don't regret it at all, because now she knows how I feel.
Do you know what I mean?
Yeah.
I think, what you got to do now is really think hard, because you have to find somebody
that can't be traced back to either of us to visit this guy.
What are you talking about?
I don't...
The guy who came with her.
I don't need anything to happen to the guy.
But if they could trace him back to either one of us...
It's not about him.
I don't care about that.
...it's a problem.
The guy, he's not a...
They're not dumb.
Cops are smart, trust me.
Okay, but he's not a problem to me.
Right.
Listen to me.
Promise me that you're not gonna do anything.
I got you.
It's better if nobody...
You don't know anything.
What are you talking about?
I'll take care of it.
I don't want you to take care of anything.
John, do me a favor.
I'm being serious with you.
I know, I know.
Smart.
You're smart.
No, I'm not.
I'm being honest with you.
I don't want anything to happen to him.
Me, either.
Promise me you're not gonna have anyone do anything to this guy.
But you've gotta tell me exactly what you're gonna tell them, if the cops come to you.
Because if we tell a different story...
Nothing.
Promise me one thing.
We don't care...
John, I'm gonna go home.
I can't do this.
I'm exhausted.
Right, go home.
Just make sure your neighbors know you're going home.
Do me a favor.
They got phone records.
Make a couple phone calls tonight.
Especially around 10:00.
Okay.
Please don't do anything.
All right.
I don't mean it like...
I mean, honestly.
No, no, I got it.
For all you know, nothing's happening.
I don't want anything to happen.
Right.
Say it louder.
What are you doing here so early?
Hey.
Everything okay with you and...
Yeah, everything's gonna be great.
I just wanna get my day started, but I just wanted to say that
I'm sorry it took so long for me to...
I love you, Dennis.
It's all right.
It's okay.
I'm sorry.
I'm gonna go do the stuff.
So, that's it for all my stuff.
If you want, you could give me your key and I'll drop it off at Riggleman's.
All right.
Thanks.
Gary.
You know, there's a thousand things I...
I would have done differently.
Me, too.
Sort of, actually, when I see this space, I realize that if we didn't have such a big coffee table and that oversized couch
a pool table would have fit nicely.
Yeah.
Although the oversized couch did come in very useful the last couple of weeks, so...
Yes, it...
I guess.
Have a good trip.
Thanks.
Chicago is called the Second City because after the Great Chicago Fire of 1871,
Chicago was rebuilt on its ruins.
The city came back even bigger and stronger than it originally was.
So it's not really an insult, it's more of a badge of honor to be called...
The Second City!
Okay.
People, you might be able to get away with that reaction at work, but you are on vacation here.
If you can't blow it out here, then where the hell can you blow it out?
Ladies and gentlemen, show me that you mean it.
Do not make me ask you twice.
Are you ready to see Chicago?
Yes!
I said, are you ready to see Chicago?
Yes!
Are you ready to see Chicago?
Shondra, put this babe in the air.
Let's go!
There is a bar downstairs.
Please enjoy yourself.
I know it's early in the morning, but it is Chicago in the summer.
Who are we kidding?
It's fine.
Go get hopped up, make some bad decisions.
My jokes get better.
The buildings look bigger.
It's not so important that everything is finished.
It's important that everything is right.
Well, what time's the presentation?
All right, I'll pick up the rest of the stuff and I'll see you at 6:45.
Great.
Bye.
Brooke!
Hi.
Hi.
Wow.
It's good to see you.
It's good to see you.
I'd give you a hug, but my hands are kind of full with all the bags here.
How've you been?
I've been really good.
How have you been?
I've been good.
Yeah.
You look great.
Thank you.
The hair's a little different.
Looks nice.
Yeah?
Oh, yeah.
You've lost some weight.
Well, it's very deceiving, actually.
I've managed to become thin without having any real muscle on me whatsoever.
Very tough thing to accomplish, by the way.
I'm proud of myself.
Well, you look terrific.
Thanks.
I heard your trip went really well.
It did.
It went really well.
Oh, good.
It was fun.
It was amazing.
I saw so many amazing places.
It was just...
But, you know, you do realize how much you love home.
It's good to have you back.
Yeah.
It's good to be back.
And the boat.
Congratulations on the boat.
Thanks.
I'm waiting for it to get warm, and I'm gonna come by and take a ride.
Well, anytime you want.
It'll be on the house.
Come on by.
Well, I will, then.
I hope you do.
Definitely.
Well, I got to...
I'm going to a meeting, so...
I got to drop these bags off anyway, but it's really good to see you, Brooke.
Really good to see you.
Shouldn't...
Sorry.
I'm sorry.
I'm just saying we shouldn't wait so long the next time before we...
Yeah.
...catch up.
We have a lot more to talk about.
Yeah.
So.
Be good.
Okay.
Bye.
Bye.
Come on, come on, come on.
All right, here we go.
Take a seat, buddy!
Come on.
It was a good play.
Are you gonna be like this all day?
I don't know.
Is it gonna be like this all day?
I don't know.
It's up to you.
I have no room to sit.
I got no room to sit.
I'm sitting next to a guy who's sitting like he's at home on the toilet with his legs spread.
Please don't crowd people.
Relax, please.
Look at me.
I am relaxed.
Look how I'm sitting.
Why are you sitting like that?
Because...
What do you think?
Why'd you wake me up for this shit?
Because I'm trying to relax and have a nice day.
Sweating in the sun like a Tijuana whore.
Ice-cold soda!
Get your soda here!
On the right.
Coming down there.
Pass that on down there.
Hot dog guy, can I get six hot dogs down here, please?
Right away.
And make it right, please.
You know, with the mustard and the ketchup and the relish.
Don't make me hit you up for more.
I thought we were going to Wiener Circle after this.
We will.
Then why are you getting hot dogs?
Pass this down, please.
You can keep the change.
Do you want one of the hot dogs?
You can have a hot...
You want a hot dog?
Do you want a hot dog, miss?
No.
Thank you.
You can have one.
That's okay.
Go ahead.
You can have a hot dog.
No, I don't want one.
Excuse me, sir?
Would you mind passing the lady one of the hot dogs?
I'm good, thanks.
You don't have to share.
You can have your own.
Thanks.
That's really nice of you.
Just have one, please.
Okay, give me a hot dog.
Somebody give her a hot dog.
I got...
The big guy can't eat all of them.
Have one.
Have you ever had one before?
A hot dog?
At the ballpark?
I have.
I believe I have.
Okay, good.
Thank you.
Well, enjoy this one.
Thanks.
Do you like mustard?
No, I'm okay.
It's much better with a topping.
Here.
I'm just kidding, I'll give you two.
Cheers!
Thanks.
We'll share it.
It's a good dog.
I like the hot dog.
I know.
That's nice.
You have a problem with me eating a hot dog, guy?
I'm trying to watch the game and have a hot dog.
I'll smack him in his head.
No, just leave him alone.
You want to go get a drink?
No.
I'm with somebody, sorry.
Who?
The guy with the tucked-in shirt and the visor?
What, is that like a brother?
The guy was not your brother, then.
Who is this guy?
He's not my brother.
Who's this...
I'm getting mad now.
I'm jealous.
Who is this guy?
Who are you?
I don't know.
I'm kidding with you.
Who's the guy with the tucked-in stuff?
Is that a boyfriend?
It's...
I'm going.
Do you think you'll marry him?
What?
'Cause I know you've thought about it.
The first time you laid eyes on him, you probably thought,
"I wonder if I could marry this guy in plaid shorts who tucks his shirt in.
No way.' '
Then when you kissed him, you said, "I can't believe it.
"I had a lot to drink tonight.
I'm kissing the tucked-in guy.' '
My point is, if you're not gonna marry him...
Yeah.
...and if it's not forever, then you really don't have anything to lose in taking me up on my offer.
Well, I'm gonna go.
Okay.
Me, too.
Okay.
To where?
On an ice-breaking first date?
Well, no, I don't think...
Listen.
If you want to stay off the market while you're with
I'm-not-the-one- but-I'm-comfortable, then you can do that.
But for all you know, I just offered you a get-out-of-bored-love- for-free card with no strings attached.
God, you're crazy.
No, I'm not crazy.
And a lot of times people go, "Oh, that's crazy,"
and then they go, "It's genius.' '
That's what happened when the person invented fire.
They burned that witch.
And guess what, then they got warm and they ate good stuff.
Now, where are we headed to?
Let's not make this weird, 'cause I'm not good on dates.
No.
You know what?
I'm better just to kind of hang out and, if we don't have fun,
I might go my separate way.
Okay.
I'm not committing to anything.
I'll go hang out with you for a little bit.
That's not gonna happen.
But I can't say for sure.
All right, all right, everybody.
Welcome to Three Brothers Bus Tours.
I'm brother number two.
It's good to have you here.
That's right, there's plenty of seats here up front.
I promise I won't bite.
I'm not a biter.
I'm psyched to have you here.
Okay, a couple quick ground rules.
Please don't jump off the bus.
Weird.
Not fun for anybody.
Also, no throwing objects at pedestrians, unless, of course, they deserve it.
Okay?
We are not at work today.
We are on vacation today.
And if you can't blow it out here on the big funny bus, where the hell can you?
I do split the tips with my driver, Shondra.
We don't want her back out turning tricks.
That was a weird time for everyone.
Seriously.
Honest to God.
And I was a customer.
Long time ago.
Come on, everybody, let's get loose!
I'm gonna ask you once.
Show me that you mean it.
Don't make me ask you twice.
Are you ready to see Chicago?
Are you ready to see Chicago?
That's what I'm talking about.
Shondra, put this baby in the air.
Let's get the blood flowing.
Let's get everyone up and let's loosen it up.
Coming up here, you're gonna notice one of the only buildings to survive the fire of 1871.
That is the original Chicago Water Tower and Pumping Station.
Happy Holidays.
Marilyn Dean Gallery.
The artist was inspired by the neoclassical movement.
No, she doesn't.
But wanted to reflect it with an abstract bent.
Okay, bye-bye.
And how much is it?
$35,000.
Happy Holidays.
Marilyn Dean Gallery.
Hold, please.
Will you excuse me for a moment?
Sure.
Go ahead.
Christopher?
Yes, sweetie.
Hi, honey.
Hi.
Christmas was months ago.
Don't remind me.
I miss it so much.
Yeah, I know.
But today is not a holiday.
I know for a fact that people like my spirit on the phone and they dig the energy that I give them.
Okay.
I'm just saying, I don't think Marilyn Dean will "dig" the energy.
Oh, no.
She's the one that told me to be creative.
So...
I know.
It's just...
Okay.
What is the next holiday coming?
The Fourth of July, is that what's next?
Well, if you want to get technical, there's Memorial Day, there's Flag Day.
Some people recognize Father's Day as a holiday.
I don't.
I get it.
I get it.
Well, on those days you can say, "Happy Holidays.' '
Every other day, "Good morning, good afternoon,
"good evening, Marilyn Dean Gallery.' ' Okay?
Okay.
I'm so sorry about that.
Oh, no.
So, now this is a new piece by Zakrzewska.
What do you think of this?
Can I be honest with you?
Please.
Other than taking an art history class in college, which I pretty much slept through, I don't have the first clue about art or how to go about buying it.
I mean, like that painting.
I mean, I don't see the point in buying something that I could have done myself.
Yeah.
I completely agree with you.
You know, an art teacher of mine once said,
"Never buy a piece of art that you don't have to have.' '
You know, don't worry about who the artist is or how much it's worth.
I mean, you have to live with it every day.
You have to walk by it every day.
You know, you have to really love it.
You have to really appreciate it.
It's kind of like picking a mate.
Hey, honey!
Hi.
How's it going?
It's good.
Oh, wow.
You got a lot happening.
I know.
Very exciting.
I am starving.
Oh, careful.
That's really...
That's very hot.
Oh, that's hot, hot, hot.
Yep.
Jesus.
Hey, honey, you've got to really...
You should get ready, okay?
Oh, you look great.
Thank you.
Got a lot of nice stuff.
Got a pizza.
All kinds of stuff.
Terrific.
I just need you to decide what to...
You know, I did everything.
Gary?
Yeah?
Oh, come on!
Really?
You got three lemons.
What my baby wants, my baby gets.
You know that.
Yeah, but I wanted 12.
Baby wanted 12.
Why would you want 12 lemons?
Because I'm making a 12-lemon centerpiece.
So, no one's actually even eating them?
They're just show lemons?
Yeah.
They're just show lemons.
Shown in the center of the table.
I'm glad you find that amusing, but I cannot fill a vase with only three lemons.
Well, can't you just use, like, maybe a drinking glass?
I'm not gonna use a drinking...
We could have a smaller version of a centerpiece.
I'm not gonna use a drinking glass for our centerpiece.
You know what?
I've got an idea.
Why don't we go ahead and scratch the centerpiece idea altogether, because the chicken that burnt my mouth could maybe use a little bit of lemon on top of it.
Guess what?
Now we've made a better meal versus something visually nice to look at.
What are you do...
What's happening here?
What are you doing?
What are you doing?
Oh, I had such a long day on the bus.
I need a little bit of down time.
My feet are killing me.
Gary, come on, my feet are killing me, too.
I'm exhausted.
I worked all day.
Went to the market.
I cleaned this entire condo and then I've been cooking for the last three hours.
Come on.
Help set the table.
Sweetheart.
What?
You've done such a great job already.
Don't you want to finish it yourself and have that personal power of that accomplishment?
Set the table.
Listen to me.
Do you think that when Michelangelo, right, was painting the Sixteenth Chapel, that he said,
"Hey, guys, you know, I did pretty good on the first 15 chapels,
"but why don't you help me design this one?
"And maybe you could help me...
Give me a brush
"and you guys can grab brushes, and we can all make a great chapel."
No, he didn't.
And you wanna know what the results were?
A masterpiece.
Okay.
It's the Sistine Chapel, not the Sixteenth, and I bet when Michelangelo asked for 12 brushes, they didn't bring him three.
Yeah.
Okay, all the talking is really starting to drain me, and now I'm gonna have to watch the highlights later to see what I missed here.
Honey, look, Gary, just...
Down time's important.
Gary, please just take a shower, okay?
Down time's important.
'Cause this is what I don't want to have happen.
I don't want the doorbell to ring.
I'm then forced to answer the door, entertain people, and I'm still cooking dinner.
Yeah.
Okay?
You're absolutely right.
Let's do that.
The second that this inning's over...
Gary.
There's one out all ready.
They're gonna be here in 20 minutes.
Baby, have you ever seen a shower of mine take more than four minutes?
Yes, I have.
Come on.
Oh, great!
They're here.
Okay.
Table's not set.
Dinner's not ready.
Would you please just let my parents in?
I gotta jump in the shower.
What?
I gotta go.
Gary.
Gary.
Well, seeing how our families haven't had many opportunities to get to know one another, we figured, what better way than to break some bread?
So, everyone, thank you for coming and enjoy the meal.
Cheers.
Cheers, honey.
Mrs. Grobowski.
Nice to meet you.
Thank you.
Cheer with the sons.
Sweetheart, cheers to you.
Darling, I see that you put those Feng Shui books that I sent to you to good use.
This place is so well balanced.
Thanks, Mom.
Yeah, the energy in this place is just amazing.
Yes.
Well, the energy in the condo might be a little more amazing if we had a pool table.
Gary, we've already discussed that.
We're gonna get a pool table when we get a bigger place.
The place is plenty big now, if you wanted a pool table because...
Gary.
Yeah.
You could take the dining room table, go ahead and move her in the living room.
Really?
Plenty of room.
And put a dining room table in the living room?
Okay.
How do you...
I mean, what do you do with a dining room table?
Eat on it.
We'd have no furniture in the living...
Where's the furniture go?
All I'm saying is, it would be nice to be able to shoot some pool.
Well, this isn't a dorm.
Look, baby, I completely understand.
There's halls and stuff.
I mean, you can go...
We will wait and get a pool table when we have a bigger place.
Thank you.
The food is outstanding.
It is delicious food.
It's outstanding.
Yeah, it really is nice.
Okay, everybody.
Time for the joke of the day.
Knock, knock.
Dad.
Dad, come on.
Who's there?
Norma Lee.
Norma Lee, who?
Normally, I don't go around knocking on doors, but would you like to buy an encyclopedia?
I got a joke.
I got a joke.
How's it going?
I got a joke for you.
What do you get when you cross a gay Eskimo and a black guy?
All right, look, I think we've had enough with the jokes for tonight.
Thank you, though.
Let's just talk with each other.
All right.
I saw that Three Brothers article in the Trib this week.
Sounds like you guys are up to some pretty exciting stuff.
Basically, our big goal is to try to take Chicago tourism by air, land and sea.
We're still in the ground phase with the buses.
But as soon as we get our infantry established, then we'll take it to the squids.
Yeah.
Boats.
Boats.
Oh, boats.
As soon as we control the waterway, then we'll bring in air supports and then we'll pretty much control everything.
You know, Dennis, the way your face lights up when you describe your ambitions, it's really inspiring.
Oh, thanks.
Because I understand how you feel that passion.
And sharing it with other people, I think that's what life's about.
I don't feel that about boats and squibs...
Squids?
Squids.
Sorry.
Yeah.
But I do feel it about singing.
With my a cappella group, The Tone Rangers.
Although it's not as aggressive as your dream, it's really more of a brotherhood.
It's like a musical team.
It's like a symphony of guys.
Guy symphony.
And it's very hard to describe the true magic of a group of guys singing in perfect harmony.
It's transcendent.
But it's still very real.
I guess the best way to put it in words is just...
Even that doesn't do it.
That doesn't do it because that's just one person.
And what I'm talking about is the pulse of the collective.
Oh, heck.
Let me just show you how it's done.
Dad, how about a little percussion?
Tap-tap-tappy.
Tap-tap-tappy.
And, Mom, high-hat.
Good, Mom.
Excellent.
And Gary!
On the kick drum!
Come, come!
On the kick drum!
Come, come!
That's Gary!
Come, come with the kick drum.
Come!
Come, come with the kick drum.
Gary, on the kick drum.
Come, come.
That's Gary on the kick drum.
Go!
And Gary.
In the house.
Come, come.
I'm not with you.
Come, come.
With the kick drum.
Come, come.
I'm just not really the kick drum kind of guy.
I'd rather be just a listener and enjoy all the banging that he's doing and the...
You know, Gary, that's your prerogative.
That's your right, to listen.
Meantime, I've gotta talk to Brooke about something.
It's called the bass line.
Excuse me.
Okay.
Good, Carol.
Good, Brooke.
Yes, Dennis.
Be nice.
Totally awesome.
Move yourself
You always live your life
Never thinking of the future
Prove yourself
You are the move you make
Take your chances win or loser
See yourself
You're every step you take
You and you and that's the only way
Shake Shake!
Shake yourself
You're every move you make
So the story goes
Thank you so much.
Okay, bye.
Thank you so much.
It was great to see you.
Okay.
Come on.
Have a good night.
It was really nice, Gary.
Nice to see you.
You, too.
Good to see you guys.
Thanks, Brookie.
Oh, honey.
Thank you, sweetie.
You're still my favorite singer.
Stop it.
Love you, sis.
And I'd love for you to come to a live performance of The Tone Rangers singing live.
That's something you'd really enjoy.
It was good seeing you.
Okay.
Thank you.
All right.
Bye, darling.
Thank you for such a...
Okay.
Okay, Mom.
We'll see you soon.
Bye, dear.
Thanks, darling.
See you later.
Okay, buddy.
Oh, now, are you sure that we can't help you clean up?
No, no.
I think we're gonna be great.
We'll...
Yes?
So nice of you to offer, but we got it.
Thank you.
Oh, it was such fun.
Great.
I love you.
Great to see you.
Good night, sweetie.
Thank you so much.
I appreciate it.
Thank you so much.
All right, guys.
Bye-bye.
Bye-bye.
Thanks for coming.
Love you, too.
Are you blind?
Oh, no, no!
My demos!
Well, I'm gonna go do the dishes.
Cool.
It'd be nice if you helped me.
Damn it.
Way to go!
No problem.
I'll get them a little bit later.
I'm just gonna hit the streets here for a little bit.
Gary, come on, I don't want to do them later.
Let's just do them now.
It'll take 15 minutes.
Honey, I am so exhausted.
I just honestly want to relax for a little bit.
If I could just sit here, let my food digest, and just try to enjoy the quiet for a little bit.
Get some!
Get some!
Get some!
That's what happens.
And we will...
You know, we can clean the dishes tomorrow.
Gary, you know I don't like waking up to a dirty kitchen.
Who cares?
I care!
All right?
I care!
I busted my ass all day cleaning this house and then cooking that meal.
And I worked today.
It would be nice if you said thank you and helped me with the dishes.
Fine.
I'll help you do the damn dishes.
Oh, come on.
You know what?
No.
See?
That's not what I want.
You just said that you want me to help you do the dishes.
I want you to want to do the dishes.
Why would I want to do dishes?
Why?
See, that's my whole point.
Let me see if I'm following this, okay?
Are you telling me that you're upset because I don't have a strong desire to clean dishes?
No.
I'm upset because you don't have a strong desire to offer to do the dishes.
I just did.
After I asked you!
Jesus, Brooke, you're acting crazy again.
Don't you call me crazy.
I am not crazy.
I didn't call you crazy.
You just did.
I didn't call you...
No, I didn't.
I said you're acting crazy.
You know what, Gary?
I asked you to do one thing today, one very simple thing, to bring me 12 lemons and you brought me three.
God damn it.
If I knew that it was gonna be this much trouble,
I would have brought home 24 lemons.
Even 100 lemons.
You know what I wish?
I wish everyone that was at that goddamn table had their own little private bag of lemons.
Honest to God!
Gary, it's not about the lemons.
Well, that's all you're talking about.
I'm just saying it'd be nice if you did things that I asked.
It would be even nicer if you did things without me having to ask you!
Well, I do seem to remember doing something for you this morning without you asking.
Gary, come on.
What?
I'm serious.
Come here.
You know what?
I'm serious.
I really am.
I am, too.
Come on.
You knew I was working today and I made that meal.
And you could have thought to yourself, you know, you could have said,
"Yeah, I think I'm gonna get Brooke some flowers.' '
You said on our very first date that you don't like flowers, that they're a waste of money.
Every girl likes flowers, Gary.
You said that you don't like flowers.
I'm supposed to take that to mean that you do like flowers?
No.
This is not about...
You're not...
God, you're not getting it.
You're not getting this, Gary, okay?
It's not about the lemons.
It's not about the flowers.
It's not about the dishes.
It's just about...
How many times do I have to drop hints about the ballet?
You know I can't stand...
Brooke, come here.
We've talked about the damn ballet.
I hate the goddamn ballet!
You got a bunch of dudes in tights flopping around for three hours.
It's like a medieval techno show.
It's a nightmare.
I sit there in a sweat.
The whole thing, I do, wondering when the hell's the goddamn nightmare gonna end.
Go to a damn ballet.
It's not about you loving the ballet, Gary.
It's about the person that you love loves the ballet and you wanting to spend time with that person.
Not when they're at the ballet.
Okay.
Forget the ballet!
Forget the ballet!
I will.
We don't go anywhere together.
We just went to Ann Arbor together.
To Ann Arbor.
To the Michigan-Notre Dame game.
You think screaming, drunk kids and leprechauns doing backflips, that's fun.
That's fun for me.
Come on, man.
I did that for you.
What do you...
How do you show up for me?
I'm up on the bus every goddamn day for you!
Come on.
You...
I'm busting my ass to be the best tour guide in the damn city, so I can make enough money to support both of us and hopefully you won't have to work one day.
I want to work.
All I ask, Brooke, is that you show a little bit of appreciation.
That I just get 20 minutes to relax when I come home, instead of being attacked with questions and nagged the whole damn time.
You think that I nag you?
That's all you do!
All you do is nag me!
"The bathroom's a mess.' ' "Your belt doesn't match.' '
"Hey, Gary, you should probably go work out.' '
Nothing I ever do is ever good enough!
I just want to be left the hell alone!
Really?
Is that what you want, Gary?
Is that what you want?
Yeah.
That's what you want?
Yeah.
Fine.
Great.
Do whatever the hell you want.
You leave your socks all over this house, dress like a pig, play your stupid-ass video game.
I don't care, I'm done.
What?
I'm done!
I don't deserve this.
I really do not deserve this.
I deserve somebody who gives a shit.
I'm not spending one more second of this life with some inconsiderate prick!
You're a prick!
Addie, it just became so clear tonight how much he takes me for granted.
What happened?
Just the same old shit.
I asked him to do one thing and he didn't do it.
Then he complained that he had to do anything, and I just felt like I had no choice.
No, sweetie, you did have a choice, okay?
And it sounds like you made the right one.
You respected yourself.
But it's just not what I want.
I don't want to break up with him.
I don't.
I just want him to say thank you.
I want him to want to do the dishes.
I just want him to want to take me to the ballet.
I want him to get me 12 lemons!
You know...
I just want him to care enough about this relationship to want to work on it.
Okay, you know what?
I'm putting on my shoes and I'm gonna be there in 15 minutes.
No, Ad.
Don't.
Please, I really don't want to see anybody.
I really don't.
But, look, I'm worried about you, okay?
And I can hear you in there banging around your dishes.
And I don't want you getting out your Clorox and your rubber gloves, and taking this out on the kitchen.
Look, look, look.
Okay.
Tonight just...
It just got a little out of hand, and hopefully he's just gonna realize that he's got some changes to make and he's gonna...
He's gonna come home and apologize.
Okay?
That's what's gonna happen.
I feel like, I don't...
You know, like, you dress however you want to dress.
You know, do whatever you want to do.
I'm done with the relationship.
Whatever.
So, it's just kind of, "You're done with the relationship?"
Well, you're obviously hurt about it.
She got to you.
You're hurt.
I'm not.
It's nothing to be ashamed of.
She hurt you.
Will you look at me?
I'm not heartbroken.
I'm a little shocked.
I'm a little surprised.
Gary, you're devastated.
Now, what's the name of the guy she's doing?
I'm gonna solve your problem.
What's his name?
What are you talking about?
Have you checked her e-mail?
I don't check e-mails.
I don't...
You can get a program that records keystrokes.
It costs, like, 20 bucks.
Very easy to use.
Okay?
You get a password, you check her e-mail.
You find out everything about her.
That's how I found out about the Puerto Rican that Stacy was running around with.
Okay.
You are reading a little too much into this situation.
There is no one she's running around with, okay?
We had a fight over the groceries I brought home.
You're probably right.
She's probably not sleeping with anybody.
No.
Not what it's about.
Okay.
Maybe she's with another guy, maybe not.
She's not.
I don't know.
I'm not Columbo.
Okay?
But what we do know is that she doesn't want to be with you anymore.
I mean, I hate to be shitty about it, and so cut and dry, but let's face it.
She says she doesn't want to be with you, and I believe her.
Now, we gotta figure it out.
And you're gonna need a place to go and lick your wounds while you get your head right over this thing.
I don't need a place to go and lick my wounds.
You're gonna stay with me.
I'm not gonna hear it.
Look it...
I'm not moving out of the place.
Oh, you're not moving out.
No.
I put money in the place.
I put half my money in the place.
You're obviously not the one calling the shots in this case.
Yeah, but I own the place.
With her.
Yeah.
But it's not up to her who gets to keep the goddamn place.
If you find out who she's sleeping with, maybe we could leverage it.
I want you to listen to me.
You listen to me.
I'm gonna leave you a key.
I don't need a key.
Why?
'Cause she's gonna put...
She's gonna move out of the place, Johnny.
Did she say she was moving out?
She will.
She's gonna move out.
Oh, she's...
I'm gonna keep the place.
I'm not moving out of the place.
I'll leave you a key.
Hey, how's it going?
I almost got it.
Yeah.
You know, I was thinking.
You know what you should do, is you should find somebody who looks like Brooke, but even hotter and, you know, bang the shit out of her.
What the hell's wrong with you?
What?
Logs.
Just fix the damn engine.
I am fixing the goddamn engine.
I need your tour logs.
I'm off the clock, okay?
Well, I cannot file the quarterlies until I have your log.
I'm going through a little bit of a life change here, Dennis.
I would really appreciate a little bit of sensitivity, please.
I know they're both French, but that has nothing to do with it.
Because Manet was earlier and...
No.
Monet and Manet are very different things.
I'm sorry, I beg to differ.
Excuse me, sir, can I have her call you back personally?
Yes.
Okay, thank you.
Sorry.
Brooke?
I am so sorry.
What?
Come here.
Oh, honey, your mom called and told me everything.
Oh, Jesus.
Good morning, Marilyn.
Morning.
I'll go water the plants.
I understand you had a long night.
Tell me everything.
"Everything.' ' I couldn't possibly...
Then don't.
My time is pressing.
What I want is for you to take the rest of the day off.
Oh, no.
No, that's not necessary.
Who am I?
Marilyn Dean.
And where are we?
The Marilyn Dean Gallery.
And of whom is that portrait?
That is Marilyn Dean.
Yeah.
You know, your personal life is your personal life.
But you look like shit.
And when you look like shit,
Marilyn Dean looks like shit, and now it is my business.
And when it comes to my business, I don't like anything that's distracting.
So, I want you to take the rest of the day off to be sad and then come back to work tomorrow ready to take care of business.
Got it?
Oh, hey, Brooke.
How are you?
What the hell are you doing?
Well, my whole life, I always wanted my own place with my own pool table.
I finally got my own place, but you would not allow me to have a pool table.
I just kind of figured I'd rectify that today.
And it does feel good.
I'm gonna go ahead and put the four ball in the corner pocket.
Nice.
I'm sorry, can I...
A little room for the shooter, please?
It's hard to shoot with someone standing...
Thank you.
Wow.
Well, I guess he feels threatened that you broke up with him and he's acting out.
Okay, look, Brooke, men are like children.
You know?
And they...
Sweetie, it's a figure of speech.
It's Brooke.
And I love you so much.
And you're my man and you know that.
You're amazing.
I love you.
Listen, and they're gonna test boundaries to see what they can get away with.
I think there's three things that Gary needs to know.
One, this type of behavior is not unnoticed.
Two, it's not acceptable.
And three, you know, you're definitely not gonna tolerate it.
Right?
Yes.
And Brooke, remember, we're always owning our actions, right?
And we're always healthy with it, yes?
Yes.
I don't wanna finish the game.
I got showings, okay?
I gotta buy the cookie spray.
I gotta clean up the dog.
And now I'm really leaving 'cause I don't want to hear that.
Okay?
Thank you for the pool.
Thank you for the snacks.
I'm going to get a cab.
I'll split it with you.
What are you, 12?
Brooke, that is not healthy.
I'm trying to make a point.
And what is that point?
My point's your point.
Your three points.
That it's not unnoticed, that it was not acceptable, and that it would definitely not be tolerated.
Not exactly what I meant.
Unbelievable.
I knew it!
Hey, gang.
Found my shirt on the floor.
Thanks for laying it out.
Gary, are you here for couples bowling?
Yeah.
Well, don't you think you and I should discuss something first?
Like what?
How your 47 average is killing us?
Okay.
Great.
No.
Gary, this is couples bowling.
And since you and I are no longer a couple, because you have chosen not to participate constructively in our relationship, we're now singles.
So, there's not room for two singles on the team.
Why do you look confused?
I don't have any idea what's happening.
I've come to play on the team.
Look, Gary, I just don't think it's a good idea for you and I to be around each other any more than we have to right now.
I completely agree.
Maybe you should go play some pinball.
No, I think you should leave.
Okay.
Brooke, when a man makes a commitment to a team, he honors that commitment.
He doesn't let emotions or personal issues get in the way of victory.
And I've made a commitment to this team.
They don't want you here either, Gary.
Yeah.
Sure, they don't.
They don't.
They're my friends.
But you're not a strong bowler.
That's not the point.
You know what?
Let's just...
Why don't we let them decide?
Gary, don't.
No.
Don't involve them, okay?
That's unnecessary.
What's wrong, Castro?
Castro?
Well, Castro doesn't let people vote as a team.
Okay.
Ask them.
Thank you.
Okay, everyone.
Team vote here.
By a show of hands, just put it up when you make a decision, who here agrees with Brooke and thinks I should leave the bowling team?
Shocker.
Band of Brothers.
You should rent it sometime.
Good luck, everyone.
Riding Miss Gutter Ball to the finals.
Hey, Gary.
Yeah.
I'm gonna need your shirt back.
What?
Well, we're gonna have to replace you, and you know we get docked 10 pins if everyone's not in matching Pin Shakers uniforms.
My shirt says "Gary" on it.
Granted.
But actually, we know a guy named Gary.
And he's not as tall as you, but he's a pretty good bowler.
I'm gonna have to request that I have my wrist guard back then.
I'm sorry.
That's mine.
Just give me the goddamn wrist guard, please.
Thank you.
I hope your wrist snaps.
Wow.
Okay?
You see that?
You know what I mean?
Yeah.
That was awesome.
You just had your ex-boyfriend, who you wish you were still dating, voted off the bowling team.
Well, I had to do that to get him right where I want him.
Where's that?
Shirtless in the parking lot?
Addie, you're not getting this.
Gary loves this bowling team.
He's hurt right now.
He's feeling pretty bad.
He's gonna go out there and he's gonna get drunk.
He's gonna make a complete fool of himself.
And he will be sitting there feeling pretty lonely and pretty pathetic, and then it's just gonna hit him.
What's gonna hit him?
That not only is he out a girlfriend, but his life is just falling apart piece by piece and maybe that life was pretty great.
And maybe I was the glue that was holding it all together.
And if he wants that life back, he's gonna have no choice but to change.
How about this?
I feel like we just found hell.
When did you start coming to knobby joints like this?
I might be the greatest you've ever seen, pal.
I'm conquering new frontiers.
Hello, babe.
Yeah, you've got to put up with the bad music and the $15 drinks, but this place is stacked with top-shelf, young, dumb ass.
All you gotta do is just separate the weaker ones from the herd.
Come on, I'll get you into the VIP.
Can I get a couple drinks from you?
Okay, L.G.
Lupus, I got to be totally...
I got to be honest with you.
I'm not feeling it here.
You're gonna like it in here.
You're gonna love it.
I don't like it out here.
Look, listen to me, will you, please?
How you doing, Buzz?
While you were on the inside locked up for the past two years, the game has changed.
Do you remember when you were an outdoor cat and you used to have to hunt and kill for your food?
Well, you've become an indoor cat.
You've been getting your milk brought to you in a silver bowl, and guess what?
Now, you've been tossed back outside and the alley has changed.
For example, your MTV generation, your technology, your text message, your TiVo.
You name it.
People want their information faster.
People e-mail each other because they want to exchange information, Gar.
They don't want to connect, they want results.
Okay.
You gotta get to the message quicker.
Now, I want you to watch.
It's real simple.
Okay?
How you doing, ladies?
Now, here's what I'd like to do to you.
First, I'd like to get you naked.
And then I'm gonna take some Saran Wrap and I'm gonna wrap you up in it, head to toe.
Then I'm gonna cut out two holes.
One for your mouth, so you can breathe, obviously.
And the other one...
Asshole.
It could be a gorgeous evening for us, babe.
The pink is gorgeous.
Jesus, God.
Come here.
Lupus, listen to me.
I want you to listen to me.
There are our drinks.
You want your drink?
No, I'm fine.
Thank you.
The L.G. Thanks you.
Will you listen to me, please?
You're my brother and I love you very much, and maybe you do get laid tonight, but maybe you get arrested.
Arrested for what, babe?
Being awesome?
Come on, babe, listen.
You want to tell your jokes, tell your jokes.
But sooner or later you're gonna get hungry and you're gonna wanna eat.
And jokes might make you feel better, but they don't get you fed.
I'm gonna go take a lap.
What are you doing?
I'm sketching.
And where are you sketching?
In the living room.
No, in my bedroom.
And I didn't say anything to you, Brooke, when you so arrogantly claimed the bed without asking me, but you can't just waltz into my room and turn it into a damn art fair.
Gary, I've only taken up a little bit of space, so...
I don't care if you only took an inch.
There might not be a door here, but this is my domain.
Okay?
I don't go into your bedroom and set up a goddamn sawhorse.
Well, then what the hell is that pool table doing in the dining room?
Because that's a common area.
And that's where this belongs.
Not in my room.
Hey, what are you doing?
It belongs in another common area.
Gary.
People want to come home and they want to relax in their room.
Gary, it is 2:00 in the morning!
Don't you drop my things.
I don't know what to tell you, kid.
This is how I am when I'm single.
My hours start to get pretty strange.
Might be time for you to think about moving out.
Why would I...
No, I'm not moving anywhere.
Gary, just please turn the volume down.
Yeah, but I don't tell you what the hell to do in your room.
You can doodle.
You can dance.
You can bake a goddamn gingerbread house.
I don't give a shit.
But in my room, I want to relax and watch my highlights in complete surround-sound experience.
What the hell are you doing?
You're not even gonna watch it!
Don't tell me what I am or aren't not doing.
Oh, what you are not, not doing?
Go learn some English.
Oh, I'm sorry.
I didn't have a grandfather on the board of some fancy college.
Key word being "was.' ' Did he touch the Filipino exchange student?
Did he not touch the exchange student?
I don't know, Brooke.
I wasn't there.
Okay.
No, don't start with the family stuff.
Like your family's so perfect?
Your brother's a pervert!
Don't talk to me about the sexual habits of family members.
What about your sister?
My sister's been through a lot.
Of dick.
There are some problems, Gary, but can we please just leave it...
Problems?
She slept with the entire Arizona Cardinals offensive line.
That's not problems.
That's she's the problem!
She was on vacation!
She was on vacation.
Don't even get me started, by the way, on your brother.
If I have to hear that guy sing just one more time,
I'd hang myself with wax dental floss.
Could the guy just come out of the closet, please?
Richard is not gay.
Okay, lassie, I want you to listen to me and listen good.
I'm not saying he won't get married.
I'm not saying he won't even have kids.
But then one day his wife will come home, and then she'll find him with a guy named Majulio, wearing leather helmets and clubbing each other to Yanni's greatest hits.
Yeah.
Right.
Whatever.
You're an infant.
Yeah, I'm an infant.
Go enjoy your room, Brooke, 'cause I'm gonna enjoy mine!
Okay.
You know what?
I might enjoy some pay-per-view options tonight.
It's gonna be a long one, sweetheart, and I got nothing to do manana but sleep in.
Boogie nights Ain't no doubt we are here to party
What are you doing?
Boogie nights Come on now, got to get it started
Ricky, you and the Get Along Gang leave or I'm gonna throw you out of here personally, you understand?
Actually, Gary, this is Brooke's bedroom.
So, technically, you don't have jurisdiction here, but I think it'd be really fun if you sang with us.
Come on, Gary.
I think you'll like it.
You got 10 seconds to get out of here or I'm gonna break your damn magic whistle.
You understand what I'm saying to you?
Move this group out of my house, now!
Gary, you can't take a pitch pipe out of a guy's hand when he's in the middle of a very funky groove.
You can get hurt doing something like that.
I'm tapping out, I'm tapping out!
Here we go.
From the bridge.
Party night Get on down with the sound of the music
Boogie nights Do it, do it
What kind of bullshit move was that?
I'm sorry.
What?
What happened?
Oh, don't be coy with me.
You sent that animal over here to attack me when I was hung over and weak.
Oh, no.
Look, all I know is The Tone Rangers, they needed someplace to rehearse, so I very clearly told Richard, "Stay in my room,"
which you explained to me was my space to do with what I want.
Is that how you want to play it?
'Cause I'll play it like that.
I'll play it like Lionel Richie.
All night long, lady.
Oh, yeah.
I'll call some guys from my neck of the woods.
And we're not talking, Brooke, about a couple of queens who know a few grapples.
We're talking about Polacks that don't have a goddamn future.
Right.
That's right!
We can make shit real uncomfortable around here, and that's what we're gonna do.
Please.
Come on.
You know what?
You're just embarrassed because Richard kicked your ass.
Richard did not kick my ass.
What Richard did was attack me when I was half asleep.
Really?
Is that how you see it?
There's a really big gap between getting your ass kicked and having a dancing, singing sprite fool you with trickery and then strike your throat before you know that you're even in a fight.
And I wouldn't expect someone like you to understand that, because all you ever do is make moves from up in your ivy tower.
Wow.
You have officially gone off the reservation.
I'm an adult.
I talk through shit.
He ran out of ideas.
God.
Listen, by the way, there's messages on the voice mail regarding game night, which is obviously not gonna happen, so you might want to call people and tell them that it's canceled.
Why would I cancel game night?
Well, I mean...
If it's our turn to host game, I'm gonna host goddamn game night.
You want to host game night?
I'm fine, Brooke.
I don't have any strangeness over what happened here today.
Okay.
If there's anyone that should feel weird about seeing people, that's you, Tonya Harding.
Me?
I'm gonna honor my commitments.
Great.
Great.
Fine.
Fine.
Let's do that.
Let's do that.
Let's honor the commitment.
Hey, there's no food in there!
So?
Well, people are gonna be here in an hour.
What are they supposed to eat?
You're a big boy.
Figure it out.
Oh, great.
Well, that's what we got.
We have only tap water because, you know, Gary didn't shop.
And we don't have any ice either 'cause he didn't fill the trays.
That's trash.
It's your shot.
What is your name again?
Diane.
Diane.
Did you call?
I called the five.
Well, yeah, but you didn't call the second ball, so that's trash, so it's your shot.
You got to play by the rules.
It's your shot.
Hi.
Hi.
Andrew.
Oh, hi.
Whoa, whoa, whoa!
Hey, hey, hey!
These two Benedict Arnolds aren't welcome in my condo.
Who sent an invite to them?
I'm sorry.
These are very loyal friends and they are always welcome in my condo.
Oh, really?
Why don't we take it to a vote and see who has the numbers this time?
All right.
Show of hands here.
Who thinks that these two traitors should leave and not be a part of game night?
And maybe take their shirts off when they leave.
Raise your hand.
I know I feel that way.
Who else?
Come on, Johnny O, put your hand up, please.
Come on.
Thank you.
You, Miss?
New girl.
Who's the girl?
What's her name?
What's her name?
The girl you're with.
What's her name?
Her name's Diane.
Oh, I'm sorry.
You might want to go ahead and touch some sky.
Thank you.
Come on, Riggleman, please?
What are you doing?
No.
We need the eight to count towards a running tally.
You know that.
Come on.
Show her whose side that you're on.
Put your hand in the air.
You know whose side I'm on.
You know we need eight, though.
Come on.
Put your hand down.
Please don't touch my Ruffles.
Put that one back.
Those are my Ruffles.
Don't eat them, please.
Thank you.
Oh, Gary.
They're mine.
Come on.
Here we go.
All right.
Eyes front.
Ready?
Hold on.
Get the timer going, please.
Ready?
Now I gotta do it.
Go.
Okay.
It's a brick.
Square.
Square.
Box.
Box.
Corner.
Corner.
A dot in the corner.
A house.
Home plate!
Football!
Baseball!
Sports.
A house.
A triangle.
It's algebra.
Okay, it's a house.
It's a house.
It's a house.
Two words.
Banana?
Chimney, chimney, chimney!
A fruit.
House.
Fruit.
Oh, restaurant.
Or...
No, chimney, chimney.
Smoke...
Oh, a house call.
House call!
Oh!
House call!
Yeah, well, I thought it was a house call.
Like a hotel, then it hit me it was a house.
Yeah!
You're terrific.
Absolutely terrific.
All right, beat that.
Okay, guys, listen.
The next one wins, okay?
So let's stay focused.
Let's stay calm.
We can do this.
High fives.
Let's go.
Come on.
Let's go.
Let's get a mind-meld.
Let's try and get a mind-meld, okay?
Here we go.
Let's go.
Mind-meld.
I heard you!
Don't over-think it.
Mind meld.
Ready?
I heard you!
Well, just keep it simple.
Shush.
Ready?
Wait.
Go!
Here we go!
We're mind-melding.
Draw faster.
It doesn't have to be beautiful, just has to be something we can get.
Shoe, shoe...
Shoe!
Shoe, shoe, shoe.
Shoeless Joe Jackson.
Draw something different.
No one's getting it.
Shoe.
What, is that a smaller shoe?
Baby shoe.
Smaller shoe.
Baby shoes.
Shoes.
Baby shoes.
Smaller shoe.
Gumshoe.
Smaller shoes.
Gumshoe?
Gumshoe?
Running Olympics.
Inside the shoe.
Inside a shoe.
A bubble...
Lining.
Stop pointing at the shoe.
We're not...
No one's guessing shoe.
Stop pointing at the shoe and draw something different.
Draw something different.
You...
Goddamn it!
No one's guessing shoe!
You drew a big shoe, then a small shoe, and no one got it.
You gotta draw something different.
Everyone said "shoe" seven times.
It's a sock, asshole.
You call yourself an artist?
Yes!
A three-year-old with a box of crayons could do a better job than this.
I'm sorry, I don't have the great talent of standing on top of a big red bus and pointing out architecture that other great men have built!
I'm the one who should be sorry, Brooke.
I shouldn't sit here and pick on your art.
No.
Because you got the nuts part down, Picasso.
All you have to do is cut off your frigging ear.
That's Van Gogh, you idiot!
And your insults are much more effective when they're accurate.
Don't talk to me about being goddamn accurate!
I can talk to you about anything that I want.
'Cause you couldn't even draw a sock.
You don't do anything right!
You're a lazy...
Everyone said, "Shoe, shoe, shoe!"
At first, I figured that the split was just something temporary, something that you two would work out and get past, but after tonight I think it's pretty clear that you two genuinely do not want to get back together.
There's not a shot in hell.
Gary.
I'm just...
I got you.
As your friend and as your realtor,
I'm not gonna leave here tonight until we decide what to do about this condo, because this living situation is obviously not working out.
Gary?
Well, the only logical thing that I can think of is for her to move out of the condo, and then to pay me some sort of a penalty as compensation for the labor that I did all around the condo.
What?
What?
What?
Pay you compensation for your labor?
We fixed this place up together.
Are you nuts?
Stop calling me nuts, I swear to God.
I fixed the...
You went around with a sponge, and you went in the bathroom and you dotted foofy shit.
That's what you're saying that I did?
There's no...
That was...
That's called aesthetics.
It warmed this place up so it didn't look like an army barracks, which it was about to.
I'll tell you what it's called in his language, depreciated.
That's what it's called.
You don't even know what that means.
Unless the next buyer happens to have your same Zulu-voodoo-land taste.
All right.
Let me tell you something else.
It's gonna cost money to cover up the holes in the wall.
The holes that you drilled in the wall there to hang up whatever that thing is called.
Oh, please.
Gary.
You're gonna have to cost money to fix that.
What I did, Brooke, has concrete value to the condo.
I added concrete...
Well, let's just go on record.
We're dealing with facts here.
I did the tiling in the bathroom.
Have you seen...
I did the new track lighting.
That tile is the shittiest tile job.
I did the plumbing!
The plumbing!
That's realty terms.
Okay.
Let's talk about your plumbing.
This is his plumbing.
We have two temperatures in our bathroom.
We get either scalding hot or we get frostbite.
That's it.
That's all we get.
It's my problem that she doesn't know how to pace a shower?
Now all of a sudden that's my fault.
I get a minute to take a shower.
One minute?
One minute of warmth?
Oh, Jesus.
One minute.
That's it.
That's correct.
Thank God you're not in charge of keeping all the clocks in Chicago on time.
This is basic logic.
You are out of your mind.
You have lost it.
Let me explain this to you in plain chapter and verse.
Cheese and rice, you guys are gonna kill each other.
Now, let's just...
Realistically speaking, neither one of you can afford this mortgage on your own, okay?
And that's a shame, because this building will continue to increase in value.
I get nothing but phone calls about it, all right?
Waiting for a unit to open up.
So, as your realtor, the last thing I would suggest is selling.
But as your friend, I just, I don't see any other solution.
You take your halves, you go your separate ways, and you get on with your lives.
I know that selling is not the easiest thing, but I do think that it's the best.
And to be honest, this is a situation where I would just as soon not take a commission.
That's great.
Thank you.
That's great.
Thank you for that.
I wish I didn't have to, you know, but company policy says I cannot waive that.
But I was just...
You know, I'm saying in theory, you know.
In this situation, 'cause we're friends, I wish I could waive it.
No can do, though.
As soon as you can, I would love to get a set of keys from you guys.
You just drop them off.
Okay.
Great.
There they are.
I'll be bringing by people all week.
You won't even know I'm here.
The good news is, should move quickly.
All right.
Okay to leave you two alone now?
Got to get back to Jen.
Very excited about the win tonight.
Okay.
Addie, if the condo sells, I think I'm gonna lose him.
Yeah, but game night was so light and fun,
I'm really surprised to be hearing this.
Okay.
You know what?
That's not constructive.
Really.
I just...
Yeah, I need a new plan, Addie.
I don't...
I'm just kidding.
It's me.
I'm gonna have to call you back.
Whenever one of my friends is down, we all go on, like, happy patrol.
I was actually having a very serious conversation.
Christopher, do not sing.
If you're happy and you know it Clap your hands
If you're happy and you know it Clap your hands
If you're happy and you know it You're going to smile to...
Pack up your shit and go home.
Okay.
You know what?
This is not his fault.
He was just really trying to cheer me up and it...
Did I or did I not give you the day off to be sad?
Yes.
But I...
Well, today's not that day, and unfortunately for you, I can't afford to look weak.
No, please.
You have warned me so many times and you have yet to fire me.
I think you and I both know that to find and train somebody new, it's gonna cost you time, and it's gonna cost you money, and I don't think you want to spend either one of those.
Now, look, I'm just gonna take a wild guess here, but you don't become Marilyn Dean without knowing how to handle men.
Okay?
Now, just listen to my problem, tell me how to fix it, and then we'll all go back to work.
Okay.
What is this problem so severe that has caused you to blaspheme in the synagogue of Marilyn Dean?
Well, it's Gary.
I broke up with him in hopes that losing me would make him want to change, and that's, you know...
And I've just ended up pushing him, you know, farther and farther away.
That's it?
Yeah.
Honey, this is not surrealism or cubism, it's paint-by-numbers.
Go see Mischa, my personal waxer at the spa.
Ask her for the Telly Savalas.
The Telly Savalas.
Compliments of M. Dean.
Then go show Gary your immaculate canvas and let him see another man eager to paint it.
Got it?
Got it?
Who loves you, baby?
Wow, impressive.
Three sharp hands landed.
What an amazing display of punching technique.
The crowd jumps.
That punch rocked him.
They sense he's on the verge of hitting the canvas.
The roaring for anticipation of a knockout.
We are witnessing a great fight.
He's displaying incredible rhythm with his hands.
Bulldog terrorizing his opponent.
Down he goes!
Hard punch slams him to the canvas.
One, two, three, four, five, six, seven, eight,
Nine, ten.
It's over.
Is...
Did...
Is Brooke here?
I don't know.
Brooke?
I'll be right there.
Cool, baby, cool.
So, how do you and Brooke know each other?
Well, how don't we know each other, you know what I mean?
Hi, Paul.
You look great.
Thank you.
Are you ready to go?
Yeah.
All set.
So, it was great meeting you.
Apple martinis.
All right, come on.
That normally does the trick.
Just ignore him.
But just two.
Three, she'll get sloppy.
You'll become a babysitter.
Oh, and fantasy role playing.
She's got a real thing for lifeguards.
Put some zinc oxide on your nose and she'll lose her mind.
It'll all be over with.
Y'all want me to stop running?
I mean, the most challenging part of what I do is between February and April 15th.
That's what we in the biz like to call crunch time.
That sounds fascinating.
Good evening.
Hi.
Can I start you two off with something to drink?
Yeah, you know, we're gonna start with a couple of apple martinis, please.
No, you know what?
I'm gonna...
I'm just gonna start with a water.
Well, you can just bring those, just in case.
What was I saying?
Oh, yeah, yeah, yeah.
So, you know, it's not like it's all work and no play.
You know, I mean, after April 15th, that's what we in the biz like to call party time.
Excuse me.
Oh, I have to get this.
I'm so sorry.
Hello.
Okay, is this when I'm supposed to call?
What?
What do you mean?
What?
Where?
What happened?
Okay, that's great.
Wait.
What?
Oh, all right.
Listen, where...
Just don't move.
Where are you?
I'm sitting in my kitchen.
Sitting?
Okay.
Don't move.
Don't...
I'm gonna be right there, honey.
I'm gonna be right there, okay?
Is everything okay?
Oh, my gosh.
That was my best friend.
She just had an accident and she...
She has this knee thing and she's just very fragile, and I have to go.
What?
I can give you a ride.
No.
No.
That's okay.
I'm gonna grab a cab, so...
I'm so sorry.
I like your dress.
I think he's fascinating.
He's obviously read a lot of books.
Yeah.
Yeah, I bet he has.
He reads a lot of books because nobody wants to talk to him.
He's a friend of Andrew's who's always been polite.
It's the best I could do on such short notice, okay?
Well, you know what?
Polite is not gonna do it.
We've got to find somebody who is really gonna make Gary jealous.
Can I just say something?
You sound a little jealous, Gary.
Why would I be jealous of some guy with computer skills?
Let's say he doesn't have computer skills, but he's got a big old elephant hog on him?
Would that bother you or would you be okay with that?
Not nearly as much as the way that your mind works.
My mind works great.
So, what's this bullshit I hear about you selling the condo?
Selling that condo is ludicrous.
I was waiting for when I was gonna get the how-Gary-always- screws-his-life-up speech again.
This must be the right time.
Look, you tell me, you just tell me, tell me.
Is it happening now?
Yeah.
Okay.
Tell me how losing that asset is gonna get us on the river?
Go ahead, just tell me.
Tell me.
Somebody tell me.
What is this?
What is this?
What is it?
What is it?
Hey!
Don't patronize me.
Helicopters.
Helicopters.
Exactly!
How does losing the asset give us helicopters?
Dennis, I'm being totally serious with you.
I don't need this shit right now.
Hey, you want to cry, cry to Mom.
Nobody's crying.
I'm not crying.
I just don't feel like hearing it.
There's no feelings here.
This is about money and business.
Fine, you broke up.
You broke up.
Fine.
You know, sad.
Sad is, instead of putting $1,000 into your mortgage every month, you waste it on rent.
That's what sad is.
Oh, you're broke up.
You're confused, brokenhearted.
Heartbreak is not having that money as part of your net worth and then not saving the money, so that after taxes you can invest!
You know, you're confused.
Are you finished?
Look, I need the damn tour logs.
Yeah.
Well, I really, really appreciate the heart to heart.
It was a great talk, Dennis.
Thank you.
Oh, well, you're behind three months.
You're still behind three months.
And those logs are imperative to insuring that our books are straight!
I'll tell you what those logs are.
Those logs are bullshit is what they are!
You got the receipts.
Tally the goddamn things yourself!
I do, I do!
And I don't appreciate it, because it cuts into my time with my family.
I could be spending that time with my family instead of doing your books.
I already do the taxes.
I do the billing.
I do the hiring, the firing.
I do the maintenance.
Come on, what do you do?
What is it that you do?
You do the tours!
I am the talent, Dennis!
They sign up a month in advance to see me.
They'll wait in line for the next bus to see me!
All right?
So don't drain me with all this bullshit about the goddamn tour logs!
How big's your TV?
Oh, shut up!
How big's your TV, 'cause I wanna know if you can see what's happening.
Oh, wow.
You beat a 12-year-old.
I don't care if you're 12 years old.
You have more time in the day to play.
I live in the real world, my man,
With bills and responsibilities.
That's right.
You can't have a handle called Mad Dog Killer if you complain every time...
Brooke?
Hi, Mike.
Hi.
Come on in.
Hold on, Mom.
I'm coming.
Is your mom in the room with you?
'Cause I hope she can't see what's happening.
I hope she can't see what's happening.
I'm gonna be just a few more seconds.
So, just sit down and relax.
Oh, yeah, no problem.
I'm sorry?
Yeah, why'd you do that?
You take the fun out of beating you, because you have an excuse to lose.
Get a life, dude.
Do you think it's possible that your mom won't love you anymore if she sees how bad you're losing in the game.
Shut up!
Okay.
All right.
That's great.
You're gonna stay man-to-man with me.
What happens when I make a play?
Making plays, making plays!
Making plays!
Well, you know, that's how my people like to handle their business.
While your guys are out partying, mine are running routes.
Try to make a difference.
Mike?
I'm ready to go.
Oh, hey, do you mind if we finish the game?
We got a real nail-biter going here.
Yeah, sure.
Of course.
Great.
Awesome, all right?
Touchdown.
Oh, God, is that pretty.
God, is that pretty.
Yeah, I'm a gentleman.
I like to be humble.
I'm old school.
I don't like to talk a lot.
But at the same time, am I talented?
Tell me how you felt about what just happened there.
That's him going deep.
That's him going...
Work ethic.
Work ethic.
I could play this game forever.
Oh, I could, too.
I love it, yeah.
I love it, don't you?
I mean, it's the kind of thing where literally
I play the game and it's like, four hours go by.
Fate has me highly skilled and loaded with talent.
Oh...
'Cause I think I'm good enough to figure out how to beat myself.
You push yourself.
You push yourself trying to achieve the impossible, because you know that when that moment comes that everything you've done up to that moment has prepared you for victory!
I can't take credit for it, Mike.
I got to thank these little digital guys with the big hearts.
Does it feel good to be a champion?
Yeah.
Yeah, it feels good to be a champion.
Good game.
Hey, Brooke, are you ready to go now?
Oh, yeah, yeah.
Sure.
Great.
Hey, Gary, thanks a lot, man.
It was great to meet you.
Absolutely, man.
Come on, Mike.
I know a great little martini bar.
Yo.
Hey, man, saddle up.
It's time to rope in some talent.
What's up?
What do you got?
My place.
Tonight.
Poker.
Call some girls up.
Your roommate is awesome.
Mmm.
Yeah, he's something.
So, where did you go to law school?
Oh, Northwestern.
God, Gary's hilarious.
Yeah, he's okay.
Okay?
I mean, the guy's all time.
But he's gonna take Chicago tourism by air, land and sea.
And he asked me to join his new bowling team.
I mean, how cool is that?
Mmm-hmm.
You know what?
I can't do this.
I'm so sorry.
Excuse me, would you please pull over?
Can you pull over, please?
Hey, wait.
Tell Gary to call me.
Welcome, everyone, to the first annual Texas Hold'em No-Limit Strip Poker Tournament.
Now, per the e-mail that Lupus sent, we each have eight articles of clothing.
Now, if you want to bet, you take off an article of clothing, you put it in the center.
If you win, you take back the clothes, you put back on what you bet.
The extras that other people bet will stay in front of you, much the same as chips would.
You can go all in at any point, but as I outlined, you must take off all your clothes to do so.
The game shall last an hour, maybe two, at which point we will begin the dance portion of the evening.
Let's get going here.
I need to see the blinds.
Small blind.
Big blind.
The blinds are one and one.
Come on, ladies.
All right.
Oh, yeah.
Let's get going here.
Shuffle up and deal.
All right.
I mean, just because they were playing video games, that doesn't mean it didn't bother him, right?
Honestly, Brooke, I wish I could tell you, but I wasn't there.
All right, Sally, get the soap out of your mouth.
We're gonna save that for when you're 12.
Mike was really, really good-looking.
I mean, he's a little bit of a goof, but Gary doesn't know that.
I mean, for all he knows, a sophisticated, really good-looking guy took me out on a date tonight.
I could be in bed with this guy right now for all he knows.
You know?
I'm telling you, if you saw the look on his face,
Mike got to him.
Hello.
Hey, it's Riggleman.
Great news.
So, how does this work?
I'll bring the car around front and you wrap them up to go?
Oh, no, no.
We take care of everything.
We deliver it.
We hang it.
We check the light and the sun exposure.
Oh.
Perfect.
Yeah.
Listen, I don't want to be too forward, but would you like to have some dinner with me sometime?
I'm sorry.
I have a boyfriend.
Of course.
So...
Well, he's a lucky man.
Oh, thank you.
I guess I will just have to keep it to home deliveries and gallery purchases.
Thank you, though.
See you.
Have a good day, Brooke.
You, too.
Okay, are you out of your mind?
Gary's throwing Greek orgies in your living room and you're telling hot rich guys you have a boyfriend?
Are you nuts?
Hey, look.
I'm not exactly innocent here.
Brooke, as an outsider with some perspective, I really think you...
Christopher, stop.
Stop it.
I don't want to hear it.
This has already gotten way out of hand.
I know what I have to do now, all right?
I know what I have to do.
Hi.
Hi.
Did you get my note?
Yeah.
Two weeks.
Yep.
I brought some boxes from work, so, you know, if you need any just help yourself.
Great.
Thanks.
Oh.
Listen, a while ago I got these tickets for the Old 97's tonight, and I completely forgot about it, so I...
You know, if you want to go.
Well, how many tickets did you get?
I got two.
How much do you want for them?
Oh, no, I'm going.
I'm going.
So, then it would just be the two of us?
Well, yes, and 2,000 other people.
I mean, it's not a big deal, but, you know, look, you know, I was going to invite Addie, but I just figured I'd gotten them for you, so...
Sure.
Why not?
Are you sure?
I mean, if you don't want them,
I can definitely give them to somebody.
No.
No, I'll be there.
That sounds...
It sounds great.
Okay.
All right.
It's at the Riv.
So, I'll just leave your ticket at Will Call.
Good?
Okay.
Okay.
Yeah, so, there.
I'll just leave that for him.
Okay, great.
Okay, so.
Gary Grobowski?
Grobowski, yeah.
He should be here in a minute.
He's really...
He's oddly tall, so.
Oh, okay.
Great.
You won't miss him.
Thanks.
All right, have a good night.
Hi.
Can I get a beer, please?
Sure.
Actually, make that two beers.
It's gonna be $8.
Excuse me.
Sorry.
Hello, everybody!
Good evening, Chicago.
We're the Old 97's.
Brooke?
Are you up?
Yeah.
Are you okay?
I'm fine.
Are you sure?
What's up?
What do you want?
I just want to say I'm sorry that I missed the concert, and let me know what that ticket cost, I'll pay you back for it.
Just leave me alone, Gary.
I planned on going to the concert.
It's just, I stopped by Johnny O's and we...
It doesn't fucking matter, okay?
Would you just leave my room and shut the door?
Jesus.
Please.
I didn't really know that the concert mattered all that much to you.
Exactly.
Hold on a second here.
Let me talk for a second.
Gary...
Brooke.
You broke up with me.
Then you have guys coming over here for dates, and all of a sudden you ask me to go to some concert.
I mean, I just figured that, you know.
Gary.
I just...
I don't know how we got here.
Our entire relationship
I've gone above and beyond for you, for us.
And I mean, I've cooked.
I've picked your shit up off the floor.
I've laid your clothes out for you like you were a four-year-old.
I support you.
I supported you, your work.
If we ever had dinner or anything, I make the plans.
I take care of everything and I just don't feel like you appreciate any of it.
I don't feel you appreciate me.
And all I want is to...
Is for you to just show me that you care.
Why didn't you just say that to me?
Gary, I've tried.
I've tried.
Yeah, but never like that.
You might've said some things that you meant to imply that, Brooke, but I'm not a mind reader.
I doubt it would matter.
You are who you are.
Just leave me alone, okay?
Right now.
Just shut my door.
Listen.
All right, Gary, just, please.
Just leave the room.
Listen to me.
Gary, just...
I don't want to be near you right now.
Listen to me.
I just want to...
Please, just shut the door.
Please.
I know.
Look, I know you feel bad, but, you know, what are you gonna do?
I mean, what does she expect, for me to want to go with the girl who dumped me?
I don't know.
She probably just wanted you, you know, to show her the respect of not standing her up or some shit, who knows?
Well, damn it.
I should have just said no in the first place.
I don't know why I called...
You know what?
It's her fault she got hurt.
You shouldn't even feel bad about it.
She should have expected it from you.
You're a fun guy, okay?
Everybody likes you.
You're the quickest guy I know.
Anytime we go out, I have a blast.
All right?
But, you know, everybody who knows you knows you're gonna do what you want to do.
And if it's not what the other person wants to do, well, that's their problem.
That's bullshit.
It's not bullshit.
There's plenty of times I do shit that I don't want to do.
That's ridiculous.
No.
Like when?
That's bullshit to say about me.
When have we ever done something you didn't want to do?
You know, I don't know, off the top of my head.
I don't keep score...
When's the last time we went to a Sox game?
The Sox.
Not when they're playing the Cubs, either.
We always do what you want to do and she always did what you want to do.
It's who you are.
Everybody thinks that you're their friend, okay?
But the fact of the matter is that there's not one person that I know that you trust enough to let close enough that they could hurt you.
And her big problem is that you really liked her.
I mean, she is the one girl you really liked.
And no matter what she did and how hard she tried, you were never gonna let your guard down.
That poor girl never stood a chance.
Marilyn?
Marilyn?
Yeah.
I'm sorry.
I just...
Oh, just get in here.
Oh, okay.
I'm sorry, excuse me.
Marilyn, I just...
I just wanted to let you know that today is gonna be my last day.
I'm gonna be traveling for a bit.
Here's a blank check.
Write down a number, I don't want to know what it is, and go back to work.
No, no.
It's not about that.
I can't accept that.
Brooke.
Travis, get your gorgeous tuckus out of here.
If you make it to Rome, search out an establishment called the Padre Negro.
Ask for a strapping young fellow named Alberto.
Compliments of M. Dean.
Well, thank you.
I appreciate that.
Yeah.
And, honey, take as long as you want, because when you're done, your job will be right here waiting for you.
And if you discover a path that doesn't lead back here...
Well, I hope you'll text.
I will.
And, like I said, the apartment's a mess, but I'm moving, so...
It's okay.
Relax about the place.
I don't care.
Okay.
This'll just take a second.
Okay.
Hello?
Hey.
I'm in here.
Don't say anything.
I...
How're you doing?
Could I talk to you in private for a second?
You know what?
This is really not a good time, and obviously you have something happening here, so we'll just be in...
No, no, I don't have anything going on.
This is actually for you.
I'm just gonna wait outside.
No, no.
Wait.
No, no.
Really.
It's okay.
I really can't do this right now.
Brooke, this whole thing has been really tough on me and I've tried to act like it hasn't been that tough on me, but the first Sunday after me and you broke up, it all kind of really hit me.
And I think it partially hit me because Sunday was sort of always our day that we would do stuff together.
But I didn't have any idea you still cared so much.
And, you know, when I saw you crying the other night, that was honestly the worst moment of my life.
Gary.
Let me just try to say some of these things here.
It's just...
Look,
I know that I've caused you a lot of pain.
And the funny thing is, all I really want to do is make you happy.
I just want to make you smile.
Now, I've had a lot of time to think about some of the things that went on, and I know, Brooke, that I don't always do the right thing or always say the right things,
but I am willing to try to do things differently.
And I'd be happy to go take a dance class.
Well, I would.
Honestly.
I would like to go do that.
Or go travel.
I mean, I'd even be willing to go to the ballet.
Although I would much rather do the dance class or take a trip somewhere.
But I realize that's not the point.
I realize that the point isn't that at all, because it's not really about doing things that you love to do always, but it is about doing things with the person that you love.
And I love you.
Gary.
Just give me one second here.
I've missed you so much.
I promise you, Brooke,
I will do whatever it is that I have to do to never hurt you again.
I love you and I'm sorry.
Okay, that's it.
That's all I...
Oh, God.
That's all I wanted to say, so you can go ahead now with anything that you're feeling to say.
I don't know what to say.
Just say whatever you feel inside.
I don't feel the same way.
I don't.
I just...
I don't know.
Oh, God.
I just, I think...
I don't know, but I don't think I have anything left to give.
I'm sorry.
I was hoping for...
It doesn't matter.
Oh, this is now beyond awkward.
There's some new guy standing out in the hallway and I think I'm gonna go.
Okay.
Thank you.
I made a dinner, and I don't know if it's any good or not, but you're welcome to have it.
Okay.
Gary, that's really...
That's not what you think that it is.
It's okay.
I'm gonna go take a walk.
I'm sorry about that.
No.
I'm sorry I imposed.
No, that's fine.
Please.
So, what do you think?
I think you're right.
I think it's great.
Good.
Okay.
Okay.
So,
I will have that wrapped up.
Packed up, sorry, and delivered.
Thank you for taking the time to show it to me, okay?
Sure.
Yeah.
I'm gonna run.
Okay, I'll walk you out.
No, no, no.
I can...
It's okay.
So, the thing that I was most afraid of happening happened and I don't regret it at all, because now she knows how I feel.
Do you know what I mean?
Yeah.
I think, what you got to do now is really think hard, because you have to find somebody
that can't be traced back to either of us to visit this guy.
What are you talking about?
I don't...
The guy who came with her.
I don't need anything to happen to the guy.
But if they could trace him back to either one of us...
It's not about him.
I don't care about that.
...it's a problem.
The guy, he's not a...
They're not dumb.
Cops are smart, trust me.
Okay, but he's not a problem to me.
Right.
Listen to me.
Promise me that you're not gonna do anything.
I got you.
It's better if nobody...
You don't know anything.
What are you talking about?
I'll take care of it.
I don't want you to take care of anything.
John, do me a favor.
I'm being serious with you.
I know, I know.
Smart.
You're smart.
No, I'm not.
I'm being honest with you.
I don't want anything to happen to him.
Me, either.
Promise me you're not gonna have anyone do anything to this guy.
But you've gotta tell me exactly what you're gonna tell them, if the cops come to you.
Because if we tell a different story...
Nothing.
Promise me one thing.
We don't care...
John, I'm gonna go home.
I can't do this.
I'm exhausted.
Right, go home.
Just make sure your neighbors know you're going home.
Do me a favor.
They got phone records.
Make a couple phone calls tonight.
Especially around 10:00.
Okay.
Please don't do anything.
All right.
I don't mean it like...
I mean, honestly.
No, no, I got it.
For all you know, nothing's happening.
I don't want anything to happen.
Right.
Say it louder.
What are you doing here so early?
Hey.
Everything okay with you and...
Yeah, everything's gonna be great.
I just wanna get my day started, but I just wanted to say that
I'm sorry it took so long for me to...
I love you, Dennis.
It's all right.
It's okay.
I'm sorry.
I'm gonna go do the stuff.
So, that's it for all my stuff.
If you want, you could give me your key and I'll drop it off at Riggleman's.
All right.
Thanks.
Gary.
You know, there's a thousand things I...
I would have done differently.
Me, too.
Sort of, actually, when I see this space, I realize that if we didn't have such a big coffee table and that oversized couch
a pool table would have fit nicely.
Yeah.
Although the oversized couch did come in very useful the last couple of weeks, so...
Yes, it...
I guess.
Have a good trip.
Thanks.
Chicago is called the Second City because after the Great Chicago Fire of 1871,
Chicago was rebuilt on its ruins.
The city came back even bigger and stronger than it originally was.
So it's not really an insult, it's more of a badge of honor to be called...
The Second City!
Okay.
People, you might be able to get away with that reaction at work, but you are on vacation here.
If you can't blow it out here, then where the hell can you blow it out?
Ladies and gentlemen, show me that you mean it.
Do not make me ask you twice.
Are you ready to see Chicago?
Yes!
I said, are you ready to see Chicago?
Yes!
Are you ready to see Chicago?
Shondra, put this babe in the air.
Let's go!
There is a bar downstairs.
Please enjoy yourself.
I know it's early in the morning, but it is Chicago in the summer.
Who are we kidding?
It's fine.
Go get hopped up, make some bad decisions.
My jokes get better.
The buildings look bigger.
It's not so important that everything is finished.
It's important that everything is right.
Well, what time's the presentation?
All right, I'll pick up the rest of the stuff and I'll see you at 6:45.
Great.
Bye.
Brooke!
Hi.
Hi.
Wow.
It's good to see you.
It's good to see you.
I'd give you a hug, but my hands are kind of full with all the bags here.
How've you been?
I've been really good.
How have you been?
I've been good.
Yeah.
You look great.
Thank you.
The hair's a little different.
Looks nice.
Yeah?
Oh, yeah.
You've lost some weight.
Well, it's very deceiving, actually.
I've managed to become thin without having any real muscle on me whatsoever.
Very tough thing to accomplish, by the way.
I'm proud of myself.
Well, you look terrific.
Thanks.
I heard your trip went really well.
It did.
It went really well.
Oh, good.
It was fun.
It was amazing.
I saw so many amazing places.
It was just...
But, you know, you do realize how much you love home.
It's good to have you back.
Yeah.
It's good to be back.
And the boat.
Congratulations on the boat.
Thanks.
I'm waiting for it to get warm, and I'm gonna come by and take a ride.
Well, anytime you want.
It'll be on the house.
Come on by.
Well, I will, then.
I hope you do.
Definitely.
Well, I got to...
I'm going to a meeting, so...
I got to drop these bags off anyway, but it's really good to see you, Brooke.
Really good to see you.
Shouldn't...
Sorry.
I'm sorry.
I'm just saying we shouldn't wait so long the next time before we...
Yeah.
...catch up.
We have a lot more to talk about.
Yeah.
So.
Be good.
Okay.
Bye.
Bye.
(CROWD CHEERING)
Come on, come on, come on.
All right, here we go.
MAN:
Take a seat, buddy!
Come on.
It was a good play.
Are you gonna be like this all day?
I don't know.
Is it gonna be like this all day?
I don't know.
It's up to you.
I have no room to sit.
I got no room to sit.
I'm sitting next to a guy who's sitting like he's at home on the toilet with his legs spread.
Please don't crowd people.
Relax, please.
Look at me.
I am relaxed.
Look how I'm sitting.
Why are you sitting like that?
Because...
What do you think?
Why'd you wake me up for this shit?
Because I'm trying to relax and have a nice day.
Sweating in the sun like a Tijuana whore.
VENDOR:
Ice-cold soda!
Get your soda here!
VENDOR:
On the right.
Coming down there.
Pass that on down there.
Hey, hot dog guy, can I get six hot dogs down here, please?
Right away.
GARY:
And make it right, please.
You know, with the mustard and the ketchup and the relish.
Don't make me hit you up for more.
I thought we were going to Wiener Circle after this.
We will.
Then why are you getting hot dogs?
Pass this down, please.
You can keep the change.
Do you want one of the hot dogs?
GARY:
You can have a hot...
You want a hot dog?
Do you want a hot dog, miss?
No.
Thank you.
You can have one.
That's okay.
Go ahead.
You can have a hot dog.
No, I don't want one.
Excuse me, sir?
Would you mind passing the lady one of the hot dogs?
I'm good, thanks.
You don't have to share.
You can have your own.
Thanks.
That's really nice of you.
Just have one, please.
Okay, give me a hot dog.
Somebody give her a hot dog.
I got...
The big guy can't eat all of them.
Have one.
Have you ever had one before?
A hot dog?
At the ballpark?
I have.
I believe I have.
Okay, good.
Thank you.
Well, enjoy this one.
Thanks.
Do you like mustard?
No, I'm okay.
It's much better with a topping.
Here.
I'm just kidding, I'll give you two.
(CROWD CHEERING)
Cheers!
Thanks.
We'll share it.
It's a good dog.
I like the hot dog.
I know.
That's nice.
You have a problem with me eating a hot dog, guy?
I'm trying to watch the game and have a hot dog.
I'll smack him in his head.
No, just leave him alone.
Hey, you want to go get a drink?
No.
I'm with somebody, sorry.
Who?
The guy with the tucked-in shirt and the visor?
What, is that like a brother?
The guy was not your brother, then.
Who is this guy?
He's not my brother.
Who's this...
I'm getting mad now.
I'm jealous.
Who is this guy?
Who are you?
I don't know.
I'm kidding with you.
Who's the guy with the tucked-in stuff?
Is that a boyfriend?
Uh, it's...
I'm going.
Do you think you'll marry him?
What?
'Cause I know you've thought about it.
The first time you laid eyes on him, you probably thought,
"I wonder if I could marry this guy in plaid shorts who tucks his shirt in.
No way."
Then when you kissed him, you said, "I can't believe it.
"I had a lot to drink tonight.
I'm kissing the tucked-in guy."
My point is, if you're not gonna marry him...
Yeah.
...and if it's not forever, then you really don't have anything to lose in taking me up on my offer.
Uh-huh.
Well, I'm gonna go.
Okay.
Me, too.
Okay.
To where?
On an ice-breaking first date?
Well, no, I don't think...
Listen.
If you want to stay off the market while you're with
I'm-not-the-one- but-I'm-comfortable, then you can do that.
But for all you know, I just offered you a get-out-of-bored-Iove- for-free card with no strings attached.
God, you're crazy.
No, I'm not crazy.
And a lot of times people go, "Oh, that's crazy,"
and then they go, "It's genius."
That's what happened when the person invented fire.
They burned that witch.
And guess what, then they got warm and they ate good stuff.
Now, where are we headed to?
Let's not make this weird, 'cause I'm not good on dates.
No.
You know what?
I'm better just to kind of hang out and, if we don't have fun,
I might go my separate way.
Okay.
I'm not committing to anything.
I'll go hang out with you for a little bit.
That's not gonna happen.
But I can't say for sure.
(YOU'RE MY BEST FRIEND PLAYING)
GARY:
All right, all right, everybody.
Welcome to Three Brothers Bus Tours.
I'm brother number two.
It's good to have you here.
That's right, there's plenty of seats here up front.
I promise I won't bite.
I'm not a biter.
I'm psyched to have you here.
Okay, a couple quick ground rules.
Please don't jump off the bus.
Weird.
Not fun for anybody.
Also, no throwing objects at pedestrians, unless, of course, they deserve it.
Okay?
We are not at work today.
We are on vacation today.
And if you can't blow it out here on the big funny bus, where the hell can you?
I do split the tips with my driver, Shondra.
We don't want her back out turning tricks.
That was a weird time for everyone.
Seriously.
Honest to God.
And I was a customer.
Long time ago.
Come on, everybody, let's get loose!
I'm gonna ask you once.
Show me that you mean it.
Don't make me ask you twice.
Are you ready to see Chicago?
Are you ready to see Chicago?
That's what I'm talking about.
Shondra, put this baby in the air.
Let's get the blood flowing.
Let's get everyone up and let's loosen it up.
Coming up here, you're gonna notice one of the only buildings to survive the fire of 1871.
That is the original Chicago Water Tower and Pumping Station.
(PHONE RINGING)
CHRISTOPHER:
Happy Holidays.
Marilyn Dean Gallery.
The artist was inspired by the neoclassical movement.
CHRISTOPHER:
No, she doesn't.
But wanted to reflect it with an abstract bent.
CHRISTOPHER:
Okay, bye-bye.
And how much is it?
$35,000.
Happy Holidays.
Marilyn Dean Gallery.
Hold, please.
Will you excuse me for a moment?
Sure.
Go ahead.
Christopher?
Yes, sweetie.
Hi, honey.
Hi.
Christmas was months ago.
Don't remind me.
I miss it so much.
Yeah, I know.
But today is not a holiday.
I know for a fact that people like my spirit on the phone and they dig the energy that I give them.
Okay.
I'm just saying, I don't think Marilyn Dean will "dig" the energy.
Oh, no.
She's the one that told me to be creative.
So...
I know.
It's just...
Okay.
What is the next holiday coming?
The Fourth of July, is that what's next?
Well, if you want to get technical, there's Memorial Day, there's Flag Day.
Some people recognize Father's Day as a holiday.
I don't.
I get it.
I get it.
Well, on those days you can say, "Happy Holidays."
Every other day, "Good morning, good afternoon,
"good evening, Marilyn Dean Gallery." Okay?
Okay.
I'm so sorry about that.
Oh, no.
So, now this is a new piece by Zakrzewska.
What do you think of this?
Can I be honest with you?
Please.
Other than taking an art history class in college, which I pretty much slept through, I don't have the first clue about art or how to go about buying it.
I mean, like that painting.
I mean, I don't see the point in buying something that I could have done myself.
Yeah.
I completely agree with you.
You know, an art teacher of mine once said,
"Never buy a piece of art that you don't have to have."
You know, don't worry about who the artist is or how much it's worth.
I mean, you have to live with it every day.
You have to walk by it every day.
You know, you have to really love it.
You have to really appreciate it.
It's kind of like picking a mate.
(EXCLAIMING)
GARY:
Hey, honey!
Hi.
How's it going?
BROOKE:
It's good.
Oh, wow.
You got a lot happening.
I know.
Very exciting.
I am starving.
Oh, careful.
That's really...
That's very hot.
Oh, that's hot, hot, hot.
Yep.
Jesus.
Hey, honey, you've got to really...
You should get ready, okay?
Oh, you look great.
Thank you.
Got a lot of nice stuff.
Got a pizza.
All kinds of stuff.
Terrific.
I just need you to decide what to...
You know, I did everything.
(TV CLICKS)
(COMMENTATOR CHATTERING)
Gary?
Yeah?
Oh, come on!
Really?
You got three lemons.
What my baby wants, my baby gets.
You know that.
Yeah, but I wanted 12.
Baby wanted 12.
Why would you want 12 lemons?
Because I'm making a 12-lemon centerpiece.
So, no one's actually even eating them?
They're just show lemons?
Yeah.
They're just show lemons.
Shown in the center of the table.
I'm glad you find that amusing, but I cannot fill a vase with only three lemons.
Well, can't you just use, like, maybe a drinking glass?
I'm not gonna use a drinking...
We could have a smaller version of a centerpiece.
I'm not gonna use a drinking glass for our centerpiece.
You know what?
I've got an idea.
Why don't we go ahead and scratch the centerpiece idea altogether, because the chicken that burnt my mouth could maybe use a little bit of lemon on top of it.
Guess what?
Now we've made a better meal versus something visually nice to look at.
What are you do...
What's happening here?
What are you doing?
What are you doing?
(STAMMERING) Oh, I had such a long day on the bus.
I need a little bit of down time.
My feet are killing me.
Gary, come on, my feet are killing me, too.
I'm exhausted.
I worked all day.
Went to the market.
I cleaned this entire condo and then I've been cooking for the last three hours.
Come on.
Help set the table.
GARY:
Sweetheart.
What?
You've done such a great job already.
Don't you want to finish it yourself and have that personal power of that accomplishment?
Set the table.
Listen to me.
Do you think that when Michelangelo, right, was painting the Sixteenth Chapel, that he said,
"Hey, guys, you know, I did pretty good on the first 15 chapels,
"but why don't you help me design this one?
"And maybe you could help me...
Give me a brush
"and you guys can grab brushes, and we can all make a great chapel." Uh-uh.
No, he didn't.
And you wanna know what the results were?
A masterpiece.
Okay.
It's the Sistine Chapel, not the Sixteenth, and I bet when Michelangelo asked for 12 brushes, they didn't bring him three.
Yeah.
Okay, all the talking is really starting to drain me, and now I'm gonna have to watch the highlights later to see what I missed here.
Honey, look, Gary, just...
Down time's important.
Gary, please just take a shower, okay?
Down time's important.
'Cause this is what I don't want to have happen.
I don't want the doorbell to ring.
I'm then forced to answer the door, entertain people, and I'm still cooking dinner.
Yeah.
Okay?
You're absolutely right.
Let's do that.
The second that this inning's over...
Gary.
There's one out all ready.
They're gonna be here in 20 minutes.
Baby, have you ever seen a shower of mine take more than four minutes?
Yes, I have.
Come on.
(DOORBELL RINGING) Oh, great!
They're here.
Okay.
Table's not set.
Dinner's not ready.
Would you please just let my parents in?
I gotta jump in the shower.
What?
(DOORBELL RINGING) I gotta go.
Gary.
Gary.
(DOORBELL RINGING)
GARY:
Well, seeing how our families haven't had many opportunities to get to know one another, we figured, what better way than to break some bread?
So, everyone, thank you for coming and enjoy the meal.
ALL:
Cheers.
Cheers, honey.
Mrs. Grobowski.
Nice to meet you.
Thank you.
DENNIS:
Cheer with the sons.
GARY:
Sweetheart, cheers to you.
Darling, I see that you put those Feng Shui books that I sent to you to good use.
This place is so well balanced.
Thanks, Mom.
Yeah, the energy in this place is just amazing.
WENDY:
Yes.
Well, the energy in the condo might be a little more amazing if we had a pool table.
Gary, we've already discussed that.
We're gonna get a pool table when we get a bigger place.
The place is plenty big now, if you wanted a pool table because...
Gary.
Yeah.
You could take the dining room table, go ahead and move her in the living room.
BROOKE:
Really?
GARY:
Plenty of room.
And put a dining room table in the living room?
Okay.
How do you...
I mean, what do you do with a dining room table?
Eat on it.
We'd have no furniture in the living...
Where's the furniture go?
All I'm saying is, it would be nice to be able to shoot some pool.
Well, this isn't a dorm.
Look, baby, I completely understand.
There's halls and stuff.
I mean, you can go...
We will wait and get a pool table when we have a bigger place.
Thank you.
The food is outstanding.
It is delicious food.
DENNIS:
It's outstanding.
LUPUS:
Yeah, it really is nice.
Okay, everybody.
Time for the joke of the day.
Knock, knock.
Dad.
Dad, come on.
Who's there?
Norma Lee.
Norma Lee, who?
Normally, I don't go around knocking on doors, but would you like to buy an encyclopedia?
LUPUS:
I got a joke.
I got a joke.
(ALL CHUCKLING) How's it going?
I got a joke for you.
What do you get when you cross a gay Eskimo and a black guy?
All right, look, I think we've had enough with the jokes for tonight.
Thank you, though.
Let's just talk with each other.
All right.
I saw that Three Brothers article in the Trib this week.
Sounds like you guys are up to some pretty exciting stuff.
Basically, our big goal is to try to take Chicago tourism by air, land and sea.
We're still in the ground phase with the buses.
But as soon as we get our infantry established, then we'll take it to the squids.
Yeah.
Boats.
Boats.
Oh, boats.
As soon as we control the waterway, then we'll bring in air supports and then we'll pretty much control everything.
You know, Dennis, the way your face lights up when you describe your ambitions, it's really inspiring.
Oh, thanks.
Because I understand how you feel that passion.
RICHARD:
And sharing it with other people, I think that's what life's about.
I don't feel that about boats and squibs...
Squids?
ALL:
Squids.
Sorry.
CAROL:
Yeah.
But I do feel it about singing.
With my a cappella group, The Tone Rangers.
Although it's not as aggressive as your dream, it's really more of a brotherhood.
It's like a musical team.
It's like a symphony of guys.
Guy symphony.
And it's very hard to describe the true magic of a group of guys singing in perfect harmony.
It's transcendent.
But it's still very real.
I guess the best way to put it in words is just... (SINGING SINGLE NOTE)
Even that doesn't do it.
That doesn't do it because that's just one person.
And what I'm talking about is the pulse of the collective.
Oh, heck.
Let me just show you how it's done.
Dad, how about a little percussion?
RICHARD:
Tap-tap-tappy.
Tap-tap-tappy.
And, Mom, high-hat.
(HISSING)
RICHARD:
Good, Mom.
Excellent.
And Gary!
(RHYTHMICALLY) On the kick drum!
Come, come!
On the kick drum!
Come, come!
That's Gary!
Come, come with the kick drum.
Come!
Come, come with the kick drum.
Gary, on the kick drum.
Come, come.
That's Gary on the kick drum.
Go!
And Gary.
In the house.
Come, come.
I'm not with you.
Come, come.
With the kick drum.
Come, come.
I'm just not really the kick drum kind of guy.
I'd rather be just a listener and enjoy all the banging that he's doing and the...
You know, Gary, that's your prerogative.
That's your right, to listen.
Meantime, I've gotta talk to Brooke about something.
It's called the bass line.
Excuse me.
Okay.
(PITCH PIPE PLAYING)
(HUMMING RHYTHMICALLY)
(SCATTING)
(HISSING)
Good, Carol.
Good, Brooke.
(ALL SINGING)
RICHARD:
Yes, Dennis.
(WHISPERING) Be nice.
RICHARD:
Totally awesome.
(MIMICKING METALLIC CLANGING)
Move yourself
You always live your life
Never thinking of the future
Prove yourself
You are the move you make
Take your chances win or loser
See yourself
You're every step you take
You and you and that's the only way
Shake WENDY:
Shake!
Shake yourself
You're every move you make
So the story goes
CAROL:
Thank you so much.
BROOKE:
Okay, bye.
WENDY:
Thank you so much.
CAROL:
It was great to see you.
Okay.
Come on.
Have a good night.
It was really nice, Gary.
Nice to see you.
You, too.
Good to see you guys.
Thanks, Brookie.
Oh, honey.
Thank you, sweetie.
You're still my favorite singer.
Stop it.
Love you, sis.
And I'd love for you to come to a live performance of The Tone Rangers singing live.
That's something you'd really enjoy.
It was good seeing you.
Okay.
Thank you.
All right.
Bye, darling.
Thank you for such a...
Okay.
Okay, Mom.
We'll see you soon.
Bye, dear.
Thanks, darling.
See you later.
Okay, buddy.
Oh, now, are you sure that we can't help you clean up?
No, no.
I think we're gonna be great.
We'II...
Yes?
So nice of you to offer, but we got it.
Thank you.
Oh, it was such fun.
Great.
I love you.
Great to see you.
Good night, sweetie.
Thank you so much.
I appreciate it.
Thank you so much.
All right, guys.
WENDY:
Bye-bye.
Bye-bye.
Thanks for coming.
Love you, too.
MAN ON TV:
Are you blind?
(HORN TOOTING)
Oh, no, no!
My demos!
(MAN ON TV SCREAMING)
Well, I'm gonna go do the dishes.
Cool.
It'd be nice if you helped me.
Damn it.
MAN:
Way to go!
No problem.
I'll get them a little bit later.
I'm just gonna hit the streets here for a little bit.
Gary, come on, I don't want to do them later.
Let's just do them now.
It'll take 15 minutes.
Honey, I am so exhausted.
I just honestly want to relax for a little bit.
If I could just sit here, let my food digest, and just try to enjoy the quiet for a little bit.
Get some!
Get some!
Get some!
That's what happens.
And we will...
You know, we can clean the dishes tomorrow.
Gary, you know I don't like waking up to a dirty kitchen.
Who cares?
I care!
All right?
I care!
I busted my ass all day cleaning this house and then cooking that meal.
And I worked today.
It would be nice if you said thank you and helped me with the dishes.
Fine.
I'll help you do the damn dishes.
Oh, come on.
You know what?
No.
See?
That's not what I want.
You just said that you want me to help you do the dishes.
I want you to want to do the dishes.
Why would I want to do dishes?
Why?
See, that's my whole point.
Let me see if I'm following this, okay?
Are you telling me that you're upset because I don't have a strong desire to clean dishes?
No.
I'm upset because you don't have a strong desire to offer to do the dishes.
I just did.
After I asked you!
Jesus, Brooke, you're acting crazy again.
Don't you call me crazy.
I am not crazy.
I didn't call you crazy.
You just did.
I didn't call you...
No, I didn't.
I said you're acting crazy.
You know what, Gary?
I asked you to do one thing today, one very simple thing, to bring me 12 lemons and you brought me three.
God damn it.
If I knew that it was gonna be this much trouble,
I would have brought home 24 lemons.
Even 100 lemons.
You know what I wish?
I wish everyone that was at that goddamn table had their own little private bag of lemons.
Honest to God!
Gary, it's not about the lemons.
Well, that's all you're talking about.
I'm just saying it'd be nice if you did things that I asked.
It would be even nicer if you did things without me having to ask you!
Well, I do seem to remember doing something for you this morning without you asking.
Gary, come on.
What?
I'm serious.
Come here.
You know what?
I'm serious.
I really am.
I am, too.
Come on.
You knew I was working today and I made that meal.
And you could have thought to yourself, you know, you could have said,
"Yeah, I think I'm gonna get Brooke some flowers."
You said on our very first date that you don't like flowers, that they're a waste of money.
Every girl likes flowers, Gary.
You said that you don't like flowers.
I'm supposed to take that to mean that you do like flowers?
No.
This is not about...
You're not...
God, you're not getting it.
You're not getting this, Gary, okay?
It's not about the lemons.
It's not about the flowers.
It's not about the dishes.
It's just about...
How many times do I have to drop hints about the ballet?
You know I can't stand...
Brooke, come here.
We've talked about the damn ballet.
I hate the goddamn ballet!
You got a bunch of dudes in tights flopping around for three hours.
It's like a medieval techno show.
It's a nightmare.
I sit there in a sweat.
The whole thing, I do, wondering when the hell's the goddamn nightmare gonna end.
Go to a damn ballet.
It's not about you loving the ballet, Gary.
It's about the person that you love loves the ballet and you wanting to spend time with that person.
Not when they're at the ballet.
Okay.
Forget the ballet!
Forget the ballet!
I will.
We don't go anywhere together.
We just went to Ann Arbor together.
To Ann Arbor.
To the Michigan-Notre Dame game.
You think screaming, drunk kids and leprechauns doing backflips, that's fun.
That's fun for me.
Come on, man.
I did that for you.
What do you...
How do you show up for me?
I'm up on the bus every goddamn day for you!
Come on.
You...
I'm busting my ass to be the best tour guide in the damn city, so I can make enough money to support both of us and hopefully you won't have to work one day.
I want to work.
All I ask, Brooke, is that you show a little bit of appreciation.
That I just get 20 minutes to relax when I come home, instead of being attacked with questions and nagged the whole damn time.
You think that I nag you?
That's all you do!
All you do is nag me!
"The bathroom's a mess." "Your belt doesn't match."
"Hey, Gary, you should probably go work out."
Nothing I ever do is ever good enough!
I just want to be left the hell alone!
Really?
Is that what you want, Gary?
Is that what you want?
Yeah.
That's what you want?
Yeah.
Fine.
Great.
Do whatever the hell you want.
You leave your socks all over this house, dress like a pig, play your stupid-ass video game.
I don't care, I'm done.
What?
I'm done!
I don't deserve this.
I really do not deserve this.
I deserve somebody who gives a shit.
I'm not spending one more second of this life with some inconsiderate prick!
You're a prick!
(DOOR SLAMMING)
(DOOR SHUTS)
Addie, it just became so clear tonight how much he takes me for granted.
What happened?
BROOKE:
Just the same old shit.
I asked him to do one thing and he didn't do it.
Then he complained that he had to do anything, and I just felt like I had no choice.
No, sweetie, you did have a choice, okay?
And it sounds like you made the right one.
You respected yourself.
But it's just not what I want.
I don't want to break up with him.
I don't.
I just want him to say thank you.
I want him to want to do the dishes.
I just want him to want to take me to the ballet.
I want him to get me 12 lemons!
You know...
I just want him to care enough about this relationship to want to work on it.
Okay, you know what?
I'm putting on my shoes and I'm gonna be there in 15 minutes.
No, Ad.
Don't.
Please, I really don't want to see anybody.
I really don't.
But, look, I'm worried about you, okay?
And I can hear you in there banging around your dishes.
And I don't want you getting out your Clorox and your rubber gloves, and taking this out on the kitchen.
Look, look, look.
Okay.
Tonight just...
It just got a little out of hand, and hopefully he's just gonna realize that he's got some changes to make and he's gonna...
He's gonna come home and apologize.
Okay?
That's what's gonna happen.
GARY:
I feel like, I don't...
You know, like, you dress however you want to dress.
You know, do whatever you want to do.
I'm done with the relationship.
Whatever.
So, it's just kind of, "You're done with the relationship?"
Well, you're obviously hurt about it.
She got to you.
You're hurt.
I'm not.
It's nothing to be ashamed of.
She hurt you.
Will you look at me?
I'm not heartbroken.
I'm a little shocked.
I'm a little surprised.
Gary, you're devastated.
Now, what's the name of the guy she's doing?
I'm gonna solve your problem.
What's his name?
What are you talking about?
Have you checked her e-mail?
I don't check e-mails.
I don't...
You can get a program that records keystrokes.
It costs, like, 20 bucks.
Very easy to use.
Okay?
You get a password, you check her e-mail.
You find out everything about her.
That's how I found out about the Puerto Rican that Stacy was running around with.
Okay.
You are reading a little too much into this situation.
There is no one she's running around with, okay?
We had a fight over the groceries I brought home.
You're probably right.
She's probably not sleeping with anybody.
No.
Not what it's about.
Okay.
Maybe she's with another guy, maybe not.
She's not.
I don't know.
I'm not Columbo.
Okay?
But what we do know is that she doesn't want to be with you anymore.
I mean, I hate to be shitty about it, and so cut and dry, but let's face it.
She says she doesn't want to be with you, and I believe her.
Now, we gotta figure it out.
And you're gonna need a place to go and lick your wounds while you get your head right over this thing.
I don't need a place to go and lick my wounds.
You're gonna stay with me.
I'm not gonna hear it.
Look it...
I'm not moving out of the place.
Oh, you're not moving out.
No.
I put money in the place.
I put half my money in the place.
You're obviously not the one calling the shots in this case.
Yeah, but I own the place.
With her.
Yeah.
But it's not up to her who gets to keep the goddamn place.
If you find out who she's sleeping with, maybe we could leverage it.
I want you to listen to me.
You listen to me.
I'm gonna leave you a key.
I don't need a key.
Why?
'Cause she's gonna put...
She's gonna move out of the place, Johnny.
Did she say she was moving out?
She will.
She's gonna move out.
Oh, she's...
I'm gonna keep the place.
I'm not moving out of the place.
I'll leave you a key.
(DOOR OPENING)
(DOOR SHUTTING)
(TOOL WHIRRING)
Hey, how's it going?
LUPUS:
I almost got it.
Yeah.
You know, I was thinking.
You know what you should do, is you should find somebody who looks like Brooke, but even hotter and, you know, bang the shit out of her.
What the hell's wrong with you?
What?
Logs.
Just fix the damn engine.
I am fixing the goddamn engine.
I need your tour logs.
I'm off the clock, okay?
Well, I cannot file the quarterlies until I have your log.
I'm going through a little bit of a life change here, Dennis.
I would really appreciate a little bit of sensitivity, please.
CHRISTOPHER:
I know they're both French, but that has nothing to do with it.
Because Manet was earlier and...
No.
Monet and Manet are very different things.
I'm sorry, I beg to differ.
Excuse me, sir, can I have her call you back personally?
Yes.
Okay, thank you.
Sorry.
Brooke?
I am so sorry.
What?
Come here.
Oh, honey, your mom called and told me everything.
Oh, Jesus.
Good morning, Marilyn.
Morning.
I'll go water the plants.
I understand you had a long night.
Tell me everything.
BROOKE: "Everything." I couldn't possibly...
Then don't.
My time is pressing.
What I want is for you to take the rest of the day off.
Oh, no.
No, that's not necessary.
Who am I?
Marilyn Dean.
And where are we?
The Marilyn Dean Gallery.
And of whom is that portrait?
That is Marilyn Dean.
Yeah.
You know, your personal life is your personal life.
But you look like shit.
And when you look like shit,
Marilyn Dean looks like shit, and now it is my business.
And when it comes to my business, I don't like anything that's distracting.
So, I want you to take the rest of the day off to be sad and then come back to work tomorrow ready to take care of business.
Got it?
(ELEVATOR BELL DINGS)
(ROCK MUSIC BLARING)
(POOL BALLS CLACKING)
Oh, hey, Brooke.
How are you?
What the hell are you doing?
Well, my whole life, I always wanted my own place with my own pool table.
I finally got my own place, but you would not allow me to have a pool table.
I just kind of figured I'd rectify that today.
And it does feel good.
I'm gonna go ahead and put the four ball in the corner pocket.
Nice.
I'm sorry, can I...
A little room for the shooter, please?
It's hard to shoot with someone standing...
Thank you.
(POOL BALLS CLACKING)
Wow.
Well, I guess he feels threatened that you broke up with him and he's acting out.
Okay, look, Brooke, men are like children.
You know?
And they... (WHISPERING) Sweetie, it's a figure of speech.
It's Brooke.
And I love you so much.
And you're my man and you know that.
You're amazing.
I love you.
Listen, and they're gonna test boundaries to see what they can get away with.
I think there's three things that Gary needs to know.
One, this type of behavior is not unnoticed.
Two, it's not acceptable.
And three, you know, you're definitely not gonna tolerate it.
Right?
Yes.
And Brooke, remember, we're always owning our actions, right?
And we're always healthy with it, yes?
Yes.
I don't wanna finish the game.
I got showings, okay?
I gotta buy the cookie spray.
I gotta clean up the dog.
(YOU OUGHTA KNOW PLAYING)
And now I'm really leaving 'cause I don't want to hear that.
Okay?
Thank you for the pool.
Thank you for the snacks.
I'm going to get a cab.
I'll split it with you.
What are you, 12?
Brooke, that is not healthy.
I'm trying to make a point.
And what is that point?
My point's your point.
Your three points.
That it's not unnoticed, that it was not acceptable, and that it would definitely not be tolerated.
Not exactly what I meant.
Unbelievable.
I knew it!
Hey, gang.
Found my shirt on the floor.
Thanks for laying it out.
Gary, are you here for couples bowling?
Yeah.
Well, don't you think you and I should discuss something first?
Like what?
How your 47 average is killing us?
Okay.
Great.
No.
Gary, this is couples bowling.
And since you and I are no longer a couple, because you have chosen not to participate constructively in our relationship, we're now singles.
So, there's not room for two singles on the team.
Why do you look confused?
I don't have any idea what's happening.
I've come to play on the team.
Look, Gary, I just don't think it's a good idea for you and I to be around each other any more than we have to right now.
I completely agree.
Maybe you should go play some pinball.
No, I think you should leave.
Okay.
Brooke, when a man makes a commitment to a team, he honors that commitment.
He doesn't let emotions or personal issues get in the way of victory.
And I've made a commitment to this team.
They don't want you here either, Gary.
Yeah.
Sure, they don't.
They don't.
They're my friends.
But you're not a strong bowler.
That's not the point.
You know what?
Let's just...
Why don't we let them decide?
Gary, don't.
No.
Don't involve them, okay?
That's unnecessary.
What's wrong, Castro?
Castro?
Well, Castro doesn't let people vote as a team.
Okay.
Ask them.
Thank you.
Okay, everyone.
Team vote here.
By a show of hands, just put it up when you make a decision, who here agrees with Brooke and thinks I should leave the bowling team?
Shocker.
Band of Brothers.
You should rent it sometime.
Good luck, everyone.
Riding Miss Gutter Ball to the finals.
Hey, Gary.
Yeah.
I'm gonna need your shirt back.
What?
Well, we're gonna have to replace you, and you know we get docked 10 pins if everyone's not in matching Pin Shakers uniforms.
My shirt says "Gary" on it.
Granted.
But actually, we know a guy named Gary.
And he's not as tall as you, but he's a pretty good bowler.
I'm gonna have to request that I have my wrist guard back then.
I'm sorry.
That's mine.
Just give me the goddamn wrist guard, please.
Thank you.
I hope your wrist snaps.
Wow.
Okay?
You see that?
You know what I mean?
Yeah.
That was awesome.
You just had your ex-boyfriend, who you wish you were still dating, voted off the bowling team.
Well, I had to do that to get him right where I want him.
Where's that?
Shirtless in the parking lot?
Addie, you're not getting this.
Gary loves this bowling team.
He's hurt right now.
He's feeling pretty bad.
He's gonna go out there and he's gonna get drunk.
He's gonna make a complete fool of himself.
And he will be sitting there feeling pretty lonely and pretty pathetic, and then it's just gonna hit him.
What's gonna hit him?
That not only is he out a girlfriend, but his life is just falling apart piece by piece and maybe that life was pretty great.
And maybe I was the glue that was holding it all together.
And if he wants that life back, he's gonna have no choice but to change.
(MUSIC PLAYING)
How about this, huh?
I feel like we just found hell.
When did you start coming to knobby joints like this?
I might be the greatest you've ever seen, pal.
I'm conquering new frontiers.
Hello, babe.
Yeah, you've got to put up with the bad music and the $15 drinks, but this place is stacked with top-shelf, young, dumb ass.
All you gotta do is just separate the weaker ones from the herd.
Come on, I'll get you into the VIP.
Can I get a couple drinks from you?
Okay, L.G.
Lupus, I got to be totally...
I got to be honest with you.
I'm not feeling it here.
You're gonna like it in here.
You're gonna love it.
I don't like it out here.
Look, listen to me, will you, please?
How you doing, Buzz?
While you were on the inside locked up for the past two years, the game has changed.
(WOMEN CHEERING)
Do you remember when you were an outdoor cat and you used to have to hunt and kill for your food?
Well, you've become an indoor cat.
You've been getting your milk brought to you in a silver bowl, and guess what?
Now, you've been tossed back outside and the alley has changed.
For example, your MTV generation, your technology, your text message, your TiVo.
You name it.
People want their information faster.
People e-mail each other because they want to exchange information, Gar.
They don't want to connect, they want results.
Okay.
You gotta get to the message quicker.
Now, I want you to watch.
It's real simple.
Okay?
How you doing, ladies?
Now, here's what I'd like to do to you.
First, I'd like to get you naked.
And then I'm gonna take some Saran Wrap and I'm gonna wrap you up in it, head to toe.
Then I'm gonna cut out two holes.
One for your mouth, so you can breathe, obviously.
And the other one...
Asshole.
It could be a gorgeous evening for us, babe.
The pink is gorgeous.
Jesus, God.
Come here.
Lupus, listen to me.
I want you to listen to me.
There are our drinks.
You want your drink?
No, I'm fine.
Thank you.
The L.G. thanks you.
Will you listen to me, please?
You're my brother and I love you very much, and maybe you do get laid tonight, but maybe you get arrested.
Arrested for what, babe?
Being awesome?
Come on, babe, listen.
You want to tell your jokes, tell your jokes.
But sooner or later you're gonna get hungry and you're gonna wanna eat.
And jokes might make you feel better, but they don't get you fed.
I'm gonna go take a lap.
(DOOR OPENING)
(DOOR SHUTTING)
What are you doing?
I'm sketching.
And where are you sketching?
In the living room.
No, in my bedroom.
And I didn't say anything to you, Brooke, when you so arrogantly claimed the bed without asking me, but you can't just waltz into my room and turn it into a damn art fair.
Gary, I've only taken up a little bit of space, so...
I don't care if you only took an inch.
There might not be a door here, but this is my domain.
Okay?
I don't go into your bedroom and set up a goddamn sawhorse.
Well, then what the hell is that pool table doing in the dining room?
Because that's a common area.
And that's where this belongs.
Not in my room.
Hey, what are you doing?
It belongs in another common area.
Gary.
People want to come home and they want to relax in their room.
Gary, it is 2:00 in the morning!
Don't you drop my things.
I don't know what to tell you, kid.
This is how I am when I'm single.
My hours start to get pretty strange.
Might be time for you to think about moving out.
Why would I...
No, I'm not moving anywhere.
Gary, just please turn the volume down.
Yeah, but I don't tell you what the hell to do in your room.
You can doodle.
You can dance.
You can bake a goddamn gingerbread house.
I don't give a shit.
But in my room, I want to relax and watch my highlights in complete surround-sound experience.
What the hell are you doing?
You're not even gonna watch it!
Don't tell me what I am or aren't not doing.
Oh, what you are not, not doing?
Go learn some English.
Oh, I'm sorry.
I didn't have a grandfather on the board of some fancy college.
Key word being "was." Did he touch the Filipino exchange student?
Did he not touch the exchange student?
I don't know, Brooke.
I wasn't there.
Okay.
No, don't start with the family stuff.
Like your family's so perfect?
Your brother's a pervert!
Don't talk to me about the sexual habits of family members.
What about your sister?
My sister's been through a lot.
Of dick.
There are some problems, Gary, but can we please just leave it...
Problems?
She slept with the entire Arizona Cardinals offensive line.
That's not problems.
That's she's the problem!
She was on vacation!
She was on vacation.
Don't even get me started, by the way, on your brother.
If I have to hear that guy sing just one more time,
I'd hang myself with wax dental floss.
Could the guy just come out of the closet, please?
Richard is not gay.
Okay, lassie, I want you to listen to me and listen good.
I'm not saying he won't get married.
I'm not saying he won't even have kids.
But then one day his wife will come home, and then she'll find him with a guy named Majulio, wearing leather helmets and clubbing each other to Yanni's greatest hits.
Yeah.
Right.
Whatever.
You're an infant.
Yeah, I'm an infant.
Go enjoy your room, Brooke, 'cause I'm gonna enjoy mine!
Okay.
You know what?
I might enjoy some pay-per-view options tonight.
It's gonna be a long one, sweetheart, and I got nothing to do mañana but sleep in.
(DOOR SLAMMING)
(BOOGIE NIGHTS PLAYING)
(SINGING) Boogie nights Ain't no doubt we are here to party
What are you doing?
Boogie nights Come on now, got to get it started
Ricky, you and the Get Along Gang leave or I'm gonna throw you out of here personally, you understand?
Actually, Gary, this is Brooke's bedroom.
So, technically, you don't have jurisdiction here, but I think it'd be really fun if you sang with us.
Come on, Gary.
I think you'll like it.
You got 10 seconds to get out of here or I'm gonna break your damn magic whistle.
You understand what I'm saying to you?
Move this group out of my house, now!
(EXCLAIMING)
(GRUNTING)
(ALL SINGING)
Gary, you can't take a pitch pipe out of a guy's hand when he's in the middle of a very funky groove.
You can get hurt doing something like that.
I'm tapping out, I'm tapping out!
Here we go.
From the bridge.
(SINGING) Party night Get on down with the sound of the music
Boogie nights Do it, do it
What kind of bullshit move was that?
I'm sorry.
What?
What happened?
Oh, don't be coy with me.
You sent that animal over here to attack me when I was hung over and weak.
Oh, no.
Look, all I know is The Tone Rangers, they needed someplace to rehearse, so I very clearly told Richard, "Stay in my room,"
which you explained to me was my space to do with what I want.
Is that how you want to play it?
'Cause I'll play it like that.
I'll play it like Lionel Richie.
All night long, lady.
Oh, yeah.
I'll call some guys from my neck of the woods.
And we're not talking, Brooke, about a couple of queens who know a few grapples.
We're talking about Polacks that don't have a goddamn future.
Right.
That's right!
We can make shit real uncomfortable around here, and that's what we're gonna do.
Please.
Come on.
You know what?
You're just embarrassed because Richard kicked your ass.
Richard did not kick my ass.
What Richard did was attack me when I was half asleep.
Really?
Is that how you see it?
There's a really big gap between getting your ass kicked and having a dancing, singing sprite fool you with trickery and then strike your throat before you know that you're even in a fight.
And I wouldn't expect someone like you to understand that, because all you ever do is make moves from up in your ivy tower.
Wow.
You have officially gone off the reservation.
I'm an adult.
I talk through shit.
He ran out of ideas.
God.
Listen, by the way, there's messages on the voice mail regarding game night, which is obviously not gonna happen, so you might want to call people and tell them that it's canceled.
Why would I cancel game night?
Well, I mean...
If it's our turn to host game, I'm gonna host goddamn game night.
You want to host game night?
I'm fine, Brooke.
I don't have any strangeness over what happened here today.
Okay.
If there's anyone that should feel weird about seeing people, that's you, Tonya Harding.
Me?
I'm gonna honor my commitments.
Great.
Great.
Fine.
Fine.
Let's do that.
Let's do that.
Let's honor the commitment.
(WATER RUNNING)
Hey, there's no food in there!
BROOKE:
So?
Well, people are gonna be here in an hour.
What are they supposed to eat?
You're a big boy.
Figure it out.
Oh, great.
Well, that's what we got.
We have only tap water because, you know, Gary didn't shop.
BROOKE:
And we don't have any ice either 'cause he didn't fill the trays.
That's trash.
It's your shot.
What is your name again?
Diane.
Diane.
GARY:
Did you call?
JOHNNY O:
I called the five.
Well, yeah, but you didn't call the second ball, so that's trash, so it's your shot.
GARY:
You got to play by the rules.
It's your shot.
Hi.
Hi.
Andrew.
BROOKE:
Oh, hi.
Whoa, whoa, whoa!
Hey, hey, hey!
These two Benedict Arnolds aren't welcome in my condo.
Who sent an invite to them?
I'm sorry.
These are very loyal friends and they are always welcome in my condo.
Oh, really?
Why don't we take it to a vote and see who has the numbers this time?
GARY:
All right.
Show of hands here.
Who thinks that these two traitors should leave and not be a part of game night?
And maybe take their shirts off when they leave.
Raise your hand.
I know I feel that way.
Who else?
GARY:
Come on, Johnny O, put your hand up, please.
Come on.
Thank you.
You, Miss?
New girl.
Who's the girl?
What's her name?
What's her name?
The girl you're with.
What's her name?
Her name's Diane.
Oh, I'm sorry.
You might want to go ahead and touch some sky.
Thank you.
Come on, Riggleman, please?
What are you doing?
No.
We need the eight to count towards a running tally.
You know that.
Come on.
Show her whose side that you're on.
Put your hand in the air.
You know whose side I'm on.
You know we need eight, though.
Come on.
Put your hand down.
Please don't touch my Ruffles.
GARY:
Put that one back.
Those are my Ruffles.
Don't eat them, please.
Thank you.
Oh, Gary.
They're mine.
Come on.
Here we go.
All right.
RIGGLEMAN:
Eyes front.
Ready?
Hold on.
Get the timer going, please.
Ready?
GARY:
Now I gotta do it.
Go.
ANDREW:
Okay.
It's a brick.
ADDIE:
Square.
Square.
Box.
Box.
Corner.
Corner.
A dot in the corner.
A house.
Home plate!
JEN:
Football!
Baseball!
Sports.
A house.
ADDIE:
A triangle.
It's algebra.
Okay, it's a house.
ADDIE:
It's a house.
JEN:
It's a house.
ANDREW:
Two words.
JEN:
Banana?
ADDIE:
Chimney, chimney, chimney!
A fruit.
House.
Fruit.
Oh, restaurant.
Or...
ANDREW:
No, chimney, chimney.
ADDIE:
Smoke...
JEN:
Oh, a house call.
House call!
(TIMER RINGING) Oh!
House call!
Yeah, well, I thought it was a house call.
Like a hotel, then it hit me it was a house.
ADDIE:
Yeah!
You're terrific.
Absolutely terrific.
All right, beat that.
Okay, guys, listen.
The next one wins, okay?
So let's stay focused.
Let's stay calm.
We can do this.
High fives.
Let's go.
Come on.
Let's go.
Let's get a mind-meld.
Let's try and get a mind-meld, okay?
GARY:
Here we go.
Let's go.
Mind-meld.
I heard you!
Don't over-think it.
Mind meld.
ANDREW:
Ready?
I heard you!
Well, just keep it simple.
Shush.
Ready?
Wait.
Go!
Here we go!
We're mind-melding.
Draw faster.
It doesn't have to be beautiful, just has to be something we can get.
Shoe, shoe...
Shoe!
Shoe, shoe, shoe.
Shoeless Joe Jackson.
Draw something different.
No one's getting it.
Shoe.
What, is that a smaller shoe?
JOHNNY O:
Baby shoe.
Smaller shoe.
Baby shoes.
JOHNNY O:
Shoes.
Baby shoes.
Smaller shoe.
Gumshoe.
GARY:
Smaller shoes.
DIANE:
Gumshoe?
Gumshoe?
Running Olympics.
JOHNNY O:
Inside the shoe.
Inside a shoe.
A bubble...
JOHNNY O:
Lining.
Stop pointing at the shoe.
We're not...
No one's guessing shoe.
Stop pointing at the shoe and draw something different.
(TIMER RINGING) Draw something different.
You...
Goddamn it!
No one's guessing shoe!
You drew a big shoe, then a small shoe, and no one got it.
You gotta draw something different.
Everyone said "shoe" seven times.
It's a sock, asshole.
You call yourself an artist?
Yes!
A three-year-old with a box of crayons could do a better job than this.
I'm sorry, I don't have the great talent of standing on top of a big red bus and pointing out architecture that other great men have built!
I'm the one who should be sorry, Brooke.
I shouldn't sit here and pick on your art.
No.
Because you got the nuts part down, Picasso.
GARY:
All you have to do is cut off your frigging ear.
BROOKE:
That's Van Gogh, you idiot!
And your insults are much more effective when they're accurate.
Don't talk to me about being goddamn accurate!
I can talk to you about anything that I want.
'Cause you couldn't even draw a sock.
You don't do anything right!
You're a lazy...
Everyone said, "Shoe, shoe, shoe!"
At first, I figured that the split was just something temporary, something that you two would work out and get past, but after tonight I think it's pretty clear that you two genuinely do not want to get back together.
There's not a shot in hell.
Gary.
I'm just...
I got you.
As your friend and as your realtor,
I'm not gonna leave here tonight until we decide what to do about this condo, because this living situation is obviously not working out.
Gary?
Well, the only logical thing that I can think of is for her to move out of the condo, and then to pay me some sort of a penalty as compensation for the labor that I did all around the condo.
What?
What?
What?
Pay you compensation for your labor?
We fixed this place up together.
Are you nuts?
Stop calling me nuts, I swear to God.
I fixed the...
You went around with a sponge, and you went in the bathroom and you dotted foofy shit.
That's what you're saying that I did?
GARY:
There's no...
BROOKE:
That was...
That's called aesthetics.
It warmed this place up so it didn't look like an army barracks, which it was about to.
I'll tell you what it's called in his language, depreciated.
That's what it's called.
You don't even know what that means.
Unless the next buyer happens to have your same Zulu-voodoo-land taste.
All right.
Let me tell you something else.
It's gonna cost money to cover up the holes in the wall.
The holes that you drilled in the wall there to hang up whatever that thing is called.
Oh, please.
Gary.
GARY:
You're gonna have to cost money to fix that.
What I did, Brooke, has concrete value to the condo.
I added concrete...
Well, let's just go on record.
We're dealing with facts here.
I did the tiling in the bathroom.
Have you seen...
I did the new track lighting.
That tile is the shittiest tile job.
GARY:
I did the plumbing!
The plumbing!
That's realty terms.
Okay.
Let's talk about your plumbing.
This is his plumbing.
We have two temperatures in our bathroom.
We get either scalding hot or we get frostbite.
That's it.
That's all we get.
It's my problem that she doesn't know how to pace a shower?
GARY:
Now all of a sudden that's my fault.
I get a minute to take a shower.
One minute?
BROOKE:
One minute of warmth?
Oh, Jesus.
One minute.
That's it.
That's correct.
Thank God you're not in charge of keeping all the clocks in Chicago on time.
This is basic logic.
You are out of your mind.
You have lost it.
Let me explain this to you in plain chapter and verse.
Cheese and rice, you guys are gonna kill each other.
Now, let's just...
Realistically speaking, neither one of you can afford this mortgage on your own, okay?
And that's a shame, because this building will continue to increase in value.
I get nothing but phone calls about it, all right?
Waiting for a unit to open up.
So, as your realtor, the last thing I would suggest is selling.
But as your friend, I just, I don't see any other solution.
You take your halves, you go your separate ways, and you get on with your lives.
I know that selling is not the easiest thing, but I do think that it's the best.
And to be honest, this is a situation where I would just as soon not take a commission.
That's great.
Thank you.
That's great.
Thank you for that.
I wish I didn't have to, you know, but company policy says I cannot waive that.
But I was just...
You know, I'm saying in theory, you know.
In this situation, 'cause we're friends, I wish I could waive it.
No can do, though.
As soon as you can, I would love to get a set of keys from you guys.
You just drop them off.
Okay.
Great.
There they are.
I'll be bringing by people all week.
You won't even know I'm here.
The good news is, should move quickly.
All right.
Okay to leave you two alone now?
Got to get back to Jen.
Very excited about the win tonight.
Okay.
(DOOR OPENING)
(DOOR CLOSING)
BROOKE:
Addie, if the condo sells, I think I'm gonna lose him.
ADDIE ON PHONE:
Yeah, but game night was so light and fun,
I'm really surprised to be hearing this.
Okay.
You know what?
That's not constructive.
Really.
I just...
Yeah, I need a new plan, Addie.
I don't... (SNICKERING)
I'm just kidding.
It's me.
I'm gonna have to call you back.
Whenever one of my friends is down, we all go on, like, happy patrol.
I was actually having a very serious conversation.
(SINGING) Christopher, do not sing.
(SINGING) If you're happy and you know it Clap your hands
If you're happy and you know it Clap your hands
If you're happy and you know it You're going to smile to... (DOOR SLAMS)
Pack up your shit and go home.
Okay.
You know what?
This is not his fault.
He was just really trying to cheer me up and it...
Did I or did I not give you the day off to be sad?
Yes.
But I...
Well, today's not that day, and unfortunately for you, I can't afford to look weak.
No, please.
You have warned me so many times and you have yet to fire me.
I think you and I both know that to find and train somebody new, it's gonna cost you time, and it's gonna cost you money, and I don't think you want to spend either one of those.
Now, look, I'm just gonna take a wild guess here, but you don't become Marilyn Dean without knowing how to handle men.
Okay?
Now, just listen to my problem, tell me how to fix it, and then we'll all go back to work.
Okay.
What is this problem so severe that has caused you to blaspheme in the synagogue of Marilyn Dean?
Well, it's Gary.
I broke up with him in hopes that losing me would make him want to change, and that's, you know...
And I've just ended up pushing him, you know, farther and farther away.
That's it?
Yeah.
Honey, this is not surrealism or cubism, it's paint-by-numbers.
Go see Mischa, my personal waxer at the spa.
Ask her for the Telly Savalas.
The Telly Savalas.
Compliments of M. Dean.
Then go show Gary your immaculate canvas and let him see another man eager to paint it.
Got it?
Got it?
Uh-huh.
Ow!
Who loves you, baby?
ANNOUNCER ON TV:
Wow, impressive.
Three sharp hands landed.
What an amazing display of punching technique.
The crowd jumps.
That punch rocked him.
They sense he's on the verge of hitting the canvas.
The roaring for anticipation of a knockout.
We are witnessing a great fight.
He's displaying incredible rhythm with his hands.
Bulldog terrorizing his opponent.
Down he goes!
Hard punch slams him to the canvas.
(WHO LOVES YA BABY PLAYING)
REFEREE:
One, two, three, four, five, six, seven, eight,
(BELL CLANGING) nine, ten.
It's over.
(DOORBELL RINGS)
(STAMMERING)
Is...
Did...
Is Brooke here?
I don't know.
(VIDEO GAME PLAYING)
Brooke?
BROOKE:
I'll be right there.
(EXPLOSIONS ON TV)
MAN:
Cool, baby, cool.
(SCREAMING)
So, how do you and Brooke know each other?
Well, how don't we know each other, you know what I mean?
BROOKE:
Hi, Paul.
Oh, hey.
Wow, you look great.
Thank you.
BROOKE:
Are you ready to go?
Yeah.
All set.
So, it was great meeting you.
Apple martinis.
All right, come on.
That normally does the trick.
Just ignore him.
But just two.
Three, she'll get sloppy.
You'll become a babysitter.
Oh, and fantasy role playing.
She's got a real thing for lifeguards.
Put some zinc oxide on your nose and she'll lose her mind.
It'll all be over with.
(DOOR CLOSES)
MAN:
Y'all want me to stop running?
I mean, the most challenging part of what I do is between February and April 15th.
That's what we in the biz like to call crunch time.
That sounds fascinating.
Good evening.
Hi.
Can I start you two off with something to drink?
Yeah, you know, we're gonna start with a couple of apple martinis, please.
No, you know what?
I'm gonna...
I'm just gonna start with a water.
Well, you can just bring those, just in case.
What was I saying?
Oh, yeah, yeah, yeah.
So, you know, it's not like it's all work and no play.
You know, I mean, after April 15th, that's what we in the biz like to call party time.
(CELL PHONE RINGING)
Excuse me.
Oh, I have to get this.
I'm so sorry.
Hello.
ADDIE:
Okay, is this when I'm supposed to call?
What?
What do you mean?
What?
Where?
What happened?
Okay, that's great.
Wait.
What?
Oh, all right.
Listen, where...
Just don't move.
Where are you?
I'm sitting in my kitchen.
Sitting?
Okay.
(STAMMERING) Don't move.
Don't...
I'm gonna be right there, honey.
I'm gonna be right there, okay?
Is everything okay?
Oh, my gosh.
That was my best friend.
She just had an accident and she...
She has this knee thing and she's just very fragile, and I have to go.
What?
I can give you a ride.
No.
No.
That's okay.
I'm gonna grab a cab, so...
I'm so sorry.
I like your dress.
I think he's fascinating.
He's obviously read a lot of books.
Yeah.
Yeah, I bet he has.
He reads a lot of books because nobody wants to talk to him.
He's a friend of Andrew's who's always been polite.
It's the best I could do on such short notice, okay?
Well, you know what?
Polite is not gonna do it.
We've got to find somebody who is really gonna make Gary jealous.
LUPUS:
Can I just say something?
You sound a little jealous, Gary.
GARY:
Why would I be jealous of some guy with computer skills?
Let's say he doesn't have computer skills, but he's got a big old elephant hog on him?
Would that bother you or would you be okay with that?
Not nearly as much as the way that your mind works.
LUPUS:
My mind works great.
So, what's this bullshit I hear about you selling the condo?
Selling that condo is ludicrous.
I was waiting for when I was gonna get the how-Gary-always- screws-his-life-up speech again.
This must be the right time.
Look, you tell me, you just tell me, tell me.
Is it happening now?
Yeah.
Okay.
Tell me how losing that asset is gonna get us on the river?
Go ahead, just tell me.
Tell me.
Somebody tell me.
What is this?
What is this?
What is it?
What is it?
Hey!
Don't patronize me.
Helicopters.
Helicopters.
Exactly!
How does losing the asset give us helicopters?
Dennis, I'm being totally serious with you.
I don't need this shit right now.
Hey, you want to cry, cry to Mom.
Nobody's crying.
I'm not crying.
I just don't feel like hearing it.
There's no feelings here.
This is about money and business.
Fine, you broke up.
You broke up.
Fine.
You know, sad.
Sad is, instead of putting $1,000 into your mortgage every month, you waste it on rent.
That's what sad is.
Oh, you're broke up.
You're confused, brokenhearted.
Heartbreak is not having that money as part of your net worth and then not saving the money, so that after taxes you can invest!
You know, you're confused.
Are you finished?
Look, I need the damn tour logs.
Yeah.
Well, I really, really appreciate the heart to heart.
It was a great talk, Dennis.
Thank you.
Oh, well, you're behind three months.
You're still behind three months.
And those logs are imperative to insuring that our books are straight!
I'll tell you what those logs are.
Those logs are bullshit is what they are!
You got the receipts.
Tally the goddamn things yourself!
I do, I do!
And I don't appreciate it, because it cuts into my time with my family.
I could be spending that time with my family instead of doing your books.
I already do the taxes.
I do the billing.
I do the hiring, the firing.
I do the maintenance.
Come on, what do you do?
What is it that you do?
You do the tours!
I am the talent, Dennis!
They sign up a month in advance to see me.
They'll wait in line for the next bus to see me!
All right?
So don't drain me with all this bullshit about the goddamn tour logs!
GARY:
How big's your TV?
BOY:
Oh, shut up!
How big's your TV, 'cause I wanna know if you can see what's happening.
Oh, wow.
You beat a 12-year-old.
I don't care if you're 12 years old.
You have more time in the day to play.
I live in the real world, my man,
(DOORBELL RINGING) with bills and responsibilities.
GARY:
That's right.
You can't have a handle called Mad Dog Killer if you complain every time...
Brooke?
Hi, Mike.
Hi.
Come on in.
Hold on, Mom.
I'm coming.
Is your mom in the room with you?
'Cause I hope she can't see what's happening.
I hope she can't see what's happening.
I'm gonna be just a few more seconds.
So, just sit down and relax.
Oh, yeah, no problem.
GARY:
I'm sorry?
Yeah, why'd you do that?
You take the fun out of beating you, because you have an excuse to lose.
Get a life, dude.
Do you think it's possible that your mom won't love you anymore if she sees how bad you're losing in the game.
Shut up!
Okay.
All right.
GARY:
That's great.
You're gonna stay man-to-man with me.
What happens when I make a play?
(MIKE GROANING) Making plays, making plays!
Making plays!
Well, you know, that's how my people like to handle their business.
While your guys are out partying, mine are running routes.
Try to make a difference.
Mike?
I'm ready to go.
Oh, hey, do you mind if we finish the game?
We got a real nail-biter going here.
Yeah, sure.
Of course.
Great.
Awesome, all right?
Touchdown.
Oh, God, is that pretty.
God, is that pretty.
Yeah, I'm a gentleman.
I like to be humble.
I'm old school.
I don't like to talk a lot.
But at the same time, am I talented?
Tell me how you felt about what just happened there.
That's him going deep.
That's him going...
Work ethic.
Work ethic.
I could play this game forever.
Oh, I could, too.
I love it, yeah.
I love it, don't you?
I mean, it's the kind of thing where literally
I play the game and it's like, four hours go by.
Fate has me highly skilled and loaded with talent.
Oh...
'Cause I think I'm good enough to figure out how to beat myself.
GARY:
You push yourself.
You push yourself trying to achieve the impossible, because you know that when that moment comes that everything you've done up to that moment has prepared you for victory!
I can't take credit for it, Mike.
I got to thank these little digital guys with the big hearts.
Does it feel good to be a champion?
Yeah.
Yeah, it feels good to be a champion.
Good game.
Hey, Brooke, are you ready to go now?
Oh, yeah, yeah.
Sure.
MIKE:
Great.
Hey, Gary, thanks a lot, man.
It was great to meet you.
Absolutely, man.
Come on, Mike.
I know a great little martini bar.
(DOOR OPENING)
(DOOR CLOSES)
LUPUS:
Yo.
Hey, man, saddle up.
It's time to rope in some talent.
What's up?
What do you got?
My place.
Tonight.
Poker.
Call some girls up.
Your roommate is awesome.
Mmm.
Yeah, he's something.
So, where did you go to law school?
Oh, Northwestern.
God, Gary's hilarious.
Yeah, he's okay.
Okay?
I mean, the guy's all time.
But he's gonna take Chicago tourism by air, land and sea.
And he asked me to join his new bowling team.
I mean, how cool is that?
Mmm-hmm.
You know what?
I can't do this.
I'm so sorry.
Excuse me, would you please pull over?
Can you pull over, please?
Hey, wait.
Tell Gary to call me.
GARY:
Welcome, everyone, to the first annual Texas Hold'em No-Limit Strip Poker Tournament.
(GIRLS WHOOPING)
Now, per the e-mail that Lupus sent, we each have eight articles of clothing.
Now, if you want to bet, you take off an article of clothing, you put it in the center.
If you win, you take back the clothes, you put back on what you bet.
The extras that other people bet will stay in front of you, much the same as chips would.
You can go all in at any point, but as I outlined, you must take off all your clothes to do so.
The game shall last an hour, maybe two, at which point we will begin the dance portion of the evening.
(ALL CHEERING)
GARY:
Let's get going here.
I need to see the blinds.
Small blind.
Big blind.
The blinds are one and one.
LUPUS:
Come on, ladies.
GARY:
All right.
Oh, yeah.
Let's get going here.
Shuffle up and deal.
All right.
I mean, just because they were playing video games, that doesn't mean it didn't bother him, right?
Honestly, Brooke, I wish I could tell you, but I wasn't there.
All right, Sally, get the soap out of your mouth.
We're gonna save that for when you're 12.
Mike was really, really good-Iooking.
I mean, he's a little bit of a goof, but Gary doesn't know that.
I mean, for all he knows, a sophisticated, really good-Iooking guy took me out on a date tonight.
I could be in bed with this guy right now for all he knows.
You know?
I'm telling you, if you saw the look on his face,
Mike got to him.
(CRAZY LITTLE THING CALLED LOVE PLAYING ON STEREO)
(PHONE RINGING)
Hello.
Hey, it's Riggleman.
Great news.
(GARY SNIFFING)
So, how does this work?
I'll bring the car around front and you wrap them up to go?
Oh, no, no.
We take care of everything.
We deliver it.
We hang it.
We check the light and the sun exposure.
Oh.
Perfect.
Yeah.
Listen, I don't want to be too forward, but would you like to have some dinner with me sometime?
I'm sorry.
I have a boyfriend.
Of course.
So...
Well, he's a lucky man.
BROOKE:
Oh, thank you.
I guess I will just have to keep it to home deliveries and gallery purchases.
Thank you, though.
See you.
Have a good day, Brooke.
You, too.
(DOOR OPENING)
(DOOR CLOSING)
Okay, are you out of your mind?
Gary's throwing Greek orgies in your living room and you're telling hot rich guys you have a boyfriend?
Are you nuts?
Hey, look.
I'm not exactly innocent here.
Brooke, as an outsider with some perspective, I really think you...
Christopher, stop.
Stop it.
I don't want to hear it.
This has already gotten way out of hand.
I know what I have to do now, all right?
I know what I have to do.
(COMMENTATOR CHATTERING)
(DOOR OPENING)
(DOOR SHUTTING)
Hi.
Hi.
Did you get my note?
Yeah.
Two weeks.
Yep.
I brought some boxes from work, so, you know, if you need any just help yourself.
Great.
Thanks.
Oh.
Listen, a while ago I got these tickets for the Old 97's tonight, and I completely forgot about it, so I...
You know, if you want to go.
Well, how many tickets did you get?
I got two.
How much do you want for them?
Oh, no, I'm going.
I'm going.
So, then it would just be the two of us?
Well, yes, and 2,000 other people.
I mean, it's not a big deal, but, you know, look, you know, I was going to invite Addie, but I just figured I'd gotten them for you, so...
Sure.
Why not?
Are you sure?
I mean, if you don't want them,
I can definitely give them to somebody.
No.
No, I'll be there.
That sounds...
It sounds great.
Okay.
All right.
It's at the Riv.
So, I'll just leave your ticket at Will Call.
Good?
Okay.
Okay.
Yeah, so, there.
I'll just leave that for him.
Okay, great.
Okay, so.
Gary Grobowski?
Grobowski, yeah.
He should be here in a minute.
He's really...
He's oddly tall, so.
Oh, okay.
Great.
You won't miss him.
Thanks.
All right, have a good night.
(ALL CHATTERING)
(ALL CHATTERING)
Hi.
Can I get a beer, please?
Sure.
Actually, make that two beers.
It's gonna be $8.
Excuse me.
Sorry.
(CROWD CHEERING)
MILLER:
Hello, everybody!
Good evening, Chicago.
We're the Old 97's.
(BAND PLAYING TIMEBOMB)
(BAND PLAYING SALOME)
(MELT SHOW PLAYING)
(LOCK CLICKING)
(DOOR OPENING)
(DOOR SHUTTING)
(KNOCKING)
Brooke?
Are you up?
Yeah.
Are you okay?
I'm fine.
Are you sure?
What's up?
What do you want?
I just want to say I'm sorry that I missed the concert, and let me know what that ticket cost, I'll pay you back for it.
Just leave me alone, Gary.
I planned on going to the concert.
It's just, I stopped by Johnny O's and we...
It doesn't fucking matter, okay?
Would you just leave my room and shut the door?
Jesus.
Please.
I didn't really know that the concert mattered all that much to you.
Exactly.
Hold on a second here.
Let me talk for a second.
Gary...
Brooke.
You broke up with me.
Then you have guys coming over here for dates, and all of a sudden you ask me to go to some concert.
I mean, I just figured that, you know.
Gary.
(SNIFFS)
I just...
I don't know how we got here.
Our entire relationship
I've gone above and beyond for you, for us.
And I mean, I've cooked.
I've picked your shit up off the floor.
I've laid your clothes out for you like you were a four-year-old.
I support you.
I supported you, your work.
If we ever had dinner or anything, I make the plans.
I take care of everything and I just don't feel like you appreciate any of it.
I don't feel you appreciate me.
And all I want is to...
Is for you to just show me that you care.
Why didn't you just say that to me?
Gary, I've tried.
I've tried.
Yeah, but never like that.
You might've said some things that you meant to imply that, Brooke, but I'm not a mind reader.
I doubt it would matter.
You are who you are.
Just leave me alone, okay?
Right now.
Just shut my door.
Listen.
All right, Gary, just, please.
Just leave the room.
Listen to me.
Gary, just...
I don't want to be near you right now.
Listen to me.
I just want to...
Please, just shut the door.
Please.
(SOBBING)
JOHNNY O:
I know.
Look, I know you feel bad, but, you know, what are you gonna do?
I mean, what does she expect, for me to want to go with the girl who dumped me?
I don't know.
She probably just wanted you, you know, to show her the respect of not standing her up or some shit, who knows?
Well, damn it.
I should have just said no in the first place.
I don't know why I called...
You know what?
It's her fault she got hurt.
You shouldn't even feel bad about it.
She should have expected it from you.
You're a fun guy, okay?
Everybody likes you.
You're the quickest guy I know.
Anytime we go out, I have a blast.
All right?
But, you know, everybody who knows you knows you're gonna do what you want to do.
And if it's not what the other person wants to do, well, that's their problem.
That's bullshit.
It's not bullshit.
There's plenty of times I do shit that I don't want to do.
That's ridiculous.
No.
Like when?
That's bullshit to say about me.
When have we ever done something you didn't want to do?
You know, I don't know, off the top of my head.
I don't keep score...
When's the last time we went to a Sox game?
The Sox.
Not when they're playing the Cubs, either.
We always do what you want to do and she always did what you want to do.
It's who you are.
Everybody thinks that you're their friend, okay?
But the fact of the matter is that there's not one person that I know that you trust enough to let close enough that they could hurt you.
And her big problem is that you really liked her.
I mean, she is the one girl you really liked.
And no matter what she did and how hard she tried, you were never gonna let your guard down.
That poor girl never stood a chance.
(BIRDS CHIRPING)
(AY COSITA LINDA PLAYING ON STEREO)
Marilyn?
Marilyn?
MARILYN:
Yeah.
I'm sorry.
I just...
MARILYN:
Oh, just get in here.
Oh, okay.
I'm sorry, excuse me.
Marilyn, I just...
I just wanted to let you know that today is gonna be my last day.
I'm gonna be traveling for a bit.
Here's a blank check.
Write down a number, I don't want to know what it is, and go back to work.
No, no.
It's not about that.
I can't accept that.
Brooke.
Travis, get your gorgeous tuckus out of here.
(SIGHS)
(STEREO STOPS PLAYING)
If you make it to Rome, search out an establishment called the Padre Negro.
Ask for a strapping young fellow named Alberto.
Compliments of M. Dean.
Well, thank you.
I appreciate that.
Yeah.
And, honey, take as long as you want, because when you're done, your job will be right here waiting for you.
And if you discover a path that doesn't lead back here...
Well, I hope you'll text.
I will.
(CHUCKLES)
And, like I said, the apartment's a mess, but I'm moving, so...
It's okay.
Relax about the place.
I don't care.
Okay.
This'll just take a second.
Okay.
(LA VEM A BAIANA PLAYING ON STEREO)
BROOKE:
Hello?
GARY:
Hey.
I'm in here.
Don't say anything.
I...
How're you doing?
Could I talk to you in private for a second?
You know what?
This is really not a good time, and obviously you have something happening here, so we'll just be in...
No, no, I don't have anything going on.
This is actually for you.
I'm just gonna wait outside.
No, no.
Wait.
No, no.
Really.
It's okay.
I really can't do this right now.
Brooke, this whole thing has been really tough on me and I've tried to act like it hasn't been that tough on me, but the first Sunday after me and you broke up, it all kind of really hit me.
And I think it partially hit me because Sunday was sort of always our day that we would do stuff together.
But I didn't have any idea you still cared so much.
And, you know, when I saw you crying the other night, that was honestly the worst moment of my life.
Gary.
Let me just try to say some of these things here.
It's just...
Look,
I know that I've caused you a lot of pain.
And the funny thing is, all I really want to do is make you happy.
I just want to make you smile.
Now, I've had a lot of time to think about some of the things that went on, and I know, Brooke, that I don't always do the right thing or always say the right things,
but I am willing to try to do things differently.
And I'd be happy to go take a dance class.
Well, I would.
Honestly.
I would like to go do that.
Or go travel.
I mean, I'd even be willing to go to the ballet.
Although I would much rather do the dance class or take a trip somewhere.
But I realize that's not the point.
I realize that the point isn't that at all, because it's not really about doing things that you love to do always, but it is about doing things with the person that you love.
And I love you.
Gary.
Just give me one second here.
I've missed you so much.
(SOBBING)
I promise you, Brooke,
I will do whatever it is that I have to do to never hurt you again.
I love you and I'm sorry.
Okay, that's it.
That's all I...
Oh, God.
That's all I wanted to say, so you can go ahead now with anything that you're feeling to say.
I don't know what to say.
Just say whatever you feel inside.
I don't feel the same way.
I don't.
I just...
I don't know.
Oh, God.
I just, I think...
I don't know, but I don't think I have anything left to give.
I'm sorry.
I was hoping for...
It doesn't matter.
Oh, this is now beyond awkward.
There's some new guy standing out in the hallway and I think I'm gonna go.
Okay.
Thank you.
I made a dinner, and I don't know if it's any good or not, but you're welcome to have it.
Okay.
Gary, that's really...
That's not what you think that it is.
It's okay.
I'm gonna go take a walk.
(DOOR OPENING)
(DOOR CLOSING)
(ELEVATOR BELL DINGS)
I'm sorry about that.
No.
I'm sorry I imposed.
No, that's fine.
Please.
So, what do you think?
I think you're right.
I think it's great.
Good.
Okay.
Okay.
So,
I will have that wrapped up.
Packed up, sorry, and delivered.
Thank you for taking the time to show it to me, okay?
Sure.
Yeah.
I'm gonna run.
Okay, I'll walk you out.
No, no, no.
I can...
It's okay.
(DOOR OPENING)
(DOOR CLOSING)
GARY:
So, the thing that I was most afraid of happening happened and I don't regret it at all, because now she knows how I feel.
Do you know what I mean?
Yeah.
I think, what you got to do now is really think hard, because you have to find somebody
that can't be traced back to either of us to visit this guy.
What are you talking about?
I don't...
The guy who came with her.
I don't need anything to happen to the guy.
But if they could trace him back to either one of us...
It's not about him.
I don't care about that.
...it's a problem.
The guy, he's not a...
They're not dumb.
Cops are smart, trust me.
Okay, but he's not a problem to me.
Right.
Listen to me.
Promise me that you're not gonna do anything.
I got you.
It's better if nobody...
You don't know anything.
What are you talking about?
I'll take care of it.
I don't want you to take care of anything.
John, do me a favor.
I'm being serious with you.
I know, I know.
Smart.
You're smart.
No, I'm not.
I'm being honest with you.
I don't want anything to happen to him.
Me, either.
Promise me you're not gonna have anyone do anything to this guy.
But you've gotta tell me exactly what you're gonna tell them, if the cops come to you.
Because if we tell a different story...
Nothing.
Promise me one thing.
We don't care...
John, I'm gonna go home.
I can't do this.
I'm exhausted.
Right, go home.
Just make sure your neighbors know you're going home.
Do me a favor.
They got phone records.
Make a couple phone calls tonight.
Especially around 10:00.
Okay.
Please don't do anything.
All right.
I don't mean it like...
I mean, honestly.
No, no, I got it.
For all you know, nothing's happening.
I don't want anything to happen.
Right.
Say it louder.
What are you doing here so early?
Hey.
Everything okay with you and...
Yeah, everything's gonna be great.
I just wanna get my day started, but I just wanted to say that
I'm sorry it took so long for me to...
I love you, Dennis.
(GASPING) It's all right.
It's okay.
I'm sorry.
I'm gonna go do the stuff.
So, that's it for all my stuff.
If you want, you could give me your key and I'll drop it off at Riggleman's.
All right.
Thanks.
Gary.
You know, there's a thousand things I...
I would have done differently.
Me, too.
Sort of, actually, when I see this space, I realize that if we didn't have such a big coffee table and that oversized couch
a pool table would have fit nicely.
Yeah.
Although the oversized couch did come in very useful the last couple of weeks, so...
Yes, it...
I guess.
Have a good trip.
Thanks.
GARY:
Chicago is called the Second City because after the Great Chicago Fire of 1871,
Chicago was rebuilt on its ruins.
The city came back even bigger and stronger than it originally was.
So it's not really an insult, it's more of a badge of honor to be called...
The Second City!
Okay.
People, you might be able to get away with that reaction at work, but you are on vacation here.
If you can't blow it out here, then where the hell can you blow it out?
Ladies and gentlemen, show me that you mean it.
Do not make me ask you twice.
Are you ready to see Chicago?
ALL:
Yes!
I said, are you ready to see Chicago?
ALL:
Yes!
Are you ready to see Chicago?
Shondra, put this babe in the air.
Let's go!
There is a bar downstairs.
Please enjoy yourself.
I know it's early in the morning, but it is Chicago in the summer.
Who are we kidding?
It's fine.
Go get hopped up, make some bad decisions.
My jokes get better.
The buildings look bigger.
It's not so important that everything is finished.
It's important that everything is right.
Well, what time's the presentation?
All right, I'll pick up the rest of the stuff and I'll see you at 6:45.
Great.
Bye.
GARY:
Brooke!
Hi.
Hi.
Wow.
(CHUCKLES)
It's good to see you.
It's good to see you.
I'd give you a hug, but my hands are kind of full with all the bags here.
How've you been?
I've been really good.
How have you been?
I've been good.
Yeah.
You look great.
Thank you.
The hair's a little different.
Looks nice.
Yeah?
Oh, yeah.
You've lost some weight.
Well, it's very deceiving, actually.
I've managed to become thin without having any real muscle on me whatsoever.
Very tough thing to accomplish, by the way.
I'm proud of myself.
Well, you look terrific.
Thanks.
I heard your trip went really well.
It did.
It went really well.
Oh, good.
It was fun.
It was amazing.
I saw so many amazing places.
It was just...
But, you know, you do realize how much you love home.
It's good to have you back.
Yeah.
It's good to be back.
And the boat.
Congratulations on the boat.
Thanks.
I'm waiting for it to get warm, and I'm gonna come by and take a ride.
Well, anytime you want.
It'll be on the house.
Come on by.
Well, I will, then.
I hope you do.
Definitely.
Well, I got to...
I'm going to a meeting, so...
I got to drop these bags off anyway, but it's really good to see you, Brooke.
Really good to see you.
Shouldn't...
Sorry.
I'm sorry.
I'm just saying we shouldn't wait so long the next time before we...
Yeah.
...catch up.
We have a lot more to talk about.
Yeah.
So.
Be good.
Okay.
Bye.
Bye.
(I CAN SEE CLEARLY NOW PLAYING)
(RAINBOW CONNECTION PLAYING)
I've got a special power that I'm not afraid to use
So come on this is my adventure this is my fantasy, it's all about living in the ocean, being wild and free.
Coz I'm no ordinary girl.
I'm from the deep blue underworld, land or sea
I've got the power if I just believe.
Coz I'm no ordinary girl.
I'm from the deep blue underworld, land or sea the world's my oyster I'm the pearl.
No ordinary girl.
so,this is the place that turn you into a fish a mermaid,Lewis yes,that's what i mean i don't know,i just expected something a little more ?
see that volcano?
the cave was up there what?
were up there?
i want to find out how this happened that takes hard works,Lewis,come on
the entrance's down there near the waterfall i can't get any closer ?
i know the whole beach ?
mermaid,Lewis yes,like is what i mean so how do you get in?
swim,there's another water entrance swim?
so the hike was optional,i could've swam?
50 meters,without coming up for air right,point taken,air is good anyway,it's better to discover the pool the same way you did it's much more scientific that way just be careful you don't fall...
Emma,please,i am a scientist and i know exactly what i'm doing
i'll meet you down there
wow pretty cool,huh?
so,where do we start?
something in this room have trigger your transformation if i can figure out what that something was i can figure out how you get your tail and then start asking why
the Miss Sea Queen pageant?
how sexy can you get?
what kind of a moron would enter something like this?
you're not thinking of entering the Miss Sea Queen pagean?
?
it was just because i'm entering and if you think you have a chance,Cleo,i have a advise,don't bother that's two,and Cleo wouldn't be interesting in ?
across the stage in a ?
dress it's a costume actually
?
?
you?
that's a joke,i'm the one with ?
mom,do you see Cleo?
i think she went out she's never here anymore i'm sure she make time for you if you wanna to play with her play with her?
no way i just wanna to borrow a ?
my secret life
this is weird
give me a most expensive low fat ice cream oh,it's you flavors?
oh,you choose,i'm feeling spontaneous and lots of confidence i've finish the preparation for the competition i have a costume that is ?
?
and i have see the list of contestants,not on my level what about Tiffany?
oh yeah,you ?
but the rest,?
,kind of like you
Hi Cleo,darling,we're short staff for the Miss sea queen pageant can you do 9:00 to 4:00 actually,i can't work that day i'd like to help,but i've decided to enter the pageant
oh,lovely mom,do you think Cleo have been acting a bit different lately?
like,like she might be in so kind of cold or something?
do you even know what a cold is Kim?
no,but i do know that make people do weird things good,mom,glad you're home
this doesn't involve you Kim,so scram mom,you know how you always wanted to teach me how to sew?
well,now it'll be a really good time like not right now,i've got fish that need me but later on
why are you always shutting your door to keep you out did i say come in?
well,why do you need to keep me out?
because you're annoying good bye what did you do with your fish?
they're in the bath
how did you do that?
there's nothing in the bath did i say bath?
i mean bucket
what are you reading?
just something physical must be good it's very educational
it's only water,darling
i came to see Elliot what for?
to tell you something i'm just gonna go clean my room we'll come and help you
here,read this,Cleo's diary i'm not reading someone else's diary it's for your own protection it's private listen,i have reason to believe that my sister,your sister,and possibly Rikki are mermaids
read it
it's in code so,still there it doesn't make any sense but look at this and this,and this they're mermaids they could just be drew those i like to drew those
Elliot!
i saw Cleo in our bathroom with a tail i know it must sound crazy but if i'm right,they even have repulse over water don't mind me,i just getting a drink she's a freak,what is she going to drink
can't be water,she can't touch the stuff
you were saying?
she's smart,she drinks out of a bottle with a straw so she doesn't get water on her skin i think you have to leave now you have got to believe me see that's a thing,i don't
but listen please see you at school
Elliot,if you don't open your eyes,and wake up to what is going on you are going to be their first victim see you at school
Elliot,hurry up i'll be out in a minute you've been in there for 20 minutes hope enough water left
hey
Kim,you were right,about everything one minute,i'm having a normal shower and the next thing i know is hailing
OK,calm down,we have to figure out how to handle this problem maybe we should talk to them talk?
are you insane?
well i was talked to solve conflict with communication communication is for humans they are not humans,they are like witches,vampires,they can't be reasonedly they have to be stopped how?
they take their true form when they're wet i say:we expose them
hey,what are you doing?
nothing,what are you doing just reading can i offer you some water no thanks i'm happy to share i'm not thirsty in fact,i share everything with you,because you're my sister and all i getting return are secrets and lies
what lies?
why didn't you tell you were a mermaid why would you think i'm a mermaid?
are you crazy?
you wrote a diary?
just a little one with every little detail about our mermaidness i'd never let anyone see it
it's gone i found the diary was under Kim's pillow look who's here?
i'm gonna ?
her just ignore them they are all here did you bring the gear?
they're not gonna let this go then we have got to do something about it huh,Lewis wait,Lewis's one of them,too i can't see Lewis as a mermaid are you a dork,he'd be a merman
like a boy mermaid just sit tight how much do they know?
pretty much everything you wanna hear something hilarious?
Cleo enter the Miss sea queen imagine trying to pull a costume together overnight
?
the best idea,we need to put them off the center get them thinking that the diary's about someone else like who?
hey,Miriam more of them?
this is bigger than i thought why are you talking to me?
you never talk to me that's silly,Miriam,we like you don't think i don't know you've enter the contest,Cleo i know everything you do?
OK it's a whole coven of mermaid creatures we can't fight them here
like Cleo,she's got something ?
i'm not sure what... mermaids your idea was way better shut up,Tiffany,come on
of course,it all make sense now
Miriam's the leader you think so?
Miriam's always the leader
i need to pull a new costume together overnight it's big,but i can do it
she's putting him onto her spell
these would go great with my new outfit what are they accessories
you're Cleo's little sister,aren't you?
i know what you're up to,you're not getting secrets so stop spying on me,are you get it?
understand?
wow,Miriam,you can be really scary it's a pageant,Tiffany can't take ?
if we are gonna make this work,we've got to make it look like Miriam's the one with powers
ready?
please,allow me
now do you believe me?
tomorrow Miriam and my freak sister are both going to be in the Miss sea queen pageant here at the marine park perfect time to expose them we'll bring down the leader that'll follow i'm scared that's exactly what they want,Elliot
now listen carefully you will be here next to this fire ?
back stage i'll be here,directly behind the stage on my signal,you will turn on the fire hydrant and angle it over this wall and the water will hit the stage,turning Miriam and Cleo into mermaids
and us into heroes any questions?
no you have to be brave,Elliot i know remember,the only one's with anything to fear are the mermaids
next stop,we have Libby Macintyre as a starfish oh,Libby this reminds me of a wonderful costume that i make when i was young who are these people?
Rikki,at least pretend you're having fun but i'm not and what a beautiful starfish she is
on my mark
our next ?
,is Cleo Sertori
and Cleo have chosen to... what is this?
give us a hint?
i'm a ?
it's a jellyfish oh
last,but by no means least please give a very warm welcome to Miriam Kent
it's a mermaid
?
you were suppose to be a mermaid no i wasn't
Miriam looks absolutely wonderful tell me did you make these yourself?
all the ?
and ?
are handmade they're all handmade,isn't that wonderful?
go Elliot now!
...have to come up with the winner... i knew it they are mermaids on the goldcoast and she it's the evil leader my sister is one of them,too
she make me do it they're evil,and dangerous look get away from me finally,something interesting what are you doing?
why is your tail tearing because it's a costume,you moron
i'm gonna get you come here,come here
well,any help here?
Tiffany,Tiffany
Tiffany dear,congratulations,you won me?
thank you
Kim,i know you steal my diary it's that where you got all those crazy ideas from?
dad says i'm not allow to talk to anyone
Kim,that diary was an english assignment we have to rewrite fairy tales i chose the little mermaids it's fiction but what about your tail?
you had one at home i saw it that was my first ?
costume,but i couldn't wear it because it shrank and the fish tank?
like i told you,there are fish in the bucket i'm such an idiot i see if you could ever be a mermaid you can't even swim
?
,i've test everything,the water,the rocks,the soil,the ?
,even the dust and what did you find?
everythings normal so that's it?
you're dumb?
hey i'm putting in 100% so Cleo,what did you do with the diary?
don't worry,i took care of it no one's gonna find it,ever again
it's a look patients get in their eyes.
There's a scent, the smell of death, some kind of sixth sense.
When the great beyond is heading for you, you feel it coming.
what's the one thing you've always dreamed of doing before you die?
Okay,hello?
Clearly not my dream.
George.
You're the strongest, most masculine man I have ever known.
You're smarter than me, and you've got really great hair.
I'm in love with you,george.
I always have been, and I always will be.
See...
I told you.
Not my dream.
Okay...this is the last time I'm gonna tell you this.
If you're gonna clog up the toilet, you have gotta be willing to use a plunger.
Otherwise,we're gonna make you crap in the backyard.
What are you doing on the floor?
Get up.
Something's wrong with meredith.
-I'm just not going.
-You have to go to work.
You're an intern.
Saving lives is not optional.
Yes,it is.I'm staying home.
You're supposed to be helping.
Uh... mere.Maybe,um, there'll be a horrible accident nearby the hospital.
Cut a bunch of people open-- sternotomies,craniotomies.
That'd be fun,right?
I don't care about surgeries.
You have a feeling?
Yes.
Okay,what kind of feeling?
Like I might die.
Today...tomorrow, in 50 years?
'Cause we're all gonna die eventually.
But now we're late.Let's go.
Crisna,come on.
okay.
This is me being supportive.
Really?
Yeah.
Okay,fine.
I'm totally supportive.
Go.
Okay,the man I love has a wife, and then he chooses her over me, and that wife takes my dog.
Okay,she didn't take the dog, I gave it to her.
Yeah.But I didn't mean to give it to her,
I meant to give it to him.
But that does not change the fact that she's got my mcdreamy and my mcdog.
She's got my mclife.
And what have I got?
Do you know I can't remember the last time we kissed?
'Cause you never think the last time is the last time.
You think there'll be more.
You think you have forever, but you don'T.
Plus,my conditioner decided to stop working and I think I have brittle bones.
I just...
I just need something to happen.
I need a sign that things are gonna change.
I need a reason to go on.
I need some hope.
And in the absence of hope, I need to stay in bed and feel like I might die today.
Whatever.Everybody has problems.
Now get your ass out of bed and get to work.
Now!
Move!
Move!
Move!
-What were you saying?
-Yeah,I... we're good to go.
-Quiet board.
-I know.
-That's a bad sign.
-I know that.
-Don't you think I know that?
-That's a quiet board.
-Is he in a bad mood?
-Quiet board.
-Right.He hates a quiet board.
-I can hear you talking about me.
-We're just saying-- -a quiet board means trouble.
A quiet board is death.
A quiet board bodes bad news.
And stop lookin' at me like that.
-Dr.
Shepherd.
-Dr.
Burke.
You and I,we've known each otherfor a while now,right?
Yes.
We've done several successful surgeries together.
Yes.
Your girlfriend is my ex-girlfriend's best friend.
Yes.
Why can't we call each other by our first name?
I don't think so.
-Seriously?
-Seriously.
-Dr.
Shepherd.
-Dr.
Burke.
I haven't been in the O.R. In two days.
I'm getting some O.R.Time.
We haven't had a decent resident this week.
Mm,the last two weren't that bad.
It doesn't matter which resident we get,they suck.
-they all sucked.
-yeah.
I miss dr.
Bailey.
-I have a feeling.
-I get those.
-Yeah?
-Yeah.
And?
If you wait long enough, it passes.
Promise?
I promise.
Hey.
-What you doin'?
-Waiting for it to pass.
For what to pass?
-So do you want to do charts later?
-Never gonna happen.
-Why?
-Alex,I gave you your chance.
You had your chance,and you slept with someone else.
I forgave you in the spirit of being a bigger person, of rising above.
But these legs are closed to you now.
The panties are staying on.
So you and me-- never gonna happen.
So you don't want to do charts later?
Go stand over there.
-Can we get back to the point?
-You had a point?
Yeah,which surgeon are we gonna have to suck up to today?
-That would be me.
-dr.
Bailey.
I've been gone two weeks-- two weeks-- and you ran off two residents?
I've got people phoning me at home,screaming, telling me my interns are rosemary's babies.
Nobody wants you.
Do you think I have the time for this?
I am pregnant!
I'm supposed to be on bed rest.
I'm supposed to be growing a human being.
I'm supposed to be calm.
Do I look calm to you?
Did I raise you fools to be pariahs?
-You're back.
-I'm not back.
-You're not?
-Get off me.
yang,karev,grey,stay here and wait for the incoming case.
O'malley,page addison shepherd.
Stevens,get a wheelchair.
-A wheelchair?
-A wheelchair.
What should I tell dr.
Montgomery-shepherd?
What did I say?
-Dr.
Bailey?
-What?
What do you want me to tell dr.
Montgomery-shepherd when she answers her page?
tell her my contractions are ten minutes apart and my water just broke all over your shoes.
Ge-get--boy,get off me!
take her!
-dude.
-Yeah.
james carlson,age 46, paramedics found him unconscious and bleeding.
Mechanisms of injury are unknown.
But he has a large, sucking chest wound and a wife with very healthy lungs.
Vitals?
Tachycardic in the 140s.
B.P. Holding in the 90s.
You were gone when I woke up.
Oh,uh,I had--I had to do a thing.
-You didn't leave a note.
-Yeah,well,I-
I had this thing to do.
-I--you know,I did this thing.
-And once again... what?
We go to sleep, I think everything is fine and by the time I wake up, you're just a little bit crazy.
I--I'm not crazy.
I had a thing.
Okay.
How's his respiratory effort?
Absent breath sounds on the right side.
Air bubbling at the site of the wound.
He's shocky and getting a little cyanotic.
My wife... let's get him intubated sivo sobre la herida.
And place an occlusive dressing over the wound.
-And now you.
-Uh,hannah.Hannah davies.
Hannah,why do you have your hand inside my patient?
I'd like to say for the record that I told her not to.
I tried to tamponade the wound with gauze and pressure, but the only thing that would stop the bleeding was my hand.
Every time I try to move it, he starts bleeding out.
Can I take my hand out now?
You don't stick your hand inside of a patient when you don't know how he was injured.
You don't stick your hand inside of a patient at all.
-Yeah,I know that now.
-Out of my room.
She gets to stay?
She has her hand stuck inside of my patient.
-Nice.
Thanks.
-Well,don't get happy.
You have your finger on a major bleeder, and mr.
Carlson is running out of time.
The only thing that you have won is an all-expense-paid trip to the O.R.
Dr. Grey,prepare to transport him to the O.R.
And let's make this happen quickly,people.
what do you want me to do?
I want you to make that woman stop screaming and tell us what happened.
-I-I can't go into the O.R.?
-No,you have "a thing" to do.
What was that about?
If I had know you were gonna get the good case,
I woulda let you stay in bed.
She's been going at least 15, 20 minutes.
This must be,like, some kind of record.
Look at her.She's not even turning red.
Good for her.Burke says shut her up.
We've got an incoming trauma-- M.V.C. With a 30-minute extrication time,and severe intrusion damage to the car.
Definite head injury.
Stable vitals on everything else.
Five minutes out.
-I've got it.
-I got it.I called it first.
I thought you said burke told you to shut her up.
Oh,no.
Burke told me to tell you to shut her up.
ma'am.Ma'am.
Mrs. Carlson...
are you injured?
I need you to try and calm down.
Mrs. Carlson?
Can you hear me?
Can you hear me?
Good.
Okay.
Now can you tell me exactly what happened to your husband?
what are you doing?
-Chief.Bailey's in there.
-Bailey's back?
-O'malley!
-She's in labor.
Dr. Montgomery-shepherd is examining her cervix,sir.
I can see that quite clearly.
O'malley,stop looking.
Pretty amazing,right?
The miracle of life.
Our bailey becoming a mother, it feels good.
Having bailey back at the hospital- balance is beingestoreD.
-That's all I'm sayin',sir.
Hey,guys.Would you,uh, give this to dr.
Shepherd for me?
Thanks.
What's going on?
-Bailey's in there.
-Oh,bailey's back.
That's excellent.
And her cervix is being examined by my wife,which is which is a visual I'll never get out of my head.
-Thanks for the warning.
-right.
Well...a gathering of men outside the delivery room.
How mid-century of you.
Say hi to bailey for me.
-How's she doin'?
-Taking it like a woman.
6 centimeters dilated, 50% effaced, and refusing all pain meds, which I think is stupid, but I'm not in labor, so... what are you people doin' out here?
Are you all right?
Can I get you anything?
A boy the size of a 10-pound bowling ball is working his way out of my body.
Can you give me something for that?
Can you give me a new vagina?
-Uh,well--
-I didn't think so.
Look,everybody, I appreciate the concern, but I'm fine.
It's just childbirth.
All I need is my husband, who shouldbeen here by now.
Write down his number.
I'll call him.
I'll track him down.
All right.Then go away.
Give me some privacy.
I don't wanna see any of you again until after the baby is born, which,if he does like I told him to and stays on schedule,should be in about four and a half hours.
I mean it.
-bailey's back.
-She's back,sir.
He's my patient,cristina.
Get your own.
I had one.
Meredith took him.
So now you're gonna take mine?
If I can.
is my wife here?
Is--is she here?
-Was she in the accident with you?
-She should be here.
-She's--she's supposed to-- -we'll find her,mr.
Jones.
Okay,what do we got?
Tucker jones,age 35, lost control of his car, hit the guardrail,flipped-- he's got a chest contusion.
A head C.T. Shows a left-sided depressed skull fracture and temporal epidural hematoma.
G.C.S. 14 in the field, now down to 12.
His motor exams are intact.
Okay,let's get him on a gram of dilantin
-and 70 grams of mannitol.
-I'm on it.
Mr. Jones,I'm gonna need to do an examination of you,okay?
uh,my phone.An-answer.It's my wife.
-Y-you need to answer...
-okay,we're gonna answer your phone.
Dr. Stevens,answer his phone.
-It's fine.
-I got it.
Mr. Jones,can you squeeze my fingers for me,please?
Mr. Jones,I need you to squeeze my finger,okay?
Can you-- okay,he's in a seizure.
Let's get him on his side.
Watch his arm.
Hello.Hello?
George?
it's me,izzie.
All right,let's get him to the O.R.
No,I don't have bailey's husband's phone.
I think I'd know if I had bailey's husband's phone,george.
What's bailey's husband's name?
Watch the wall.
How are you doing over there?
My hand's getting numb.
And I gotta tell you, this whole "insides are bloody and squishy" thing is so not good for my gag reflex.
But I'm good.
Is this okay?
Me being in here likeke this?
Once dr.
Burke scrubs in, he'll have you remove your hand.
And then you can go, and we'll fix mr.
Carlson.
Good.'Cause I know how much medicine I know, and it's just enough to never be allowed in an O.R.
It's my second week as a paramedic.
I got out of school about a month ago.
I haven't been doing this that long either.
Talk about on-the-job training,uh?
-Dr.
Burke.
-Dr.
Shepherd.
-Hey.
-Hey
You've got dr.
Bailey's husband on the table?
Bailey's husband is going into surgery?
Got into a car accident trying to get to the hospital before the birth.
-What do I tell bailey?
-Nothing.
Just wait till I get in there and see how bad the damage is, have something concrete to tell her.
Yeah,no use upsetting her until we know.
Yeah.
-Okay,keep me posted.
-Okay.
-Hey,preston.
-Good seeing you,addison.
What?
She gets to call you by your first name and I don't.
I like her.
-And you don't like me?
-No.
-How are we doin'?
-He's stabilized.
I'm just about to put him under.
Doctor.
Y-you're... shepherd,right?
Yes,I am.
I thought so.
Miranda...
she really likes you.
I like her,too.
-W-we're having a baby.
-I know.
I'm gonna take care of you.
I'm gonna get you back to bailey,okay?
Safe and sound.
All this blood and none of it's hers?
Yeah,she's fine.
Acute anxiety reaction.
Give her 2 of diazepam P.O.
-To calm her down.
-She in shock?
I'll say.
Can you tell us exactly what happened?
I mean,the shock part.
it was shocking.
I'm shocked.
You tell my husband when I get my hands on him, he's a dead man.
Do you hear me?
Scaring me like this.
Exactly how was your husband injured?
mindy?
Mindy,are you in here?
I'm over here,you moron.
How's james doing?
Oh,he's bleeding all over the place.
That's how he's doing.
The girl in the ambulance put her hand inside of him!
That's how he's doing!
What are you yelling at me for?
Because!
Because you and james are like idiots,playing like 8 year olds.
-Excuse me,um-- -we don't play
-Look,we reenact.
-You play.
You put on your costumes, and you build your stupid toys and you play.
-No,we reenact.
-Nobody reenacts world war ii,
-you moron!
-Again,exactly what happened?
You wanna know what haened?
What happened is my husband and his moron best friend-- could you stop calling me a mor?
Moron best friend decided to build some kind of big gun.
Yeah,an exact replica of the finest allied antitank weapon of world war ii,the m981 bazooka.
So they put on their stupid costumes, and they go out into the backyard, and they try to shoot the thing.
I'm the gunner.
James is the loader,okay?
We followed the specifications exactly.
You should see it.
It's a 60-millimeter, 1 1/2-pound rocket-- I mean,it's a beauty.
It didn't work, so like an idiot,my husband has to go and stand in front of his big gun to see what went wrong.
That's when the stupid toy starts working.
-Stop calling it a toy.
-It's taking up half my garage.
I'll call it whatever I want!
Hold on.
He shot himself with a bazooka?
Yeah.
He shot himself with a bazooka?
Like I said,morons, the pair of 'em.
-Was there an explosion?
-Huh?
-Was there an explosion?
-No,why?
Oh,crap
What?
What is it?
Hey,slow down.
if bailey asks,I'm not the one who did this.
okay,everybody,I'm going to do a thoracotomy, and hannah here is going to pull her hand out.
Dr. Grey is going to clamp the bleeder when we have more exposure.
-You ready?
-More than ready.
Scalpel.
uh,tucker jones, you better be lying in the street somewhere dead,mister, because when I get my hands on you--
I am having your baby here, mister!
okay,on the count of three.
One... two... dr.
Burke.
-I need to speak with you.
-I'm in surgery,karev.
You want to talk to me,sir.
unhook me.
Karev,if you interrupt me in my O.R.,
-It better be for a good damn reason.
-Was it through and through?
What?
The wound on james carlson, was it through and through?
No,it was just an entry.
No exit.
Why?
he's cute.He single?
-hannah.
-Yes,dr.
Burke.
What do you feel inside of mr.Carlson?
-What is your hand touching?
-What do you mean?
Is your hand touching anything hard?
-hard?
-Like metal.
Um...
I don't know.
Don't move your hand.
Just tell me...
what you feel.
Dr. Burke,what's going on?
Hannah.
Um,my fingertips are touching something...kinda hard.
-Yeah.Yeah,definitely.
-Oh,my god.
-Dr.
Milton.
-What?
What's wrong?
hannah,I don't want you to move-- not your hand,not your body, not an inch.
Okay.
You should know you're starting to scare me.
Don't be scared.Everything's going to be fine.
Dr. Grey,can you...
I want you to walk out of this room-- walk,do not run-- go and tell the charge nurse that whave a code black.
-I'm sorry,"code black"?
-Code black.
Tell him that I am sure, and then tell him to call the bomb squad.
god,can you imagine?
What'd she stick her hand in there for anyway?
She was trying to save his life.
And now she might die because of it.
What do we do now?
I go back in and wait for the bomb squad.
You leave.
You all leave.
Mere,you comin'?
It's your funeral.
You need a surgical team.
All I need is dr.
Milton to keep him under.
I can do the rest myself.
fine.But you wait by the elevator.
I don't want anyone in here that doesn't need to be in this O.R.
When the bomb squad arrives, we'll take it from there.
Until then,milton and i are doing this alone.
Now,go.
Okay,okay,okay.
eight minutes apart.
There is no shame in an epidural,miranda.
Epidural increases the possibility of a c-section.
It also decreases in.Mirand this is a big baby, it is your first baby, and I am telling you, it is not gonna a short or an easy labor.
I can handle a little pain.
No problem.
Women all over the world do this at home...
With nothing more than a pair of scissors and a bucket of hot water.
Well,women all over the world also die giving birth at home every single day.
I did not just say-- you're supposed to be making yourself useful and finding my husband.
-Well,I-I-- -he's not... here.
Oh,now he should be here by now.
okay,we're gonna go find him,
-right,dr.
O'malley?
-Right.
what?
Uh,nothing.I'll-- I'll be right back.
yang,could you check that?
-how's he doing?
-Ah,it' s touch and go.
I've located the clot.
I'm just trying to find the source of the bleeding.
Go and find addison, and tell her he's in worse shape than I thought.
-What'd they want?
-They want us to evacuate.
Evacuate?
Did they say why?
Uh,no,but your pager said, "code black."
-You're sure they said that?
-Yes.
It could be a drill.
Even if it's not a drill, I can't evacuate.
I've got an open brain on the table.
I'm not leaving bailey's husband on the table with his skull flap open, so if anybody wants to go, they should go.
Anybody want to evacuate?
Going once,going twice, three times.
You're sure they said, "code black"?
Yes.
I don't like having to lie to dr.Bailey.
-She would want-- -now is not the time, dr.
O'malley.
She'd want to know about her husband.
"code black"?
What's a code black.
wait,wait,hold it.
Dr. Shepherd, the other dr.
Shepherd wanted me to let you know that tucker's bleed is more extensive than he originally thought.
It's gonna be a few more hours before he has anything concrete
-to tell dr.
Bailey.
-Thanks,stevens.
-What's a code black?
-A what?
"code black"?
Code red,code blue,code white- I've never had a code black.
Dr. Shepherd?
Just--just go back to your locker room and wait for your resident to give you instructions.
-We don't have a resident.
-What's going on?
Is it something bad?
yeah,it's something bad.
so... so I'm touching live...
unexploded ammunition?
I'm afraid so.
not the greatest feeling in the world.
No.
I guess not.
And he's still out?
yeah.
But he's not hooked up to the machine anymore?
I had dr.
Milton take him off the ventilator.
The flow of oxygen posed a danger.
The ambu bag is...breathing for him now.
But he can't hear me?
No.
Hannah.
what if I just take my hand out really quickly?
We'd have to ask the bomb squad that when they arrive, but I'm guessing that would cause the ammo to shift and explode.
Oh.
-Hannah.
-Yeah.
Your hand is keeping mr.
Carlson from bleeding out.
You are keeping him alive.
Right.An--and the bomb squad is coming?
The bomb squad is coming.
Okay.
Okay.
we are having pre-op patients transported to mercy west.
all trauma rerouted to seattle presbyterian.
there is no danger to the north, south and west wings of this hospital just the east surgical wing.
that said,anyone who wants to leave can leave.
one stays unless they volunteer to stay.
understood?
okay.
richard,it's a code black, a real one?
yes,i've shut down the o. r. 's.
-to trauma?
-to everything.
wait a minute,to "everything" everything?
as of ten minutes ago,all the operating rooms at seattle grace were completely evacuated,with the exception fo dr.burke's team.
and dr. shepherd's team.
what?
what do you mean, "dr. shepherd's team"?
they're still in o. r. two.
the bomb squad just arrived.
excuse me.
-you're the surgical team?
-yes.
dylan young,bomb squad.
spread out,check the area, and then we'll secure the patient.
where are they?
dr. burke has them in there.
and the rest of this floor has been evacuated?
it has,yes.
all right,you stay here.
nobody moves unless i say so.
we've got people over here!
i thought you said the floor had been evacucuated.
i thought it had. i'm not in charge of anything.
-cristina!
\-seriously,back up.
oh,no,no.
she will hurt him.
-what's going on?
-bomb in a body cavity.
man.
all i got is bailey's husband's open brain.
what procedure?
craniotomy with shepherd.
shepherd's got bailey's husband on the table?
bailey's having a baby right now.
excuse me!
stop talking.
gotta eat something.
you knew meredith and cristina would be on the floor with the bomb.
yeah.
is it wrong that we're jealous?
it's all right that we're jealous,right?
the fact that we're jealous because they might blow up and die is not a reflection on our character.
-it's about feeling useless.
-ineffectual.
we couldn't even get meredith out of bed this morning.
we had to call in cristina.
how embarrassing is that?
you know what i think,george?
i think meredith and cristina are doers.
-They do.They're doers.
-They do,and we-- we watch.
We're watchers.
check mrs.Carlson's levels.
If they are stable, she can come up here.
All right!
-Excuse me.
-Oh,no problem
We have to become more proactive,george.
We have to become doers.
fight for what we want.
-We have to do.
-Yeah.
Oh,you mean... we are starting right now.
Okay.
Alex.
How crazy is this?
Dude,it's like the apocalypse.
-Alex.
-It's true.
I mean,look around you-- half the people who are supposed to be saving lives have fled the building to save themselves, bailey's husband almost died coming to see his kid get born, the annoying twins are down on the O.R. Floor with a guy
who literally might explode in their faces.
It's a morgue waiting to happen in here.
I'm just saying,people should get while the getting's good because there might not be a tomorrow.
-Alex!
-What?
-Take off your pants.
-Izzie,what are you doing?
I'm being a doer.
Getting while the getting's good.
Now take off your pants.
You do realize that when I said "the apocalypse,"
I meant it metaphorically, not literally?
Alex...
I haven't had sex in 8 months and 12 days.
I'm horny,I'm half-naked, and I'm saying yes.
You want to stand there and talk metaphors or do you want to literally take off your pants?
dr.Shepherd, there's an explosive device in the O.R. Next door.
I need you to evacuate now.
Yeah,and I've got a guy whose brain is exposed on this table.
I'm not gonna walk away and leave him to die.
The rest of you can go.
You should go.
Suction.
You close him up.You do whatever you have to do.
The chief of surgery has authorized me to tell you you cannot stay here.
The chief of surgery doesn't scare me.
Dr. Bailey scares me.
I'm not gonna be the one to tell her her husband died, and that's what would happen if we put his skull flap on in this condition, bomb or no bomb.
Now get out of my O.R.
Suction.
I'm trying to get gravity to do me a favor.
I'm 9 centimeters dilated.
I need that last centimeter.
Good.
That's,uh... that's good.
Dr.Shepherd.
Where exactly is my husband?
He's with my husband.
there's no telling how dangerous it is.
We need more info.
The longer we wait, the greater the chance he'll bleed out and die.
-Pink mist.
-Excuse me?
That's what the bomb squad calls you when you blow up.
Pink mist.
I read that somewhere.
The bomb goes off and... anyone in range explodes into a billion pieces.
You're liquid.
here's nothing left.
Just flecks of human flesh and blood.
Pink mist.
Sometimes they don't even find a finger.
One minute you're a person... the next,you're... bloody rain.
-Here,take this.
-What?
Go ahead.
Now I want you to squeeze it in even beats,okay?
No,not too fast.
Not too fast.
There you go.
Dr.Milton?
I've got kids.
Even beats.
Okay?
That's it.
what-- what about my husband?
How long can he staylike that, with live ammo inside him?
I honestly don't know.
But you're gonna try to save him,right?
We're gonna try.
First,the bomb squad has to determine the best way to retrieve the device.
I'm sorry,mindy.
I'm so sorry.
Shut up!
We've got three kids, and you've got him building bazookas.
Oh,god.
he's gonna die.
Uh,paul,why don't you go with the officer there and answer his questions about the device you guys built?
Oh,anything.Anything to help.
Uh,karev,why don't we get mrs.Carlson a cup of coffee?
I-I guess I should look on the bright side.
It's not like this can get any worse.
I mean... this is it.
This is as bad as it gets.
Right?
Dr.Bailey...
um,I was... dr.Bailey, what are you- get someone to find me my suitcase.
-I need my suitcase.
I'm goin' home.
Dr.Bailey, you're having a baby.
There's not going to be any baby born today.
You hear me?
I'm holding it in.
I'll have him tomorrow.
Just not now.
Not like this.
No!
Just... no.
I'm goin' home.
I'm goin' home right now.
I can't.
I can't do this without my husband.
I can't do this all alone.
Okay,okay.
so how are they gonna remove that ammo without killing hannah and james?
Cristina.
The bomb squad guy said you're supposed to stay away from there.
Is it me or is hannah shaking?
Is she squeezing that ambu bag by herself?
Where is dr.Milton?
Hannah.
Where is the anesthesiologist?
He,um... he left.
He didn't want to die.
Hannah.
I think I'm gonna take my hand out now.
When the hell are people gonna learn?
it may not be as bad as it seems.
Her hand is holding that device steady.
Or maybe her hand is simply in there with the ammo.
We can't know.
Yeah,well,my guy's talked to the friend.
That device is homemade, which means it's unstable and very unreliable.
It could be a dud, but we have no way of knowing.
Add to that the fact that you've got a surgeon in the O.R. Next door refusing to leave and a nervous paramedic's hand inside the body cavity-- it's definitely as bad as it seems.
That's what I'm saying.
hey,somebody!
Help!
We need help in here.
I think I'm just gonna take it out now,okay?
You made it almost to the finish line.You can do this.
No,no,I just want to take it out and be done with it.
hannah,it won't be much longer.
Remember,you're keeping him from bleeding out.
No!
I am 22 years old.
I should not even be in here.
This is some kind of mistake.
She's panicking.
We need to clear the room.
I'm not leaving.
-Grey,let's move.
-I'm not leaving her.
You need to get everyone out now,dr.Burke.
She's my intern.
I am responsible for her.
No,it's gotta come out.
It has to come out.
-Yang,go with dylan.
-You go with dylan.
-Hannah,look at me.
-No,it's gotta come out.
-Hannah.
-No,no.
Hannah,look at me.
You can do this.
Hannah, you need to calm down.
You need to relax,hannah.
Everything's gonna be fine.
-No!
-Hannah.
you can do this.
You can do this,hannah.
No,it has to come out.
No,you keep it there just a little while longer.
I have to take it out!
I have to!
I have to!
-Hannah.
-I have to!
If you leave, it'll break.
Meredith.
What did I do?
oh,god,meredith.
Just stay right where you are.
Nobody move.
Stay exactly where you are.
What did I do?
What did I do?
What did I do?
What did I do?
What did I do?
What did I do?
What did I do?
What did I do?
What did I do?
What did I do?
previously on "grey's anatomy"... i have a feeling.
what kind of feeling?
like i might die.
hello?
clearly not my dream.
my contractions are ten minutes apart and my water just broke all over your shoes.
why can't we call each other by our first name?
i don't think so.
do you know i can't remember the last time we kissed?
where is my husband?
got into a car accident trying to get to the hospital before the birth.
is my wife here?
there's not going to be any baby born today.
meredith and cristina are doers.
they're doers.
i'm horny, i'm half-naked and i'm saying yes.
you want to stand there and talk metaphors, or do you want to literally take off your pants?
a quiet board means trouble.
a quiet board is death.
hannah. hannah davies.
why do you have your hand inside my patient?
my husband has to go and stand in front of his big gun-- he shot himself with a bazooka?
was there an explosion?
no.
so i'm touching live, unexploded ammunition?
as of ten minutes ago, all the operating rooms at seattle grace are completely evacuated with the exception of dr. burke's team.
and dr. shepherd's team.
i'm not leaving bailey's husband on the table with his skull flap open.
pink mist.
that's what the bomb squad calls you when you blow up.
dylan young, bomb squad.
that device is homemade, which means it's unstable and very unreliable.
i am 22 years old.
she's panicking.
we need to clear the room.
this is some kind of mistake.
i have to!
oh, what did i do?
what did i do?
what did i do?
in hospitals,they say you know.
you know when you're going to die.
some doctors sayt's a look patients get in their eyes.
some say there's a scent,the smell of death.
some think there's just some kind of sixth sense.
when the great beyond is heading for you, you feel it coming.
whatever it is,it's creepy.
because if you know, what do you do about it?
forget about the fact that you're scared out of your mind.
if you knew this was your last day on earth... how would you want to spend it?
what's going on?
something happened in o.r. three.
what?
i don't know.
all i know is that hannah, the paramedic, she's missing.
chief?
what's happened?
a quiet board.
a quiet board is what's happened.
dr. shepherd.
dr. burke.
how's it going?
--------------- if i do what the textbooks say, he could lose the power of speech, herniate through the first craniotomy and die.
what's your other option?
well, if i do at i want to do, he could lose the power of speech, herniate through the first craniotomy and die.
yeah.
well, good luck with that.
thanks.
is there something you want?
you know, it was really stupid of you not to evacuate.
hmm. you, too.
yeah, i know.
we should consider a change of profession.
yes, we should.
now can you operate and, uh, remove the device from the guy?
after the bomb squad is through assessing him, i'm going to try.
gotta say, don't want to be the guy that kills bailey's husband.
i don't want to be the guy that kills us all.
dr. shepherd.
dr. burke.
you realize how stupid that was?
it was, mer.increadable stupid okay, you know when you don't need to be made fun of?
like, when you've got your hand inside a body that's got a bomb in it and a stranger is velcroing a flak jacket to your boobs.
okay, okay.
you've got a sense of irony.
only when things are really ironic.
i had a feeling.
what's that?
nothing.
time for you to go.
no, i'm staying.
there's nothing more you can do here.
we've got it covered.
cristina, this is not another cool surgery.
this ammo could go off at any time and kill everyone in this room.
do you get that?
you cannot be in here.
you think this is about surgery?
cristina, i cannot do this with you in here i cannot think.
we'll be fine.
it's okay.
you know in the movies how there's always the hero and then there's the other guy, the guy who sees danger and then runs in the opposite direction?
yes.
be the other guy.
so you have a plan, right?
you're really gonna get me outta this, right?
i feel like colors are brighter.
does anyone feel like colors are brighter?
my head hurts.
it's the adrenaline.
do you have the smell thing?
'cause i have like this crazy-- shut up!
are you okay?
of course she's not okay.
how could she possibly be okay?
you're insensitive.
i'm not innsitive.
would you two just shut up?
nobody cares if the blue is bluer or if you have super smelling powers.
meredith could die.
any minute she could just... die.
actually stop living.
dead.
a corpse.
oh, go--i'm sorry.
god, i have really inappropriate reactions to this kind of stress.
i'm sorry. hold on.
okay?
yeah.
should we, like... should we, like, do something?
i mean, call meredith's family?
we are meredith's family.
i'm sorry.
i'm sorry.
we are meredith's family.
this area's been evacuated, dr. yang.
and somehow you're still here.
i have to be here.
you don't.
yes, i do.
dr. yang-- yes, i do.
besides, i-- i'm guessing you need a little company.
how's he doing?
he's hanging in there.
how's that paramedic hannah doing?
hannah?
the girl with the bomb.
she's hanging in there, too.
calm down.
calm down?
i have an evacuated o.r., a bomb in a body cavity, a missing paramedic, an intern with her hand on the explosive, two world-class surgeons in harm's way, a man on a table who may bleed out at any moment
unless we remove the bomb from his chest and my favorite resident in labor, who you are now telling me refuses to push.
really? "calm down"?
you really want to say right now to me, "calm down"?
okay, don't calm down.
dr. bailey is scared, sir.
it's a day to be scad.
she won't let me examine her, but from what i can tell, her contractions are 40 seconds apart, and she is refusing to push.
the baby coulgo into distress, and if she doesn't come out of this, i mean, and soon, then i gonna need an o.r. to do an emergency c-section.
i can't give you an o.r., addie.
i don't have an o.r. to give.
can't you convince her to push?
bailey's rational.
she's not bailey right now.
she's a woman in labor whose husband is in surgery next to a bomb.
so is yours.
this is about bailey.
i need an o.r.
i don't know what to tell you.
look, richard, we have about an hour to change bailey's mind.
and then i'm gonna need you to get me an o.r., build me an o.r., find me a helicopter to fly me to any o.r. in the city.
otherwise, instead of having a baby, she'll be losing one.
here are the blueprints you asked for, chief.
thank you.
i laugh at funerals.
i don't go to funerals.
izzie. iz... i was jealous.
i was jealous of meredith and the surgery. i... i-i was... jealous, and now... i was jealous, alex.
is this the strangest thing that's ever happened in your o.r.?
i'd have to say that it is.
good.
'cause i'm very competitive.
all the best surgeons are.
dr. montgomery-shepherd just talked to the chief.
they're really worried about you.
she's on the phone with mercy west right now to see if they have any o.r.s available.
i need someone to drive me home.
they're talking about doing an emergency c-section.
they can talk all they want.
i'm not going to mercy west.
the baby is not coming out.
i need a ride.
i can't focus enough to drive myself, and tucker... i need a ride.
you could lose it.
you know this.
i told you already, i'm not having this baby until tomorrow.
this baby could die before it's even born.
can you give me a ride home
dr. bailey-- then get out.
is--is there any news?
what?
oh, i'm sorry, mrs. carlson.
m-my husband... i was wondering if there was any news because you look so worried.
and i heard this doctor saying that even ough that girl's got her finger on the tear in his heart,
that my husband's losing... blood.
every second, he's losing blood, which means he could die.
he could die.
i ask because i know yoll tell me the truth... because you look so worried.
mrs. carlson... yes... it's possible he could bleed out and die if we don't operate soon.
okay.
okay.
thank you for telling me the truth.
i'll just,m... i'll just go wait over here.
look, will somebody get me an update?
and where's the head of the bomb squad?
i'm right here, and we're good to go.
my team's in place.
dr. burke is ready.
the patient' in stable condition.
we can have the bomb out in under ten minutes if i'm not interrupted again.
in the o.r., we put our patients under general anesthesia.
yeah?
that involves a steady flow of pure oxygen.
well, can't you turn off the oxygen in my o.r.?
i can and i have.
but... this is your o.r.
this is the o.r. floor's main oxygen line.
it's gonna be okay.
you don't know that.
it's just what you say.
i know.
where you going?
i can't just... i gotta do something to help.
thank you for saying that it's gonna be okay,
even if it is just what you say.
stop it.
i'm not a patient.
what?
the two of you are looking at me the way we look at patients, like i'm gonna freak out at any minute.
i'm not gonna freak out.
so whatever it is, just tell me straight out.
the main oxygen line runs directly under this room.
okay.
not okay?
well?
i need one of you to tell me what this means, exactly.
because i think i know what it means, but i tend to be "glass half-empty" these days.
so i won't trust what i think it means because what i think it means is that if the bomb were to explode over the oxygen line, the whole hospital could blow up.
and that's just crazy, right?
i need an answer on when they're gonna start moving.
chief.
look, i'm busy.
i know, i know you're really, really busy, but if there was something, anything that we could do to help, it would really be very helpful.
we need an assignment, sir.
look, i need... chief?
i need... he's pale and diaphoretic.
check his pulse.
we need some help over here.
come on, let's move people.
i'll get a wheelchair.
i think he's having a heart attack.
meredith, all it means is that we have to move.
move?
that's right, we have to move.
and now, because i don't want to spend another second in this room.
wait.
i can't wiggle my fingers because we can't shift the ammo.
and now you want to roll out the entire gurney?
well, that's our safest-- safest option.
so we move.
not a problem.
we can do this.
you handling this, grey?
i'm handling this.
so how's it look?
hard to say for sure.
e.k.g. is normal.
that's good news.
all right, i'm getting up.
sir, you should really wait until we get the blood work back.
i'm not listening, stevens.
you can talk to me, dr. stevens.
um... um... okay.
your husband should really wait until we get the blood work back for confirmation.
okay, out, both of you.
i'm gettin' up.
you're gonna have to bodycheck me to do so.
adele, there is a bomb.
i heard.
dr. montgomery-shephd... what are we gonna do?
i mean, about dr. bailey.
can--can we drug her?
against her will?
no. well... yes?
i mean, can't we force her to push?
if, uh... declare her temporarily insane?
you want me to declare miranda bailey-- miranda bailey-- incompetent?
do you think that'll help?
you think it'll make her more inclined, more comfortable giving birth?
i don't know, that's why do you think i'm not doing everything i can to help her?
i mean, do you think i'm just out here because, i don't know, i'm feelin' a little lazy, just needed a little "me" time?
i'm just asking-- stop asking!
because no matter what you ask, the answer is i don't know.
i'm doing everything i can-- everything i can.
miranda bailey's husband is in mortal danger-- actual mortal danger-- and there is not a lot i can say to comfort her right now because there's not a lot anybody can say to comfort me.
i'm doing my best.
dr. bailey is doing her best.
and i need you to do your best, and i need it to be better than standing here asking me the world's stupidest questions.
i don't know, o'malley!
hey.
you okay?
wait, are you bleeding?
i-i think i fell.
i was--i was running, and, um, and i fell.
it's okay.
are you hannah?
yeah.
can i have those scissors, dr. yang?
what is so interesti out there, dr. yang?
i-i... you're doing great.
let's go over it again.
the device is shaped like a rocket.
it's about 8 inches long.
and we're gonna have everything ready.
dr. burke's team is gonna be in place and my team is gonna be in place.
then i'm gonna ask you to take the hand that you have in mr. carlson
and wrap it around the device.
and pull it out.
level.
pull it out while keeping it level.
you know, i don't like you very much.
i don't like you either.
what are you doing?
stop.
stop right where you are.
what are you doing?
i thought dr. burke told you to leave.
we're moving to an o.r. further away from the oxygen line.
you know, in ce we blow up.
i distinctly remember him telling you to leave.
where is he?
he's prepping the o.r.
then he'll never know, will he?
you stay over there.
you stay over there.
you ready?
nice.
tell me something.
what?
cristina... i have my hand on a bomb, i'm freakin' out, and most importantly, i really have to pee.
tell me anything.
he told me he loved me.
last night-- he thought i was sleeping, but i heard him say it.
burke loves you.
yeah.
mind your own business.
burke loves you.
yeah, everybody has problems.
well, are you gonna say it back or... of course not.
he didn't say it to me.
he said it to sleeping me.
reciprocity is not required.
besides, he might blow up.
excellent point.
All right, everybody.
let's just keep placing one foot in front of the other.
nice and slow.
all right, meredith, we're almost there.
okay.
we're almost there.
nice and easy. you ready?
yep.
all right, let's go.
all right, nice and slow.
you had to say you were gonna die today.
i told you.
but you are gonna need a couple of stitches.
hannah... uh, is there someone you'd like me to call?
family or maybe... okay.
that doctor... dr. grey.
meredith.
is she-- she's still there.
so she's still alive?
she's alive.
she's still alive.
dr. milton shouldn't have left you.
he's a coward.
i'm the coward.
no.
i ran away.
you think you're gonna be different.
you think you're gonna be the kind of person who stays and does something.
you know, a good man in a storm.
i'm a paramedic.
i'm supposed to stay and do something.
i'm not supposed to run away.
i'm not supposed to hide under the stairs 'cause i left two people to die.
i was supposed to stay and do something.
i ran away.
well, blood work's back.
the chief had an anxiety attack.
who's gonna tell him?
um... i gave you sex in a linen closet, you tell him.
fair enough.
okay, dr. bailey, let's go.
dr. bailey, i need you to turn on your back.
i need you to push.
leave me alone.
miranda... all right, i can't let her go any longer.
i'm gonna go tell richard that he has to give us an o.r., okay?
dr. bailey, i'm surprised at you.
i really thought-- this is not how i thought you would do this.
dr. o'malley, i don't think that-- i truly-- i expected more george... you're dr. bailey.
you don't hide from a fight.
you don't give up.
you strive for greatness.
you, dr. bailey...
you are a doer.
i know your husband's not here, and i know there are a lot of things going on here that we have no control over.
but this... this... we can do.
okay?
okay.
let's have this baby.
we're ready when you are.
we're good. meredith?
yeah.
i'm going to extend the wound.
when i cut, the bleeding's going to intensify.
if we're going to save mr. carlson, you have to pull the ammo out immediately.
but remember, remove it while keeping it as level as possible.
nice and easy, no quick movements.
level.
right, level.
you ready?
i, uh... do i have a choice?
you have to be ready.
yeah.
i guess.
scalpel.
i guess i'm ready.
how's it going out there, yang?
everything's fine.
how's the girl with the bomb?
how's he doing?
he's almost there.
i need suction.
irrigate.
you didn't answer my question.
sir?
how is the girl with the bomb?
it's meredith.
the girl with the bomb is meredith.
i'm good. she can go.
all right, now, meredith... wrap your hand around the nose cone.
meredith.
grey.
grey.
damn it. we're losing him.
okay, push 1 of epi.
thready pulse.
epi in.
nothing.
okay, give me a wet lap.
we're gonna roll him on three.
let me know when everybody's ready. let's go. we gotta go.
we gotta go.
come on, let's go!
meredith.
george and izzie shouldn't have to move out of the house.
no. you hear me?
you should make sure-- make sure that they... they get to stay in the house.
okay, miranda, keep go--good.push.
a little bit more.
i can see the top of the head.
i gotta stop.
oh, stop.
okay, that was good.
that was very good.
that was... okay.
are you ready?
ready?
okay.
push.
ohh!
good.
wide-complex bradycardia.
push 1 more of epi and 1 of atropine.
come on, come on.
you don't do this, tucker.
you cannot quit on me, tucker.
do not quit.
in.
grey... his pressure is dropping.
grey.
i-i can't. no.
i can't. this is crazy.
burke, you're gonna go.
you go.
both of you should go.
nobody's dying today, grey.
meredith, i want you to look at me.
look at me.
i know this is bad.
and i know that i'm this ass who's been yelling at you all day.
so you pretend that i'm not.
you pretend that i'm someone you like.
whatever you need, but you need to listen to me.
i'm scared.
i know.
you can do this.
it'll be over in a second.
you can do this, meredith.
okay.
okay.
gently.
good. stop.
oh, . bailey, i can see the top of his head.
he's got a lot of hair, but he's cute.
o'malley.
yeah.
stop lookin' at my vah-jay-jay.
yes, ma'am.
you did good.
what the hell is happening down there?
who's coming up?
okay.
come on, sweetheart.
all right,people.
they're coming up.
derek.
preston.
d-dr. burke... is my husband, uh... alive?
yes.
is he...
gonna stay alive?
thanks to that young lady over there... she is.
oh.
thank you.
thank you.
thank you. thank you.
thank you.
where is she?
you had to be a cowboy.
wh-where is she?
she's right over here.
derek.
oh, you're okay.
you're okay.
that is not the "she"
he was asking for.
burke.
are you awake, burke?
i love you, too.
this is our son-- william george bailey jones.
hello.
hello, my little man.
hello.
he's beautiful
there's someone at the door for you.
hey.
hey.
you almost died today.
yeah.
i almost died today.
i can't... i can't remember... our last kiss.
all i could think about was, m gonna die today, and i can't rememb our last kiss, which is pathetic, but... the last time we were together and happy, i... want to be able to remember that,
and i can't, derek.
i can't remember it.
i'm glad you didn't die today.
it was a thursday morning.
you were wearing that ratty little dartmouth t-shirt you look so good in.
the one with the hole in the back of the neck.
you just washed your hair, and you smelled like some kind of... flower.
i was running late for surgery.
you said you were gonna see me later.
then you leaned into me, you put your hand on my chest... and then you kissed me.
soft... it was quick, kinda like a habit.
you know, like we'd do it every day for the rest of our lives.
you went back to reading your newspaper, and i went to work.
that was the last time we kissed.
lavender.
my hair smelled like lavender from my conditioner.
lavender.
if you knew this was your last day on earth, how would you want to spend it?
it's a look patients get in their eyes.
There's a scent, the smell of death, some kind of sixth sense.
When the great beyond is heading for you, you feel it coming.
what's the one thing you've always Dreamed of doing before you die?
Okay,hello?
Clearly not my Dream.
George.
You're the strongest, most masculine man I have ever known.
You're smarter than me, and you've got really great hair.
I'm in love with you,George.
I always have been, and I always will be.
See...
I told you.
Not my Dream.
Okay...this is the last time I'm gonna tell you this.
If you're gonna clog up the toilet, you have gotta be willing to use a plunger.
Otherwise,we're gonna make you crap in the backyard.
What are you doing on the floor?
Get up.Something's wrong with Meredith.
-I'm just not going.
-You have to go to work.
You're an intern.
Saving lives is not optional.
Yes,it is.I'm staying home.
You're supposed to be helping.
Uh... mere.Maybe,um, there'll be a horrible accident nearby the hospital.
Cut a bunch of people open-- sternotomies,craniotomies.
That'd be fun,right?
I don't care about surgeries.
You have a feeling?
Yes.
Okay,what kind of feeling?
Like I might die.
Today...tomorrow, in 50 years?
'Cause we're all gonna die eventually.
But now we're late.Let's go.
Cristina,come on.
okay.
This is me being supportive.
Really?
Yeah.
Okay,fine.
I'm totally supportive.
Go.
Okay,the man I love has a wife, and then he chooses her over me, and that wife takes my dog.
Okay,she didn't take the dog, I gave it to her.
Yeah.But I didn't mean to give it to her,
I meant to give it to him.
But that does not change the fact that she's got my mcDreamy and my mcdog.
She's got my mclife.
And what have I got?
Do you know I can't remember the last time we kissed?
'Cause you never think the last time is the last time.
You think there'll be more.
You think you have forever, but you don't.
Plus,my conditioner decided to stop working and I think I have brittle bones.
I just...
I just need something to happen.
I need a sign that things are gonna change.
I need a reason to go on.
I need some hope.
And in the absence of hope, I need to stay in bed and feel like I might die today.
Whatever.Everybody has problems.
Now get your ass out of bed and get to work.
Now!
Move!
Move!
Move!
-What were you saying?
-Yeah,I... we're good to go.
-Quiet board.
-I know.
-That's a bad sign.
-I know that.
-Don't you think I know that?
-That's a quiet board.
-Is he in a bad mood?
-Quiet board.
-Right.He hates a quiet board.
-I can hear you talking about me.
-We're just saying-- -a quiet board means trouble.
A quiet board is death.
A quiet board bodes bad news.
And stop lookin' at me like that.
-Dr.
Shepherd.
-Dr.
Burke.
You and I,we've known each otherfor a while now,right?
Yes.
We've done several successful surgeries together.
Yes.
Your girlfriend is my ex-girlfriend's best friend.
Yes.
Why can't we call each other by our first name?
I don't think so.
-Seriously?
-Seriously.
-Dr.
Shepherd.
-Dr.
Burke.
I haven't been in the O.R. In two days.
I'm getting some O.R.Time.
We haven't had a decent resident this week.
Mm,the last two weren't that bad.
It doesn't matter which resident we get,they suck.
-they all sucked.
-yeah.
I miss Dr. Bailey.
-I have a feeling.
-I get those.
-Yeah?
-Yeah.
And?
If you wait long enough, it passes.
Promise?
I promise.
Hey.
-What you doin'?
-Waiting for it to pass.
For what to pass?
-So do you want to do charts later?
-Never gonna happen.
-Why?
-Alex,I gave you your chance.
You had your chance,and you slept with someone else.
I forgave you in the spirit of being a bigger person, of rising above.
But these legs are closed to you now.
The panties are staying on.
So you and me-- never gonna happen.
So you don't want to do charts later?
Go stand over there.
-Can we get back to the point?
-You had a point?
Yeah,which surgeon are we gonna have to suck up to today?
-That would be me.
-Dr.
Bailey.
I've been gone two weeks-- two weeks-- and you ran off two residents?
I've got people phoning me at home,screaming, telling me my interns are rosemary's babies.
Nobody wants you.
Do you think I have the time for this?
I am pregnant!
I'm supposed to be on bed rest.
I'm supposed to be growing a human being.
I'm supposed to be calm.
Do I look calm to you?
Did I raise you fools to be pariahs?
-You're back.
-I'm not back.
-You're not?
-Get off me.
Yang,Karev,Grey,stay here and wait for the incoming case.
O'malley,page Addison Shepherd.
Stevens,get a wheelchair.
-A wheelchair?
-A wheelchair.
What should I tell Dr. Montgomery-Shepherd?
What did I say?
-Dr.
Bailey?
-What?
What do you want me to tell Dr. Montgomery-Shepherd when she answers her page?
tell her my contractions are ten minutes apart and my water just broke all over your shoes.
Ge-get--boy,get off me!
take her!
-dude.
-Yeah.
James Carlson,age 46, paramedics found him unconscious and bleeding.
Mechanisms of injury are unknown.
But he has a large, sucking chest wound and a wife with very healthy lungs.
Vitals?
Tachycardic in the 140s.
B.P. Holding in the 90s.
You were gone when I woke up.
Oh,uh,I had--I had to do a thing.
-You didn't leave a note.
-Yeah,well,I-
I had this thing to do.
-I--you know,I did this thing.
-And once again... what?
We go to sleep, I think everything is fine and by the time I wake up, you're just a little bit crazy.
I--I'm not crazy.
I had a thing.
Okay.
How's his respiratory effort?
Absent breath sounds on the right side.
Air bubbling at the site of the wound.
He's shocky and getting a little cyanotic.
My wife... let's get him intubated
And place an occlusive Dressing over the wound.
-And now you.
-Uh,Hannah.Hannah Davies.
Hannah,why do you have your hand inside my patient?
I'd like to say for the record that I told her not to.
I tried to tamponade the wound with gauze and pressure, but the only thing that would stop the bleeding was my hand.
Every time I try to move it, he starts bleeding out.
Can I take my hand out now?
You don't stick your hand inside of a patient when you don't know how he was injured.
You don't stick your hand inside of a patient at all.
-Yeah,I know that now.
-Out of my room.
She gets to stay?
She has her hand stuck inside of my patient.
-Nice.
Thanks.
-Well,don't get happy.
You have your finger on a major bleeder, and mr.
Carlson is running out of time.
The only thing that you have won is an all-expense-paid trip to the O.R.
Dr. Grey,prepare to transport him to the O.R.
And let's make this happen quickly,people.
what do you want me to do?
I want you to make that woman stop screaming and tell us what happened.
-I-I can't go into the O.R.?
-No,you have "a thing" to do.
What was that about?
If I had know you were gonna get the good case,
I woulda let you stay in bed.
She's been going at least 15, 20 minutes.
This must be,like, some kind of record.
Look at her.She's not even turning red.
Good for her.Burke says shut her up.
We've got an incoming trauma-- M.V.C. With a 30-minute extrication time,and severe intrusion damage to the car.
Definite head injury.
Stable vitals on everything else.
Five minutes out.
-I've got it.
-I got it.I called it first.
I thought you said Burke told you to shut her up.
Oh,no.
Burke told me to tell you to shut her up.
ma'am.Ma'am.
Mrs. Carlson...
are you injured?
I need you to try and calm down.
Mrs. Carlson?
Can you hear me?
Can you hear me?
Good.
Okay.
Now can you tell me exactly what happened to your husband?
what are you doing?
-Chief.Bailey's in there.
-Bailey's back?
-O'malley!
-She's in labor.
Dr. Montgomery-Shepherd is examining her cervix,sir.
I can see that quite clearly.
O'malley,stop looking.
Pretty amazing,right?
The miracle of life.
Our Bailey becoming a mother, it feels good.
Having Bailey back at the hospital- balance is beingestoreD.
-That's all I'm sayin',sir.
Hey,guys.Would you,uh, give this to Dr. Shepherd for me?
Thanks.
What's going on?
-Bailey's in there.
-Oh,Bailey's back.
That's excellent.
And her cervix is being examined by my wife,which is which is a visual I'll never get out of my head.
-Thanks for the warning.
-right.
Well...a gathering of men outside the delivery room.
How mid-century of you.
Say hi to Bailey for me.
-How's she doin'?
-Taking it like a woman.
6 centimeters dilated, 50% effaced, and refusing all pain meds, which I think is stupid, but I'm not in labor, so... what are you people doin' out here?
Are you all right?
Can I get you anything?
A boy the size of a 10-pound bowling ball is working his way out of my body.
Can you give me something for that?
Can you give me a new vagina?
-Uh,well--
-I didn't think so.
Look,everybody, I appreciate the concern, but I'm fine.
It's just childbirth.
All I need is my husband, who should been here by now.
Write down his number.
I'll call him.
I'll track him down.
All right.Then go away.
Give me some privacy.
I don't wanna see any of you again until after the baby is born, which,if he does like I told him to and stays on schedule,should be in about four and a half hours.
I mean it.
-Bailey's back.
-She's back,sir.
He's my patient,Cristina.
Get your own.
I had one.
Meredith took him.
So now you're gonna take mine?
If I can.
is my wife here?
Is--is she here?
-Was she in the accident with you?
-She should be here.
-She's--she's supposed to-- -we'll find her,mr.
Jones.
Okay,what do we got?
Tucker Jones,age 35, lost control of his car, hit the guardrail,flipped-- he's got a chest contusion.
A head C.T. Shows a left-sided depressed skull fracture and temporal epidural hematoma.
G.C.S. 14 in the field, now down to 12.
His motor exams are intact.
Okay,let's get him on a gram of dilantin
-and 70 grams of mannitol.
-I'm on it.
Mr. Jones,I'm gonna need to do an examination of you,okay?
uh,my phone.An-answer.It's my wife.
-Y-you need to answer...
-okay,we're gonna answer your phone.
Dr. Stevens,answer his phone.
-It's fine.
-I got it.
Mr. Jones,can you squeeze my fingers for me,please?
Mr. Jones,I need you to squeeze my finger,okay?
Can you-- okay,he's in a seizure.
Let's get him on his side.
Watch his arm.
Hello.Hello?
George?
it's me,Izzie.
All right,let's get him to the O.R.
No,I don't have Bailey's husband's phone.
I think I'd know if I had Bailey's husband's phone,George.
What's Bailey's husband's name?
Watch the wall.
How are you doing over there?
My hand's getting numb.
And I gotta tell you, this whole "insides are bloody and squishy" thing is so not good for my gag reflex.
But I'm good.
Is this okay?
Me being in here likeke this?
Once Dr. Burke scrubs in, he'll have you remove your hand.
And then you can go, and we'll fix mr.
Carlson.
Good.'Cause I know how much medicine I know, and it's just enough to never be allowed in an O.R.
It's my second week as a paramedic.
I got out of school about a month ago.
I haven't been doing this that long either.
Talk about on-the-job training,uh?
-Dr.
Burke.
-Dr.
Shepherd.
-Hey.
-Hey
You've got Dr. Bailey's husband on the table?
Bailey's husband is going into surgery?
Got into a car accident trying to get to the hospital before the birth.
-What do I tell Bailey?
-Nothing.
Just wait till I get in there and see how bad the damage is, have something concrete to tell her.
Yeah,no use upsetting her until we know.
Yeah.
-Okay,keep me posted.
-Okay.
-Hey,Preston.
-Good seeing you,Addison.
What?
She gets to call you by your first name and I don't.
I like her.
-And you don't like me?
-No.
-How are we doin'?
-He's stabilized.
I'm just about to put him under.
Doctor.
Y-you're...
Shepherd,right?
Yes,I am.
I thought so.
Miranda...
she really likes you.
I like her,too.
-W-we're having a baby.
-I know.
I'm gonna take care of you.
I'm gonna get you back to Bailey,okay?
Safe and sound.
All this blood and none of it's hers?
Yeah,she's fine.
Acute anxiety reaction.
Give her 2 of diazepam P.O.
-To calm her down.
-She in shock?
I'll say.
Can you tell us exactly what happened?
I mean,the shock part.
it was shocking.
I'm shocked.
You tell my husband when I get my hands on him, he's a dead man.
Do you hear me?
Scaring me like this.
Exactly how was your husband injured?
Mindy?
Mindy,are you in here?
I'm over here,you moron.
How's James doing?
Oh,he's bleeding all over the place.
That's how he's doing.
The girl in the ambulance put her hand inside of him!
That's how he's doing!
What are you yelling at me for?
Because!
Because you and james are like idiots,playing like 8 year olds.
-Excuse me,um-- -we don't play
-Look,we reenact.
-You play.
You put on your costumes, and you build your stupid toys and you play.
-No,we reenact.
-Nobody reenacts world war II,
-you moron!
-Again,exactly what happened?
You wanna know what happened?
What happened is my husband and his moron best friend-- could you stop calling me a moron?
Moron best friend decided to build some kind of big gun.
Yeah,an exact replica of the finest allied antitank weapon of World War II,the m981 bazooka.
So they put on their stupid costumes, and they go out into the backyard, and they try to shoot the thing.
I'm the gunner.
James is the loader,okay?
We followed the specifications exactly.
You should see it.
It's a 60-millimeter, 1 1/2-pound rocket-- I mean,it's a beauty.
It didn't work, so like an idiot,my husband has to go and stand in front of his big gun to see what went wrong.
That's when the stupid toy starts working.
-Stop calling it a toy.
-It's taking up half my garage.
I'll call it whatever I want!
Hold on.
He shot himself with a bazooka?
Yeah.
He shot himself with a bazooka?
Like I said,morons, the pair of 'em.
-Was there an explosion?
-Huh?
-Was there an explosion?
-No,why?
Oh,crap
What?
What is it?
Hey,slow down.
if Bailey asks,I'm not the one who did this.
okay,everybody,I'm going to do a thoracotomy, and Hannah here is going to pull her hand out.
Dr. Grey is going to clamp the bleeder when we have more exposure.
-You ready?
-More than ready.
Scalpel.
uh,Tucker Jones, you better be lying in the street somewhere dead,mister, because when I get my hands on you--
I am having your baby here, mister!
okay,on the count of three.
One... two...
Dr. Burke.
-I need to speak with you.
-I'm in surgery,Karev.
You want to talk to me,sir.
unhook me.
Karev,if you interrupt me in my O.R.,
-It better be for a good damn reason.
-Was it through and through?
What?
The wound on James Carlson, was it through and through?
No,it was just an entry.
No exit.
Why?
he's cute.He single?
-Hannah.
-Yes,Dr. Burke.
What do you feel inside of mr.Carlson?
-What is your hand touching?
-What do you mean?
Is your hand touching anything hard?
-hard?
-Like metal.
Um...
I don't know.
Don't move your hand.
Just tell me...
what you feel.
Dr. Burke,what's going on?
Hannah.
Um,my fingertips are touching something...kinda hard.
-Yeah.Yeah,definitely.
-Oh,my god.
-Dr.
Milton.
-What?
What's wrong?
Hannah,I don't want you to move-- not your hand,not your body, not an inch.
Okay.
You should know you're starting to scare me.
Don't be scared.Everything's going to be fine.
Dr. Grey,can you...
I want you to walk out of this room-- walk,do not run-- go and tell the charge nurse that we have a code black.
-I'm sorry,"code black"?
-Code black.
Tell him that I am sure, and then tell him to call the bomb squad.
god,can you imagine?
What'd she stick her hand in there for anyway?
She was trying to save his life.
And now she might die because of it.
What do we do now?
I go back in and wait for the bomb squad.
You leave.
You all leave.
Mere,you comin'?
It's your funeral.
You need a surgical team.
All I need is Dr. Milton to keep him under.
I can do the rest myself.
fine.But you wait by the elevator.
I don't want anyone in here that doesn't need to be in this O.R.
When the bomb squad arrives, we'll take it from there.
Until then,Milton and I are doing this alone.
Now,go.
Okay,okay,okay.
eight minutes apart.
There is no shame in an epidural,Miranda.
Epidural increases the possibility of a c-section.
It also decreases pain.Miranda this is a big baby, it is your first baby, and I am telling you, it is not gonna a short or an easy labor.
I can handle a little pain.
No problem.
Women all over the world do this at home...
With nothing more than a pair of scissors and a bucket of hot water.
Well,women all over the world also die giving birth at home every single day.
I did not just say-- you're supposed to be making yourself useful and finding my husband.
-Well,I-I-- -he's not... here.
Oh,now he should be here by now.
okay,we're gonna go find him,
-right,Dr. O'malley?
-Right.
what?
Uh,nothing.I'll-- I'll be right back.
Yang,could you check that?
-how's he doing?
-Ah,it' s touch and go.
I've located the clot.
I'm just trying to find the source of the bleeding.
Go and find Addison, and tell her he's in worse shape than I thought.
-What'd they want?
-They want us to evacuate.
Evacuate?
Did they say why?
Uh,no,but your pager said, "code black."
-You're sure they said that?
-Yes.
It could be a Drill.
Even if it's not a Drill, I can't evacuate.
I've got an open brain on the table.
I'm not leaving Bailey's husband on the table with his skull flap open, so if anybody wants to go, they should go.
Anybody want to evacuate?
Going once,going twice, three times.
You're sure they said, "code black"?
Yes.
I don't like having to lie to Dr.Bailey.
-She would want-- -now is not the time, Dr. O'malley.
She'd want to know about her husband.
"code black"?
What's a code black.
wait,wait,hold it.
Dr. Shepherd, the other Dr. Shepherd wanted me to let you know that tucker's bleed is more extensive than he originally thought.
It's gonna be a few more hours before he has anything concrete
-to tell Dr. Bailey.
-Thanks,Stevens.
-What's a code black?
-A what?
"code black"?
Code red,code blue,code white- I've never had a code black.
Dr. Shepherd?
Just--just go back to your locker room and wait for your resident to give you instructions.
-We don't have a resident.
-What's going on?
Is it something bad?
yeah,it's something bad.
so... so I'm touching live...
unexploded ammunition?
I'm afraid so.
not the greatest feeling in the world.
No.
I guess not.
And he's still out?
yeah.
But he's not hooked up to the machine anymore?
I had Dr. Milton take him off the ventilator.
The flow of oxygen posed a danger.
The ambu bag is...breathing for him now.
But he can't hear me?
No.
Hannah.
what if I just take my hand out really quickly?
We'd have to ask the bomb squad that when they arrive, but I'm guessing that would cause the ammo to shift and explode.
Oh.
-Hannah.
-Yeah.
Your hand is keeping mr.
Carlson from bleeding out.
You are keeping him alive.
Right.An--and the bomb squad is coming?
The bomb squad is coming.
Okay.
Okay.
we are having pre-op patients transported to Mercy West.
all trauma rerouted to seattle presbyterian.
there is no danger to the north, south and west wings of this hospital just the east surgical wing.
that said,anyone who wants to leave can leave.
one stays unless they volunteer to stay.
understood?
okay.
richard,it's a code black, a real one?
yes,i've shut down the o. r. 's.
-to trauma?
-to everything.
wait a minute,to "everything" everything?
as of ten minutes ago,all the operating rooms at seattle grace were completely evacuated,with the exception fo Dr.Burke's team.
and Dr. Shepherd's team.
what?
what do you mean, "Dr. Shepherd's team"?
they're still in o. r. two.
the bomb squad just arrived.
excuse me.
-you're the surgical team?
-yes.
dylan young,bomb squad.
spread out,check the area, and then we'll secure the patient.
where are they?
Dr. Burke has them in there.
and the rest of this floor has been evacuated?
it has,yes.
all right,you stay here.
nobody moves unless I say so.
we've got people over here!
I thought you said the floor had been evacucuated.
I thought it had.
I'm not in charge of anything.
-Cristina!
-seriously,back up.
oh,no,no.
she will hurt him.
-what's going on?
-bomb in a body cavity.
man.
all i got is Bailey's husband's open brain.
what procedure?
craniotomy with Shepherd.
Shepherd's got Bailey's husband on the table?
Bailey's having a baby right now.
excuse me!
stop talking.
gotta eat something.
you knew Meredith and Cristina would be on the floor with the bomb.
yeah.
is it wrong that we're jealous?
it's all right that we're jealous,right?
the fact that we're jealous because they might blow up and die is not a reflection on our character.
-it's about feeling useless.
-ineffectual.
we couldn't even get Meredith out of bed this morning.
we had to call in Cristina.
how embarrassing is that?
you know what i think,George?
i think Meredith and Cristina are doers.
-They do.They're doers.
-They do,and we-- we watch.
We're watchers.
check mrs.Carlson's levels.
If they are stable, she can come up here.
All right!
-Excuse me.
-Oh,no problem
We have to become more proactive,George.
We have to become doers.
fight for what we want.
-We have to do.
-Yeah.
Oh,you mean... we are starting right now.
Okay.
Alex.
How crazy is this?
Dude,it's like the apocalypse.
-Alex.
-It's true.
I mean,look around you-- half the people who are supposed to be saving lives have fled the building to save themselves,
Bailey's husband almost died coming to see his kid get born, the annoying twins are down on the O.R. Floor with a guy who literally might explode in their faces.
It's a morgue waiting to happen in here.
I'm just saying,people should get while the getting's good because there might not be a tomorrow.
-Alex!
-What?
-Take off your pants.
-Izzie,what are you doing?
I'm being a doer.
Getting while the getting's good.
Now take off your pants.
You do realize that when I said "the apocalypse,"
I meant it metaphorically, not literally?
Alex...
I haven't had sex in 8 months and 12 days.
I'm horny,I'm half-naked, and I'm saying yes.
You want to stand there and talk metaphors or do you want to literally take off your pants?
Dr.Shepherd, there's an explosive device in the O.R. Next door.
I need you to evacuate now.
Yeah,and I've got a guy whose brain is exposed on this table.
I'm not gonna walk away and leave him to die.
The rest of you can go.
You should go.
Suction.
You close him up.You do whatever you have to do.
The chief of surgery has authorized me to tell you you cannot stay here.
The chief of surgery doesn't scare me.
Dr. Bailey scares me.
I'm not gonna be the one to tell her her husband died, and that's what would happen if we put his skull flap on in this condition, bomb or no bomb.
Now get out of my O.R.
Suction.
I'm trying to get gravity to do me a favor.
I'm 9 centimeters dilated.
I need that last centimeter.
Good.
That's,uh... that's good.
Dr.Shepherd.
Where exactly is my husband?
He's with my husband.
there's no telling how dangerous it is.
We need more info.
The longer we wait, the greater the chance he'll bleed out and die.
-Pink mist.
-Excuse me?
That's what the bomb squad calls you when you blow up.
Pink mist.
I read that somewhere.
The bomb goes off and... anyone in range explodes into a billion pieces.
You're liquid.
here's nothing left.
Just flecks of human flesh and blood.
Pink mist.
Sometimes they don't even find a finger.
One minute you're a person... the next,you're... bloody rain.
-Here,take this.
-What?
Go ahead.
Now I want you to squeeze it in even beats,okay?
No,not too fast.
Not too fast.
There you go.
Dr.Milton?
I've got kids.
Even beats.
Okay?
That's it.
what-- what about my husband?
How long can he staylike that, with live ammo inside him?
I honestly don't know.
But you're gonna try to save him,right?
We're gonna try.
First,the bomb squad has to determine the best way to retrieve the device.
I'm sorry,mindy.
I'm so sorry.
Shut up!
We've got three kids, and you've got him building bazookas.
Oh,god.
he's gonna die.
Uh,paul,why don't you go with the officer there and answer his questions about the device you guys built?
Oh,anything.Anything to help.
Uh,Karev,why don't we get mrs.Carlson a cup of coffee?
I-I guess I should look on the bright side.
It's not like this can get any worse.
I mean... this is it.
This is as bad as it gets.
Right?
Dr.Bailey...
um,I was...
Dr.Bailey, what are you- get someone to find me my suitcase.
-I need my suitcase.
I'm goin' home.
Dr.Bailey, you're having a baby.
There's not going to be any baby born today.
You hear me?
I'm holding it in.
I'll have him tomorrow.
Just not now.
Not like this.
No!
Just... no.
I'm goin' home.
I'm goin' home right now.
I can't.
I can't do this without my husband.
I can't do this all alone.
Okay,okay.
so how are they gonna remove that ammo without killing Hannah and james?
Cristina.
The bomb squad guy said you're supposed to stay away from there.
Is it me or is Hannah shaking?
Is she squeezing that ambu bag by herself?
Where is Dr.Milton?
Hannah.
Where is the anesthesiologist?
He,um... he left.
He didn't want to die.
Hannah.
I think I'm gonna take my hand out now.
When the hell are people gonna learn?
it may not be as bad as it seems.
Her hand is holding that device steady.
Or maybe her hand is simply in there with the ammo.
We can't know.
Yeah,well,my guy's talked to the friend.
That device is homemade, which means it's unstable and very unreliable.
It could be a dud, but we have no way of knowing.
Add to that the fact that you've got a surgeon in the O.R. Next door refusing to leave and a nervous paramedic's hand inside the body cavity-- it's definitely as bad as it seems.
That's what I'm saying.
hey,somebody!
Help!
We need help in here.
I think I'm just gonna take it out now,okay?
You made it almost to the finish line.You can do this.
No,no,I just want to take it out and be done with it.
Hannah,it won't be much longer.
Remember,you're keeping him from bleeding out.
No!
I am 22 years old.
I should not even be in here.
This is some kind of mistake.
She's panicking.
We need to clear the room.
I'm not leaving.
-Grey,let's move.
-I'm not leaving her.
You need to get everyone out now,Dr.Burke.
She's my intern.
I am responsible for her.
No,it's gotta come out.
It has to come out.
-Yang,go with Dylan.
-You go with Dylan.
-Hannah,look at me.
-No,it's gotta come out.
-Hannah.
-No,no.
Hannah,look at me.
You can do this.
Hannah, you need to calm down.
You need to relax,Hannah.
Everything's gonna be fine.
-No!
-Hannah.
you can do this.
You can do this,Hannah.
No,it has to come out.
No,you keep it there just a little while longer.
I have to take it out!
I have to!
I have to!
-Hannah.
-I have to!
If you leave, it'll break.
Meredith.
What did I do?
oh,god,Meredith.
Just stay right where you are.
Nobody move.
Stay exactly where you are.
What did I do?
What did I do?
What did I do?
What did I do?
[Narrator] Previously on Grey's Anatomy:
[Meredith] I have a feeling.
- [Cristina] What kind of feeling?
- Like I might die.
[Meredith] Hello?
Clearly not my dream.
My contractions are ten minutes apart and my water just broke on your shoes.
- Can't we use first names?
- I don't think so.
I can't remember our last kiss?
Where... is my husband?
Got into a car accident getting to the birth.
- Is my wife here?
- There's not going to be a baby today!
Meredith and Cristina are doers.
They're doers.
I'm horny, I'm half-naked.
You want to talk metaphors or do you want to take off your pants?
A quiet board means trouble.
A quiet board is death.
Hannah.
Hannah Davies.
Why do you have your hand inside my patient?
My husband has to go and stand in front of his big gun.
[Alex] He shot himself with a bazooka?
- Was there an explosion?
- No.
I'm touching live unexploded ammunition?
Ten minutes ago the operating rooms at Seattle Grace were evacuated
- except Dr. Burke's team.
- And Dr. Shepherd's team.
I can't leave Bailey's husband with his skull flap open.
Pink mist.
That's what the bomb squad calls you when you blow up.
Dylan Young, bomb squad.
That device is homemade which means it's unstable.
I am 22 years old.
We need to clear the room.
This is a mistake.
Calm down.
What did I do?
What did I do?
[Meredith] In hospitals, they say you know,
You know when you're going to die,
Some doctors say it's a look patients get in their eyes,
Some say there 's a scent, the smell of death,
Some think there 's just some kind of sixth sense,
When the great beyond is heading for you, you feel it coming,
Whatever it is, it's creepy,
Because if you know, what do you do about it?
Forget about the fact that you're scared out of your mind, [breathes heavily]
If you knew this was your last day on Earth, how would you want to spend it?
- What's going on?
- Uh, something happened in OR Three.
- What?
- I don't know.
All I know is Hannah, the paramedic, she's missing.
[George] Chief?
What's happened?
A quiet board.
A quiet board is what's happened.
Dr. Shepherd?
Dr. Burke.
How's it going?
He's got a second bleed under the skull base.
If I do what the textbooks say, he could lose the power of speech, herniate and die.
- What's your other option?
- If I do what I want, he could lose the power of speech, herniate and die.
Well, good luck with that.
Thanks.
Is there something you want?
You know, it was really stupid of you not to evacuate.
- You, too.
- Yeah, I know.
We should consider a new profession.
Yes, we should.
Now, can you operate and remove the device from the guy?
After the bomb squad is through assessing him, I'm going to try.
I don't want to be the guy that kills Bailey's husband.
I don't want to be the guy that kills us all.
- Dr. Shepherd.
- Dr. Burke.
You realize how stupid that was?
- It was, incredibly stupid.
- I don't need to be made fun of when I have my hand inside a body that's got a bomb in it and a stranger is Velcro-ing a flak jacket to my boobs.
You've got a sense of irony.
Only when things are really ironic.
I had a feeling.
[Dylan] What's that?
Nothing.
- Time for you to go.
- No, I'm staying.
There's nothing more you can do here.
We got it covered.
Cristina, this is not another cool surgery.
This ammo can go off any time and kill everyone.
Do you get that?
You cannot be in here.
- Do you think this is about surgery?
- I cannot do this with you here.
I cannot think.
We'll be fine.
It's OK.
You know in the movies how there's always the hero and then there's the other guy?
You know the guy who sees danger and runs in the opposite direction?
Yes.
Be the other guy.
[Sighs]
So, you have a plan, right?
You have a way to get me out of this?
I feel colors are brighter.
Does anyone feel colors are brighter?
- My head hurts.
- It's the adrenaline.
- Do you have the smell thing?
I have...
- Shut up!
- Are you OK?
- Of course not.
How could she be OK?
You're insensitive.
- I am not insensitive.
- Would you shut up!
Nobody cares if the blue is bluer or if you have super smelling powers.
Meredith could die.
Any minute she could just... die.
Actually stop living.
Dead.
Corpse.
[Laughs]
Look, I'm sorry.
God, I have really inappropriate reactions to this kind of stress.
I'm sorry.
Hold on.
- OK?
- Yeah.
Should we like... do something?
- I mean, call Meredith's family?
- We are Meredith's family.
I'm sorry. [laughs]
We are Meredith's family.
- This area's been evacuated, Dr. Yang.
- And somehow you're still here.
- I have to be here.
You don't.
- Yes I do.
- Dr. Yang.
- Yes I do!
Besides, I...
I'm guessing you need a little company.
- How's he doing?
- He's hanging in there.
- How's the paramedic Hannah doing?
- Hannah?
The girl with the bomb.
Oh, uh, she's hanging in there, too.
[Elevator bell pings]
- Calm down.
- [Richard] Calm down?
I have an evacuated OR, a bomb in a body cavity, a missing paramedic, an intern with her hand on the explosive, two world-class surgeons in harm's way, a man on a table who may bleed out any moment
unless we remove the bomb from his chest and my favorite resident in labor who you are now telling me refuses to push.
Really?
Calm down?
- You really want me to calm down?
- OK, don't calm down.
Dr. Bailey is scared, sir.
It's a day to be scared.
She won't let me examine her but her contractions are 40 seconds apart and she is refusing to push.
The baby could go into distress and if she doesn't come out of this,
I'll need an OR to do an emergency C-section.
I can't give you an OR, Addie.
I don't have an OR to give.
Convince her.
Bailey's rational.
She's not Bailey, she's a woman in labor whose husband is in surgery next to a bomb.
- So is yours.
- This is about Bailey.
I need an OR.
- I don't know what to tell you.
- Look, Richard, we have about an hour.
And then I'm going to need you to get me an OR, build me an OR, find me a helicopter to fly me to any OR in the city.
Otherwise, instead of having a baby, she'll be losing one.
- Here are the blueprints you asked for.
- Thank you.
[# The Weepies:
World Spins Madly On]
I laugh at funerals.
I don't go to funerals.
Izzie.
Iz.
I was jealous.
I was jealous of Meredith and the surgery and I...
I...
I was... jealous, and now...
I was jealous, Alex.
Is this the strangest thing to happen in your OR?
- I'd have to say that it is.
- Good, because I'm very competitive.
All the best surgeons are.
[George] Dr. Montgomery-Shepherd talked to the chief.
She's on the phone with Mercy West now
- to see if they have any ORs.
- I need someone to drive me home.
They're talking about doing a C-section.
Let them talk.
I'm not going to Mercy West.
This baby is not coming out.
I need a ride.
I can't focus enough to drive myself and Tucker...
- I need a ride.
- You could lose it.
I told you, I'm not having this baby until tomorrow.
- It could die before it's even born!
- Can you give me a ride home?
- Dr. Bailey...
- Then get out!
[Woman] Is there any news?
What?
Oh, I'm sorry, Mrs. Carlson.
My husband.
I was wondering if there was any news.
Because you look so worried.
And I heard this doctor saying even though that girl has her finger on the tear in his heart... that my husband's losing... blood.
Every second he's losing blood.
Which means he could die.
He could die?
I ask because I know you'll tell me the truth.
Because you look so worried.
Mrs. Carlson...
Yes, it's possible that he could bleed out and die if we don't operate soon.
OK.
OK.
Thank you for telling me the truth.
[Breathless sobbing]
I'll just...
I'll just go wait... over here.
Will somebody get me an update?
And where's the head of the bomb squad?
I'm right here.
And we're good to go.
My team's in place, Dr. Burke is ready.
The patient is stable.
We can have the bomb out in ten minutes if I'm not interrupted.
In the OR we put our patients under general anesthesia.
- Yeah.
- That involves a steady flow of oxygen.
Well, can't you turn off the oxygen to my OR?
I can and I have.
But... this is your OR.
This is the OR floor's main oxygen line.
It's going to be OK.
- You don't know that.
- It's just what you say.
I know.
- Where you going?
- I can't just...
I got to do something to help.
Thank you...
for saying that it's going to be OK.
Even if it is just what you say.
[Whispering]
Stop it.
- I'm not a patient.
- What?
You two are looking at me the way we look at patients.
Like I'm going to freak out any minute.
I'm not going to freak out so, whatever it is, just tell me.
The main oxygen line runs directly under this room.
OK.
Not OK?
Well?
I need one of you to tell me what this means exactly.
Because I think I know what it means, but I tend to be "glass half empty" these days, so I won't trust what I think it means.
Because I think it means that if the bomb were to explode over the oxygen line, the whole hospital could blow up.
And that's just crazy, right?
I need an answer on when they're going to start moving.
- Look, I'm busy.
- I know.
I know you are, but if there was something, anything we could do to help, it would be very helpful.
We need an assignment, sir.
- [Breathless] Look, I need...
- [Izzie] Chief?
- He's full-on diaphoretic.
- Check his pulse.
- [Alex] We need help.
- [Izzie] Let's move!
- [Izzie] I'll get a wheelchair.
- [Alex] I think it's a heart attack.
[Dylan] Meredith, all it means...
- is that we have to move.
- Move?
That's right.
We have to move.
[Whispers] I don't want to spend another second here.
Wait.
I can't wiggle my fingers because we can't shift the ammo, and now you want to roll out the entire gurney?
Well, that's our safest, safest option.
So we move.
Not a problem.
We can do this.
- You handling this, Grey?
- I'm handling this.
- So how's it look?
- Hard to say.
EKG is normal.
- That's good news.
- I'm getting up.
Sir, you should wait until we get the blood work back.
- I'm not listening.
- You can talk to me, Dr. Stevens.
[Izzie] Um...
Um...
OK.
Your husband should really wait until we get the blood work back for confirmation.
OK, out!
Both of you!
- I'm getting up.
- You have to body-check me to do so.
Adele, there is a bomb!
I heard.
[Richard sighs]
Dr. Montgomery-Shepherd?
What are we going to do?
I mean, about Dr. Bailey.
Can we drug her?
- Against her will?
- No.
Well... yes.
I mean, can't we force her to push?
Lf...
Declare her temporarily insane?
[Short laugh]
You want me to declare Miranda Bailey, Miranda...
Bailey, incompetent?
Do you think that will help?
Do you think it will make her more inclined, comfortable giving birth?
- I don't know.
- Do you think I'm not doing everything I can to help her?
Do you think I'm just out here because I needed a little me-time?
- I'm just asking.
- Stop asking!
No matter what you ask, I don't know.
I am doing everything I can.
Everything I can.
Miranda Bailey's husband is in mortal danger, actual mortal danger.
There's not a lot I can say to comfort her because there's not a lot anybody can say to comfort me.
I'm doing my best.
Dr. Bailey is doing her best.
And I need you to do your best and I need it to be better than standing here asking me the world's stupidest questions!
I don't know, O'Malley!
[Sobbing]
Hey.
You OK?
Wait, are you bleeding?
I...
I think I fell.
I was...
I was running and, um...
and I fell.
It...
It's OK.
Are you Hannah?
Yeah.
[Derek] Microscissors, Dr. Yang.
What is so interesting out there?
I, um, I'll...
[Dylan] You're doing great.
[Meredith] Let's go over it again.
The device is shaped like a rocket about eight inches long.
We'll have everything ready, Dr. Burke's team will be in place, my team will be in place.
Then I'm going to ask you to take the hand that you have in Mr. Carlson and wrap it around the device.
- And pull it out.
- Level.
Pull it out while keeping it level.
You know, I don't like you very much.
I don't like you, either.
- What are you doing?
- Stop where you are.
- What are you doing?
- Dr. Burke told you to leave.
We're moving to an OR further away from the oxygen line.
In case we blow up.
[Dylan] I remember him telling you to leave.
- Where is he?
- He's prepping the OR.
Then he'll never know, will he?
You stay over there.
You stay over there.
You ready?
- Tell me something.
- What?
Cristina, I have my hand on a bomb, I'm freaking out.
And most importantly, I really have to pee.
Tell me anything.
He told me he loved me.
Last night.
He thought I was sleeping, but I heard.
Burke loves you.
Yeah.
Mind your own business.
- Burke loves you.
- Yeah, everybody has problems.
- Well, are you going to say it back?
- Of course not.
He didn't say it to me, only to the sleeping me.
Reciprocity is not required.
- Besides, he might blow up.
- Excellent point.
All right, everybody.
Let's just keep placing one foot in front of the other.
Nice and slow.
- Meredith, we're almost there.
- OK.
We're almost there.
Nice and easy.
Ready?
- Yep.
- All right, let's go.
Nice and slow.
You had to say you were going to die today?
I told you.
It's not too deep, but you are going to need a couple of stitches.
Hannah, is there someone you would like me to call?
Family?
Or maybe... a friend?
That doctor...
Dr. Grey?
Meredith.
- Is she?
- She's still there.
- So she's still alive?
- She's alive.
She's still alive.
Dr. Milton shouldn't have left you.
- He's a coward.
- I'm a coward.
- No.
- I ran away.
You think you're going to be different.
You think you're going to be the kind of person who stays and does something.
You know, a good man in the storm.
I'm a paramedic.
I'm supposed to stay and do something.
I'm not supposed to run away.
I'm not supposed to hide under the stairs because I left two people to die.
I'm supposed to stay and do something.
I ran away.
Well, blood work's back.
The chief had an anxiety attack.
Who's going to tell him?
Um...
I gave you sex in the linen closet.
You tell him.
Fair enough.
OK, Dr. Bailey.
Let's go.
[Sobs]
Dr. Bailey, I need you to turn on your back.
I need you to push.
Leave me alone.
Miranda...
I can't let her go any longer.
I'll go tell Richard that he has to give us an OR, OK?
Dr. Bailey, I'm surprised at you.
This is not how I thought you would do this.
Dr. O'Malley, I don't think...
I truly...
- I expected more.
- George.
- You're Dr. Bailey.
- [Sobs]
You don't hide from a fight.
You don't give up.
You strive for greatness.
You...
Dr. Bailey... you are a doer.
I know your husband's not here and I know there are a lot of things going on here that we have no control over.
But this...
This... we can do.
OK?
OK.
[Bailey sobs]
Let's have this baby.
[Exhales] We're ready when you are.
[Dylan] We're good.
Meredith?
Yeah.
[Burke] I'm going to extend the wound.
When I cut, the bleeding is going to intensify.
If we're going to save Mr. Carlson, you must pull the ammo out immediately.
But remember:
Remove it while keeping it as level as possible.
Nice and easy.
No quick movements.
Level.
Right.
Level.
You ready?
I, uh...
- Do I have a choice?
- You have to be ready.
Yeah.
I guess...
Scalpel.
I guess I'm ready.
- [Derek] How's it going, Yang?
- Everything's fine.
- How's the girl with the bomb?
- How's he doing?
He's almost there.
Can you suction?
Irrigate.
Great.
- You didn't answer my question.
- Sir?
How is the girl with the bomb?
It's Meredith.
The girl with the bomb is Meredith.
[Beep]
I'm good.
She can go.
All right, now, Meredith... wrap your hand around the nose cone.
Meredith.
Grey?
Grey?
We're losing him.
Push one of epi.
- [Cristina] Thready pulse.
- [Nurse] Epi in.
- [Derek] Get me a wet lap.
- Here.
Roll him on three.
Everybody ready?
Ready?
We got to go!
Come on, let's go!
Meredith?
George and Izzie shouldn't have to move out.
No.
You hear me...
You should make sure... make sure that they... they get to stay in the house.
[Moaning]
- [Addison] Good.
- [George] Push.
- Push.
- Just a little bit more.
- I can see the top of the head.
- I got to stop.
- And stop.
- OK, that was good.
That was very good.
That was...
OK, are you ready?
- Ready?
- OK.
Push.
[Wails]
[Derek] Come on, come on.
- [Cristina] Wide complex bradycardia.
- [Derek] One of epi and of atropine.
Come on, come on.
You can't do this, Tucker!
You cannot quit on me.
Come on.
- In.
- Grey?
His pressure's dropping.
Grey?
Look, I can't.
No.
I can't.
This is crazy.
Burke, you're gonna go.
You go.
- Both of you.
- Nobody's dying today, Grey.
I want you to look at me.
Look at me.
I know this is bad.
I know that I'm this ass who's been yelling at you all day.
So you pretend that I'm not.
You pretend that I'm someone you like.
Whatever you need.
But you need to listen to me.
- I'm scared.
- [Derek] I know.
You can do this.
It'll be over in a second.
You can do this, Meredith.
OK.
OK.
Gently.
[# Anna Nalick:
Breathe (2AM)]
[Addison] Good.
A little bit more.
Good.
Stop.
Stop?
Oh, Dr. Bailey, I can see the top of his head.
He's got a lot of hair.
- Oh, he's cute.
- O'Malley.
Stop looking at my vah-jay-jay!
Yes, ma'am.
[Continuous beep]
Out of the way!
[Groans]
[Intermittent beeping]
You did good.
[Richard] What the hell is happening?
Who's coming up?
OK.
Come on, sweetheart.
All right, people!
They're coming up!
Mrs. Carlson... [elevator bell pings]
- Derek.
- Preston.
Dr. Burke.
Is my husband, um alive?
- Yes.
Is he going to stay alive?
Thanks to that young lady over there, he is.
[Sobs]
Thank you.
Thank you.
Thank you.
Thank you.
- Where is she?
- You had to be a cowboy.
Where is she?
She's right here.
Derek!
You're OK.
You're OK.
That is not the "she" he was asking for.
[# Kate Havnevik:
Unlike Me (acapella mix)]
Burke?
You awake?
Burke.
[Snores]
I love you, too.
This is our son.
William George Bailey Jones.
Hello, my little man.
Hello.
He's beautiful.
[Thunder rumbles]
[Knock at door]
There's someone at the door for you.
[Sighs]
Hey.
Hey.
You almost died today.
Yeah.
I almost died today.
I can't...
I can't remember our last kiss.
All I could think about was, "I can't remember our last kiss,"
which is pathetic, but... the last time we were together and happy, I... want to be able to remember that.
And I can't, Derek.
I can't remember it.
I'm glad you didn't die today.
It was a Thursday morning.
You were wearing that ratty little Dartmouth t-shirt you look so good in.
The one with the hole in the back of the neck.
You'd just washed your hair and you smelled like some kind of... flower.
I was running late for surgery.
You said you were going to see me later.
Then you leaned to me.
You put your hand on my chest... and you kissed me.
Soft.
It was quick.
Kind of like a habit.
You know, like we'd do it every day for the rest of our lives.
You went back to reading the newspaper and I went to work.
That was the last time we kissed.
Lavender.
My hair smelled like lavender.
From my conditioner.
Lavender.
Huh.
[Meredith] If you knew this was your last day on Earth... how would you want to spend it?
[narrator] Previously on Grey's Anatomy:
[Meredith] I have a feeling.
- [Cristina] What kind of feeling?
- Like I might die.
[Meredith] Hello?
Clearly not my dream.
My contractions are ten minutes apart and my water just broke on your shoes.
- Can't we use first names?
- I don't think so.
I can't remember our last kiss?
Where... is my husband?
Got into a car accident getting to the birth.
- Is my wife here?
- There's not going to be a baby today!
Meredith and Cristina are doers.
They're doers.
I'm horny, I'm half-naked.
You want to talk metaphors or do you want to take off your pants?
A quiet board means trouble.
A quiet board is death.
Hannah.
Hannah Davies.
Why do you have your hand inside my patient?
My husband has to go and stand in front of his big gun.
[Alex] He shot himself with a bazooka?
- Was there an explosion?
- No.
I'm touching live unexploded ammunition?
Ten minutes ago the operating rooms at Seattle Grace were evacuated
- except Dr. Burke's team.
- And Dr. Shepherd's team.
I can't leave Bailey's husband with his skull flap open.
Pink mist.
That's what the bomb squad calls you when you blow up.
Dylan Young, bomb squad.
That device is homemade which means it's unstable.
I am 22 years old.
We need to clear the room.
This is a mistake.
Calm down.
What did I do?
What did I do?
[Meredith] In hospitals, they say you know.
You know when you're going to die.
Some doctors say it's a look patients get in their eyes.
Some say there 's a scent, the smell of death.
Some think there 's just some kind of sixth sense.
When the great beyond is heading for you, you feel it coming.
Whatever it is, it's creepy.
Because if you know, what do you do about it?
Forget about the fact that you're scared out of your mind.
[breathes heavil7]
If you knew this was your last day on Earth, how would you want to spend it?
- What's going on?
- Uh, something happened in OR Three.
- What?
- I don't know.
All I know is Hannah, the paramedic, she's missing.
[George] Chief?
What's happened?
A quiet board.
A quiet board is what's happened.
Dr. Shepherd?
Dr. Burke.
How's it going?
He's got a second bleed under the skull base.
If I do what the textbooks say, he could lose the power of speech, herniate and die.
- What's your other option?
- If I do what I want, he could lose the power of speech, herniate and die.
Well, good luck with that.
Thanks.
Is there something you want?
You know, it was really stupid of you not to evacuate.
- You, too.
- Yeah, I know.
We should consider a new profession.
Yes, we should.
Now, can you operate and remove the device from the guy?
After the bomb squad is through assessing him, I'm going to try.
I don't want to be the guy that kills Bailey's husband.
I don't want to be the guy that kills us all.
- Dr. Shepherd.
- Dr. Burke.
You realize how stupid that was?
- It was, incredibly stupid.
- I don't need to be made fun of when I have my hand inside a body that's got a bomb in it and a stranger is Velcro-ing a flak jacket to my boobs.
You've got a sense of irony.
Only when things are really ironic.
I had a feeling.
[Dylan] What's that?
Nothing.
- Time for you to go.
- No, I'm staying.
There's nothing more you can do here.
We got it covered.
Cristina, this is not another cool surgery.
This ammo can go off any time and kill everyone.
Do you get that?
You cannot be in here.
- Do you think this is about surgery?
- I cannot do this with you here.
I cannot think.
We'll be fine.
It's OK.
You know in the movies how there's always the hero and then there's the other guy?
You know the guy who sees danger and runs in the opposite direction?
Yes.
Be the other guy.
[sighs]
So, you have a plan, right?
You have a way to get me out of this?
I feel colors are brighter.
Does anyone feel colors are brighter?
- My head hurts.
- It's the adrenaline.
- Do you have the smell thing?
I have...
- Shut up!
- Are you OK?
- Of course not.
How could she be OK?
You're insensitive.
- I am not insensitive.
- Would you shut up!
Nobody cares if the blue is bluer or if you have super smelling powers.
Meredith could die.
Any minute she could just... die.
Actually stop living.
Dead.
Corpse.
[laughs]
Look, I'm sorry.
God, I have really inappropriate reactions to this kind of stress.
I'm sorry.
Hold on.
- OK?
- Yeah.
Should we like... do something?
- I mean, call Meredith's family?
- We are Meredith's family.
I'm sorry. [laughs]
We are Meredith's family.
- This area's been evacuated, Dr. Yang.
- And somehow you're still here.
- I have to be here.
You don't.
- Yes I do.
- Dr. Yang.
- Yes I do!
Besides, I...
I'm guessing you need a little company.
- How's he doing?
- He's hanging in there.
- How's the paramedic Hannah doing?
- Hannah?
The girl with the bomb.
Oh, uh, she's hanging in there, too.
[elevator bell pings]
- Calm down.
- [Richard] Calm down?
I have an evacuated OR, a bomb in a body cavity, a missing paramedic, an intern with her hand on the explosive, two world-class surgeons in harm's way, a man on a table who may bleed out any moment
unless we remove the bomb from his chest and my favorite resident in labor who you are now telling me refuses to push.
Really?
Calm down?
- You really want me to calm down?
- OK, don't calm down.
Dr. Bailey is scared, sir.
It's a day to be scared.
She won't let me examine her but her contractions are 40 seconds apart and she is refusing to push.
The baby could go into distress and if she doesn't come out of this,
I'll need an OR to do an emergency C-section.
I can't give you an OR, Addie.
I don't have an OR to give.
Convince her.
Bailey's rational.
She's not Bailey, she's a woman in labor whose husband is in surgery next to a bomb.
- So is yours.
- This is about Bailey.
I need an OR.
- I don't know what to tell you.
- Look, Richard, we have about an hour.
And then I'm going to need you to get me an OR, build me an OR, find me a helicopter to fly me to any OR in the city.
Otherwise, instead of having a baby, she'll be losing one.
- Here are the blueprints you asked for.
- Thank you.
[# The Weepies:
World Spins Madly On]
I laugh at funerals.
I don't go to funerals.
Izzie.
Iz.
I was jealous.
I was jealous of Meredith and the surgery and I...
I...
I was... jealous, and now...
I was jealous, Alex.
Is this the strangest thing to happen in your OR?
- I'd have to say that it is.
- Good, because I'm very competitive.
All the best surgeons are.
[George] Dr. Montgomery-Shepherd talked to the chief.
She's on the phone with Mercy West now
- to see if they have any ORs.
- I need someone to drive me home.
They're talking about doing a C-section.
Let them talk.
I'm not going to Mercy West.
This baby is not coming out.
I need a ride.
I can't focus enough to drive myself and Tucker...
- I need a ride.
- You could lose it.
I told you, I'm not having this baby until tomorrow.
- It could die before it's even born!
- Can you give me a ride home?
- Dr. Bailey...
- Then get out!
[woman] Is there any news?
What?
Oh, I'm sorry, Mrs. Carlson.
My husband.
I was wondering if there was any news.
Because you look so worried.
And I heard this doctor saying even though that girl has her finger on the tear in his heart... that my husband's losing... blood.
Every second he's losing blood.
Which means he could die.
He could die?
I ask because I know you'll tell me the truth.
Because you look so worried.
Mrs. Carlson...
Yes, it's possible that he could bleed out and die if we don't operate soon.
OK.
OK.
Thank you for telling me the truth.
[breathless sobbing]
I'll just...
I'll just go wait... over here.
Will somebody get me an update?
And where's the head of the bomb squad?
I'm right here.
And we're good to go.
My team's in place, Dr. Burke is ready.
The patient is stable.
We can have the bomb out in ten minutes if I'm not interrupted.
In the OR we put our patients under general anesthesia.
- Yeah.
- That involves a steady flow of oxygen.
Well, can't you turn off the oxygen to my OR?
I can and I have.
But... this is your OR.
This is the OR floor's main oxygen line.
It's going to be OK.
- You don't know that.
- It's just what you say.
I know.
- Where you going?
- I can't just...
I got to do something to help.
Thank you...
for saying that it's going to be OK.
Even if it is just what you say.
[whispering]
Stop it.
- I'm not a patient.
- What?
You two are looking at me the way we look at patients.
Like I'm going to freak out any minute.
I'm not going to freak out so, whatever it is, just tell me.
The main oxygen line runs directly under this room.
OK.
Not OK?
Well?
I need one of you to tell me what this means exactly.
Because I think I know what it means, but I tend to be "glass half empty" these days, so I won't trust what I think it means.
Because I think it means that if the bomb were to explode over the oxygen line, the whole hospital could blow up.
And that's just crazy, right?
I need an answer on when they're going to start moving.
- Look, I'm busy.
- I know.
I know you are, but if there was something, anything we could do to help, it would be very helpful.
We need an assignment, sir.
- [breathless] Look, I need...
- [lzzie] Chief?
- He's full-on diaphoretic.
- Check his pulse.
- [Alex] We need help.
- [lzzie] Let's move!
- [lzzie] I'll get a wheelchair.
- [Alex] I think it's a heart attack.
[Dylan] Meredith, all it means...
- is that we have to move.
- Move?
That's right.
We have to move.
[whispers] I don't want to spend another second here.
Wait.
I can't wiggle my fingers because we can't shift the ammo, and now you want to roll out the entire gurney?
Well, that's our safest, safest option.
So we move.
Not a problem.
We can do this.
- You handling this, Grey?
- I'm handling this.
- So how's it look?
- Hard to say.
EKG is normal.
- That's good news.
- I'm getting up.
Sir, you should wait until we get the blood work back.
- I'm not listening.
- You can talk to me, Dr. Stevens.
[lzzie] Um...
Um...
OK.
Your husband should really wait until we get the blood work back for confirmation.
OK, out!
Both of you!
- I'm getting up.
- You have to body-check me to do so.
Adele, there is a bomb!
I heard.
[Richard sighs]
Dr. Montgomery-Shepherd?
What are we going to do?
I mean, about Dr. Bailey.
Can we drug her?
- Against her will?
- No.
Well... yes.
I mean, can't we force her to push?
If...
Declare her temporarily insane?
[short laugh]
You want me to declare Miranda Bailey, Miranda...
Bailey, incompetent?
Do you think that will help?
Do you think it will make her more inclined, comfortable giving birth?
- I don't know.
- Do you think I'm not doing everything I can to help her?
Do you think I'm just out here because I needed a little me-time?
- I'm just asking.
- Stop asking!
No matter what you ask, I don't know.
I am doing everything I can.
Everything I can.
Miranda Bailey's husband is in mortal danger, actual mortal danger.
There's not a lot I can say to comfort her because there's not a lot anybody can say to comfort me.
I'm doing my best.
Dr. Bailey is doing her best.
And I need you to do your best and I need it to be better than standing here asking me the world's stupidest questions!
I don't know, O'Malley!
[sobbing]
Hey.
You OK?
Wait, are you bleeding?
I...
I think I fell.
I was...
I was running and, um...
and I fell.
It...
It's OK.
Are you Hannah?
Yeah.
[Derek] Microscissors, Dr. Yang.
What is so interesting out there?
I, um, I'll...
[Dylan] You're doing great.
[Meredith] Let's go over it again.
The device is shaped like a rocket about eight inches long.
We'll have everything ready, Dr. Burke's team will be in place, my team will be in place.
Then I'm going to ask you to take the hand that you have in Mr. Carlson and wrap it around the device.
- And pull it out.
- Level.
Pull it out while keeping it level.
You know, I don't like you very much.
I don't like you, either.
- What are you doing?
- Stop where you are.
- What are you doing?
- Dr. Burke told you to leave.
We're moving to an OR further away from the oxygen line.
In case we blow up.
[Dylan] I remember him telling you to leave.
- Where is he?
- He's prepping the OR.
Then he'll never know, will he?
You stay over there.
You stay over there.
You ready?
- Tell me something.
- What?
Cristina, I have my hand on a bomb, I'm freaking out.
And most importantly, I really have to pee.
Tell me anything.
He told me he loved me.
Last night.
He thought I was sleeping, but I heard.
Burke loves you.
Yeah.
Mind your own business.
- Burke loves you.
- Yeah, everybody has problems.
- Well, are you going to say it back?
- Of course not.
He didn't say it to me, only to the sleeping me.
Reciprocity is not required.
- Besides, he might blow up.
- Excellent point.
All right, everybody.
Let's just keep placing one foot in front of the other.
Nice and slow.
- Meredith, we're almost there.
- OK.
We're almost there.
Nice and easy.
Ready?
- Yep.
- All right, let's go.
Nice and slow.
You had to say you were going to die today?
I told you.
It's not too deep, but you are going to need a couple of stitches.
Hannah, is there someone you would like me to call?
Family?
Or maybe... a friend?
That doctor...
Dr. Grey?
Meredith.
- Is she...?
- She's still there.
- So she's still alive?
- She's alive.
She's still alive.
Dr. Milton shouldn't have left you.
- He's a coward.
- I'm a coward.
- No.
- I ran away.
You think you're going to be different.
You think you're going to be the kind of person who stays and does something.
You know, a good man in the storm.
I'm a paramedic.
I'm supposed to stay and do something.
I'm not supposed to run away.
I'm not supposed to hide under the stairs because I left two people to die.
I'm supposed to stay and do something.
I ran away.
Well, blood work's back.
The chief had an anxiety attack.
Who's going to tell him?
Um...
I gave you sex in the linen closet.
You tell him.
Fair enough.
OK, Dr. Bailey.
Let's go.
[sobs]
Dr. Bailey, I need you to turn on your back.
I need you to push.
Leave me alone.
Miranda...
I can't let her go any longer.
I'll go tell Richard that he has to give us an OR, OK?
Dr. Bailey, I'm surprised at you.
This is not how I thought you would do this.
Dr. O'Malley, I don't think...
I truly...
- I expected more.
- George.
- You're Dr. Bailey.
- [sobs]
You don't hide from a fight.
You don't give up.
You strive for greatness.
You...
Dr. Bailey... you are a doer.
I know your husband's not here and I know there are a lot of things going on here that we have no control over.
But this...
This... we can do.
OK?
OK.
[Bailey sobs]
Let's have this baby.
[exhales] We're ready when you are.
[Dylan] We're good.
Meredith?
Yeah.
[Burke] I'm going to extend the wound.
When I cut, the bleeding is going to intensify.
If we're going to save Mr. Carlson, you must pull the ammo out immediately.
But remember:
Remove it while keeping it as level as possible.
Nice and easy.
No quick movements.
Level.
Right.
Level.
You ready?
I, uh...
- Do I have a choice?
- You have to be ready.
Yeah.
I guess...
Scalpel.
I guess I'm ready.
- [Derek] How's it going, Yang?
- Everything's fine.
- How's the girl with the bomb?
- How's he doing?
He's almost there.
Can you suction?
Irrigate.
Great.
- You didn't answer my question.
- Sir?
How is the girl with the bomb?
It's Meredith.
The girl with the bomb is Meredith.
[beep]
I'm good.
She can go.
All right, now, Meredith... wrap your hand around the nose cone.
Meredith.
Grey?
Grey?
We're losing him.
Push one of epi.
- [Cristina] Thready pulse.
- [nurse] Epi in.
- [Derek] Get me a wet lap.
- Here.
Roll him on three.
Everybody ready?
Ready?
We got to go!
Come on, let's go!
Meredith?
George and Izzie shouldn't have to move out.
No.
You hear me...
You should make sure... make sure that they... they get to stay in the house.
[moaning]
- [Addison] Good.
- [George] Push.
- Push.
- Just a little bit more.
- I can see the top of the head.
- I got to stop.
- And stop.
- OK, that was good.
That was very good.
That was...
OK, are you ready?
- Ready?
- OK.
Push.
[wails]
[Derek] Come on, come on.
- [Cristina] Wide complex bradycardia.
- [Derek] One of epi and of atropine.
Come on, come on.
You can't do this, Tucker!
You cannot quit on me.
Come on.
- ln.
- Grey?
His pressure's dropping.
Grey?
Look, I can't.
No.
I can't.
This is crazy.
Burke, you're gonna go.
You go.
- Both of you.
- Nobody's dying today, Grey.
I want you to look at me.
Look at me.
I know this is bad.
I know that I'm this ass who's been yelling at you all day.
So you pretend that I'm not.
You pretend that I'm someone you like.
Whatever you need.
But you need to listen to me.
- I'm scared.
- [Derek] I know.
You can do this.
It'll be over in a second.
You can do this, Meredith.
OK.
OK.
Gently.
[# Anna Nalick:
Breathe (2AM)]
[Addison] Good.
A little bit more.
Good.
Stop.
Stop?
Oh, Dr. Bailey, I can see the top of his head.
He's got a lot of hair.
- Oh, he's cute.
- O'Malley.
Stop looking at my vah-jay-jay!
Yes, ma'am.
[continuous beep]
Out of the way!
[groans]
[intermittent beeping]
You did good.
[Richard] What the hell is happening?
Who's coming up?
OK.
Come on, sweetheart.
All right, people!
They're coming up!
Mrs. Carlson... [elevator bell pings]
- Derek.
- Preston.
Dr. Burke.
Is my husband, um...
-...alive?
- Yes.
Is he going to stay alive?
Thanks to that young lady over there, he is.
[sobs]
Thank you.
Thank you.
Thank you.
Thank you.
- Where is she?
- You had to be a cowboy.
Where is she?
She's right here.
Derek!
You're OK.
You're OK.
That is not the "she" he was asking for.
[# Kate Havnevik:
Unlike Me (acapella mix)]
Burke?
You awake?
Burke.
[snores]
I love you, too.
This is our son.
William George Bailey Jones.
Hello, my little man.
Hello.
He's beautiful.
[thunder rumbles] [knock at door]
There's someone at the door for you.
[sighs]
Hey.
Hey.
You almost died today.
Yeah.
I almost died today.
I can't...
I can't remember our last kiss.
All I could think about was, "l can't remember our last kiss,"
which is pathetic, but... the last time we were together and happy, I... want to be able to remember that.
And I can't, Derek.
I can't remember it.
I'm glad you didn't die today.
It was a Thursday morning.
You were wearing that ratty little Dartmouth t-shirt you look so good in.
The one with the hole in the back of the neck.
You'd just washed your hair and you smelled like some kind of... flower.
I was running late for surgery.
You said you were going to see me later.
Then you leaned to me.
You put your hand on my chest... and you kissed me.
Soft.
It was quick.
Kind of like a habit.
You know, like we'd do it every day for the rest of our lives.
You went back to reading the newspaper and I went to work.
That was the last time we kissed.
Lavender.
My hair smelled like lavender.
From my conditioner.
Lavender.
Huh.
[Meredith] If you knew this was your last day on Earth... how would you want to spend it?
(indistinct chatter)
(whooping and cheering)
(crowd cheering continues)
(engines revving)
Yo, check it out, it's Dex.
He's going to do it.
Oh, dude, it's the Jack-in-the-Box.
Whoo!
(screams)
(crowd screaming)
(tires squealing)
Oh, my God, he's got no head.
Cops are coming.
Let's get out of here.
(distant sirens approaching)
(indistinct police radio transmission)
Gentlemen.
DELKO:
Wolfe, you got the head over there?
WOLFE:
Yeah.
But how did it get 15 feet from its body?
Maybe, gentlemen, maybe it had some help.
WOLFE:
Well, vic needed some elevation to make contact with this wire.
911 call said there was a sideshow going on over here.
What do you mean sideshow?
It's a party.
Kids in tricked-out cars doing stunts.
That's the only way our vic could have got that high.
WOLFE:
Well, if this was a stunt gone wrong, then how come everybody took off?
Because this... was not an accident.
* Yeah!
*
Capture:
FRM@ID Sync:
FRM@Uranus
* We don't get fooled again *
* Don't get fooled again *
What, no Alexx?
Falls under "obvious death."
WOLFE:
What's his name?
Name's Dexter Gilman.
Nineteen.
Let me ask you something.
What are all these lights and cables doing in the middle of a parking lot?
Yeah, well, uh, PD said there was a street fair here a couple of days ago.
City's not scheduled to take them down.
Oh, yeah?
And our headless horseman decided to utilize them in his act?
Yeah, well, based on these tread marks, he wasn't the only one performing.
That means we're going to have to collect everything.
All right?
Beer bottles, beer cans, cigarette butts.
Everything.
Yeah.
Who's that guy?
You know him?
Nah.
Never seen him before.
Hey.
Hey, this is an active crime scene.
Can I help you?
Yeah.
Mike Doyle.
Documentary filmmaker.
Here to get some footage.
Oh, yeah?
Of what?
Scanner said decapitation.
Figured it might be pretty good.
Looks like the ME, uh... the ME already bagged he body?
And the head?
Look, Mike, I don't know who you think you are, but this isn't a scene in one of your movies.
This is real life.
That's exactly why I'm here.
They want factual accounts of what you CSIs do.
Who's they?
The mayor's office.
The City signed off on filming us?
Yeah.
Horatio said they might try this.
It's a public relations move.
To cast a better light on your department.
Why, because we had a mole?
Look, take your camera and your film and go somewhere else.
Okay.
Fair enough.
Here's my card.
(wry chuckle)
Here's my card.
We'll be in touch.
Alexx, did we get anything?
His head was severed between the first and second cervical vertebrae.
No soft tissue bridges.
The incision is clean.
Consistent with the cable that we found at the scene.
Yeah.
A soup spoon can kill you with enough velocity.
The boy was moving, Horatio.
What about those markings on the arm?
Based on the orange color, it's postmortem.
Look like a tire tread.
Yep.
This baby boy was run over after the fact.
The tread pattern is odd, Horatio, like nothing I've seen.
Yeah, it's no ordinary tire.
Do you need a Microsil impression of it?
I'll send Boa Vista in.
Thank you, Alexx.
* *
Nice work.
Thanks.
Almost documentary worthy, wouldn't you say?
By the way, I would've done the same exact thing you and Eric did today.
The last thing that this department needs is more scrutiny.
Scrutiny like your covert investigation of our lab?
You know, Ryan, when I started here,
I really did start with the best intentions.
And when it all came crumbling down,
I lost almost every friend I had.
So I would really hate to see somebody else make that same mistake.
Well, I agreed to do it.
And let a camera crew follow you around?
Mm-hmm.
And Horatio okayed that?
As long as it doesn't interfere with my work, yeah.
Natalia, somebody had to do it.
So, you're going to fall on the sword
The lab needs a clean slate.
And you know what they say:
"Sunlight is the best disinfectant."
So, is this thing going to tell us who ran him over?
Well, it has a unique pattern, minimal tread.
And I did little digging.
The tires with this kind of tread are called "racing slicks."
Hey,oosiers.
They're made for serious abuse.
They use them, actually, over at the Miami Speedway.
Someone's been testing their street performance at sideshows.
Maybe that someone knows what happened to Dexter Gilman.
Only one place that sells them here in town.
Place called Tread On Me.
Then that's where I'll be.
Yeah, I recognize the tread.
They're Hoosier R6s.
Racing tires.
WOLFE:
You sell these to teenagers?
I run a business.
Had one kid used them for drifting.
What's drifting?
It's a stunt.
Driver turns the front wheels in the opposite direction of the turn.
(tires squealing, crowd whooping)
Tires have a good bite, but they get destroyed pretty quickly.
He was replacing them every couple of weeks.
He, huh?
Who's he?
His name is Dex Gilman.
Dex Gilman's the vic from this morning.
You telling me he ran himself over with his own car?
I don't think that car was totally his own.
Oh, yeah?
What do you mean?
He drove it.
But some girl by the name of, uh, Brynn Roberts paid for every new set of rubber.
Brynn Roberts, huh?
Anything else?
Yeah, keep these tires on the pro circuit.
Stop selling them to teenagers, okay?
I didn't kill that kid.
But you didn't care if he lived or died, did you?
So I understand that you and Dex Gilman had a relationship.
I guess you could call him my boyfriend, yes.
(cell phone buzzing)
I need to take this.
Let it go to voice mail, please.
(buzzing stops)
I also understand that
Dex was buying Hoosier racing tires and you were footing the bill.
I paid for the whole car.
I was his sponsor.
Do you know where the car is right now?
Someone drove off with it.
I had to report it stolen.
That's a hard day.
(sighs):
Yeah.
What happened this morning... wasn't part of the plan.
What is your plan?
Dad said he'll match any money that I make before I turn 25.
These sideshows could be my huge moneymaker with the right marketing.
What kind of marketing?
(sighs)
(cell phone buzzing)
(buzzing stops)
The Web.
When you're breaking a new sport, it is all about video.
So, you film these sideshows?
It's my plan to attract investors.
Well, in that case, I'd like to see all the footage from this morning's event.
I'd be more than happy to show you.
?
Hey. 99 bottles of beer on the wall.
You and Ryan collect all those from the parking lot?
Yeah, he's running extracted liquids, cigarette butts and drug paraphernalia.
So... he's got DNA and Trace.
You win the coin toss?
(chuckles):
No.
I pulled my seniority card.
Ah.
Perfect.
Hey, I heard that you had a visitor at the crime scene.
Yeah.
Some Michael Moore wannabe.
I told him to get lost.
Unfortunately, I'm afraid someone's gonna get stuck with the guy.
Well, I can tell you that that somebody is not going to be me.
(laughs)
All right.
(cla)
Start your engines.
Look like a tented arch to you?
Yeah, it does.
That's rare.
That's very rare.
Less than five percent of the population has it.
And every one of these bottles has the identical print.
That would mean that the same guy would have had to have passed all of them out.
Must have been the life of the party.
(typing)
(beeping)
I got it.
"Evan Dunlar.
Internship at Lasgrove Electronics Corporation."
Let's go see if the intern likes fast cars.
* *
EVAN:
You know, the guys sai
"Make yourself useful," so I did.
I manned the coolers.
DELKO:
We found your prints on each of these bottles.
It was a sideshow.
These guys trick out their cars, drive all crazy and stuff.
Just want to hang out with them, that's all.
DELKO:
It's reckless driving, Evan.
And it's against the law.
You giving these guys an audience only makes you part of the problem.
Evan, this morning, a young man named Dexter Gilman was killed.
How well did you know him?
He was one of the best drivers.
Did the Jack-in-the-Box.
What's that?
Peddle-free, cruise control, feet on the wheel, head out the top.
Unbelievable.
And the girls loved him.
Not enough to stick around after he was decapitated.
How 'bout you, Evan?
Did you feel the need to stick around?
Dex's car came up stolen.
Did you take it?
No, I didn't steal Dex's car.
I ran.
Look, the cops come, you break for it.
It's just...
it's what you do.
You know?
I mean, it's that or spend the night in jail.
(sirens wailing)
(people shouting)
Man, the cops were on us fast this time.
Evan, we need names.
I can't.
If something happens, they're gonna know that I'm talking to you guys.
Evan, listen to me.
We know you're involved, and you could go to jail for this, son.
So don't go far.
Heard a kid had his head taken off at a sideshow this morning.
That's true.
I need you to look into something for me, please.
You wondering who organized it?
No.
Quite the contrary-- who broke it up.
The kid said that the police were there in record time.
Somebody on the inside tipped them?
It's possible.
Let's see who made the call.
I'll call 911, track it down.
Thank you.
I had some information,
I thoughthe police should know about it.
I overheard my son, Evan, talking about one of these sideshows a few days ago where it would be.
I'm a single parent.
I got home from my job, and my son wasn't there.
Did he mention anyone else's involvement?
No, he didn't.
This is my fault.
I was the one encouraging him to make new friends.
I just never thought he'd get wrapped up in this.
Well, he's a teenager, Mr. Dunlar, so don't... don't be too hard on yourself.
Evan was into cars as a kid.
(chuckles)
Toys, models, remote control.
But now, he's playing with the real thing.
He could've been killed today.
Yes, he could've.
So here's what I'd like you to do:
go home and make sure he's safe.
Okay?
Thank you.
Thanks for coming in.
(line ringing) Come on.
Come on, come on, come on, come on.
(sighs):
Answer.
I'm headed to Judge Harrison's for a warrant.
What do you need?
Trying to save you the trip.
Brynn Roberts already posted her sideshow footage online.
I don't need a warrant?
I am loving you.
I don't know if this helps.
Camera's in a fixed position.
She must've set up a tripod.
Go ahead and run it.
DUQUESNE:
There's our vic.
Jeez.
I really wish I could un-see that.
I'm sorry, can you play it again?
Why didn't he clear the last cable?
No idea.
Ryan said they were all hung at the same height.
Okay, again.
Maybe the height of the car changed.
Can you measure the height of the bumper?
Yeah, yeah, yeah, I think so.
And get a measurement as he clears the second to the last cable.
Six inches.
What's the measurement as he collides with the last cable?
17 inches.
The car was raised.
Hydraulics.
Maybe he accidentally set them off himself?
I don't know.
He was hanging out the sunroof, he was driving with his feet.
I doubt it.
Okay, that leaves, what?
A malfunction?
Maybe.
Could be premeditated murder.
Well, I know one person who would profit from this.
DUQUESNE:
You weren't ilding a sport, you were trading in sleaze.
I bet you couldn't wait to upload the footage.
It's a male-dominated sport.
You grab their attention any way you can.
I get all sorts of stuff for this site.
Well, the high tension wires were certainly a success.
Did you pick the location?
A matter of fact, I did.
But I didn't kill Dex, if that's where you're going with all of this.
What about the hydraulics that killed him?
What are you talking about?
Are you serious?
Look, Dex wanted those in.
He did it all himself.
(cell phone buzzing)
Gable and Third.
Sounds like a sideshow.
You know what?
I'm gonna see how they like our cars.
* *
(sirens wailing)
This is Dexter Gilman's car.
Dex and I did a few tandem stunts.
Drifts and stuff.
You guys teammates?
More like friendly competitors.
You're some friend, Luke.
He's in the morgue and you're driving his car.
I didn't have anything to do with Dex's accident.
I feel bad.
Yeah, clearly.
Luke, you ran over your friend when you took his car.
I couldn't just let this beauty get impounded.
(sirens approaching)
(tires screech)
Dex would have wanted me to take it.
I guess we'll never know, will we?
Officer.
Book him on auto theft.
Why you sweating us for, man?
Why you need the registration for anyway?
Why you trying to run our plates, man?
Run this guy's plates.
He's the one with the problem.
Man, we was just here watching.
We didn't even do anything.
Hey, hey, hey, hey, hey.
Shut up.
Okay?
Sound like a couple of busted leaf blowers.
We're just trying to ride, mister.
Look, man, it's about what's under the hood, man.
I don't give a damn what's in the glove compartment.
This vehicle's stolen, smart-ass.
No way.
Well, the VIN number says way.
All right?
Take Tweedledee and Tweedledum here for a ride.
Six of these rides are hot, so now we're looking at car thieves.
Something else going on here, Frank, bigger than this.
I'll look into auto thefts over the last few days.
Think there's a connection to our murder?
The car, Frank, is going to tell us.
(tires screeching)
Okay, so... the kids we busted at the sideshow are throwing up all overhemselves to give us information.
Beats six months in jail.
Yeah, unfortunately, none of them knows a single thing about the death of Dexter Gilman.
Selective memory.
Is that the blood that's left after the cleanup?
Yeah, we're not going to need to run DNA on it.
This is, um...
This is definitely the car Dexter got killed in.
What we really need to do is figure out how this car's hydraulic lift was activated.
Well, what about this?
Is this the on-off switch?
Yeah, but based on the stunt that he was performing at the time, ther's no way he could have reached that with his feet.
Yeah, he's definitely not tall enough to pull that move off.
(hydraulics humming)
Little warning, please.
Yeah.
(laughs quietly)
(humming stops)
Sorry about that.
On a positive note, we now know that that works.
Yeah.
Glad your video guy didn't see that.
Yeah.
He's supposed to start in a couple of weeks.
What is this?
I don't know.
Looks like a transmitter.
Well, that would allow the hydraulics to be activated remotely.
And at exactly the right time.
Whoo!
(screams)
Okay, so now our big question is: who activated it and how?
You know, Horatio talked to a guy whose son is into radio-controlled cars.
I know it's kind of a stretch.
Not by much.
So, Wolfe, you're dragging me out here because of
Evan Dunlar's vast knowledge of electronics, huh?
Dex's head came off 'cause that car got triggered, and, uh, this kid admitted to being there, so...
Hot lead, Wolfe.
You gonna get a camera on us?
Yeah, at's that supposed to mean?
Supposed to mean I heard you signed up to represent us.
So what's next, your own TV show?
You know what, pal, you can get one if you want.
Nah, that's all right, 'll leave that to you.
(tires screeching)
Don't move!
Don't move!
(grunts):
Help me.
You got him, Wolfe?
Help me.
I got him!
I'll go get a fire extinguisher.
What are you running from, Evan?
I can't breathe.
You probably just cracked your rib.
Just lie still.
I think...
I think someone's trying to kill me.
(Evan grunts)
(siren approaching)
Wow.
What just happened here?
You smell that?
Yeah, that isn't gasoline, is it?
No, it's jet fuel.
Burns 200 degrees hotter, cooked this car.
Can't exactly get jet fuel at a gas station.
Well, it couldn't be stolen, could it?
Nah, nah, airports, refineries-- they guard their supplies 24-7.
Would have made big news.
Maybe they got it from underground.
What are you thinking?
I read this article.
Refineries deliver their fuel supply to airports through high-pressured pipelines.
But get this, it's five feet under the city.
It's six miles long and it delivers the equivalent of 1800 tanker trucks a day.
So the jet fuel pipeline runs underneath all these subdivisions?
Yeah, it's underneath everything.
You think the sideshow kids are tapping into it?
I don't know.
Maybe.
Department of Public Works says this half mile of the pipe has been shut down this morning for construction, so it's a very good time to try it.
And the minirae will tell us where to go?
Yeah, HazMat uses it to detect contamination leaks.
This is the highest reading I've gotten so far.
It's 12 parts per million.
DUQUESNE:
Excuse me, ma'am, can we talk to you?
Can I help you?
I'm Calleigh Duquesne.
This is Ryan Wolfe.
We're with Miami-Dade PD.
Do you own this house?
Yes.
WOLFE:
Can we take a look around your property?
Sure.
DUQUESNE:
You still getting something?
Yeah, it's off the charts.
What kind of construction are you doing back here?
I'm putting in a pool.
Well, at least I was until a few days ago.
Who's your contractor?
Dunlar Construction.
Steve Dunlar?
Yeah.
That's the sideshow kid's dad, isn't it?
So there definitely is a connection.
He told me he broke a water main, said he had to talk to the city before he could do anything.
When's the, uh,ast time you saw Mr. Dunlar?
This morning.
He woke me up.
Backed in a tanker truck.
Made a lot of noise for 6:00 in the morning.
Said he was moving the main.
Do you smell that?
Did he hit a gas line?
It's jet fuel.
(minirae clicking rapidly)
He hit it on purpose.
That thing on top wasn't there before.
Dunlar built his own gas pump.
We're gonna need to take those tools with us.
I'll call H.
I'm sure he has some questions for Mr. Dunlar.
Tapping into an underground pipeline is destruction of city property, Mr. Dunlar.
I was breaking ground for the woman, putting in a pool.
I found a pipeline, but I never tampered with anything.
Then, explain the jet fuel found in your son's car.
I have no idea.
The homeowner said you had a tanker truck.
She's a housewife.
She probably doesn't even know what one looks like.
(sighs):
Look talk to my son about it.
He's the one you found with the jet fuel, right?
He's the one that's racing around with these street racers.
Was he aware of what you found?
No, because I knew he'd tell people.
He'll do anything to get in with those kids.
I can't trust him.
You set quite an example for him.
I'm gonna go now.
'm a good contractor, a reputable contractor, and as far as I can see, all you got on me is suspicious behavior.
Mr. Dunlar, that's going to change.
Francis.
Horatio.
I had a chat with the guys over at Auto Theft.
And?
They're saying stolen cars are up 300% in two weeks.
Toyotas, Mazdas, Hondas.
Frank, this is not street racing.
Have you called the refinery?
Yeah, control center's latest count says they're short 10,000 gallons of aviation fuel worth 47 grand.
I don't think Dunlar would give his son up for that, do you?
No.
We executed a search warrant on his home and business.
Came up nothing.
It's, uh...
it's just not adding up.
Not yet, Frank.
Not yet.
Is that everything from the jet fuel pipeline?
Yeah, straight from the ground.
Diverting pipe, wrenches.
Whoever did this knew exactly what they were doing.
Well, Public Works said that they shut down the pipeline for repairs between 5:00 and 7:30 this morning.
That's the same time as the sideshow.
Wait a minute.
WhatWhat is it?
Blood.
Good eye.
I'm starting to feel like this murder is covering up something bigger.
Did Natalia tell you about the remote transmitter we found.
Yeah, and I think I figured out how it activated the car's hydraulics.
Dial that number.
(touch tones beeping)
What the hell just happened?
Uh, the trigger... r this car's hydraulics was a cell phone.
So the killer activated Dex's hydraulics with a phone call.
Exactly.
The receiver in this car was a circuit board from a stripped down cell phone.
When it received the signal, it sent an electric current.
In this case, bypassed the ringer and was wired directly into the car's hydraulic master switch.
Well, that would mean that the caller's number is still in the memory chip, right?
Exactly.
I'll pull up the call log.
You know I would narrow it down by time.
The, uh, the murder occurred around 6:00 a.m.
I would, but I don't need to.
There's only one number.
(buzzing)
Aren't you going to get it?
Let it go to voice mail.
I don't know the number.
Oh, I think you do.
No.
You want my phone?
Talk to my lawyers.
I did one better.
I talked to a judge.
This is a warrant.
Yeah, that number you don't recognize, you called it this morning.
We know your phone call was sent the exact moment Dex was killed.
It's the phone call that killed him.
I didn't mean for it to happen that way.
I didn't want him to die.
Well, I'm sure it didn't hurt.
A good crash brings millio of eyeballs.
That's a fantastic business plan.
What, you don't slow down at the side of a road to see an accident?
Everyone does it.
Nobody even pays attention at a speedway until there's a pileup.
It's human nature.
It's a human life, Ms. Roberts.
And I'm sure that's all the explanation a jury is going to need.
Get her out of here.
So what do we got from the lady's pool?
The blood on the valve from the pool matches the DNA profile of your headless victim.
Dex Gilman.
What?
No, that doesn't make sense.
He died ten miles away.
How'd his blood get on the pipe?
The blood would have to be wet to transfer.
There was a kid who jumped in the car with him-
- Luke Baylor.
Guys, I didn't kill Dex.
That's not why you're here.
How did you know Mr. Dunlar?
I didn't know him.
I knew his kid.
Drove him home a couple times.
How do you explain the peline?
Pipeline?
TRIPP:
Yeah, the pipeline that's missing 10,000 gallons of jet fuel.
The pipeline had blood on it.
Which means you're connected to Steve Dunlar and you two work together.
I'm not saying another word.
Not until I have a lawyer in here with me.
Frank, call Customs, cargo manifest for all departing flights please.
Will do.
What do you need $47,000 worth of jet fuel for?
Are you a world traveler, Luke?
Is that a crime?
No, but traveling with stolen cars is.
I'll be out on bail before he dials his first phone call.
Well, I guess the race is on.
Mr. Wolfe, you were looking for me?
Yeah, two things.
Tripp sent the air cargo manifests.
There are 21 planes scheduled for departure today.
What kind of cargo?
Uh, Express mail, produce, construction equipment, seafood...
Wait a second.
Construction equipment shipping from where?
Risedale Airstrip.
Private airstrip, private jet.
Yeah, the second thing, Luke Baylor made bail.
I'll be at the airstrip.
Come on, man, open it up.
I'm out.
Time to get paid.
Nice.
(siren wailing)
TRIPP:
You made bail pretty fast.
Who put the money up?
What can I say?
I told you I was going to get out.
CAINE:
You've got quite a collection here, Luke.
TRIPP:
Is this the last car?
It's a business.
We fix cars.
You fix up stolen cars, Luke.
Your fleet here looks like cargo.
Mr. Dunlar came to me.
He knew I boosted cars.
Later.
Later.
Hey.
You Baylor?
Well, if what I hear is true, I might have a job for you.
Said he would get me five thou for every car.
So I deliver 'em here, and I walk.
The restThs his deal.
Where's Steve Dunlar right now?
Frank, I think I kno
Look, I don't care, just get it done.
(sirens wailing)
CAINE:
Almost, Steve.
Almost.
TRIPP:
Dunlar, you planning on going somewhere with these stolen cars?
I got paperwork back everything you see here.
Luke Baylor's ready to bust in song about every gallon you stole from the pipeline.
CAINE:
You're trying to leave while your kid is lying in a hospital bed alone.?
Could've filled this plane ten times over my kid doesn't screw around with the fuel.
He didn't know you were smuggling jet fuel, did he?
TRIPP:
You used him
You called 911 pretending you were concerned about him.
All you cared about was diverting the police away from you.
Luke offers up free cars, you truck in free fuel.
Did you make a deal on this plane, too?
Look, this was my shot.
Nobody got hurt here.
You know what they'll pay for these cars in Venezuela?
Almost three times the sticker.
Now your son's an orphan.
What's the price tag on that?
Evan's a big boy.
He'll learn to forgive.
And hopefully...
hopefully forget.
(indistinct chatter)
(whooping and cheering)
* *
(engines revving)
Yo, check it out, it's Dex.
He's going to do it.
Oh, dude, it's the Jack-in-the-Box.
Whoo!
(screams)
(crowd screaming)
(tires squealing)
Oh, my God, he's got no head.
Cops are coming.
Let's get out of here.
(distant sirens approaching)
(indistinct police radio transmission)
Gentlemen.
DELKO:
Wolfe, you got the head over there?
WOLFE:
Yeah.
But how did it get 15 feet from its body?
Maybe, gentlemen, maybe it had some help.
WOLFE:
Well, vic needed some elevation to make contact with this wire.
911 call said there was a sideshow going on over here.
What do you mean sideshow?
It's a party.
Kids in tricked-out cars doing stunts.
That's the only way our vic could have got that high.
WOLFE:
Well, if this was a stunt gone wrong, then how come everybody took off?
Because this... was not an accident.
* Yeah!
*
Capture:
FRM@ID Sync:
FRM@Uranus
* We don't get fooled again *
* Don't get fooled again *
What, no Alexx?
Falls under "obvious death."
WOLFE:
What's his name?
Name's Dexter Gilman.
Nineteen.
Let me ask you something.
What are all these lights and cables doing in the middle of a parking lot?
Yeah, well, uh, PD said there was a street fair here a couple of days ago.
City's not scheduled to take them down.
Oh, yeah?
And our headless horseman decided to utilize them in his act?
Yeah, well, based on these tread marks, he wasn't the only one performing.
That means we're going to have to collect everything.
All right?
Beer bottles, beer cans, cigarette butts.
Everything.
Yeah.
Who's that guy?
You know him?
Nah.
Never seen him before.
Hey.
Hey, this is an active crime scene.
Can I help you?
Yeah.
Mike Doyle.
Documentary filmmaker.
Here to get some footage.
Oh, yeah?
Of what?
Scanner said decapitation.
Figured it might be pretty good.
Looks like the ME, uh... the ME already bagged he body?
And the head?
Look, Mike, I don't know who you think you are, but this isn't a scene in one of your movies.
This is real life.
That's exactly why I'm here.
They want factual accounts of what you CSIs do.
Who's they?
The mayor's office.
The City signed off on filming us?
Yeah.
Horatio said they might try this.
It's a public relations move.
To cast a better light on your department.
Why, because we had a mole?
Look, take your camera and your film and go somewhere else.
Okay.
Fair enough.
Here's my card.
(wry chuckle)
Here's my card.
We'll be in touch.
Alexx, did we get anything?
His head was severed between the first and second cervical vertebrae.
No soft tissue bridges.
The incision is clean.
Consistent with the cable that we found at the scene.
Yeah.
A soup spoon can kill you with enough velocity.
The boy was moving, Horatio.
What about those markings on the arm?
Based on the orange color, it's postmortem.
Look like a tire tread.
Yep.
This baby boy was run over after the fact.
The tread pattern is odd, Horatio, like nothing I've seen.
Yeah, it's no ordinary tire.
Do you need a Microsil impression of it?
I'll send Boa Vista in.
Thank you, Alexx.
* *
Nice work.
Thanks.
Almost documentary worthy, wouldn't you say?
By the way, I would've done the same exact thing you and Eric did today.
The last thing that this department needs is more scrutiny.
Scrutiny like your covert investigation of our lab?
You know, Ryan, when I started here,
I really did start with the best intentions.
And when it all came crumbling down,
I lost almost every friend I had.
So I would really hate to see somebody else make that same mistake.
Well, I agreed to do it.
And let a camera crew follow you around?
Mm-hmm.
And Horatio okayed that?
As long as it doesn't interfere with my work, yeah.
Natalia, somebody had to do it.
So, you're going to fall on the sword
The lab needs a clean slate.
And you know what they say:
"Sunlight is the best disinfectant."
So, is this thing going to tell us who ran him over?
Well, it has a unique pattern, minimal tread.
And I did little digging.
The tires with this kind of tread are called "racing slicks."
Hey,oosiers.
They're made for serious abuse.
They use them, actually, over at the Miami Speedway.
Someone's been testing their street performance at sideshows.
Maybe that someone knows what happened to Dexter Gilman.
Only one place that sells them here in town.
Place called Tread On Me.
Then that's where I'll be.
Yeah, I recognize the tread.
They're Hoosier R6s.
Racing tires.
WOLFE:
You sell these to teenagers?
I run a business.
Had one kid used them for drifting.
What's drifting?
It's a stunt.
Driver turns the front wheels in the opposite direction of the turn.
(tires squealing, crowd whooping)
Tires have a good bite, but they get destroyed pretty quickly.
He was replacing them every couple of weeks.
He, huh?
Who's he?
His name is Dex Gilman.
Dex Gilman's the vic from this morning.
You telling me he ran himself over with his own car?
I don't think that car was totally his own.
Oh, yeah?
What do you mean?
He drove it.
But some girl by the name of, uh, Brynn Roberts paid for every new set of rubber.
Brynn Roberts, huh?
Anything else?
Yeah, keep these tires on the pro circuit.
Stop selling them to teenagers, okay?
I didn't kill that kid.
But you didn't care if he lived or died, did you?
So I understand that you and Dex Gilman had a relationship.
I guess you could call him my boyfriend, yes.
(cell phone buzzing)
I need to take this.
Let it go to voice mail, please.
(buzzing stops)
I also understand that
Dex was buying Hoosier racing tires and you were footing the bill.
I paid for the whole car.
I was his sponsor.
Do you know where the car is right now?
Someone drove off with it.
I had to report it stolen.
That's a hard day.
(sighs):
Yeah.
What happened this morning... wasn't part of the plan.
What is your plan?
Dad said he'll match any money that I make before I turn 25.
These sideshows could be my huge moneymaker with the right marketing.
What kind of marketing?
(sighs)
(cell phone buzzing)
(buzzing stops)
The Web.
When you're breaking a new sport, it is all about video.
So, you film these sideshows?
It's my plan to attract investors.
Well, in that case, I'd like to see all the footage from this morning's event.
I'd be more than happy to show you.
?
Hey. 99 bottles of beer on the wall.
You and Ryan collect all those from the parking lot?
Yeah, he's running extracted liquids, cigarette butts and drug paraphernalia.
So... he's got DNA and Trace.
You win the coin toss?
(chuckles):
No.
I pulled my seniority card.
Ah.
Perfect.
Hey, I heard that you had a visitor at the crime scene.
Yeah.
Some Michael Moore wannabe.
I told him to get lost.
Unfortunately, I'm afraid someone's gonna get stuck with the guy.
Well, I can tell you that that somebody is not going to be me.
(laughs)
All right.
(cla)
Start your engines.
Look like a tented arch to you?
Yeah, it does.
That's rare.
That's very rare.
Less than five percent of the population has it.
And every one of these bottles has the identical print.
That would mean that the same guy would have had to have passed all of them out.
Must have been the life of the party.
(typing)
(beeping)
I got it.
"Evan Dunlar.
Internship at Lasgrove Electronics Corporation."
Let's go see if the intern likes fast cars.
* *
EVAN:
You know, the guys sai
"Make yourself useful," so I did.
I manned the coolers.
DELKO:
We found your prints on each of these bottles.
It was a sideshow.
These guys trick out their cars, drive all crazy and stuff.
Just want to hang out with them, that's all.
DELKO:
It's reckless driving, Evan.
And it's against the law.
You giving these guys an audience only makes you part of the problem.
Evan, this morning, a young man named Dexter Gilman was killed.
How well did you know him?
He was one of the best drivers.
Did the Jack-in-the-Box.
What's that?
Peddle-free, cruise control, feet on the wheel, head out the top.
Unbelievable.
And the girls loved him.
Not enough to stick around after he was decapitated.
How 'bout you, Evan?
Did you feel the need to stick around?
Dex's car came up stolen.
Did you take it?
No, I didn't steal Dex's car.
I ran.
Look, the cops come, you break for it.
It's just...
it's what you do.
You know?
I mean, it's that or spend the night in jail.
(sirens wailing)
(people shouting)
Man, the cops were on us fast this time.
Evan, we need names.
I can't.
If something happens, they're gonna know that I'm talking to you guys.
Evan, listen to me.
We know you're involved, and you could go to jail for this, son.
So don't go far.
Heard a kid had his head taken off at a sideshow this morning.
That's true.
I need you to look into something for me, please.
You wondering who organized it?
No.
Quite the contrary-- who broke it up.
The kid said that the police were there in record time.
Somebody on the inside tipped them?
It's possible.
Let's see who made the call.
I'll call 911, track it down.
Thank you.
I had some information,
I thoughthe police should know about it.
I overheard my son, Evan, talking about one of these sideshows a few days ago where it would be.
I'm a single parent.
I got home from my job, and my son wasn't there.
Did he mention anyone else's involvement?
No, he didn't.
This is my fault.
I was the one encouraging him to make new friends.
I just never thought he'd get wrapped up in this.
Well, he's a teenager, Mr. Dunlar, so don't... don't be too hard on yourself.
Evan was into cars as a kid.
(chuckles)
Toys, models, remote control.
But now, he's playing with the real thing.
He could've been killed today.
Yes, he could've.
So here's what I'd like you to do:
go home and make sure he's safe.
Okay?
Thank you.
Thanks for coming in.
(line ringing) Come on.
Come on, come on, come on, come on.
(sighs):
Answer.
I'm headed to Judge Harrison's for a warrant.
What do you need?
Trying to save you the trip.
Brynn Roberts already posted her sideshow footage online.
I don't need a warrant?
I am loving you.
I don't know if this helps.
Camera's in a fixed position.
She must've set up a tripod.
Go ahead and run it.
DUQUESNE:
There's our vic.
Jeez.
I really wish I could un-see that.
I'm sorry, can you play it again?
Why didn't he clear the last cable?
No idea.
Ryan said they were all hung at the same height.
Okay, again.
Maybe the height of the car changed.
Can you measure the height of the bumper?
Yeah, yeah, yeah, I think so.
And get a measurement as he clears the second to the last cable.
Six inches.
What's the measurement as he collides with the last cable?
17 inches.
The car was raised.
Hydraulics.
Maybe he accidentally set them off himself?
I don't know.
He was hanging out the sunroof, he was driving with his feet.
I doubt it.
Okay, that leaves, what?
A malfunction?
Maybe.
Could be premeditated murder.
Well, I know one person who would profit from this.
DUQUESNE:
You weren't ilding a sport, you were trading in sleaze.
I bet you couldn't wait to upload the footage.
It's a male-dominated sport.
You grab their attention any way you can.
I get all sorts of stuff for this site.
Well, the high tension wires were certainly a success.
Did you pick the location?
A matter of fact, I did.
But I didn't kill Dex, if that's where you're going with all of this.
What about the hydraulics that killed him?
What are you talking about?
Are you serious?
Look, Dex wanted those in.
He did it all himself.
(cell phone buzzing)
Gable and Third.
Sounds like a sideshow.
You know what?
I'm gonna see how they like our cars.
* *
(sirens wailing)
This is Dexter Gilman's car.
Dex and I did a few tandem stunts.
Drifts and stuff.
You guys teammates?
More like friendly competitors.
You're some friend, Luke.
He's in the morgue and you're driving his car.
I didn't have anything to do with Dex's accident.
I feel bad.
Yeah, clearly.
Luke, you ran over your friend when you took his car.
I couldn't just let this beauty get impounded.
(sirens approaching)
(tires screech)
Dex would have wanted me to take it.
I guess we'll never know, will we?
Officer.
Book him on auto theft.
Why you sweating us for, man?
Why you need the registration for anyway?
Why you trying to run our plates, man?
Run this guy's plates.
He's the one with the problem.
Man, we was just here watching.
We didn't even do anything.
Hey, hey, hey, hey, hey.
Shut up.
Okay?
Sound like a couple of busted leaf blowers.
We're just trying to ride, mister.
Look, man, it's about what's under the hood, man.
I don't give a damn what's in the glove compartment.
This vehicle's stolen, smart-ass.
No way.
Well, the VIN number says way.
All right?
Take Tweedledee and Tweedledum here for a ride.
Six of these rides are hot, so now we're looking at car thieves.
Something else going on here, Frank, bigger than this.
I'll look into auto thefts over the last few days.
Think there's a connection to our murder?
The car, Frank, is going to tell us.
(tires screeching)
Okay, so... the kids we busted at the sideshow are throwing up all overhemselves to give us information.
Beats six months in jail.
Yeah, unfortunately, none of them knows a single thing about the death of Dexter Gilman.
Selective memory.
Is that the blood that's left after the cleanup?
Yeah, we're not going to need to run DNA on it.
This is, um...
This is definitely the car Dexter got killed in.
What we really need to do is figure out how this car's hydraulic lift was activated.
Well, what about this?
Is this the on-off switch?
Yeah, but based on the stunt that he was performing at the time, ther's no way he could have reached that with his feet.
Yeah, he's definitely not tall enough to pull that move off.
(hydraulics humming)
Little warning, please.
Yeah.
(laughs quietly)
(humming stops)
Sorry about that.
On a positive note, we now know that that works.
Yeah.
Glad your video guy didn't see that.
Yeah.
He's supposed to start in a couple of weeks.
What is this?
I don't know.
Looks like a transmitter.
Well, that would allow the hydraulics to be activated remotely.
And at exactly the right time.
Whoo!
(screams)
Okay, so now our big question is: who activated it and how?
You know, Horatio talked to a guy whose son is into radio-controlled cars.
I know it's kind of a stretch.
Not by much.
So, Wolfe, you're dragging me out here because of
Evan Dunlar's vast knowledge of electronics, huh?
Dex's head came off 'cause that car got triggered, and, uh, this kid admitted to being there, so...
Hot lead, Wolfe.
You gonna get a camera on us?
Yeah, at's that supposed to mean?
Supposed to mean I heard you signed up to represent us.
So what's next, your own TV show?
You know what, pal, you can get one if you want.
Nah, that's all right, 'll leave that to you.
(tires screeching)
Don't move!
Don't move!
(grunts):
Help me.
You got him, Wolfe?
Help me.
I got him!
I'll go get a fire extinguisher.
What are you running from, Evan?
I can't breathe.
You probably just cracked your rib.
Just lie still.
I think...
I think someone's trying to kill me.
(Evan grunts)
(siren approaching)
Wow.
What just happened here?
You smell that?
Yeah, that isn't gasoline, is it?
No, it's jet fuel.
Burns 200 degrees hotter, cooked this car.
Can't exactly get jet fuel at a gas station.
Well, it couldn't be stolen, could it?
Nah, nah, airports, refineries-- they guard their supplies 24-7.
Would have made big news.
Maybe they got it from underground.
What are you thinking?
I read this article.
Refineries deliver their fuel supply to airports through high-pressured pipelines.
But get this, it's five feet under the city.
It's six miles long and it delivers the equivalent of 1800 tanker trucks a day.
So the jet fuel pipeline runs underneath all these subdivisions?
Yeah, it's underneath everything.
You think the sideshow kids are tapping into it?
I don't know.
Maybe.
Department of Public Works says this half mile of the pipe has been shut down this morning for construction, so it's a very good time to try it.
And the minirae will tell us where to go?
Yeah, HazMat uses it to detect contamination leaks.
This is the highest reading I've gotten so far.
It's 12 parts per million.
DUQUESNE:
Excuse me, ma'am, can we talk to you?
Can I help you?
I'm Calleigh Duquesne.
This is Ryan Wolfe.
We're with Miami-Dade PD.
Do you own this house?
Yes.
WOLFE:
Can we take a look around your property?
Sure.
DUQUESNE:
You still getting something?
Yeah, it's off the charts.
What kind of construction are you doing back here?
I'm putting in a pool.
Well, at least I was until a few days ago.
Who's your contractor?
Dunlar Construction.
Steve Dunlar?
Yeah.
That's the sideshow kid's dad, isn't it?
So there definitely is a connection.
He told me he broke a water main, said he had to talk to the city before he could do anything.
When's the, uh,ast time you saw Mr. Dunlar?
This morning.
He woke me up.
Backed in a tanker truck.
Made a lot of noise for 6:00 in the morning.
Said he was moving the main.
Do you smell that?
Did he hit a gas line?
It's jet fuel.
(minirae clicking rapidly)
He hit it on purpose.
That thing on top wasn't there before.
Dunlar built his own gas pump.
We're gonna need to take those tools with us.
I'll call H.
I'm sure he has some questions for Mr. Dunlar.
Tapping into an underground pipeline is destruction of city property, Mr. Dunlar.
I was breaking ground for the woman, putting in a pool.
I found a pipeline, but I never tampered with anything.
Then, explain the jet fuel found in your son's car.
I have no idea.
The homeowner said you had a tanker truck.
She's a housewife.
She probably doesn't even know what one looks like.
(sighs):
Look talk to my son about it.
He's the one you found with the jet fuel, right?
He's the one that's racing around with these street racers.
Was he aware of what you found?
No, because I knew he'd tell people.
He'll do anything to get in with those kids.
I can't trust him.
You set quite an example for him.
I'm gonna go now.
'm a good contractor, a reputable contractor, and as far as I can see, all you got on me is suspicious behavior.
Mr. Dunlar, that's going to change.
Francis.
Horatio.
I had a chat with the guys over at Auto Theft.
And?
They're saying stolen cars are up 300% in two weeks.
Toyotas, Mazdas, Hondas.
Frank, this is not street racing.
Have you called the refinery?
Yeah, control center's latest count says they're short 10,000 gallons of aviation fuel worth 47 grand.
I don't think Dunlar would give his son up for that, do you?
No.
We executed a search warrant on his home and business.
Came up nothing.
It's, uh...
it's just not adding up.
Not yet, Frank.
Not yet.
Is that everything from the jet fuel pipeline?
Yeah, straight from the ground.
Diverting pipe, wrenches.
Whoever did this knew exactly what they were doing.
Well, Public Works said that they shut down the pipeline for repairs between 5:00 and 7:30 this morning.
That's the same time as the sideshow.
Wait a minute.
WhatWhat is it?
Blood.
Good eye.
I'm starting to feel like this murder is covering up something bigger.
Did Natalia tell you about the remote transmitter we found.
Yeah, and I think I figured out how it activated the car's hydraulics.
Dial that number.
(touch tones beeping)
What the hell just happened?
Uh, the trigger... r this car's hydraulics was a cell phone.
So the killer activated Dex's hydraulics with a phone call.
Exactly.
The receiver in this car was a circuit board from a stripped down cell phone.
When it received the signal, it sent an electric current.
In this case, bypassed the ringer and was wired directly into the car's hydraulic master switch.
Well, that would mean that the caller's number is still in the memory chip, right?
Exactly.
I'll pull up the call log.
You know I would narrow it down by time.
The, uh, the murder occurred around 6:00 a.m.
I would, but I don't need to.
There's only one number.
(buzzing)
Aren't you going to get it?
Let it go to voice mail.
I don't know the number.
Oh, I think you do.
No.
You want my phone?
Talk to my lawyers.
I did one better.
I talked to a judge.
This is a warrant.
Yeah, that number you don't recognize, you called it this morning.
We know your phone call was sent the exact moment Dex was killed.
It's the phone call that killed him.
I didn't mean for it to happen that way.
I didn't want him to die.
Well, I'm sure it didn't hurt.
A good crash brings millio of eyeballs.
That's a fantastic business plan.
What, you don't slow down at the side of a road to see an accident?
Everyone does it.
Nobody even pays attention at a speedway until there's a pileup.
It's human nature.
It's a human life, Ms. Roberts.
And I'm sure that's all the explanation a jury is going to need.
Get her out of here.
So what do we got from the lady's pool?
The blood on the valve from the pool matches the DNA profile of your headless victim.
Dex Gilman.
What?
No, that doesn't make sense.
He died ten miles away.
How'd his blood get on the pipe?
The blood would have to be wet to transfer.
There was a kid who jumped in the car with him-
- Luke Baylor.
Guys, I didn't kill Dex.
That's not why you're here.
How did you know Mr. Dunlar?
I didn't know him.
I knew his kid.
Drove him home a couple times.
How do you explain the peline?
Pipeline?
TRIPP:
Yeah, the pipeline that's missing 10,000 gallons of jet fuel.
The pipeline had blood on it.
Which means you're connected to Steve Dunlar and you two work together.
I'm not saying another word.
Not until I have a lawyer in here with me.
Frank, call Customs, cargo manifest for all departing flights please.
Will do.
What do you need $47,000 worth of jet fuel for?
Are you a world traveler, Luke?
Is that a crime?
No, but traveling with stolen cars is.
I'll be out on bail before he dials his first phone call.
Well, I guess the race is on.
Mr. Wolfe, you were looking for me?
Yeah, two things.
Tripp sent the air cargo manifests.
There are 21 planes scheduled for departure today.
What kind of cargo?
Uh, Express mail, produce, construction equipment, seafood...
Wait a second.
Construction equipment shipping from where?
Risedale Airstrip.
Private airstrip, private jet.
Yeah, the second thing, Luke Baylor made bail.
I'll be at the airstrip.
Come on, man, open it up.
I'm out.
Time to get paid.
Nice.
(siren wailing)
TRIPP:
You made bail pretty fast.
Who put the money up?
What can I say?
I told you I was going to get out.
CAINE:
You've got quite a collection here, Luke.
TRIPP:
Is this the last car?
It's a business.
We fix cars.
You fix up stolen cars, Luke.
Your fleet here looks like cargo.
Mr. Dunlar came to me.
He knew I boosted cars.
Later.
Later.
Hey.
You Baylor?
Well, if what I hear is true, I might have a job for you.
Said he would get me five thou for every car.
So I deliver 'em here, and I walk.
The restThs his deal.
Where's Steve Dunlar right now?
Frank, I think I kno
Look, I don't care, just get it done.
(sirens wailing)
CAINE:
Almost, Steve.
Almost.
TRIPP:
Dunlar, you planning on going somewhere with these stolen cars?
I got paperwork back everything you see here.
Luke Baylor's ready to bust in song about every gallon you stole from the pipeline.
CAINE:
You're trying to leave while your kid is lying in a hospital bed alone.?
Could've filled this plane ten times over my kid doesn't screw around with the fuel.
He didn't know you were smuggling jet fuel, did he?
TRIPP:
You used him
You called 911 pretending you were concerned about him.
All you cared about was diverting the police away from you.
Luke offers up free cars, you truck in free fuel.
Did you make a deal on this plane, too?
Look, this was my shot.
Nobody got hurt here.
You know what they'll pay for these cars in Venezuela?
Almost three times the sticker.
Now your son's an orphan.
What's the price tag on that?
Evan's a big boy.
He'll learn to forgive.
And hopefully...
hopefully forget.
Yo, check it out, it's Dex.
He's going to do it.
Oh, dude, it's the Jack-in-the-Box.
Whoo !
Oh, my God, he's got no head.
Cops are coming.
Let's get out of here.
Gentlemen.
Wolfe, you got the head over there ?
Yeah.
But how did it get 15 feet from its body ?
Maybe, gentlemen, maybe it had some help.
Well, vic needed some elevation to make contact with this wire.
911 call said there was a sideshow going on over here.
What do you mean sideshow ?
It's a party.
Kids in tricked-out cars doing stunts.
That's the only way our vic could have got that high.
Well, if this was a stunt gone wrong, then how come everybody took off ?
Because this... was not an accident.
High Octane
What, no Alexx ?
Falls under "obvious death."
What's his name ?
Name's Dexter Gilman.
Nineteen.
Let me ask you something.
What are all these lights and cables doing in the middle of a parking lot ?
Yeah, well, uh, PD said there was a street fair here a couple of days ago.
City's not scheduled to take them down.
Oh, yeah ?
And our headless horseman decided to utilize them in his act ?
Yeah, well, based on these tread marks, he wasn't the only one performing.
That means we're going to have to collect everything.
All right ?
Beer bottles, beer cans, cigarette butts.
Everything.
Yeah.
Who's that guy ?
You know him ?
Nah.
Never seen him before.
Hey.
Hey, this is an active crime scene.
Can I help you ?
Yeah.
Mike Doyle.
Documentary filmmaker.
Here to get some footage.
Oh, yeah ?
Of what ?
Scanner said decapitation.
Figured it might be pretty good.
Looks like the ME, uh... the ME already bagged he body ?
And the head ?
Look, Mike, I don't know who you think you are, but this isn't a scene in one of your movies.
This is real life.
That's exactly why I'm here.
They want factual accounts of what you CSIs do.
Who's they ?
The mayor's office.
The City signed off on filming us ?
Yeah.
Horatio said they might try this.
It's a public relations move.
To cast a better light on your department.
Why, because we had a mole ?
Look, take your camera and your film and go somewhere else.
Okay.
Fair enough.
Here's my card.
Here's my card.
We'll be in touch.
Alexx, did we get anything ?
His head was severed between the first and second cervical vertebrae.
No soft tissue bridges.
The incision is clean.
Consistent with the cable that we found at the scene.
Yeah.
A soup spoon can kill you with enough velocity.
The boy was moving, Horatio.
What about those markings on the arm ?
Based on the orange color, it's postmortem.
Look like a tire tread.
Yep.
This baby boy was run over after the fact.
The tread pattern is odd, Horatio, like nothing I've seen.
Yeah, it's no ordinary tire.
Do you need a Microsil impression of it ?
I'll send Boa Vista in.
Thank you, Alexx.
Nice work.
Thanks.
Almost documentary worthy, wouldn't you say ?
By the way, I would've done the same exact thing you and Eric did today.
The last thing that this department needs is more scrutiny.
Scrutiny like your covert investigation of our lab ?
You know, Ryan, when I started here,
I really did start with the best intentions.
And when it all came crumbling down,
I lost almost every friend I had.
So I would really hate to see somebody else make that same mistake.
Well, I agreed to do it.
And let a camera crew follow you around ?
Mm-hmm.
And Horatio okayed that ?
As long as it doesn't interfere with my work, yeah.
Natalia, somebody had to do it.
So, you're going to fall on the sword
The lab needs a clean slate.
And you know what they say :
"Sunlight is the best disinfectant."
So, is this thing going to tell us who ran him over ?
Well, it has a unique pattern, minimal tread.
And I did little digging.
The tires with this kind of tread are called "racing slicks."
Hey, oosiers.
They're made for serious abuse.
They use them, actually, over at the Miami Speedway.
Someone's been testing their street performance at sideshows.
Maybe that someone knows what happened to Dexter Gilman.
Only one place that sells them here in town.
Place called Tread On Me.
Then that's where I'll be.
Yeah, I recognize the tread.
They're Hoosier R6s.
Racing tires.
You sell these to teenagers ?
I run a business.
Had one kid used them for drifting.
What's drifting ?
It's a stunt.
Driver turns the front wheels in the opposite direction of the turn.
Tires have a good bite, but they get destroyed pretty quickly.
He was replacing them every couple of weeks.
He, huh ?
Who's he ?
His name is Dex Gilman.
Dex Gilman's the vic from this morning.
You telling me he ran himself over with his own car ?
I don't think that car was totally his own.
Oh, yeah ?
What do you mean ?
He drove it.
But some girl by the name of, uh, Brynn Roberts paid for every new set of rubber.
Brynn Roberts, huh ?
Anything else ?
Yeah, keep these tires on the pro circuit.
Stop selling them to teenagers, okay ?
I didn't kill that kid.
But you didn't care if he lived or died, did you ?
So I understand that you and Dex Gilman had a relationship.
I guess you could call him my boyfriend, yes.
I need to take this.
Let it go to voice mail, please.
I also understand that
Dex was buying Hoosier racing tires and you were footing the bill.
I paid for the whole car.
I was his sponsor.
Do you know where the car is right now ?
Someone drove off with it.
I had to report it stolen.
That's a hard day.
Yeah.
What happened this morning... wasn't part of the plan.
What is your plan ?
Dad said he'll match any money that I make before I turn 25.
These sideshows could be my huge moneymaker with the right marketing.
What kind of marketing ?
The Web.
When you're breaking a new sport, it is all about video.
So, you film these sideshows ?
It's my plan to attract investors.
Well, in that case, I'd like to see all the footage from this morning's event.
I'd be more than happy to show you.
As soon as you show me a warrant.
Hey. 99 bottles of beer on the wall.
You and Ryan collect all those from the parking lot ?
Yeah, he's running extracted liquids, cigarette butts and drug paraphernalia.
So... he's got DNA and Trace.
You win the coin toss ?
No.
I pulled my seniority card.
Ah.
Perfect.
Hey, I heard that you had a visitor at the crime scene.
Yeah.
Some Michael Moore wannabe.
I told him to get lost.
Unfortunately, I'm afraid someone's gonna get stuck with the guy.
Well, I can tell you that somebody is not going to be me.
All right.
Start your engines.
Look like a tented arch to you ?
Yeah, it does.
That's rare.
That's very rare.
Less than five percent of the population has it.
And every one of these bottles has the identical print.
That would mean that the same guy would have had to have passed all of them out.
Must have been the life of the party.
I got it.
"Evan Dunlar.
Internship at " Lasgrove Electronics Corporation."
Let's go see if the intern likes fast cars.
You know, the guys said
"Make yourself useful," so I did.
I manned the coolers.
We found your prints on each of these bottles.
It was a sideshow.
These guys trick out their cars, drive all crazy and stuff.
Just want to hang out with them, that's all.
It's reckless driving, Evan.
And it's against the law.
You giving these guys an audience only makes you part of the problem.
Evan, this morning, a young man named Dexter Gilman was killed.
How well did you know him ?
He was one of the best drivers.
Did the Jack-in-the-Box.
What's that ?
Peddle-free, cruise control, feet on the wheel, head out the top.
Unbelievable.
And the girls loved him.
Not enough to stick around after he was decapitated.
How 'bout you, Evan ?
Did you feel the need to stick around ?
Dex's car came up stolen.
Did you take it ?
No, I didn't steal Dex's car.
I ran.
Look, the cops come, you break for it.
It's just...
it's what you do.
You know ?
I mean, it's that or spend the night in jail.
Man, the cops were on us fast this time.
Evan, we need names.
I can't.
If something happens, they're gonna know that I'm talking to you guys.
Evan, listen to me.
We know you're involved, and you could go to jail for this, son.
So don't go far.
Heard a kid had his head taken off at a sideshow this morning.
That's true.
I need you to look into something for me, please.
You wondering who organized it ?
No.
Quite the contrary..
who broke it up.
The kid said that the police were there in record time.
Somebody on the inside tipped them ?
It's possible.
Let's see who made the call.
I'll call 911, track it down.
Thank you.
I had some information,
I though the police should know about it.
I overheard my son, Evan, talking about one of these sideshows a few days ago where it would be.
I'm a single parent.
I got home from my job, and my son wasn't there.
Did he mention anyone else's involvement ?
No, he didn't.
This is my fault.
I was the one encouraging him to make new friends.
I just never thought he'd get wrapped up in this.
Well, he's a teenager, Mr. Dunlar, so don't... don't be too hard on yourself.
Evan was into cars as a kid.
Toys, models, remote control.
But now, he's playing with the real thing.
He could've been killed today.
Yes, he could've.
So here's what I'd like you to do go home and make sure he's safe.
Okay ?
Thank you.
Thanks for coming in.
Come on.
Come on, come on, come on, come on.
Answer.
I'm headed to Judge Harrison's for a warrant.
What do you need ?
Trying to save you the trip.
Brynn Roberts already posted her sideshow footage online.
I don't need a warrant ?
I am loving you.
I don't know if this helps.
Camera's in a fixed position.
She must've set up a tripod.
Go ahead and run it.
There's our vic.
Jests.
I really wish I could unseen that.
I'm sorry, can you play it again ?
Why didn't he clear the last cable ?
No idea.
Ryan said they were all hung at the same height.
Okay, again.
Maybe the height of the car changed.
Can you measure the height of the bumper ?
Yeah, yeah, yeah, I think so.
And get a measurement as he clears the second to the last cable.
Six inches.
What's the measurement as he collides with the last cable ?
17 inches.
The car was raised.
Hydraulics.
Maybe he accidentally set them off himself ?
I don't know.
He was hanging out the sunroof, he was driving with his feet.
I doubt it.
Okay, that leaves, what ?
A malfunction ?
Maybe.
Could be premeditated murder.
Well, I know one person who would profit from this.
You weren't building a sport, you were trading in sleaze.
I bet you couldn't wait to upload the footage.
It's a male-dominated sport.
You grab their attention any way you can.
I get all sorts of stuff for this site.
Well, the high tension wires were certainly a success.
- Did you pick the location ?
- A matter of fact, I did.
But I didn't kill Dex, if that's where you're going with all of this.
What about the hydraulics that killed him ?
What are you talking about ?
Are you serious ?
Look, Dex wanted those in.
He did it all himself.
Gable and Third.
Sounds like a sideshow.
You know what ?
I'm gonna see how they like our cars.
This is Dexter Gilman's car.
Dex and I did a few tandem stunts.
Drifts and stuff.
You guys teammates ?
More like friendly competitors.
You're some friend, Luke.
He's in the morgue and you're driving his car.
I didn't have anything to do with Dex's accident.
I feel bad.
Yeah, clearly.
Luke, you ran over your friend when you took his car.
I couldn't just let this beauty get impounded.
Dex would have wanted me to take it.
I guess we'll never know, will we ?
Officer.
Book him on auto theft.
Why you sweating us for, man ?
Why you need the registration for anyway ?
Why you trying to run our plates, man ?
Run this guy's plates.
He's the one with the problem.
Man, we was just here watching.
We didn't even do anything.
Hey, hey, hey, hey, hey.
Shut up.
Okay ?
Sound like a couple of busted leaf blowers.
We're just trying to ride, mister.
Look, man, it's about what's under the hood, man.
I don't give a damn what's in the glove compartment.
This vehicle's stolen, smart-ass.
No way.
Well, the VIN number says way.
All right ?
Take Tweedledee and Tweedledum here for a ride.
Six of these rides are hot, so now we're looking at car thieves.
Something else going on here, Frank, bigger than this.
I'll look into auto thefts over the last few days.
Think there's a connection to our murder ?
The car, Frank, is going to tell us.
Okay, so... the kids we busted at the sideshow are throwing up all over themselves to give us information.
Beats six months in jail.
Yeah, unfortunately, none of them knows a single thing about the death of Dexter Gilman.
Selective memory.
Is that the blood that's left after the cleanup ?
Yeah, we're not going to need to run DNA on it.
This is, um...
This is definitely the car Dexter got killed in.
What we really need to do is figure out how this car's hydraulic lift was activated.
Well, what about this ?
Is this the on-off switch ?
Yeah, but based on the stunt that he was performing at the time, ther's no way he could have reached that with his feet.
Yeah, he's definitely not tall enough to pull that move off.
Little warning, please.
Yeah.
Sorry about that.
On a positive note, we now know that that works.
Yeah.
Glad your video guy didn't see that.
Yeah.
He's supposed to start in a couple of weeks.
What is this ?
I don't know.
Looks like a transmitter.
Well, that would allow the hydraulics to be activated remotely.
And at exactly the right time.
Okay, so now our big question is : who activated it and how ?
You know, Horatio talked to a guy whose son is into radio-controlled cars.
I know it's kind of a stretch.
Not by much.
So, Wolfe, you're dragging me out here because of Evan Dunlar's vast knowledge of electronics, huh ?
Dex's head came off 'cause that car got triggered, and, uh, this kid admitted to being there, so...
So hot lead, Wolfe.
You gonna get a camera on us ?
Yeah, what's that supposed to mean ?
Supposed to mean I heard you signed up to represent us.
So what's next, your own TV show ?
You know what, pal, you can get one if you want.
Nah, that's all right, 'll leave that to you.
Don't move !
Don't move !
Help me.
You got him, Wolfe ?
I got him !
I'll go get a fire extinguisher.
- What are you running from, Evan ?
- I can't breathe.
You probably just cracked your rib.
Just lie still.
I think...
I think someone's trying to kill me.
Wow.
What just happened here ?
You smell that ?
Yeah, that isn't gasoline, is it ?
No, it's jet fuel.
Burns 200 degrees hotter, cooked this car.
Can't exactly get jet fuel at a gas station.
Well, it couldn't be stolen, could it ?
Nah, nah, airports, refineries..
they guard their supplies 24-7.
Would have made big news.
Maybe they got it from underground.
What are you thinking ?
I read this article.
Refineries deliver their fuel supply to airports though... high-pressured pipelines.
But get this, it's five feet under the city.
It's six miles long and it delivers the equivalent of 1800 tanker trucks a day.
So the jet fuel pipeline runs underneath all these subdivisions ?
Yeah, it's underneath everything.
You think the sideshow kids are tapping into it ?
I don't know.
Maybe.
Department of Public Works says this half mile of the pipe has been shut down this morning for construction, so it's a very good time to try it.
And the minirae will tell us where to go ?
Yeah, HazMat uses it to detect contamination leaks.
This is the highest reading I've gotten so far.
It's 12 parts per million.
Excuse me, ma'am,
Can I help you ?
I'm Calleigh Duquesne.
This is Ryan Wolfe.
We're with Miami-Dade PD.
Do you own this house ?
Yes.
Can we take a look around your property ?
Sure.
You still getting something ?
Yeah, it's off the charts.
What kind of construction are you doing back here ?
I'm putting in a pool.
Well, at least I was until a few days ago.
Who's your contractor ?
Dunlar Construction.
Steve Dunlar ?
Yeah.
That's the sideshow kid's dad, isn't it ?
So there definitely is a connection.
He told me he broke a water main, said he had to talk to the city before he could do anything.
When's the, uh, last time you saw Mr. Dunlar ?
This morning.
He woke me up.
Backed in a tanker truck.
Made a lot of noise for 6:00 in the morning.
Said he was moving the main.
Do you smell that ?
Did he hit a gas line ?
It's jet fuel.
He hit it on purpose.
That thing on top wasn't there before.
Dunlar built his own gas pump.
We're gonna need to take those tools with us.
I'll call H. I'm sure he has some questions for Mr. Dunlar.
Tapping into an underground pipeline is destruction of city property, Mr. Dunlar.
I was breaking ground for the woman, putting in a pool.
I found a pipeline, but I never tampered with anything.
Then, explain the jet fuel found in your son's car.
I have no idea.
The homeowner said you had a tanker truck.
She's a housewife.
She probably doesn't even know what one looks like.
Look talk to my son about it.
He's the one you found with the jet fuel, right ?
He's the one that's racing around with these street racers.
Was he aware of what you found ?
No, because I knew he'd tell people.
He'll do anything to get in with those kids.
I can't trust him.
You set quite an example for him.
I'm gonna go now.
'm a good contractor, a reputable contractor, and as far as I can see, all you got on me is suspicious behavior.
Mr. Dunlar, that's going to change.
Francis.
Horatio.
I had a chat with the guys over at Auto Theft.
And ?
They're saying stolen cars are up 300% in two weeks.
Toyotas, Mazdas, Hondas.
Frank, this is not street racing.
Have you called the refinery ?
Yeah, control center's latest count says they're short 10,000 gallons of aviation fuel worth 47 grand.
- I don't think Dunlar would give his son up for that, do you ?
- No.
We executed a search warrant on his home and business.
Came up nothing.
It's, uh... it's just not adding up.
Not yet, Frank.
Not yet.
Is that everything from the jet fuel pipeline ?
Yeah, straight from the ground.
Diverting pipe, wrenches.
Whoever did this knew exactly what they were doing.
Well, Public Works said that they shut down the pipeline for repairs between 5:00 and 7:30 this morning.
That's the same time as the sideshow.
Wait a minute.
What ?
What you got ?
Blood.
Good eye.
I'm starting to feel like this murder is covering up something bigger.
Did Natalia tell you about the remote transmitter we found.
Yeah, and I think I figured out how it activated the car's hydraulics.
Dial that number.
What the hell just happened ?
Uh, the trigger... for this car's hydraulics was a cell phone.
So the killer activated Dex's hydraulics with a phone call.
Exactly.
The receiver in this car was a circuit board from a stripped down cell phone.
When it received the signal, it sent an electric current.
In this case, bypassed the ringer and was wired directly into the car's hydraulic master switch.
Well, that would mean that the... caller's number is still in the memory chip, right ?
It's right.
I'll pull up the call log.
You know I would narrow it down by time.
The, uh, the murder occurred around 6:00 a.m.
I would, but I don't need to.
There's only one number.
Aren't you going to get it ?
Let it go to voice mail.
I don't know the number.
Oh, I think you do.
No.
You want my phone ?
Talk to my lawyers.
I did one better.
I talked to a judge.
This is a warrant.
Yeah, that number you don't recognize, you called it this morning.
We know your phone call was sent the exact moment Dex was killed.
It's the phone call that killed him.
I didn't mean for it to happen that way.
I didn't want him to die.
Well, I'm sure it didn't hurt.
A good crash brings millio of eyeballs.
That's a fantastic business plan.
What, you don't slow down at the side of a road to see an accident ?
Everyone does it.
Nobody even pays attention at a speedway until there's a pileup.
It's human nature.
It's a human life, Ms. Roberts.
And I'm sure that's all the explanation a jury is going to need.
Get her out of here.
So what do we got from the lady's pool ?
The blood on the valve matches the DNA profile of your headless victim.
Dex Gilman.
What ?
No, that doesn't make sense.
He died ten miles away.
How'd his blood get on the pipe ?
The blood would have to be wet to transfer.
There was a kid who jumped in the car with him..
Luke Baylor.
Guys, I didn't kill Dex.
That's not why you're here.
How did you know Mr. Dunlar ?
I didn't know him.
I knew his kid.
Drove him home a couple times.
How do you explain the pipeline ?
Pipeline ?
Yeah, the pipeline that's missing 10,000 gallons of jet fuel.
The pipeline had blood on it.
Which means you're connected to Steve Dunlar and you two work together.
I'm not saying another word.
Not until I have a lawyer in here with me.
Frank, call Customs, cargo manifest for all departing flights please.
Will do.
$47,000 for the jet fuel.
Are you a world traveler, Luke ?
Is that a crime ?
No, but traveling with stolen cars is.
I'll be out on bail before he dials his first phone call.
Well, I guess the race is on.
Mr. Wolfe, you were looking for me ?
Yeah, two things.
Tripp sent the air cargo manifests.
There are 21 planes scheduled for departure today.
What kind of cargo ?
Uh, Express mail, produce, construction equipment, seafood...
Wait a second.
Construction equipment shipping from where ?
Risedale Airstrip.
Private airstrip, private jet.
Yeah, the second thing, Luke Baylor made bail.
I'll be at the airstrip.
Come on, man, open it up.
I'm out.
Time to get paid.
Nice.
You made bail pretty fast.
Who put the money up ?
What can I say ?
I told you I was going to get out.
You've got quite a collection here, Luke.
Is this the last car ?
It's a business.
We fix cars.
You fix up stolen cars, Luke.
Your fleet here looks like cargo.
Mr. Dunlar came to me.
He knew I boosted cars.
Later.
Hey.
You Baylor ?
Well, if what I hear is true, I might have a job for you.
Said he would get me five thou for every car.
So I deliver 'em here,... and I walk.
The rest is his deal.
Where's Steve Dunlar right now ?
Frank, I think I know.
Look, I don't care, just get it done.
Almost, Steve.
Almost.
Dunlar, you planning on going somewhere with these stolen cars ?
I got paperwork back everything you see here.
Luke Baylor's ready to bust in song about every gallon you stole from the pipeline.
Your son is lying in a hospital bed alone and you bringing away...
Could've filled this plane ten times over my kid doesn't screw around with the fuel.
He didn't know you were smuggling jet fuel, did he ?
You used him
You called 911 pretending you were concerned about him.
All you cared about was diverting the police away from you.
Luke offers up free cars, you truck in free fuel.
Did you make a deal on this plane, too ?
Look, this was my shot.
Nobody got hurt here.
You know what they'll pay for these cars in Venezuela ?
Almost three times the sticker.
Now your son's an orphan.
What's the price tag on that ?
Evan's a big boy.
He'll learn to forgive.
And hopefully...
Hopefully... forget.
STUDIO 2.0 presents
In association with OCN KOCCA, and KTB Network a J TEAM Studio production
The world has run out of all forms of energy.
People built a new city by making a new energy with their excrements.
Soon after the city's leaders announced two legislations to generate and control the new energy.
First, installing an ID chip in each of the citizen's anus to monitor their defecation level.
Second, provide defecating citizens in return one addictive "juicybar".
Later, defecation amounts have skyrocketed, but the city became full of addicts due to the juicybar's strong addiction.
Illegal trade of juicybars became prevalent, and the juicybar's side effects have created dumb pint-sized mutants.
These mutants organized a gang to plunder juicybars.
They became known as the 'Diaper Gang'.
They're coming.
They're coming.
Hey, they're coming!
They're coming.
They're coming.
They're going.
They're going.
They're coming.
They're coming.
Outta my way!
Hey slowpoke, think you're faster?
You betcha!
Hey!
Bald bastard.
AACHI SSIPAK
We are the forgotten orphans.
We once dedicated our crap and youth to this city.
But what did our leaders do for us?
Did they appreciate us for our crap?
Never!
We became addicted to juicybars, so we can never shit or even reproduce because our dicks have shrunk like peanuts.
Then they ran us out of this city like garbage!
Why?
Because we've evolved into mutants, liberating ourselves from having to shit all the time!
Diapers!
Diapers!
Nonetheless, we're in shitcreek now.
Juicybars is our only source of food, but we haven't had any for a month.
And why is this?
Because of that special cop, Geko?
No.
It's because a whole bunch of you piss-ass dumb shits can't even blow away one fuckin' cop!
Stand up!
This is your last chance to redeem yourselves.
Tell me where we can find juicybars for our hungry brothers.
Kindergarten defecation classes.
Where were you before?
A kindergarten defecation class.
A juicybar factory?
No, a juicybar market?
No, how about...
You freaks don't deserve to be called gangsters.
Know what punks like you are called?
I know!
Hoodlums!
Yes, hoodlums!
What?
I mean, these hoodlums...
A lot of hoodlums are dealing juicybars in Section 4.
Hoodlums, you say...
You bonehead!
There's only eighteen in here, not twenty!
You swiped two, didn't you?
Count it yourself, idiot!
You hopeless chimp.
You won't get your cut unless you get two more.
And no chick as well.
Got it?
You twirp!
Why am I always doing the dirty work?
Hey, you get the easy way out.
I always risk my life being on the lookout.
Go and get some more.
We need to make up for it.
You little piss ant!
Then every chick we find tonight are mine.
And if you cheat me again and take off, you're really gonna pay this time.
Damn it, that hurt!
Stupid mutt!
Today the police scored big again for mopping up the Diaper Gang.
We will rigidly tackle any insincere defecation!
Have any problems defecating?
Well, I'm constipated.
Drink!
Dump-free Yogurt!
FLUSH ITALL DOWN!
Now get ready, gear up and...
Headbump!
One, two, givin' it to ya'.
Don't get too wasted now.
Stop showing off and do some kickin'!
Here comes daddy!
Your juicybar is being prepared.
Sorry to disturb.
Man!
That's one hell of a dump!
Juicybar delivery complete.
Smells damn good, too!
The way kids shit these days is so impolite.
He's such a hopeless case.
His damn showing off gives me the runs.
Abio, showing off here is useless.
We're in the can.
Screw off.
Run!
It's too damn hot for this crap.
Let's go.
You little punks.
You assholes swiped a ton of juicybars in Section 4.
Think you're big shots?
You cheating scums.
There's taxes on what you made.
What?
Bastard got some balls!
You little shit, stop being a wus again.
Look here, cue ball.
Unless you want me to make sushi out of your tongue, bring me 100 juicybars a day.
Damn, you got cavaties.
Be a good boy!
And grow some damn hair!
You know my boss's cell in prison, right?
Hand the juicybars over to him.
Let's go!
Oh yeah, Jimmy says hi.
You got a really good friend!
Ciao!
Jimmy, you son of a bitch.
John Doe is this month's "King of Defecation".
If you become the "King", you'll receive unlimited VIP service with beautiful girls at a luxurious resort.
Try your best to defecate, and be the "King of Defecation".
You can be the "King", too!
Foul bastards.
How dare they stuff things into the sacred anus.
Those beasts are the real traitors of our establishment.
They're evil to our society.
Don't you think, Captain?
Chief, so you mean...
They're illegal anus users?
- Like this, bitch?
- Harder!
- Like this?
- Harder!
- Like this?
- Harder!
- Like this?
- Harder!
Cut!
Cut!
Cut!
You idiots, get it right for once!
How many times I gotta tell you?
Think we're shooting a cheap porn?
You sluts.
Each whip should be the sublime.
A girl who sacrifices her anus to save the world.
Oh how beautiful she is.
Once this film is complete, it will be praised by critics and moviegoers, and be a world-wide success!
Oh my Lord, how art thou I be this talented?
Bullshit!
Hey asslover, you're in deep trouble!
You freak!
Dr. Strange sawed another guard into pieces again in prison.
That crazy old fart.
He'd be cooked on the electric chair if he hadn't created our cyborg.
Move him into the special cell so that he can't touch anyone.
And report that he's cooperating very well with us.
Yes, ma'am.
Geko, good work and...
My report for today.
99 kills and no arrests.
That despicable cyborg, how rude.
ANAL INSTICT
SM MIZERY
HORNYALIENS
You freak, what's with your room?
Don't you have anything kinky?
He's totally high, man.
Don't sweat it, dude.
Keep stuffing his face.
Look at him.
I'm telling you, he's toasted.
Okay, okay.
You like feeling high, you pervert?
From now on, you're Shitman.
Shitman.
Shitman.
Shitman.
Shitman.
Yes!
I am!
Shitman!
Shitman, shall we save the world now?
Here comes Shitman to bring peace to the fuckin' world!
That was so cool.
Let's take him to a higher place this time.
Then he'll croak for sure, you meathead.
We need him for something else.
What the hell is this?
Pigeon poo?
Is this the right way?
Yes, sir!
I'm positive this is the way to Section 4's prison.
Oh, how corrupt the world is.
A prison is a hideout for hoodlums?
I'm bored!
Give me a vacation!
Who stole my Teddy Bear?
This sucks!
The world's too corrupt for good citizens like me.
80 juicybars from the Razor Gang in Section 3.
80 juicybars from the Razor Gang in Section 3.
25 juicybars from the Cobra Gang in Section 4.
25 juicybars from the Cobra Gang in Section 4.
A measly 25 juicybars?
The Cobras seem to be out of heart lately.
Yes, they do.
I'll break your balls if you sleep on the job again!
Someone's here to see you.
What does he want to snitch this time?
- What the hell?
- What's that?
Why are you stripping?
How dare you, you looney!
What are you going to do?
Charge me for smoking?
What's gotten into his head?
Of course it's prohibited, you freak!
Who the hell do you think you are?
That freak turned out to be a useful friend.
Hey lady, time for the 'Misery' version.
Misery.
Misery.
Misery.
Misery.
Misery.
Misery...
One, two, one, two.
Misery...
One, two, one, two.
You freak!
I'm gonna slice you in half!
Write it again!
Write it again!
Write it again!
Write it again!
Didn't I warn you not to kill Misery without my permission!
This is much better than the movie.
If you won't give it up, then don't hit me at least!
Crap, it's my first erection in three years.
You pervert.
How dare you hit your director!
Director, my ass.
You crazy bitch!
You call an animator a real director?
Yes, I do.
What a bummer.
Hey, kid!
What are you looking at?
Who are you calling "kid"?
You rude bitch!
Isn't she totally hot?
Damn horndog is at it again!
Peabrain!
We have to finish the job first!
You horny bastard!
Diapers, diapers, diapers.
Die, you mushroom head!
Shoot that crazy bitch!
I mean that crazy asshole right now!
Absent-minded myself.
What's this red crap?
Is the ceiling taking a shit?
What the hell are all these diapers?
Is this some kindergarten?
Let's go if it's all done.
Go, go, go!
One, two, one, two!
One, two, one, two!
Go, go, go!
Where am I?
Aliens?
Then that means...
Then that means...
Come to mama!
You evil beasts!
Alien Queen!
Give me my baby back!
Come on, bitch!
Oh no.
How can I give you a slow and painful death...
I don't know why I did that, but...
I'll compensate you with juicybars.
Do you have any juicybars?
Well, I don't have any now, but if my movie becomes a big hit.
Movie?
Yes.
When my heroine takes a dump, juicybars come gushing out.
Doesn't it sound like a hit?
Juicybars gush out with just one dump?
How is that possible?
It happens only in a fictional world.
Stop bullshitting!
Just tell me how.
Or else, you'll die in the real world!
Right, I mean my movie is about a holy sacrifice.
I mean in order to enlighten her...
God digs out this corruptive chip from her anus.
Yes, digs out.
Then, he sticks a blessed chip back in there, so...
So whenever she shits, tons of juicybars gush out.
In other words...
Yes!
It becomes a magical anus!
A magical anus...
So he digs it out and sticks it in?
You've been implanted with an ID chip at your birth.
This is your soul mate to supply you with precious juicybars for a plentiful life.
This ID chip in your anus is your second identity.
Why didn't I think about this before?
Since you gave me this great idea,
I'll put these chips into your rear with honor.
But...
I don't shit very well.
Nobody here can shit better than you.
I'm extremely constipated, and I even have hemorrhoids.
Sorry, I do a lot of things with my butt.
Gross.
Drop him.
Wait!
Wait!
I'm gonna have an audition for a girl who's good at shitting.
Wait!
Please don't kill me.
If you don't kill me,
I'll stick those chips into a girl who can shit several times a day.
I beg you!
There she is.
She's going.
"Wanted ASAP"
"Excellent defecation skills"
"Need actress with experienced anus"
"Jimmy's Pure Cinema"
Jimmy, that tough cockroach.
He's still alive.
Hey, let's beat the hell out of Jimmy in front of Beautiful.
If I show her how strong I am,
I'll sweep her off her feet.
So Jean D'Arc is this lady who was born to save the world.
But one day a juicybar tycoon shows up.
May the anal force be with me.
Show me the anus!
So angry Jean D'Arc tramps on him.
Oh my god!
But he turned out to be an angel looking for the city's saviour.
Oh, Jean D'Arc!
I will give you a blessed anal chip.
Save the world with this.
That's stupid!
It's so boring.
How about a woman who saves a man with her breasts?
A very, very rich man.
Hey, I'm the director here!
Oh my.
This is a film about a noble sacrifice.
I mean, art...
An auteur film.
You know what an auteur film is?
Why do I have to know that?
Being pretty is enough.
Come on baby.
Change it into tits, okay?
What the hell do you know?
A ditz like you will never be a star in this business!
Then do it yourself, Mr. Auteur.
Ciao!
- Rock, paper, scissors.
- Rock, paper, scissors.
Bend over, asshole!
You see, there are all kinds of shit in this world.
Some are soft, some are hard, and some just don't turn out right.
But in the end, shit is shit.
The same goes for chics.
Then is my Beautiful Shit inside?
Not a bad show.
Jimmy's bolder than I thought.
What are they doing, damn it?
What is it?
Oh, nothing.
They're just chit-chatting.
Well, it looks too loose.
Can she take a good crap?
Look how elastic her anus is.
Ten times a day will be no problem.
I'll stick it in beautifully.
What the hell?
Damn it.
You idiot!
Jimmy, that son of a bitch, is dead.
What are you doing, you perverts!
What is it?
Run!
Oh, my tummy!
What's wrong with your tummy?
You perverts also with them?
No way.
How could we possibly be with those jerks?
We were just passing by and...
Damn it!
What a major bitch.
She's the one who followed us.
Rotten perverts.
Why into my anus of all places?
Damn it.
You must be constipated.
You think that will work?
No.
For constipations...
GOLD LAX!
And SILVER LAX!
Shut up!
She's a real pain in the ass.
How could she shit now?
Isn't she super sexy?
You blockhead!
Just bring her juicybar after she finishes.
ID check complete.
Your juicybar will be delivered.
Oh my goodness!
Is it broken?
If anyone is on patrol in Section 4, please comply!
What's with all these juicybars?
What did that pervert do to me?
She's pretty, has an awesome personality, and she's so fertile.
I love you!
She's a walking juicybar factory.
Now I know why the Diaper Gang wanted her so bad.
She takes one dump and tons of juicybars are delivered.
Anyway, what should I do with these leaches?
Beautiful, trust me from now on.
I'll be your manager, and we'II...
Flies like him tend to swarm around a beauty like you.
Let go!
Gonna kill a friend over a chic?
Whatever.
Remember when you ran away?
Don't worry, sweety.
I'm your man from now on.
You traitor!
Forgive me for asking you this, but since I helped you find their place, mind if I go home now?
Help me!
Help me!
Eat this, you diapers!
Turn left!
Left!
Is that left, you idiot?
Sons of bitches.
You show your juicybar trick to the whole damn world?
That was the first time I pooped so many juicybars!
Then what's up their asses?
How should I know what's in there?
I'm no ass expert.
Then go find out and resolve this!
Who do you think I am?
This is 0497.
I don't see anything strange.
Not a soul in sight...
Shit!
The Diaper Gang!
Cease fire!
Find the girl!
Find the girl, find the girl.
What are you waiting for?
Go after them!
This is evidence one discovered on the scene.
His name is Jimmy, and was presumed to be killed by the Diaper Gang.
He pretended to be a movie director, and has a criminal record with regard to illegal movies.
They were at the crime scene, and were presumed homeless hoodlums.
If an error occurred in the computer on the numerous ID registrations, these two culprits are very likely to have the answer.
So if we analyze the defecation data of the checked IDs...
Get to the point!
How are they related to this case?
Well, they had an illegal affair...
Shut up, you idiot!
Mobilize all the forces and catch them all.
WANTED
We found her!
We found her!
We found one woman who last defecated in our records.
The rest of the IDs have no record of defecation.
The Diaper Gang cannot defecate.
So their need for juicybars makes them a big suspect.
If we capture her, we'll be able to uncover everything about this case.
A SWAT team is now positioned to track down any massive supply of juicybars within three minutes.
Get to the point!
So will you catch them or not?
I will catch them, ma'am.
If you miss them this time, you'll be the first to die.
Man, this is frustrating!
Look, I'm not the same old Aachi.
If you wanna survive in Section 4, you better not get on my bad side.
I got many customers waiting in line besides you, old man.
Alright, I won't get upset.
Anyhow, hoodlums like you walking into this fancy hotel is humiliating.
So quietly use the back door.
Senile old bastard.
Who does he think he's talking to?
Beautiful, the old man is coming to buy some juicybars.
How about a nice whole-hearted shit?
Moron.
I'm the one who feeds you punks.
What?
Moron?
You bitch!
We got them!
All enforcements mobilize to coordinates 646!
Just rough them up a little.
And remember, my share is two thirds.
Are you ready?
Let's go.
Let's go!
Hold your gun right, idiot!
I got no hair, but I got the body.
I'm such a hottie.
Cut the crap.
Old man, I told you to use the back door.
You think my words don't count?
You son of a...
One, two, one, two.
Ready!
Ready!
Throw it!
Who the hell are you?
Where is she?
Who are you talking about?
I can't remember all my chics.
One, two...
You'll be okay, sweety.
Damn it, this is humilating.
You know who I am?
Wait!
Let's talk!
So, well...
Over there...
Put your guns down!
- Don't move or we'll shoot!
- Put your guns down!
You little assholes, how dare...
Who the hell are you?
Going up the stairs with one leg is a pain in the ass.
What are you waiting for?
Go inside!
Move it!
Diapers!
My leg!
Sons of bitches!
My money!
My money!
You stupid old man, don't be such a meanie.
We're in trouble.
We need back-up.
What are you doing?
Get in there and fight!
I hate you.
Boss!
You bastards!
I have grenades!
Shit.
Damn it!
My hands are burning.
Get them!
Hurry and stand up!
You sons of bitches!
What have I gotten myself into!
How did things turn out like this?
And is that little rat alive or what?
Hold on tight, babe.
You little rat!
You're alive!
You idiot!
How could you bring the Diapers with you?
I didn't, you moron.
They're the ones who followed me!
- Asshole!
- Yeah, asshole.
Man, you never make things any easier.
Shut up and just follow me!
Crap, we're screwed.
Oney, do something!
Yeah!
Bring it on!
Shit, we got a code fucking red here.
Get them!
Get them!
Get them!
Let go!
Let go!
I said let go!
Let go!
Damn it.
You son of a bitch!
Hey, who do you think you are?
You asshole.
Think you're a tough guy, huh?
Get him!
I'm a fake.
You lost.
Large illegal distribution of juicybars...
The toilets in Section 4 were attacked...
The Diaper Gang attacked...
Growing crimes by the Diapers...
Citizens, please stay calm.
We will poke out the axis of evil.
Useless idiots!
Wipe them all off this planet!
This situation is terribly...
I won't eat it!
I won't!
I'm not a shitmaker for you dwarves!
- We were annihilated.
- You idiot!
According to a recent report, a female in her 20s seems to be related to this case...
The Diaper Gang will rule this city soon.
Yesterday we were forgotten orphans.
But tomorrow we will stand up as remembered orphans!
Diapers!
Diapers!
Damn it!
I was a juicybar tycoon just the other day.
The Diapers are rich now that they have Beautiful, while we're homeless fugitives.
That bitch!
It's all her fault!
This sucks.
How dare you call her that!
Shut your trap!
Beautiful made you rich with all those juicybars.
Make me rich?
Screw you!
You see us with any juicybars now?
Then what the hell did you do when my Beautiful got caught?
You're the one who fainted after one punch!
I'm going.
Where are you going?
I'm going to save Beautiful.
What?
Hey, meathead!
Talk some sense!
Even the pigs can't beat them, so what the hell are you gonna do?
I'm going with or without you.
Cowards like you will always live off of snitching juicybars.
Hey!
You don't know what true love is!
Hey!
You stupid romantic.
You dumb Romeo!
We have a traitor among us.
Otherwise, it's impossible for the Diaper Gang to obliterate us like this.
Actually, since Geko was in charge of the Diaper Gang until now, we don't know their strategies.
No excuses!
Think we're weaker than those dwarfs?
We need another plan.
Doctor, long time no see.
I'll get straight to the point.
Can you revive Geko?
I created him, so it won't be so difficult.
But, I need a lot of corpses.
Very fresh ones.
If you can bring him back to life,
I'll bring you all the filth in Section 4.
I'm happy to hear that.
And one more.
Give me his corpse, too.
As you wish.
Damn it.
Wait, you!
You're that little shit!
What's up?
You little prick!
Don't you have anything better to do?
Go to school, shithead.
I was a juicybar tycoon just yesterday, damn it.
Tell me!
Tell me now!
Where's my Beautiful?
Who are you?
Where's Beautiful?
Tell me where Beautiful is!
You sons of bitches!
Shit!
My motorbike!
You assholes!
What the hell are you doing here?
Just passing by, bonehead.
Then keep going, you twirp.
Mind your own business, jackass.
You little turd.
Screw you and that pride of yours.
What, you little dwarf?
You son of a bitch.
You're the worst character in this movie!
Screw you, asshole!
My baby, daddy will do you good.
You're so adorable.
If you bring me the scientist who created Geko,
I will dispose of the Chief.
And I want the number two position in your gang.
It's yours.
But if you're thinking of betraying us or plan to do something stupid, then you'll suffer a pain worse than death.
If you don't kill the Chief, she'll kill me first.
You can be assured that I'll never betray you.
I'll be ready for you tonight.
Now do you feel like talking?
I don't know.
I don't.
Bastard must be high on juicybars.
How the hell do you not know where your home is?
Asshole!
I have no idea!
He's really not gonna talk.
This punk's pretty loyal.
We better just kill him.
No!
No!
Doctor, from now on you'll work for us.
Now even mutants come looking for me.
This will be quite a new thrill.
I'll go to any place that has fresh corpses.
Escort him out.
Escort, escort.
When will you dispose of the Chief?
No betrayer like you deserves to be in our gang.
When will you dispose of the Chief?
When will you dispose of the Chief?
When will you dispose of the Chief?
You raised a good assistant.
If you have the guts, come to the desert.
You despicable fool, how dare you betray me.
We can't find any traces of Dr. Strange.
HAIL THE DIAPER KING!
Damn it, it's boiling hot.
True love conquers everything.
My Beautiful.
Attack!
What the hell is that?
Did they already clash with the pigs?
That spells bad news for us.
This won't work.
We should think over our plan, and then come back.
We gotta finish what we started whether it kills us or not.
Stop trying to be a hero and let's just go back.
- You!
- You blockhead, go without me.
I don't wanna die.
Execution to all who are caught red-handed.
Geko, you lunatic!
It's dangerous!
Get out of here!
He's coming, he's coming.
Isn't that Beautiful?
Where?
He's coming, he's coming.
Damn it!
My head!
Long live the Diapers!
Juicybars!
Juicybars!
I told you we should've just gone back!
Then what about Beautiful?
Who's more important?
Me or Beautiful?
Beautiful.
Think you can kill me?
I'm afraid not.
I told you we should've just left!
But you go nuts over a chic!
Screw you!
Beautiful.
Stop talking crap!
Beautiful!
- Beautiful!
- Beautiful!
Hold on tight!
Hold her tight, idiot!
Beautiful's in danger!
Hurry!
Pull her in!
Do something!
Put more muscle into it!
No!
Beautiful!
Very interesting-Iooking specimens.
Geko passed the XX point, roger!
Okay, roger!
Hey!
Get it ready fast!
Fast!
Fast!
What the hell is this?
Untie me!
You crazy old bastard!
Screw you!
He's coming, roger.
What?
Coming?
Hey!
He's coming!
Here he comes!
Fire!
Stop acting like Paris Hilton!
I let you slide until now, but you've disrespected me.
I oughta slice your belly and yank out your chip.
Get ready to die!
Don't touch Beautiful.
You damn hoodlum, you're such a pain in the ass.
But no more games.
Hey!
I'm right over here!
Srew you!
No!
Die, please!
Die!
- You...
- Wait, that's...
Jimmy the freak?
When did you start working for the pigs?
But I killed you with my bare hands.
Let go!
Let go, you filthy bastard!
Die!
Die!
You son of a bitch!
What the hell?
No!
You worthless hoodlum.
Stop, you blue asshole!
You belong down there.
You son of a bitch!
Beautiful.
- You bastard!
- Beautiful.
Beautiful!
Come back here!
Save the world like you said you would.
Die!
Hey, it stopped.
How dare you.
Around and around we go!
Die!
Cut!
Cut!
Cut!
You sluts!
I told you not to do it that way!
How many times do I have to tell you!
You are charged for interfering with police duties, for organizing an illegal clan, and for murdering a policeman.
Whether dead or alive, you're coming with me.
Beautiful!
More!
Stretch a bit more!
Oh no, what is this?
You filthy bastard.
Nothing went right whenever you showed up.
I didn't do anything!
I swear!
Idiot!
Please do something about this!
I don't want to die!
I hate you!
Beautiful!
Try harder!
Do something fast!
Stretch out a bit more!
I can't anymore!
Stretch more!
Damn it!
I can't anymore.
- More!
- I can't!
I can't!
A little bit more!
I can't stand it anymore!
Be patient, sweetheart.
I'll find you one soon.
Let's find you the right toilet, so you can let out a big load!
What are you so happy about?
We're millionaires now!
Did you say "we"?
Who's "we"?
Who's "we"?
We're business partners of course!
Who asked you to be my partner?
In business, logistics is more important than production.
Got to know your stuff.
That big mouth never shuts up.
Anyway, your share is one-fifth.
Stop talking and let's jet out of here.
If you take a dump on the road, it's a huge loss.
My shit is supporting you guys.
Better be grateful.
Let's go to the city and run it dry!
SO LONG!
I'm going to have fun with this new friend.
RYU Seung-Bum, YIM Chang-Jeong, HYUN Young, SHIN Hyae-Chul executive producer KIM Seung-Bum directed by JOE Bum-Jin screenplay by JUNG Hye-Won, KANG Sang-Kyun producer KIM Sun-Ku
- CG two, this is dispatch.
What's your status.
-20 klicks to the drop zone.
Hot as hell out here.
Looks like smooth sailing.
Over.
- Copy that, CG two.
The goose is loose.
- Oh, wish these things had bigger seats.
- Juicypops!
They're coming!
They're coming!
- They're coming!
- Oh shit.
Where the hell did they come from?
- Keep back, you little garden gnome.
- Juicypops!
- And you're dead.
That dude just got a motorcycle up his butt.
- Wheelie time!
- That was stupid.
I say weave around, like a snake.
Aachi and Ssipak!
- We are pooping in a pot, we all love to poop a lot.
The Diaper Gang's latest hijacking is foiled by
Shiball City Police.
- This department is committed to tackling the Diaper Gang problem once and for all.
- Have you been pooping for your country?
- I can't go when people are watching.
- Drink Flogurt, the laxative of patriots.
- Did, you chode.
Did you even count these?
We're two short.
- Uh, you know I can't count.
Are you just pretending to count?
- Yes.
- Ha.
Did you even graduate from kindergarten?
Baby can't count, baby doesn't get a share.
- Yeah right.
I can count to seven.
- You gotta take it easy.
You think you can count to seven?
Prove it.
If you can count to seven, I won't shoot you in the face.
- Listen to this, fucker.
1, 2, 90, 3.
I-I'm running out of numbers here.
7-
So I'm gonna through you against this wall.
Let's go steal some more Juicypops.
- You knocked my shoes off!
- Ha ha ha.
Look at these cretins.
Turd burglars.
Trying to keep their poo to themselves.
Selfish.
They'll be the death of our great society.
Wouldn't you agree, Captain?
- Uh.
Uh, ye--
Uh, yes.
It's, uh, dangerous to keep it inside of you when--
- You shit.
We were once a noble people, and delivered our turds to the city with pride in return for our precious Juicybars.
But were we appreciated?
No.
Because when we became addicted to the Juicybars, we changed into freaks!
We were flushed out.
Abandoned.
And now we can't even defecate.
But now we are free.
Free from a system that gives us shit for taking our crap!
Their number two makes us number one!
- Number two!
Number two!
Number two!
Woo woo!
- But now we are all up shit creek.
We haven't had one Juicybar in a month.
You know why?
The police forces?
No!
It's because you little dingleberries can't even take out one god damn cop!
Stand up.
This is your last chance.
Where can we find the Juicybars?
- W-we can m-make them out of, uh, juice?
Wrong!
You die!
- Uh, w-we could try ourselves and poop in toilets for us to make the Juicybars.
- Do you want all our brothers to die?
Do you want us to starve?
- Yeah!
Wait, no.
Ha ha ha ha.
- We could, uh--
Uh, invest in stocks and bonds, and make a lot of money, and--
- I heard two guys are stealing Juicybars in Section 4.
Please don't kill me!
- Hm.
Aachi and Ssipak.
- All right, hit and run.
And a-one, and a-two, and a-headbump!
Surprise!
It's tear gas.
Dude, what are you doing?
Kick down the door, dude.
Your Juicypop is being delivered.
- No hard feelings, man.
Especially for you.
What did you eat?
Juicybar delivered.
EnJ'0Y-
- You need to eat more fiber.
Oh man, that smells like a baby dook.
Phew!
- Suck gas, bitches.
- Whew.
- Na-na-na-na na-na-na-na, Gasman!
- Dude, stop fucking around.
- Gasman!
- Gas ain't cheap, you know.
Man, this stuff smells almost as bad as you do.
- Do the crazy moves, like cool guy.
But I'm not.
- Fuck off.
- Dude, run!
- Hey guys, what's up?
- It's too hot for this.
- You guys ready to talk yet?
- I don't think he is.
- You guys got a lot of Juicies, huh?
You must've been knee-deep in shit.
Too bad you're on our turf.
Our boss gets a cut of everything stolen here, or didn't you get the memo?
- Hey-
- What?
- Wanna see a trick?
Got your penis.
- Very funny, Mr. Clean.
- Argh, that's just unnecessary, man.
- Oh, there's so much blood in my head.
- Listen up, rice ball, unless you want me to turn your tongue into sushi, bring the boss 100 Juicies a day.
Man, you got cavities.
Now get to work and grow some hair.
- Bring them to our office, Shiball City Prison.
You got 'til sundown, fudgepackers.
- Let's go.
Oh, Jimmy says hi.
You can thank him for all those broken teeth.
- Ugh.
Jimmy.
- BM stands for Big Money!
We're given the citizen who excretes the most a defecation vacation at a luxury resort.
The complete package includes VIP services, comp buffets, and butt massages, and these lovely ladies!
- I love to poop!
- Ooh yeah.
You like that?
- Yes.
- You like that?
'Yes!
- You like that?
- Cut.
Cut!
- Huh?
- What do you think this is?
Some cheap, amateur, internet porn?
I No.
This is a pornographic expeﬂence.
Imagine his dick as a Juicypop.
The story is about a girl who sacrifices her anus to save the world.
They'll call it the greatest film ever created by the hands of mankind.
I'm so pa--
Bullshit!
Jimmy.
Jimmy!
'W ha'?
- Jimmy, wake up!
Hey, remember us?
- You sold us out.
Dr. Strange made mincemeat out of another prison guard today.
- That sick old scientist.
If he hadn't created our special cyborg agent, I'd have him cooked by now.
Put him in solitary so he can't play Doctor
Frankenstein, and report that there have been no incidents.
- Yes ma'am.
- Geko.
Excellent work today with the diaper.
- My report, 99 kills, no survivors.
Now these back, nerd.
- Aren't robots supposed to have manners?
- Every citizen of Shiball City's implanted with an anal ring at birth, which monitors how much and how often you defecate.
In return for your turds, you will receive delicious and life sustaining Juicypops for a long and happy life.
Removing the ring is punishable by death.
- Tape recorder, purple pickle, old shirts.
Man, I thought my room had some weird stuff in it.
- Dude, he's really fucked up.
Then stop wasting Juicies on him.
- Look at this.
His eyelids are so stretchy.
- All right, my turn.
Do I look like a bitch to you?
Old friend, you're in a lot of shit, man.
Shit, man.
Shit, man.
Shit man.
Shit man.
Shit man.
- Yes.
I am Shitman!
- This underwear really hurts my balls.
- My junk is twisted up like a rattlesnake!
- One, two.
Ah!
Wh a?
Whoa!
- Oh man, he really stuck that landing.
Let's take him to a taller building.
- As much as I'd love to make asphalt guacamole out of him, we need him for something else.
Come on.
- What the who?
- Maybe the sewer's on its period.
- How much further?
- Uh,.
- The mob is hiding out in the prison.
That's pretty god damn ironic if I say so myself, right guys?
- All right, lights out.
- They keep raping us in here.
- Quiet down or I'm gonna rape you.
- Only the boss can take his shoes off.
80 Juicybars from Razor gang in Section 3.
-80 Juicybars from Razor gang in Section 3.
-25 Juicybars from the Cobra gang in Section 4.
-25 Juicybars from the Cobra gang in Section 4.
- Only 25 bars?
They're either lazy or they got tighter ass holes than a frog.
- I'll let them know to loosen up.
- Wake up then, lady.
See who it is.
- Got a visitor, man.
- Ooh, she pretty.
Let her in.
- Oh my god.
What a beauty
-What?
She's a he.
He's a she.
- What?
- Huh?
Jimmy, is that you?
- Huh?
- Are you out of your mind?
- What are you gonna do?
Charge me for smoking?
- Jimmy, no.
- Get him out of here.
- You're in for it now, pretty lady.
I'm gonna put this sharp thing way into your guts and stuff.
You're gonna bleed until you die!
- Oh my god, we should win an award for this.
Hey lady, time to bust a cap.
Break his knees.
Break his knees.
Break his knees!
- Huh?
Break his knees.
- We're climbing up a ladder.
- Ugh.
- We're climbing up a ladder!
- You freak.
I'm gonna cut you and make every day a victory!
- This is awesome.
- You just threw me out the window.
- Yeah, cause you're so ugly.
- How dare you?
- Now you're ugly and dead.
Don't worry, you'll heal up just fine.
- What are you kids looking at?
- Kids?
Hey, who you calling kids, grandma?
- Are you Miss Beautiful?
I loved you in Paranormal Asstivity, 1 and 3!
- Ssipakg
Come back here, you stupid horndog dick for brains!
We got a job to finish!
God damn!
- Show that crazy bitch, or bastard, or-- right now!
- Huh?
Wh a?
- Huh?
Huh?
What's going on?
Who's playing ping pong.
- Round up all the Juicybars.
- Where am I?
What 'the--
Aliens?
Game over, man.
Game over!
Alien queen, get away from her, you bitch!
Brotality.
- Uh oh.
- There are so many good ways to kill you.
- Please!
No!
I'll do anything!
I was drugged!
- Aw, boo goo.
- When movie becomes a hit, I can pay you anything.
- Movie?
- Yeah.
When "The Heroine" goes number two, hundreds of Juicybars come flying out.
It's gonna be a movie gold!
Hundreds of Juicybars with one dook?
How is that possible?
- W-well, I-it's just a movie, you know, a--
- Bullshit!
Tell me how it works.
Tell me, or else you die.
- M-m-my movie's about Joan of Arc, you know, and-- and-- a-and-- and--
- Spit it out!
- Well, t-these scientists travel back in time and find her, t-take out her anus chip, and reprogram it so that every poop counts as 10,000 poops.
A-and then they put it back in her butt, and when she poops, 10,000 Juicybars come gushing out as her reward.
S-so, you see, the people revere her as a god because she has a magic anus!
-10,000 Juicybars.
That's a terrible idea for a movie, but an awesome idea for us.
- Dude, I don't know why you keep following this girl.
She's way hotter than you.
- Shut up, man.
Actors wanted for period drama.
Role requires great emotional depth and willingness to poo on camera?
So, they poo on the camera?
- Ah, Jimmy.
Why won't you die?
He's like a cockroach.
- Dude, let's go beat him up in front of Beautiful so she can check out all my huge muscles and stuff.
OK.
So, this is Joan of Arc, and she was born to save the world, OK?
A-and she..
And she's really pretty.
Then, a hunky time traveller shows up wearing pants, and he says Joan of Arc.
Show me your butt.
There's something wrong with it.
B-but--
But then Joan of Arc gets really angry, and she kicks him in the balls.
But then God shows up-- th-that's me-- and says, Joan of Arc, your old butt chip is defective, but with this new butt chip, if you poop, you'll get tons of Juicybars, and it
will be sweet!
That's stupid.
It doesn't even make sense.
How about a woman who saves a man with her titties?
A rich man.
- This is my move.
- Well, I like it.
- Look.
N-now this is a high quality film.
With class.
We can't have boobs shaking around.
Just butts.
Junk in the trunk, as they say.
- Why do I care about butts when I've got boobs like these?
Make it about tits, OK?
- Oh, no, you put that front butt away.
You wouldn't know a good film if you had sex with it.
Well, you would know good sex if it had sex with you.
Ciao.
- Rock, paper, scissors.
Yeah.
Bend over, asshole.
You'll never bag a girl like Beautiful.
The problem is, she thinks she's hot, spicy shit, and to her, guys like you are just plain, lukewarm, shit.
You'll need a butt load of money to change that.
Yeah right.
My shit's on fire.
- Woo hoo hoo hoo.
Not a bad show in there.
- Oh my god, she's so naked.
Naked?
W-what?
Dude.
Let me see.
- No way.
We Rock, Paper, Scissor'd.
- Hm.
Looks pretty small.
You sure she can crap big?
- Oh, she's full of it.
She can shit like 10 times a day, no problem.
Here, watch this.
We're gonna be drowning in poop.
- Beautiful!
- Oh my god, I think you broke my lumbar support.
- Jimmy is dead.
So dead.
- What are you doing?
I'm calling my manager.
- OK.
_Hey guys.
Uh, run!
Ow, my butt hurts.
I wonder why.
- Hey, you guys part of that little blue man group?
- No way.
Do we look like midgets to you?
Hell no.
We were just walking by.
- Perverts.
- You sure know how to pick them, you douche.
- Weirdos.
They better not have a hidden camera in here.
Damn it.
You must be constipated.
- Yes.
You think that will work?
- No.
For constipation, Goldlax and Silverlax!
Shut up!
- She's not just a bitch.
She's a noisy bitch.
I say we just throw her back to the diapers.
- I think she likes me.
- All right, Romeo, but if we keep her, I get her Juicybars when she's done.
Successful defecation.
Juicybar delivery in progress.
Your Juicybar is being delivered.
Your Juicybar is being--
Error.
Your error is being Juicy.
Oh Shit!
- Oh man, something's wrong.
Uh, we have a code Brown in Sector 4.
All units in Sector 4 respond, or whatever.
- I've never seen so many Juicypops before.
What did that pervert director do to my butt?
- She's so pretty, beautiful, and hot.
Her tits.
They're pretty-
- So that's why the Diaper gang wanted her.
One dump and she gets tons of Juicybars.
I get tons of Juicybars.
I'm gonna be rich!
- Climb.
Climb.
Climb.
Climb.
Climb.
Climb.
Climb.
Climb.
Climb.
- Hey, baby what you need is a manager, someone to deal with all those Juicybars.
- Is this guy bothering you?
Because I can be your bodyguard.
And your lover?
- Hey-
This trip's for business, not pleasure, man.
- Some bodyguard.
You ran away from baby people.
- I was just getting my bike ready for the getaway.
- Get them!
Get them!
- More garden gnomes.
Run!
- Well, I-it's getting late, a-and I just ratted out my friends again, and-- a-and this thong is chafing my num nums.
You know, maybe it's time you let me go home, Your Blueness.
- Stab you in the eye.
'Ya!
Hiya, ya. ya!
Hiya!
- I got so many student loans.
Hey Diapers, keep the change!
- You got bullets in all my fish!
- I wonder what this lever does.
Fish!
- This is Sidecar patrol.
The apartment's empty.
No signs of life on the street.
Oh shit.
The Diapers.
- Save your bullets!
Find the girl.
- Where are we?
- What are you looking at me for?
Look at them!
We found this guy at the scene.
He's super dead, and his name was Jimmy, presumably killed by the Diaper gang-
I guess he used to be a porn director, but did a lot of crime stuff to.
These two retards were also at the crime scene.
We thought they were homeless, but are actually low-grade crooks, and if anyone knows about the Juicybar error in
Sector 4, it's probably them, even though they are retarded.
- Get to the point!
How did they get all those Juicybars out?
- Uh, well, uh we have no leads.
'Shut
Mobilize everyone!
Bring them to me now.
- Found her.
- We found her!
At the apartment we raided, we located this suspect,
Beautiful, who we believe the Diaper gang were after.
The Diaper gang cannot poop, so their need for Juicybars makes them a prime suspect.
If we capture Beautiful, we might be able to finally crack this case for good.
The SWAT team is standing by to track any large Juicybar deposits.
- Get to the point!
Will you catch her or not?
- I will try my best, of course.
If course you will, or you will die.
- You listen to me, sonny friend.
You're talking to the brand new Aachi, and now Aachi's got a watchie, and some necklaces, and a whole mess of customers waiting to buy my Juicypops.
Aw, but I guess if you want some, you can sneak in through the back door so you don't embarrass me, with an old man or whatever.
Beautiful, we got a new customer coming in.
Why don't you pinch out some more money loafs?
- Moron.
Next one's going on your head.
- What did you say?
What did you call me?
A Mormon?
Shit.
All units drive like crazy to Sector 6.
- Just rough them up a little.
And remember, my share is 75%.
- Ready?
Let's go.
- I got so many bullets for them to eat.
Let's go talk shit.
- Look at this guy.
Bald and beautiful.
That's what they say, right?
- Shut up, Ssipak.
- What the hell, man?
I told him to use the back door.
Front door's for strippers!
- Freeze!
- They're here for Beautiful!
- Up on a limb, hands in the air, jump to your death.
- Who do you think you are?
- Where's the girl?
- Which one are you talking about?
I got too many girls to count.
- Repel.
Repel.
Repel.
Repel.
Repel.
- You'll be OK, sweetheart.
- Damn it.
Don't you know who I am?
Wait, wait, wait, wait, wait!
Let's make a deal.
You like, uh, bribes?
I give up.
She's in the bathroom.
- Raid the bathroom!
- Oh geez.
- Back.
Back, back, back.
- Huh?
Who the hell are you?
- Fuck this.
God damn this pirate leg.
What are you waiting for?
Move it.
Diapers?
They ruined my leg!
Arghg
_My mori€Y-
My money!
- Oh.
Did I just fart?
Yeah, I just farted.
- We're dying in here.
- What are you doing?
Get in there and fight!
- Get down!
- Nobody move.
I have grenades!
- Oh shit.
- Aachi!
- It burns!
Brain trauma.
Huh?
- There they are!
Arrest them.
- Oh shit, more Diapers!
- Two, three, four.
Kill.
Murder.
Headshot.
Miss.
Double kill.
Combo.
I wish I never met you two idiots.
Don't say that, sweet pea.
You are my life now.
- You're a terrible driver.
- You're still alive?
Where did you go?
- Aw, damn it.
- Oh shit.
Diapers!
- Butt munch, you led them right to us.
- No I didn't.
They're the ones who followed me.
- You--
- Yeah, ass crab.
- Why are we riding up these stairs?
- I don't know.
We really should be riding on the road!
Oh screw.
We're fucked.
- You're my bodyguards.
Do something!
I'll save everyone.
- Oh, we're sitting in deep doo doo, dude.
They're after her butt.
- Seize them!
- Ssipak.
- Aachi.
- Ssipak.
- Help!
Help-
Help!
Let me go, you cyborg dildo.
- Rock, paper, cyborg.
- Yeah.
Get him.
Twist the leg.
Twist the leg.
Punch him in the mouth.
Shit.
Uh, my motorcycle's getting wet.
- Rah!
- Ugh, get off me.
Go!
Ah!
You lose!
- Chaos in Shiball City as the Diapers run rampant.
Toilets in every sector are under attack.
Police are overwhelmed by the diapers.
- We urge all citizens to continue their civic duties in their homes.
- They're just sweeping through the city like bees!
- You're pathetic, getting whipped by baby gnomes.
- Shit currently is crazy.
- Stop, I can't crap anymore.
Please not the dog food.
I poo better with cat food.
- Giddy up!
- Porn actress Beautiful has been spotted with the diapers.
Is she their new queen?
- Where are your previous Juicybars now?
You've been shitting on us for years, and now we're gonna shit on you!
- Shit on you.
Shit on you.
Shit on you.
God damn it!
I was on top of the world, and now look at us.
We're just on top of a building.
We're nothing without Beautiful.
That bitch!
It's all her fault, though.
This sucks.
- You don't talk about Beautiful that way.
She's perfect, and the only reason we had anything is because of her magical butt.
- Magical butt?
The only thing she poops out anymore is trouble.
- Yeah?
And what did you ever do for us?
You suck.
- You suck at everything, and you're stupid.
- I'm going.
- What?
Where are you going?
- To save Beautiful.
- What?
I told you, you really are stupid.
The cops couldn't beat the Diapers.
What the hell are you gonna do?
- I'm going to beat them up myself, with or without you, with both hands if I have to.
And even if they keep coming, I'm not gonna stop.
- What?
+j
I realize what I said, but, uh, I'm gonna keep going with it.
Sh-Shut up.
- You dumb romantic!
You can't beat off the whole world!
Yes I can!
- There seems to be a traitor among us, because now we suck at fighting Diaper Babies!
- It's my duty to inform you that anyone not wearing sunglasses is a traitor.
As you can see, I've got two pair on my face.
'Enough!
Anyone can wear sunglasses.
You could all be traitors!
I think it's time to implement PLR, Plan Last Resort.
- I'm so dizzy.
- Doctor, you look dizzy.
Have you been spinning or drinking?
- I've been spinning.
You just saw me.
I suppose you want me to fix the robot.
If you bring him back to life, there will be no more spinning.
I promise.
I'm happy and also, bring me beer, woman.
As you wish, Doctor.
As you wish.
- Here we go.
Right.
Remember the plan.
Aachi kicks down the door.
I don't need Ssipak to steal these Juicypops.
He can beat off people all he wants, but he's not gonna beat off me.
- Occupied.
Occupado.
Busy in here.
- One, two, three, shuttle kick.
- What the?
You?
You're that little turd burglar!
- What's that?
- Me too.
- Nice hair, Goku.
Have a good night--
- You look like an elf.
- Where's your bald friend now?
Where is she?
Where did you creeps take her?
Tell me where my Beautiful is, or I'll pop your head like a balloon.
- Who are you?
- Where's Beautiful?
Tell me where my love boat has sailed.
- Eat motorcycle!
No!
My bike!
What am I supposed to drive chicks around in now?
- Aachi, what the hell are you doing here?
- Letting you apologize.
- Not until I beat up all these midgets.
- Do you realize how that sounds?
- Like I'm buff as hell.
- Really?
'Cause it sounds like you're gay as hell.
- Least I'm trying to save Beautiful.
- By beating people off?
- Shut up or I'll beat you off.
- Hoo hoo hoo.
I love building robots, all day long.
Even more than spinning.
- If you bring the scientist who created your cyborg, I'll kill the police chief.
- And I want a super awesome looking Hang glider.
- It's yours, but if you're planning on betraying me, I will betray you first, and by betray, I mean murder the shit out of you.
That's how I betray people.
- That sounds terrible.
I will never betray you.
And I really Can't wait for that hang glider.
I'll be ready for you tonight.
- Now do you feel like talking?
Hm hm?
- I peed in all your clothes.
- Where's your hideout?
Tell me, or I'll use bleach next time, and it's gonna burn so bad.
- I know nothing.
I am God.
- He's not gonna talk.
I think he pooped his pants.
- They got these Diapers trained good.
What do you say we just kill him.
'No!
No,no,no,no!
- Doctor.
From now on, you work for me.
- Working for the mutants, eh?
Well, the robot's already done.
Heh.
Sure, as long as you don't spin me.
- Go spin him.
- Spin.
Spin.
Spin.
Spin.
- When will you kill the chief?
- I wanted the pleasure of killing you, and now I have it.
- When will you kill the chief?
When will you kill the chief?
When will you kill the chief?
Even your own men want you dead.
If you want to find us, come to the desert.
- How dare you betray me before I betray you?
- Ma'am.
Ma'am, we can't find the doctor.
- Argh, I think my eyeballs are boiling.
- She's nearby.
My boner's a divining rod.
That's gross, man.
- Attack!
- Oh shit, World War IV.
The cops and the Diapers are going at it.
Dude, we are gonna die.
We should leave, like, right now.
Screw Juicybars.
I wanna live.
- You're being a puss.
The love of my life is down there.
I'm not leaving without her.
- Don't be a hero.
You'll get us both killed.
No!
No, do it yourself.
I don't wanna die.
- Now deploying inflatable torpedo.
- Geko, you fool, you'll kill us all.
- Get out of here!
Get out of here!
- Shit!
- What the fuck?
- Ow, my brain.
- Group hug!
- He's so fast!
This is a really weird wrestling match.
- How about we just give up?
- OK.
Dude, I really hope there's not a mine cart coming up.
- Me too!
- What?
So ironic!
- I hate mine carts!
Actually, this is kinda fun!
- Think you can take me alive?
Over my dead body.
Arghg
All this for a girl?
No wonder I'm single!
- Shut up.
Huh?
Beautiful?
- Would you stop talking crap?
- Beautiful!
Grab my hand!
Hold on.
- Whoa.
Hurry, pull her in.
We gotta pull your fat ass in first!
How have we not pulled her in yet?
She's like all the way in the cart.
- Do something!
'No!
Beautiful!
- Ooh hoo.
Welcome to the party.
- Robot's coming over.
Get ready!
- Roger over.
Get ready!
- Since we're about to die, I just wanted to tell you, I think Beautiful's hot!
- Me too.
- Robot's coming!
- Coming?
- Ready!
You've been a butt slut!
I've been patient until now, but we've run out of time.
I need that ring out of your sweet ass, so I can have all the Juicybars to myself!
- Don't touch her.
- That ring is mine, you burn victim.
But first, you die!
Arghg
- Oh, man, weird.
Who threw that?
- What?
No.
Die, little monster!
Die!
- You.
- Ssipak, isn't that--
- Jimmy.
Jimmy's a robot cop?
- I killed you with my bare hands.
Let go!
You filthy bastard!
Why won't you die?
- Piece of shit.
What the hell?
'No!
- Later, gator.
- Get back here, you big, blue asshole!
- Boo'.!
Well, that was easy.
- Huh?
- Come fight me like a man, bitch!
- Beautiful.
Beautiful!
- Get over here .
- All right, shit man.
Time to save the world.
- Take that!
- Hey, the elevator stopped.
That was lucky.
- Very fiesty.
You like it rough?
Me too!
I am your master.
Say it!
- This song rules.
- We're not making cheap hotel porn here.
I told you guys to do it right!
You're charged with unlawful assembly, conspiracy, and assassination.
Dead or alive, you're coming with me.
- Whoa!
- Whoa.
- Whoa!
.HelP-
Help!
Help!
He--
- Beautiful.
Just a little bit further.
- Where am I?
what is this?
- You idiot.
You'll kill us both!
- Ow!
I didn't do anything.
I swear!
Please, get it off!
I just came back to life.
I don't wanna die.
- I hate you!
- Beautiful, you can do it.
- Dude, I can't hold on.
You have to.
- I can't.
- Damn it!
- Save yourselves.
- I won't let you go.
I love you.
- I love you too.
I have to find a stop.
- Be patient, baby.
We're almost there.
- Yeah.
We gotta find you a real toilet for that million dollar ass.
- What are you so happy about?
- There's no competition left.
Whole city's ours now.
Ha ha.
- Ours, huh?
- That's right, ours.
My brains, Ssipak's peas, and your ass.
- Who asked you to be my partner?
- Well, you need a manager, right?
Big city, lots of money.
Someone to deal with your business.
Ha. get it?
- Dude, you tell the shittiest jokes.
- Standard management fee is 10%.
- I can live with that.
Let's get you to a toiler.
Don't wanna be losing steaming piles of money on the side of the road!
Hey, my butts
Supporting you lazy bums.
You've gotta treat it with respect.
You must treat all butts with respect.
This song rules.
STUDIO 2.0 presents
In association with OCN KOCCA, and KTB Network a J TEAM Studio production
The world has run out of all forms of energy.
people built a new city by making a new energy with their excrements.
Soon after the city's leaders announced two legislations to generate and control the new energy.
First, installing an ID chip in each of the citizen 's anus to monitor their defecation level.
Second, provide defecating citizens in return one addictive "juicybar".
Later, defecation amounts have skyrocketed, but the city became full of addicts due to the juicybar's strong addiction.
llIegaI trade of juicybars became prevalent, and the juicybar's side effects have created dumb pint-sized mutants.
These mutants organized a gang to plunder juicybars.
They became known as the 'Diaper Gang'.
They're coming.
They're coming.
Hey, they're coming!
They're coming.
They're coming.
They're going.
They're going.
They're coming.
They're coming.
Outta my way!
Hey slowpoke, think you're faster?
You betcha!
Hey!
Bald bastard.
AACHI SSIPAK
We are the forgotten orphans.
We once dedicated our crap and youth to this city.
But what did our leaders do for us?
Did they appreciate us for our crap?
Never!
We became addicted to juicybars, so we can never shit or even reproduce because our dicks have shrunk like peanuts.
Then they ran us out of this city like garbage!
Why?
Because we've evolved into mutants, liberating ourselves from having to shit all the time!
Diapers!
Diapers!
Nonetheless, we're in shitcreek now.
Juicybars is our only source of food, but we haven't had any for a month.
And why is this?
Because of that special cop, Geko?
No.
It's because a whole bunch of you piss-ass dumb shits can't even blow away one fuckin' cop!
Stand up!
This is your last chance to redeem yourselves.
Tell me where we can find juicybars for our hungry brothers.
Kindergarten defecation classes.
Where were you before?
A kindergarten defecation class.
A juicybar factory?
No, a juicybar market?
No, how about...
You freaks don't deserve to be called gangsters.
Know what punks like you are called?
I know!
Hoodlums!
Yes, hoodlums!
What?
I mean, these hoodlums...
A lot of hoodlums are dealing juicybars in Section 4.
Hoodlums, you say...
You bonehead!
There's only eighteen in here, not twenty!
You swiped two, didn't you?
Count it yourself, idiot!
You hopeless chimp.
You won't get your cut unless you get two more.
And no chick as well.
Got it?
You twirp!
Why am I always doing the dirty work?
Hey, you get the easy way out.
I always risk my life being on the lookout.
Go and get some more.
We need to make up for it.
You little piss ant!
Then every chick we find tonight are mine.
And if you cheat me again and take off, you're really gonna pay this time.
Damn it, that hurt!
Stupid mutt!
Today the police scored big again for mopping up the Diaper Gang.
We will rigidly tackle any insincere defecation!
Have any problems defecating?
Well, I'm constipated.
Drink!
Dump-free Yogurt!
FLUSH IT ALL DOWN!
Now get ready, gear up and...
Headbump!
One, two, givin' it to ya'.
Don't get too wasted now.
Stop showing off and do some kickin'!
Here comes daddy!
Your juicybar is being prepared.
Sorry to disturb.
Man!
That's one hell of a dump!
Juicybar delivery complete.
Smells damn good, too!
The way kids shit these days is so impolite.
He's such a hopeless case.
His damn showing off gives me the runs.
abio, showing off here is useless.
We're in the can.
Screw off.
Run!
It's too damn hot for this crap.
Let's go.
You little punks.
You assholes swiped a ton of juicybars in Section 4.
Think you're big shots?
You cheating scums.
There's taxes on what you made.
What?
Bastard got some balls!
You little shit, stop being a wus again.
Look here, cue ball.
Unless you want me to make sushi out of your tongue, bring me 100 juicybars a day.
Damn, you got cavaties.
Be a good boy!
And grow some damn hair!
You know my boss's cell in prison, right?
Hand the juicybars over to him.
Let's go!
Oh yeah, Jimmy says hi.
You got a really good friend!
Ciao!
Jimmy, you son of a bitch.
John Doe is this month's "King of Defecation".
If you become the "King", you'll receive unlimited VIP service with beautiful girls at a luxurious resort.
Try your best to defecate, and be the "King of Defecation ".
You can be the "King", too!
Foul bastards.
How dare they stuff things into the sacred anus.
Those beasts are the real traitors of our establishment.
They're evil to our society.
Don't you think, Captain?
Chief, so you mean...
They're illegal anus users?
- Like this, bitch?
- Harder!
- Like this?
- Harder!
- Like this?
- Harder!
- Like this?
- Harder!
Cut!
Cut!
Cut!
You idiots, get it right for once!
How many times I gotta tell you?
Think we're shooting a cheap porn?
You sluts.
Each whip should be the sublime.
A girl who sacrifices her anus to save the world.
Oh how beautiful she is.
Once this film is complete, it will be praised by critics and moviegoers, and be a world-wide success!
Oh my Lord, how art thou I be this talented?
Bullshit!
Hey asslover, you're in deep trouble!
You freak!
Dr. Strange sawed another guard into pieces again in prison.
That crazy old fart.
He'd be cooked on the electric chair if he hadn't created our cyborg.
Move him into the special cell so that he can't touch anyone.
And report that he's cooperating very well with us.
Yes, ma'am.
Geko, good work and...
My report for today.
99 kills and no arrests.
That despicable cyborg, how rude.
ANAL INSTICT
SM MIZERY
HORNY ALIENS
You freak, what's with your room?
Don't you have anything kinky?
He's totally high, man.
Don't sweat it, dude.
Keep stuffing his face.
Look at him.
I'm telling you, he's toasted.
Okay, okay.
You like feeling high, you pervert?
From now on, you're Shitman.
Shitman.
Shitman.
Shitman.
Shitman.
Yes!
I am!
Shitman!
Shitman, shall we save the world now?
Here comes Shitman to bring peace to the fuckin' world!
That was so cool.
Let's take him to a higher place this time.
Then he'll croak for sure, you meathead.
We need him for something else.
What the hell is this?
Pigeon poo?
Is this the right way?
Yes, sir!
I'm positive this is the way to Section 4's prison.
Oh, how corrupt the world is.
A prison is a hideout for hoodlums?
I'm bored!
Give me a vacation!
Who stole my Teddy Bear?
This sucks!
The world's too corrupt for good citizens like me.
80 juicybars from the Razor Gang in Section 3.
80 juicybars from the Razor Gang in Section 3.
25 juicybars from the Cobra Gang in Section 4.
25 juicybars from the Cobra Gang in Section 4.
A measly 25 juicybars?
The Cobras seem to be out of heart lately.
Yes, they do.
I'll break your balls if you sleep on the job again!
Someone's here to see you.
What does he want to snitch this time?
- What the hell?
- What's that?
Why are you stripping?
How dare you, you looney!
What are you going to do?
Charge me for smoking?
What's gotten into his head?
Of course it's prohibited, you freak!
Who the hell do you think you are?
That freak turned out to be a useful friend.
Hey lady, time for the 'Misery' version.
Misery.
Misery.
Misery.
Misery.
Misery.
Misery...
One, two, one, two.
Misery...
One, two, one, two.
You freak!
I'm gonna slice you in half!
Write it again!
Write it again!
Write it again!
Write it again!
Didn't I warn you not to kill Misery without my permission!
This is much better than the movie.
If you won't give it up, then don't hit me at least!
Crap, it's my first erection in three years.
You pervert.
How dare you hit your director!
Director, my ass.
You crazy bitch!
You call an animator a real director?
Yes, I do.
What a bummer.
Hey, kid!
What are you looking at?
Who are you calling "kid"?
You rude bitch!
Isn't she totally hot?
Damn horndog is at it again!
Peabrain!
We have to finish the job first!
You horny bastard!
Diapers, diapers, diapers.
Die, you mushroom head!
Shoot that crazy bitch!
I mean that crazy asshole right now!
Absent-minded myself.
What's this red crap?
Is the ceiling taking a shit?
What the hell are all these diapers?
Is this some kindergarten?
Let's go if it's all done.
Go, go, go!
One, two, one, two!
One, two, one, two!
Go, go, go!
Where am I?
Aliens?
Then that means...
Then that means...
Come to mama!
You evil beasts!
Alien Queen!
Give me my baby back!
Come on, bitch!
Oh no.
How can I give you a slow and painful death...
I don't know why I did that, but...
I'll compensate you with juicybars.
Do you have any juicybars?
Well, I don't have any now, but if my movie becomes a big hit.
Movie?
Yes.
When my heroine takes a dump, juicybars come gushing out.
Doesn't it sound like a hit?
Juicybars gush out with just one dump?
How is that possible?
It happens only in a fictional world.
Stop bullshitting!
Just tell me how.
Or else, you'll die in the real world!
Right, I mean my movie is about a holy sacrifice.
I mean in order to enlighten her...
God digs out this corruptive chip from her anus.
Yes, digs out.
Then, he sticks a blessed chip back in there, so...
So whenever she shits, tons of juicybars gush out.
In other words...
Yes!
It becomes a magical anus!
A magical anus...
So he digs it out and sticks it in?
You've been implanted with an ID chip at your birth.
This is your soul mate to supply you with precious juicybars for a plentiful life.
This ID chip in your anus is your second identity.
Why didn't I think about this before?
Since you gave me this great idea,
I'll put these chips into your rear with honor.
But...
I don't shit very well.
Nobody here can shit better than you.
I'm extremely constipated, and I even have hemorrhoids.
Sorry, I do a lot of things with my butt.
Gross.
Drop him.
Wait!
Wait!
I'm gonna have an audition for a girl who's good at shitting.
Wait!
Please don't kill me.
If you don't kill me,
I'll stick those chips into a girl who can shit several times a day.
I beg you!
There she is.
She's going.
"Wanted ASAP"
"Excellent defecation skills"
"Need actress with experienced anus"
"Jimmy's Pure Cinema"
Jimmy, that tough cockroach.
He's still alive.
Hey, let's beat the hell out of Jimmy in front of Beautiful.
If I show her how strong I am,
I'll sweep her off her feet.
So Jean D'Arc is this lady who was born to save the world.
But one day a juicybar tycoon shows up.
May the anal force be with me.
Show me the anus!
So angry Jean D'Arc tramps on him.
Oh my god!
But he turned out to be an angel
looking for the city's saviour.
Oh, Jean D'Arc!
I will give you a blessed anal chip.
Save the world with this.
That's stupid!
It's so boring.
How about a woman who saves a man with her breasts?
A very, very rich man.
Hey, I'm the director here!
Oh my.
This is a film about a noble sacrifice.
I mean, art...
An auteur film.
You know what an auteur film is?
Why do I have to know that?
Being pretty is enough.
Come on baby.
Change it into tits, okay?
What the hell do you know?
A ditz like you will never be a star in this business!
Then do it yourself, Mr. Auteur.
Ciao!
- Rock, paper, scissors.
- Rock, paper, scissors.
Bend over, asshole!
You see, there are all kinds of shit in this world.
Some are soft, some are hard, and some just don't turn out right.
But in the end, shit is shit.
The same goes for chics.
Then is my Beautiful Shit inside?
Not a bad show.
Jimmy's bolder than I thought.
What are they doing, damn it?
What is it?
Oh, nothing.
They're just chit-chatting.
Well, it looks too loose.
Can she take a good crap?
Look how elastic her anus is.
Ten times a day will be no problem.
I'll stick it in beautifully.
What the hell?
Damn it.
You idiot!
Jimmy, that son of a bitch, is dead.
What are you doing, you perverts!
What is it?
Run!
Oh, my tummy!
What's wrong with your tummy?
You perverts also with them?
No way.
How could we possibly be with those jerks?
We were just passing by and...
Damn it!
What a major bitch.
She's the one who followed us.
Rotten perverts.
Why into my anus of all places?
Damn it.
You must be constipated.
You think that will work?
No.
For constipations...
GOLD LAX!
And SILVER LAX!
Shut up!
She's a real pain in the ass.
How could she shit now?
Isn't she super sexy?
You blockhead!
Just bring her juicybar after she finishes.
ID check complete.
Your juicybar will be delivered.
Oh my goodness!
Is it broken?
If anyone is on patrol in Section 4, please comply!
What's with all these juicybars?
What did that pervert do to me?
She's pretty, has an awesome personality, and she's so fertile.
I love you!
She's a walking juicybar factory.
Now I know why the Diaper Gang wanted her so bad.
She takes one dump and tons of juicybars are delivered.
Anyway, what should I do with these leaches?
Beautiful, trust me from now on.
I'll be your manager, and we'll...
Flies like him tend to swarm around a beauty like you.
Let go!
Gonna kill a friend over a chic?
Whatever.
Remember when you ran away?
Don't worry, sweety.
I'm your man from now on.
You traitor!
Forgive me for asking you this, but since I helped you find their place, mind if I go home now?
Help me!
Help me!
Eat this, you diapers!
Turn left!
Left!
Is that left, you idiot?
Sons of bitches.
You show your juicybar trick to the whole damn world?
That was the first time I pooped so many juicybars!
Then what's up their asses?
How should I know what's in there?
I'm no ass expert.
Then go find out and resolve this!
Who do you think I am?
This is 0497.
I don't see anything strange.
Not a soul in sight...
Shit!
The Diaper Gang!
Cease fire!
Find the girl!
Find the girl, find the girl.
What are you waiting for?
Go after them!
This is evidence one discovered on the scene.
His name is Jimmy, and was presumed to be killed by the Diaper Gang.
He pretended to be a movie director, and has a criminal record with regard to illegal movies.
They were at the crime scene, and were presumed homeless hoodlums.
If an error occurred in the computer on the numerous lD registrations, these two culprits are very likely to have the answer.
So if we analyze the defecation data of the checked lDs...
Get to the point!
How are they related to this case?
Well, they had an illegal affair...
Shut up, you idiot!
Mobilize all the forces and catch them all.
WANTED
We found her!
We found her!
We found one woman who last defecated in our records.
The rest of the ids have no record of defecation.
The Diaper Gang cannot defecate.
So their need for juicybars makes them a big suspect.
If we capture her, we'll be able to uncover everything about this case.
A SWAT team is now positioned to track down any massive supply of juicybars within three minutes.
Get to the point!
So will you catch them or not?
I will catch them, ma'am.
If you miss them this time, you'll be the first to die.
Man, this is frustrating!
Look, I'm not the same old Aachi.
If you wanna survive in Section 4, you better not get on my bad side.
I got many customers waiting in line besides you, old man.
Alright, I won't get upset.
Anyhow, hoodlums like you walking into this fancy hotel is humiliating.
So quietly use the back door.
Senile old bastard.
Who does he think he's talking to?
Beautiful, the old man is coming to buy some juicybars.
How about a nice whole-hearted shit?
Moron.
I'm the one who feeds you punks.
What?
Moron?
You bitch!
We got them!
All enforcements mobilize to coordinates 646!
Just rough them up a little.
And remember, my share is two thirds.
Are you ready?
Let's go.
Let's go!
Hold your gun right, idiot!
I got no hair, but I got the body.
I'm such a hottie.
Cut the crap.
Old man, I told you to use the back door.
You think my words don't count?
You son of a...
One, two, one, two.
Ready!
Ready!
Throw it!
Who the hell are you?
Where is she?
Who are you talking about?
I can't remember all my chics.
One, two...
You'll be okay, sweety.
Damn it, this is humilating.
You know who I am?
Wait!
Let's talk!
So, well...
Over there...
Put your guns down!
- Don't move or we'll shoot!
- Put your guns down!
You little assholes, how dare...
Who the hell are you?
Going up the stairs with one leg is a pain in the ass.
What are you waiting for?
Go inside!
Move it!
Diapers!
My leg!
Sons of bitches!
My money!
My money!
You stupid old man, don't be such a meanie.
We're in trouble.
We need back-up.
What are you doing?
Get in there and fight!
I hate you.
Boss!
You bastards!
I have grenades!
Shit.
Damn it!
My hands are burning.
Get them!
Hurry and stand up!
You sons of bitches!
What have I gotten myself into!
How did things turn out like this?
And is that little rat alive or what?
Hold on tight, babe.
You little rat!
You're alive!
You idiot!
How could you bring the Diapers with you?
I didn't, you moron.
They're the ones who followed me!
- Asshole!
- Yeah, asshole.
Man, you never make things any easier.
Shut up and just follow me!
Crap, we're screwed.
oney, do something!
Yeah!
Bring it on!
Shit, we got a code fucking red here.
Get them!
Get them!
Get them!
Let go!
Let go!
I said let go!
Let go!
Damn it.
You son of a bitch!
Hey, who do you think you are?
You asshole.
Think you're a tough guy, huh?
Get him!
I'm a fake.
You lost.
Large illegal distribution ofjuicybars...
The toilets in Section 4 were attacked...
The Diaper Gang attacked...
Growing crimes by the Diapers...
Citizens, please stay calm.
We will poke out the axis of evil.
Useless idiots!
Wipe them all off this planet!
This situation is terribly...
I won't eat it!
I won't!
I'm not a shitmaker for you dwarves!
- We were annihilated.
- You idiot!
According to a recent report, a female in her 20s seems to be related to this case...
The Diaper Gang will rule this city soon.
Yesterday we were forgotten orphans.
But tomorrow we will stand up as remembered orphans!
Diapers!
Diapers!
Damn it!
I was a juicybar tycoon just the other day.
The Diapers are rich now that they have Beautiful, while we're homeless fugitives.
That bitch!
It's all her fault!
This sucks.
How dare you call her that!
Shut your trap!
Beautiful made you rich with all those juicybars.
Make me rich?
Screw you!
You see us with any juicybars now?
Then what the hell did you do when my Beautiful got caught?
You're the one who fainted after one punch!
I'm going.
Where are you going?
I'm going to save Beautiful.
What?
Hey, meathead!
Talk some sense!
Even the pigs can't beat them, so what the hell are you gonna do?
I'm going with or without you.
Cowards like you will always live off of snitching juicybars.
Hey!
You don't know what true love is!
Hey!
You stupid romantic.
You dumb Romeo!
We have a traitor among us.
Otherwise, it's impossible for the Diaper Gang to obliterate us like this.
Actually, since Geko was in charge of the Diaper Gang until now, we don't know their strategies.
No excuses!
Think we're weaker than those dwarfs?
We need another plan.
Doctor, long time no see.
I'll get straight to the point.
Can you revive Geko?
I created him, so it won't be so difficult.
But, I need a lot of corpses.
Very fresh ones.
If you can bring him back to life,
I'll bring you all the filth in Section 4.
I'm happy to hear that.
And one more.
Give me his corpse, too.
As you wish.
Damn it.
Wait, you!
You're that little shit!
What's up?
You little prick!
Don't you have anything better to do?
Go to school, shithead.
I was a juicybar tycoon just yesterday, damn it.
Tell me!
Tell me now!
Where's my Beautiful?
Who are you?
Where's Beautiful?
Tell me where Beautiful is!
You sons of bitches!
Shit!
My motorbike!
You assholes!
What the hell are you doing here?
Just passing by, bonehead.
Then keep going, you twirp.
Mind your own business, jackass.
You little turd.
Screw you and that pride of yours.
What, you little dwarf?
You son of a bitch.
You're the worst character in this movie!
Screw you, asshole!
My baby, daddy will do you good.
You're so adorable.
If you bring me the scientist who created Geko,
I will dispose of the Chief.
And I want the number two position in your gang.
It's yours.
But if you're thinking of betraying us or plan to do something stupid, then you'll suffer a pain worse than death.
If you don't kill the Chief, she'll kill me first.
You can be assured that I'll never betray you.
I'll be ready for you tonight.
Now do you feel like talking?
I don't know.
I don't.
Bastard must be high on juicybars.
How the hell do you not know where your home is?
Asshole!
I have no idea!
He's really not gonna talk.
This punk's pretty loyal.
We better just kill him.
No!
No!
Doctor, from now on you'll work for us.
Now even mutants come looking for me.
This will be quite a new thrill.
I'll go to any place that has fresh corpses.
Escort him out.
Escort, escort.
When will you dispose of the Chief?
No betrayer like you deserves to be in our gang.
When will you dispose of the Chief?
When will you dispose of the Chief?
When will you dispose of the Chief?
You raised a good assistant.
If you have the guts, come to the desert.
You despicable fool, how dare you betray me.
We can't find any traces of Dr. Strange.
HAIL THE DIAPER KING!
Damn it, it's boiling hot.
True love conquers everything.
My Beautiful.
Attack!
What the hell is that?
Did they already clash with the pigs?
That spells bad news for us.
This won't work.
We should think over our plan, and then come back.
We gotta finish what we started whether it kills us or not.
Stop trying to be a hero and let's just go back.
- You!
- You blockhead, go without me.
I don't wanna die.
Execution to all who are caught red-handed.
Geko, you lunatic!
It's dangerous!
Get out of here!
He's coming, he's coming.
Isn't that Beautiful?
Where?
He's coming, he's coming.
Damn it!
My head!
Long live the Diapers!
Juicybars!
Juicybars!
I told you we should've just gone back!
Then what about Beautiful?
Who's more important?
Me or Beautiful?
Beautiful.
Think you can kill me?
I'm afraid not.
I told you we should've just left!
But you go nuts over a chic!
Screw you!
Beautiful.
Stop talking crap!
Beautiful!
- Beautiful!
- Beautiful!
Hold on tight!
Hold her tight, idiot!
Beautiful's in danger!
Hurry!
Pull her in!
Do something!
Put more muscle into it!
No!
Beautiful!
Very interesting-looking specimens.
Geko passed the XX point, roger!
Okay, roger!
Hey!
Get it ready fast!
Fast!
Fast!
What the hell is this?
Untie me!
You crazy old bastard!
Screw you!
He's coming, roger.
What?
Coming?
Hey!
He's coming!
Here he comes!
Fire!
Stop acting like Paris Hilton!
I let you slide until now, but you've disrespected me.
I oughta slice your belly and yank out your chip.
Get ready to die!
Don't touch Beautiful.
You damn hoodlum, you're such a pain in the ass.
But no more games.
Hey!
I'm right over here!
Srew you!
No!
Die, please!
Die!
- You...
- Wait, that's...
Jimmy the freak?
When did you start working for the pigs?
But I killed you with my bare hands.
Let go!
Let go, you filthy bastard!
Die!
Die!
You son of a bitch!
What the hell?
No!
You worthless hoodlum.
Stop, you blue asshole!
You belong down there.
You son of a bitch!
Beautiful.
- You bastard!
- Beautiful.
Beautiful!
Come back here!
Save the world like you said you would.
Die!
Hey, it stopped.
How dare you.
Around and around we go!
Die!
Cut!
Cut!
Cut!
You sluts!
I told you not to do it that way!
How many times do I have to tell you!
You are charged for interfering with police duties, for organizing an illegal clan, and for murdering a policeman.
Whether dead or alive, you're coming with me.
Beautiful!
More!
Stretch a bit more!
Oh no, what is this?
You filthy bastard.
Nothing went right whenever you showed up.
I didn't do anything!
I swear!
Idiot!
Please do something about this!
I don't want to die!
I hate you!
Beautiful!
Try harder!
Do something fast!
Stretch out a bit more!
I can't anymore!
Stretch more!
Damn it!
I can't anymore.
- More!
- I can't!
I can't!
A little bit more!
I can't stand it anymore!
Be patient, sweetheart.
I'll find you one soon.
Let's find you the right toilet, so you can let out a big load!
What are you so happy about?
We're millionaires now!
Did you say "we"?
Who's "we"?
Who's "we"?
We're business partners of course!
Who asked you to be my partner?
In business, logistics is more important than production.
Got to know your stuff.
That big mouth never shuts up.
Anyway, your share is one-fifth.
Stop talking and let's jet out of here.
If you take a dump on the road, it's a huge loss.
My shit is supporting you guys.
Better be grateful.
Let's go to the city and run it dry!
SO LONG!
I'm going to have fun with this new friend.
RYU Seung-Bum, YIM Chang-Jeong, HYUN Young, SHIN Hyae-ChuI executive producer KIM Seung-Bum directed by JOE Bum-Jin screenplay by JUNG Hye-Won, KANG Sang-Kyun producer KIM Sun-Ku
STUDIO 2.0 presents
In association with OCN KOCCA, and KTB Network a J TEAM Studio production
The world has run out of all forms of energy.
People built a new city by making a new energy with their excrements.
Soon after the city's leaders announced two legislations to generate and control the new energy.
First, installing an ID chip in each of the citizen's anus to monitor their defecation level.
Second, provide defecating citizens in return one addictive "juicybar".
Later, defecation amounts have skyrocketed, but the city became full of addicts due to the juicybar's strong addiction.
Illegal trade of juicybars became prevalent, and the juicybar's side effects have created dumb pint-sized mutants.
These mutants organized a gang to plunder juicybars.
They became known as the 'Diaper Gang'.
They're coming.
They're coming.
Hey, they're coming!
They're coming.
They're coming.
They're going.
They're going.
They're coming.
They're coming.
Outta my way!
Hey slowpoke, think you're faster?
You betcha!
Hey!
Bald bastard.
AACHI SSIPAK
We are the forgotten orphans.
We once dedicated our crap and youth to this city.
But what did our leaders do for us?
Did they appreciate us for our crap?
Never!
We became addicted to juicybars, so we can never shit or even reproduce because our dicks have shrunk like peanuts.
Then they ran us out of this city like garbage!
Why?
Because we've evolved into mutants, liberating ourselves from having to shit all the time!
Diapers!
Diapers!
Nonetheless, we're in shitcreek now.
Juicybars is our only source of food, but we haven't had any for a month.
And why is this?
Because of that special cop, Geko?
No.
It's because a whole bunch of you piss-ass dumb shits can't even blow away one fuckin' cop!
Stand up!
This is your last chance to redeem yourselves.
Tell me where we can find juicybars for our hungry brothers.
Kindergarten defecation classes.
Where were you before?
A kindergarten defecation class.
A juicybar factory?
No, a juicybar market?
No, how about...
You freaks don't deserve to be called gangsters.
Know what punks like you are called?
I know!
Hoodlums!
Yes, hoodlums!
What?
I mean, these hoodlums...
A lot of hoodlums are dealing juicybars in Section 4.
Hoodlums, you say...
You bonehead!
There's only eighteen in here, not twenty!
You swiped two, didn't you?
Count it yourself, idiot!
You hopeless chimp.
You won't get your cut unless you get two more.
And no chick as well.
Got it?
You twirp!
Why am I always doing the dirty work?
Hey, you get the easy way out.
I always risk my life being on the lookout.
Go and get some more.
We need to make up for it.
You little piss ant!
Then every chick we find tonight are mine.
And if you cheat me again and take off, you're really gonna pay this time.
Damn it, that hurt!
Stupid mutt!
Today the police scored big again for mopping up the Diaper Gang.
We will rigidly tackle any insincere defecation!
Have any problems defecating?
Well, I'm constipated.
Drink!
Dump-free Yogurt!
FLUSH ITALL DOWN!
Now get ready, gear up and...
Headbump!
One, two, givin' it to ya'.
Don't get too wasted now.
Stop showing off and do some kickin'!
Here comes daddy!
Your juicybar is being prepared.
Sorry to disturb.
Man!
That's one hell of a dump!
Juicybar delivery complete.
Smells damn good, too!
The way kids shit these days is so impolite.
He's such a hopeless case.
His damn showing off gives me the runs.
Abio, showing off here is useless.
We're in the can.
Screw off.
Run!
It's too damn hot for this crap.
Let's go.
You little punks.
You assholes swiped a ton of juicybars in Section 4.
Think you're big shots?
You cheating scums.
There's taxes on what you made.
What?
Bastard got some balls!
You little shit, stop being a wus again.
Look here, cue ball.
Unless you want me to make sushi out of your tongue, bring me 100 juicybars a day.
Damn, you got cavaties.
Be a good boy!
And grow some damn hair!
You know my boss's cell in prison, right?
Hand the juicybars over to him.
Let's go!
Oh yeah, Jimmy says hi.
You got a really good friend!
Ciao!
Jimmy, you son of a bitch.
John Doe is this month's "King of Defecation".
If you become the "King", you'll receive unlimited VIP service with beautiful girls at a luxurious resort.
Try your best to defecate, and be the "King of Defecation".
You can be the "King", too!
Foul bastards.
How dare they stuff things into the sacred anus.
Those beasts are the real traitors of our establishment.
They're evil to our society.
Don't you think, Captain?
Chief, so you mean...
They're illegal anus users?
- Like this, bitch?
- Harder!
- Like this?
- Harder!
- Like this?
- Harder!
- Like this?
- Harder!
Cut!
Cut!
Cut!
You idiots, get it right for once!
How many times I gotta tell you?
Think we're shooting a cheap porn?
You sluts.
Each whip should be the sublime.
A girl who sacrifices her anus to save the world.
Oh how beautiful she is.
Once this film is complete, it will be praised by critics and moviegoers, and be a world-wide success!
Oh my Lord, how art thou I be this talented?
Bullshit!
Hey asslover, you're in deep trouble!
You freak!
Dr. Strange sawed another guard into pieces again in prison.
That crazy old fart.
He'd be cooked on the electric chair if he hadn't created our cyborg.
Move him into the special cell so that he can't touch anyone.
And report that he's cooperating very well with us.
Yes, ma'am.
Geko, good work and...
My report for today.
99 kills and no arrests.
That despicable cyborg, how rude.
ANAL INSTICT
SM MIZERY
HORNYALIENS
You freak, what's with your room?
Don't you have anything kinky?
He's totally high, man.
Don't sweat it, dude.
Keep stuffing his face.
Look at him.
I'm telling you, he's toasted.
Okay, okay.
You like feeling high, you pervert?
From now on, you're Shitman.
Shitman.
Shitman.
Shitman.
Shitman.
Yes!
I am!
Shitman!
Shitman, shall we save the world now?
Here comes Shitman to bring peace to the fuckin' world!
That was so cool.
Let's take him to a higher place this time.
Then he'll croak for sure, you meathead.
We need him for something else.
What the hell is this?
Pigeon poo?
Is this the right way?
Yes, sir!
I'm positive this is the way to Section 4's prison.
Oh, how corrupt the world is.
A prison is a hideout for hoodlums?
I'm bored!
Give me a vacation!
Who stole my Teddy Bear?
This sucks!
The world's too corrupt for good citizens like me.
80 juicybars from the Razor Gang in Section 3.
80 juicybars from the Razor Gang in Section 3.
25 juicybars from the Cobra Gang in Section 4.
25 juicybars from the Cobra Gang in Section 4.
A measly 25 juicybars?
The Cobras seem to be out of heart lately.
Yes, they do.
I'll break your balls if you sleep on the job again!
Someone's here to see you.
What does he want to snitch this time?
- What the hell?
- What's that?
Why are you stripping?
How dare you, you looney!
What are you going to do?
Charge me for smoking?
What's gotten into his head?
Of course it's prohibited, you freak!
Who the hell do you think you are?
That freak turned out to be a useful friend.
Hey lady, time for the 'Misery' version.
Misery.
Misery.
Misery.
Misery.
Misery.
Misery...
One, two, one, two.
Misery...
One, two, one, two.
You freak!
I'm gonna slice you in half!
Write it again!
Write it again!
Write it again!
Write it again!
Didn't I warn you not to kill Misery without my permission!
This is much better than the movie.
If you won't give it up, then don't hit me at least!
Crap, it's my first erection in three years.
You pervert.
How dare you hit your director!
Director, my ass.
You crazy bitch!
You call an animator a real director?
Yes, I do.
What a bummer.
Hey, kid!
What are you looking at?
Who are you calling "kid"?
You rude bitch!
Isn't she totally hot?
Damn horndog is at it again!
Peabrain!
We have to finish the job first!
You horny bastard!
Diapers, diapers, diapers.
Die, you mushroom head!
Shoot that crazy bitch!
I mean that crazy asshole right now!
Absent-minded myself.
What's this red crap?
Is the ceiling taking a shit?
What the hell are all these diapers?
Is this some kindergarten?
Let's go if it's all done.
Go, go, go!
One, two, one, two!
One, two, one, two!
Go, go, go!
Where am I?
Aliens?
Then that means...
Then that means...
Come to mama!
You evil beasts!
Alien Queen!
Give me my baby back!
Come on, bitch!
Oh no.
How can I give you a slow and painful death...
I don't know why I did that, but...
I'll compensate you with juicybars.
Do you have any juicybars?
Well, I don't have any now, but if my movie becomes a big hit.
Movie?
Yes.
When my heroine takes a dump, juicybars come gushing out.
Doesn't it sound like a hit?
Juicybars gush out with just one dump?
How is that possible?
It happens only in a fictional world.
Stop bullshitting!
Just tell me how.
Or else, you'll die in the real world!
Right, I mean my movie is about a holy sacrifice.
I mean in order to enlighten her...
God digs out this corruptive chip from her anus.
Yes, digs out.
Then, he sticks a blessed chip back in there, so...
So whenever she shits, tons of juicybars gush out.
In other words...
Yes!
It becomes a magical anus!
A magical anus...
So he digs it out and sticks it in?
You've been implanted with an ID chip at your birth.
This is your soul mate to supply you with precious juicybars for a plentiful life.
This ID chip in your anus is your second identity.
Why didn't I think about this before?
Since you gave me this great idea,
I'll put these chips into your rear with honor.
But...
I don't shit very well.
Nobody here can shit better than you.
I'm extremely constipated, and I even have hemorrhoids.
Sorry, I do a lot of things with my butt.
Gross.
Drop him.
Wait!
Wait!
I'm gonna have an audition for a girl who's good at shitting.
Wait!
Please don't kill me.
If you don't kill me,
I'll stick those chips into a girl who can shit several times a day.
I beg you!
There she is.
She's going.
"Wanted ASAP"
"Excellent defecation skills"
"Need actress with experienced anus"
"Jimmy's Pure Cinema"
Jimmy, that tough cockroach.
He's still alive.
Hey, let's beat the hell out of Jimmy in front of Beautiful.
If I show her how strong I am,
I'll sweep her off her feet.
So Jean D'Arc is this lady who was born to save the world.
But one day a juicybar tycoon shows up.
May the anal force be with me.
Show me the anus!
So angry Jean D'Arc tramps on him.
Oh my god!
But he turned out to be an angel looking for the city's saviour.
Oh, Jean D'Arc!
I will give you a blessed anal chip.
Save the world with this.
That's stupid!
It's so boring.
How about a woman who saves a man with her breasts?
A very, very rich man.
Hey, I'm the director here!
Oh my.
This is a film about a noble sacrifice.
I mean, art...
An auteur film.
You know what an auteur film is?
Why do I have to know that?
Being pretty is enough.
Come on baby.
Change it into tits, okay?
What the hell do you know?
A ditz like you will never be a star in this business!
Then do it yourself, Mr. Auteur.
Ciao!
- Rock, paper, scissors.
- Rock, paper, scissors.
Bend over, asshole!
You see, there are all kinds of shit in this world.
Some are soft, some are hard, and some just don't turn out right.
But in the end, shit is shit.
The same goes for chics.
Then is my Beautiful Shit inside?
Not a bad show.
Jimmy's bolder than I thought.
What are they doing, damn it?
What is it?
Oh, nothing.
They're just chit-chatting.
Well, it looks too loose.
Can she take a good crap?
Look how elastic her anus is.
Ten times a day will be no problem.
I'll stick it in beautifully.
What the hell?
Damn it.
You idiot!
Jimmy, that son of a bitch, is dead.
What are you doing, you perverts!
What is it?
Run!
Oh, my tummy!
What's wrong with your tummy?
You perverts also with them?
No way.
How could we possibly be with those jerks?
We were just passing by and...
Damn it!
What a major bitch.
She's the one who followed us.
Rotten perverts.
Why into my anus of all places?
Damn it.
You must be constipated.
You think that will work?
No.
For constipations...
GOLD LAX!
And SILVER LAX!
Shut up!
She's a real pain in the ass.
How could she shit now?
Isn't she super sexy?
You blockhead!
Just bring her juicybar after she finishes.
ID check complete.
Your juicybar will be delivered.
Oh my goodness!
Is it broken?
If anyone is on patrol in Section 4, please comply!
What's with all these juicybars?
What did that pervert do to me?
She's pretty, has an awesome personality, and she's so fertile.
I love you!
She's a walking juicybar factory.
Now I know why the Diaper Gang wanted her so bad.
She takes one dump and tons of juicybars are delivered.
Anyway, what should I do with these leaches?
Beautiful, trust me from now on.
I'll be your manager, and we'll...
Flies like him tend to swarm around a beauty like you.
Let go!
Gonna kill a friend over a chic?
Whatever.
Remember when you ran away?
Don't worry, sweety.
I'm your man from now on.
You traitor!
Forgive me for asking you this, but since I helped you find their place, mind if I go home now?
Help me!
Help me!
Eat this, you diapers!
Turn left!
Left!
Is that left, you idiot?
Sons of bitches.
You show your juicybar trick to the whole damn world?
That was the first time I pooped so many juicybars!
Then what's up their asses?
How should I know what's in there?
I'm no ass expert.
Then go find out and resolve this!
Who do you think I am?
This is 0497.
I don't see anything strange.
Not a soul in sight...
Shit!
The Diaper Gang!
Cease fire!
Find the girl!
Find the girl, find the girl.
What are you waiting for?
Go after them!
This is evidence one discovered on the scene.
His name is Jimmy, and was presumed to be killed by the Diaper Gang.
He pretended to be a movie director, and has a criminal record with regard to illegal movies.
They were at the crime scene, and were presumed homeless hoodlums.
If an error occurred in the computer on the numerous ID registrations, these two culprits are very likely to have the answer.
So if we analyze the defecation data of the checked IDs...
Get to the point!
How are they related to this case?
Well, they had an illegal affair...
Shut up, you idiot!
Mobilize all the forces and catch them all.
WANTED
We found her!
We found her!
We found one woman who last defecated in our records.
The rest of the IDs have no record of defecation.
The Diaper Gang cannot defecate.
So their need for juicybars makes them a big suspect.
If we capture her, we'll be able to uncover everything about this case.
A SWAT team is now positioned to track down any massive supply of juicybars within three minutes.
Get to the point!
So will you catch them or not?
I will catch them, ma'am.
If you miss them this time, you'll be the first to die.
Man, this is frustrating!
Look, I'm not the same old Aachi.
If you wanna survive in Section 4, you better not get on my bad side.
I got many customers waiting in line besides you, old man.
Alright, I won't get upset.
Anyhow, hoodlums like you walking into this fancy hotel is humiliating.
So quietly use the back door.
Senile old bastard.
Who does he think he's talking to?
Beautiful, the old man is coming to buy some juicybars.
How about a nice whole-hearted shit?
Moron.
I'm the one who feeds you punks.
What?
Moron?
You bitch!
We got them!
All enforcements mobilize to coordinates 646!
Just rough them up a little.
And remember, my share is two thirds.
Are you ready?
Let's go.
Let's go!
Hold your gun right, idiot!
I got no hair, but I got the body.
I'm such a hottie.
Cut the crap.
Old man, I told you to use the back door.
You think my words don't count?
You son of a...
One, two, one, two.
Ready!
Ready!
Throw it!
Who the hell are you?
Where is she?
Who are you talking about?
I can't remember all my chics.
One, two...
You'll be okay, sweety.
Damn it, this is humilating.
You know who I am?
Wait!
Let's talk!
So, well...
Over there...
Put your guns down!
- Don't move or we'll shoot!
- Put your guns down!
You little assholes, how dare...
Who the hell are you?
Going up the stairs with one leg is a pain in the ass.
What are you waiting for?
Go inside!
Move it!
Diapers!
My leg!
Sons of bitches!
My money!
My money!
You stupid old man, don't be such a meanie.
We're in trouble.
We need back-up.
What are you doing?
Get in there and fight!
I hate you.
Boss!
You bastards!
I have grenades!
Shit.
Damn it!
My hands are burning.
Get them!
Hurry and stand up!
You sons of bitches!
What have I gotten myself into!
How did things turn out like this?
And is that little rat alive or what?
Hold on tight, babe.
You little rat!
You're alive!
You idiot!
How could you bring the Diapers with you?
I didn't, you moron.
They're the ones who followed me!
- Asshole!
- Yeah, asshole.
Man, you never make things any easier.
Shut up and just follow me!
Crap, we're screwed.
Oney, do something!
Yeah!
Bring it on!
Shit, we got a code fucking red here.
Get them!
Get them!
Get them!
Let go!
Let go!
I said let go!
Let go!
Damn it.
You son of a bitch!
Hey, who do you think you are?
You asshole.
Think you're a tough guy, huh?
Get him!
I'm a fake.
You lost.
Large illegal distribution of juicybars...
The toilets in Section 4 were attacked...
The Diaper Gang attacked...
Growing crimes by the Diapers...
Citizens, please stay calm.
We will poke out the axis of evil.
Useless idiots!
Wipe them all off this planet!
This situation is terribly...
I won't eat it!
I won't!
I'm not a shitmaker for you dwarves!
- We were annihilated.
- You idiot!
According to a recent report, a female in her 20s seems to be related to this case...
The Diaper Gang will rule this city soon.
Yesterday we were forgotten orphans.
But tomorrow we will stand up as remembered orphans!
Diapers!
Diapers!
Damn it!
I was a juicybar tycoon just the other day.
The Diapers are rich now that they have Beautiful, while we're homeless fugitives.
That bitch!
It's all her fault!
This sucks.
How dare you call her that!
Shut your trap!
Beautiful made you rich with all those juicybars.
Make me rich?
Screw you!
You see us with any juicybars now?
Then what the hell did you do when my Beautiful got caught?
You're the one who fainted after one punch!
I'm going.
Where are you going?
I'm going to save Beautiful.
What?
Hey, meathead!
Talk some sense!
Even the pigs can't beat them, so what the hell are you gonna do?
I'm going with or without you.
Cowards like you will always live off of snitching juicybars.
Hey!
You don't know what true love is!
Hey!
You stupid romantic.
You dumb Romeo!
We have a traitor among us.
Otherwise, it's impossible for the Diaper Gang to obliterate us like this.
Actually, since Geko was in charge of the Diaper Gang until now, we don't know their strategies.
No excuses!
Think we're weaker than those dwarfs?
We need another plan.
Doctor, long time no see.
I'll get straight to the point.
Can you revive Geko?
I created him, so it won't be so difficult.
But, I need a lot of corpses.
Very fresh ones.
If you can bring him back to life,
I'll bring you all the filth in Section 4.
I'm happy to hear that.
And one more.
Give me his corpse, too.
As you wish.
Damn it.
Wait, you!
You're that little shit!
What's up?
You little prick!
Don't you have anything better to do?
Go to school, shithead.
I was a juicybar tycoon just yesterday, damn it.
Tell me!
Tell me now!
Where's my Beautiful?
Who are you?
Where's Beautiful?
Tell me where Beautiful is!
You sons of bitches!
Shit!
My motorbike!
You assholes!
What the hell are you doing here?
Just passing by, bonehead.
Then keep going, you twirp.
Mind your own business, jackass.
You little turd.
Screw you and that pride of yours.
What, you little dwarf?
You son of a bitch.
You're the worst character in this movie!
Screw you, asshole!
My baby, daddy will do you good.
You're so adorable.
If you bring me the scientist who created Geko,
I will dispose of the Chief.
And I want the number two position in your gang.
It's yours.
But if you're thinking of betraying us or plan to do something stupid, then you'll suffer a pain worse than death.
If you don't kill the Chief, she'll kill me first.
You can be assured that I'll never betray you.
I'll be ready for you tonight.
Now do you feel like talking?
I don't know.
I don't.
Bastard must be high on juicybars.
How the hell do you not know where your home is?
Asshole!
I have no idea!
He's really not gonna talk.
This punk's pretty loyal.
We better just kill him.
No!
No!
Doctor, from now on you'll work for us.
Now even mutants come looking for me.
This will be quite a new thrill.
I'll go to any place that has fresh corpses.
Escort him out.
Escort, escort.
When will you dispose of the Chief?
No betrayer like you deserves to be in our gang.
When will you dispose of the Chief?
When will you dispose of the Chief?
When will you dispose of the Chief?
You raised a good assistant.
If you have the guts, come to the desert.
You despicable fool, how dare you betray me.
We can't find any traces of Dr. Strange.
HAIL THE DIAPER KING!
Damn it, it's boiling hot.
True love conquers everything.
My Beautiful.
Attack!
What the hell is that?
Did they already clash with the pigs?
That spells bad news for us.
This won't work.
We should think over our plan, and then come back.
We gotta finish what we started whether it kills us or not.
Stop trying to be a hero and let's just go back.
- You!
- You blockhead, go without me.
I don't wanna die.
Execution to all who are caught red-handed.
Geko, you lunatic!
It's dangerous!
Get out of here!
He's coming, he's coming.
Isn't that Beautiful?
Where?
He's coming, he's coming.
Damn it!
My head!
Long live the Diapers!
Juicybars!
Juicybars!
I told you we should've just gone back!
Then what about Beautiful?
Who's more important?
Me or Beautiful?
Beautiful.
Think you can kill me?
I'm afraid not.
I told you we should've just left!
But you go nuts over a chic!
Screw you!
Beautiful.
Stop talking crap!
Beautiful!
- Beautiful!
- Beautiful!
Hold on tight!
Hold her tight, idiot!
Beautiful's in danger!
Hurry!
Pull her in!
Do something!
Put more muscle into it!
No!
Beautiful!
Very interesting-looking specimens.
Geko passed the XX point, roger!
Okay, roger!
Hey!
Get it ready fast!
Fast!
Fast!
What the hell is this?
Untie me!
You crazy old bastard!
Screw you!
He's coming, roger.
What?
Coming?
Hey!
He's coming!
Here he comes!
Fire!
Stop acting like Paris Hilton!
I let you slide until now, but you've disrespected me.
I oughta slice your belly and yank out your chip.
Get ready to die!
Don't touch Beautiful.
You damn hoodlum, you're such a pain in the ass.
But no more games.
Hey!
I'm right over here!
Srew you!
No!
Die, please!
Die!
- You...
- Wait, that's...
Jimmy the freak?
When did you start working for the pigs?
But I killed you with my bare hands.
Let go!
Let go, you filthy bastard!
Die!
Die!
You son of a bitch!
What the hell?
No!
You worthless hoodlum.
Stop, you blue asshole!
You belong down there.
You son of a bitch!
Beautiful.
- You bastard!
- Beautiful.
Beautiful!
Come back here!
Save the world like you said you would.
Die!
Hey, it stopped.
How dare you.
Around and around we go!
Die!
Cut!
Cut!
Cut!
You sluts!
I told you not to do it that way!
How many times do I have to tell you!
You are charged for interfering with police duties, for organizing an illegal clan, and for murdering a policeman.
Whether dead or alive, you're coming with me.
Beautiful!
More!
Stretch a bit more!
Oh no, what is this?
You filthy bastard.
Nothing went right whenever you showed up.
I didn't do anything!
I swear!
Idiot!
Please do something about this!
I don't want to die!
I hate you!
Beautiful!
Try harder!
Do something fast!
Stretch out a bit more!
I can't anymore!
Stretch more!
Damn it!
I can't anymore.
- More!
- I can't!
I can't!
A little bit more!
I can't stand it anymore!
Be patient, sweetheart.
I'll find you one soon.
Let's find you the right toilet, so you can let out a big load!
What are you so happy about?
We're millionaires now!
Did you say "we"?
Who's "we"?
Who's "we"?
We're business partners of course!
Who asked you to be my partner?
In business, logistics is more important than production.
Got to know your stuff.
That big mouth never shuts up.
Anyway, your share is one-fifth.
Stop talking and let's jet out of here.
If you take a dump on the road, it's a huge loss.
My shit is supporting you guys.
Better be grateful.
Let's go to the city and run it dry!
SO LONG!
I'm going to have fun with this new friend.
RYU Seung-Bum, YIM Chang-Jeong, HYUN Young, SHIN Hyae-Chul executive producer KIM Seung-Bum directed by JOE Bum-Jin screenplay by JUNG Hye-Won, KANG Sang-Kyun producer KIM Sun-Ku
STUDIO 2.0 presents
In association with OCN KOCCA, and KTB Network a J TEAM Studio production
The world has run out of all forms of energy.
People built a new city by making a new energy with their excrements.
Soon after the city's leaders announced two legislations to generate and control the new energy.
First, installing an ID chip in each of the citizen's anus to monitor their defecation level.
Second, provide defecating citizens in return one addictive "juicybar".
Later, defecation amounts have skyrocketed, but the city became full of addicts due to the juicybar's strong addiction.
Illegal trade of juicybars became prevalent, and the juicybar's side effects have created dumb pint-sized mutants.
These mutants organized a gang to plunder juicybars.
They became known as the 'Diaper Gang'.
They're coming.
They're coming.
Hey, they're coming!
They're coming.
They're coming.
They're going.
They're going.
They're coming.
They're coming.
Outta my way!
Hey slowpoke, think you're faster?
You betcha!
Hey!
Bald bastard.
AACHI SSIPAK
We are the forgotten orphans.
We once dedicated our crap and youth to this city.
But what did our leaders do for us?
Did they appreciate us for our crap?
Never!
We became addicted to juicybars, so we can never shit or even reproduce because our dicks have shrunk like peanuts.
Then they ran us out of this city like garbage!
Why?
Because we've evolved into mutants, liberating ourselves from having to shit all the time!
Diapers!
Diapers!
Nonetheless, we're in shitcreek now.
Juicybars is our only source of food, but we haven't had any for a month.
And why is this?
Because of that special cop, Geko?
No.
It's because a whole bunch of you piss-ass dumb shits can't even blow away one fuckin' cop!
Stand up!
This is your last chance to redeem yourselves.
Tell me where we can find juicybars for our hungry brothers.
Kindergarten defecation classes.
Where were you before?
A kindergarten defecation class.
A juicybar factory?
No, a juicybar market?
No, how about...
You freaks don't deserve to be called gangsters.
Know what punks like you are called?
I know!
Hoodlums!
Yes, hoodlums!
What?
I mean, these hoodlums...
A lot of hoodlums are dealing juicybars in Section 4.
Hoodlums, you say...
You bonehead!
There's only eighteen in here, not twenty!
You swiped two, didn't you?
Count it yourself, idiot!
You hopeless chimp.
You won't get your cut unless you get two more.
And no chick as well.
Got it?
You twirp!
Why am I always doing the dirty work?
Hey, you get the easy way out.
I always risk my life being on the lookout.
Go and get some more.
We need to make up for it.
You little piss ant!
Then every chick we find tonight are mine.
And if you cheat me again and take off, you're really gonna pay this time.
Damn it, that hurt!
Stupid mutt!
Today the police scored big again for mopping up the Diaper Gang.
We will rigidly tackle any insincere defecation!
Have any problems defecating?
Well, I'm constipated.
Drink!
Dump-free Yogurt!
FLUSH ITALL DOWN!
Now get ready, gear up and...
Headbump!
One, two, givin' it to ya'.
Don't get too wasted now.
Stop showing off and do some kickin'!
Here comes daddy!
Your juicybar is being prepared.
Sorry to disturb.
Man!
That's one hell of a dump!
Juicybar delivery complete.
Smells damn good, too!
The way kids shit these days is so impolite.
He's such a hopeless case.
His damn showing off gives me the runs.
Abio, showing off here is useless.
We're in the can.
Screw off.
Run!
It's too damn hot for this crap.
Let's go.
You little punks.
You assholes swiped a ton of juicybars in Section 4.
Think you're big shots?
You cheating scums.
There's taxes on what you made.
What?
Bastard got some balls!
You little shit, stop being a wus again.
Look here, cue ball.
Unless you want me to make sushi out of your tongue, bring me 100 juicybars a day.
Damn, you got cavaties.
Be a good boy!
And grow some damn hair!
You know my boss's cell in prison, right?
Hand the juicybars over to him.
Let's go!
Oh yeah, Jimmy says hi.
You got a really good friend!
Ciao!
Jimmy, you son of a bitch.
John Doe is this month's "King of Defecation".
If you become the "King", you'll receive unlimited VIP service with beautiful girls at a luxurious resort.
Try your best to defecate, and be the "King of Defecation".
You can be the "King", too!
Foul bastards.
How dare they stuff things into the sacred anus.
Those beasts are the real traitors of our establishment.
They're evil to our society.
Don't you think, Captain?
Chief, so you mean...
They're illegal anus users?
- Like this, bitch?
- Harder!
- Like this?
- Harder!
- Like this?
- Harder!
- Like this?
- Harder!
Cut!
Cut!
Cut!
You idiots, get it right for once!
How many times I gotta tell you?
Think we're shooting a cheap porn?
You sluts.
Each whip should be the sublime.
A girl who sacrifices her anus to save the world.
Oh how beautiful she is.
Once this film is complete, it will be praised by critics and moviegoers, and be a world-wide success!
Oh my Lord, how art thou I be this talented?
Bullshit!
Hey asslover, you're in deep trouble!
You freak!
Dr. Strange sawed another guard into pieces again in prison.
That crazy old fart.
He'd be cooked on the electric chair if he hadn't created our cyborg.
Move him into the special cell so that he can't touch anyone.
And report that he's cooperating very well with us.
Yes, ma'am.
Geko, good work and...
My report for today.
99 kills and no arrests.
That despicable cyborg, how rude.
ANAL INSTICT
SM MIZERY
HORNYALIENS
You freak, what's with your room?
Don't you have anything kinky?
He's totally high, man.
Don't sweat it, dude.
Keep stuffing his face.
Look at him.
I'm telling you, he's toasted.
Okay, okay.
You like feeling high, you pervert?
From now on, you're Shitman.
Shitman.
Shitman.
Shitman.
Shitman.
Yes!
I am!
Shitman!
Shitman, shall we save the world now?
Here comes Shitman to bring peace to the fuckin' world!
That was so cool.
Let's take him to a higher place this time.
Then he'll croak for sure, you meathead.
We need him for something else.
What the hell is this?
Pigeon poo?
Is this the right way?
Yes, sir!
I'm positive this is the way to Section 4's prison.
Oh, how corrupt the world is.
A prison is a hideout for hoodlums?
I'm bored!
Give me a vacation!
Who stole my Teddy Bear?
This sucks!
The world's too corrupt for good citizens like me.
80 juicybars from the Razor Gang in Section 3.
80 juicybars from the Razor Gang in Section 3.
25 juicybars from the Cobra Gang in Section 4.
25 juicybars from the Cobra Gang in Section 4.
A measly 25 juicybars?
The Cobras seem to be out of heart lately.
Yes, they do.
I'll break your balls if you sleep on the job again!
Someone's here to see you.
What does he want to snitch this time?
- What the hell?
- What's that?
Why are you stripping?
How dare you, you looney!
What are you going to do?
Charge me for smoking?
What's gotten into his head?
Of course it's prohibited, you freak!
Who the hell do you think you are?
That freak turned out to be a useful friend.
Hey lady, time for the 'Misery' version.
Misery.
Misery.
Misery.
Misery.
Misery.
Misery...
One, two, one, two.
Misery...
One, two, one, two.
You freak!
I'm gonna slice you in half!
Write it again!
Write it again!
Write it again!
Write it again!
Didn't I warn you not to kill Misery without my permission!
This is much better than the movie.
If you won't give it up, then don't hit me at least!
Crap, it's my first erection in three years.
You pervert.
How dare you hit your director!
Director, my ass.
You crazy bitch!
You call an animator a real director?
Yes, I do.
What a bummer.
Hey, kid!
What are you looking at?
Who are you calling "kid"?
You rude bitch!
Isn't she totally hot?
Damn horndog is at it again!
Peabrain!
We have to finish the job first!
You horny bastard!
Diapers, diapers, diapers.
Die, you mushroom head!
Shoot that crazy bitch!
I mean that crazy asshole right now!
Absent-minded myself.
What's this red crap?
Is the ceiling taking a shit?
What the hell are all these diapers?
Is this some kindergarten?
Let's go if it's all done.
Go, go, go!
One, two, one, two!
One, two, one, two!
Go, go, go!
Where am I?
Aliens?
Then that means...
Then that means...
Come to mama!
You evil beasts!
Alien Queen!
Give me my baby back!
Come on, bitch!
Oh no.
How can I give you a slow and painful death...
I don't know why I did that, but...
I'll compensate you with juicybars.
Do you have any juicybars?
Well, I don't have any now, but if my movie becomes a big hit.
Movie?
Yes.
When my heroine takes a dump, juicybars come gushing out.
Doesn't it sound like a hit?
Juicybars gush out with just one dump?
How is that possible?
It happens only in a fictional world.
Stop bullshitting!
Just tell me how.
Or else, you'll die in the real world!
Right, I mean my movie is about a holy sacrifice.
I mean in order to enlighten her...
God digs out this corruptive chip from her anus.
Yes, digs out.
Then, he sticks a blessed chip back in there, so...
So whenever she shits, tons of juicybars gush out.
In other words...
Yes!
It becomes a magical anus!
A magical anus...
So he digs it out and sticks it in?
You've been implanted with an ID chip at your birth.
This is your soul mate to supply you with precious juicybars for a plentiful life.
This ID chip in your anus is your second identity.
Why didn't I think about this before?
Since you gave me this great idea,
I'll put these chips into your rear with honor.
But...
I don't shit very well.
Nobody here can shit better than you.
I'm extremely constipated, and I even have hemorrhoids.
Sorry, I do a lot of things with my butt.
Gross.
Drop him.
Wait!
Wait!
I'm gonna have an audition for a girl who's good at shitting.
Wait!
Please don't kill me.
If you don't kill me,
I'll stick those chips into a girl who can shit several times a day.
I beg you!
There she is.
She's going.
"Wanted ASAP"
"Excellent defecation skills"
"Need actress with experienced anus"
"Jimmy's Pure Cinema"
Jimmy, that tough cockroach.
He's still alive.
Hey, let's beat the hell out of Jimmy in front of Beautiful.
If I show her how strong I am,
I'll sweep her off her feet.
So Jean D'Arc is this lady who was born to save the world.
But one day a juicybar tycoon shows up.
May the anal force be with me.
Show me the anus!
So angry Jean D'Arc tramps on him.
Oh my god!
But he turned out to be an angel looking for the city's saviour.
Oh, Jean D'Arc!
I will give you a blessed anal chip.
Save the world with this.
That's stupid!
It's so boring.
How about a woman who saves a man with her breasts?
A very, very rich man.
Hey, I'm the director here!
Oh my.
This is a film about a noble sacrifice.
I mean, art...
An auteur film.
You know what an auteur film is?
Why do I have to know that?
Being pretty is enough.
Come on baby.
Change it into tits, okay?
What the hell do you know?
A ditz like you will never be a star in this business!
Then do it yourself, Mr. Auteur.
Ciao!
- Rock, paper, scissors.
- Rock, paper, scissors.
Bend over, asshole!
You see, there are all kinds of shit in this world.
Some are soft, some are hard, and some just don't turn out right.
But in the end, shit is shit.
The same goes for chics.
Then is my Beautiful Shit inside?
Not a bad show.
Jimmy's bolder than I thought.
What are they doing, damn it?
What is it?
Oh, nothing.
They're just chit-chatting.
Well, it looks too loose.
Can she take a good crap?
Look how elastic her anus is.
Ten times a day will be no problem.
I'll stick it in beautifully.
What the hell?
Damn it.
You idiot!
Jimmy, that son of a bitch, is dead.
What are you doing, you perverts!
What is it?
Run!
Oh, my tummy!
What's wrong with your tummy?
You perverts also with them?
No way.
How could we possibly be with those jerks?
We were just passing by and...
Damn it!
What a major bitch.
She's the one who followed us.
Rotten perverts.
Why into my anus of all places?
Damn it.
You must be constipated.
You think that will work?
No.
For constipations...
GOLD LAX!
And SILVER LAX!
Shut up!
She's a real pain in the ass.
How could she shit now?
Isn't she super sexy?
You blockhead!
Just bring her juicybar after she finishes.
ID check complete.
Your juicybar will be delivered.
Oh my goodness!
Is it broken?
If anyone is on patrol in Section 4, please comply!
What's with all these juicybars?
What did that pervert do to me?
She's pretty, has an awesome personality, and she's so fertile.
I love you!
She's a walking juicybar factory.
Now I know why the Diaper Gang wanted her so bad.
She takes one dump and tons of juicybars are delivered.
Anyway, what should I do with these leaches?
Beautiful, trust me from now on.
I'll be your manager, and we'II...
Flies like him tend to swarm around a beauty like you.
Let go!
Gonna kill a friend over a chic?
Whatever.
Remember when you ran away?
Don't worry, sweety.
I'm your man from now on.
You traitor!
Forgive me for asking you this, but since I helped you find their place, mind if I go home now?
Help me!
Help me!
Eat this, you diapers!
Turn left!
Left!
Is that left, you idiot?
Sons of bitches.
You show your juicybar trick to the whole damn world?
That was the first time I pooped so many juicybars!
Then what's up their asses?
How should I know what's in there?
I'm no ass expert.
Then go find out and resolve this!
Who do you think I am?
This is 0497.
I don't see anything strange.
Not a soul in sight...
Shit!
The Diaper Gang!
Cease fire!
Find the girl!
Find the girl, find the girl.
What are you waiting for?
Go after them!
This is evidence one discovered on the scene.
His name is Jimmy, and was presumed to be killed by the Diaper Gang.
He pretended to be a movie director, and has a criminal record with regard to illegal movies.
They were at the crime scene, and were presumed homeless hoodlums.
If an error occurred in the computer on the numerous ID registrations, these two culprits are very likely to have the answer.
So if we analyze the defecation data of the checked IDs...
Get to the point!
How are they related to this case?
Well, they had an illegal affair...
Shut up, you idiot!
Mobilize all the forces and catch them all.
WANTED
We found her!
We found her!
We found one woman who last defecated in our records.
The rest of the IDs have no record of defecation.
The Diaper Gang cannot defecate.
So their need for juicybars makes them a big suspect.
If we capture her, we'll be able to uncover everything about this case.
A SWAT team is now positioned to track down any massive supply of juicybars within three minutes.
Get to the point!
So will you catch them or not?
I will catch them, ma'am.
If you miss them this time, you'll be the first to die.
Man, this is frustrating!
Look, I'm not the same old Aachi.
If you wanna survive in Section 4, you better not get on my bad side.
I got many customers waiting in line besides you, old man.
Alright, I won't get upset.
Anyhow, hoodlums like you walking into this fancy hotel is humiliating.
So quietly use the back door.
Senile old bastard.
Who does he think he's talking to?
Beautiful, the old man is coming to buy some juicybars.
How about a nice whole-hearted shit?
Moron.
I'm the one who feeds you punks.
What?
Moron?
You bitch!
We got them!
All enforcements mobilize to coordinates 646!
Just rough them up a little.
And remember, my share is two thirds.
Are you ready?
Let's go.
Let's go!
Hold your gun right, idiot!
I got no hair, but I got the body.
I'm such a hottie.
Cut the crap.
Old man, I told you to use the back door.
You think my words don't count?
You son of a...
One, two, one, two.
Ready!
Ready!
Throw it!
Who the hell are you?
Where is she?
Who are you talking about?
I can't remember all my chics.
One, two...
You'll be okay, sweety.
Damn it, this is humilating.
You know who I am?
Wait!
Let's talk!
So, well...
Over there...
Put your guns down!
- Don't move or we'll shoot!
- Put your guns down!
You little assholes, how dare...
Who the hell are you?
Going up the stairs with one leg is a pain in the ass.
What are you waiting for?
Go inside!
Move it!
Diapers!
My leg!
Sons of bitches!
My money!
My money!
You stupid old man, don't be such a meanie.
We're in trouble.
We need back-up.
What are you doing?
Get in there and fight!
I hate you.
Boss!
You bastards!
I have grenades!
Shit.
Damn it!
My hands are burning.
Get them!
Hurry and stand up!
You sons of bitches!
What have I gotten myself into!
How did things turn out like this?
And is that little rat alive or what?
Hold on tight, babe.
You little rat!
You're alive!
You idiot!
How could you bring the Diapers with you?
I didn't, you moron.
They're the ones who followed me!
- Asshole!
- Yeah, asshole.
Man, you never make things any easier.
Shut up and just follow me!
Crap, we're screwed.
Oney, do something!
Yeah!
Bring it on!
Shit, we got a code fucking red here.
Get them!
Get them!
Get them!
Let go!
Let go!
I said let go!
Let go!
Damn it.
You son of a bitch!
Hey, who do you think you are?
You asshole.
Think you're a tough guy, huh?
Get him!
I'm a fake.
You lost.
Large illegal distribution of juicybars...
The toilets in Section 4 were attacked...
The Diaper Gang attacked...
Growing crimes by the Diapers...
Citizens, please stay calm.
We will poke out the axis of evil.
Useless idiots!
Wipe them all off this planet!
This situation is terribly...
I won't eat it!
I won't!
I'm not a shitmaker for you dwarves!
- We were annihilated.
- You idiot!
According to a recent report, a female in her 20s seems to be related to this case...
The Diaper Gang will rule this city soon.
Yesterday we were forgotten orphans.
But tomorrow we will stand up as remembered orphans!
Diapers!
Diapers!
Damn it!
I was a juicybar tycoon just the other day.
The Diapers are rich now that they have Beautiful, while we're homeless fugitives.
That bitch!
It's all her fault!
This sucks.
How dare you call her that!
Shut your trap!
Beautiful made you rich with all those juicybars.
Make me rich?
Screw you!
You see us with any juicybars now?
Then what the hell did you do when my Beautiful got caught?
You're the one who fainted after one punch!
I'm going.
Where are you going?
I'm going to save Beautiful.
What?
Hey, meathead!
Talk some sense!
Even the pigs can't beat them, so what the hell are you gonna do?
I'm going with or without you.
Cowards like you will always live off of snitching juicybars.
Hey!
You don't know what true love is!
Hey!
You stupid romantic.
You dumb Romeo!
We have a traitor among us.
Otherwise, it's impossible for the Diaper Gang to obliterate us like this.
Actually, since Geko was in charge of the Diaper Gang until now, we don't know their strategies.
No excuses!
Think we're weaker than those dwarfs?
We need another plan.
Doctor, long time no see.
I'll get straight to the point.
Can you revive Geko?
I created him, so it won't be so difficult.
But, I need a lot of corpses.
Very fresh ones.
If you can bring him back to life,
I'll bring you all the filth in Section 4.
I'm happy to hear that.
And one more.
Give me his corpse, too.
As you wish.
Damn it.
Wait, you!
You're that little shit!
What's up?
You little prick!
Don't you have anything better to do?
Go to school, shithead.
I was a juicybar tycoon just yesterday, damn it.
Tell me!
Tell me now!
Where's my Beautiful?
Who are you?
Where's Beautiful?
Tell me where Beautiful is!
You sons of bitches!
Shit!
My motorbike!
You assholes!
What the hell are you doing here?
Just passing by, bonehead.
Then keep going, you twirp.
Mind your own business, jackass.
You little turd.
Screw you and that pride of yours.
What, you little dwarf?
You son of a bitch.
You're the worst character in this movie!
Screw you, asshole!
My baby, daddy will do you good.
You're so adorable.
If you bring me the scientist who created Geko,
I will dispose of the Chief.
And I want the number two position in your gang.
It's yours.
But if you're thinking of betraying us or plan to do something stupid, then you'll suffer a pain worse than death.
If you don't kill the Chief, she'll kill me first.
You can be assured that I'll never betray you.
I'll be ready for you tonight.
Now do you feel like talking?
I don't know.
I don't.
Bastard must be high on juicybars.
How the hell do you not know where your home is?
Asshole!
I have no idea!
He's really not gonna talk.
This punk's pretty loyal.
We better just kill him.
No!
No!
Doctor, from now on you'll work for us.
Now even mutants come looking for me.
This will be quite a new thrill.
I'll go to any place that has fresh corpses.
Escort him out.
Escort, escort.
When will you dispose of the Chief?
No betrayer like you deserves to be in our gang.
When will you dispose of the Chief?
When will you dispose of the Chief?
When will you dispose of the Chief?
You raised a good assistant.
If you have the guts, come to the desert.
You despicable fool, how dare you betray me.
We can't find any traces of Dr. Strange.
HAIL THE DIAPER KING!
Damn it, it's boiling hot.
True love conquers everything.
My Beautiful.
Attack!
What the hell is that?
Did they already clash with the pigs?
That spells bad news for us.
This won't work.
We should think over our plan, and then come back.
We gotta finish what we started whether it kills us or not.
Stop trying to be a hero and let's just go back.
- You!
- You blockhead, go without me.
I don't wanna die.
Execution to all who are caught red-handed.
Geko, you lunatic!
It's dangerous!
Get out of here!
He's coming, he's coming.
Isn't that Beautiful?
Where?
He's coming, he's coming.
Damn it!
My head!
Long live the Diapers!
Juicybars!
Juicybars!
I told you we should've just gone back!
Then what about Beautiful?
Who's more important?
Me or Beautiful?
Beautiful.
Think you can kill me?
I'm afraid not.
I told you we should've just left!
But you go nuts over a chic!
Screw you!
Beautiful.
Stop talking crap!
Beautiful!
- Beautiful!
- Beautiful!
Hold on tight!
Hold her tight, idiot!
Beautiful's in danger!
Hurry!
Pull her in!
Do something!
Put more muscle into it!
No!
Beautiful!
Very interesting-Iooking specimens.
Geko passed the XX point, roger!
Okay, roger!
Hey!
Get it ready fast!
Fast!
Fast!
What the hell is this?
Untie me!
You crazy old bastard!
Screw you!
He's coming, roger.
What?
Coming?
Hey!
He's coming!
Here he comes!
Fire!
Stop acting like Paris Hilton!
I let you slide until now, but you've disrespected me.
I oughta slice your belly and yank out your chip.
Get ready to die!
Don't touch Beautiful.
You damn hoodlum, you're such a pain in the ass.
But no more games.
Hey!
I'm right over here!
Srew you!
No!
Die, please!
Die!
- You...
- Wait, that's...
Jimmy the freak?
When did you start working for the pigs?
But I killed you with my bare hands.
Let go!
Let go, you filthy bastard!
Die!
Die!
You son of a bitch!
What the hell?
No!
You worthless hoodlum.
Stop, you blue asshole!
You belong down there.
You son of a bitch!
Beautiful.
- You bastard!
- Beautiful.
Beautiful!
Come back here!
Save the world like you said you would.
Die!
Hey, it stopped.
How dare you.
Around and around we go!
Die!
Cut!
Cut!
Cut!
You sluts!
I told you not to do it that way!
How many times do I have to tell you!
You are charged for interfering with police duties, for organizing an illegal clan, and for murdering a policeman.
Whether dead or alive, you're coming with me.
Beautiful!
More!
Stretch a bit more!
Oh no, what is this?
You filthy bastard.
Nothing went right whenever you showed up.
I didn't do anything!
I swear!
Idiot!
Please do something about this!
I don't want to die!
I hate you!
Beautiful!
Try harder!
Do something fast!
Stretch out a bit more!
I can't anymore!
Stretch more!
Damn it!
I can't anymore.
- More!
- I can't!
I can't!
A little bit more!
I can't stand it anymore!
Be patient, sweetheart.
I'll find you one soon.
Let's find you the right toilet, so you can let out a big load!
What are you so happy about?
We're millionaires now!
Did you say "we"?
Who's "we"?
Who's "we"?
We're business partners of course!
Who asked you to be my partner?
In business, logistics is more important than production.
Got to know your stuff.
That big mouth never shuts up.
Anyway, your share is one-fifth.
Stop talking and let's jet out of here.
If you take a dump on the road, it's a huge loss.
My shit is supporting you guys.
Better be grateful.
Let's go to the city and run it dry!
SO LONG!
I'm going to have fun with this new friend.
RYU Seung-Bum, YIM Chang-Jeong, HYUN Young, SHIN Hyae-Chul executive producer KIM Seung-Bum directed by JOE Bum-Jin screenplay by JUNG Hye-Won, KANG Sang-Kyun producer KIM Sun-Ku
Red.
You look good, man.
It's been a while, hasn't it?
Haven't seen you forever.
Of course, you know that better than anybody.
I'm... surprised to see you here.
Actually, you know what, I'm not that surprised.
Listen, I'm glad you dropped by, 'cause there I've been meaning to talk to you about.
No, I-I just wanted to say...
Oh, my God!
Oh, my God!
Oh, my God!
Oh, my God!
Are you okay?
Yeah, yeah, I'm...
I'm okay.
I'm okay.
I-I am so sorry.
I was on the phone, and I was going too fast, and I just...
Oh, God, um...
I'm going to call 911, and I'm going get you an ambulance.
I'm fine, honest, I am.
Really, it's nothing.
At least, can I just...
I'm going to call the police and make a police report.
I'd really rather you not do that.
I'll tell you why.
I don't have any insurance.
No, no, no.
That's okay.
I do.
Look, it was my fault;
I know that.
And that is exactly what I will tell them.
My dad just said, if I ever got into an accident
Can I tell you something, sweetheart?
You're drunk right now, okay?
And you hit me.
Now, that's a DUI, and if you call the police, they're going to take your license away, and they're going to throw you in jail.
Now, what I'd like you to do is get in your car, drive yourself home and forget that this ever happened.
Can you do that?
I'm fine.
Go on.
I'm fine, honest, I promise.
You go.
Her name is Ally Sullivan.
She's the registered owner.
Patrol unit investigating the wreck, found the body.
So far, we have nothing on the other car.
Where's the nearest traffic camera?
Four blocks north.
We've been pulling bodies out of this neighborhood twice a month, it seems like.
I think that's actually an improvement.
Well, it's a cold night.
I'm going to get you some coffee and donuts.
Nine-nine-nine...
five-five-two.
Most people would have called 911.
Well, there's a seat-belt contusion on her shoulder.
So... she survives the crash.
She gets out of the car, She dies on the street?
Internal injuries maybe.
Maybe.
How'd the car end up in this position?
It looks like she caused the wreck.
Usually, the guy who hits is the guy who runs.
Well, either way, they left the scene, so it's still a hit-and-run.
And this girl's dead.
So we may have a murderer.
It's late.
I was worried.
Sorry.
Love you.
I love you, too.
Ally was out late all the time.
I never worried about her.
She liked night clubs?
She liked the club business.
She wasn't a party girl.
She wanted to be a VIP hostess.
Way you do that in this town is you... get your face out there,
meet the right people, be seen.
I taught her to be responsible.
If there was an accident, call the police.
Help anyone who needed it.
I'd say to her all the time, no matter how pretty are today, someday, all that will be gone.
She knew that.
She knew she had to treat people with respect.
She always did the right thing;
that's why I don't get it.
Whoever was in the other car...
I don't care why they left.
All they had to do was call an ambulance instead of leaving her there to die.
C.O.D. was hyper-extension of the neck with a rotational snap, resulting in a ruptured vertebral artery, mid-cervical.
Mid?
Most MVA's break down low or up high, don't they?
That's why I don't think the accident did it.
The injury was more consistent with a stranglehold.
The head was rapidly twisted relative to the spinal column.
She would have been dead within a minute.
Whoever killed this poor kid knew what they were doing.
I don't like Gruyere, Daddy.
There's no Gruyere in it, sweetie;
I promise.
All right, egg me.
Hello, Mommy.
I'm cooking.
I see that.
Good morning, honey.
Good morning.
Yeah, well, the jury's still out on that as far as you're concerned.
You must have had quite a night.
Yeah.
I guess I lost track of time.
That Joey's a dog.
If you don't watch out, he's going to get you into trouble.
I kind of doubt that.
I wouldn't worry, though.
It won't happen again.
These days, I'm all about you, baby.
I'm the baby.
I know.
I know, but daddies can have more than one baby.
- Yeah, pretty talk, talk, talk.
- Here, wait, wait.
Try this, try this.
Maddy made them.
Mm, it's delicious.
Very good.
I'm glad you shaved.
I barely recognized you under all that scruff.
Hadn't quite finished that.
Hello, rapist.
Man, I'm not a rapist.
I was a date rapist, which is not even the same thing.
And besides, back then, roofies were in.
So you miss the action of the good old days, huh?
It's not like that.
It's not like that at all.
What's it like?
Can I get a soda, too?
I'm, like, parched.
You want to tell me what your fingerprints are doing on a cup in a dead girl's car?
I was out at Jet...
I was kind of faded, I guess.
Um, I bumped into Ally, and she offered me a ride home.
I needed it.
So that's what you were doing on Harmon Road?
Yeah, Ally don't care where I live; she's a cool girl.
You were close?
Were you banging her?
So, what, are you like, pen pals?
Girlfriends?
What?
No, look, we really didn't talk that much.
But we would text all the time.
That's, like, when you use your cell phone to send, like, you know, words.
Yeah.
I know what text messaging is.
Fine.
Sorry.
Look, I'm telling you the truth, you really couldn't get Ally on the phone, it's all texting with her.
Well, what do you want my DNA?
You want me to pee into a cup?
You want my underwear?
Whatever you want, you got it, cause I didn't kill Ally.
I'll tell you what I want...
Paint scrapings from your vic's bumper are consistent with a '91 to '96 blue Ford.
So that narrows it down to a few thousand cars in the greater Las Vegas area.
Yeah, but the car you're looking for is also a piece of crap.
Make and model I get, but unless you have a new test that quantifies "crappiness"...
Actually, take a look.
Silver Firebird's on the left, blue Ford on the right.
What's the gray-blue in the middle?
A mixture of Rustoleum and house paint.
The killer's car had exposed primer.
Swanky.
Might have found a few letters from the license plate.
- "Y-K-A."
- You found a witness?
Just behavior.
But according to Ally Sullivan's father, she was the type of girl that might have noticed the license plate of the car that hit her.
And according to her good friend, she preferred text messaging to leaving voice messages.
She was dying, right?
Disoriented?
I don't know, but maybe she thought she was texting when in fact she was just dialing her phone.
That's a bit of a long shot.
It's still a shot.
Good evening, I'm Paula Francis.
A weekend of sordid crimes has Las Vegas Police working double-time.
You don't hit on a cocktail waitress at the bar.
Go sit at a table, then she's got a reason to come over and serve you, and it's less obvious.
Hold on.
Wait, wait.
The househusband's giving me tips on women?
I married a cocktail waitress.
Janice-- cocktail?
- This crappy little joint in Cleveland.
- Really?
I'm not looking to marry this broad.
Although, she might think so.
At least for tonight.
Joey, you're, like, 40-something, right.
- Shouldn't you be toning it down a little?
- Tone it down?
Karl, I'm looking to take it up a notch.
I got, like, ten more years of fun left and my wingman's got a curfew.
Why'd you bail out so early last night?
I missed my family.
You're so sweet.
You should work for Hallmark.
I'll send them my resume.
It wasn't the smell that got my attention, you know?
Usually when I find a body, it's, uh, it's very, um, raunchy.
It's called "decomp," in case you're interested.
I'll remember that for next time.
If it wasn't the smell, why did you check the room?
Rent is due every week.
What's his name?
We ask for cash, not names.
We take who the casinos won't.
Someone's got to do it.
Did you touch or move anything?
First thing I did was call you guys.
Got you on speed dial.
And finally, in local crime, an update on yesterday's tragic death of Vegas party girl Ally Sullivan.
Police are still examining all the evidence from the gruesome crime scene.
Detectives tell Eyewitness News they have little to work with.
And something that stumps them:
What was the motive for the killer in this violent end to a young and beautifu life?
Mr. Sullivan, when was the last time you saw her alive?
What are you people thinking?
Think I'm going to say something magical, bring Ally back to me?
I'm not talking to you people.
Police are hoping that passersby or other eyewitnesses will come forward to help the investigation of this terrible murder.
If you have information that might help police, you are urged to call LVPD at the toll-free number on the screen.
Control, this is Detective Curtis.
I'm at 1773 Twain, Riviera Suites.
I got a 419.
I need CSI.
You know, I think I've been called out to this place before.
I think I've processed this very room before.
Liver temp is close to ambient.
But lividity is fixed.
And rigidity starting to pass.
So he's been dead for at least 20 hours.
".380
Auto." That's Federal ammo.
.380s make a lot of noise.
It's odd that no one heard anything, even in a dump like this.
"Walther PPK."
Two shots in the body, one to the head.
Sounds like a professional hit to me.
Looks like the killer used Armor All.
The gun is clean.
Looks like the victim was doing a little cleaning of his own.
He was a 12 Stepper.
Trying to make amends.
He was on step number nine.
Apparently not enough.
Well, it's pretty obvious he came in through the window.
One thing's for sure, this killer's lugging around some pretty big dogs.
I just ID'd those fibers you found on Ally Sullivan's necklace.
They were not from her jacket or her dress.
They're made of lambskin and rabbit fur.
You know, just between you and me, I used to carry a rabbit's foot.
I mean, I'm not superstitious.
It's just, I figure why take the chance?
You know, as a kid, my grandfather used to have a rabbit farm.
Is this our Ford Taurus?
Once upon a time.
Told you it was a piece of crap.
The vehicle was abandoned near a junkyard off Boulder Highway.
By the time they checked the plates, it was already in the crusher.
Plates and paint are a match to your BOLO.
Did Brass run those tags?
Yeah, it was last registered to a Betty Grinly in Henderson.
She passed away last month.
Gasoline.
They torched it.
So he burns the evidence near a junkyard so that they'll find it and dispose of it.
Clever.
Looks like we're dealing with a professional.
Professional what, though?
Ally Sullivan was killed over a fender bender.
You're right.
He probably just loved his car and has a really bad temper.
And he likes pineapples.
Ah, yeah, I remember that Taurus.
Cheap and reliable.
That combo always sells.
Could you give me a description of the person who bought it?
Honey, I'm not even sure I can tell what you look like.
All I remember is he came off the bus... he walked right up with a big wad of cash.
I put him in that Taurus, and 15 minutes later, he drove off the lot.
Did you get a transaction record?
Let's see.
Taurus, Taurus, Taurus, Taurus...
Ah, here you go.
This is for a '99 Jeep Cherokee.
It sure is.
Um, hold it.
It's over here.
How's that one look?
Not so great.
The coroner's bullets matched the Walther, but Bobby found an additional striated mark on the O-jive, so he went back to the gun.
There was threading inside the muzzle.
Killer used a silencer.
Slightest imperfection in the barrel of a silencer could explain these scratches on the bullet.
Oh.
Also explains why no one heard anything.
But leave the gun, take the silencer?
Well, you can't legally buy a silencer, and those things are hard to make.
If the silencer was homemade, we might have been able to match the killer's tool marks.
Assuming we ever find this guy.
I don't know who would go through this much trouble to kill a nobody like Nash.
Well, he was a somebody to the killer. with this week's creep report.
If you were planning on checking out that new club, Bubbles, down near Harmon and Twain, you might want to think twice, because the corpses are really piling up down there.
The body of Clayton Nash vas found just two blocks away from the site of Ally Sullivan's murder, and the killer's still at large.
Is this just another crime spree, or the work of one deranged maniac?
Don't ask the cops.
They don't have a clue.
Remember, Amanda warned you.
What are you doing?
Not even ready for dinner.
I was checking our stocks.
Well, you're not wearing that to the Eiffel Tower.
I'll throw some clothes on.
Hurry up.
My mom's waiting for Maddy.
- I don't want to lose that table.
- Two seconds.
Well, now, who's that beautiful girl, huh?
So, you drive Route 107 Southbound during the week, is that right?
6:00 a.m. to 6:00 p.m. Yeah, I'm a morning person.
Now, is there any chance, any chance at all, that you remember this guy?
I know it's not the best picture.
I let him out on stop "E" around 4:30 day before yesterday.
Oh, you know, you get hundreds of people on and off your bus every day.
We got to be sure-- are you sure you remember him?
I look at every face that steps on my ride.
I saw the movie Speed-- I'm not gonna be hijacked.
Well, you know, actually Speed, it... it wasn't hijacked, it was wired to explode.
- Whatever.
- Well, all right.
What exactly do you remember about him?
He paid in cash, told me to keep the change-- everybody else uses a bus pass.
He was a real gentleman-- tucked-in shirt, new shoes...
Nice smell.
Kind of stands out on my route.
So I guess you remember where you picked him up, then?
He came walking out of the desert like Moses himself.
So the bus driver said the guy got on here?
You sure this is a working stop?
You know, the Cat bus stops here 59 times a day.
For what?
Construction workers, hikers, migrants.
The name on the driver's license was fake, but the picture's got to be real.
I'm gonna go... wave it around the neighborhood.
Assuming our guy's not from around here, how'd he get here?
The same way they did.
Every time I come to the desert, I see porno mags.
Who brings spankables out here?
It's probably just trash blown in from off the street.
Nobody throws away porn.
They're like heirlooms.
You'd better check this out.
A single set of ATV tracks goes off the trail back there into here-- killer could've dumped the ATV and then got on the bus.
Whoever was here had some big shoes.
Not necessarily big feet.
Multiple socks.
Another precaution to cover your tracks.
Assuming it's our guy.
I'd say it's our guy.
And I think he just gave us the finger.
I have an update for you.
The burned gloves that Nick submitted are lambskin lined with rabbit's fur.
They're consistent with the fibers found in Ally Sullivan's necklace.
Good.
Thanks.
I'm guessing that Clayton Nash had a record.
1985, aiding and abetting, extortion in '87, armed robbery in '92, assault in '95, uh, loan sharking the same year.
I get the drift.
But, uh, take a look at this-- it's FBI surveillance.
What is this, summer camp?
Well, not the kind you want to send your kid to- they're bank robbers.
- All of them?
Apparently, Nash and his buddies would get together every year, talk shop, hire hookers, play flag football.
Nash did mostly grunt work-- driver, lookout.
Never handled the cash.
He got busted in an armored car heist in Ohio ten years ago.
Testified against practically everyone he'd ever worked with.
Well, that certainly explains why someone would want to kill him.
Most of those people in the picture are either dead or in prison.
Who isn't?
Give me a Heine, please.
What is that?
Anybody should be drinking water, it's me, let me tell ya.
Really blasted my quads.
Let's do shooters.
Wanna?
Let's pretend... that you're wearing a suit, and let's pretend we're in your office, and let's pretend I just cut you a big check for your services because you are still my damn lawyer.
All right, man, all right, I'm listening.
There's some stuff I need.
No particular order.
Credit card blanks?
- DMV license blanks?
What is this?
- No questions.
Laminating machine, blank bar code labels.
What are you doing?
What makes you think I can even get this stuff?
I know the guys you represent.
I'm one of 'em.
I need the stuff fast.
Don't let me down.
There was no reason to connect the two murders until ballistics matched the silencer we found in the desert with the gun you found at the Riviera Suites.
Two murders, same killer.
Here's how we think things went down.
The killer drove his ATV into the desert, concealed it in the brush, takes a bus to a used car lot and buys a blue Taurus.
Then he drives to the apartment, puts a cap in Clayton Nash, gets into his car and drives away, free and clear.
It's a good plan, well executed.
Yeah, right up until the point that Ally Sullivan smashed into his car.
Collateral damage-- he killed her so she couldn't identify him.
Okay, that all sounds great.
How do we find the guy?
We know his original target, Clayton Nash.
Small-time hood who gave up a lot of his big-time cronies.
He's got a list of enemies.
How many guys got convicted off Nash's testimony?
Seven.
Three of them are still in prison.
One is dead, one is out on parole, and two served their time and are now out.
So we have three potential killers and nothing to tie them to either crime scene.
Not quite.
I ruled out most of the prints from Ally Sullivan's car-- the vic, the father, her boyfriend-- but there were a few unidentified partials.
It's not enough detail to run through AFIS?
Well, if this guy is a major case felon, then his prints are definitely in the system.
I dusted every inch of that apartment window.
He never took off his gloves.
You going somewhere?
The fake ID cards?
!
The staying out all night, and then this mysterious ATV ride in the desert.
You gave me the ATV for my birthday.
I ride it because I love you.
Yeah, at 3:00 in the morning?
- You're planning a job.
- I'm not planning a job!
You know I don't do that anymore.
You're a liar, Karl.
- You're lying!
- Honey, listen-- honey!
Janice, look...
I had to take care of something.
And what's that supposed to mean?
I killed Clayton Nash.
You even think about Maddy?
Your daughter?
You promised... on her life, you promised!
No more robberies!
I don't do robberies anymore.
- Now you just kill people.
- He was a rat.
All the waiting.
All the maneuvering, the lying.
I did it.
And I did it for us, for this family.
I kept money in our wallets.
I invested it, so all you had to do was watch football on TV.
And Nash was the reason.
The reason that you had to hide the money and live on the run.
I never got caught!
And I never would've got caught, except for that... that lousy junkie who gave me up.
I only had one rule:
you never talk!
And he talked.
And you jeopardized everything we have for some scumbag that nobody gives a damn about.
Janice, he called me four weeks ago.
He said, "I'm in town for a while.
Maybe we could we get together."
He had something to tell me.
Tell me what?
"I'm sorry?
I'm sorry I stole seven years of your life."
I-I couldn't let it go.
Oh, God, he had it coming.
And you were careful, right?
So what's with the fake IDs?
You don't make mistakes.
I didn't.
Somebody else did.
A girl named Ally Sullivan.
The girl on the TV?
Oh, God, she was just a kid!
She crashed into my car right after I did Nash.
She was gonna call the cops.
I had to do it.
I had to.
I want you to go up the stairs.
I want you to kiss Maddy.
I want you to tell her that you love her... and I want you to get out of this house.
Karl Cooper.
At age 19, he was an Army Ranger.
By 42, he was one of the most successful bank robbers in U.S. history.
He pulled off dozens of heists, going back two decades, all without killing a single person, and he was known to his bank-robbing buddies as "Red."
He doesn't have red hair.
Well, he got the nickname because he was always in debt...
"in the red."
Do we have In The Red's address?
Last known was the U.S. Federal Penitentiary in Marion, Illinois.
When Nash gave him up, Cooper plead guilty.
He served the full seven years term.
He got out, dropped off the face of the earth.
The tire model is a Dunlop KT-345.
I checked with the local dealers.
The only ATV that uses that particular type of tire has only been on the market for about a year.
It's called the Yamaha Raptor.
So I got the list of the names of everybody in Las Vegas who's recently bought one.
The only Cooper on the list is female-
- Janice.
Well, Karl Cooper had a girlfriend back in Ohio, a Janice Hanford.
I mean, she could be Cooper now.
- Do we have her address?
- Yeah.
It's, uh, second page.
I think you broke the case, Nick.
Sweetie, come with me, okay?
Las Vegas police.
Open up!
Janice Cooper?
- We're looking for your husband.
- He's not here.
Don't take it personally, but I'm not going to take your word for that.
You guys never do.
Look around all you like.
Please step outside with the child.
It's for your own safety.
Like I said, he's not here.
Mommy doesn't like you.
Really?
Well, that's too bad.
She hardly even knows me.
Maddy, you be nice, baby, okay?
Definitely.
Let's all be nice.
ATV has the right tires and there are plenty of machine tools and parts back there to build a silencer.
- Where's Karl?
- Go to hell.
All right.
Here's the way it is.
You're going to jail, she's going to Child Services.
End of story.
I've had cops in my face for half my life.
- You don't scare me.
- Well, maybe that's your lawyer now.
Hello?
Just answer yes or no-- are the cops there?
Yes.
Are they threatening to take Maddy?
Yes.
That's what happens when you marry a crook.
- I think they're tracing this call.
- I'll take that phone.
Hey, Officer.
I'm going to make your day.
Uncuff him, will you, Mitch?
Karl.
Don't do anything stupid.
- Palms out, please.
- I know the drill.
So, tell me...
Where'd I go wrong?
You killed two people.
Transcript :
Raceman
Subtitles:
AbraCadaver Team
Red.
Hey.
You look good, man.
It's been a while, hasn't it
Haven't seen you forever.
Of course, you know that better than anybody.
I'm... surprised to see you here.
Actually, you know what, I'm not that surprised.
Listen, I'm glad you dropped by, 'cause there's something
I've been meaning to talk to you about.
No, I-I just wanted to say...
?
...
Let the good times roll
?
Good times roll...?
Oh, my God!
Oh, my God.
Are you.
Are you okay?
Yeah, yeah, I'm...
I'm okay.
I'm okay.
I
- I am so sorry.
I was on the phone, and I was going too fast, and I just
Oh, God, um...
I'm going to call 911, and I'm going get you an ambulance.
I'm fine, honest, I am.
Okay.
Really, it's nothing.
At least, can I just...
I'm going to call the police and make a police report.
I'd really rather you not do that.
I'll tell you why.
I don't, uh, I don't have any insurance.
No, no, no
That's okay.
I do.
Look, it was my fault;
I know that.
And that is exactly what I will tell them.
My dad just said, if I ever got into an accident that I had to make a police report.
Can I tell you something, sweetheart?
You're drunk right now, okay?
And you hit me
Now, that's a dui, and if you call the police, they're going to take your license away, and they're going to throw you in jail.
Now, what I'd like you to do is get in your car, drive yourself home and forget that this ever happened.
Can you do that?
I'm fine.
Go on.
I'm fine, honest, I promise.
You go
Okay.
Her name is Ally Sullivan.
She's the registered owner.
Patrol unit investigating the wreck, found the body.
So far, we have nothing on the other car.
Where's the nearest traffic camera?
Four blocks north.
We've been pulling bodies out of this neighborhood twice a month, it seems like.
I think that's actually an improvement.
Yeah.
Well, it's a cold night.
I'm going to get you some coffee and doughnuts.
Nine, nine, nine, five, five, two.
Most people would have called 911.
Well, there's a seat-belt contusion on her shoulder.
So... she survives the crash.
She gets out of the car,
She dies on the street?
Internal injuries maybe.
Maybe.
How'd the car end up in this position though?
It looks like shecaused the wreck.
Usually, the guy who hits is the guy who runs.
Well, either way, they left the scene, so it's still a hit-and-run.
And this girl's dead.
So we may have a murderer.
It's late.
I was worried.
Sorry.
Love you.
I love you, too.
?
Who... are you?
?
Who, who, who, who?
?
Who... are you?
?
Who, who, who, who?
?
I really want to know?
?
Who... are you?
?
Oh-oh-oh?
?
Who...?
?
Come on, tell me who are you, you, you?
?
Oh, you!
?
Ally was out late all the time.
I never worried about her.
She liked night clubs?
She liked the club business.
She wasn't a party girl.
She wanted to be a VIP hostess.
Way you do that in this town is you...
get your face out there, meet the right people, be seen.
I taught her to be responsible.
If there was an accident, call the police.
Help anyone who needed it.
I'd say to her all the time, no matter how pretty you are today, someday, all that will be gone.
She knew that.
She knew she had to treat people with respect.
She always did the right thing;
that's why I don't get it.
Whoever was in the other car...
I don't care why they left
All they had to do was call an ambulance instead of leaving her there to die.
C.O.D. was hyper-extensio n of the neck with a rotational snap , resulting in a ruptured vertebral artery, mid-cervical.
Mid?
Yeah.
Most MVA's break down low or up high, don't they?
That's why I don't think the accident did it.
The injury was more consistent with a stranglehold.
The head was rapidly twisted relative to the spinal column.
She would have been dead within a minute.
Whoever killed this poor kid knew what they were doing.
I don't like Gruyere, Daddy.
No Gruyere in it, sweetie;
I promise.
All right, egg me.
Hello, Mommy.
I'm cooking.
I see that
Good morning, honey.
Morning.
Yeah, well, the jury's still out on that as far you're concerned.
You must have had quite a night.
Yeah.
I guess I lost track of time.
That Joey's a dog.
If you don't watch out, he's going to get you into trouble.
I kind of doubt that.
I wouldn't worry, though
It won't happen again.
These days, I'm all about you, baby.
I'm the baby.
I know.
I know, but daddies can have more than one baby.
Yeah, pretty talk, talk, talk.
Here, wait, wait.
Try this, try this.
Maddy made them.
Mm, it's delicious.
Very good.
I'm glad you shaved.
I barely recognized you under all that scruff.
Hadn't quite finished that
Hello, rapist.
Man, I'm not a rapist.
I was a date rapist, which is not even the same thing.
And besides, back then, roofies were in.
So you miss the action of the good old days, huh?
It's not like that.
It's not like that at all.
What's it like?
Can I get a soda, too?
I'm, like, parched.
You want to tell me what your fingerprints are doing on a cup in a dead girl's car?
Uh, yeah, yeah.
I was out at Jet...
I was kind of faded, I guess.
Um, I bumped into Ally, and she offered me a ride home.
I needed it.
So that's what you were doing on Harmon Road?
Yeah, Ally don't care where I live; she's a cool girl.
You were close?
Oh, yeah.
Were you banging her?
Nah.
So, what, are you like, pen pals?
Girlfriends?
What?
No, look, we really didn't talk that much.
But we would text all the time.
That's, like, when you use your cell phone to send, like, you know, words.
Yeah.
I know what text messaging is.
Fine.
Sorry.
Look, I'm telling you the truth, you really couldn't get Ally on the phone, it's all texting with her.
Well, what do you want my DNA?
You want me to pee into a cup?
You want my underwear?
Whatever you want, you got it, 'cause I didn't kill Ally.
I'll tell you what I want.
I want you to write down exactly where you were last night and when.
Paint scrapings from your vic's bu mper are consistent with a '91 to '96 blue Ford.
So that narrows it down to a few thousand cars in the greater Las Vegas area.
Yeah, but the car you're looki ng for is also a piece of crap.
Make and model I get, but unless you have a new test that quantifies "crappiness"..
Actually, take a look.
Silver Firebird's on the left, blue Ford on the right.
What's the gray-blue in the middle?
A mixture of Rustoleum and house paint.
The killer's car had exposed primer.
Swanky.
Might have found a few letters from the license plate.
"Y-K-A."
You found a witness?
No.
Just behavior.
But according to Ally Sullivan's father, she was the type of girl that might have noticed the license plate of the car that hit her.
And according to her good friend, she preferred text messaging to leaving voice messages.
She was dying, right?
Disoriented?
I don't know, but maybe she thought she was texting when in fact she was just dialing the phone.
That's a bit of a long shot.
Yeah.
It's still a shot.
Good evening.
I'm Paula Francis.
A weekend of sordid crimes has
Las Vegas Police working double-time.
At the same time, the police union is arguing for more pay.
They say they're doing all they can to protect residents, but the pay scale...
Yeah, yeah, okay.
Joey?
Joey?
Hey.
You don't hit on a cocktail waitressatthe bar.
Go sit at a table, then she's got a reason to come over and serve you, and it's less obvious.
Hold on.
Wait, wait.
The househusband's giving me tips on women?
I married a cocktail waitress.
Janice cocktailed?
This crappy little joint in Cleveland.
Really?
Mm-hmm.
I'm not looking to marry this broad.
Although, she might think so.
At least for tonight.
Ah.
Joey, you're, like, 40-something, right?
Shouldn't you be toning it down a little?
Tone it down?
Karl, I'm looking to take it up a notch.
I got, like, ten more years of fun left and my wingman's got a curfew.
No
Why'd you bail out so early last night?
I missed my family.
That's so sweet.
You should work for Hallmark.
I'll send them my resume
It wasn't the smell that got my attention, you know?
Usually when I find a body, it's, uh, it's very, um, raunchy.
It's called "decomp," in case you're interested.
I'll remember that for next time.
If it wasn't the smell, why did you check the room?
Rent is due every week
What's his name?
We ask for cash, not names.
We take who the casinos won't.
Someone's got to do it.
Did you touch or move anything?
First thing I di d was call you guys.
Got you on speed dial.
And finally, in local crime, an update on yesterday's tragic death of Vegas party girl Ally Sullivan.
Police are still examining all the evidence from the gruesome crime scene.
Detectives tell Eyewitness News they have little to work with.
And something that stumps them:
What was the motive for the killer in this violent end to a young and beautiful life?
Mr. Sullivan, when was the last ti me you saw her alive?
What are you people thinking?
Think I'm going to say something magical, bring Ally back to me?
I'm not talking to you people.
Mr. Sullivan, what was your daughter doing in that section of town?
You think it was drug-relate d?
Police are hoping passersby or other eyewitnesses will come forward to help in the investigation of this terrible murder.
If you have information that might help police, you are urged to call LVPD at the toll-free number on the screen.
Control, this is Detective Curtis.
I'm at 1773 Twain, Riviera Suites.
I got a 419.
I need CSI.
You know, I think
I've been called out to this place before.
I think I've processed this very room before.
Liver temp is close to ambient.
But lividity is fixed.
And rigidity starting to pass.
So he's been dead for at least 20 hours.
".380
Auto. "
That's Federal ammo.
.380s make a lot of noise.
It's odd that no one heard anything, even in a dump like this.
"Walther PPK."
Two shots in the body, one to the head.
Sounds like a professional hit to me.
Looks like the killer used Armor All.
The gun is clean.
Looks like the victim was doing a little cleaning of his own.
He was a 12 Stepper.
Trying to make amends.
He was on step number nine.
Apparently not enough.
Well, it's pretty obvious that he came in through the window.
Whew.
One thing's for sure, this killer's lugging arou nd some pretty big dogs.
Oh.
Hey, Grissom, I just I.D.'d those fibers you found on Ally Sullivan's necklace.
They were not from her jacket or her dress.
They're made of lambskin and rabbit fur.
You know, just between you and me,
I used to carry a rabbit's foot.
I mean, I'm not superstitious.
It's just, I figure why take the chance?
You know, as a kid, my grandfather used to have a rabbit farm.
Is this our Ford Taurus?
Once upon a time.
Told you it was a piece of crap.
The vehicle was abando ned near a junkyard off Boulder Highway.
By the time they checked the plates, it was already in the crusher.
Plates and paint are a match to your BOLO.
Did Brass run those tags?
Yeah, it was last registered to a Betty Grinly in Henderson.
She passed away last month.
Gasoline.
They torched it.
So he burns the evidence near a junkyard so that they'll find it and dispose of it.
Clever.
Looks like we're dealing with a professional.
Professional what, though?
Ally Sullivan was killed over a fender bender.
You're right.
He probably just loved his car and has a really bad temper.
And he likes pineapples.
Ah, yeah, I remember that Taurus.
Cheap and reliable.
That combo always sells.
Could you give me a description of the person who bought it?
Honey, I'm not even sure I can tell what you look like.
All I remember is he came off the bus... he walked right up with a big wad of cash.
I put him in that Taurus, and 15 minutes later, he drove off the lot.
Did you get a transaction record?
Let's see.
Taurus, Taurus, Taurus, Taurus...
Ah, here you go.
This is for a '99 Jeep Cherokee.
It sure is.
Um, hold it.
It's over here.
How's that one look?
Not so great.
The coroner's bullets matched the Walther, but Bobby found an additional striated mark on the O-jive, so he went back to the gun.
There was threading inside the muzzle.
Killer used a silencer.
Slightest imperfection in the barrel of a silencer could explain these scratches on the bullet.
Oh.
Also explains why no one heard anything.
But.
leave the gun, take the silencer?
Well, you can't legally buy a silencer, and those things are hard to make.
If the silencer was homemade, we might have been able to match the killer's tool marks.
Assuming we ever find this guy.
I don't know who would go to this much trouble to kill a nobody like Nash.
Well, he was a somebody to the killer.
Hey, people, Amanda Congdon from rocketboom. com with this week's creep report.
If you were planning on checking out that new club, Bubbles, down near Harmon and Twain, you might want to think twice, because the corpses are really piling up down there.
The body of Clayton Nash was found just two blocks away from the site of Ally Sullivan's murder, and the killer's still at large.
Is this just another crime spree, or the work of one deranged maniac?
Don't ask the cops.
They don't have a clue.
Remember, Amanda warned you.
Carl?
Mm What are you doing?
Oh Not even ready for dinner.
I was checking our stocks.
Well, you're not wearing that to the Eiffel Tower.
I'll throw some clothes on
Hurry up.
My mom's waiting for Maddy.
I don't want to lose that table.
Two seconds.
Okay.
Well, now, who's that beautiful girl, huh?
So, you drive Route 107 Southbound during the week, is that right?
6:00 a. m.
to 6:00 p. m.
Yeah, I'm a morning person
Now, is there any chance, any chance at all, that you remember this guy?
I know it's not the best picture.
Oh, yeah.
I let him out on stop "E" around 4:30 day before yesterday.
You know, you get hundreds of people on and off your bus every day.
We got to be sure- are you sure you remember him?
I look at every face that steps on my ride.
I saw the movieSpeed
- I'm not gonna be hijacked.
Well, you know, actuallySpeed, it... it wasn't hijacked, it was wired to explode.
Whatever.
Well, all right.
What exactly do you remember about him?
He paid in cash, told me to keep the change- everybody else uses a bus pass.
He was a real gentleman- tucked-in shirt, new shoes...
Nice smell.
Kind of stands out on my route.
So I guess you remember where you picked him up, then?
He came walking out of the desert like Moses himself.
So the bus driver said the guy got on here?
You sure this is a working stop?
You know, the Cat bus stops here 59 times a day.
For what?
Construction workers, hikers, migrants.
se The name on the driver's licen is fake, but the picture' s got to be real
I'm gonna go... wave it around the neighborhood.
Okay.
Assuming our guy's not from around here, how'd he get here?
The same way they did.
Every time I come to the desert,
I see porno mags.
Who brings spankables out here?
It's probably just trash blown in from off the street.
Nobody throws away porn.
They're like heirlooms.
Passed on down the family tree.
Hey, Greg.
Come here and check this out.
A single set of ATV tracks goes off the trail back there into here - killer could've dumped the ATV and then got on the bus.
Whoever was here had some big shoes.
Not necessarily big feet.
Multiple socks.
Another precaution to cover your tracks.
Assuming it's our guy.
I'd say it's our guy.
And I think he just gave us the finger.
I have an update for you.
The burned gloves that Nick submitted are lambskin lined with rabbit's fur.
They're consistent with the fibers found in Ally Sullivan's necklace.
Good.
Thanks.
Mm-hmm.
I'm guessing that Clayton Nash had a record.
1985, aldi ng and abetting, extortion in '87, armed robbery in '92, assault in '95, uh, loan shark ing the same year.
I get the drift.
But, uh, take a look at this- - it's FBI surveillance.
What is this, summer camp?
Well, not the kind you want to send your kid to- they're bank robbers.
All of them?
Apparently, Nash and his buddies would get together every year, talk shop, hire hookers, play flag football.
Nash did mostly grunt work- driver, lookout
Never handled the cash.
He got busted in an armored car heist in Ohio ten years ago.
Testified against practically everyone he'd ever worked with
Well, that certainly explains why someone would want to kill him.
Most of those people in the picture are either dead or in prison.
Who isn't?
Give me a Heine, please.
What is that?
Anybody should be drinking water, it's me, let me tell ya.
Really blasted my quads.
Let's do shooters.
Wanna?
Let's pretend...
that you're wearing a suit, and let's pretend we're inyouroffice, and let's pretend I ju st cut you a big check for your services because you are st ill my damn lawyer.
All right, man, all right, I'm listening.
There's some stuff I need.
No particular order.
Credit card blanks?
DMV license blanks?
What is this?
No questions.
Laminating machine, blank bar code labels.
What are you doing?
What makes you think I can even get this stuff?
I know the guy s you represent.
I'm one of 'em.
I need the stuff fast.
Don't let me down.
There was no reason to connect the two murders until ballistics matched the silencer we found in the desert with the gun you found at the Riviera Suites.
Two murders, same killer.
Here's how we th ink things went down.
The killer drove his ATV into the desert, sh, concealed it in the bru takes a bus to a used car lot and buys a blue Taurus
Then he drives to the apartment, puts a cap in Clayton Nash, gets into his car and drives away, free and clear.
It's a good plan, well executed.
Yeah, right up until the point that Ally Sullivan smashed into his car.
Collateral damage- he killed her so she couldn't identify him.
Okay, that all sounds great.
How do we find the guy?
We know his original target, Clayton Nash.
Small-time hood who gave up a lot of his big-time cronies.
He's got a list of enemies
How many guys got convicted off Nash's testimony?
Seven.
Three of them are still in prison.
One is dead, one is out on parole, and two served their time and are now out.
So we have three potential killers and nothing to tie them to either crime scene.
Not quite.
I ruled out most of the prints from Ally Sullivan's car- the vic, the father, her boyfriend- but there are a few unidentified partials.
It's not enough detail to run through AFIS?
Well, if this guy is a major case felon, then his prints are definitely in the system.
I dusted every inch of that apartment window.
He never took off his gloves.
You going somewhere?
The fake I.D. cards?
!
The staying out all night, and then this mysterious ATV ride in the desert.
You gave me the ATV for my birthday.
I ride it because I love you.
Yeah, at 3:00 in the morning?
Yeah.
Uh-uh.
You're planning a job.
I'm not planning a job!
You know I don't do that anymore.
You're a liar, Karl.
You're lying!
Honey, listen- honey!
Janice, look...
I had to take care of something.
And what's that supposed to mean?
I killed Clayton Nash.
You even think about Maddy?
Your daughter?
You promised... on her life, you promised!
No more robberies!
I don't do robberies any more.
Now you just kill people.
He was a rat.
Oh, Karl.
All the waiting.
All the maneuvering, the lying.
I did it.
And I did it for us, for this family.
I kept money in our wallets.
I invested it, so all you had to do was watch football on TV.
And Nash was the reason.
The reason that you had to hide the money and live on the run.
I never got caught
And I never would've got caught, except for that...
that lousy junkie who gave me up.
I only had one rule:
you never talk!
And he talked.
And you jeopardized everything we have for some scumbag that nobody gives a damn about.
Janice, he called me four weeks ago.
He said, "I'm in town for a while
Maybe we could we get together. "
He had something to tell me.
Tell me what?
"I'm sorry?
I'm sorry I stole seven years of your life. "
I
- I couldn't let it go.
Oh, God, he had it coming.
And you were careful, right
So what's with the fake I.D.s?
Karl?
You don't make mistakes.
I didn't.
Somebody else did.
A girl named Ally Sullivan.
The...
The girl on the TV?
Oh, Karl!
Oh, God, she was just a kid!
She crashed into my car right after I did Nash
She was gonna call the cops.
I had to do it
I had to.
I want you to go up the stairs.
I want you to kiss Maddy.
I want you to tell her that you love her... and I want you to get out of this house.
Karl Cooper.
At age 19, he was an Army Ranger
By 42, he was one of the most successful bank robbers in U.S. history.
He pulled off dozens of heists, going back two decades, all without killing a single person, and he was known to his bank-robbin g buddies as "Red. "
He doesn't have red hair
Well, he got the nickname because he was always in debt... "in the red. "
Do we have In The Red's address?
Last known was the U.S. Federal Penitentiary in Marion, Illinois.
When Nash gave him up,
Cooper plead guilty.
He served the fu ll seven years term
He got out, dropped of f the face of the earth.
The tire model is a Dunlop KT-345
I checked with the local dealers.
The only ATV that uses that particular type of tire has only been on the market for about a year.
It's called the Yamaha Raptor.
So I got the list of the names of everybody in Las Vegas who's recently bought one.
The only Cooper on the list is female
- Janice.
Well, Karl Cooper had a girlfriend back in Ohio, a Janice Hanford.
I mean, she could be Cooper now.
Do we have her address?
Yeah.
It's, uh, second page.
I think you broke the case, Nick.
Maddy...
Sweetie, come with me, okay?
Las Vegas police.
Open up!
Janice Cooper?
Yeah.
We're looking for your husband.
He's not here.
Don't take it personally, but I'm not going to take your word for that.
You guys never do.
Look around all you like.
Please step outside with the child.
It's for your own safety.
Like I said, he's not here.
Mommy doesn't like you.
Really?
Well, that's too bad
She hardly even knows me.
Maddy, you be nice, baby, okay?
Definitely.
Let's all be nice.
Jim...
ATV has the right tires and there are plenty of machine tools and parts back there to build a silencer.
Where's Karl.
Go to hell.
All right.
Here's the way it is.
You're going to jail, she's going to Child Services.
End of story.
I've had cops in my face for half my life.
You don't scare me.
Well, maybe that's your lawyer now.
Hello?
Just answer yes or no- are the cops there?
Yes.
Are they threatening to take Maddy?
Yes.
That's what happens when you marry a crook.
I think they're tracing this call.
I'll take that phone.
Hey, Officer.
Yup?
I'm going to make your day.
Uncuff him, will you, Mitch?
Karl.
Don't do anything stupid.
Palms out, please.
I know the drill.
So, tell me... where'd I go wrong?
You killed two people.
Red.
You look good, man.
It's been a while, hasn't it?
Haven't seen you forever.
Of course, you know that better than anybody.
I'm... surprised to see you here.
Actually, you know what, I'm not that surprised.
Listen, I'm glad you dropped by, 'cause there I've been meaning to talk to you about.
No, I-I just wanted to say...
Oh, my God!
Oh, my God!
Oh, my God!
Oh, my God!
Are you okay?
Yeah, yeah, I'm...
I'm okay.
I'm okay.
I
- I am so sorry.
I was on the phone, and I was going too fast, and I just...
Oh, God, um...
I'm going to call 911, and I'm going get you an ambulance.
I'm fine, honest, I am.
Really, it's nothing.
At least, can I just...
I'm going to call the police and make a police report.
I'd really rather you not do that.
I'll tell you why.
I don't have any insurance.
No, no, no.
That's okay.
I do.
Look, it was my fault;
I know that.
And that is exactly what I will tell them.
My dad just said, if I ever got into an accident you have to make a police report.
Can I tell you something, sweetheart?
You're drunk right now, okay?
And you hit me.
Now, that's a dui, and if you call the police, they're going to take your license away, and they're going to throw you in jail.
Now, what I'd like you to do is get in your car, drive yourself home and forget that this ever happened.
Can you do that?
I'm fine.
Go on.
I'm fine, honest, I promise.
You go.
Her name is Ally Sullivan.
She's the registered owner.
Patrol unit investigating the wreck, found the body.
So far, we have nothing on the other car.
Where's the nearest traffic camera?
Four blocks north.
We've been pulling bodies out of this neighborhood twice a month, it seems like.
I think that's actually an improvement.
Well, it's a cold night.
I'm going to get you some coffee and donuts.
Nine-nine-nine... five-five-two.
Most people would have called 911.
Well, there's a seat-belt contusion on her shoulder.
So... she survives the crash.
She gets out of the car, She dies on the street?
Internal injuries maybe.
Maybe.
How'd the car end up in this position?
It looks like she caused the wreck.
Usually, the guy who hits is the guy who runs.
Well, either way, they left the scene, so it's still a hit-and-run.
And this girl's dead.
So we may have a murderer.
It's late.
I was worried.
Sorry.
Love you.
I love you, too.
Ally was out late all the time.
I never worried about her.
She liked night clubs?
She liked the club business.
She wasn't a party girl.
She wanted to be a VIP hostess.
Way you do that in this town is you... get your face out there,
meet the right people, be seen.
I taught her to be responsible.
If there was an accident, call the police.
Help anyone who needed it.
I'd say to her all the time, no matter how pretty are today, someday, all that will be gone.
She knew that.
She knew she had to treat people with respect.
She always did the right thing;
that's why I don't get it.
Whoever was in the other car...
I don't care why they left.
All they had to do was call an ambulance instead of leaving her there to die.
COD was hyper-extension of the neck with a rotational snap, resulting in a ruptured vertebral artery, mid-cervical.
Mid?
Most MVA's break down low or up high, don't they?
That's why I don't think the accident did it.
The injury was more consistent with a stranglehold.
The head was rapidly twisted relative to the spinal column.
She would have been dead within a minute.
Whoever killed this poor kid knew what they were doing.
I don't like Gruyere, Daddy.
There's no Gruyere in it, sweetie;
I promise.
All right, egg me.
Hello, Mommy.
I'm cooking.
I see that.
Good morning, honey.
Good morning.
Yeah, well, the jury's still out on that as far as you're concerned.
You must have had quite a night.
Yeah.
I guess I lost track of time.
That Joey's a dog.
If you don't watch out, he's going to get you into trouble.
I kind of doubt that.
I wouldn't worry, though.
It won't happen again.
These days, I'm all about you, baby.
I'm the baby.
I know.
I know, but daddies can have more than one baby.
Yeah, pretty talk, talk, talk.
Here, wait, wait.
Try this, try this.
Maddy made them.
Mm, it's delicious.
Very good.
I'm glad you shaved.
I barely recognized you under all that scruff.
Hadn't quite finished that.
Hello, rapist.
Man, I'm not a rapist.
I was a date rapist, which is not even the same thing.
And besides, back then, roofies were in.
So you miss the action of the good old days, huh?
It's not like that.
It's not like that at all.
What's it like?
Can I get a soda, too?
I'm, like, parched.
You want to tell me what your fingerprints are doing on a cup in a dead girl's car?
I was out at Jet...
I was kind of faded, I guess.
Um, I bumped into Ally, and she offered me a ride home.
I needed it.
So that's what you were doing on Harmon Road?
Yeah, Ally don't care where I live; she's a cool girl.
You were close?
Were you banging her?
So, what, are you like, pen pals?
Girlfriends?
What?
No, look, we really didn't talk that much.
But we would text all the time.
That's, like, when you use your cell phone to send, like, you know, words.
Yeah.
I know what text messaging is.
Fine.
Sorry.
Look, I'm telling you the truth, you really couldn't get Ally on the phone, it's all texting with her.
Well, what do you want my DNA?
You want me to pee into a cup?
You want my underwear?
Whatever you want, you got it, cause I didn't kill Ally.
I'll tell you what I want...
Paint scrapings from your vic's bumper are consistent with a '91 to '96 blue Ford.
So that narrows it down to a few thousand cars in the greater Las Vegas area.
Yeah, but the car you're looking for is also a piece of crap.
Make and model I get, but unless you have a new test that quantifies "crappiness"...
Actually, take a look.
Silver Firebird's on the left, blue Ford on the right.
What's the gray-blue in the middle?
A mixture of Rustoleum and house paint.
The killer's car had exposed primer.
Swanky.
Might have found a few letters from the license plate.
Y
- K-A.
You found a witness?
Just behavior.
But according to Ally Sullivan's father, she was the type of girl that might have noticed the license plate of the car that hit her.
And according to her good friend, she preferred text messaging to leaving voice messages.
She was dying, right?
Disoriented?
I don't know, but maybe she thought she was texting when in fact she was just dialing her phone.
That's a bit of a long shot.
It's still a shot.
Good evening, I'm Paula Francis.
A weekend of sordid crimes has Las Vegas Police working double-time.
You don't hit on a cocktail waitress at the bar.
Go sit at a table, then she's got a reason to come over and serve you, and it's less obvious.
Hold on.
Wait, wait.
The househusband's giving me tips on women?
I married a cocktail waitress.
Janice- cocktail?
This crappy little joint in Cleveland.
Really?
I'm not looking to marry this broad.
Although, she might think so.
At least for tonight.
Joey, you're, like, 40-something, right.
Shouldn't you be toning it down a little?
Tone it down?
Karl, I'm looking to take it up a notch.
I got, like, ten more years of fun left and my wingman's got a curfew.
Why'd you bail out so early last night?
I missed my family.
You're so sweet.
You should work for Hallmark.
I'll send them my resume.
It wasn't the smell that got my attention, you know?
Usually when I find a body, it's, uh, it's very, um, raunchy.
It's called "decomp", in case you're interested.
I'll remember that for next time.
If it wasn't the smell, why did you check the room?
Rent is due every week.
What's his name?
We ask for cash, not names.
We take who the casinos won't.
Someone's got to do it.
Did you touch or move anything?
First thing I did was call you guys.
Got you on speed dial.
And finally, in local crime, an update on yesterday's tragic death of Vegas party girl Ally Sullivan.
Police are still examining all the evidence from the gruesome crime scene.
Detectives tell Eyewitness News they have little to work with.
And something that stumps them:
What was the motive for the killer in this violent end to a young and beautifu life?
Mr. Sullivan, when was the last time you saw her alive?
What are you people thinking?
Think I'm going to say something magical, bring Ally back to me?
I'm not talking to you people.
Police are hoping that passersby or other eyewitnesses will come forward to help the investigation of this terrible murder.
If you have information that might help police, you are urged to call LVPD at the toll-free number on the screen.
Control, this is Detective Curtis.
I'm at 1773 Twain, Riviera Suites.
I got a 419.
I need CSI.
You know, I think I've been called out to this place before.
I think I've processed this very room before.
Liver temp is close to ambient.
But lividity is fixed.
And rigidity starting to pass.
So he's been dead for at least 20 hours.
.380 Auto.
That's Federal ammo.
.380s make a lot of noise.
It's odd that no one heard anything, even in a dump like this.
"Walther PPK."
Two shots in the body, one to the head.
Sounds like a professional hit to me.
Looks like the killer used Armor All.
The gun is clean.
Looks like the victim was doing a little cleaning of his own.
He was a 12 Stepper.
Trying to make amends.
He was on step number nine.
Apparently not enough.
Well, it's pretty obvious he came in through the window.
One thing's for sure, this killer's lugging around some pretty big dogs.
Hey, Grissom!
I just ID'd those fibers you found on Ally Sullivan's necklace.
They were not from her jacket or her dress.
They're made of lambskin and rabbit fur.
You know, just between you and me, I used to carry a rabbit's foot.
I mean, I'm not superstitious.
It's just, I figure why take the chance?
You know, as a kid, my grandfather used to have a rabbit farm.
Is this our Ford Taurus?
Once upon a time.
Told you it was a piece of crap.
The vehicle was abandoned near a junkyard off Boulder Highway.
By the time they checked the plates, it was already in the crusher.
Plates and paint are a match to your BOLO.
Did Brass run those tags?
Yeah, it was last registered to a Betty Grinly in Henderson.
She passed away last month.
Gasoline.
They torched it.
So he burns the evidence near a junkyard so that they'll find it and dispose of it.
Clever.
Looks like we're dealing with a professional.
Professional what, though?
Ally Sullivan was killed over a fender bender.
You're right.
He probably just loved his car and has a really bad temper.
And he likes pineapples.
Ah, yeah, I remember that Taurus.
Cheap and reliable.
That combo always sells.
Could you give me a description of the person who bought it?
Honey, I'm not even sure I can tell what you look like.
All I remember is he came off the bus... he walked right up with a big wad of cash.
I put him in that Taurus, and 15 minutes later, he drove off the lot.
Did you get a transaction record?
Let's see.
Taurus, Taurus, Taurus, Taurus...
Ah, here you go.
This is for a '99 Jeep Cherokee.
It sure is.
Um, hold it.
It's over here.
How's that one look?
Not so great.
The coroner's bullets matched the Walther, but Bobby found an additional striated mark on the O-jive, so he went back to the gun.
There was threading inside the muzzle.
Killer used a silencer.
Slightest imperfection in the barrel of a silencer could explain these scratches on the bullet.
Oh.
Also explains why no one heard anything.
But leave the gun, take the silencer?
Well, you can't legally buy a silencer, and those things are hard to make.
If the silencer was homemade, we might have been able to match the killer's tool marks.
Assuming we ever find this guy.
I don't know who would go through this much trouble to kill a nobody like Nash.
Well, he was a somebody to the killer.
Hey, people, Amanda Congdon from rocketboom. com with this week's creep report.
If you were planning on checking out that new club, Bubbles, down near Harmon and Twain, you might want to think twice, because the corpses are really piling up down there.
The body of Clayton Nash vas found just two blocks away from the site of Ally Sullivan's murder, and the killer's still at large.
Is this just another crime spree, or the work of one deranged maniac?
Don't ask the cops.
They don't have a clue.
Remember, Amanda warned you.
What are you doing?
Not even ready for dinner.
I was checking our stocks.
Well, you're not wearing that to the Eiffel Tower.
I'll throw some clothes on.
Hurry up.
My mom's waiting for Maddy.
I don't want to lose that table.
Two seconds.
Well, now, who's that beautiful girl, huh?
So, you drive Route 107 Southbound during the week, is that right?
6:00 a. m. to 6:00 p. m.
Yeah, I'm a morning person.
Now, is there any chance, any chance at all, that you remember this guy?
I know it's not the best picture.
I let him out on stop "E" around 4:30 day before yesterday.
Oh, you know, you get hundreds of people on and off your bus every day.
We got to be sure- are you sure you remember him?
I look at every face that steps on my ride.
I saw the movie Speed
- I'm not gonna be hijacked.
Well, you know, actually Speed, it... it wasn't hijacked, it was wired to explode.
Whatever.
Well, all right.
What exactly do you remember about him?
He paid in cash, told me to keep the change- everybody else uses a bus pass.
He was a real gentleman- tucked-in shirt, new shoes...
Nice smell.
Kind of stands out on my route.
So I guess you remember where you picked him up, then?
He came walking out of the desert like Moses himself.
So the bus driver said the guy got on here?
You sure this is a working stop?
You know, the Cat bus stops here 59 times a day.
For what?
Construction workers, hikers, migrants.
The name on the driver's license was fake, but the picture's got to be real.
I'm gonna go... wave it around the neighborhood.
Assuming our guy's not from around here, how'd he get here?
The same way they did.
Every time I come to the desert, I see porno mags.
Who brings spankables out here?
It's probably just trash blown in from off the street.
Nobody throws away porn.
They're like heirlooms.
Hey, Greg.
You'd better check this out.
A single set of ATV tracks goes off the trail back there into here- killer could've dumped the ATV and then got on the bus.
Whoever was here had some big shoes.
Not necessarily big feet.
Multiple socks.
Another precaution to cover your tracks.
Assuming it's our guy.
I'd say it's our guy.
And I think he just gave us the finger.
I have an update for you.
The burned gloves that Nick submitted are lambskin lined with rabbit's fur.
They're consistent with the fibers found in Ally Sullivan's necklace.
Good.
Thanks.
I'm guessing that Clayton Nash had a record.
1985, aiding and abetting, extortion in '87, armed robbery in '92, assault in '95, uh, loan sharking the same year.
I get the drift.
But, uh, take a look at this- it's FBI surveillance.
What is this, summer camp?
Well, not the kind you want to send your kid to- they're bank robbers.
All of them?
Apparently, Nash and his buddies would get together every year, talk shop, hire hookers, play flag football.
Nash did mostly grunt work- driver, lookout.
Never handled the cash.
He got busted in an armored car heist in Ohio ten years ago.
Testified against practically everyone he'd ever worked with.
Well, that certainly explains why someone would want to kill him.
Most of those people in the picture are either dead or in prison.
Who isn't?
Give me a Heine, please.
What is that?
Anybody should be drinking water, it's me, let me tell ya.
Really blasted my quads.
Let's do shooters.
Wanna?
Let's pretend... that you're wearing a suit, and let's pretend we're in your office, and let's pretend I just cut you a big check for your services because you are still my damn lawyer.
All right, man, all right, I'm listening.
There's some stuff I need.
No particular order.
Credit card blanks?
DMV license blanks?
What is this?
No questions.
Laminating machine, blank bar code labels.
What are you doing?
What makes you think I can even get this stuff?
I know the guys you represent.
I'm one of 'em.
I need the stuff fast.
Don't let me down.
There was no reason to connect the two murders until ballistics matched the silencer we found in the desert with the gun you found at the Riviera Suites.
Two murders, same killer.
Here's how we think things went down.
The killer drove his ATV into the desert, concealed it in the brush, takes a bus to a used car lot and buys a blue Taurus.
Then he drives to the apartment, puts a cap in Clayton Nash, gets into his car and drives away, free and clear.
It's a good plan, well executed.
Yeah, right up until the point that Ally Sullivan smashed into his car.
Collateral damage- he killed her so she couldn't identify him.
Okay, that all sounds great.
How do we find the guy?
We know his original target, Clayton Nash.
Small-time hood who gave up a lot of his big-time cronies.
He's got a list of enemies.
How many guys got convicted off Nash's testimony?
Seven.
Three of them are still in prison.
One is dead, one is out on parole, and two served their time and are now out.
So we have three potential killers and nothing to tie them to either crime scene.
Not quite.
I ruled out most of the prints from Ally Sullivan's car- the vic, the father, her boyfriend- but there were a few unidentified partials.
It's not enough detail to run through AFIS?
Well, if this guy is a major case felon, then his prints are definitely in the system.
I dusted every inch of that apartment window.
He never took off his gloves.
You going somewhere?
The fake ID cards?
!
The staying out all night, and then this mysterious ATV ride in the desert.
You gave me the ATV for my birthday.
I ride it because I love you.
Yeah, at 3:00 in the morning?
You're planning a job.
I'm not planning a job!
You know I don't do that anymore.
You're a liar, Karl.
You're lying!
Honey, listen- honey!
Janice, look...
I had to take care of something.
And what's that supposed to mean?
I killed Clayton Nash.
You even think about Maddy?
Your daughter?
You promised... on her life, you promised!
No more robberies!
I don't do robberies anymore.
- Now you just kill people.
- He was a rat.
All the waiting.
All the maneuvering, the lying.
I did it.
And I did it for us, for this family.
I kept money in our wallets.
I invested it, so all you had to do was watch football on TV.
And Nash was the reason.
The reason that you had to hide the money and live on the run.
I never got caught!
And I never would've got caught, except for that... that lousy junkie who gave me up.
I only had one rule: you never talk!
And he talked.
And you jeopardized everything we have for some scumbag that nobody gives a damn about.
Janice, he called me four weeks ago.
He said, "I'm in town for a while.
Maybe we could we get together".
He had something to tell me.
Tell me what?
"I'm sorry?
I'm sorry I stole seven years of your life".
I
- I couldn't let it go.
Oh, God, he had it coming.
And you were careful, right?
So what's with the fake IDs?
You don't make mistakes.
I didn't.
Somebody else did.
A girl named Ally Sullivan.
The girl on the TV?
Oh, God, she was just a kid!
She crashed into my car right after I did Nash.
She was gonna call the cops.
I had to do it.
I had to.
I want you to go up the stairs.
I want you to kiss Maddy.
I want you to tell her that you love her... and I want you to get out of this house.
Karl Cooper.
At age 19, he was an Army Ranger.
By 42, he was one of the most successful bank robbers in U.S. history.
He pulled off dozens of heists, going back two decades, all without killing a single person, and he was known to his bank-robbing buddies as "Red".
He doesn't have red hair.
Well, he got the nickname because he was always in debt...
"in the red".
Do we have In The Red's address?
Last known was the U.S. Federal Penitentiary in Marion, Illinois.
When Nash gave him up, Cooper plead guilty.
He served the full seven years term.
He got out, dropped off the face of the earth.
The tire model is a Dunlop KT-345.
I checked with the local dealers.
The only ATV that uses that particular type of tire has only been on the market for about a year.
It's called the Yamaha Raptor.
So I got the list of the names of everybody in Las Vegas who's recently bought one.
The only Cooper on the list is female
- Janice.
Well, Karl Cooper had a girlfriend back in Ohio, a Janice Hanford.
I mean, she could be Cooper now.
Do we have her address?
Yeah.
It's, uh, second page.
I think you broke the case, Nick.
Sweetie, come with me, okay?
Las Vegas police.
Open up!
Janice Cooper?
We're looking for your husband.
He's not here.
Don't take it personally, but I'm not going to take your word for that.
You guys never do.
Look around all you like.
Please step outside with the child.
It's for your own safety.
Like I said, he's not here.
Mommy doesn't like you.
Really?
Well, that's too bad.
She hardly even knows me.
Maddy, you be nice, baby, okay?
Definitely.
Let's all be nice.
ATV has the right tires and there are plenty of machine tools and parts back there to build a silencer.
Where's Karl?
Go to hell.
All right.
Here's the way it is.
You're going to jail, she's going to Child Services.
End of story.
I've had cops in my face for half my life.
You don't scare me.
Well, maybe that's your lawyer now.
Hello?
Just answer yes or no- are the cops there?
Yes.
Are they threatening to take Maddy?
Yes.
That's what happens when you marry a crook.
I think they're tracing this call.
I'll take that phone.
Hey, Officer.
I'm going to make your day.
Uncuff him, will you, Mitch?
Karl.
Don't do anything stupid.
Palms out, please.
I know the drill.
So, tell me...
Where'd I go wrong?
You killed two people.
Red.
You look good, man.
It's been a while, hasn't it?
Haven't seen you forever.
Of course, you know that better than anybody.
I'm... surprised to see you here.
Actually, you know what, I'm not that surprised.
Listen, I'm glad you dropped by, 'cause there I've been meaning to talk to you about.
No, I-I just wanted to say...
Oh, my God!
Oh, my God!
Oh, my God!
Oh, my God!
Are you okay?
Yeah, yeah, I'm...
I'm okay.
I'm okay.
I
- I am so sorry.
I was on the phone, and I was going too fast, and I just...
Oh, God, um...
I'm going to call 911, and I'm going get you an ambulance.
I'm fine, honest, I am.
Really, it's nothing.
At least, can I just...
I'm going to call the police and make a police report.
I'd really rather you not do that.
I'll tell you why.
I don't have any insurance.
No, no, no.
That's okay.
I do.
Look, it was my fault;
I know that.
And that is exactly what I will tell them.
My dad just said, if I ever got into an accident you have to make a police report.
Can I tell you something, sweetheart?
You're drunk right now, okay?
And you hit me.
Now, that's a dui, and if you call the police, they're going to take your license away, and they're going to throw you in jail.
Now, what I'd like you to do is get in your car, drive yourself home and forget that this ever happened.
Can you do that?
I'm fine.
Go on.
I'm fine, honest, I promise.
You go.
Her name is Ally Sullivan.
She's the registered owner.
Patrol unit investigating the wreck, found the body.
So far, we have nothing on the other car.
Where's the nearest traffic camera?
Four blocks north.
We've been pulling bodies out of this neighborhood twice a month, it seems like.
I think that's actually an improvement.
Well, it's a cold night.
I'm going to get you some coffee and donuts.
Nine-nine-nine... five-five-two.
Most people would have called 911.
Well, there's a seat-belt contusion on her shoulder.
So... she survives the crash.
She gets out of the car, She dies on the street?
Internal injuries maybe.
Maybe.
How'd the car end up in this position?
It looks like she caused the wreck.
Usually, the guy who hits is the guy who runs.
Well, either way, they left the scene, so it's still a hit-and-run.
And this girl's dead.
So we may have a murderer.
It's late.
I was worried.
Sorry.
Love you.
I love you, too.
Ally was out late all the time.
I never worried about her.
She liked night clubs?
She liked the club business.
She wasn't a party girl.
She wanted to be a VIP hostess.
Way you do that in this town is you... get your face out there,
meet the right people, be seen.
I taught her to be responsible.
If there was an accident, call the police.
Help anyone who needed it.
I'd say to her all the time, no matter how pretty are today, someday, all that will be gone.
She knew that.
She knew she had to treat people with respect.
She always did the right thing;
that's why I don't get it.
Whoever was in the other car...
I don't care why they left.
All they had to do was call an ambulance instead of leaving her there to die.
COD was hyper-extension of the neck with a rotational snap, resulting in a ruptured vertebral artery, mid-cervical.
Mid?
Most MVA's break down low or up high, don't they?
That's why I don't think the accident did it.
The injury was more consistent with a stranglehold.
The head was rapidly twisted relative to the spinal column.
She would have been dead within a minute.
Whoever killed this poor kid knew what they were doing.
I don't like Gruyere, Daddy.
There's no Gruyere in it, sweetie;
I promise.
All right, egg me.
Hello, Mommy.
I'm cooking.
I see that.
Good morning, honey.
Good morning.
Yeah, well, the jury's still out on that as far as you're concerned.
You must have had quite a night.
Yeah.
I guess I lost track of time.
That Joey's a dog.
If you don't watch out, he's going to get you into trouble.
I kind of doubt that.
I wouldn't worry, though.
It won't happen again.
These days, I'm all about you, baby.
I'm the baby.
I know.
I know, but daddies can have more than one baby.
Yeah, pretty talk, talk, talk.
Here, wait, wait.
Try this, try this.
Maddy made them.
Mm, it's delicious.
Very good.
I'm glad you shaved.
I barely recognized you under all that scruff.
Hadn't quite finished that.
Hello, rapist.
Man, I'm not a rapist.
I was a date rapist, which is not even the same thing.
And besides, back then, roofies were in.
So you miss the action of the good old days, huh?
It's not like that.
It's not like that at all.
What's it like?
Can I get a soda, too?
I'm, like, parched.
You want to tell me what your fingerprints are doing on a cup in a dead girl's car?
I was out at Jet...
I was kind of faded, I guess.
Um, I bumped into Ally, and she offered me a ride home.
I needed it.
So that's what you were doing on Harmon Road?
Yeah, Ally don't care where I live; she's a cool girl.
You were close?
Were you banging her?
So, what, are you like, pen pals?
Girlfriends?
What?
No, look, we really didn't talk that much.
But we would text all the time.
That's, like, when you use your cell phone to send, like, you know, words.
Yeah.
I know what text messaging is.
Fine.
Sorry.
Look, I'm telling you the truth, you really couldn't get Ally on the phone, it's all texting with her.
Well, what do you want my DNA?
You want me to pee into a cup?
You want my underwear?
Whatever you want, you got it, cause I didn't kill Ally.
I'll tell you what I want...
Paint scrapings from your vic's bumper are consistent with a '91 to '96 blue Ford.
So that narrows it down to a few thousand cars in the greater Las Vegas area.
Yeah, but the car you're looking for is also a piece of crap.
Make and model I get, but unless you have a new test that quantifies "crappiness"...
Actually, take a look.
Silver Firebird's on the left, blue Ford on the right.
What's the gray-blue in the middle?
A mixture of Rustoleum and house paint.
The killer's car had exposed primer.
Swanky.
Might have found a few letters from the license plate.
Y
- K-A.
You found a witness?
Just behavior.
But according to Ally Sullivan's father, she was the type of girl that might have noticed the license plate of the car that hit her.
And according to her good friend, she preferred text messaging to leaving voice messages.
She was dying, right?
Disoriented?
I don't know, but maybe she thought she was texting when in fact she was just dialing her phone.
That's a bit of a long shot.
It's still a shot.
Good evening, I'm Paula Francis.
A weekend of sordid crimes has Las Vegas Police working double-time.
You don't hit on a cocktail waitress at the bar.
Go sit at a table, then she's got a reason to come over and serve you, and it's less obvious.
Hold on.
Wait, wait.
The househusband's giving me tips on women?
I married a cocktail waitress.
Janice- cocktail?
This crappy little joint in Cleveland.
Really?
I'm not looking to marry this broad.
Although, she might think so.
At least for tonight.
Joey, you're, like, 40-something, right.
Shouldn't you be toning it down a little?
Tone it down?
Karl, I'm looking to take it up a notch.
I got, like, ten more years of fun left and my wingman's got a curfew.
Why'd you bail out so early last night?
I missed my family.
You're so sweet.
You should work for Hallmark.
I'll send them my resume.
It wasn't the smell that got my attention, you know?
Usually when I find a body, it's, uh, it's very, um, raunchy.
It's called "decomp", in case you're interested.
I'll remember that for next time.
If it wasn't the smell, why did you check the room?
Rent is due every week.
What's his name?
We ask for cash, not names.
We take who the casinos won't.
Someone's got to do it.
Did you touch or move anything?
First thing I did was call you guys.
Got you on speed dial.
And finally, in local crime, an update on yesterday's tragic death of Vegas party girl Ally Sullivan.
Police are still examining all the evidence from the gruesome crime scene.
Detectives tell Eyewitness News they have little to work with.
And something that stumps them:
What was the motive for the killer in this violent end to a young and beautifu life?
Mr. Sullivan, when was the last time you saw her alive?
What are you people thinking?
Think I'm going to say something magical, bring Ally back to me?
I'm not talking to you people.
Police are hoping that passersby or other eyewitnesses will come forward to help the investigation of this terrible murder.
If you have information that might help police, you are urged to call LVPD at the toll-free number on the screen.
Control, this is Detective Curtis.
I'm at 1773 Twain, Riviera Suites.
I got a 419.
I need CSI.
You know, I think I've been called out to this place before.
I think I've processed this very room before.
Liver temp is close to ambient.
But lividity is fixed.
And rigidity starting to pass.
So he's been dead for at least 20 hours.
.380 Auto.
That's Federal ammo.
.380s make a lot of noise.
It's odd that no one heard anything, even in a dump like this.
"Walther PPK."
Two shots in the body, one to the head.
Sounds like a professional hit to me.
Looks like the killer used Armor All.
The gun is clean.
Looks like the victim was doing a little cleaning of his own.
He was a 12 Stepper.
Trying to make amends.
He was on step number nine.
Apparently not enough.
Well, it's pretty obvious he came in through the window.
One thing's for sure, this killer's lugging around some pretty big dogs.
Hey, Grissom!
I just ID'd those fibers you found on Ally Sullivan's necklace.
They were not from her jacket or her dress.
They're made of lambskin and rabbit fur.
You know, just between you and me, I used to carry a rabbit's foot.
I mean, I'm not superstitious.
It's just, I figure why take the chance?
You know, as a kid, my grandfather used to have a rabbit farm.
Is this our Ford Taurus?
Once upon a time.
Told you it was a piece of crap.
The vehicle was abandoned near a junkyard off Boulder Highway.
By the time they checked the plates, it was already in the crusher.
Plates and paint are a match to your BOLO.
Did Brass run those tags?
Yeah, it was last registered to a Betty Grinly in Henderson.
She passed away last month.
Gasoline.
They torched it.
So he burns the evidence near a junkyard so that they'll find it and dispose of it.
Clever.
Looks like we're dealing with a professional.
Professional what, though?
Ally Sullivan was killed over a fender bender.
You're right.
He probably just loved his car and has a really bad temper.
And he likes pineapples.
Ah, yeah, I remember that Taurus.
Cheap and reliable.
That combo always sells.
Could you give me a description of the person who bought it?
Honey, I'm not even sure I can tell what you look like.
All I remember is he came off the bus... he walked right up with a big wad of cash.
I put him in that Taurus, and 15 minutes later, he drove off the lot.
Did you get a transaction record?
Let's see.
Taurus, Taurus, Taurus, Taurus...
Ah, here you go.
This is for a '99 Jeep Cherokee.
It sure is.
Um, hold it.
It's over here.
How's that one look?
Not so great.
The coroner's bullets matched the Walther, but Bobby found an additional striated mark on the O-jive, so he went back to the gun.
There was threading inside the muzzle.
Killer used a silencer.
Slightest imperfection in the barrel of a silencer could explain these scratches on the bullet.
Oh.
Also explains why no one heard anything.
But leave the gun, take the silencer?
Well, you can't legally buy a silencer, and those things are hard to make.
If the silencer was homemade, we might have been able to match the killer's tool marks.
Assuming we ever find this guy.
I don't know who would go through this much trouble to kill a nobody like Nash.
Well, he was a somebody to the killer.
Hey, people, Amanda Congdon from rocketboom. com with this week's creep report.
If you were planning on checking out that new club, Bubbles, down near Harmon and Twain, you might want to think twice, because the corpses are really piling up down there.
The body of Clayton Nash vas found just two blocks away from the site of Ally Sullivan's murder, and the killer's still at large.
Is this just another crime spree, or the work of one deranged maniac?
Don't ask the cops.
They don't have a clue.
Remember, Amanda warned you.
What are you doing?
Not even ready for dinner.
I was checking our stocks.
Well, you're not wearing that to the Eiffel Tower.
I'll throw some clothes on.
Hurry up.
My mom's waiting for Maddy.
I don't want to lose that table.
Two seconds.
Well, now, who's that beautiful girl, huh?
So, you drive Route 107 Southbound during the week, is that right?
6:00 a. m. to 6:00 p. m.
Yeah, I'm a morning person.
Now, is there any chance, any chance at all, that you remember this guy?
I know it's not the best picture.
I let him out on stop "E" around 4:30 day before yesterday.
Oh, you know, you get hundreds of people on and off your bus every day.
We got to be sure- are you sure you remember him?
I look at every face that steps on my ride.
I saw the movie Speed
- I'm not gonna be hijacked.
Well, you know, actually Speed, it... it wasn't hijacked, it was wired to explode.
Whatever.
Well, all right.
What exactly do you remember about him?
He paid in cash, told me to keep the change- everybody else uses a bus pass.
He was a real gentleman- tucked-in shirt, new shoes...
Nice smell.
Kind of stands out on my route.
So I guess you remember where you picked him up, then?
He came walking out of the desert like Moses himself.
So the bus driver said the guy got on here?
You sure this is a working stop?
You know, the Cat bus stops here 59 times a day.
For what?
Construction workers, hikers, migrants.
The name on the driver's license was fake, but the picture's got to be real.
I'm gonna go... wave it around the neighborhood.
Assuming our guy's not from around here, how'd he get here?
The same way they did.
Every time I come to the desert, I see porno mags.
Who brings spankables out here?
It's probably just trash blown in from off the street.
Nobody throws away porn.
They're like heirlooms.
Hey, Greg.
You'd better check this out.
A single set of ATV tracks goes off the trail back there into here- killer could've dumped the ATV and then got on the bus.
Whoever was here had some big shoes.
Not necessarily big feet.
Multiple socks.
Another precaution to cover your tracks.
Assuming it's our guy.
I'd say it's our guy.
And I think he just gave us the finger.
I have an update for you.
The burned gloves that Nick submitted are lambskin lined with rabbit's fur.
They're consistent with the fibers found in Ally Sullivan's necklace.
Good.
Thanks.
I'm guessing that Clayton Nash had a record.
1985, aiding and abetting, extortion in '87, armed robbery in '92, assault in '95, uh, loan sharking the same year.
I get the drift.
But, uh, take a look at this- it's FBI surveillance.
What is this, summer camp?
Well, not the kind you want to send your kid to- they're bank robbers.
All of them?
Apparently, Nash and his buddies would get together every year, talk shop, hire hookers, play flag football.
Nash did mostly grunt work- driver, lookout.
Never handled the cash.
He got busted in an armored car heist in Ohio ten years ago.
Testified against practically everyone he'd ever worked with.
Well, that certainly explains why someone would want to kill him.
Most of those people in the picture are either dead or in prison.
Who isn't?
Give me a Heine, please.
What is that?
Anybody should be drinking water, it's me, let me tell ya.
Really blasted my quads.
Let's do shooters.
Wanna?
Let's pretend... that you're wearing a suit, and let's pretend we're in your office, and let's pretend I just cut you a big check for your services because you are still my damn lawyer.
All right, man, all right, I'm listening.
There's some stuff I need.
No particular order.
Credit card blanks?
DMV license blanks?
What is this?
No questions.
Laminating machine, blank bar code labels.
What are you doing?
What makes you think I can even get this stuff?
I know the guys you represent.
I'm one of 'em.
I need the stuff fast.
Don't let me down.
There was no reason to connect the two murders until ballistics matched the silencer we found in the desert with the gun you found at the Riviera Suites.
Two murders, same killer.
Here's how we think things went down.
The killer drove his ATV into the desert, concealed it in the brush, takes a bus to a used car lot and buys a blue Taurus.
Then he drives to the apartment, puts a cap in Clayton Nash, gets into his car and drives away, free and clear.
It's a good plan, well executed.
Yeah, right up until the point that Ally Sullivan smashed into his car.
Collateral damage- he killed her so she couldn't identify him.
Okay, that all sounds great.
How do we find the guy?
We know his original target, Clayton Nash.
Small-time hood who gave up a lot of his big-time cronies.
He's got a list of enemies.
How many guys got convicted off Nash's testimony?
Seven.
Three of them are still in prison.
One is dead, one is out on parole, and two served their time and are now out.
So we have three potential killers and nothing to tie them to either crime scene.
Not quite.
I ruled out most of the prints from Ally Sullivan's car- the vic, the father, her boyfriend- but there were a few unidentified partials.
It's not enough detail to run through AFIS?
Well, if this guy is a major case felon, then his prints are definitely in the system.
I dusted every inch of that apartment window.
He never took off his gloves.
You going somewhere?
The fake ID cards?
!
The staying out all night, and then this mysterious ATV ride in the desert.
You gave me the ATV for my birthday.
I ride it because I love you.
Yeah, at 3:00 in the morning?
You're planning a job.
I'm not planning a job!
You know I don't do that anymore.
You're a liar, Karl.
You're lying!
Honey, listen- honey!
Janice, look...
I had to take care of something.
And what's that supposed to mean?
I killed Clayton Nash.
You even think about Maddy?
Your daughter?
You promised... on her life, you promised!
No more robberies!
I don't do robberies anymore.
- Now you just kill people.
- He was a rat.
All the waiting.
All the maneuvering, the lying.
I did it.
And I did it for us, for this family.
I kept money in our wallets.
I invested it, so all you had to do was watch football on TV.
And Nash was the reason.
The reason that you had to hide the money and live on the run.
I never got caught!
And I never would've got caught, except for that... that lousy junkie who gave me up.
I only had one rule: you never talk!
And he talked.
And you jeopardized everything we have for some scumbag that nobody gives a damn about.
Janice, he called me four weeks ago.
He said, "I'm in town for a while.
Maybe we could we get together".
He had something to tell me.
Tell me what?
"I'm sorry?
I'm sorry I stole seven years of your life".
I
- I couldn't let it go.
Oh, God, he had it coming.
And you were careful, right?
So what's with the fake IDs?
You don't make mistakes.
I didn't.
Somebody else did.
A girl named Ally Sullivan.
The girl on the TV?
Oh, God, she was just a kid!
She crashed into my car right after I did Nash.
She was gonna call the cops.
I had to do it.
I had to.
I want you to go up the stairs.
I want you to kiss Maddy.
I want you to tell her that you love her... and I want you to get out of this house.
Karl Cooper.
At age 19, he was an Army Ranger.
By 42, he was one of the most successful bank robbers in U.S. history.
He pulled off dozens of heists, going back two decades, all without killing a single person, and he was known to his bank-robbing buddies as "Red".
He doesn't have red hair.
Well, he got the nickname because he was always in debt...
"in the red".
Do we have In The Red's address?
Last known was the U.S. Federal Penitentiary in Marion, Illinois.
When Nash gave him up, Cooper plead guilty.
He served the full seven years term.
He got out, dropped off the face of the earth.
The tire model is a Dunlop KT-345.
I checked with the local dealers.
The only ATV that uses that particular type of tire has only been on the market for about a year.
It's called the Yamaha Raptor.
So I got the list of the names of everybody in Las Vegas who's recently bought one.
The only Cooper on the list is female
- Janice.
Well, Karl Cooper had a girlfriend back in Ohio, a Janice Hanford.
I mean, she could be Cooper now.
Do we have her address?
Yeah.
It's, uh, second page.
I think you broke the case, Nick.
Sweetie, come with me, okay?
Las Vegas police.
Open up!
Janice Cooper?
We're looking for your husband.
He's not here.
Don't take it personally, but I'm not going to take your word for that.
You guys never do.
Look around all you like.
Please step outside with the child.
It's for your own safety.
Like I said, he's not here.
Mommy doesn't like you.
Really?
Well, that's too bad.
She hardly even knows me.
Maddy, you be nice, baby, okay?
Definitely.
Let's all be nice.
ATV has the right tires and there are plenty of machine tools and parts back there to build a silencer.
Where's Karl?
Go to hell.
All right.
Here's the way it is.
You're going to jail, she's going to Child Services.
End of story.
I've had cops in my face for half my life.
You don't scare me.
Well, maybe that's your lawyer now.
Hello?
Just answer yes or no- are the cops there?
Yes.
Are they threatening to take Maddy?
Yes.
That's what happens when you marry a crook.
I think they're tracing this call.
I'll take that phone.
Hey, Officer.
I'm going to make your day.
Uncuff him, will you, Mitch?
Karl.
Don't do anything stupid.
Palms out, please.
I know the drill.
So, tell me...
Where'd I go wrong?
You killed two people.
Red.
You look good, man.
It's been a while, hasn't it?
Haven't seen you forever.
Of course, you know that better than anybody.
I'm... surprised to see you here.
Actually, you know what, I'm not that surprised.
Listen, I'm glad you dropped by, 'cause there I've been meaning to talk to you about.
No, I-I just wanted to say...
Oh, my God!
Oh, my God!
Oh, my God!
Oh, my God!
Are you okay?
Yeah, yeah, I'm...
I'm okay.
I'm okay.
I-I am so sorry.
I was on the phone, and I was going too fast, and I just...
Oh, God, um...
I'm going to call 911, and I'm going get you an ambulance.
I'm fine, honest, I am.
Really, it's nothing.
At least, can I just...
I'm going to call the police and make a police report.
I'd really rather you not do that.
I'll tell you why.
I don't have any insurance.
No, no, no.
That's okay.
I do.
Look, it was my fault;
I know that.
And that is exactly what I will tell them.
My dad just said, if I ever got into an accident
Can I tell you something, sweetheart?
You're drunk right now, okay?
And you hit me.
Now, that's a DUI, and if you call the police, they're going to take your license away, and they're going to throw you in jail.
Now, what I'd like you to do is get in your car, drive yourself home and forget that this ever happened.
Can you do that?
I'm fine.
Go on.
I'm fine, honest, I promise.
You go.
Her name is Ally Sullivan.
She's the registered owner.
Patrol unit investigating the wreck, found the body.
So far, we have nothing on the other car.
Where's the nearest traffic camera?
Four blocks north.
We've been pulling bodies out of this neighborhood twice a month, it seems like.
I think that's actually an improvement.
Well, it's a cold night.
I'm going to get you some coffee and donuts.
Nine-nine-nine...
five-five-two.
Most people would have called 911.
Well, there's a seat-belt contusion on her shoulder.
So... she survives the crash.
She gets out of the car, She dies on the street?
Internal injuries maybe.
Maybe.
How'd the car end up in this position?
It looks like she caused the wreck.
Usually, the guy who hits is the guy who runs.
Well, either way, they left the scene, so it's still a hit-and-run.
And this girl's dead.
So we may have a murderer.
It's late.
I was worried.
Sorry.
Love you.
I love you, too.
Ally was out late all the time.
I never worried about her.
She liked night clubs?
She liked the club business.
She wasn't a party girl.
She wanted to be a VIP hostess.
Way you do that in this town is you... get your face out there,
meet the right people, be seen.
I taught her to be responsible.
If there was an accident, call the police.
Help anyone who needed it.
I'd say to her all the time, no matter how pretty are today, someday, all that will be gone.
She knew that.
She knew she had to treat people with respect.
She always did the right thing;
that's why I don't get it.
Whoever was in the other car...
I don't care why they left.
All they had to do was call an ambulance instead of leaving her there to die.
C.O.D. was hyper-extension of the neck with a rotational snap, resulting in a ruptured vertebral artery, mid-cervical.
Mid?
Most MVA's break down low or up high, don't they?
That's why I don't think the accident did it.
The injury was more consistent with a stranglehold.
The head was rapidly twisted relative to the spinal column.
She would have been dead within a minute.
Whoever killed this poor kid knew what they were doing.
I don't like Gruyere, Daddy.
There's no Gruyere in it, sweetie;
I promise.
All right, egg me.
Hello, Mommy.
I'm cooking.
I see that.
Good morning, honey.
Good morning.
Yeah, well, the jury's still out on that as far as you're concerned.
You must have had quite a night.
Yeah.
I guess I lost track of time.
That Joey's a dog.
If you don't watch out, he's going to get you into trouble.
I kind of doubt that.
I wouldn't worry, though.
It won't happen again.
These days, I'm all about you, baby.
I'm the baby.
I know.
I know, but daddies can have more than one baby.
- Yeah, pretty talk, talk, talk.
- Here, wait, wait.
Try this, try this.
Maddy made them.
Mm, it's delicious.
Very good.
I'm glad you shaved.
I barely recognized you under all that scruff.
Hadn't quite finished that.
Hello, rapist.
Man, I'm not a rapist.
I was a date rapist, which is not even the same thing.
And besides, back then, roofies were in.
So you miss the action of the good old days, huh?
It's not like that.
It's not like that at all.
What's it like?
Can I get a soda, too?
I'm, like, parched.
You want to tell me what your fingerprints are doing on a cup in a dead girl's car?
I was out at Jet...
I was kind of faded, I guess.
Um, I bumped into Ally, and she offered me a ride home.
I needed it.
So that's what you were doing on Harmon Road?
Yeah, Ally don't care where I live; she's a cool girl.
You were close?
Were you banging her?
So, what, are you like, pen pals?
Girlfriends?
What?
No, look, we really didn't talk that much.
But we would text all the time.
That's, like, when you use your cell phone to send, like, you know, words.
Yeah.
I know what text messaging is.
Fine.
Sorry.
Look, I'm telling you the truth, you really couldn't get Ally on the phone, it's all texting with her.
Well, what do you want my DNA?
You want me to pee into a cup?
You want my underwear?
Whatever you want, you got it, cause I didn't kill Ally.
I'll tell you what I want...
Paint scrapings from your vic's bumper are consistent with a '91 to '96 blue Ford.
So that narrows it down to a few thousand cars in the greater Las Vegas area.
Yeah, but the car you're looking for is also a piece of crap.
Make and model I get, but unless you have a new test that quantifies "crappiness"...
Actually, take a look.
Silver Firebird's on the left, blue Ford on the right.
What's the gray-blue in the middle?
A mixture of Rustoleum and house paint.
The killer's car had exposed primer.
Swanky.
Might have found a few letters from the license plate.
- "Y-K-A."
- You found a witness?
Just behavior.
But according to Ally Sullivan's father, she was the type of girl that might have noticed the license plate of the car that hit her.
And according to her good friend, she preferred text messaging to leaving voice messages.
She was dying, right?
Disoriented?
I don't know, but maybe she thought she was texting when in fact she was just dialing her phone.
That's a bit of a long shot.
It's still a shot.
Good evening, I'm Paula Francis.
A weekend of sordid crimes has Las Vegas Police working double-time.
You don't hit on a cocktail waitress at the bar.
Go sit at a table, then she's got a reason to come over and serve you, and it's less obvious.
Hold on.
Wait, wait.
The househusband's giving me tips on women?
I married a cocktail waitress.
Janice-- cocktail?
- This crappy little joint in Cleveland.
- Really?
I'm not looking to marry this broad.
Although, she might think so.
At least for tonight.
Joey, you're, like, 40-something, right.
- Shouldn't you be toning it down a little?
- Tone it down?
Karl, I'm looking to take it up a notch.
I got, like, ten more years of fun left and my wingman's got a curfew.
Why'd you bail out so early last night?
I missed my family.
You're so sweet.
You should work for Hallmark.
I'll send them my resume.
It wasn't the smell that got my attention, you know?
Usually when I find a body, it's, uh, it's very, um, raunchy.
It's called "decomp," in case you're interested.
I'll remember that for next time.
If it wasn't the smell, why did you check the room?
Rent is due every week.
What's his name?
We ask for cash, not names.
We take who the casinos won't.
Someone's got to do it.
Did you touch or move anything?
First thing I did was call you guys.
Got you on speed dial.
And finally, in local crime, an update on yesterday's tragic death of Vegas party girl Ally Sullivan.
Police are still examining all the evidence from the gruesome crime scene.
Detectives tell Eyewitness News they have little to work with.
And something that stumps them:
What was the motive for the killer in this violent end to a young and beautifu life?
Mr. Sullivan, when was the last time you saw her alive?
What are you people thinking?
Think I'm going to say something magical, bring Ally back to me?
I'm not talking to you people.
Police are hoping that passersby or other eyewitnesses will come forward to help the investigation of this terrible murder.
If you have information that might help police, you are urged to call LVPD at the toll-free number on the screen.
Control, this is Detective Curtis.
I'm at 1773 Twain, Riviera Suites.
I got a 419.
I need CSI.
You know, I think I've been called out to this place before.
I think I've processed this very room before.
Liver temp is close to ambient.
But lividity is fixed.
And rigidity starting to pass.
So he's been dead for at least 20 hours.
".380
Auto." That's Federal ammo.
.380s make a lot of noise.
It's odd that no one heard anything, even in a dump like this.
"Walther PPK."
Two shots in the body, one to the head.
Sounds like a professional hit to me.
Looks like the killer used Armor All.
The gun is clean.
Looks like the victim was doing a little cleaning of his own.
He was a 12 Stepper.
Trying to make amends.
He was on step number nine.
Apparently not enough.
Well, it's pretty obvious he came in through the window.
One thing's for sure, this killer's lugging around some pretty big dogs.
I just ID'd those fibers you found on Ally Sullivan's necklace.
They were not from her jacket or her dress.
They're made of lambskin and rabbit fur.
You know, just between you and me, I used to carry a rabbit's foot.
I mean, I'm not superstitious.
It's just, I figure why take the chance?
You know, as a kid, my grandfather used to have a rabbit farm.
Is this our Ford Taurus?
Once upon a time.
Told you it was a piece of crap.
The vehicle was abandoned near a junkyard off Boulder Highway.
By the time they checked the plates, it was already in the crusher.
Plates and paint are a match to your BOLO.
Did Brass run those tags?
Yeah, it was last registered to a Betty Grinly in Henderson.
She passed away last month.
Gasoline.
They torched it.
So he burns the evidence near a junkyard so that they'll find it and dispose of it.
Clever.
Looks like we're dealing with a professional.
Professional what, though?
Ally Sullivan was killed over a fender bender.
You're right.
He probably just loved his car and has a really bad temper.
And he likes pineapples.
Ah, yeah, I remember that Taurus.
Cheap and reliable.
That combo always sells.
Could you give me a description of the person who bought it?
Honey, I'm not even sure I can tell what you look like.
All I remember is he came off the bus... he walked right up with a big wad of cash.
I put him in that Taurus, and 15 minutes later, he drove off the lot.
Did you get a transaction record?
Let's see.
Taurus, Taurus, Taurus, Taurus...
Ah, here you go.
This is for a '99 Jeep Cherokee.
It sure is.
Um, hold it.
It's over here.
How's that one look?
Not so great.
The coroner's bullets matched the Walther, but Bobby found an additional striated mark on the O-jive, so he went back to the gun.
There was threading inside the muzzle.
Killer used a silencer.
Slightest imperfection in the barrel of a silencer could explain these scratches on the bullet.
Oh.
Also explains why no one heard anything.
But leave the gun, take the silencer?
Well, you can't legally buy a silencer, and those things are hard to make.
If the silencer was homemade, we might have been able to match the killer's tool marks.
Assuming we ever find this guy.
I don't know who would go through this much trouble to kill a nobody like Nash.
Well, he was a somebody to the killer. with this week's creep report.
If you were planning on checking out that new club, Bubbles, down near Harmon and Twain, you might want to think twice, because the corpses are really piling up down there.
The body of Clayton Nash vas found just two blocks away from the site of Ally Sullivan's murder, and the killer's still at large.
Is this just another crime spree, or the work of one deranged maniac?
Don't ask the cops.
They don't have a clue.
Remember, Amanda warned you.
What are you doing?
Not even ready for dinner.
I was checking our stocks.
Well, you're not wearing that to the Eiffel Tower.
I'll throw some clothes on.
Hurry up.
My mom's waiting for Maddy.
- I don't want to lose that table.
- Two seconds.
Well, now, who's that beautiful girl, huh?
So, you drive Route 107 Southbound during the week, is that right?
6:00 a.m. to 6:00 p.m. Yeah, I'm a morning person.
Now, is there any chance, any chance at all, that you remember this guy?
I know it's not the best picture.
I let him out on stop "E" around 4:30 day before yesterday.
Oh, you know, you get hundreds of people on and off your bus every day.
We got to be sure-- are you sure you remember him?
I look at every face that steps on my ride.
I saw the movie Speed-- I'm not gonna be hijacked.
Well, you know, actually Speed, it... it wasn't hijacked, it was wired to explode.
- Whatever.
- Well, all right.
What exactly do you remember about him?
He paid in cash, told me to keep the change-- everybody else uses a bus pass.
He was a real gentleman-- tucked-in shirt, new shoes...
Nice smell.
Kind of stands out on my route.
So I guess you remember where you picked him up, then?
He came walking out of the desert like Moses himself.
So the bus driver said the guy got on here?
You sure this is a working stop?
You know, the Cat bus stops here 59 times a day.
For what?
Construction workers, hikers, migrants.
The name on the driver's license was fake, but the picture's got to be real.
I'm gonna go... wave it around the neighborhood.
Assuming our guy's not from around here, how'd he get here?
The same way they did.
Every time I come to the desert, I see porno mags.
Who brings spankables out here?
It's probably just trash blown in from off the street.
Nobody throws away porn.
They're like heirlooms.
You'd better check this out.
A single set of ATV tracks goes off the trail back there into here-- killer could've dumped the ATV and then got on the bus.
Whoever was here had some big shoes.
Not necessarily big feet.
Multiple socks.
Another precaution to cover your tracks.
Assuming it's our guy.
I'd say it's our guy.
And I think he just gave us the finger.
I have an update for you.
The burned gloves that Nick submitted are lambskin lined with rabbit's fur.
They're consistent with the fibers found in Ally Sullivan's necklace.
Good.
Thanks.
I'm guessing that Clayton Nash had a record.
1985, aiding and abetting, extortion in '87, armed robbery in '92, assault in '95, uh, loan sharking the same year.
I get the drift.
But, uh, take a look at this-- it's FBI surveillance.
What is this, summer camp?
Well, not the kind you want to send your kid to- they're bank robbers.
- All of them?
Apparently, Nash and his buddies would get together every year, talk shop, hire hookers, play flag football.
Nash did mostly grunt work-- driver, lookout.
Never handled the cash.
He got busted in an armored car heist in Ohio ten years ago.
Testified against practically everyone he'd ever worked with.
Well, that certainly explains why someone would want to kill him.
Most of those people in the picture are either dead or in prison.
Who isn't?
Give me a Heine, please.
What is that?
Anybody should be drinking water, it's me, let me tell ya.
Really blasted my quads.
Let's do shooters.
Wanna?
Let's pretend... that you're wearing a suit, and let's pretend we're in your office, and let's pretend I just cut you a big check for your services because you are still my damn lawyer.
All right, man, all right, I'm listening.
There's some stuff I need.
No particular order.
Credit card blanks?
- DMV license blanks?
What is this?
- No questions.
Laminating machine, blank bar code labels.
What are you doing?
What makes you think I can even get this stuff?
I know the guys you represent.
I'm one of 'em.
I need the stuff fast.
Don't let me down.
There was no reason to connect the two murders until ballistics matched the silencer we found in the desert with the gun you found at the Riviera Suites.
Two murders, same killer.
Here's how we think things went down.
The killer drove his ATV into the desert, concealed it in the brush, takes a bus to a used car lot and buys a blue Taurus.
Then he drives to the apartment, puts a cap in Clayton Nash, gets into his car and drives away, free and clear.
It's a good plan, well executed.
Yeah, right up until the point that Ally Sullivan smashed into his car.
Collateral damage-- he killed her so she couldn't identify him.
Okay, that all sounds great.
How do we find the guy?
We know his original target, Clayton Nash.
Small-time hood who gave up a lot of his big-time cronies.
He's got a list of enemies.
How many guys got convicted off Nash's testimony?
Seven.
Three of them are still in prison.
One is dead, one is out on parole, and two served their time and are now out.
So we have three potential killers and nothing to tie them to either crime scene.
Not quite.
I ruled out most of the prints from Ally Sullivan's car-- the vic, the father, her boyfriend-- but there were a few unidentified partials.
It's not enough detail to run through AFIS?
Well, if this guy is a major case felon, then his prints are definitely in the system.
I dusted every inch of that apartment window.
He never took off his gloves.
You going somewhere?
The fake ID cards?
!
The staying out all night, and then this mysterious ATV ride in the desert.
You gave me the ATV for my birthday.
I ride it because I love you.
Yeah, at 3:00 in the morning?
- You're planning a job.
- I'm not planning a job!
You know I don't do that anymore.
You're a liar, Karl.
- You're lying!
- Honey, listen-- honey!
Janice, look...
I had to take care of something.
And what's that supposed to mean?
I killed Clayton Nash.
You even think about Maddy?
Your daughter?
You promised... on her life, you promised!
No more robberies!
I don't do robberies anymore.
- Now you just kill people.
- He was a rat.
All the waiting.
All the maneuvering, the lying.
I did it.
And I did it for us, for this family.
I kept money in our wallets.
I invested it, so all you had to do was watch football on TV.
And Nash was the reason.
The reason that you had to hide the money and live on the run.
I never got caught!
And I never would've got caught, except for that... that lousy junkie who gave me up.
I only had one rule:
you never talk!
And he talked.
And you jeopardized everything we have for some scumbag that nobody gives a damn about.
Janice, he called me four weeks ago.
He said, "I'm in town for a while.
Maybe we could we get together."
He had something to tell me.
Tell me what?
"I'm sorry?
I'm sorry I stole seven years of your life."
I-I couldn't let it go.
Oh, God, he had it coming.
And you were careful, right?
So what's with the fake IDs?
You don't make mistakes.
I didn't.
Somebody else did.
A girl named Ally Sullivan.
The girl on the TV?
Oh, God, she was just a kid!
She crashed into my car right after I did Nash.
She was gonna call the cops.
I had to do it.
I had to.
I want you to go up the stairs.
I want you to kiss Maddy.
I want you to tell her that you love her... and I want you to get out of this house.
Karl Cooper.
At age 19, he was an Army Ranger.
By 42, he was one of the most successful bank robbers in U.S. history.
He pulled off dozens of heists, going back two decades, all without killing a single person, and he was known to his bank-robbing buddies as "Red."
He doesn't have red hair.
Well, he got the nickname because he was always in debt...
"in the red."
Do we have In The Red's address?
Last known was the U.S. Federal Penitentiary in Marion, Illinois.
When Nash gave him up, Cooper plead guilty.
He served the full seven years term.
He got out, dropped off the face of the earth.
The tire model is a Dunlop KT-345.
I checked with the local dealers.
The only ATV that uses that particular type of tire has only been on the market for about a year.
It's called the Yamaha Raptor.
So I got the list of the names of everybody in Las Vegas who's recently bought one.
The only Cooper on the list is female-
- Janice.
Well, Karl Cooper had a girlfriend back in Ohio, a Janice Hanford.
I mean, she could be Cooper now.
- Do we have her address?
- Yeah.
It's, uh, second page.
I think you broke the case, Nick.
Sweetie, come with me, okay?
Las Vegas police.
Open up!
Janice Cooper?
- We're looking for your husband.
- He's not here.
Don't take it personally, but I'm not going to take your word for that.
You guys never do.
Look around all you like.
Please step outside with the child.
It's for your own safety.
Like I said, he's not here.
Mommy doesn't like you.
Really?
Well, that's too bad.
She hardly even knows me.
Maddy, you be nice, baby, okay?
Definitely.
Let's all be nice.
ATV has the right tires and there are plenty of machine tools and parts back there to build a silencer.
- Where's Karl?
- Go to hell.
All right.
Here's the way it is.
You're going to jail, she's going to Child Services.
End of story.
I've had cops in my face for half my life.
- You don't scare me.
- Well, maybe that's your lawyer now.
Hello?
Just answer yes or no-- are the cops there?
Yes.
Are they threatening to take Maddy?
Yes.
That's what happens when you marry a crook.
- I think they're tracing this call.
- I'll take that phone.
Hey, Officer.
I'm going to make your day.
Uncuff him, will you, Mitch?
Karl.
Don't do anything stupid.
- Palms out, please.
- I know the drill.
So, tell me...
Where'd I go wrong?
You killed two people.
Transcript :
Raceman
Subtitles:
AbraCadaver Team
Red.
Hey.
You look good, man.
It's been a while, hasn't it?
Haven't seen you forever.
Of course, you know that better than anybody.
I'm... surprised to see you here.
Actually, you know what, I'm not that surprised.
Listen, I'm glad you dropped by, 'cause there I've been meaning to talk to you about.
No, I-I just wanted to say...
Oh, my God!
Oh, my God!
Oh, my God.
Oh, my God.
Are you...
Are you okay?
Yeah, yeah, I'm...
I'm okay.
I'm okay.
I-I am so sorry.
I was on the phone, and I was going too fast, and I just...
Oh, God, um...
I'm going to call 911, and I'm going get you an ambulance.
I'm fine, honest, I am.
Okay.
Really, it's nothing.
At least, can I just...
I'm going to call the police and make a police report.
I'd really rather you not do that.
I'll tell you why.
I don't, uh, I don't have any insurance.
No, no, no.
That's okay.
I do.
Look, it was my fault;
I know that.
And that is exactly what I will tell them.
My dad just said, if I ever got into an accident that I had to make a police report.
Can I tell you something, sweetheart?
You're drunk right now, okay?
And you hit me.
Now, that's a DUI, and if you call the police, they're going to take your license away, and they're going to throw you in jail.
Now, what I'd like you to do is get in your car, drive yourself home and forget that this ever happened.
Can you do that?
I'm fine.
Go on.
I'm fine, honest, I promise.
You go.
BRASS:
Her name is Ally Sullivan.
She's the registered owner.
Patrol unit investigating the wreck, found the body.
So far, we have nothing on the other car.
Where's the nearest traffic camera?
Four blocks north.
We've been pulling bodies out of this neighborhood twice a month, it seems like.
I think that's actually an improvement.
Yeah.
Well, it's a cold night.
I'm going to get you some coffee and donuts.
Nine-nine-nine...
five-five-two.
Most people would have called 911.
Well, there's a seat-belt contusion on her shoulder.
So... she survives the crash.
She gets out of the car,
She dies on the street?
Internal injuries maybe.
Maybe.
How'd the car end up in this position?
It looks like she caused the wreck.
SIDLE:
Usually, the guy who hits is the guy who runs.
GRISSOM:
Well, either way, they left the scene, so it's still a hit-and-run.
And this girl's dead.
That makes them a murderer.
It's late.
I was worried.
Sorry.
Love you.
I love you, too.
Ally was out late all the time.
I never worried about her.
She liked night clubs?
MAN:
She liked the club business.
She wasn't a party girl.
She wanted to be a VIP hostess.
Way you do that in this town is you...
get your face out there, meet the right people, be seen.
I taught her to be responsible.
If there was an accident, call the police.
Help anyone who needed it.
I'd say to her all the time, no matter how pretty are today, someday, all that will be gone.
She knew that.
She knew she had to treat people with respect.
She always did the right thing;
that's why I don't get it.
Whoever was in the other car...
I don't care why they left.
All they had to do was call an ambulance instead of leaving her there to die.
ROBBINS:
C.O.D. was hyper-extension of the neck with a rotational snap, resulting in a ruptured vertebral artery, mid-cervical.
Mid?
Yeah.
Most MVA's break down low or up high, don't they?
That's why I don't think the accident did it.
The injury was more consistent with a stranglehold.
ROBBINS:
The head was rapidly twisted relative to the spinal column.
She would have been dead within a minute.
Whoever killed this poor kid knew what they were doing.
I don't like Gruyere, Daddy.
No Gruyere in it, sweetie;
I promise.
All right, egg me.
Hello, Mommy.
I'm cooking.
I see that.
Good morning, honey.
Morning.
Yeah, well, the jury's still out on that as far you're concerned.
You must have had quite a night.
Yeah.
I guess I lost track of time.
That Joey's a dog.
If you don't watch out, he's going to get you into trouble.
I kind of doubt that.
I wouldn't worry, though.
It won't happen again.
These days, I'm all about you, baby.
I'm the baby.
I know.
I know, but daddies can have more than one baby.
Yeah, pretty talk, talk, talk.
Here, wait, wait.
Try this, try this.
Maddy made them.
Mm, it's delicious.
Very good.
I'm glad you shaved.
I barely recognized you under all that scruff.
Hadn't quite finished that.
BRASS:
Hello, rapist.
MAN:
Man, I'm not a rapist.
I was a date rapist, which is not even the same thing.
And besides, back then, roofies were in.
So you miss the action of the good old days, huh?
It's not like that.
It's not like that at all.
What's it like?
Can I get a soda, too?
I'm, like, parched.
You want to tell me what your fingerprints are doing on a cup in a dead girl's car?
Uh, yeah, yeah.
I was out at Jet... ( over microphone ):
I was kind of faded, I guess.
Um, I bumped into Ally, and she offered me a ride home.
I needed it.
So that's what you were doing on Harmon Road?
Yeah, Ally don't care where I live; she's a cool girl.
You were close?
Oh, yeah.
Were you banging her?
Nah.
BRASS:
So, what, are you like, pen pals?
Girlfriends?
What?
No, look, we really didn't talk that much.
But we would text all the time.
That's, like, when you use your cell phone to send, like, you know, words.
Yeah.
I know what text messaging is.
Fine.
Sorry.
Look, I'm telling you the truth, you really couldn't get Ally on the phone, it's all texting with her.
Well, what do you want my DNA?
You want me to pee into a cup?
You want my underwear?
Whatever you want, you got it, cause I didn't kill Ally.
I'll tell you what I want.
I want you to write down exactly where you were last night and when.
Think you can handle that?
HALL:
Can I get a soda?
BRASS:
Shut up and write.
HODGES:
Paint scrapings from your vic's bumper are consistent with a '91 to '96 blue Ford.
So that narrows it down to a few thousand cars in the greater Las Vegas area.
Yeah, but the car you're looking for is also a piece of crap.
Make and model I get, but unless you have a new test that quantifies "crappiness"...
Actually, take a look.
SIDLE:
Firebird's on the left, blue Ford on the right.
What's the gray-blue in the middle?
A mixture of Rustoleum and house paint.
The killer's car had exposed primer.
Swanky.
Might have found a few letters from the license plate.
"Y-K-A."
You found a witness?
No.
Just behavior.
But according to Ally Sullivan's father, she was the type of girl that might have noticed the license plate of the car that hit her.
And according to her good friend, she preferred text messaging to leaving voice messages.
She was dying, right?
Disoriented?
I don't know, but maybe she thought she was texting when in fact she just dialing her phone.
That's a bit of a long shot.
Yeah.
It's still a shot.
NEWSPERSON ( on TV ):
Good evening, I'm Paula Francis.
A weekend of sordid crimes has Las Vegas Police working double-time.
MAN:
Come on, admit it.
Come on.
That's a little smile.
Come on...
Huh?
You know you're crazy about me.
I want you to come back.
As soon as you're done, come back.
Joey?
Joey?
Hey.
You don't hit on a cocktail waitress at the bar.
Go sit at a table, then she's got a reason to come over and serve you, and it's less obvious.
Hold on.
Wait, wait.
The househusband's giving me tips on women?
I married a cocktail waitress.
Janice-- cocktail?
This crappy little joint in Cleveland.
Really?
Mm-hmm.
I'm not looking to marry this this broad.
Although, she might think so.
At least for tonight.
Ah.
Joe, you're, like, 40-something, right.
Shouldn't you be toning it down a little?
Tone it down?
Karl, I'm looking to take it up a notch.
I got, like, ten more years of fun left and my wingman's got a curfew.
No?
Why'd you bail out so early last night?
I missed my family.
You're so sweet.
You should work for Hallmark.
I'll send them my resume.
MAN:
It wasn't the smell that got my attention, you know?
Usually when I find a body, it's, uh, it's very, um, raunchy.
It's called "decomp," in case you're interested.
I'll remember that for next time.
If it wasn't the smell, why did you check the room?
Rent is due every week.
What's his name?
We ask for cash, not names.
We take who the casinos won't.
Someone's got to do it.
You touch or move anything?
First thing I did was call you guys.
Got you on speed dial.
And finally, in local crime, an update on yesterday's tragic death of Vegas party girl Ally Sullivan.
Police are still examining all the evidence from the gruesome crime scene.
Detectives tell Eyewitness News they have little to work with.
And something that stumps them:
What was the motive for the killer in this violent end to a young and beautifu life?
REPORTER:
Mr. Sullivan, when was the last time you saw her alive?
What are you people thinking?
Think I'm going to say something magical, bring Ally back to me?
I'm not talking to you people.
Mr. Sullivan, what was your daughter doing in that section of town?
You think it was drug-related?
ANCHOR:
Police are hoping that passersby or other eyewitnesses will come forward to help the investigation of this terrible murder.
If you have information that might help police, you are urged to call LVPD at the toll-free number on the screen.
Control, this is Detective Curtis.
I'm at 1773 Twain, Riviera Suites.
I got a 419.
I need CSI.
You know, I think I've been called out to this place before.
I think I've processed this very room before.
Liver temp is close to ambient.
But lividity is fixed.
And rigidity starting to pass.
So he's been dead for at least 20 hours.
".380
Auto."
That's Federal ammo.
.380s make a lot of noise.
It's odd that no one heard anything, even in a dump like this.
"Walther PPK."
Two shots in the body, one to the head.
Sounds like a professional hit to me.
Looks like the killer used Armor All.
The gun is clean.
Looks like the victim was doing a little cleaning of his own.
He was a 12 Stepper.
Trying to make amends.
He was on step number nine.
Apparently not enough.
Well, it's pretty obvious he came in through the window.
Whew.
One thing's for sure, this killer's lugging around some pretty big dogs.
Oh.
Hey, Grissom, I just ID'd those fibers you found on Ally Sullivan's necklace.
They were not from her jacket or her dress.
They're made of lambskin and rabbit fur.
You know, just between you and me,
I used to carry a rabbit's foot.
I mean, I'm not superstitious.
It's just, I figure why take the chance?
You know, as a kid, my grandfather used to have a rabbit farm.
Is this our Ford Taurus?
Once upon a time.
Told you it was a piece of crap.
The vehicle was abandoned near a junkyard off Boulder Highway.
By the time they checked the plates, it was already in the crusher.
Plates and paint are a match to your BOLO.
Did Brass run those tags?
Yeah, it was last registered to a Betty Grinly in Henderson.
She passed away last month.
Gasoline.
They torched it.
So he burns the evidence near a junkyard so that they'll find it and dispose of it.
Clever.
Looks like we're dealing with a professional.
Professional what, though?
Ally Sullivan was killed over a fender bender.
You're right.
He probably just loved his car and has a really bad temper.
And he likes pineapples.
Ah, yeah, I remember that Taurus.
Cheap and reliable.
That combo always sells.
Could you give me a description of the person who bought it?
Honey, I'm not even sure I can tell what you look like.
All I remember is he came off the bus... he walked right up with a big wad of cash.
I put him in that Taurus, and 15 minutes later, he drove off the lot.
Did you get a transaction record?
Let's see.
Taurus, Taurus, Taurus, Taurus...
Ah, here you go.
This is for a '99 Jeep Cherokee.
It sure is.
Um, hold it.
It's over here.
How's that one look?
Not so great.
The coroner's bullets matched the Walther, but Bobby found an additional striated mark on the O-jive, so he went back to the gun.
There was threading inside the muzzle.
Killer used a silencer.
Slightest imperfection in the barrel of a silencer could explain these scratches on the bullet.
Oh.
Also explains why no one heard anything.
But leave the gun, take the silencer?
Well, you can't legally buy a silencer, and those things are hard to make.
If the silencer was homemade, we might have been able to match the killer's tool marks.
Assuming we ever find this guy.
I don't know who would go through this much trouble to kill a nobody like Nash.
WILLOWS:
Well, he was a somebody to the killer. with this week's creep report.
If you were planning on checking out that new club, Bubbles, down near Harmon and Twain, you might want to think twice, because the corpses are really piling up down there.
The body of Clayton Nash vas found just two blocks away from the site of Ally Sullivan's murder, and the killer's still at large.
Is this just another crime spree, or the work of one deranged maniac?
Don't ask the cops.
They don't have a clue.
Remember, Amanda warned you.
JANICE:
Carl?
Mm.
What are you doing?
Oh.
Not even ready for dinner.
I was checking our stocks.
Well, you're not wearing that to the Eiffel Tower.
I'll throw some clothes on.
Hurry up.
My mom's waiting for Maddy.
I don't want to lose that table.
Two seconds.
Okay.
Well, now, who's that beautiful girl, huh?
So, you drive Route 107 Southbound during the week, is that right?
6:00 a.m. to 6:00 p.m.
Yeah, I'm a morning person.
Now, is there any chance, any chance at all, that you remember this guy?
I know it's not the best picture.
Oh, yeah.
I let him out on stop "E" around 4:30 day before yesterday.
Oh, you know, you get hundreds of people on and off your bus every day.
We got to be sure-- are you sure you remember him?
I look at every face that steps on my ride.
I saw the movie Speed-- I'm not gonna be hijacked.
Well, you know, actually Speed, it... it wasn't hijacked, it was wired to explode.
Whatever.
Well, all right.
What exactly do you remember about him?
He paid in cash, told me to keep the change-- everybody else uses a bus pass.
He was a real gentleman-- tucked-in shirt, new shoes...
Nice smell.
Kind of stands out on my route.
So I guess you remember where you picked him up, then?
He came walking out of the desert like Moses himself.
SANDERS:
So the bus driver said the guy got on here?
You sure this is a working stop?
You know, the Cat bus stops here 59 times a day.
SANDERS:
For what?
Construction workers, hikers, migrants.
The name on the driver's license was fake, but the picture's got to be real.
I'm gonna go... wave it around the neighborhood.
Okay.
Assuming our guy's not from around here, how'd he get here?
The same way they did.
SANDERS:
Every time I come to the desert,
I see porno mags.
Who brings spankables out here?
STOKES:
It's probably just trash blown in from off the street.
Nobody throws away porn.
They're like heirlooms.
Passed on down the family tree.
Hey, Greg.
Come here and check this out.
A single set of ATV tracks goes off the trail back there into here-- killer could've dumped the ATV and then got on the bus.
Whoever was here had some big shoes.
Not necessarily big feet.
Multiple socks.
Another precaution to cover your tracks.
Assuming it's our guy.
STOKES:
I'd say it's our guy.
?
I have an update for you.
The burned gloves that Nick submitted are lambskin lined with rabbit's fur.
They're consistent with the fibers found in Ally Sullivan's necklace.
Good.
Thanks.
Mm-hmm.
WILLOWS:
I'm guessing that Clayton Nash had a record.
1985, aiding and abetting, extortion in '87, armed robbery in '92, assault in '95, uh, loan sharking the same year.
I get the drift.
But, uh, take a look at this-- it's FBI surveillance.
What is this, summer camp?
Well, not the kind you want to send your kid to-- they're bank robbers.
All of them?
Apparently, Nash and his buddies would get together every year, talk shop, hire hookers, play flag football.
Nash did mostly grunt work-- driver, lookout.
Never handled the cash.
He got busted in an armored car heist in Ohio ten years ago.
Testified against practically everyone he'd ever worked with.
Well, that certainly explains why someone would want to kill him.
Most of those people in the picture are either dead or in prison.
Who isn't?
Give me a Heine, please.
What is that?
Anybody should be drinking water, it's me, let me tell ya.
Really blasted my quads.
Let's do shooters.
Wanna?
Let's pretend... that you're wearing a suit, and let's pretend we're in your office, and let's pretend I just cut you a big check for your services because you are still my damn lawyer.
All right, man, all right, I'm listening.
There's some stuff I need.
No particular order.
Credit card blanks?
DMV license blanks?
What is this?
No questions.
Laminating machine, blank bar code labels.
What are you doing?
What makes you think I can even get this stuff?
I know the guys you represent.
I'm one of 'em.
I need the stuff fast.
Don't let me down.
GRISSOM:
There was no reason to connect the two murders until ballistics matched the silencer we found in the desert with the gun you found at the Riviera Suites.
Two murders, same killer.
SIDLE:
Here's how we think things went down.
The killer drove his ATV into the desert, concealed it in the brush, takes a bus to a used car lot and buys a blue Taurus.
BROWN:
Then he drives to the apartment, puts a cap in Clayton Nash, gets into his car and drives away, free and clear.
It's a good plan, well executed.
Yeah, right up until the point that Ally Sullivan smashed into his car.
Collateral damage-- he killed her so she couldn't identify him.
BROWN:
Okay, that all sounds great.
How do we find the guy?
WILLOWS:
We know his original target, Clayton Nash.
Small-time hood who gave up a lot of his big-time cronies.
He's got a list of enemies.
How many guys got convicted off Nash's testimony?
Seven.
Three of them are still in prison.
One is dead, one is out on parole, and two served their time and are now out.
So we have three potential killers and nothing to tie them to either crime scene.
SIDLE:
Not quite.
I ruled out most of the prints from Ally Sullivan's car-- the vic, the father, her boyfriend-- but there were a few unidentified partials.
It's not enough detail to run through AFIS?
GRISSOM:
Well, if this guy is a major case felon, then his prints are definitely in the system.
I dusted every inch of that apartment window.
He never took off his gloves.
?
The fake ID cards?
!
The staying out all night, and then this mysterious ATV ride in the desert.
You gave me the ATV for my birthday.
I ride it because I love you.
Yeah, at 3:00 in the morning?
Yeah.
Uh-uh.
You're planning a job.
I'm not planning a job!
You know I don't do that anymore.
You're a liar, Karl.
You're lying!
Honey, listen-- honey!
Janice, look...
I had to take care of something.
And what's that supposed to mean?
I killed Clayton Nash.
You even think about Maddy?
Your daughter?
You promised... on her life, you promised!
No more robberies!
I don't do robberies anymore.
Now you just kill people.
He was a rat.
Oh, Karl.
All the waiting.
All the maneuvering, the lying.
I did it.
And I did it for us, for this family.
I kept money in our wallets.
I invested it, so all you had to do was watch football on TV.
And Nash was the reason.
The reason that you had to hide the money and live on the run.
I never got caught!
And I never would've got caught, except for that...
that lousy junkie who gave me up.
I only had one rule:
you never talk!
And he talked.
And you jeopardized everything we have for some scumbag that nobody gives a damn about.
Janice, he called me four weeks ago.
He said, "I'm in town for a while.
Maybe we could we get together."
He had something to tell me.
Tell me what?
"I'm sorry?
I'm sorry I stole seven years of your life."
I-I couldn't let it go.
Oh, God, he had it coming.
And you were careful, right?
So what's with the fake IDs?
Karl?
You don't make mistakes.
I didn't.
Somebody else did.
A girl named Ally Sullivan.
The...
The girl on the TV?
Oh, Karl!
Oh, God, she was just a kid!
She crashed into my car right after I did Nash.
She was gonna call the cops.
I had to do it.
I had to.
I want you to go up the stairs.
I want you to kiss Maddy.
I want you to tell her that you love her... and I want you to get out of this house.
WILLOWS:
Karl Cooper.
At age 19, he was an Army Ranger.
By 42, he was one of the most successful bank robbers in U.S. history.
He pulled off dozens of heists, going back two decades, all without killing a single person, and he was known to his bank-robbing buddies as "Red."
He doesn't have red hair.
Well, he got the nickname because he was always in debt... "in the red."
Do we have In The Red's address?
Last known was the U.S. Federal Penitentiary in Marion, Illinois.
When Nash gave him up,
Cooper plead guilty.
He served the full seven years term.
He got out, dropped off the face of the earth.
STOKES:
The tire model is a Dunlop KT-345.
I checked with the local dealers.
The only ATV that uses that particular type of tire has only been on the market for about a year.
It's called the Yamaha Raptor.
So I got the list of the names of everybody in Las Vegas who's recently bought one.
The only Cooper on the list is female-
- Janice.
Well, Karl Cooper had a girlfriend back in Ohio, a Janice Hanford.
I mean, she could be Cooper now.
Do we have her address?
Yeah.
It's, uh, second page.
I think you broke the case, Nick.
( tires squealing )
Maddy...
Sweetie, come with me, okay?
OFFICER:
Las Vegas police.
Open up!
Janice Cooper?
Yeah.
We're looking for your husband.
He's not here.
Don't take it personally, but I'm not going to take your word for that.
You guys never do.
Look around all you like.
Please step outside with the child.
It's for your own safety.
Like I said, he's not here.
Mommy doesn't like you.
Really?
Well, that's too bad.
She hardly even knows me.
Maddy, you be nice, baby, okay?
Definitely.
Let's all be nice.
STOKES:
Jim...
ATV has the right tires and there are plenty of machine tools and parts back there to build a silencer.
Where's Karl?
Go to hell.
All right.
Here's the way it is.
You're going to jail, she's going to Child Services.
End of story.
I've had cops in my face for half my life.
You don't scare me.
Well, maybe that's your lawyer now.
Hello?
Just answer yes or no-- are the cops there?
Yes.
Are they threatening to take Maddy?
Yes.
That's what happens when you marry a crook.
I think they're tracing this call.
I'll take that phone.
Hey, Officer.
Yup?
I'm going to make your day.
Uncuff him, will you, Mitch?
Karl.
Don't do anything stupid.
Palms out, please.
I know the drill.
So, tell me...
Where'd I go wrong?
You killed two people.
(distant siren wails)
Red.
Hey.
(chuckles nervously)
You look good, man.
?
It'''s been a while, hasn'''t it
Haven'''t seen you forever.
Of course, you know that better than anybody.
I'''m... surprised to see you here.
Actually, you know what, I'''m not that surprised.
Listen, I'''m glad you dropped by, '''cause there'''s something
I'''ve been meaning to talk to you about.
No, I-I just wanted to say... (silenced gunshots)
(silenced gunshot)
(radio plays)
?
?
...
Let the good times roll
?
Good times roll... ?
(tires screeching)
(gasps)
Oh, my God!
Oh, my God!
Oh, my God.
Oh, my God.
.. (groans) Are you.
ay?
Are you ok
Yeah, yeah, I'''m...
I'''m okay.
I'''m okay.
I-I am so sorry.
st, I was on the phone, and I was going too fa ... and I just
911, Oh, God, um...
I'''m going to call ce.
and I'''m goin g get you an ambulan
I'''m fine, honest, I am.
Ok ay.
Really, it'''s nothing.
At least, can I just...
I'''m going to call the poli ce and make a police report.
I'''d really rather you not do that.
I'''ll tell you why.
I don'''t, uh, I don'''t have any insurance.
.
No, no, no
That'''s okay.
I do.
Look, it was my faul t;
I know that.
And that is exactly what I will tell them.
My dad just said, if I ever got into an accident that I had to make a police report.
t?
Can I tell you something, sweethear
You'''re drunk right now, okay?
.
And you hit me
Now, that'''s a DUI, and if you call the police, they'''re going to take your license away, il.
and they'''re goin g to throw you in ja
Now, what I'''d like you to do is get in your car, drive yourself home and forget that this ever happened.
Can you do that?
I'''m fine.
n.
Go o e.
I'''m fine, honest, I promis
.
You go
Okay.
(groans)
(shutter clicking) n.
BRASS:
Her name is Ally Sulliva er.
She'''s the registered own y.
Patrol unit investigating g the wreck, found the bod
So far, we have nothing on the other car.
Where'''s the nearest traffic camera?
Four blocks north.
es We'''ve been pulling bodi out of this neighborhood twice a month, it seems like.
I think that'''s actually an improvement.
Yeah.
Well, it'''s a cold night.
s.
I'''m going to get you some coffee and doughnut
Nine, nine, nine, five, five, two.
Most people would have called 911.
Well, there'''s a seat-bel t contusion on her shoulder.
So... she survives the crash.
She gets out of the car,
She dies on the street?
Internal injuries maybe.
Maybe.
How'''d the car end up in this position though?
It looks like shecaused the wreck.
SIDLE:
Usually, the guy who hits is the guy who runs.
GRISSOM:
Well, either way, they left the scene, so it'''s still a hit-and-run.
And this girl'''s dead.
So we may have a murderer.
(sighs)
It'''s late.
I was worried.
Sorry.
Love you.
I love you, too.
?
Who... are you?
?
?
Who, who, who, who?
?
?
Who... are you?
?
?
Who, who, who, who?
?
?
I really want to know ?
?
?
Who... are you?
?
?
Oh-oh-oh ?
?
Who... ?
?
Come on, tell me who are you, you, you ?
?
Oh, you!
?
Ally was out late all the time.
I never worried about her.
She liked night clubs?
MAN:
She liked the club business.
She wasn'''t a party girl.
She wanted to be a VIP hostess.
(shutter clicking)
Way you do that in this town is you...
get your face out there, meet the right people, be seen.
I taught her to be responsible.
If there was an accident, call the police.
Help anyone who needed it.
I'''d say to her all the tim e, no matter how pretty you are today, someday, all that will be gone.
She knew that.
She knew she had to treat people with respect.
She always did the right thing;
that'''s why I don'''t get i t.
Whoever was in the other car...
I don'''t care why they left .
All they had to do was call an ambulance instead of leaving her there to die.
ROBBINS:
C.O.D. was hyper-extensio n of the neck with a rotational snap , resulting in a rupture d vertebral arte ry, mid-cervical.
Mid?
Ye ah.
Most MVA'''s break down low or up high, don'''t they?
That'''s why I don'''t think the accident did it.
The injury was more consistent with a stranglehold.
ROBBINS:
The head was rapidly twisted relative to the spinal column.
te.
She would have bee n dead within a minu
Whoever killed this poor kid knew what they were doing.
y.
I don'''t like Gruyere, Dadd
No Gruyere in it, sweetie;
I promise.
All right, egg me.
Hello, Mommy.
I'''m cooking.
.
I see that
Good morning, honey.
Morning.
Yeah, well, the jury '''s still out on that d.
as far you'''re concerne
You must have had quite a night.
Yeah.
I guess I lost track of time.
dog.
That Joey'''s a e.
If you don'''t watch out, he '''sgoing to get you into troubl
I kind of doubt that.
.
I wouldn'''t worry, though
It won'''t happen again.
These days, I'''m all about you, baby.
I'''m the baby.
I know.
I know, but daddies can have more than one baby.
Yeah, pretty talk, talk, talk.
Here, wait, wait.
Try this, try this.
Maddy made them.
us.
Mm, it'''s delicio d.
Very goo d.
I'''m glad you shave u I barely recognized yo under all that scruff.
.
Hadn'''t quite finished that
BRASS:
Hello, rapist.
MAN:
Man, I'''m not a rapist.
I was a date rapist, which is not even the same thing.
And besides, back then, roofies were in.
So you miss the action of the good old days, huh?
It'''s not like th at.
It'''s not like that at all.
What'''s it like?
o?
Can I get a soda, to
I'''m, like, parched.
You want to tell me what your fingerprints are doing on a cup in a dead girl'''s car?
Uh, yeah, yeah.
I was out at Jet... (over microphone):
I was kind of faded, I guess.
Um, I bumped into Ally, and she offered me a ride home.
I needed it.
So that'''s what you were doing on Harmon Road?
I.
Yeah, Ally don'''t care where I live; she'''s a cool gir
You were close?
Oh, yeah.
Were you banging her?
Nah.
BRASS:
So, what, are you like, pen pals?
Girlfriends?
What?
uch.
No, look, we really didn'''t talk that m
But we would t ext all the time.
e That'''s, like, when you use your cell phon to send, like, you know, words.
Yeah.
I know what text messaging is.
Fine.
Sorry.
Look, I'''m telling you the truth, you really couldn'''t get Ally on the phone, it'''s all texting with he r.
Well, what do you want my DNA?
You want me to pee into a cup?
You want my underwear?
Whatever you want, you got it, '''cause I didn'''t kill A lly.
BRASS:
I'''ll tell you what I wan t.
I want you to write down exactly where you were last night and when.
HODGES:
Paint scrapings from your vic'''s bu mper are consistent with a '''91 t o '''96 blue Ford.
So that narrows it down to a few thousand cars in the greater Las Vegas area.
Yeah, but the car you'''re looki ng for is also a piece of crap.
et, Make and model I g but unless you hav e a new test
. that quantifie s "crappiness"..
Actually, take a look.
SIDLE:
Silver Firebird'''s on the lef t, blue Ford on the right.
What'''s the gray-blue in the middle?
A mixture of Rustoleum and house paint.
The killer'''s car had exposed primer.
Swanky.
(door opens)
Might have found a few letters from the license plate.
"Y-K-A."
You found a witness?
No.
Just behavior.
But according to Ally Sullivan'''s father, she was the type of girl that might have noticed the license plate of the car that hit her.
And according to her good friend, she preferred text messaging to leaving voice messages.
She was dying, right?
Disoriented?
I don'''t know, but maybe she thought she was texting when in fact she was just dialing the phone.
(phone keys beeping) t.
That'''s a bit of a long sho
Yeah.
It'''s still a shot.
NEWSWOMAN (on TV):
Good evening.
I'''m Paula Franci s.
A weekend of sordid crimes has
Las Vegas Police working double-time.
At the same time, the police union is arguing for more pay.
They say they'''re doing all they can to protect residents, but the pay scale...
Yeah, yeah, okay.
Joey?
Joey?
Hey.
You don'''t hit on a cocktail waitressatthe bar.
Go sit at a table, then she'''s got a reason to come over and serve you, and it'''s less obvious.
Hold on.
Wait, wait.
The househusband'''s giving me tips on women?
I married a cocktail waitress.
d?
Janice cocktaile
This crappy little joint in Cleveland.
Really?
Mm-hmm.
I'''m not looking to marry this broad.
Although, she might think so.
ht.
At least for tonig
Ah.
Joey, you'''re, like, 40-something, right?
Shouldn'''t you be toning it down a little?
wn?
Tone it do h.
Karl, I'''m looking to take it up a notc ft I got, like, ten more years of fun le and my wingman'' 's got a curfew.
?
No
Why'''d you bail out so early last night?
I missed my family.
t.
That'''s so swee
You should wor k for Hallmark.
.
I'''ll send them my resume
MAN:
It wasn'''t the smell that g ot my attention, you know?
, Usually when I find a body it'''s, uh, it'''s v ery, um, raunchy.
It'''s called "decomp," in case you'''re interested.
I'''ll remember that for next time.
If it wasn'''t the smell, why did you check the room?
.
Rent is du e every week
What'''s his name?
We ask for cash, not names.
t.
We take who the casinos won'''
Someone'''s got to do it.
Did you touch or move anything?
s.
First thing I di d was call you guy I.
Got you on speed dia
And finally, in local crime, an update on yesterday'''s tragic deat h of Vegas party girl Ally Sullivan.
Police are still examining all the evidence from the gruesome crime scene.
Detectives tell Eyewitness News they have little to work with.
And something that stumps them:
What was the motive for the killer in this violent end to a young and beautiful life?
REPORTER:
Mr. Sulliv an, when was the last ti me you saw her alive?
What are you people thinking?
Think I'''m going to say something magical, bring Ally back to me?
I'''m not talking to you peopl e.
Mr. Sullivan , what was you r daughter doi ng in that section of town?
You think it was drug-relate d?
NEWSWOMAN:
Police are hoping passersby or other eyewitnesses will come forward to help in the investigation of this terrible murder.
If you have information that might help police, you are urged to call LVPD at the toll-free number on the screen.
Control, this is Detective Curtis.
I'''m at 1773 Twain, Riviera Suites.
I got a 419.
I need CSI.
You know, I think
I'''ve been called out to this place before.
I think I'''ve processed this very room before.
Liver temp is close to ambient.
d.
But lividity is fixe
And rigidity starting to pass.
So he'''s been dead for at least 20 hours.
".380
Auto."
That'''s Federal ammo.
.380s make a lot of noise.
It'''s odd that no one heard anything, even in a dump like this.
"Walther PPK."
Two shots in the body, one to the head.
Sounds like a professional hit to me.
Looks like the killer used Armor All.
The gun is clean.
Looks like the vic tim was doing a little cleaning of his own.
He was a 12 Stepper.
Trying to make amends.
He was on step number nine.
Apparently not enough.
Well, it'''s pretty obvious that he came in through the window.
, Whew.
One thing'''s for sure this killer'''s lugging arou nd some pretty big dogs.
Oh.
Hey, Grissom, I just I.D.'''d those fibers you found on Ally Sullivan'''s necklace.
They were not from her jacket or her dress.
They'''re made of lambskin and rabbit fur.
You know, just between you and me,
I used to carry a rabbit'''s foot.
I mean, I'''m not superstitious.
It'''s just, I figure why take the chance?
You know, as a kid, my grandfather used to have a rabbit farm.
Is this our Ford Taurus?
Once upon a time.
Told you it was a piece of crap.
The vehicle was abando ned near a junkyard off Boulder Highway.
By the time they checked the plates, it was already in the crusher.
Plates and paint are a match to your BOLO.
Did Brass run those tags?
Yeah, it was last registered to a Betty Grinly in Henderson.
She passed away last month.
Gasoline.
They torched it.
So he burns the evidence near a junkyard so that they'''ll find it and dispose of it.
Clever.
Looks like we'''re dealing with a professional.
Professional what, though?
Ally Sullivan was killed over a fender bender.
ight.
You'''re r
He probably just loved his car and has a really bad temper.
And he likes pineapples.
Ah, yeah, I remember that Taurus.
Cheap and reliable.
That combo always sells.
Could you give me a description of the person who bought it?
Honey, I'''m not even sure I can tell what you look like.
is All I remember he came off the bus... he walked right up with a big wad of cash.
I put him in that Taurus, and 15 minutes later, he drove off the lot.
Did you get a transaction record?
Let'''s see.
Taurus, Tauru s, Taurus, Taurus...
Ah, here you go.
e.
This is for a '''99 Jeep Cheroke
It sure is.
Um, hold it.
It'''s over here.
How'''s that one look?
Not so great.
?
?
?
?
The coroner'''s bullets matched the Walther, but Bobby found an additional striated mark on the O-jive, so he went back to the gun.
There was threading g inside the muzzle.
Killer used a silencer.
Slightest imperfection in the barrel of a silencer could explain these scratches on the bullet.
Oh.
Also explains why no one heard anything.
.. But.
leave the gun, take the silencer?
Well, you can'''t legally buy a silencer, and those things are hard to make.
If the silencer was homemade, we might have been able to match the killer'''s tool marks.
Assuming we ever find this guy.
I don'''t know who would g o to this much trouble to kill a nobody like Nash.
WILLOWS:
Well, he was a somebody to the killer.
(beeps)
(beeps) with this week'''s creep repor t.
If you were planning on checking out that new club, Bubbles, down near Harmon and Twain, you might want to think twice, because the corpses are really piling up down there.
The body of Clayton Nash was found just two blocks away from the site of Ally Sullivan'''s murde r, and the killer'''s still at large.
Is this just another crime spree, or the work of one deranged maniac?
Don'''t ask the cops.
They don'''t have a clue.
Remember, Amanda warned you.
JANICE :
Carl?
Mm .
What are you doing?
Oh .
Not even ready for dinner.
I was checki ng our stocks.
Well, you'''re not wearing that to the Eiffel Tower.
.
I'''ll throw some clothes on
Hurry up.
My mom'''s waiting for Maddy.
I don'''t want to lose that table.
Two seconds.
Okay.
Well, now, who'''s that beautiful girl, huh?
(laughs )
(keyboard clicking)
(beeps )
(beeps )
(whirring)
(beeps)
?
?
?
?
So, you drive Route 107 Southbound during the week, is that right?
6:00 a.m. to 6:00 p.m.
.
Yeah, I'''m a morning person
Now, is there any chance, any chance at all, that you remember this guy?
I know it'''s not the best picture.
Oh, yeah.
I let him out on stop "E" around 4:30 day before yesterday.
You know, you get hundreds of people on and off your bus every day.
We got to be sure-- are you sure you remember him?
e.
I look at every face that steps on my rid d.
I saw the movieSpeed-- I'''m not gonna be hijacke
Well, you know, actuallySpeed, it... it wasn'''t hijacked, it was wired to explode.
er.
Whatev
Well, all right.
What exactly do you remember about him?
He paid in cash, told me to keep the change-- everybody else uses a bus pass.
He was a real gentlema n-- tucked-in shirt, new shoes...
Nice smell.
Kind of stands out on my route.
So I guess you remember where you picked him up, then?
He came walking out of the desert like Moses himself.
SANDERS:
So the bus driver said the guy got on here?
You sure this is a working stop?
You know, the Cat bus stops here 59 times a day.
SANDERS:
For what?
Construction workers,
, hikers migrants.
se The name on the driver'''s licen
. is fake, but the picture''' s got to be real
I'''m gonna go... wave it around the neighborhood.
Okay.
(vehicles revving) re, Assuming our guy'' 's not from around he ere?
how'''d he get h
The same way they did.
SANDERS:
Every time I come to the desert,
I see porno mags.
Who brings spankables out here?
STOKES:
It'''s probably just trash blown in from off the street.
Nobody throws away porn.
ms.
They'''re like heirloo
Passed on down the family tree.
Hey, Greg.
Come here and check this out.
A single set of ATV trac ks goes off the trail
TV back there into here-- killer could'''ve dumped the A and then got on the bus.
Whoever was here had some big shoes.
Not necessarily big feet.
Multiple socks.
Another precaution to cover your tracks.
Assuming it'''s our guy.
STOKES:
I'''d say it'''s our guy.
And I think he just gave us the finger.
I have an update for you.
The burned gloves that Nick submitted are lambskin lined with rabbit'''s fur.
They'''re consistent with the fibers found in Ally Sullivan'''s necklace.
Good.
Thanks . Mm-hmm.
WILLOWS:
I'''m guessing that Clayton Nash had a record.
ng, 1985, aldi ng and abetti ''92, extortion in '''87 , armed robbery in ' assault in ''' 95, uh, loan shark ing the same year.
I get the drift.
But, uh, nce.
take a look at this- - it'''s FBI surveilla nd What is this, summer camp?
Well, not the ki you want to send your kid to-- they'''re bank robbers.
All of them?
Apparently, Nash and his buddies would get together every year, talk shop, hire hookers, play flag football.
.
Nash did mostly grunt work-- driver, lookout
Never handled the cash.
He got busted in an armored car heist in Ohio ten years ago.
.
Testified against practically everyone he'''d ever worked with
Well, that certainly explains why someone would want to kill him.
Most of those people in the picture are either dead or in prison.
Who isn'''t?
Give me a Heine, please.
at?
What is th
Anybody should be drinking water, it'' 's me, let me tell ya.
Really blasted my quads.
Let'''s do shoot ers.
Wanna?
uit, Let'''s pretend... t hat you'''re wearing a s ce, and let'''s preten d we'''re inyouroffi and let'''s pretend I ju st cut you a big check for your services
because you are st ill my damn lawyer.
All right, man, all right, I'''m listening.
eed.
There'''s some stuff I n
No particular order.
Credit card blanks?
DMV license blanks?
What is this?
ns.
No questio
Laminating machine, blank bar code labels.
What are you doing?
What makes you think I can even get this stuff?
I know the guy s you represent.
''em.
I'''m one of ' t.
I need the stuff fas own.
Don'''t let me d
GRISSOM:
There was no reason to connect the two murders until ballistics matched the silencer we found in the dese rt with the gun you found at the Riviera Suites.
Two murders, same killer.
SIDLE:
Here'''s how we th ink things went down.
The killer drove his ATV into the desert, sh, concealed it in the bru
. takes a bus to a used car lot and buys a blue Taurus
BROWN:
Then he drives to the apartment, puts a cap in Clayton Nash, gets into his car and drives away, free and clear.
d.
It'''s a good plan, well execute
Yeah, right up until the point that Ally Sullivan smashed into his car.
Collateral damage-- he killed her so she couldn' ''t identify him.
BROWN:
Okay, that all sounds great.
How do we find the guy?
WILLOWS:
We know his original target, Clayton Nash.
Small-time hood who gave up a lot of his big-time cronies.
.
He'''s got a list of enemies
How many guys got convicted off Nash'''s testimony?
Seven.
Three of them are still in prison.
One is dead, one is out on parole, and two served their time and are now out.
So we have three potential killers and nothing to tie them to either crime scene.
SIDLE:
Not quite.
I ruled out most of the prints ar-- from Ally Sullivan'''s c the vic, the father, her boyfriend-- but there are a few unidentified partials.
It'''s not enough detail to run through AFIS?
GRISSOM:
Well, if this guy is a major case felon, then his prints are definitely in the system.
I dusted every inch of that apartment window.
He never took off his gloves.
?
?
You going somewhere?
The fake I.D. cards?
!
The staying out all night, and then this mysterious ATV ride in the desert.
You gave me the ATV for my birthday.
I ride it because I love you.
ng?
Yeah, at 3:00 in the morni
Yeah.
Uh-uh.
job.
You'''re planning a
I'''m not planning a job!
You know I don'''t do that anymore.
I.
You'''re a liar, Kar y!
You'''re lying!
Honey, listen-- hone
Janice, look...
I had to take ca re of something.
And what'''s that supposed to mean?
h.
I killed Clayton Nas
You even think about Maddy?
Your daughter?
You promised... on her life, you promised!
No more robberies!
more.
I don'''t do robberies any
Now you just kill people.
He was a rat.
Oh, Karl.
All the waiting.
All the maneuvering, the lying.
I did it.
And I did it for us, for this family.
I kept money in our wallets.
I invested it, so all you had to do was watch football on TV.
And Nash was the reason.
The reason that you had to hide the money and live on the run.
!
I never got caught t, And I never would'''ve got caugh except for that...
that lousy junkie who gave me up.
I only had one rule:
you never talk!
And he talked.
And you jeopardize d everything we have t.
for some scumbag that nobody gives a damn abou
Janice, he called me four weeks ago.
.
He said, "I'''m in town for a while
Maybe we could we get together."
He had something to tell me.
Tell me what?
"I'''m sorry?
I'''m sorry I stole seven years of your life."
I-I couldn'''t let it go.
g.
Oh, God, he had it comin
?
And you were careful, right
D.s?
So what'''s with the fake I.
Karl?
s.
You don'''t make mistake
I didn'''t.
Somebody else did.
A girl named Ally Sullivan.
V?
The...
The girl on the T
Oh, Karl!
Oh, God, she was just a kid!
r She crashe d into my ca
. right after I did Nash
She was gonna call the cops.
.
I had to do it
to.
I had
I want you to go up the stairs.
I want you to kiss Maddy.
I want you to tell her that you love her... and I want you to get out of this house.
WILLOWS:
Karl Cooper.
At age 19, he was
. an Army Ranger ul By 42, he was one of the most successf bank robbers in U.S. history.
He pulled off dozens of heists,
, going back two decades all without killing g a single person, and he was known to his bank-robbin g buddies as "Red."
.
He doesn'''t have red hair ame Well, he got the nickn because he was always in debt... "in the red."
s?
Do we have In The Red'''s addres wn Last kno was the U.S. Federal Penitentiary in Marion, Illinois.
p, When Nash gave him u
Cooper plead guilty.
.
He served the fu ll seven years term
He got out, dropped of f the face of the earth.
(typing)
STOKES:
The tire model
. is a Dunlop KT-345 s.
I checked with the local dealer
The only ATV that uses that particular type of tire has only been on the marke t for about a year.
tor.
It'''s called the Yamaha Rap
So I got the l ist of the names one.
of everybody in Las Vega s who'''s recently bought
The only Cooper on the list is female-
- Janice.
Well, Karl Cooper had a girlfriend back in Ohio, a Janice Hanford.
I mean, she could be Cooper now.
Do we have her address?
Yeah.
It'''s, uh, second page.
I think you broke the case, Nick.
(tires squealing)
Maddy... y?
Sweetie, com e with me, oka
(pounding on door)
OFFICER:
Las Vegas police.
Open up!
Janice Cooper?
Yeah.
We'''re looking for your husband.
ere.
He'''s not h
Don'''t take it personally, but I'''m not going to take your word for that.
o.
You guys never d ke.
Look around all you li
Please step outside with the child.
It'''s for your own safety.
re.
Like I said, he'''s not he
Mommy doesn'''t like you.
.
Really?
Well, that'''s too bad
She hardly even knows me.
Maddy, you be nice, baby, okay?
e.
Definitely.
Let'''s all be nic
STOKES:
Jim... s ATV has th e right tire and there are plenty of machine tools and parts back there to build a silencer.
Where'''s Go to hell.
s.
All right.
Here'''s the way it i s.
You'''re going to jail, she'''s going to Child Service
End of sto ry.
I'''ve had cops in my face for half my life.
You don'''t scare me.
(phone rings)
Well, maybe that '''s your lawyer now.
Hello?
Just answer yes or no-- are the cops there?
Yes.
Are they threatening to take Maddy?
Yes.
That'''s what happens when you marry a crook.
I think they'''re tracing this call.
I'''ll take that phone.
er.
Hey, Offic
Yup?
ay.
I'''m going to make your d
Uncuff him, will you, Mitch?
Karl.
Don'''t do anything stupid.
e.
Palms out, pleas
I know the drill.
So, tell me... where'''d I go wrong?
You killed two people.
Unscheduled offworld activation!
What the hell was that?
I don't know, Sir.
We're receiving SG-1's IDC.
They're back early.
Open the iris.
There was nothing on your end?
Nothing out of the ordinary to account for what we heard?
No Sir, it was perfectly routine, we just dialed the Gate and stepped through.
Gate diagnostics showed no irregularities.
Still I'd like you to double check the data once we're done here.
Yes, Sir.
Tell me about the planet...
Well we can confirm that the locals were visited by a Prior two weeks ago.
He performed the... standard miracles, healed the sick, cured the blind and... passed out the usual literature.
The natives are easy pickings they feel as though they were abandoned by their God Amaterasu and...
Ba'al.
- Excuse me?
- You said Amaterasu...
According to the background file, P4R was once under Ba'al's control...
P4R?
Sir... we went to PX7-455, I believe you have the wrong report.
Anyway.
The Tok'ra have been monitoring the inroads that the Ori have been making in the region for quite some time.
According to Selmak they are taking advantage of the relationships between...
Did you just say Selmak?
Indeed.
Teal'c...
Selmak is dead.
Sir...
Selmak and Jacob are very much alive.
Offworld activation!
- Chief...
- It's SG-1's IDC, Sir.
This is when they were originally scheduled to come back.
Defense teams stand by.
Open the iris.
Transcript by Tara P.
Season 9
- Episode 13 "Ripple Effect"
Well, according to the tests I've run, they're both SG-1.
- Identical in every way.
- How's that possible?
Well, we know Ba'al's able to produce adult clones of himself.
Presumably he could do the same with our people given samples of their DNA.
That doesn't explain how they knew SG-1's IDC.
And if their Intel was good enough to get their hands on something that sensitive,
- then how come they didn't know about Selmak?
- Yeah.
It's like they got the hard stuff right and the easy stuff wrong.
Ba'al would have known better.
You know the first team was making some pretty wild claims about people in past events.
And since the second team came back from the right planet at the scheduled time,
- it's safe to assume that they're the real SG-1.
- Okay.
Then who's the other team and where'd they come from?
Exactly.
We checked their story out, we went to PX7-445, the planet they claimed to have gated in from the locals there swore they'd never laid eyes on us.
So... this other team... is lying.
Not necessarily Sir.
It's possible they did gate in from PX7...
just not the PX7 that we know.
The multiverse theory of quantum physics deposits the existence of parallel universes.
An infinite number of ever growing alternate realities that exist concurrently with our own.
The theory holds that anything that can happen, will happen.
If not in this reality, then in another.
So you're saying that somewhere in an alternate universe,
I got to second base with Amy Pandenberg?
Theoretically, yes.
Boggles the mind, doesn't it?
We're part of a metaverse in which individual subuniverses are continually being generated.
Our own experience with the quantum mirror proved as much.
Realities can exist where...
we never defeated the Goa'uld or,
- the Stargate program went public.
- And Selmak is still alive.
Exactly.
Now, while it may feel immediate, the journey between Gates is not instantaneous.
It takes on average 0.3 seconds travel time.
However, according to Gate diagnostics, the travel time for the other SG-1 team clocked in at 3.4 seconds, suggesting a significantly longer trip.
OK, say for example we accept...
the possibility that this is an alternate SG-1 from a... parallel universe.
How did they get here?
I got nothing.
Yet.
Sumatra Mandheling.
One cream.
Two sugars.
Lucky guess.
Usually I have instant myself.
So, I'm guessing this almost feels like home, doesn't it?
Almost like home.
But... if it was home,
I'd be sitting where your sitting and you'd be sitting here, telling me:
"I'd love to help you but I have no idea what's going on."
I'm thinking one of two possible scenarios.
A:
Carter's right and you're from an alternate universe in which case we'll do everything we can to get you back home.
Or B:
You're not who you say you are.
In which case we need to find out what you're really after.
Actually there's a third scenario.
C:
You're not who you say you are, and it's up to us to find out what you're after.
I understand your reluctance to trust us, but rest assured we're just as eager to get to the bottom of this as you are.
No offence but, I'm not entirely sold on the alternate world theory.
There was nothing on our mission to PX7 that would even hint at it.
No quantum mirror, no weird alien artifacts.
It was a routine op.
But... you're telling me that, somehow, the Gate sent us through to a parallel universe.
Even though we know it's not supposed to work like that.
And yet here you are.
Assuming of course this is the SGC.
SG-1... six years ago.
Wake up in what they think is the SGC, turns out they're not really on Earth and it's all part of an elaborate Goa'uld plot.
Pegasus Galaxy, last year.
A team from the Atlantis base... gates through to what they think is the SGC, turns out they're not really on Earth.
It's another planet...
- and they're being manipulated by aliens.
- Let me put your mind at ease, we are neither the Goa'uld nor manipulative aliens.
You'll forgive me Sir if I don't take your word for it.
We won our freedom in the battle for Dakara.
And on that day not only did we defeat Ba'al and the replicators, you ensured that Anubis would never again threaten this Galaxy.
And then all Jaffa were united under our new leader
Bra'tac.
Bra'tac?
Really?
That, that that hasn't happened here yet.
And with the new threat to this galaxy I returned to SG-1.
Right, along with colonel Mitchell myself, and eventually colonel Carter.
- Who rejoined following her...
- Following her honeymoon.
What?
No.
I was gonna say following her stay on the Prometheus.
Honeymoon?
Indeed.
We weren't able to stop the Ori from establishing the second beachhead.
By the time we realized it was too late they had already sent their ships through.
If it happened in our reality...
There's a good chance it could happen in ours as well.
They destroyed Chulak,
Dakara, most of the Jaffa strongholds.
It's only a matter of time before they attack Earth.
- You have to find a way to get us back.
- I'm working on it.
- I've been going over the Gate diagnostics.
- And?
There was an unidentifiable energy spike just prior to your arrival.
It's almost certainly related to the sound they heard, but I'm still analyzing the data.
We were on PX7 for over 24 hours gathering intel.
And yet when your team went back to the planet no one recognized you.
Now, that suggests that our point of departure was definitely in our universe.
So what ever happened...
Had to have happened between the time you stepped through the Gate on your end, and the time you stepped through the Gate on this end.
Except the Gate system isn't designed to transport matter between universes.
It isn't designed to take you back in time either but it has before.
Did you notice any...
No unusual weather patterns or solar flare activity at the time.
Then is it conceivable something else could have affected the wormhole.
What could possibly exert that kind of influence on a subspace matter stream?
- A black hole!
- A black hole!
As we discussed the situation we realized we could pinpoint the source of the phenomenon to a precise window.
Specifically the in term journey between the two Gates.
Did she just say we?
Pardon me?
She said we.
You said we?
Ah, me and myself, I suppose.
The other Samantha Carter.
Right finally someone who can keep up with you?
Yep.
OK, this is PX7-455, their point of departure and this, is Earth their point of arrival.
The wormhole that brought them here, cross this section of space bisecting this singularity.
The black hole that was created when we destroyed the Ori beachhead.
Exactly.
Now, I'm theorizing that when they bisected the singularity subspace was ruptured, creating a rift in the space-time continuum that brought that SG-1 in to this universe.
But we've had teams gate in from locations on the other side of that black hole in our universe.
Why weren't they affected?
One more stupid question.
Oh, sorry.
Yours was fine, mine is stupid.
Why didn't we end up on alternate PX7 when we gated through to check out bizarre SG-1's story?
I can't answer that...
As far as I know the deviation was one way and specific to that particular wormhole.
However just to be on the safe side I would suggest that we reroute all Gate travel around the singularity for the time being.
Unscheduled offworld activation.
- What do you have for me now Walter?
- Sir, It's SG-1's IDC.
Again.
Do you want me to send a confirmation?
If another team comes through they'll just be stranded like the first one.
- Receiving radio transmission.
- Let's hear it.
Stargate Command, this is Mitchell.
What's the hold up?
We've got a situation here.
Sir if we don't open the iris...
Stargate Command do you read?
Defense teams!
Open the iris.
What the hell's going on?
So much for this phenomenon being restricted to one wormhole.
I may have underestimated its influence.
It's possible the first spatial tear may have caused a ripple effect across several realities, transforming an area of their subspace into a kind of... funnel, that's redirecting their Gate travel to this universe.
Any wormhole passing close enough to the black hole is being drawn into the singularity and rerouted here.
- So you're telling me we're the hub.
- The convergence point, yes Sir.
It might account for why Gate travel in this universe wasn't affected.
Might account.
Colonel Mitchell.
Sir.
Inform all off world teams to proceed to the Alpha site.
Until further notice Gate travel to and from Stargate Command, will be suspended, indefinitely.
- What if there are more teams coming in hot, Sir?
- I'm willing to make the occasional exception but I'm not about to turn this base into the grand central station of the Multiverse.
Dismissed.
Why is it that every team that has come through the Gate so far, has been exclusively an alternate SG-1?
I mean, how come no alternate SG-2s or SG-3s?
Well, SG-1 is the frontline team, the one most likely to get into trouble offworld.
And as a result the team we'd most likely have to let through.
Right.
So far we've had to turn back over 50 teams and not all of them have been SG-1.
Here's the really interesting part.
Each team, from each reality has dialed in from a different point of origin.
No repeats.
All originating from a corridor of space starting from Earth and passing within a few degrees of the singularity.
What about that superfluous energy signature?
- Has that happened again?
- No.
Not since the first alternate team dialed in.
Any idea what it was?
I'm not sure.
- But it reminds me of the incident on...
- K'Tau.
In that case we introduced an unstable super heavy element into their sun's nuclear reaction...
When the wormhole that brought us there passed directly through it.
But in this case the wormhole's passing through a black hole.
So who knows what the effect would be.
I thought we could use the help.
Yeah, I suppose two heads are better than one.
Unscheduled offworld activation.
Let's get to work.
General.
I was just about to come find you.
I have contacted Bra'tac on Dakara.
He has dispatched a mothership to the location provided to us by the other colonel Carter.
If the Ori attempt to establish a second beachhead then the Jaffa should give us a heads up.
Presuming of course if events play out the same way in both universes...
To this point, the particulars of the varying universes have remained remarkably similar.
That's what I wanted to talk to you about.
Another SG-1 came through twenty minutes ago.
Which puts the count at twelve teams.
Not including yourselves.
- Well, at least we're in good company.
- Well, this last team is a little different in terms of personnel.
How so?
Well, there's someone I thought you might like to talk to.
Daniel?
Teal'c?
Where's General O'Neill?
I'm sure you all have a lot to catch up on.
Janet...
Dr. Frasier...
What's going on here?
Janet, this, this may look like home to you, but it's not.
This is not the Stargate Command you left, we're not the Daniel and Teal'c you know.
You and your team gated to a parallel reality, this is an alternate SGC, on an alternate Earth, in an alternate universe.
In our reality Dr. Janet Frasier died... 2 years ago.
Sixteen different SG-1s.
Sixteen different points of origin, but only one point of convergence, this universe.
Now... given the fact that previous trips through the black hole didn't produce a rupture in the subspace structure...
They may not have of produced the rupture but it is entirely possible, that their repeated trips contributed to the deterioration of the space time fabric that weakened, eventually seeded to the singularity.
Creating the bridge between the various realities.
And I'm thinking that the proximity of these realities in relation to each other, may account for the absence of the... entropic cascade failure.
But... it still doesn't help us with the main problem.
How do we reverse the process?
I don't have the answer to this.
Because if I did...
We all wouldn't be here.
- Coffee?
- No.
Thank you.
You know, I can't help but think this whole thing would be a lot easier if Hammond hadn't ordered us to destroy the quantum mirror.
We could just use that to send all these teams back to their proper realities.
How?
I mean, there are a near infinite number of parallel universes.
The chances of us finding the right home universe for even one of these teams is next to impossible.
Excuse me, Colonel Carter.
My, colonel Carter...
Here Sir...
I've brought another volunteer who's offered to help.
Martouf.
Hello Samantha.
I remember the mission to P3X.
I was tending to a wounded airman, we came under fire.
You were there, you helped me stabilize him and got us out of there.
No, I didn't.
You were hit by an errant staff blast and, and killed instantly.
You were honored with a heroes funeral.
Lucky me.
Hopefully you will be able to return to your world soon.
- Hopefully?
- Yeah, for the moment it looks like your...
- your trip here, was only one way.
- No... no, you have to find a way to get us back as soon as possible.
- Yes, Sam and Dr Lee are working on something.
- But you don't understand.
We have been targeted by the Ori.
Earth is being ravaged by a plague, hundreds of thousands have been infected.
If we don't find a cure the entire planet will be wiped out.
So... how are things in your universe?
You mean between us?
I'm a little curious.
Things developed, but with you being on the other side of the galaxy.
Well, long distance relationships can be difficult.
I eventually joined the Stargate program to be closer to you.
We worked together.
Even lived together for quite some time, but in the end, things didn't work out.
You're with someone else now.
Who?
I think I have something.
This is the postmortem analysis of the P3W-451 incident.
A planet whose orbit strayed too close to a black hole.
One of our teams were attempting to gate back at the same time and as a result the SGC couldn't shut down the Gate from this end.
- I don't see what this...
- We were unable to sever the connection because Stargate Command was still connected to the singularity's gravitational field through the open Stargate.
- But we're not trying to...
- In that case we used a shape charge to deliver an energy surge to the matter stream... forcing the matter stream to jump to a different Gate, thereby severing the connection.
That could explain the sound they heard... and the superfluous energy signature that accompanied the matter stream from the first wormhole.
- It is some sort of la...
- Maybe a supernova.
or a gamma ray burst discharging at the exact millisecond that wormhole passed through that singularity.
It's a one in a billion fluke that ruptured subspace and created the point of confluence that drew the affected realities into this one.
And then to seal the bridge between the multiverse we have to target that point of confluence, basically recreate the circumstances that caused the breach in the first place.
But how is that possible...
You... you said it yourself, it was a one in a billion freak incident.
Well the odds would increase significantly if we took the wormhole out of the equation.
Then what happens to us?
We'd be stranded here.
I considered not telling you about this.
I understand why you hesitated but you made the right decision... by sealing the rupture we'll ensure no other teams get stranded here.
That's provided that this actually works.
I mean, we still have one major obstacle to overcome.
How do we deliver an explosive device into the singularity?
We get help from a friend.
Thor sends his apologies for not attending personally, but he and Heimdall are in the neighboring galaxy dealing with a most sensitive matter.
In his stead, I have conveyed the time dilation device as requested.
We appreciate your quick response Vaseer.
So, what do you think will this work?
I prefer not to prognosticate.
Well, don't prognosticate just tell us what your gut feeling is.
Speculating on the matter would serve no practical purpose.
Joseph and Mary...
What are the odds?
Less than 12% and that is provided you are able to in act the plan before the black hole's gravity decimates your ship.
Damn that's cold.
Colonel Mitchell.
Colonel Carter.
I'm giving it the green light...
shut this thing down.
You know I read all the mission reports on the Asgard...
They're not that I expected.
What were you expecting?
Well... pants for one.
The distance between the launch point and the target is crucial and you must be precise in your calculations.
I know.
The slightest oversight in either the timing of the explosion or the proximity of your ship to the singularity could result in a failed mission at best.
Certain death at worst.
I'm sorry, I'm having a hard time concentrating.
I understand, you are tired.
Allow me to complete the calibration for you.
Knock yourself out.
Time and again we've managed to save Earth and its allies from the most dire threats... situations in which we faced unassailable odds... almost certain defeat but we always managed to find a way to prevail in the end.
I'm sorry...
I wish there was a way I could send you home or...
- at the very least delay the mission so...
- You have no choice but to do what's best for your world.
I assume yours is not the only SG team in your reality that's actively searching for a cure to the plague...
No.
And I have a feeling that your Samantha Carter is back home working on the problem.
She stopped being my Samantha a long time ago.
I've missed you.
I have completed the calibrations.
Thank you Vaseer.
General.
Sorry to disturb you, I was wondering if I could have a word.
Of course Doctor.
Come in.
Thank you.
Sir, I would like to make a request on behalf of all of the teams stranded in this reality.
Please, postpone this mission until we can find a way to get home.
I can't do that.
We need our teams out there gathering intel on the Ori threat... instead of sitting on their hands here, waiting for normal Gate operations to resume... and that won't be possible until this problem is dealt with.
Well, I can empathize Sir, believe me.
I think you need to take a look at the bigger picture.
This goes beyond this world...
beyond this galaxy, this universe.
Hundreds of billions of lives are at stake.
Their survival could hinge on not just our return but the return of every SG-1 stranded on this base.
Sir, back in my universe, Earth is facing a global pandemic, one that your planet has already faced and beaten.
You have the cure that could save my world, all I have to do is get it to them.
I can also empathize but at the risk of sounding callous... my priorities are with this world.
How can you prioritize the lives of one group over those of another?
What makes my Earth any less important than your own?
We have the top minds from 18 different universes working on a way to get you home.
Now hopefully they can come up with a solution before this mission is completed but if they can't... then I'm sorry Doctor.
We finished loading the warhead and the time dilation generator.
Once the system checks are complete, we're good to go...
Where's the crew?
You're looking at it.
Given the dangers we may face it was decided that we proceed alone.
So if this plan goes fubar, we're the only ones that goes down with the ship.
Well, there's plenty more where we came from, right?
The perilous nature of this mission should not be taken lightly, there is a chance the Prometheus may not survive this voyage but courage and a steadfast resolve will prove the most valuable assets in this undertaking.
Well, good luck to you all.
I miss Thor.
Of course by the time he actually got around to drinking that orange juice, it would have been sitting in the back of the fridge for what, a month?
Yeah!
Yeah yeah!
Oh...yep, he was so damn thirsty he knocked it right back, it was a second or two before he actually breathed in, at which point...
Spit take of all spit takes!
there was orange juice on the table, the chairs...
On Aunt Emma!
Aunt Emma!
Oh!
Oh!
Big old fat Emma sitting across the table...
Little bits of bacon on her face orange juice dripping off her nose...
Reminiscing over old times?
Yeah... hell, I could talk to this guy all day.
No doubt.
You finished your shift?
Yeah, I'm exhausted I'm going to bed.
Speaking of which, I think it's past my bedtime.
And you need your beauty sleep.
Woah... who's talking?
So how'd it go?
I found a way round all the security protocols, everything's set.
Perfect.
By the time they figure out what happened... it'll be too late.
Show time.
We're approaching the singularity.
Calculating minimal prime distance to warhead launch.
Come on Carter.
.
I've got it, relaying the information.
Received.
Engaging sublight engines, proceeding to co-ordinates.
We've reached the target location.
- Yeah, I heard.
- Yeah, I think they're just... circling, like we are parking.
I should warn you...
I've been practicing those Sodan moves.
You were warned.
Wouldn't it have been easier just to zat him?
Easier yes... but far less gratifying.
Did he just insult me?
What's going on?
There's been a change of flight plans.
You want to tell us what's going on?
We're making an unscheduled detour.
Yeah, just how far out of our way is this little detour gonna take us?
About 3 weeks.
You're planning on taking this ship to Atlantis...
I mean, given the parallels between our two realities, I can't think of anywhere else we'll be going.
As soon as we complete our mission we'll drop you at the nearest habitable planet.
'till then have fun.
Three weeks, well that gives us time to think of something.
Idea's anyone?
Given the unique circumstance we find ourselves in.
It is possible to anticipate their actions and reactions.
All we must do... is think like them.
Well, shouldn't be that hard.
The other colonel Mitchell wishes to speak with you.
You're just going to ignore him for the next three weeks?
You guys seem reasonable... and you haven't hurt us... much.
You don't have a beard so you're not from the evil twin universe right?
Good.
Right, so if I know me like I do...
I'd have a pretty damn good reason to be doing what you guys are doing.
Bottom line is, I'd understand better than anyone, so level with me.
What's going on?
Let me ask you something.
How far would you go to save the lives of every man and woman on Earth?
Don't bother.
I already know the answer.
- If you were in my situation you would be doing the exact same thing.
- What?
Going after the ZPM?
Come on...
- Why else would you be going to Atlantis?
- Our ZPM is depleted.
We need yours to power the ancient weapon in Antarctica.
- Oh right, screw our Earth to save your own.
- All that ZPM is doing right now.
Is allowing one way travel from the Pegasus galaxy to Earth.
The billions of lives that we save is worth more than the inconvenience
- of slopping back and forth on the Daedalus.
- We need that ZPM to cloak Atlantis
If the Wraith come back and discover the City wasn't destroyed, they'll launch another attack.
If Atlantis falls, this galaxy is the next target.
If the Wraith return.
If they attack.
If the City is destroyed.
The threat we face is more immediate.
That still doesn't give you the right to do this.
Well, say it works.
Say that you can beam the ZPM of Atlantis, how do you plan to get it back to your own universe?
You have a way back.
You've planned this all along.
Well, we were right, they're going after the ZPM.
You sure you can open the door?
Hey, I helped build this thing... opening the doors the easy part.
It's taking the ship back that'll be tricky.
The armory is this way.
No Teal'c go to the armory on the next level it's less likely you'll be spotted.
Daniel and I will head to the engine room and pull the control crystal, once they come to investigate the problem, we'll get the drop on them there.
Very well.
Hey, you had to give it a shot.
I know I would.
So, now that we know how you get out, we'll just have to make sure it doesn't happen again.
No hitting.
So, while we were up here.
We were down on the next level breaking into the other armory.
- How did you know I wasn't your Mitchell.
- Easy.
If we were in your position we would have done the same thing.
Let me get this straight.
We figured that you guys would try to escape and we set this trap for you, not realizing that you'd figure out that we'd figure you out and you'd set your own?
Indeed.
Now, can you take us to our colonel Mitchell?
Sam disabled the power relay running through these walls so...
I wouldn't bother.
Ideas anyone?
Walter?
Sir, it's a subspace communication from the Prometheus.
- Let's hear it.
- Yes Sir.
Sir, this is colonel Carter.
Good to hear from you Colonel, I take it the mission was a success.
No Sir.
In fact we're scraping the mission and heading back home.
Colonel?
Sir, I think I figured out a way to send these teams back to their proper realities.
And how do we do that?
By doing exactly the same thing the first team did in order to get here.
You're telling me they planned this from the get-go?
Yes Sir, it accounts for the boom you heard and the extra energy signature the Gate diagnostic picked up in the first matter stream.
They opened the wormhole through the black hole and then blasted a bridge into this universe.
Ain't that how Carter described it, I don't know, I just remember
Wormhole, black hole, blast.
Colonel Carter.
Sir, we've established a wormhole to PX7-455.
Now, when sergeant Siler is finished, we'll fire the directed energy weapon through the Gate.
If I'm right, it should reverse the space time rupture effectively inverting the convergence effect.
Each team gated in from a different point of origin, once the convergence effect has been reversed we'll dial those different points of origin and create wormholes that will follow the inter-universal pathways
- already created by their initial trips here...
- I got it, I got it, they're going back.
Ready when you are, Sir.
Clear the Gateroom.
I will need the weapon back once your work here is completed.
it is, after all, only on loan to you temporarily.
I know.
You'll get it back when we're done.
Lower the blast doors.
Fire the weapon.
We have a stable wormhole, 3.4 seconds, it worked.
Open the blast doors.
Bring them in.
Hey Mitchell... when the time comes, cut the green one.
What the hell did that mean?
I don't know.
But I've the feeling that someday you're going to find out.
Have all the other teams left, Sir?
You're the last ones to go.
It was nice working with you again Sam.
Your presence has been sorely missed on our team.
Just out of curiosity, where did I go?
Maternity leave.
We have something for you.
The cure to the Prior's plague.
Thank you General.
It's good to see you again.
You too.
May it not be the last time.
Well, we'd love to stay... but we have a planet to save.
Bye.
23.976
Unscheduled offworld activation!
What the hell was that?
I don't know, Sir.
We're receiving SG-1's IDC.
They're back early.
Open the iris.
There was nothing on your end?
Nothing out of the ordinary to account for what we heard?
No Sir, it was perfectly routine, we just dialed the Gate and stepped through.
Gate diagnostics showed no irregularities.
Still I'd like you to double check the data once we're done here.
Yes, Sir.
Tell me about the planet...
Well we can confirm that the locals were visited by a Prior two weeks ago.
He performed the... standard miracles, healed the sick, cured the blind and... passed out the usual literature.
The natives are easy pickings they feel as though they were abandoned by their God Amaterasu and...
Ba'al.
- Excuse me?
- You said Amaterasu...
According to the background file, P4R was once under Ba'al's control...
P4R?
Sir... we went to PX7-455, I believe you have the wrong report.
Anyway.
The Tok'ra have been monitoring the inroads that the Ori have been making in the region for quite some time.
According to Selmak they are taking advantage of the relationships between...
Did you just say Selmak?
Indeed.
Teal'c...
Selmak is dead.
Sir...
Selmak and Jacob are very much alive.
Offworld activation!
- Chief...
- It's SG-1's IDC, Sir.
This is when they were originally scheduled to come back.
Defense teams stand by.
Open the iris.
Transcript by Tara P.
Season 9
- Episode 13 "Ripple Effect"
Well, according to the tests I've run, they're both SG-1.
- Identical in every way.
- How's that possible?
Well, we know Ba'al's able to produce adult clones of himself.
Presumably he could do the same with our people given samples of their DNA.
That doesn't explain how they knew SG-1's IDC.
And if their Intel was good enough to get their hands on something that sensitive,
- then how come they didn't know about Selmak?
- Yeah.
It's like they got the hard stuff right and the easy stuff wrong.
Ba'al would have known better.
You know the first team was making some pretty wild claims about people in past events.
And since the second team came back from the right planet at the scheduled time,
- it's safe to assume that they're the real SG-1.
- Okay.
Then who's the other team and where'd they come from?
Exactly.
We checked their story out, we went to PX7-445, the planet they claimed to have gated in from the locals there swore they'd never laid eyes on us.
So... this other team... is lying.
Not necessarily Sir.
It's possible they did gate in from PX7...
just not the PX7 that we know.
The multiverse theory of quantum physics deposits the existence of parallel universes.
An infinite number of ever growing alternate realities that exist concurrently with our own.
The theory holds that anything that can happen, will happen.
If not in this reality, then in another.
So you're saying that somewhere in an alternate universe,
I got to second base with Amy Pandenberg?
Theoretically, yes.
Boggles the mind, doesn't it?
We're part of a metaverse in which individual subuniverses are continually being generated.
Our own experience with the quantum mirror proved as much.
Realities can exist where...
we never defeated the Goa'uld or,
- the Stargate program went public.
- And Selmak is still alive.
Exactly.
Now, while it may feel immediate, the journey between Gates is not instantaneous.
It takes on average 0.3 seconds travel time.
However, according to Gate diagnostics, the travel time for the other SG-1 team clocked in at 3.4 seconds, suggesting a significantly longer trip.
OK, say for example we accept...
the possibility that this is an alternate SG-1 from a... parallel universe.
How did they get here?
I got nothing.
Yet.
Sumatra Mandheling.
One cream.
Two sugars.
Lucky guess.
Usually I have instant myself.
So, I'm guessing this almost feels like home, doesn't it?
Almost like home.
But... if it was home,
I'd be sitting where your sitting and you'd be sitting here, telling me:
"I'd love to help you but I have no idea what's going on."
I'm thinking one of two possible scenarios.
A:
Carter's right and you're from an alternate universe in which case we'll do everything we can to get you back home.
Or B:
You're not who you say you are.
In which case we need to find out what you're really after.
Actually there's a third scenario.
C:
You're not who you say you are, and it's up to us to find out what you're after.
I understand your reluctance to trust us, but rest assured we're just as eager to get to the bottom of this as you are.
No offence but, I'm not entirely sold on the alternate world theory.
There was nothing on our mission to PX7 that would even hint at it.
No quantum mirror, no weird alien artifacts.
It was a routine op.
But... you're telling me that, somehow, the Gate sent us through to a parallel universe.
Even though we know it's not supposed to work like that.
And yet here you are.
Assuming of course this is the SGC.
SG-1... six years ago.
Wake up in what they think is the SGC, turns out they're not really on Earth and it's all part of an elaborate Goa'uld plot.
Pegasus Galaxy, last year.
A team from the Atlantis base... gates through to what they think is the SGC, turns out they're not really on Earth.
It's another planet...
- and they're being manipulated by aliens.
- Let me put your mind at ease, we are neither the Goa'uld nor manipulative aliens.
You'll forgive me Sir if I don't take your word for it.
We won our freedom in the battle for Dakara.
And on that day not only did we defeat Ba'al and the replicators, you ensured that Anubis would never again threaten this Galaxy.
And then all Jaffa were united under our new leader
Bra'tac.
Bra'tac?
Really?
That, that that hasn't happened here yet.
And with the new threat to this galaxy I returned to SG-1.
Right, along with colonel Mitchell myself, and eventually colonel Carter.
- Who rejoined following her...
- Following her honeymoon.
What?
No.
I was gonna say following her stay on the Prometheus.
Honeymoon?
Indeed.
We weren't able to stop the Ori from establishing the second beachhead.
By the time we realized it was too late they had already sent their ships through.
If it happened in our reality...
There's a good chance it could happen in ours as well.
They destroyed Chulak,
Dakara, most of the Jaffa strongholds.
It's only a matter of time before they attack Earth.
- You have to find a way to get us back.
- I'm working on it.
- I've been going over the Gate diagnostics.
- And?
There was an unidentifiable energy spike just prior to your arrival.
It's almost certainly related to the sound they heard, but I'm still analyzing the data.
We were on PX7 for over 24 hours gathering intel.
And yet when your team went back to the planet no one recognized you.
Now, that suggests that our point of departure was definitely in our universe.
So what ever happened...
Had to have happened between the time you stepped through the Gate on your end, and the time you stepped through the Gate on this end.
Except the Gate system isn't designed to transport matter between universes.
It isn't designed to take you back in time either but it has before.
Did you notice any...
No unusual weather patterns or solar flare activity at the time.
Then is it conceivable something else could have affected the wormhole.
What could possibly exert that kind of influence on a subspace matter stream?
- A black hole!
- A black hole!
As we discussed the situation we realized we could pinpoint the source of the phenomenon to a precise window.
Specifically the in term journey between the two Gates.
Did she just say we?
Pardon me?
She said we.
You said we?
Ah, me and myself, I suppose.
The other Samantha Carter.
Right finally someone who can keep up with you?
Yep.
OK, this is PX7-455, their point of departure and this, is Earth their point of arrival.
The wormhole that brought them here, cross this section of space bisecting this singularity.
The black hole that was created when we destroyed the Ori beachhead.
Exactly.
Now, I'm theorizing that when they bisected the singularity subspace was ruptured, creating a rift in the space-time continuum that brought that SG-1 in to this universe.
But we've had teams gate in from locations on the other side of that black hole in our universe.
Why weren't they affected?
One more stupid question.
Oh, sorry.
Yours was fine, mine is stupid.
Why didn't we end up on alternate PX7 when we gated through to check out bizarre SG-1's story?
I can't answer that...
As far as I know the deviation was one way and specific to that particular wormhole.
However just to be on the safe side I would suggest that we reroute all Gate travel around the singularity for the time being.
Unscheduled offworld activation.
- What do you have for me now Walter?
- Sir, It's SG-1's IDC.
Again.
Do you want me to send a confirmation?
If another team comes through they'll just be stranded like the first one.
- Receiving radio transmission.
- Let's hear it.
Stargate Command, this is Mitchell.
What's the hold up?
We've got a situation here.
Sir if we don't open the iris...
Stargate Command do you read?
Defense teams!
Open the iris.
What the hell's going on?
So much for this phenomenon being restricted to one wormhole.
I may have underestimated its influence.
It's possible the first spatial tear may have caused a ripple effect across several realities, transforming an area of their subspace into a kind of... funnel, that's redirecting their Gate travel to this universe.
Any wormhole passing close enough to the black hole is being drawn into the singularity and rerouted here.
- So you're telling me we're the hub.
- The convergence point, yes Sir.
It might account for why Gate travel in this universe wasn't affected.
Might account.
Colonel Mitchell.
Sir.
Inform all off world teams to proceed to the Alpha site.
Until further notice Gate travel to and from Stargate Command, will be suspended, indefinitely.
- What if there are more teams coming in hot, Sir?
- I'm willing to make the occasional exception but I'm not about to turn this base into the grand central station of the Multiverse.
Dismissed.
Why is it that every team that has come through the Gate so far, has been exclusively an alternate SG-1?
I mean, how come no alternate SG-2s or SG-3s?
Well, SG-1 is the frontline team, the one most likely to get into trouble offworld.
And as a result the team we'd most likely have to let through.
Right.
So far we've had to turn back over 50 teams and not all of them have been SG-1.
Here's the really interesting part.
Each team, from each reality has dialed in from a different point of origin.
No repeats.
All originating from a corridor of space starting from Earth and passing within a few degrees of the singularity.
What about that superfluous energy signature?
- Has that happened again?
- No.
Not since the first alternate team dialed in.
Any idea what it was?
I'm not sure.
- But it reminds me of the incident on...
- K'Tau.
In that case we introduced an unstable super heavy element into their sun's nuclear reaction...
When the wormhole that brought us there passed directly through it.
But in this case the wormhole's passing through a black hole.
So who knows what the effect would be.
I thought we could use the help.
Yeah, I suppose two heads are better than one.
Unscheduled offworld activation.
Let's get to work.
General.
I was just about to come find you.
I have contacted Bra'tac on Dakara.
He has dispatched a mothership to the location provided to us by the other colonel Carter.
If the Ori attempt to establish a second beachhead then the Jaffa should give us a heads up.
Presuming of course if events play out the same way in both universes...
To this point, the particulars of the varying universes have remained remarkably similar.
That's what I wanted to talk to you about.
Another SG-1 came through twenty minutes ago.
Which puts the count at twelve teams.
Not including yourselves.
- Well, at least we're in good company.
- Well, this last team is a little different in terms of personnel.
How so?
Well, there's someone I thought you might like to talk to.
Daniel?
Teal'c?
Where's General O'Neill?
I'm sure you all have a lot to catch up on.
Janet...
Dr. Frasier...
What's going on here?
Janet, this, this may look like home to you, but it's not.
This is not the Stargate Command you left, we're not the Daniel and Teal'c you know.
You and your team gated to a parallel reality, this is an alternate SGC, on an alternate Earth, in an alternate universe.
In our reality Dr. Janet Frasier died... 2 years ago.
Sixteen different SG-1s.
Sixteen different points of origin, but only one point of convergence, this universe.
Now... given the fact that previous trips through the black hole didn't produce a rupture in the subspace structure...
They may not have of produced the rupture but it is entirely possible, that their repeated trips contributed to the deterioration of the space time fabric that weakened, eventually seeded to the singularity.
Creating the bridge between the various realities.
And I'm thinking that the proximity of these realities in relation to each other, may account for the absence of the... entropic cascade failure.
But... it still doesn't help us with the main problem.
How do we reverse the process?
I don't have the answer to this.
Because if I did...
We all wouldn't be here.
- Coffee?
- No.
Thank you.
You know, I can't help but think this whole thing would be a lot easier if Hammond hadn't ordered us to destroy the quantum mirror.
We could just use that to send all these teams back to their proper realities.
How?
I mean, there are a near infinite number of parallel universes.
The chances of us finding the right home universe for even one of these teams is next to impossible.
Excuse me, Colonel Carter.
My, colonel Carter...
Here Sir...
I've brought another volunteer who's offered to help.
Martouf.
Hello Samantha.
I remember the mission to P3X.
I was tending to a wounded airman, we came under fire.
You were there, you helped me stabilize him and got us out of there.
No, I didn't.
You were hit by an errant staff blast and, and killed instantly.
You were honored with a heroes funeral.
Lucky me.
Hopefully you will be able to return to your world soon.
- Hopefully?
- Yeah, for the moment it looks like your...
- your trip here, was only one way.
- No... no, you have to find a way to get us back as soon as possible.
- Yes, Sam and Dr Lee are working on something.
- But you don't understand.
We have been targeted by the Ori.
Earth is being ravaged by a plague, hundreds of thousands have been infected.
If we don't find a cure the entire planet will be wiped out.
So... how are things in your universe?
You mean between us?
I'm a little curious.
Things developed, but with you being on the other side of the galaxy.
Well, long distance relationships can be difficult.
I eventually joined the Stargate program to be closer to you.
We worked together.
Even lived together for quite some time, but in the end, things didn't work out.
You're with someone else now.
Who?
I think I have something.
This is the postmortem analysis of the P3W-451 incident.
A planet whose orbit strayed too close to a black hole.
One of our teams were attempting to gate back at the same time and as a result the SGC couldn't shut down the Gate from this end.
- I don't see what this...
- We were unable to sever the connection because Stargate Command was still connected to the singularity's gravitational field through the open Stargate.
- But we're not trying to...
- In that case we used a shape charge to deliver an energy surge to the matter stream... forcing the matter stream to jump to a different Gate, thereby severing the connection.
That could explain the sound they heard... and the superfluous energy signature that accompanied the matter stream from the first wormhole.
- It is some sort of la...
- Maybe a supernova.
or a gamma ray burst discharging at the exact millisecond that wormhole passed through that singularity.
It's a one in a billion fluke that ruptured subspace and created the point of confluence that drew the affected realities into this one.
And then to seal the bridge between the multiverse we have to target that point of confluence, basically recreate the circumstances that caused the breach in the first place.
But how is that possible...
You... you said it yourself, it was a one in a billion freak incident.
Well the odds would increase significantly if we took the wormhole out of the equation.
Then what happens to us?
We'd be stranded here.
I considered not telling you about this.
I understand why you hesitated but you made the right decision... by sealing the rupture we'll ensure no other teams get stranded here.
That's provided that this actually works.
I mean, we still have one major obstacle to overcome.
How do we deliver an explosive device into the singularity?
We get help from a friend.
Thor sends his apologies for not attending personally, but he and Heimdall are in the neighboring galaxy dealing with a most sensitive matter.
In his stead, I have conveyed the time dilation device as requested.
We appreciate your quick response Vaseer.
So, what do you think will this work?
I prefer not to prognosticate.
Well, don't prognosticate just tell us what your gut feeling is.
Speculating on the matter would serve no practical purpose.
Joseph and Mary...
What are the odds?
Less than 12% and that is provided you are able to in act the plan before the black hole's gravity decimates your ship.
Damn that's cold.
Colonel Mitchell.
Colonel Carter.
I'm giving it the green light...
shut this thing down.
You know I read all the mission reports on the Asgard...
They're not that I expected.
What were you expecting?
Well... pants for one.
The distance between the launch point and the target is crucial and you must be precise in your calculations.
I know.
The slightest oversight in either the timing of the explosion or the proximity of your ship to the singularity could result in a failed mission at best.
Certain death at worst.
I'm sorry, I'm having a hard time concentrating.
I understand, you are tired.
Allow me to complete the calibration for you.
Knock yourself out.
Time and again we've managed to save Earth and its allies from the most dire threats... situations in which we faced unassailable odds... almost certain defeat but we always managed to find a way to prevail in the end.
I'm sorry...
I wish there was a way I could send you home or...
- at the very least delay the mission so...
- You have no choice but to do what's best for your world.
I assume yours is not the only SG team in your reality that's actively searching for a cure to the plague...
No.
And I have a feeling that your Samantha Carter is back home working on the problem.
She stopped being my Samantha a long time ago.
I've missed you.
I have completed the calibrations.
Thank you Vaseer.
General.
Sorry to disturb you, I was wondering if I could have a word.
Of course Doctor.
Come in.
Thank you.
Sir, I would like to make a request on behalf of all of the teams stranded in this reality.
Please, postpone this mission until we can find a way to get home.
I can't do that.
We need our teams out there gathering intel on the Ori threat... instead of sitting on their hands here, waiting for normal Gate operations to resume... and that won't be possible until this problem is dealt with.
Well, I can empathize Sir, believe me.
I think you need to take a look at the bigger picture.
This goes beyond this world...
beyond this galaxy, this universe.
Hundreds of billions of lives are at stake.
Their survival could hinge on not just our return but the return of every SG-1 stranded on this base.
Sir, back in my universe, Earth is facing a global pandemic, one that your planet has already faced and beaten.
You have the cure that could save my world, all I have to do is get it to them.
I can also empathize but at the risk of sounding callous... my priorities are with this world.
How can you prioritize the lives of one group over those of another?
What makes my Earth any less important than your own?
We have the top minds from 18 different universes working on a way to get you home.
Now hopefully they can come up with a solution before this mission is completed but if they can't... then I'm sorry Doctor.
We finished loading the warhead and the time dilation generator.
Once the system checks are complete, we're good to go...
Where's the crew?
You're looking at it.
Given the dangers we may face it was decided that we proceed alone.
So if this plan goes fubar, we're the only ones that goes down with the ship.
Well, there's plenty more where we came from, right?
The perilous nature of this mission should not be taken lightly, there is a chance the Prometheus may not survive this voyage but courage and a steadfast resolve will prove the most valuable assets in this undertaking.
Well, good luck to you all.
I miss Thor.
Of course by the time he actually got around to drinking that orange juice, it would have been sitting in the back of the fridge for what, a month?
Yeah!
Yeah yeah!
Oh...yep, he was so damn thirsty he knocked it right back, it was a second or two before he actually breathed in, at which point...
Spit take of all spit takes!
there was orange juice on the table, the chairs...
On Aunt Emma!
Aunt Emma!
Oh!
Oh!
Big old fat Emma sitting across the table...
Little bits of bacon on her face orange juice dripping off her nose...
Reminiscing over old times?
Yeah... hell, I could talk to this guy all day.
No doubt.
You finished your shift?
Yeah, I'm exhausted I'm going to bed.
Speaking of which, I think it's past my bedtime.
And you need your beauty sleep.
Woah... who's talking?
So how'd it go?
I found a way round all the security protocols, everything's set.
Perfect.
By the time they figure out what happened... it'll be too late.
Show time.
We're approaching the singularity.
Calculating minimal prime distance to warhead launch.
Come on Carter.
.
I've got it, relaying the information.
Received.
Engaging sublight engines, proceeding to co-ordinates.
We've reached the target location.
- Yeah, I heard.
- Yeah, I think they're just... circling, like we are parking.
I should warn you...
I've been practicing those Sodan moves.
You were warned.
Wouldn't it have been easier just to zat him?
Easier yes... but far less gratifying.
Did he just insult me?
What's going on?
There's been a change of flight plans.
You want to tell us what's going on?
We're making an unscheduled detour.
Yeah, just how far out of our way is this little detour gonna take us?
About 3 weeks.
You're planning on taking this ship to Atlantis...
I mean, given the parallels between our two realities, I can't think of anywhere else we'll be going.
As soon as we complete our mission we'll drop you at the nearest habitable planet.
'till then have fun.
Three weeks, well that gives us time to think of something.
Idea's anyone?
Given the unique circumstance we find ourselves in.
It is possible to anticipate their actions and reactions.
All we must do... is think like them.
Well, shouldn't be that hard.
The other colonel Mitchell wishes to speak with you.
You're just going to ignore him for the next three weeks?
You guys seem reasonable... and you haven't hurt us... much.
You don't have a beard so you're not from the evil twin universe right?
Good.
Right, so if I know me like I do...
I'd have a pretty damn good reason to be doing what you guys are doing.
Bottom line is, I'd understand better than anyone, so level with me.
What's going on?
Let me ask you something.
How far would you go to save the lives of every man and woman on Earth?
Don't bother.
I already know the answer.
- If you were in my situation you would be doing the exact same thing.
- What?
Going after the ZPM?
Come on...
- Why else would you be going to Atlantis?
- Our ZPM is depleted.
We need yours to power the ancient weapon in Antarctica.
- Oh right, screw our Earth to save your own.
- All that ZPM is doing right now.
Is allowing one way travel from the Pegasus galaxy to Earth.
The billions of lives that we save is worth more than the inconvenience
- of slopping back and forth on the Daedalus.
- We need that ZPM to cloak Atlantis
If the Wraith come back and discover the City wasn't destroyed, they'll launch another attack.
If Atlantis falls, this galaxy is the next target.
If the Wraith return.
If they attack.
If the City is destroyed.
The threat we face is more immediate.
That still doesn't give you the right to do this.
Well, say it works.
Say that you can beam the ZPM of Atlantis, how do you plan to get it back to your own universe?
You have a way back.
You've planned this all along.
Well, we were right, they're going after the ZPM.
You sure you can open the door?
Hey, I helped build this thing... opening the doors the easy part.
It's taking the ship back that'll be tricky.
The armory is this way.
No Teal'c go to the armory on the next level it's less likely you'll be spotted.
Daniel and I will head to the engine room and pull the control crystal, once they come to investigate the problem, we'll get the drop on them there.
Very well.
Hey, you had to give it a shot.
I know I would.
So, now that we know how you get out, we'll just have to make sure it doesn't happen again.
No hitting.
So, while we were up here.
We were down on the next level breaking into the other armory.
- How did you know I wasn't your Mitchell.
- Easy.
If we were in your position we would have done the same thing.
Let me get this straight.
We figured that you guys would try to escape and we set this trap for you, not realizing that you'd figure out that we'd figure you out and you'd set your own?
Indeed.
Now, can you take us to our colonel Mitchell?
Sam disabled the power relay running through these walls so...
I wouldn't bother.
Ideas anyone?
Walter?
Sir, it's a subspace communication from the Prometheus.
- Let's hear it.
- Yes Sir.
Sir, this is colonel Carter.
Good to hear from you Colonel, I take it the mission was a success.
No Sir.
In fact we're scraping the mission and heading back home.
Colonel?
Sir, I think I figured out a way to send these teams back to their proper realities.
And how do we do that?
By doing exactly the same thing the first team did in order to get here.
You're telling me they planned this from the get-go?
Yes Sir, it accounts for the boom you heard and the extra energy signature the Gate diagnostic picked up in the first matter stream.
They opened the wormhole through the black hole and then blasted a bridge into this universe.
Ain't that how Carter described it, I don't know, I just remember
Wormhole, black hole, blast.
Colonel Carter.
Sir, we've established a wormhole to PX7-455.
Now, when sergeant Siler is finished, we'll fire the directed energy weapon through the Gate.
If I'm right, it should reverse the space time rupture effectively inverting the convergence effect.
Each team gated in from a different point of origin, once the convergence effect has been reversed we'll dial those different points of origin and create wormholes that will follow the inter-universal pathways
- already created by their initial trips here...
- I got it, I got it, they're going back.
Ready when you are, Sir.
Clear the Gateroom.
I will need the weapon back once your work here is completed.
it is, after all, only on loan to you temporarily.
I know.
You'll get it back when we're done.
Lower the blast doors.
Fire the weapon.
We have a stable wormhole, 3.4 seconds, it worked.
Open the blast doors.
Bring them in.
Hey Mitchell... when the time comes, cut the green one.
What the hell did that mean?
I don't know.
But I've the feeling that someday you're going to find out.
Have all the other teams left, Sir?
You're the last ones to go.
It was nice working with you again Sam.
Your presence has been sorely missed on our team.
Just out of curiosity, where did I go?
Maternity leave.
We have something for you.
The cure to the Prior's plague.
Thank you General.
It's good to see you again.
You too.
May it not be the last time.
Well, we'd love to stay... but we have a planet to save.
Bye.
Unscheduled offworld activation!
What the hell was that?
I don't know, Sir.
We're receiving SG-1's IDC.
They're back early.
Open the iris.
There was nothing on your end?
Nothing out of the ordinary to account for what we heard?
No Sir, it was perfectly routine, we just dialed the Gate and stepped through.
Gate diagnostics showed no irregularities.
Still I'd like you to double check the data once we're done here.
Yes, Sir.
Tell me about the planet...
Well we can confirm that the locals were visited by a Prior two weeks ago.
He performed the... standard miracles, healed the sick, cured the blind and... passed out the usual literature.
The natives are easy pickings they feel as though they were abandoned by their God Amaterasu and...
Ba'al.
- Excuse me?
- You said Amaterasu...
According to the background file, P4R was once under Ba'al's control...
P4R?
Sir... we went to PX7-455, I believe you have the wrong report.
Anyway.
The Tok'ra have been monitoring the inroads that the Ori have been making in the region for quite some time.
According to Selmak they are taking advantage of the relationships between...
Did you just say Selmak?
Indeed.
Teal'c...
Selmak is dead.
Sir...
Selmak and Jacob are very much alive.
Offworld activation!
- Chief...
- It's SG-1's IDC, Sir.
This is when they were originally scheduled to come back.
Defense teams stand by.
Open the iris.
Season 9
- Episode 13 Ripple Effect
Well, according to the tests I've run, they're both SG-1.
- Identical in every way.
- How's that possible?
Well, we know Ba'al's able to produce adult clones of himself.
Presumably he could do the same with our people given samples of their DNA.
That doesn't explain how they knew SG-1's IDC.
And if their Intel was good enough to get their hands on something that sensitive,
- then how come they didn't know about Selmak?
- Yeah.
It's like they got the hard stuff right and the easy stuff wrong.
Ba'al would have known better.
You know the first team was making some pretty wild claims about people in past events.
And since the second team came back from the right planet at the scheduled time,
- it's safe to assume that they're the real SG-1.
- Okay.
Then who's the other team and where'd they come from?
Exactly.
We checked their story out, we went to PX7-445, the planet they claimed to have gated in from the locals there swore they'd never laid eyes on us.
So... this other team... is lying.
Not necessarily Sir.
It's possible they did gate in from PX7...
just not the PX7 that we know.
The multiverse theory of quantum physics deposits the existence of parallel universes.
An infinite number of ever growing alternate realities that exist concurrently with our own.
The theory holds that anything that can happen, will happen.
If not in this reality, then in another.
So you're saying that somewhere in an alternate universe,
I got to second base with Amy Pandenberg?
Theoretically, yes.
Boggles the mind, doesn't it?
We're part of a metaverse in which individual subuniverses are continually being generated.
Our own experience with the quantum mirror proved as much.
Realities can exist where...
we never defeated the Goa'uld or,
- the Stargate program went public.
- And Selmak is still alive.
Exactly.
Now, while it may feel immediate, the journey between Gates is not instantaneous.
It takes on average 0.3 seconds travel time.
However, according to Gate diagnostics, the travel time for the other SG-1 team clocked in at 3.4 seconds, suggesting a significantly longer trip.
OK, say for example we accept...
the possibility that this is an alternate SG-1 from a... parallel universe.
How did they get here?
I got nothing.
Yet.
Sumatra Mandheling.
One cream.
Two sugars.
Lucky guess.
Usually I have instant myself.
So, I'm guessing this almost feels like home, doesn't it?
Almost like home.
But... if it was home,
I'd be sitting where your sitting and you'd be sitting here, telling me:
"I'd love to help you but I have no idea what's going on."
I'm thinking one of two possible scenarios.
(A) Carter's right and you're from an alternate universe in which case we'll do everything we can to get you back home.
Or (B) You're not who you say you are.
In which case we need to find out what you're really after.
Actually there's a third scenario.
(C)
You're not who you say you are, and it's up to us to find out what you're after.
I understand your reluctance to trust us, but rest assured we're just as eager to get to the bottom of this as you are.
No offence but, I'm not entirely sold on the alternate world theory.
There was nothing on our mission to PX7 that would even hint at it.
No quantum mirror, no weird alien artifacts.
It was a routine op.
But... you're telling me that, somehow, the Gate sent us through to a parallel universe.
Even though we know it's not supposed to work like that.
And yet here you are.
Assuming of course this is the SGC.
SG-1... six years ago.
Wake up in what they think is the SGC, turns out they're not really on Earth and it's all part of an elaborate Goa'uld plot.
Pegasus Galaxy, last year.
A team from the Atlantis base... gates through to what they think is the SGC, turns out they're not really on Earth.
It's another planet...
- and they're being manipulated by aliens.
- Let me put your mind at ease, we are neither the Goa'uld nor manipulative aliens.
You'll forgive me Sir if I don't take your word for it.
We won our freedom in the battle for Dakara.
And on that day not only did we defeat Ba'al and the replicators, you ensured that Anubis would never again threaten this Galaxy.
And then all Jaffa were united under our new leader
Bra'tac.
Bra'tac?
Really?
That, that that hasn't happened here yet.
And with the new threat to this galaxy I returned to SG-1.
Right, along with colonel Mitchell myself, and eventually colonel Carter.
- Who rejoined following her...
- Following her honeymoon.
What?
No.
I was gonna say following her stay on the Prometheus.
Honeymoon?
Indeed.
We weren't able to stop the Ori from establishing the second beachhead.
By the time we realized it was too late they had already sent their ships through.
If it happened in our reality...
There's a good chance it could happen in ours as well.
They destroyed Chulak,
Dakara, most of the Jaffa strongholds.
It's only a matter of time before they attack Earth.
- You have to find a way to get us back.
- I'm working on it.
- I've been going over the Gate diagnostics.
- And?
There was an unidentifiable energy spike just prior to your arrival.
It's almost certainly related to the sound they heard, but I'm still analyzing the data.
We were on PX7 for over 24 hours gathering intel.
And yet when your team went back to the planet no one recognized you.
Now, that suggests that our point of departure was definitely in our universe.
So what ever happened...
Had to have happened between the time you stepped through the Gate on your end, and the time you stepped through the Gate on this end.
Except the Gate system isn't designed to transport matter between universes.
It isn't designed to take you back in time either but it has before.
Did you notice any...
No unusual weather patterns or solar flare activity at the time.
Then is it conceivable something else could have affected the wormhole.
What could possibly exert that kind of influence on a subspace matter stream?
- A black hole!
- A black hole!
As we discussed the situation we realized we could pinpoint the source of the phenomenon to a precise window.
Specifically the in term journey between the two Gates.
Did she just say we?
Pardon me?
She said we.
You said we?
Ah, me and myself, I suppose.
The other Samantha Carter.
Right finally someone who can keep up with you?
Yep.
OK, this is PX7-455, their point of departure and this, is Earth their point of arrival.
The wormhole that brought them here, cross this section of space bisecting this singularity.
The black hole that was created when we destroyed the Ori beachhead.
Exactly.
Now, I'm theorizing that when they bisected the singularity subspace was ruptured, creating a rift in the space-time continuum that brought that SG-1 in to this universe.
But we've had teams gate in from locations on the other side of that black hole in our universe.
Why weren't they affected?
One more stupid question.
Oh, sorry.
Yours was fine, mine is stupid.
Why didn't we end up on alternate PX7 when we gated through to check out bizarre SG-1's story?
I can't answer that...
As far as I know the deviation was one way and specific to that particular wormhole.
However just to be on the safe side I would suggest that we reroute all Gate travel around the singularity for the time being.
Unscheduled offworld activation.
- What do you have for me now Walter?
- Sir, It's SG-1's IDC.
Again.
Do you want me to send a confirmation?
If another team comes through they'll just be stranded like the first one.
- Receiving radio transmission.
- Let's hear it.
Stargate Command, this is Mitchell.
What's the hold up?
We've got a situation here.
Sir if we don't open the iris...
Stargate Command do you read?
Defense teams!
Open the iris.
What the hell's going on?
So much for this phenomenon being restricted to one wormhole.
I may have underestimated its influence.
It's possible the first spatial tear may have caused a ripple effect across several realities, transforming an area of their subspace into a kind of... funnel, that's redirecting their Gate travel to this universe.
Any wormhole passing close enough to the black hole is being drawn into the singularity and rerouted here.
- So you're telling me we're the hub.
- The convergence point, yes Sir.
It might account for why Gate travel in this universe wasn't affected.
Might account.
Colonel Mitchell.
Sir.
Inform all off world teams to proceed to the Alpha site.
Until further notice Gate travel to and from Stargate Command, will be suspended, indefinitely.
- What if there are more teams coming in hot, Sir?
- I'm willing to make the occasional exception but I'm not about to turn this base into the grand central station of the Multiverse.
Dismissed.
Why is it that every team that has come through the Gate so far, has been exclusively an alternate SG-1?
I mean, how come no alternate SG-2s or SG-3s?
Well, SG-1 is the frontline team, the one most likely to get into trouble offworld.
And as a result the team we'd most likely have to let through.
Right.
So far we've had to turn back over 50 teams and not all of them have been SG-1.
Here's the really interesting part.
Each team, from each reality has dialed in from a different point of origin.
No repeats.
All originating from a corridor of space starting from Earth and passing within a few degrees of the singularity.
What about that superfluous energy signature?
- Has that happened again?
- No.
Not since the first alternate team dialed in.
Any idea what it was?
I'm not sure.
- But it reminds me of the incident on...
- K'Tau.
In that case we introduced an unstable super heavy element into their sun's nuclear reaction...
When the wormhole that brought us there passed directly through it.
But in this case the wormhole's passing through a black hole.
So who knows what the effect would be.
I thought we could use the help.
Yeah, I suppose two heads are better than one.
Unscheduled offworld activation.
Let's get to work.
General.
I was just about to come find you.
I have contacted Bra'tac on Dakara.
He has dispatched a mothership to the location provided to us by the other colonel Carter.
If the Ori attempt to establish a second beachhead then the Jaffa should give us a heads up.
Presuming of course if events play out the same way in both universes...
To this point, the particulars of the varying universes have remained remarkably similar.
That's what I wanted to talk to you about.
Another SG-1 came through twenty minutes ago.
Which puts the count at twelve teams.
Not including yourselves.
- Well, at least we're in good company.
- Well, this last team is a little different in terms of personnel.
How so?
Well, there's someone I thought you might like to talk to.
Daniel?
Teal'c?
Where's General O'Neill?
I'm sure you all have a lot to catch up on.
Janet...
Dr. Frasier...
What's going on here?
Janet, this, this may look like home to you, but it's not.
This is not the Stargate Command you left, we're not the Daniel and Teal'c you know.
You and your team gated to a parallel reality, this is an alternate SGC, on an alternate Earth, in an alternate universe.
In our reality Dr. Janet Frasier died... 2 years ago.
Sixteen different SG-1s.
Sixteen different points of origin, but only one point of convergence, this universe.
Now... given the fact that previous trips through the black hole didn't produce a rupture in the subspace structure...
They may not have of produced the rupture but it is entirely possible, that their repeated trips contributed to the deterioration of the space time fabric that weakened, eventually seeded to the singularity.
Creating the bridge between the various realities.
And I'm thinking that the proximity of these realities in relation to each other, may account for the absence of the... entropic cascade failure.
But... it still doesn't help us with the main problem.
How do we reverse the process?
I don't have the answer to this.
Because if I did...
We all wouldn't be here.
- Coffee?
- No.
Thank you.
You know, I can't help but think this whole thing would be a lot easier if Hammond hadn't ordered us to destroy the quantum mirror.
We could just use that to send all these teams back to their proper realities.
How?
I mean, there are a near infinite number of parallel universes.
The chances of us finding the right home universe for even one of these teams is next to impossible.
Excuse me, Colonel Carter.
My, colonel Carter...
Here Sir...
I've brought another volunteer who's offered to help.
Martouf.
Hello Samantha.
I remember the mission to P3X.
I was tending to a wounded airman, we came under fire.
You were there, you helped me stabilize him and got us out of there.
No, I didn't.
You were hit by an errant staff blast and, and killed instantly.
You were honored with a heroes funeral.
Lucky me.
Hopefully you will be able to return to your world soon.
- Hopefully?
- Yeah, for the moment it looks like your...
- your trip here, was only one way.
- No... no, you have to find a way to get us back as soon as possible.
- Yes, Sam and Dr Lee are working on something.
- But you don't understand.
We have been targeted by the Ori.
Earth is being ravaged by a plague, hundreds of thousands have been infected.
If we don't find a cure the entire planet will be wiped out.
So... how are things in your universe?
You mean between us?
I'm a little curious.
Things developed, but with you being on the other side of the galaxy.
Well, long distance relationships can be difficult.
I eventually joined the Stargate program to be closer to you.
We worked together.
Even lived together for quite some time, but in the end, things didn't work out.
You're with someone else now.
Who?
I think I have something.
This is the postmortem analysis of the P3W-451 incident.
A planet whose orbit strayed too close to a black hole.
One of our teams were attempting to gate back at the same time and as a result the SGC couldn't shut down the Gate from this end.
- I don't see what this...
- We were unable to sever the connection because Stargate Command was still connected to the singularity's gravitational field through the open Stargate.
- But we're not trying to...
- In that case we used a shape charge to deliver an energy surge to the matter stream... forcing the matter stream to jump to a different Gate, thereby severing the connection.
That could explain the sound they heard... and the superfluous energy signature that accompanied the matter stream from the first wormhole.
- It is some sort of la...
- Maybe a supernova.
or a gamma ray burst discharging at the exact millisecond that wormhole passed through that singularity.
It's a one in a billion fluke that ruptured subspace and created the point of confluence that drew the affected realities into this one.
And then to seal the bridge between the multiverse we have to target that point of confluence, basically recreate the circumstances that caused the breach in the first place.
But how is that possible...
You... you said it yourself, it was a one in a billion freak incident.
Well the odds would increase significantly if we took the wormhole out of the equation.
Then what happens to us?
We'd be stranded here.
I considered not telling you about this.
I understand why you hesitated but you made the right decision... by sealing the rupture we'll ensure no other teams get stranded here.
That's provided that this actually works.
I mean, we still have one major obstacle to overcome.
How do we deliver an explosive device into the singularity?
We get help from a friend.
Thor sends his apologies for not attending personally, but he and Heimdall are in the neighboring galaxy dealing with a most sensitive matter.
In his stead, I have conveyed the time dilation device as requested.
We appreciate your quick response Vaseer.
So, what do you think will this work?
I prefer not to prognosticate.
Well, don't prognosticate just tell us what your gut feeling is.
Speculating on the matter would serve no practical purpose.
Joseph and Mary...
What are the odds?
Less than 12% and that is provided you are able to in act the plan before the black hole's gravity decimates your ship.
Damn that's cold.
Colonel Mitchell.
Colonel Carter.
I'm giving it the green light...
shut this thing down.
You know I read all the mission reports on the Asgard...
They're not that I expected.
What were you expecting?
Well... pants for one.
The distance between the launch point and the target is crucial and you must be precise in your calculations.
I know.
The slightest oversight in either the timing of the explosion or the proximity of your ship to the singularity could result in a failed mission at best.
Certain death at worst.
I'm sorry, I'm having a hard time concentrating.
I understand, you are tired.
Allow me to complete the calibration for you.
Knock yourself out.
Time and again we've managed to save Earth and its allies from the most dire threats... situations in which we faced unassailable odds... almost certain defeat but we always managed to find a way to prevail in the end.
I'm sorry...
I wish there was a way I could send you home or...
- at the very least delay the mission so...
- You have no choice but to do what's best for your world.
I assume yours is not the only SG team in your reality that's actively searching for a cure to the plague...
No.
And I have a feeling that your Samantha Carter is back home working on the problem.
She stopped being my Samantha a long time ago.
I've missed you.
I have completed the calibrations.
Thank you Vaseer.
General.
Sorry to disturb you, I was wondering if I could have a word.
Of course Doctor.
Come in.
Thank you.
Sir, I would like to make a request on behalf of all of the teams stranded in this reality.
Please, postpone this mission until we can find a way to get home.
I can't do that.
We need our teams out there gathering intel on the Ori threat... instead of sitting on their hands here, waiting for normal Gate operations to resume... and that won't be possible until this problem is dealt with.
Well, I can empathize Sir, believe me.
I think you need to take a look at the bigger picture.
This goes beyond this world...
beyond this galaxy, this universe.
Hundreds of billions of lives are at stake.
Their survival could hinge on not just our return but the return of every SG-1 stranded on this base.
Sir, back in my universe, Earth is facing a global pandemic, one that your planet has already faced and beaten.
You have the cure that could save my world, all I have to do is get it to them.
I can also empathize but at the risk of sounding callous... my priorities are with this world.
How can you prioritize the lives of one group over those of another?
What makes my Earth any less important than your own?
We have the top minds from 18 different universes working on a way to get you home.
Now hopefully they can come up with a solution before this mission is completed but if they can't... then I'm sorry Doctor.
We finished loading the warhead and the time dilation generator.
Once the system checks are complete, we're good to go...
Where's the crew?
You're looking at it.
Given the dangers we may face it was decided that we proceed alone.
So if this plan goes fubar, we're the only ones that goes down with the ship.
Well, there's plenty more where we came from, right?
The perilous nature of this mission should not be taken lightly, there is a chance the Prometheus may not survive this voyage but courage and a steadfast resolve will prove the most valuable assets in this undertaking.
Well, good luck to you all.
I miss Thor.
Of course by the time he actually got around to drinking that orange juice, it would have been sitting in the back of the fridge for what, a month?
Yeah!
Yeah yeah!
Oh...yep, he was so damn thirsty he knocked it right back, it was a second or two before he actually breathed in, at which point...
Spit take of all spit takes!
there was orange juice on the table, the chairs...
On Aunt Emma!
Aunt Emma!
Oh!
Oh!
Big old fat Emma sitting across the table...
Little bits of bacon on her face orange juice dripping off her nose...
Reminiscing over old times?
Yeah... hell, I could talk to this guy all day.
No doubt.
You finished your shift?
Yeah, I'm exhausted I'm going to bed.
Speaking of which, I think it's past my bedtime.
And you need your beauty sleep.
Woah... who's talking?
So how'd it go?
I found a way round all the security protocols, everything's set.
Perfect.
By the time they figure out what happened... it'll be too late.
Show time.
We're approaching the singularity.
Calculating minimal prime distance to warhead launch.
Come on Carter.
I've got it, relaying the information.
Received.
Engaging sublight engines, proceeding to co-ordinates.
We've reached the target location.
- Yeah, I heard.
- Yeah, I think they're just... circling, like we are parking.
I should warn you...
I've been practicing those Sodan moves.
You were warned.
Wouldn't it have been easier just to zat him?
Easier yes... but far less gratifying.
Did he just insult me?
What's going on?
There's been a change of flight plans.
You want to tell us what's going on?
We're making an unscheduled detour.
Yeah, just how far out of our way is this little detour gonna take us?
About 3 weeks.
You're planning on taking this ship to Atlantis...
I mean, given the parallels between our two realities, I can't think of anywhere else we'll be going.
As soon as we complete our mission we'll drop you at the nearest habitable planet.
'till then have fun.
Three weeks, well that gives us time to think of something.
Idea's anyone?
Given the unique circumstance we find ourselves in.
It is possible to anticipate their actions and reactions.
All we must do... is think like them.
Well, shouldn't be that hard.
The other colonel Mitchell wishes to speak with you.
You're just going to ignore him for the next three weeks?
You guys seem reasonable... and you haven't hurt us... much.
You don't have a beard so you're not from the evil twin universe right?
Good.
Right, so if I know me like I do...
I'd have a pretty damn good reason to be doing what you guys are doing.
Bottom line is, I'd understand better than anyone, so level with me.
What's going on?
Let me ask you something.
How far would you go to save the lives of every man and woman on Earth?
Don't bother.
I already know the answer.
- If you were in my situation you would be doing the exact same thing.
- What?
Going after the ZPM?
Come on...
- Why else would you be going to Atlantis?
- Our ZPM is depleted.
We need yours to power the ancient weapon in Antarctica.
- Oh right, screw our Earth to save your own.
- All that ZPM is doing right now.
Is allowing one way travel from the Pegasus galaxy to Earth.
The billions of lives that we save is worth more than the inconvenience
- of slopping back and forth on the Daedalus.
- We need that ZPM to cloak Atlantis
If the Wraith come back and discover the City wasn't destroyed, they'll launch another attack.
If Atlantis falls, this galaxy is the next target.
If the Wraith return.
If they attack.
If the City is destroyed.
The threat we face is more immediate.
That still doesn't give you the right to do this.
Well, say it works.
Say that you can beam the ZPM of Atlantis, how do you plan to get it back to your own universe?
You have a way back.
You've planned this all along.
Well, we were right, they're going after the ZPM.
You sure you can open the door?
Hey, I helped build this thing... opening the doors the easy part.
It's taking the ship back that'll be tricky.
The armory is this way.
No Teal'c go to the armory on the next level it's less likely you'll be spotted.
Daniel and I will head to the engine room and pull the control crystal, once they come to investigate the problem, we'll get the drop on them there.
Very well.
Hey, you had to give it a shot.
I know I would.
So, now that we know how you get out, we'll just have to make sure it doesn't happen again.
No hitting.
So, while we were up here.
We were down on the next level breaking into the other armory.
- How did you know I wasn't your Mitchell.
- Easy.
If we were in your position we would have done the same thing.
Let me get this straight.
We figured that you guys would try to escape and we set this trap for you, not realizing that you'd figure out that we'd figure you out and you'd set your own?
Indeed.
Now, can you take us to our colonel Mitchell?
Sam disabled the power relay running through these walls so...
I wouldn't bother.
Ideas anyone?
Walter?
Sir, it's a subspace communication from the Prometheus.
- Let's hear it.
- Yes Sir.
Sir, this is colonel Carter.
Good to hear from you Colonel, I take it the mission was a success.
No Sir.
In fact we're scraping the mission and heading back home.
Colonel?
Sir, I think I figured out a way to send these teams back to their proper realities.
And how do we do that?
By doing exactly the same thing the first team did in order to get here.
You're telling me they planned this from the get-go?
Yes Sir, it accounts for the boom you heard and the extra energy signature the Gate diagnostic picked up in the first matter stream.
They opened the wormhole through the black hole and then blasted a bridge into this universe.
Ain't that how Carter described it, I don't know, I just remember
Wormhole, black hole, blast.
Colonel Carter.
Sir, we've established a wormhole to PX7-455.
Now, when sergeant Siler is finished, we'll fire the directed energy weapon through the Gate.
If I'm right, it should reverse the space time rupture effectively inverting the convergence effect.
Each team gated in from a different point of origin, once the convergence effect has been reversed we'll dial those different points of origin and create wormholes that will follow the inter-universal pathways
- already created by their initial trips here...
- I got it, I got it, they're going back.
Ready when you are, Sir.
Clear the Gateroom.
I will need the weapon back once your work here is completed.
it is, after all, only on loan to you temporarily.
I know.
You'll get it back when we're done.
Lower the blast doors.
Fire the weapon.
We have a stable wormhole, 3.4 seconds, it worked.
Open the blast doors.
Bring them in.
Hey Mitchell... when the time comes, cut the green one.
What the hell did that mean?
I don't know.
But I've the feeling that someday you're going to find out.
Have all the other teams left, Sir?
You're the last ones to go.
It was nice working with you again Sam.
Your presence has been sorely missed on our team.
Just out of curiosity, where did I go?
Maternity leave.
We have something for you.
The cure to the Prior's plague.
Thank you General.
It's good to see you again.
You too.
May it not be the last time.
Well, we'd love to stay... but we have a planet to save.
Bye.
It's beautiful!
We need to fix that... using the same materials...
Right.
I'm off!
- Here's my drill.
- See you later.
No drills at work?
In construction, but unconstructive!
Thanks Dad.
Good one!
Thanks Dad.
Here.
Here's David.
delivery man!
8 at the hotel.
already here, babe?
Oh, my pussycat!
I'd for gotten you!
Look at your new house!
What's up, puss?
It's a pile of rot here!
The ceilings are original!
Easy to rip out!
Right, we'II have the charm removed!
For now, we've lots to do!
It's nice.
I can't say I don't like it... but you're miles from Paris!
How did you find it?
A will that Dad handled.
Empty for 30 years.
Did Dad put up the money?
No, we took out a 20-year mortgage.
Oh, yes!
Your pool table!
It takes up the whole room!
Put it in the cellar!
No way!
It'II warp and go mouldy!
You break.
It's the only thing I brought!
Take it easy!
I'm a doctor, not a mover.
You drive a medics' truck.
You're happy to use the truck!
- And I'm on call.
- Oh yeah?
They beep you to park?
I need a beer.
Hot stuff, Mr italy!
- Mark!
Come quick!
- What's up?
What's the matter?
- Pretty fast!
- OK!
Wait!
I was thinking about this room... it's quiet, it's next to ours... it's light, it's ideal for a...
Home cinema!
brilliant!
We black out the windows...
two speakers here!
Great idea!
- Can we start now?
- Yeah!
Mark!
Emma!
I'm off!
- Bye.
- Have fun, babe!
She has gym class with pablo, her Cuban coach.
- I need a beer.
- On a Sunday?
Yeah, he works hard.
Sundays too.
A great guy.
Charges one hour, but she stays all evening!
Right.
- I'm up at 5 for an early flight.
- Where to?
Pompeii.
A new dig at the baths.
- Boring!
- For guys who like pool.
I didn't tell you...
It's never been excavated before!
Never open to the public!
Can you imagine?
Huh?
Oh, yeah, that's great.
- Come with me.
- I can't.
There's too much to do here!
Don't forget to put up the wardrobe!
OK.
Don't be long.
And the stairs... fix that step!
It's dangerous...
- and tidy up, OK?
- MaIdini, shut up!
You're not sleeping here?
Come to our place.
Why?
It's my home.
I'm not scared.
valerie would be pleased.
She really likes you.
Let's go!
Shame!
A mile wide!
- I slipped!
- You choked!
Give me the chalk!
You blew it!
Isn't Emma anti-spIiff?
So?
So you're deceiving her!
Not really.
Watch my retro shot.
only one other guy can do it.
Was that you?
Right!
A dirty trick!
Can you hear that?
Emma, can you hear it?
What?
The music!
What music?
There... that music!
Damn!
It's scratched!
There's no music, love.
Not any more.
You were dreaming.
carlos, how's tricks?
- Frank.
Mr Trayner.
- You part-time now?
Sorry for the slight delay.
We just moved house.
- You know how it is.
- No I don't.
Be on time, or you're home all day, every day!
Capito!
As you say!
absolutely.
Yeah, it's great!
We're working a Iot.
It's really great!
Wait...
- Later!
- What's that?
Patricians.
Washing.
No.
They're buttfucking.
No question about it.
They're buttfucking.
Yes!
For fuck's sake!
What the hell is that!
Sorry!
- You?
Here?
- It was open.
Emma's away.
I thought I'd drop by.
I brought us a wee drink.
But no glasses in the kitchen.
So it's you.
What?
Taking photos of my ass.
Making dicks with pool balls.
Dicks with what?
You find it funny?
What are you on about?
Is something wrong?
No, I'm fine, me!
But what's your game?
Nothing!
I'm sorry...
I was wrong about you.
I think so!
Right.
Bye!
Otherwise...
Don't tell Emma.
Yes.
I mean no.
Yeah.
Quiet please!
Some of us are trying to sleep!
Thank you!
No reply, and she's in my bed.
Yes, sir.
He doesn't answer?
When the cat's away...
- What's up?
- I can't see!
I need a flashlight.
Shame Emma's gone.
You into chicks now?
Bad boy, Ivan!
My men are waiting!
You can put it down now!
- hello.
- Hi, love.
- It's me!
- Hi honey!
- I'II call back.
- We found a great mosaic!
- It's Justinian!
- Great!
A mosaic!
Super!
- I can't talk now.
- Did you do the wardrobe?
The wardrobe?
- Yeah.
It's good.
- Wait...
Did you go out?
- No.
- You slept at home?
I'II call you back.
Love you.
It's fine, it's all arranged!
Is somebody there?
I'd better not tell Emma.
She'II freak.
No pool tonight, David.
Right, I'm scared of a good thrashing.
Emma's back tomorrow, and I have to do... the wardrobe!
Hang on!
Mark...
Modena.
Pavarotti's town?
exactly!
well, even cops love painting!
So...
Traces of a break-in?
No break-in.
No break-in?
So what was stolen?
- Nothing.
- hold on...
Nothing stolen or broken?
- What did they do?
- Drawings and they put up a wardrobe.
They put up a what?
A wardrobe.
And the ironing.
Even my jeans.
With a crease.
phil!
- Listen, Mr Modena!
- I know...
It's terrible... we can't fight gangs doing wardrobes and ironing...
Right.
...but we're quite effective drug-wise.
I didn't see this.
But next time, I might!
Fine, that's good of you.
It's not even mine.
But I guess it was in my house.
Good night.
You scared me!
- It's you!
- You're not asleep?
- You put up the wardrobe!
- Yeah!
- You're hiding something!
- No, why?
Your mistress does your ironing?
In fact, I started doing it myself.
It's very relaxing.
I wanted to surprise you.
What's the matter?
- You hear that?
- What?
There... can you hear it?
No, I can't hear anything... come on!
"Ra-ra-Rasputin, na-na-na Iove machine..."
If you're not in the mood...
No, I swear...
listen!
It's scratched!
It's stopped.
Give up the joints!
Rubbish!
I don't smoke!
OK, but you hear Russians, singing: "Rasputin, etc..."
They're not Russians.
It's Boney M.
I'm just saying, they're not Russians.
It's Boney M, black guys.
Mark, are you sure you feel OK?
Oh yes, you feel fine!
- You feel just fine!
- I feel very fine!
An ass like a docker!
clumsy!
She deserves better!
Forget the girl, Bert!
- There!
- What!
Ivan's dancing.
Fancy a quickie?
There!
The guy's ass?
-What guy's ass?
-There!
You saw it!
On the wall!
please, stop it!
A guy showed me his ass... and asked if...
I fancied a...
- if I wanted...
- Great!
Was it a nice ass?
Did it turn you on?
What now?
Come to bed!
I'm just going for some water.
What the fuck?
There you are!
What the hell's going on?
Come to watch the fags, eh?
michael Raffin, gay and proud of it!
- Fascist!
- You what?
Where's your chick?
Got any blow?
I'm all out!
He's all rumpIy!
Not hanging too heavy down there?
The material I mean!
What's the fabric?
Enough!
Be nice to our intruder!
I'm John, but my friends call me Shaggy.
- This is my fucking house!
- Have a drink.
That's my wine!
"My house!", "My wine".
ChiII, man!
A little green, maybe.
No effect at all.
'76 is young, though.
Needs to age.
So, Mark.
We need to talk.
You're cool, but this is our home.
- Private.
- Your home?
Maybe we can help each other out.
You can crash here for a while.
Sure.
Thanks!
We've been here for ages.
But we need a change.
- Any ideas?
- Out!
Or it's the cops!
The boys in blue!
The boys in blue!
I prefer firemen!
I'm giles.
I'm a rep with BASF.
They're showing off.
Fags!
I'm not.
You know?
I just come to dance!
So dance away!
And take your pals with you!
OK?
OK?
You don't get it!
What's going on?
Don't worry, it's alright.
And the shovel?
Don't touch me!
- It's for them!
- There's nobody there!
Shut up!
You're drinking at night, now?
It's not me who's drinking, it's them!
They opened our wine.
Stop it!
- Mark, you're insane!
- They opened our wine.
Stop it!
Quiet!
- call the cops!
- Quiet!
You're nuts!
You're nuts!
What?
You're nuts!
I'm nuts?
So what do you call this, then?
A cellar.
Emma!
You can see this shit!
OK.
You're fun guys, and great dancers...
I don't care who you are... but get lost!
OK!
The boys in blue!
OK, great!
I'II call them myself!
It's always the same.
Never there when you need them.
Stop it, Mark!
Stop it!
You saw it down there!
You're scaring me!
You're mad!
Are you blind, or what?
You saw those guys!
- What's your game?
- My game?
Have you seen yourself?
What are you on?
Booze?
Drugs?
You need a shrink!
Of course.
You're calling a shrink now?
We'II see who's nuts!
David?
Is this a bad time?
Yeah, but... wait!
Can you come over to the house please?
Can we turn the music down!
What's the big deal?
That!
The cellar?
You must help me!
I see guys!
- Just guys, in the cellar?
- No!
Everywhere!
In the shower...
kissing, showing their asses!
Kissing, showing their asses?
Kissing, showing their asses?
- You're gay!
- But David!
Either mad, or gay.
But see a psycho-thingy.
You're not a well person.
Take that to help you sleep.
- I don't like pills.
- But you're too stressed.
One every two days.
With a glass of water for one week.
OK.
So, I'II call you.
Bye!
"Just guys!"
Oh, it's you!
Pyjamas in the shower now!
Oh, yeah!
I forgot.
Must be those damned pills.
Scared of being naked?
Not with you!
I mean...
I'm late!
Gotta run!
Mr Trayner!
I know, I know!
You piss me off.
- I've warned you!
- absolutely!
But trust me!
I'II make it up!
Let's do it for Mr Trayner!
Hip-hip-hooray, Iet's build!
Hi!
What's that?
A cue-rack.
ugly, isn't it.
- Dad didn't come by.
- No.
So how are you?
- Fine.
- really?
Fine, fine!
You saw someone?
Yeah!
But I'II tell you later.
Are you sick of me?
No, why?
Don't force yourself!
I can force myself a little!
He'II stretch the material!
- The fabric!
- OK?
Yeah, yeah!
Show your tits!
Shut up Ivan!
- Do you still fancy me?
- I do!
- Fuck!
- Mark!
Maybe we can talk now?
We've got a proposal for you.
- help us escape!
- Get lost!
You're busting my balls!
That sounds like fun!
Get out!
Who're you talking to now?
Get out!
To those bastards!
Stop it!
What luck!
It didn't break!
It wasn't luck.
It should have broken.
- That guy caught it.
- Sure.
You can't see the guy in white?
- Stop it!
- Watch this!
Take a glass... drop it... and it breaks!
and it breaks!
- But he couldn't catch it!
Wait...
- And it breaks!
- Wait...
- Stop it!
Stop it!
Wait... watch again!
- Stop it!
- It's OK!
Now, you catch it.
OK?
Yes!
You'II see!
I'm off!
You're mad!
This time we count down.
Like NASA...
You're mad!
Ready?
3, 2, 1...
Idiot!
You're certifiable!
You didn't catch it?
You just want us out, no?
You're out, OK!
He wants to marry us!
Let's play tag!
Kissie-kissie!
Can't catch us!
- That you, Mark?
- Yeah!
It's taken!
Straight fascist!
She told you to fix the step!
You didn't hurt your thingy?
I can massage it!
Just helping!
Not that way!
Go ahead, make my day!
Hit me!
Show me your thingy!
That's not a good omen!
Anyone home?
Emma sweetie!
It's Dad!
Anyone home?
"Took the drill.
Dad."
"LSD.
Handcuffs..."
"Yum-yum"
Whacko!
Hurts like that, huh!
Don't fuck with me in my house!
What did you do?
I got one of them!
Dad!
Are you all right?
Answer me!
Mr ChevaIIier!
Don't touch me!
What a savage!
And with just a shovel!
So butch!
I'm sorry.
For the insurance.
Thanks.
You're staying with your Dad?
I'm leaving.
But you'II be back tomorrow?
You'II be back?
- Why?
- You attacked Dad!
I know, but...
I Iove you!
Listen: it's over!
You cheat on me...
fantasize about men... steal my panties and hear voices!
What?
She said you fantasize about men...
Shut it!
For the photographer!
Man or woman.
But I don't know...
I don't know who took it!
You're scaring me!
I can't take this!
I'II see someone, tomorrow!
I thought you already had?
Yes, I went there but...
let's go back in!
Emma, I Iove you!
Shit!
Shit!
Shit!
Shit!
A guy crying, and with pecs like that... makes your heart bleed!
There's something in my eye...
She's hot when she's mad!
- Shame she's gone!
- Enough, Ivan!
Straights and their tiffs!
I see men... in my room... in the shower... in the cellar... but, Iet's be clear:
I'm not homosexual, OK?
Of course not!
What's your job?
Construction.
I'm a site manager.
A man's world.
Yes.
So you work exclusively with men...
Er, yeah.
That's interesting.
And these men...
I'm the only one who sees them!
Mr Modena...
You are the victim of hallucinations.
Fine.
Why?
If we restrict our instincts, or restrain our desires...
we may have certain visions.
When you say visions,
- what do you mean?
- Time's up.
That's 45 euros, please.
Wait, wait!
If I get a change of scene... or sell the house, maybe that would help?
Change your head.
That's the problem.
In cash, of course.
- I only have this.
- I owe you 5.
"GAY"
We'II delve into that next time.
Make a new appointment...
Listen to me!
But what can I do?
My wife's left me!
I'm all alone!
You have homosexual fantasies.
Accept it.
Act upon it.
You'II feel much better.
- I'm sorry.
- It's OK.
- Thanks.
- Never mind.
I've made tea.
I always said that boy wasn't for us.
For you, I mean.
Oh, look!
I Iove it...
valerie's such a space case, she's left her gymbag!
I need to talk...
She's got a 15-day course in Cuba, with her coach...
And she's the only girl!
David...
I'm wondering if...
I might be gay.
Pass the crisps.
- Did you hear me?
- Gay.
Yes.
I heard.
I told you that.
- So?
- So, nothing.
You're not my type.
Hey, take it easy.
That explains the guys in the cellar.
So who is it?
A colleague?
- Who's who?
- Whaddya mean who?
Your boyfriend!
For fuck's sake!
It's carlos, the Portuguese guy.
You guys are always...
It's carlos!
I knew it!
No boyfriend!
Right.
carlos met your Dad?
- Are you deaf!
I don't have a boyfriend!
- So you just screw around?
I've never screwed a guy.
You said you were gay?
- Yes.
- And gays do guys.
You can't generaIise.
Not all gays do guys.
But... you do want to screw a guy?
No!
Screw your dumb questions!
I have to go: my grandma's 80th birthday.
Where's my tie?
Oh God!
Look, Mark!
I found this for V's birthday.
It's African or CoIumbian, maybe...
- I don't know where to put it.
- Nor me.
But you're gay!
You should know!
Where would you put it?
In the cellar.
What did he say?
He didn't say anything.
Yes I did, Papa.
I said that maybe I was... homosexual... or bisexual.
Phew!
I was worried...
I thought you didn't like my tiramisu!
Your tiramisu's the best!
So you're a fairy...
You know, pre-war... back in italy...
I had this beautiful neighbour...
- she was round and firm: an apricot!
- alright, Mama!
Enough already!
- We used to do it every washday.
- alright, Mama!
Enough already!
- Your father was kind and a good worker.
- What did gran say?
But useless in bed.
We have to help him.
No leftovers!
What did gran say?
We have to help him.
Any ideas?
This TV is all squashed!
I'II talk to him.
A proper discussion.
We can help him...
and he might help us escape.
What's that?
An article about hammerhead sharks.
Hammertit sharks!
Don't push me, Ivan, please!
I've grilled his jeans!
Have you seen the date?
It's 2006!
We've been here for 27 years!
I'm 60!
No.
My ex is mayor of Paris!
And when I was in italy... one night he wasn't home!
But Mark is the Latin type.
And?
He's hot-bIooded.
He needs to play around!
I swore I wouldn't tell...
He even hit on me!
What?
Mark?
I don't want to cause trouble...
Is that him?
Don't answer!
Don't be a sucker!
You understand?
"Accept it.
Act upon it."
Excuse me...
I will have... a Scotch!
On the rocks?
Right, no ice.
Thanks.
Has everyone left?
At 12?
It isn't EuroDisney.
Uh, Yes.
Can I get a light, please?
...and for a name?
samuel or John, finally Mark.
That's funny: my name's Mark!
You done, Mr Suit 'n' Tie?
No, it's Modena.
Mark... never mind.
Straight bait.
Up my alley!
Time out!
Hi, I'm Mark.
Wanna go downstairs?
Yes, sure... why?
What's downstairs?
Come, and I'II show you.
Easy now...
The direct type, huh?
I'm more oId-fashioned...
maybe we could talk?
You just give head?
I didn't catch that.
You only give bIow-jobs?
I didn't say that!
No way!
Maybe we can chat... first!
What do you do?
I'm active.
Yes, but in what?
In almost anyone.
It depends.
Right!
So what sign are you?
I don't believe in all that astral shit, but hey!
I Iike you.
We're going to get along.
Terrific!
You OK?
Do you want something to drink?
Or a bite to eat?
I just want to fuck.
Your place?
My place is not a good option!
Outside then?
I didn't like it much outside, the Iast time.
Stones, and bits of stuff, and thorns...
Stop it!
Sorry, but I can't drive.
That's all.
Shame: no site keys.
You work on a site?
Site manager!
A great job!
A challenge, I Iove it!
Have you got any work clothes?
The first time I feIched a Turkish builder...
Great!
Great!
Park there, quick!
talk Turkish to me!
- Turkish?
- Yeah!
Go on, go on!
Kebab!
More!
GaIatasaray...
Fuck, you're a hunk!
OK.
OK.
- Do me a favour?
- No, yes, it depends.
Do me a favour?
No, yes, it depends.
Put this on.
And get undressed.
Aren't you worried someone will see us?
Sure... the squirrels.
Here, lover...
Dear God!
It's unreal!
And it's all yours!
What?
Hi.
It's our pal!
Freaky, huh!
- It's not mine!
- I can see that!
No question!
Wrap it all up!
follow us!
Straights!
Never again!
"New message."
"Trayner here.
You were expected at 7.
Get a new job.
Goodbye."
"New message."
"Mark, it's Emma."
"Dad's picking up his car tonight."
"Don't be there... please."
How are you?
Oh no!
I'd forgotten!
We're having a village people party... we borrowed some stuff.
Damn visions!
He's obsessed!
See a shrink!
Change the goddamn song!
What time is it?
You're all worked up!
You need a bath and a massage.
Shut up!
MaIdini!
Dinnertime!
I need my keys.
Come in.
I'm sorry... it's so unlike me.
Just a misunderstanding...
tell Emma...
definitely.
Thanks.
gentlemen...
Kissie!
"gentlemen?"
Wait!
Wait!
Wait!
Who were you talking to?
Who was there?
Those fellows...
What fellows?
I'm all alone!
You're crazy!
The Indian, the cop...
the motorbike guy...
That's great!
- That's great!
- Crazy!
"L'Am - bi - gu" What is that?
colour TV for the straights!
Damn allergies!
Must be puss!
"Franz, Iet's get married!"
Princes but no queens!
"I Iove you, Franz!"
"Don't call me Franz!"
- Change channels!
- Switch it back on!
We want the Princess!
And the Prince!
"Tragedy at club. 5 dead."
Baby!
Smoking!
No effect at all!
Come on!
Pass the ball!
"Tr.z.guet shoots!"
Tr.z.-gay?
Who are these guys?
We'II never win with the B-team!
Where's Janvion and ReveIIi?
Or the new kid, PIatini?
France always sucks at soccer!
We have won 2 Euros and a world Cup!
Leave the footie!
Let's talk.
Did you hear that, girls!
- He wants to talk!
- Look.
We're in the newspaper!
Let's see!
"explosion at 2 in the morning..."
1.55 on the dot.
That's mine.
"Five victims' bodies were not found..."
"due to the blast..."
"caused by a short-circuit in an overheated bubble and foam machine!"
I get it now.
april 13th 1979...
Huggy's surprise birthday party... he was thirty... my partner!
You come out at night...
stay young...
We're fags, right?
- Yes.
No.
I was going to say ghosts!
- What a genius!
We walk through walls and don't age... you could have asked us!
Anyway...
Emma's Dad sees you, so I'm not alone...
And I'm not mad, and not gay!
Happy now, are you?
He's glad not to be gay!
Yes!
Maybe I can win back the woman I Iove!
"Ghosts"
brilliant!
I'm coming!
...so if you think you can help, call me back.
Thanks.
The very man!
You lost your job: you're in deep shit...
So?
suicide?
What?
well you're gay, your wife's left you, you're jobless It makes sense.
bullshit!
I'm not gay.
Shame, it was kind of cool.
Did you tell Emma?
I Ieft 100 messages...
Oh shit!
Like a beer?
It's me...
I went for my car.
- You OK?
- Yeah.
Move on, Emma.
I saw Mark.
- really?
How is he?
- Seems just fine!
Having a little party a kinky costume do!
Going out?
To work.
I can't sleep anyway.
Mark!
Christ!
Stop going through walls!
It's creepy!
There are doors!
Doors means... never mind.
You know... the pal who never showed up... can you try and find him?
His name was Henry Burns.
But I called him Huggy.
He ran a bar in the Rue St Anne.
The love of my Iife.
I'II do what I can.
- Huggy?
- Huggy.
Right...
We're going to dance.
Thanks.
What's up?
It's Ivan!
He's dead!
- Yes, I'm dead!
- My baby's dead!
- It's Ivan!
He's dead!
- Of course he's dead!
You're dead too!
You're all dead!
So what?
Not again!
You need locking up!
You need locking up!
You're seriously whacko!
You're seriously whacko!
I'm talking to gh... to friends you can't see.
Cut it out!
How about a demo?
Leave it to me!
What?
Just watch!
Ready?
Lets' go!
Nice move.
My turn.
Nice move!
Did you see that?
You think I did that alone?
What planet are you on?
Huh?
OK, guys.
Reset.
You shoot now.
You'II see.
holy shit!
Is that them?
Wow!
They're good!
It's like a flying sea-snake!
Oh shit!
Are they there?
I've got pretty balls, huh?
They see me?
Is he playing with a full deck?
They think you're cool.
Howdy!
That's a cue-rack!
Over there!
Do they live here?
That's the problem...
Good evening, Mr Modena.
A classic case.
What our German friends call "poItergeists".
"Noisy spirits".
You say they died violently, without a proper burial... they behave strangely...
are prisoners in this house and appear at night?
absolutely.
What are you doing?
To imprison such spirits...
one needs an area of consecrated ground enclosed by 4 holy stones.
We need to find those stones.
I should have taken the barbecue sauce.
Get me some.
Hey!
Get it yourself!
David... please.
And for dessert, a fudge McFIurry.
Do it for me!
Great!
It's OK.
He has a cuckold's chin... a prominent forehead and a thick neck an obvious cretin!
Right... find me those stones!
It's manual labour... not too hard... even for you.
I hate him.
It's mutual.
You can see them?
And hear them?
Let's go guys!
"This house was built on a TempIars' shrine..."
"and the 4 imprisoning stones represent the 4 corners of the old torture chamber."
"When the Order was repressed..."
"the templars were slain..."
"at this precise location:
your house..."
"and the former club."
slow going!
careful, Mark.
OK.
There!
The stones represent the limits of the ectoplasmic perimeter.
Your chums' "prison".
If I move the stones... they move too.
One barbecue sauce!
I don't want it now.
Where's my dessert?
Thanks, David.
I don't want it now.
Where's my dessert?
Here!
So if I put the stonesat each corner of the country... they could go anywhere?
That's impossible.
The ectopIasmic zone is fixed.
It can't be enlarged.
So they will never leave?
Oh, but yes!
The poltergeist state is just one step preceding reincarnation and... the Great Passage.
What's that?
Like in that film: "HeII-house".
Every 700 years, there's a big hole... and guys fall in.
So you liked that fine documentary...
But then, you have flat Iobes.
I'm going to play pool.
When is the Great Passage?
It can be defined.
I can do that.
But I am intrigued...
Some people... can see them... others cannot.
Yes, I agree.
Be quiet!
I need to think.
We know that Casanova's ghost... appeared only to virgins.
To no-one else.
Why?
Because he lusted after virginity.
Thus, if we see them... others do not, it is for the same reason...
Virginity!
That doesn't work.
I can see them...
- and I'm no virgin.
- With a man?
Ah, in that case...
myself too!
And what fantasy...
inspires every pederast?
You and I!
Attractive hetero males to convert!
That makes sense.
Emma's Dad and I can see them...
but she can't.
exactly.
Impure contact with a man means virginity is lost.
So you can't see them.
Are your toilets clean?
Yes.
Where?
I'm coming.
AII right, guys?
I'II kill the fascist!
No, we need him!
It's bedtime, OK?
For you!
We're stuck here because of the stones!
Why don't you put the stones in the car and go for a drive!
He's right!
We can't leave the perimeter, but we can move it!
Mark can drive us and the stones...
I wouldn't, if I were you.
We'II do what we like, pal!
You're not giving orders!
How do we do it?
We can't even touch the stones!
- Come and party with us!
- I'm off!
I'm really not in the mood.
early night for me.
Be cool, Mark!
We'II never see what's become of the world.
But we can't force anyone to be generous.
Don't worry, Mark...
We'II still help get Emma back.
Kissie!
Bastards!
OK.
But not for long.
I'II have to move the stones!
Hurry up!
I have a question for you... why doesn't David see the ghosts?
Think about it.
There are two cases.
Either you're pure... or you're not.
Leave the old fart!
Good night, Mr Modena.
Let's go, Mark!
- You'II drop me off?
- Sure.
Party time!
Who put a stone by the brake!
- I did.
Don't move.
- What's he doing?
OK!
I've got it.
Put the radio on!
- Yes, the radio!
- 2 seconds!
A serenade for Paris!
Sounds good!
Is it new?
- Turn it up!
- That better?
- Yeah, cool!
- Yes.
Why don't you come?
V's probably waiting.
And tomorrow at 6...
I have to examine the firemen.
- A whole squad in their boxers!
- Invite her.
Having their nuts squeezed!
You want to come?
It's near your house.
Thanks... but no thanks.
- See you!
- Meet you!
They all say bye.
Hey, Mark?
What?
Maybe we could stop by?
- Maybe we could stop by?
- To see the firemen!
What?
What's the problem?
Firemen are cool!
Firefighting is important!
- Right!
- It is!
And hunky firemen?
What are you talking about?
Admit it!
You're a fag!
You want to check out firemen because you're gay!
You hear that, Mark?
That's a good one!
Me!
Gay!
It's preposterous!
- Gay, gay!
- Stop teasing Benny hill!
Paris is still so beautiful!
michael!
The Mayor's place!
Where are we going?
The Marais!
The Marais!
- What's there?
- Surprise!
Gay driving schools!
Gay restaurants!
Gay bookstores!
Gay hairdressers!
Gay gays!
It's the Promised Land!
Take a smaller table!
When the place fills up, I'II move.
OK?
What can I get you?
Beer?
Beer?
Yes?
6 beers, please.
Thanks.
The joint's empty!
It's not EuroDisney!
- Euro-what?
- What's EuroDisney?
Oh, right.
A funfair in the suburbs with Mickey Mouse.
Why doesn't David see you?
I'm sure he's not gay.
Everyone's gay.
HeterosexuaIity is a bourgeois scam.
And all straights are latent gays!
We're either gay or fascists!
Yes?
You piss me off!
What about tolerance and difference... do they mean nothing?
With his Peace and Love pendant...
a bigot!
You're right.
He's talking rubbish.
David!
He touches dicks!
Firemen's dicks!
That's the reason!
He touches other people's dicks!
That's why he can't see you!
Of course, that's why he can't see you!
He touches firemen's dicks!
And so he can't see you!
That's great!
No problem!
brilliant!
I'II call him!
Move the stones!
Mark!
The stones!
At work, you touch dicks!
That's why they're invisible!
I'II call back.
That's me, there.
I've changed!
No, I recognize you.
I know the person beside you.
impossible.
He passed away a Iong time ago.
Huggy?
only one person ever called me that!
You're too young.
How did you know?
I know?
What's up guys?
Don't move!
Sir!
Sir!
Your order!
Any longer outside, and they're in limbo...
I wouldn't like to be in their shoes...
- Your order?
- Quarterpounder with cheese.
I'd just leave them there.
But if you want to save them, it's simple.
Put the stones back in the house.
The timing is vital.
They must always be back by 1.55.
The time of the explosion during their debauchery.
Like cinderella... they're CindereIIas!
You!
Cinders with their own balls!
Napkins are extra?
They're in the bag, sir.
Don't worry!
It'II be OK!
It's alright!
Don't worry!
Wait...
I'II be back!
Don't move!
Emma!
Emma!
unbelievable!
Don't you get my messages?
I'm fine!
I'm cured!
It's complex, but I'II explain!
We'II be home in 2 minutes!
please!
Forget me.
Good luck.
To you, and your wheelbarrow.
Fuck!
Emma!
Are you OK?
Are you OK?
nearly there!
Sorry.
Our pal!
Running red lights now, eh?
- You like prison food?
- It's an emergency!
really!
5 in the back and no belts!
AII wasted too!
AII right, girls!
Get out!
phil... who are you talking to?
He's all alone.
Yeah... it's just me.
The 5 fairies back there!
The 5 what?
What?
Who?
Take a vacation, phil!
It's OK, phil... move along now...
Bye phil!
Are you nuts?
You know how it is.
Don't touch me!
Better now?
AII right, baby?
Thanks, Mark.
"Emma..."
"I'd Iike to explain..."
"but otherwise, your stuff's in the hall."
"Mark"
Don't put a crease in the jeans.
You'II get all rumpIy at work!
Work is history!
But that's not the problem never mind.
This is nice, eh?
OK, Mark?
Yeah, yeah.
"Love is a science..."
"you my guiding hand...
I hear your silence..."
"and try to understand...
Did I Iove you badly?"
"My angel, sweet and brutal..."
"Pure and clear and perfect..."
"a jewel made of crystal."
Who is it?
Is it for me?
Mark.
I got your letter.
I just wanted to say...
- "It's lovely."
-Yeah?
"especially the end."
The end?
"Your stuff"?
"I hear your silence..."
"It's beautiful."
- Must be a mistake...
- Jean Cocteau.
What?
Jean Cocteau.
You like poetry?
Oh yes...
We should talk, don't you think?
Of course.
talk and meet...
- Invite her to dinner!
- Get her over here!
Maybe we can... have dinner?
finally!
- Next week!
- Tonight!
Tonight?
I'II be there in 1 hour.
Me too.
I mean, I'II be waiting.
Who forged my handwriting?
Thanks, guys!
It was me, Mark.
I only wanted to help.
So I took the letter...
Thanks, Shaggy!
You're brilliant!
Thanks!
What time is it?
1.55.
That's on your broken watch.
It's 20.15.
Do me a favour, guys.
- Leave me and Emma alone tonight?
- OK, but...
OK, but... you want your wife back, right?
exactly!
The way he looks, he has no chance!
hardly a babe-magnet!
He's right: always rumpIy!
But he works, or worked, so hard!
No time for taste!
I worked for BASF for ten years...
- and was always more than alluring!
- But...
- Listen.
- Enough with the witchtriaI!
So he's frumpy!
And straight!
That's how it is!
Is it innate?
Who knows?
We can't all have dominant mothers... and meek fathers!
It's not his fault!
The concept of tolerance... means nothing to you?
- Is Perry Mason done?
- Stop it!
We'II help you!
Let's get to work, girls!
Give me a hand!
No.
No.
I think I'II do the icing!
This material!
Wait, GiIes!
This might work better!
facial toner!
Such penetration!
Easy, boy!
Good evening!
It's changed!
It's so much bigger!
We...
I took out the pool table.
It creates more space.
- You did all this?
- Yes.
By yourself?
Yes.
I did the step!
That's pretty.
Fairy lights!
They light up!
Sit down.
Make yourself... at home!
Mark!
It's ready!
Two more nibbles!
Did you shag her?
The tomato umbrellas!
That's enough!
- She'II notice!
- Dressed to the nines!
She'II love you!
Yes.
Next!
You're back already?
You did all this?
Yes.
- It's lovely!
- A minimum of effort.
Everything OK?
Ask about her job.
So, how's work?
well, the Pompeii job... is a bit boring.
well, "Pompeii isn't Carthage!"
well, "Pompeii isn't Carthage!"
Carthage?
That's for sure.
You weren't into that stuff before?
- "HannibaI, - "HannibaI,
- the city walls, - the city walls,
- the Antonine baths..." - the Antonine baths..."
I got so laid there!
I got so... it's great!
Pompeii, Carthage those Persians, huh!
Idiot!
Wrong answer!
The Persians?
really!
Fancy some wine?
I'm fine.
You're different.
I'm cured.
I'm better now.
It's all sorted.
It's as if you'd changed.
For the better.
I Iike it.
Dessert is served!
Dessert is served!
already?
I mean, I made dessert, and it's ready.
Superb!
- Cake?
- Is that the cake?
I supervised!
I'd never have guessed...
- It's great, fantastic.
- Thanks.
But, I'm sorry...
- I have to...
She'II notice.
- But... my icing!
That was my icing!
Sorry!
- He ruined my cake!
- Be strong!
- He ruined my cake!
- I know!
I know!
It's sort of...
chocolate!
No, really, it was delicious... it was a great dinner...
I'II have an apple.
As you Iike.
I'II mute it.
What are you doing?
A Marquise apple!
Did you do that?
But how?
It's amazing!
- It's an apple.
- Show me.
Not with a Granny.
Come on!
giles, the music!
Let me see...
The music is pre-programmed.
Time to dance!
Dance?
follow my lead.
Forward..
follow my lead.
Back,
Back, and forward...
To the right...
And the magic square...
Now!
I should go...
Are you sure?
In for the kill!
- Kiss her!
You fag!
- full tongue job!
Damn allergies!
please, get lost!
You're not hurt, Mark?
Kissie.
Kissie, kissie.
I Iove it when you growl.
Turns me on!
OK, Iet's go!
Hi, I'm giles.
What's your precinct, big boy?
It wasn't me!
I didn't touch anything!
It was already switched on!
It was great!
Now she's back, we need to get organised...
explain this!
Wow, you're on here!
It was true?
We're off...
We'II be downstairs...
Kissie you too.
They went into the wall!
well my love, that's what ghosts do.
They go into walls.
My calculation for the Great Passage is done.
The moment when your ghostly chums...
leave the world of the living... is fixed for...
Tuesday july 7th 2706.
At 1.55.
That late, huh?
Or 2.55, if we give up daylight savings time.
700 years stuck here!
That's quite a wait!
We need more friends!
girlfriends even!
Enough, Ivan!
You'II need to be very, very patient... because 2706 is hardly next week!
I've thought of something!
This was once a nightclub!
8 months later.
A drink on the house?
Why all the Greeks on TV?
They're Romans!
Ghosts!
They're here, but only on-screen for you.
From Pompeii!
They were at the baths.
mostly gay... and they died in the eruption!
How did they get here?
By ship, with lava stones.
Dance?
I'm GiIIus.
Concerning the baths...
I just went to wash.
I'm not... a homo.
Nor me, GiIIus!
Did you see Ivan?
No.
No.
Weird cocktail!
No Curacao...
I used tomato juice.
It's different but it's...
Hi.
Amazing!
You look 20 years younger!
-Is he here?
- Right here.
You can see him on the screen.
- Shaggy?
- Yes, Huggy.
He's saying...
I can read his lips... thanks, Mark.
"I'm here Huggy..."
"Here for ever..."
Dust in my eye...
- Having fun?
- I'm thirsty!
Hi!
I'm her husband!
Fancy a drink?
How's my grandson doing?
Fine, Dad!
Bravo Mark!
well done!
No hard feelings!
Great club!
Nice atmosphere!
Yes.
- A Iot of fags here!
- Pardon?
- Lots of fags!
- I Iike it!
I Iike older men.
Yeah, but: "old rod, small rod!"
Let's be clear...
There's a pork-roast for 6 down there!
OK?
So beat it, RomuIus and Remus!
- Have you seen Ivan?
- No.
Everything OK?
I can't find him.
- Who's Ivan?
- His friend: or ex!
Dave!
Yes!
You can see them?
And hear them?
Sure.
So that means... you're not...
It's beautiful!
We need to fix that... using the same materials...
Right.
I'm off!
- Here's my drill.
- See you later.
No drills at work?
In construction, but unconstructive!
Thanks Dad.
Good one!
Thanks Dad.
Here.
Here's David.
Delivery man!
8 at the hotel.
already here, babe?
Oh, my pussycat!
I'd for gotten you!
Look at your new house!
What's up, puss?
It's a pile of rot here!
The ceilings are original!
Easy to rip out!
Right, we'll have the charm removed!
For now, we've lots to do!
It's nice.
I can't say I don't like it... but you're miles from Paris!
How did you find it?
A will that Dad handled.
Empty for 30 years.
Did Dad put up the money?
No, we took out a 20-year mortgage.
Oh, yes!
Your pool table!
It takes up the whole room!
Put it in the cellar!
No way!
It'll warp and go mouldy!
You break.
It's the only thing I brought!
Take it easy!
I'm a doctor, not a mover.
You drive a medics' truck.
You're happy to use the truck!
- And I'm on call.
- Oh yeah?
They beep you to park?
I need a beer.
Hot stuff, Mr Italy!
- Mark!
Come quick!
- What's up?
What's the matter?
- Pretty fast!
- OK!
Wait!
I was thinking about this room... it's quiet, it's next to ours... it's light, it's ideal for a...
Home cinema!
Brilliant!
We black out the windows...
two speakers here!
Great idea!
- Can we start now?
- Yeah!
Mark!
Emma!
I'm off!
- Bye.
- Have fun, babe!
She has gym class with Pablo, her Cuban coach.
- I need a beer.
- On a Sunday?
Yeah, he works hard.
Sundays too.
A great guy.
Charges one hour, but she stays all evening!
Right.
- I'm up at 5 for an early flight.
- Where to?
Pompeii.
A new dig at the baths.
- Boring!
- For guys who like pool.
I didn't tell you...
It's never been excavated before!
Never open to the public!
Can you imagine?
Huh?
Oh, yeah, that's great.
- Come with me.
- I can't.
There's too much to do here!
Don't forget to put up the wardrobe!
OK.
Don't be long.
And the stairs... fix that step!
It's dangerous...
- and tidy up, OK?
- Maldini, shut up!
You're not sleeping here?
Come to our place.
Why?
It's my home.
I'm not scared.
Valerie would be pleased.
She really likes you.
Let's go!
Shame!
A mile wide!
- I slipped!
- You choked!
Give me the chalk!
You blew it!
Isn't Emma anti-spliff?
So?
So you're deceiving her!
Not really.
Watch my retro shot.
Only one other guy can do it.
Was that you?
Right!
A dirty trick!
Can you hear that?
Emma, can you hear it?
What?
The music!
What music?
There... that music!
Damn!
It's scratched!
There's no music, love.
Not any more.
You were dreaming.
Carlos, how's tricks?
- Frank.
Mr Trayner.
- You part-time now?
Sorry for the slight delay.
We just moved house.
- You know how it is.
- No I don't.
Be on time, or you're home all day, every day!
Capito!
As you say!
Absolutely.
Yeah, it's great!
We're working a lot.
It's really great!
Wait...
- Later!
- What's that?
Patricians.
Washing.
No.
They're buttfucking.
No question about it.
They're buttfucking.
Yes!
For fuck's sake!
What the hell is that!
Sorry!
- You?
Here?
- It was open.
Emma's away.
I thought I'd drop by.
I brought us a wee drink.
But no glasses in the kitchen.
So it's you.
What?
Taking photos of my ass.
Making dicks with pool balls.
Dicks with what?
You find it funny?
What are you on about?
Is something wrong?
No, I'm fine, me!
But what's your game?
Nothing!
I'm sorry...
I was wrong about you.
I think so!
Right.
Bye!
Otherwise...
Don't tell Emma.
Yes.
I mean no.
Yeah.
Quiet please!
Some of us are trying to sleep!
Thank you!
No reply, and she's in my bed.
Yes, sir.
He doesn't answer?
When the cat's away...
- What's up?
- I can't see!
I need a flashlight.
Shame Emma's gone.
You into chicks now?
Bad boy, Ivan!
My men are waiting!
You can put it down now!
- Hello.
- Hi, love.
- It's me!
- Hi honey!
- I'll call back.
- We found a great mosaic!
- It's Justinian!
- Great!
A mosaic!
Super!
- I can't talk now.
- Did you do the wardrobe?
The wardrobe?
- Yeah.
It's good.
- Wait...
Did you go out?
- No.
- You slept at home?
I'll call you back.
Love you.
It's fine, it's all arranged!
Is somebody there?
I'd better not tell Emma.
She'll freak.
No pool tonight, David.
Right, I'm scared of a good thrashing.
Emma's back tomorrow, and I have to do... the wardrobe!
Hang on!
Mark...
Modena.
Pavarotti's town?
Exactly!
Well, even cops love painting!
So...
Traces of a break-in?
No break-in.
No break-in?
So what was stolen?
- Nothing.
- Hold on...
Nothing stolen or broken?
- What did they do?
- Drawings and they put up a wardrobe.
They put up a what?
A wardrobe.
And the ironing.
Even my jeans.
With a crease.
Phil!
- Listen, Mr Modena!
- I know...
It's terrible... we can't fight gangs doing wardrobes and ironing...
Right.
...but we're quite effective drug-wise.
I didn't see this.
But next time, I might!
Fine, that's good of you.
It's not even mine.
But I guess it was in my house.
Good night.
You scared me!
- It's you!
- You're not asleep?
- You put up the wardrobe!
- Yeah!
- You're hiding something!
- No, why?
Your mistress does your ironing?
In fact, I started doing it myself.
It's very relaxing.
I wanted to surprise you.
What's the matter?
- You hear that?
- What?
There... can you hear it?
No, I can't hear anything... come on!
"Ra-ra-Rasputin, na-na-na love machine..."
If you're not in the mood...
No, I swear...
listen!
It's scratched!
It's stopped.
Give up the joints!
Rubbish!
I don't smoke!
OK, but you hear Russians, singing: "Rasputin, etc..."
They're not Russians.
It's Boney M.
I'm just saying, they're not Russians.
It's Boney M, black guys.
Mark, are you sure you feel OK?
Oh yes, you feel fine!
- You feel just fine!
- I feel very fine!
An ass like a docker!
CIumsy!
She deserves better!
Forget the girl, Bert!
- There!
- What!
Ivan's dancing.
Fancy a quickie?
There!
The guy's ass?
-What guy's ass?
-There!
You saw it!
On the wall!
please, stop it!
A guy showed me his ass... and asked if...
I fancied a...
- if I wanted...
- Great!
Was it a nice ass?
Did it turn you on?
What now?
Come to bed!
I'm just going for some water.
What the fuck?
There you are!
What the hell's going on?
Come to watch the fags, eh?
Michael Raffin, gay and proud of it!
- Fascist!
- You what?
Where's your chick?
Got any blow?
I'm all out!
He's all rumply!
Not hanging too heavy down there?
The material I mean!
What's the fabric?
Enough!
Be nice to our intruder!
I'm John, but my friends call me Shaggy.
- This is my fucking house!
- Have a drink.
That's my wine!
"My house!", "My wine".
Chill, man!
A little green, maybe.
No effect at all.
'76 is young, though.
Needs to age.
So, Mark.
We need to talk.
You're cool, but this is our home.
- Private.
- Your home?
Maybe we can help each other out.
You can crash here for a while.
Sure.
Thanks!
We've been here for ages.
But we need a change.
- Any ideas?
- Out!
Or it's the cops!
The boys in blue!
The boys in blue!
I prefer firemen!
I'm Giles.
I'm a rep with BASF.
They're showing off.
Fags!
I'm not.
You know?
I just come to dance!
So dance away!
And take your pals with you!
OK?
OK?
You don't get it!
What's going on?
Don't worry, it's alright.
And the shovel?
Don't touch me!
- It's for them!
- There's nobody there!
Shut up!
You're drinking at night, now?
It's not me who's drinking, it's them!
They opened our wine.
Stop it!
- Mark, you're insane!
- They opened our wine.
Stop it!
Quiet!
- Call the cops!
- Quiet!
You're nuts!
You're nuts!
What?
You're nuts!
I'm nuts?
So what do you call this, then?
A cellar.
Emma!
You can see this shit!
OK.
You're fun guys, and great dancers...
I don't care who you are... but get lost!
OK!
The boys in blue!
OK, great!
I'll call them myself!
It's always the same.
Never there when you need them.
Stop it, Mark!
Stop it!
You saw it down there!
You're scaring me!
You're mad!
Are you blind, or what?
You saw those guys!
- What's your game?
- My game?
Have you seen yourself?
What are you on?
Booze?
Drugs?
You need a shrink!
Of course.
You're calling a shrink now?
We'll see who's nuts!
David?
Is this a bad time?
Yeah, but... wait!
Can you come over to the house please?
Can we turn the music down!
What's the big deal?
That!
The cellar?
You must help me!
I see guys!
- Just guys, in the cellar?
- No!
Everywhere!
In the shower...
kissing, showing their asses!
Kissing, showing their asses?
Kissing, showing their asses?
- You're gay!
- But David!
Either mad, or gay.
But see a psycho-thingy.
You're not a well person.
Take that to help you sleep.
- I don't like pills.
- But you're too stressed.
One every two days.
With a glass of water for one week.
OK.
So, I'll call you.
Bye!
"Just guys!"
Oh, it's you!
Pyjamas in the shower now!
Oh, yeah!
I forgot.
Must be those damned pills.
Scared of being naked?
Not with you!
I mean...
I'm late!
Gotta run!
Mr Trayner!
I know, I know!
You piss me off.
- I've warned you!
- Absolutely!
But trust me!
I'll make it up!
Let's do it for Mr Trayner!
Hip-hip-hooray, let's build!
Hi!
What's that?
A cue-rack.
Ugly, isn't it.
- Dad didn't come by.
- No.
So how are you?
- Fine.
- Really?
Fine, fine!
You saw someone?
Yeah!
But I'll tell you later.
Are you sick of me?
No, why?
Don't force yourself!
I can force myself a little!
He'll stretch the material!
- The fabric!
- OK?
Yeah, yeah!
Show your tits!
Shut up Ivan!
- Do you still fancy me?
- I do!
- Fuck!
- Mark!
Maybe we can talk now?
We've got a proposal for you.
- Help us escape!
- Get lost!
You're busting my balls!
That sounds like fun!
Get out!
Who're you talking to now?
Get out!
To those bastards!
Stop it!
What luck!
It didn't break!
It wasn't luck.
It should have broken.
- That guy caught it.
- Sure.
You can't see the guy in white?
- Stop it!
- Watch this!
Take a glass... drop it... and it breaks!
and it breaks!
- But he couldn't catch it!
Wait...
- And it breaks!
- Wait...
- Stop it!
Stop it!
Wait... watch again!
- Stop it!
- It's OK!
Now, you catch it.
OK?
Yes!
You'll see!
I'm off!
You're mad!
This time we count down.
Like NASA...
You're mad!
Ready?
3, 2, 1...
Idiot!
You're certifiable!
You didn't catch it?
You just want us out, no?
You're out, OK!
He wants to marry us!
Let's play tag!
Kissie-kissie!
Can't catch us!
- That you, Mark?
- Yeah!
It's taken!
Straight fascist!
She told you to fix the step!
You didn't hurt your thingy?
I can massage it!
Just helping!
Not that way!
Go ahead, make my day!
Hit me!
Show me your thingy!
That's not a good omen!
Anyone home?
Emma sweetie!
It's Dad!
Anyone home?
"Took the drill.
Dad."
"LSD.
Handcuffs..."
"Yum-yum"
Whacko!
Hurts like that, huh!
Don't fuck with me in my house!
What did you do?
I got one of them!
Dad!
Are you all right?
Answer me!
Mr Chevallier!
Don't touch me!
What a savage!
And with just a shovel!
So butch!
I'm sorry.
For the insurance.
Thanks.
You're staying with your Dad?
I'm leaving.
But you'll be back tomorrow?
You'll be back?
- Why?
- You attacked Dad!
I know, but...
I love you!
Listen: it's over!
You cheat on me...
fantasize about men... steal my panties and hear voices!
What?
She said you fantasize about men...
Shut it!
For the photographer!
Man or woman.
But I don't know...
I don't know who took it!
You're scaring me!
I can't take this!
I'll see someone, tomorrow!
I thought you already had?
Yes, I went there but...
let's go back in!
Emma, I love you!
Shit!
Shit!
Shit!
Shit!
A guy crying, and with pecs like that... makes your heart bleed!
There's something in my eye...
She's hot when she's mad!
- Shame she's gone!
- Enough, Ivan!
Straights and their tiffs!
I see men... in my room... in the shower... in the cellar... but, let's be clear:
I'm not homosexual, OK?
Of course not!
What's your job?
Construction.
I'm a site manager.
A man's world.
Yes.
So you work exclusively with men...
Er, yeah.
That's interesting.
And these men...
I'm the only one who sees them!
Mr Modena...
You are the victim of hallucinations.
Fine.
Why?
If we restrict our instincts, or restrain our desires...
we may have certain visions.
When you say visions,
- what do you mean?
- Time's up.
That's 45 euros, please.
Wait, wait!
If I get a change of scene... or sell the house, maybe that would help?
Change your head.
That's the problem.
In cash, of course.
- I only have this.
- I owe you 5.
"GAY"
We'll delve into that next time.
Make a new appointment...
Listen to me!
But what can I do?
My wife's left me!
I'm all alone!
You have homosexual fantasies.
Accept it.
Act upon it.
You'll feel much better.
- I'm sorry.
- It's OK.
- Thanks.
- Never mind.
I've made tea.
I always said that boy wasn't for us.
For you, I mean.
Oh, look!
I love it...
Valerie's such a space case, she's left her gymbag!
I need to talk...
She's got a 15-day course in Cuba, with her coach...
And she's the only girl!
David...
I'm wondering if...
I might be gay.
Pass the crisps.
- Did you hear me?
- Gay.
Yes.
I heard.
I told you that.
- So?
- So, nothing.
You're not my type.
Hey, take it easy.
That explains the guys in the cellar.
So who is it?
A colleague?
- Who's who?
- Whaddya mean who?
Your boyfriend!
For fuck's sake!
It's Carlos, the Portuguese guy.
You guys are always...
It's Carlos!
I knew it!
No boyfriend!
Right.
Carlos met your Dad?
- Are you deaf!
I don't have a boyfriend!
- So you just screw around?
I've never screwed a guy.
You said you were gay?
- Yes.
- And gays do guys.
You can't generalise.
Not all gays do guys.
But... you do want to screw a guy?
No!
Screw your dumb questions!
I have to go: my grandma's 80th birthday.
Where's my tie?
Oh God!
Look, Mark!
I found this for V's birthday.
It's African or Columbian, maybe...
- I don't know where to put it.
- Nor me.
But you're gay!
You should know!
Where would you put it?
In the cellar.
What did he say?
He didn't say anything.
Yes I did, Papa.
I said that maybe I was... homosexual... or bisexual.
Phew!
I was worried...
I thought you didn't like my tiramisu!
Your tiramisu's the best!
So you're a fairy...
You know, pre-war... back in Italy...
I had this beautiful neighbour...
- she was round and firm: an apricot!
- alright, Mama!
Enough already!
- We used to do it every washday.
- alright, Mama!
Enough already!
- Your father was kind and a good worker.
- What did gran say?
But useless in bed.
We have to help him.
No leftovers!
What did gran say?
We have to help him.
Any ideas?
This TV is all squashed!
I'll talk to him.
A proper discussion.
We can help him...
and he might help us escape.
What's that?
An article about hammerhead sharks.
Hammertit sharks!
Don't push me, Ivan, please!
I've grilled his jeans!
Have you seen the date?
It's 2006!
We've been here for 27 years!
I'm 60!
No.
My ex is mayor of Paris!
And when I was in Italy... one night he wasn't home!
But Mark is the Latin type.
And?
He's hot-blooded.
He needs to play around!
I swore I wouldn't tell...
He even hit on me!
What?
Mark?
I don't want to cause trouble...
Is that him?
Don't answer!
Don't be a sucker!
You understand?
"Accept it.
Act upon it."
Excuse me...
I will have... a Scotch!
On the rocks?
Right, no ice.
Thanks.
Has everyone left?
At 12?
It isn't EuroDisney.
Uh, Yes.
Can I get a light, please?
...and for a name?
Samuel or John, finally Mark.
That's funny: my name's Mark!
You done, Mr Suit 'n' Tie?
No, it's Modena.
Mark... never mind.
Straight bait.
Up my alley!
Time out!
Hi, I'm Mark.
Wanna go downstairs?
Yes, sure... why?
What's downstairs?
Come, and I'll show you.
Easy now...
The direct type, huh?
I'm more old-fashioned...
maybe we could talk?
You just give head?
I didn't catch that.
You only give blow-jobs?
I didn't say that!
No way!
Maybe we can chat... first!
What do you do?
I'm active.
Yes, but in what?
In almost anyone.
It depends.
Right!
So what sign are you?
I don't believe in all that astral shit, but hey!
I like you.
We're going to get along.
Terrific!
You OK?
Do you want something to drink?
Or a bite to eat?
I just want to fuck.
Your place?
My place is not a good option!
Outside then?
I didn't like it much outside, the last time.
Stones, and bits of stuff, and thorns...
Stop it!
Sorry, but I can't drive.
That's all.
Shame: no site keys.
You work on a site?
Site manager!
A great job!
A challenge, I love it!
Have you got any work clothes?
The first time I felched a Turkish builder...
Great!
Great!
Park there, quick!
Talk Turkish to me!
- Turkish?
- Yeah!
Go on, go on!
Kebab!
More!
Galatasaray...
Fuck, you're a hunk!
OK.
OK.
- Do me a favour?
- No, yes, it depends.
Do me a favour?
No, yes, it depends.
Put this on.
And get undressed.
Aren't you worried someone will see us?
Sure... the squirrels.
Here, lover...
Dear God!
It's unreal!
And it's all yours!
What?
Hi.
It's our pal!
Freaky, huh!
- It's not mine!
- I can see that!
No question!
Wrap it all up!
Follow us!
Straights!
Never again!
"New message."
"Trayner here.
You were expected at 7.
Get a new job.
Goodbye."
"New message."
"Mark, it's Emma."
"Dad's picking up his car tonight."
"Don't be there... please."
How are you?
Oh no!
I'd forgotten!
We're having a Village People party... we borrowed some stuff.
Damn visions!
He's obsessed!
See a shrink!
Change the goddamn song!
What time is it?
You're all worked up!
You need a bath and a massage.
Shut up!
Maldini!
Dinnertime!
I need my keys.
Come in.
I'm sorry... it's so unlike me.
Just a misunderstanding...
Tell Emma...
Definitely.
Thanks.
Gentlemen...
Kissie!
"Gentlemen?"
Wait!
Wait!
Wait!
Who were you talking to?
Who was there?
Those fellows...
What fellows?
I'm all alone!
You're crazy!
The Indian, the cop...
the motorbike guy...
That's great!
- That's great!
- Crazy!
"L'Am - bi - gu" What is that?
Colour TV for the straights!
Damn allergies!
Must be puss!
"Franz, let's get married!"
Princes but no queens!
"I love you, Franz!"
"Don't call me Franz!"
- Change channels!
- Switch it back on!
We want the Princess!
And the Prince!
"Tragedy at club. 5 dead."
Baby!
Smoking!
No effect at all!
Come on!
Pass the ball!
"Tr.z.guet shoots!"
Tr.z.-gay?
Who are these guys?
We'll never win with the B-team!
Where's Janvion and Revelli?
Or the new kid, PIatini?
France always sucks at soccer!
We have won 2 Euros and a World Cup!
Leave the footie!
Let's talk.
Did you hear that, girls!
- He wants to talk!
- Look.
We're in the newspaper!
Let's see!
"Explosion at 2 in the morning..."
1.55 on the dot.
That's mine.
"Five victims' bodies were not found..."
"due to the blast..."
"caused by a short-circuit in an overheated bubble and foam machine!"
I get it now.
April 13th 1979...
Huggy's surprise birthday party... he was thirty... my partner!
You come out at night...
stay young...
We're fags, right?
- Yes.
No.
I was going to say ghosts!
- What a genius!
We walk through walls and don't age... you could have asked us!
Anyway...
Emma's Dad sees you, so I'm not alone...
And I'm not mad, and not gay!
Happy now, are you?
He's glad not to be gay!
Yes!
Maybe I can win back the woman I love!
"Ghosts"
Brilliant!
I'm coming!
...so if you think you can help, call me back.
Thanks.
The very man!
You lost your job: you're in deep shit...
So?
suicide?
What?
Well you're gay, your wife's left you, you're jobless... it makes sense.
Bullshit!
I'm not gay.
Shame, it was kind of cool.
Did you tell Emma?
I left 100 messages...
Oh shit!
Like a beer?
It's me...
I went for my car.
- You OK?
- Yeah.
Move on, Emma.
I saw Mark.
- Really?
How is he?
- Seems just fine!
Having a little party a kinky costume do!
Going out?
To work.
I can't sleep anyway.
Mark!
Christ!
Stop going through walls!
It's creepy!
There are doors!
Doors means... never mind.
You know... the pal who never showed up... can you try and find him?
His name was Henry Burns.
But I called him Huggy.
He ran a bar in the Rue St Anne.
The love of my life.
I'll do what I can.
- Huggy?
- Huggy.
Right...
We're going to dance.
Thanks.
What's up?
It's Ivan!
He's dead!
- Yes, I'm dead!
- My baby's dead!
- It's Ivan!
He's dead!
- Of course he's dead!
You're dead too!
You're all dead!
So what?
Not again!
You need locking up!
You need locking up!
You're seriously whacko!
You're seriously whacko!
I'm talking to gh... to friends you can't see.
Cut it out!
How about a demo?
Leave it to me!
What?
Just watch!
Ready?
Lets' go!
Nice move.
My turn.
Nice move!
Did you see that?
You think I did that alone?
What planet are you on?
Huh?
OK, guys.
Reset.
You shoot now.
You'll see.
Holy shit!
Is that them?
Wow!
They're good!
It's like a flying sea-snake!
Oh shit!
Are they there?
I've got pretty balls, huh?
They see me?
Is he playing with a full deck?
They think you're cool.
Howdy!
That's a cue-rack!
Over there!
Do they live here?
That's the problem...
Good evening, Mr Modena.
A classic case.
What our German friends call "poltergeists".
"Noisy spirits".
You say they died violently, without a proper burial... they behave strangely...
are prisoners in this house and appear at night?
Absolutely.
What are you doing?
To imprison such spirits...
one needs an area of consecrated ground enclosed by 4 holy stones.
We need to find those stones.
I should have taken the barbecue sauce.
Get me some.
Hey!
Get it yourself!
David... please.
And for dessert, a fudge McFIurry.
Do it for me!
Great!
It's OK.
He has a cuckold's chin... a prominent forehead and a thick neck an obvious cretin!
Right... find me those stones!
It's manual labour... not too hard... even for you.
I hate him.
It's mutual.
You can see them?
And hear them?
Let's go guys!
"This house was built on a Templars' shrine..."
"and the 4 imprisoning stones represent the 4 corners of the old torture chamber."
"When the Order was repressed..."
"the Templars were slain..."
"at this precise location:
your house..."
"and the former club."
slow going!
Careful, Mark.
OK.
There!
The stones represent the limits of the ectoplasmic perimeter.
Your chums' "prison".
If I move the stones... they move too.
One barbecue sauce!
I don't want it now.
Where's my dessert?
Thanks, David.
I don't want it now.
Where's my dessert?
Here!
So if I put the stonesat each corner of the country... they could go anywhere?
That's impossible.
The ectoplasmic zone is fixed.
It can't be enlarged.
So they will never leave?
Oh, but yes!
The poltergeist state is just one step preceding reincarnation and... the Great Passage.
What's that?
Like in that film: "Hell-house".
Every 700 years, there's a big hole... and guys fall in.
So you liked that fine documentary...
But then, you have flat lobes.
I'm going to play pool.
When is the Great Passage?
It can be defined.
I can do that.
But I am intrigued...
Some people... can see them... others cannot.
Yes, I agree.
Be quiet!
I need to think.
We know that Casanova's ghost... appeared only to virgins.
To no-one else.
Why?
Because he lusted after virginity.
Thus, if we see them... others do not, it is for the same reason...
Virginity!
That doesn't work.
I can see them...
- and I'm no virgin.
- With a man?
Ah, in that case...
Myself too!
And what fantasy...
inspires every pederast?
You and I!
Attractive hetero males to convert!
That makes sense.
Emma's Dad and I can see them...
but she can't.
Exactly.
Impure contact with a man means virginity is lost.
So you can't see them.
Are your toilets clean?
Yes.
Where?
I'm coming.
AII right, guys?
I'll kill the fascist!
No, we need him!
It's bedtime, OK?
For you!
We're stuck here because of the stones!
Why don't you put the stones in the car and go for a drive!
He's right!
We can't leave the perimeter, but we can move it!
Mark can drive us and the stones...
I wouldn't, if I were you.
We'll do what we like, pal!
You're not giving orders!
How do we do it?
We can't even touch the stones!
- Come and party with us!
- I'm off!
I'm really not in the mood.
Early night for me.
Be cool, Mark!
We'll never see what's become of the world.
But we can't force anyone to be generous.
Don't worry, Mark...
We'll still help get Emma back.
Kissie!
Bastards!
OK.
But not for long.
I'll have to move the stones!
Hurry up!
I have a question for you... why doesn't David see the ghosts?
Think about it.
There are two cases.
Either you're pure... or you're not.
Leave the old fart!
Good night, Mr Modena.
Let's go, Mark!
- You'll drop me off?
- Sure.
Party time!
Who put a stone by the brake!
- I did.
Don't move.
- What's he doing?
OK!
I've got it.
Put the radio on!
- Yes, the radio!
- 2 seconds!
A serenade for Paris!
Sounds good!
Is it new?
- Turn it up!
- That better?
- Yeah, cool!
- Yes.
Why don't you come?
V's probably waiting.
And tomorrow at 6...
I have to examine the firemen.
- A whole squad in their boxers!
- Invite her.
Having their nuts squeezed!
You want to come?
It's near your house.
Thanks... but no thanks.
- See you!
- Meet you!
They all say bye.
Hey, Mark?
What?
Maybe we could stop by?
- Maybe we could stop by?
- To see the firemen!
What?
What's the problem?
Firemen are cool!
Firefighting is important!
- Right!
- It is!
And hunky firemen?
What are you talking about?
Admit it!
You're a fag!
You want to check out firemen because you're gay!
You hear that, Mark?
That's a good one!
Me!
Gay!
It's preposterous!
- Gay, gay!
- Stop teasing Benny Hill!
Paris is still so beautiful!
Michael!
The Mayor's place!
Where are we going?
The Marais!
The Marais!
- What's there?
- Surprise!
Gay driving schools!
Gay restaurants!
Gay bookstores!
Gay hairdressers!
Gay gays!
It's the Promised Land!
Take a smaller table!
When the place fills up, I'll move.
OK?
What can I get you?
Beer?
Beer?
Yes?
6 beers, please.
Thanks.
The joint's empty!
It's not EuroDisney!
- Euro-what?
- What's EuroDisney?
Oh, right.
A funfair in the suburbs with Mickey Mouse.
Why doesn't David see you?
I'm sure he's not gay.
Everyone's gay.
Heterosexuality is a bourgeois scam.
And all straights are latent gays!
We're either gay or fascists!
Yes?
You piss me off!
What about tolerance and difference... do they mean nothing?
With his Peace and Love pendant...
a bigot!
You're right.
He's talking rubbish.
David!
He touches dicks!
Firemen's dicks!
That's the reason!
He touches other people's dicks!
That's why he can't see you!
Of course, that's why he can't see you!
He touches firemen's dicks!
And so he can't see you!
That's great!
No problem!
Brilliant!
I'll call him!
Move the stones!
Mark!
The stones!
At work, you touch dicks!
That's why they're invisible!
I'll call back.
That's me, there.
I've changed!
No, I recognize you.
I know the person beside you.
Impossible.
He passed away a long time ago.
Huggy?
Only one person ever called me that!
You're too young.
How did you know?
I know?
What's up guys?
Don't move!
Sir!
Sir!
Your order!
Any longer outside, and they're in limbo...
I wouldn't like to be in their shoes...
- Your order?
- Quarterpounder with cheese.
I'd just leave them there.
But if you want to save them, it's simple.
Put the stones back in the house.
The timing is vital.
They must always be back by 1.55.
The time of the explosion during their debauchery.
Like Cinderella... they're Cinderellas!
You!
Cinders with their own balls!
Napkins are extra?
They're in the bag, sir.
Don't worry!
It'll be OK!
It's alright!
Don't worry!
Wait...
I'll be back!
Don't move!
Emma!
Emma!
Unbelievable!
Don't you get my messages?
I'm fine!
I'm cured!
It's complex, but I'll explain!
We'll be home in 2 minutes!
please!
Forget me.
Good luck.
To you, and your wheelbarrow.
Fuck!
Emma!
Are you OK?
Are you OK?
Nearly there!
Sorry.
Our pal!
Running red lights now, eh?
- You like prison food?
- It's an emergency!
Really!
5 in the back and no belts!
AII wasted too!
AII right, girls!
Get out!
Phil... who are you talking to?
He's all alone.
Yeah... it's just me.
The 5 fairies back there!
The 5 what?
What?
Who?
Take a vacation, Phil!
It's OK, Phil... move along now...
Bye Phil!
Are you nuts?
You know how it is.
Don't touch me!
Better now?
AII right, baby?
Thanks, Mark.
"Emma..."
"I'd like to explain..."
"but otherwise, your stuff's in the hall."
"Mark"
Don't put a crease in the jeans.
You'll get all rumply at work!
Work is history!
But that's not the problem never mind.
This is nice, eh?
OK, Mark?
Yeah, yeah.
"Love is a science..."
"you my guiding hand...
I hear your silence..."
"and try to understand...
Did I love you badly?"
"My angel, sweet and brutal..."
"Pure and clear and perfect..."
"a jewel made of crystal."
Who is it?
Is it for me?
Mark.
I got your letter.
I just wanted to say...
- "It's lovely."
-Yeah?
"Especially the end."
The end?
"Your stuff"?
"I hear your silence..."
"It's beautiful."
- Must be a mistake...
- Jean Cocteau.
What?
Jean Cocteau.
You like poetry?
Oh yes...
We should talk, don't you think?
Of course.
Talk and meet...
- Invite her to dinner!
- Get her over here!
Maybe we can... have dinner?
Finally!
- Next week!
- Tonight!
Tonight?
I'll be there in 1 hour.
Me too.
I mean, I'll be waiting.
Who forged my handwriting?
Thanks, guys!
It was me, Mark.
I only wanted to help.
So I took the letter...
Thanks, Shaggy!
You're brilliant!
Thanks!
What time is it?
1.55.
That's on your broken watch.
It's 20.15.
Do me a favour, guys.
- Leave me and Emma alone tonight?
- OK, but...
OK, but... you want your wife back, right?
Exactly!
The way he looks, he has no chance!
Hardly a babe-magnet!
He's right: always rumply!
But he works, or worked, so hard!
No time for taste!
I worked for BASF for ten years...
- and was always more than alluring!
- But...
- Listen.
- Enough with the witchtrial!
So he's frumpy!
And straight!
That's how it is!
Is it innate?
Who knows?
We can't all have dominant mothers... and meek fathers!
It's not his fault!
The concept of tolerance... means nothing to you?
- Is Perry Mason done?
- Stop it!
We'll help you!
Let's get to work, girls!
Give me a hand!
No.
No.
I think I'll do the icing!
This material!
Wait, Giles!
This might work better!
Facial toner!
Such penetration!
Easy, boy!
Good evening!
It's changed!
It's so much bigger!
We...
I took out the pool table.
It creates more space.
- You did all this?
- Yes.
By yourself?
Yes.
I did the step!
That's pretty.
Fairy lights!
They light up!
Sit down.
Make yourself... at home!
Mark!
It's ready!
Two more nibbles!
Did you shag her?
The tomato umbrellas!
That's enough!
- She'll notice!
- Dressed to the nines!
She'll love you!
Yes.
Next!
You're back already?
You did all this?
Yes.
- It's lovely!
- A minimum of effort.
Everything OK?
Ask about her job.
So, how's work?
Well, the Pompeii job... is a bit boring.
Well, "Pompeii isn't Carthage!"
Well, "Pompeii isn't Carthage!"
Carthage?
That's for sure.
You weren't into that stuff before?
- "Hannibal, - "Hannibal,
- the city walls, - the city walls,
- the Antonine baths..." - the Antonine baths..."
I got so laid there!
I got so... it's great!
Pompeii, Carthage those Persians, huh!
Idiot!
Wrong answer!
The Persians?
Really!
Fancy some wine?
I'm fine.
You're different.
I'm cured.
I'm better now.
It's all sorted.
It's as if you'd changed.
For the better.
I like it.
Dessert is served!
Dessert is served!
already?
I mean, I made dessert, and it's ready.
Superb!
- Cake?
- Is that the cake?
I supervised!
I'd never have guessed...
- It's great, fantastic.
- Thanks.
But, I'm sorry...
- I have to...
She'll notice.
- But... my icing!
That was my icing!
Sorry!
- He ruined my cake!
- Be strong!
- He ruined my cake!
- I know!
I know!
It's sort of...
Chocolate!
No, really, it was delicious... it was a great dinner...
I'll have an apple.
As you like.
I'll mute it.
What are you doing?
A Marquise apple!
Did you do that?
But how?
It's amazing!
- It's an apple.
- Show me.
Not with a Granny.
Come on!
Giles, the music!
Let me see...
The music is pre-programmed.
Time to dance!
Dance?
Follow my lead.
Forward..
Follow my lead.
Back,
Back, and forward...
To the right...
And the magic square...
Now!
I should go...
Are you sure?
In for the kill!
- Kiss her!
You fag!
- Full tongue job!
Damn allergies!
please, get lost!
You're not hurt, Mark?
Kissie.
Kissie, kissie.
I love it when you growl.
Turns me on!
OK, let's go!
Hi, I'm Giles.
What's your precinct, big boy?
It wasn't me!
I didn't touch anything!
It was already switched on!
It was great!
Now she's back, we need to get organised...
Explain this!
Wow, you're on here!
It was true?
We're off...
We'll be downstairs...
Kissie you too.
They went into the wall!
Well my love, that's what ghosts do.
They go into walls.
My calculation for the Great Passage is done.
The moment when your ghostly chums...
leave the world of the living... is fixed for...
Tuesday July 7th 2706.
At 1.55.
That late, huh?
Or 2.55, if we give up daylight savings time.
700 years stuck here!
That's quite a wait!
We need more friends!
Girlfriends even!
Enough, Ivan!
You'll need to be very, very patient... because 2706 is hardly next week!
I've thought of something!
This was once a nightclub!
8 months later.
A drink on the house?
Why all the Greeks on TV?
They're Romans!
Ghosts!
They're here, but only on-screen for you.
From Pompeii!
They were at the baths.
Mostly gay... and they died in the eruption!
How did they get here?
By ship, with lava stones.
Dance?
I'm Gillus.
Concerning the baths...
I just went to wash.
I'm not... a homo.
Nor me, Gillus!
Did you see Ivan?
No.
No.
Weird cocktail!
No Curacao...
I used tomato juice.
It's different but it's...
Hi.
Amazing!
You look 20 years younger!
-Is he here?
- Right here.
You can see him on the screen.
- Shaggy?
- Yes, Huggy.
He's saying...
I can read his lips... thanks, Mark.
"I'm here Huggy..."
"Here for ever..."
Dust in my eye...
- Having fun?
- I'm thirsty!
Hi!
I'm her husband!
Fancy a drink?
How's my grandson doing?
Fine, Dad!
Bravo Mark!
Well done!
No hard feelings!
Great club!
Nice atmosphere!
Yes.
- A lot of fags here!
- Pardon?
- Lots of fags!
- I like it!
I like older men.
Yeah, but: "old rod, small rod!"
Let's be clear...
There's a pork-roast for 6 down there!
OK?
So beat it, Romulus and Remus!
- Have you seen Ivan?
- No.
Everything OK?
I can't find him.
- Who's Ivan?
- His friend: or ex!
Dave!
Yes!
You can see them?
And hear them?
Sure.
So that means... you're not...
It's beautiful!
We need to fix that... using the same materials...
Right.
I'm off!
- Here's my drill.
- See you later.
No drills at work?
In construction, but unconstructive!
Thanks Dad.
Good one!
Thanks Dad.
Here.
Here's David.
Delivery man!
8 at the hotel.
already here, babe?
Oh, my pussycat!
I'd for gotten you!
Look at your new house!
What's up, puss?
It's a pile of rot here!
The ceilings are original!
Easy to rip out!
Right, we'll have the charm removed!
For now, we've lots to do!
It's nice.
I can't say I don't like it... but you're miles from Paris!
How did you find it?
A will that Dad handled.
Empty for 30 years.
Did Dad put up the money?
No, we took out a 20-year mortgage.
Oh, yes!
Your pool table!
It takes up the whole room!
Put it in the cellar!
No way!
It'll warp and go mouldy!
You break.
It's the only thing I brought!
Take it easy!
I'm a doctor, not a mover.
You drive a medics' truck.
You're happy to use the truck!
- And I'm on call.
- Oh yeah?
They beep you to park?
I need a beer.
Hot stuff, Mr Italy!
- Mark!
Come quick!
- What's up?
What's the matter?
- Pretty fast!
- OK!
Wait!
I was thinking about this room... it's quiet, it's next to ours... it's light, it's ideal for a...
Home cinema!
Brilliant!
We black out the windows...
two speakers here!
Great idea!
- Can we start now?
- Yeah!
Mark!
Emma!
I'm off!
- Bye.
- Have fun, babe!
She has gym class with Pablo, her Cuban coach.
- I need a beer.
- On a Sunday?
Yeah, he works hard.
Sundays too.
A great guy.
Charges one hour, but she stays all evening!
Right.
- I'm up at 5 for an early flight.
- Where to?
Pompeii.
A new dig at the baths.
- Boring!
- For guys who like pool.
I didn't tell you...
It's never been excavated before!
Never open to the public!
Can you imagine?
Huh?
Oh, yeah, that's great.
- Come with me.
- I can't.
There's too much to do here!
Don't forget to put up the wardrobe!
OK.
Don't be long.
And the stairs... fix that step!
It's dangerous...
- and tidy up, OK?
- Maldini, shut up!
You're not sleeping here?
Come to our place.
Why?
It's my home.
I'm not scared.
Valerie would be pleased.
She really likes you.
Let's go!
Shame!
A mile wide!
- I slipped!
- You choked!
Give me the chalk!
You blew it!
Isn't Emma anti-spliff?
So?
So you're deceiving her!
Not really.
Watch my retro shot.
Only one other guy can do it.
Was that you?
Right!
A dirty trick!
Can you hear that?
Emma, can you hear it?
What?
The music!
What music?
There... that music!
Damn!
It's scratched!
There's no music, love.
Not any more.
You were dreaming.
Carlos, how's tricks?
- Frank.
Mr Trayner.
- You part-time now?
Sorry for the slight delay.
We just moved house.
- You know how it is.
- No I don't.
Be on time, or you're home all day, every day!
Capito!
As you say!
Absolutely.
Yeah, it's great!
We're working a lot.
It's really great!
Wait...
- Later!
- What's that?
Patricians.
Washing.
No.
They're buttfucking.
No question about it.
They're buttfucking.
Yes!
For fuck's sake!
What the hell is that!
Sorry!
- You?
Here?
- It was open.
Emma's away.
I thought I'd drop by.
I brought us a wee drink.
But no glasses in the kitchen.
So it's you.
What?
Taking photos of my ass.
Making dicks with pool balls.
Dicks with what?
You find it funny?
What are you on about?
Is something wrong?
No, I'm fine, me!
But what's your game?
Nothing!
I'm sorry...
I was wrong about you.
I think so!
Right.
Bye!
Otherwise...
Don't tell Emma.
Yes.
I mean no.
Yeah.
Quiet please!
Some of us are trying to sleep!
Thank you!
No reply, and she's in my bed.
Yes, sir.
He doesn't answer?
When the cat's away...
- What's up?
- I can't see!
I need a flashlight.
Shame Emma's gone.
You into chicks now?
Bad boy, Ivan!
My men are waiting!
You can put it down now!
- Hello.
- Hi, love.
- It's me!
- Hi honey!
- I'll call back.
- We found a great mosaic!
- It's Justinian!
- Great!
A mosaic!
Super!
- I can't talk now.
- Did you do the wardrobe?
The wardrobe?
- Yeah.
It's good.
- Wait...
Did you go out?
- No.
- You slept at home?
I'll call you back.
Love you.
It's fine, it's all arranged!
Is somebody there?
I'd better not tell Emma.
She'll freak.
No pool tonight, David.
Right, I'm scared of a good thrashing.
Emma's back tomorrow, and I have to do... the wardrobe!
Hang on!
Mark...
Modena.
Pavarotti's town?
Exactly!
Well, even cops love painting!
So...
Traces of a break-in?
No break-in.
No break-in?
So what was stolen?
- Nothing.
- Hold on...
Nothing stolen or broken?
- What did they do?
- Drawings and they put up a wardrobe.
They put up a what?
A wardrobe.
And the ironing.
Even my jeans.
With a crease.
Phil!
- Listen, Mr Modena!
- I know...
It's terrible... we can't fight gangs doing wardrobes and ironing...
Right.
...but we're quite effective drug-wise.
I didn't see this.
But next time, I might!
Fine, that's good of you.
It's not even mine.
But I guess it was in my house.
Good night.
You scared me!
- It's you!
- You're not asleep?
- You put up the wardrobe!
- Yeah!
- You're hiding something!
- No, why?
Your mistress does your ironing?
In fact, I started doing it myself.
It's very relaxing.
I wanted to surprise you.
What's the matter?
- You hear that?
- What?
There... can you hear it?
No, I can't hear anything... come on!
"Ra-ra-Rasputin, na-na-na love machine..."
If you're not in the mood...
No, I swear...
listen!
It's scratched!
It's stopped.
Give up the joints!
Rubbish!
I don't smoke!
OK, but you hear Russians, singing: "Rasputin, etc..."
They're not Russians.
It's Boney M.
I'm just saying, they're not Russians.
It's Boney M, black guys.
Mark, are you sure you feel OK?
Oh yes, you feel fine!
- You feel just fine!
- I feel very fine!
An ass like a docker!
CIumsy!
She deserves better!
Forget the girl, Bert!
- There!
- What!
Ivan's dancing.
Fancy a quickie?
There!
The guy's ass?
-What guy's ass?
-There!
You saw it!
On the wall!
please, stop it!
A guy showed me his ass... and asked if...
I fancied a...
- if I wanted...
- Great!
Was it a nice ass?
Did it turn you on?
What now?
Come to bed!
I'm just going for some water.
What the fuck?
There you are!
What the hell's going on?
Come to watch the fags, eh?
Michael Raffin, gay and proud of it!
- Fascist!
- You what?
Where's your chick?
Got any blow?
I'm all out!
He's all rumply!
Not hanging too heavy down there?
The material I mean!
What's the fabric?
Enough!
Be nice to our intruder!
I'm John, but my friends call me Shaggy.
- This is my fucking house!
- Have a drink.
That's my wine!
"My house!", "My wine".
Chill, man!
A little green, maybe.
No effect at all.
'76 is young, though.
Needs to age.
So, Mark.
We need to talk.
You're cool, but this is our home.
- Private.
- Your home?
Maybe we can help each other out.
You can crash here for a while.
Sure.
Thanks!
We've been here for ages.
But we need a change.
- Any ideas?
- Out!
Or it's the cops!
The boys in blue!
The boys in blue!
I prefer firemen!
I'm Giles.
I'm a rep with BASF.
They're showing off.
Fags!
I'm not.
You know?
I just come to dance!
So dance away!
And take your pals with you!
OK?
OK?
You don't get it!
What's going on?
Don't worry, it's alright.
And the shovel?
Don't touch me!
- It's for them!
- There's nobody there!
Shut up!
You're drinking at night, now?
It's not me who's drinking, it's them!
They opened our wine.
Stop it!
- Mark, you're insane!
- They opened our wine.
Stop it!
Quiet!
- Call the cops!
- Quiet!
You're nuts!
You're nuts!
What?
You're nuts!
I'm nuts?
So what do you call this, then?
A cellar.
Emma!
You can see this shit!
OK.
You're fun guys, and great dancers...
I don't care who you are... but get lost!
OK!
The boys in blue!
OK, great!
I'll call them myself!
It's always the same.
Never there when you need them.
Stop it, Mark!
Stop it!
You saw it down there!
You're scaring me!
You're mad!
Are you blind, or what?
You saw those guys!
- What's your game?
- My game?
Have you seen yourself?
What are you on?
Booze?
Drugs?
You need a shrink!
Of course.
You're calling a shrink now?
We'll see who's nuts!
David?
Is this a bad time?
Yeah, but... wait!
Can you come over to the house please?
Can we turn the music down!
What's the big deal?
That!
The cellar?
You must help me!
I see guys!
- Just guys, in the cellar?
- No!
Everywhere!
In the shower...
kissing, showing their asses!
Kissing, showing their asses?
Kissing, showing their asses?
- You're gay!
- But David!
Either mad, or gay.
But see a psycho-thingy.
You're not a well person.
Take that to help you sleep.
- I don't like pills.
- But you're too stressed.
One every two days.
With a glass of water for one week.
OK.
So, I'll call you.
Bye!
"Just guys!"
Oh, it's you!
Pyjamas in the shower now!
Oh, yeah!
I forgot.
Must be those damned pills.
Scared of being naked?
Not with you!
I mean...
I'm late!
Gotta run!
Mr Trayner!
I know, I know!
You piss me off.
- I've warned you!
- Absolutely!
But trust me!
I'll make it up!
Let's do it for Mr Trayner!
Hip-hip-hooray, let's build!
Hi!
What's that?
A cue-rack.
Ugly, isn't it.
- Dad didn't come by.
- No.
So how are you?
- Fine.
- Really?
Fine, fine!
You saw someone?
Yeah!
But I'll tell you later.
Are you sick of me?
No, why?
Don't force yourself!
I can force myself a little!
He'll stretch the material!
- The fabric!
- OK?
Yeah, yeah!
Show your tits!
Shut up Ivan!
- Do you still fancy me?
- I do!
- Fuck!
- Mark!
Maybe we can talk now?
We've got a proposal for you.
- Help us escape!
- Get lost!
You're busting my balls!
That sounds like fun!
Get out!
Who're you talking to now?
Get out!
To those bastards!
Stop it!
What luck!
It didn't break!
It wasn't luck.
It should have broken.
- That guy caught it.
- Sure.
You can't see the guy in white?
- Stop it!
- Watch this!
Take a glass... drop it... and it breaks!
and it breaks!
- But he couldn't catch it!
Wait...
- And it breaks!
- Wait...
- Stop it!
Stop it!
Wait... watch again!
- Stop it!
- It's OK!
Now, you catch it.
OK?
Yes!
You'll see!
I'm off!
You're mad!
This time we count down.
Like NASA...
You're mad!
Ready?
3, 2, 1...
Idiot!
You're certifiable!
You didn't catch it?
You just want us out, no?
You're out, OK!
He wants to marry us!
Let's play tag!
Kissie-kissie!
Can't catch us!
- That you, Mark?
- Yeah!
It's taken!
Straight fascist!
She told you to fix the step!
You didn't hurt your thingy?
I can massage it!
Just helping!
Not that way!
Go ahead, make my day!
Hit me!
Show me your thingy!
That's not a good omen!
Anyone home?
Emma sweetie!
It's Dad!
Anyone home?
"Took the drill.
Dad."
"LSD.
Handcuffs..."
"Yum-yum"
Whacko!
Hurts like that, huh!
Don't fuck with me in my house!
What did you do?
I got one of them!
Dad!
Are you all right?
Answer me!
Mr Chevallier!
Don't touch me!
What a savage!
And with just a shovel!
So butch!
I'm sorry.
For the insurance.
Thanks.
You're staying with your Dad?
I'm leaving.
But you'll be back tomorrow?
You'll be back?
- Why?
- You attacked Dad!
I know, but...
I love you!
Listen: it's over!
You cheat on me...
fantasize about men... steal my panties and hear voices!
What?
She said you fantasize about men...
Shut it!
For the photographer!
Man or woman.
But I don't know...
I don't know who took it!
You're scaring me!
I can't take this!
I'll see someone, tomorrow!
I thought you already had?
Yes, I went there but...
let's go back in!
Emma, I love you!
Shit!
Shit!
Shit!
Shit!
A guy crying, and with pecs like that... makes your heart bleed!
There's something in my eye...
She's hot when she's mad!
- Shame she's gone!
- Enough, Ivan!
Straights and their tiffs!
I see men... in my room... in the shower... in the cellar... but, let's be clear:
I'm not homosexual, OK?
Of course not!
What's your job?
Construction.
I'm a site manager.
A man's world.
Yes.
So you work exclusively with men...
Er, yeah.
That's interesting.
And these men...
I'm the only one who sees them!
Mr Modena...
You are the victim of hallucinations.
Fine.
Why?
If we restrict our instincts, or restrain our desires...
we may have certain visions.
When you say visions,
- what do you mean?
- Time's up.
That's 45 euros, please.
Wait, wait!
If I get a change of scene... or sell the house, maybe that would help?
Change your head.
That's the problem.
In cash, of course.
- I only have this.
- I owe you 5.
"GAY"
We'll delve into that next time.
Make a new appointment...
Listen to me!
But what can I do?
My wife's left me!
I'm all alone!
You have homosexual fantasies.
Accept it.
Act upon it.
You'll feel much better.
- I'm sorry.
- It's OK.
- Thanks.
- Never mind.
I've made tea.
I always said that boy wasn't for us.
For you, I mean.
Oh, look!
I love it...
Valerie's such a space case, she's left her gymbag!
I need to talk...
She's got a 15-day course in Cuba, with her coach...
And she's the only girl!
David...
I'm wondering if...
I might be gay.
Pass the crisps.
- Did you hear me?
- Gay.
Yes.
I heard.
I told you that.
- So?
- So, nothing.
You're not my type.
Hey, take it easy.
That explains the guys in the cellar.
So who is it?
A colleague?
- Who's who?
- Whaddya mean who?
Your boyfriend!
For fuck's sake!
It's Carlos, the Portuguese guy.
You guys are always...
It's Carlos!
I knew it!
No boyfriend!
Right.
Carlos met your Dad?
- Are you deaf!
I don't have a boyfriend!
- So you just screw around?
I've never screwed a guy.
You said you were gay?
- Yes.
- And gays do guys.
You can't generalise.
Not all gays do guys.
But... you do want to screw a guy?
No!
Screw your dumb questions!
I have to go: my grandma's 80th birthday.
Where's my tie?
Oh God!
Look, Mark!
I found this for V's birthday.
It's African or Columbian, maybe...
- I don't know where to put it.
- Nor me.
But you're gay!
You should know!
Where would you put it?
In the cellar.
What did he say?
He didn't say anything.
Yes I did, Papa.
I said that maybe I was... homosexual... or bisexual.
Phew!
I was worried...
I thought you didn't like my tiramisu!
Your tiramisu's the best!
So you're a fairy...
You know, pre-war... back in Italy...
I had this beautiful neighbour...
- she was round and firm: an apricot!
- alright, Mama!
Enough already!
- We used to do it every washday.
- alright, Mama!
Enough already!
- Your father was kind and a good worker.
- What did gran say?
But useless in bed.
We have to help him.
No leftovers!
What did gran say?
We have to help him.
Any ideas?
This TV is all squashed!
I'll talk to him.
A proper discussion.
We can help him...
and he might help us escape.
What's that?
An article about hammerhead sharks.
Hammertit sharks!
Don't push me, Ivan, please!
I've grilled his jeans!
Have you seen the date?
It's 2006!
We've been here for 27 years!
I'm 60!
No.
My ex is mayor of Paris!
And when I was in Italy... one night he wasn't home!
But Mark is the Latin type.
And?
He's hot-blooded.
He needs to play around!
I swore I wouldn't tell...
He even hit on me!
What?
Mark?
I don't want to cause trouble...
Is that him?
Don't answer!
Don't be a sucker!
You understand?
"Accept it.
Act upon it."
Excuse me...
I will have... a Scotch!
On the rocks?
Right, no ice.
Thanks.
Has everyone left?
At 12?
It isn't EuroDisney.
Uh, Yes.
Can I get a light, please?
...and for a name?
Samuel or John, finally Mark.
That's funny: my name's Mark!
You done, Mr Suit 'n' Tie?
No, it's Modena.
Mark... never mind.
Straight bait.
Up my alley!
Time out!
Hi, I'm Mark.
Wanna go downstairs?
Yes, sure... why?
What's downstairs?
Come, and I'll show you.
Easy now...
The direct type, huh?
I'm more old-fashioned...
maybe we could talk?
You just give head?
I didn't catch that.
You only give blow-jobs?
I didn't say that!
No way!
Maybe we can chat... first!
What do you do?
I'm active.
Yes, but in what?
In almost anyone.
It depends.
Right!
So what sign are you?
I don't believe in all that astral shit, but hey!
I like you.
We're going to get along.
Terrific!
You OK?
Do you want something to drink?
Or a bite to eat?
I just want to fuck.
Your place?
My place is not a good option!
Outside then?
I didn't like it much outside, the last time.
Stones, and bits of stuff, and thorns...
Stop it!
Sorry, but I can't drive.
That's all.
Shame: no site keys.
You work on a site?
Site manager!
A great job!
A challenge, I love it!
Have you got any work clothes?
The first time I felched a Turkish builder...
Great!
Great!
Park there, quick!
Talk Turkish to me!
- Turkish?
- Yeah!
Go on, go on!
Kebab!
More!
Galatasaray...
Fuck, you're a hunk!
OK.
OK.
- Do me a favour?
- No, yes, it depends.
Do me a favour?
No, yes, it depends.
Put this on.
And get undressed.
Aren't you worried someone will see us?
Sure... the squirrels.
Here, lover...
Dear God!
It's unreal!
And it's all yours!
What?
Hi.
It's our pal!
Freaky, huh!
- It's not mine!
- I can see that!
No question!
Wrap it all up!
Follow us!
Straights!
Never again!
"New message."
"Trayner here.
You were expected at 7.
Get a new job.
Goodbye."
"New message."
"Mark, it's Emma."
"Dad's picking up his car tonight."
"Don't be there... please."
How are you?
Oh no!
I'd forgotten!
We're having a Village People party... we borrowed some stuff.
Damn visions!
He's obsessed!
See a shrink!
Change the goddamn song!
What time is it?
You're all worked up!
You need a bath and a massage.
Shut up!
Maldini!
Dinnertime!
I need my keys.
Come in.
I'm sorry... it's so unlike me.
Just a misunderstanding...
Tell Emma...
Definitely.
Thanks.
Gentlemen...
Kissie!
"Gentlemen?"
Wait!
Wait!
Wait!
Who were you talking to?
Who was there?
Those fellows...
What fellows?
I'm all alone!
You're crazy!
The Indian, the cop...
the motorbike guy...
That's great!
- That's great!
- Crazy!
"L'Am - bi - gu" What is that?
Colour TV for the straights!
Damn allergies!
Must be puss!
"Franz, let's get married!"
Princes but no queens!
"I love you, Franz!"
"Don't call me Franz!"
- Change channels!
- Switch it back on!
We want the Princess!
And the Prince!
"Tragedy at club. 5 dead."
Baby!
Smoking!
No effect at all!
Come on!
Pass the ball!
"Tr.z.guet shoots!"
Tr.z.-gay?
Who are these guys?
We'll never win with the B-team!
Where's Janvion and Revelli?
Or the new kid, PIatini?
France always sucks at soccer!
We have won 2 Euros and a World Cup!
Leave the footie!
Let's talk.
Did you hear that, girls!
- He wants to talk!
- Look.
We're in the newspaper!
Let's see!
"Explosion at 2 in the morning..."
1.55 on the dot.
That's mine.
"Five victims' bodies were not found..."
"due to the blast..."
"caused by a short-circuit in an overheated bubble and foam machine!"
I get it now.
April 13th 1979...
Huggy's surprise birthday party... he was thirty... my partner!
You come out at night...
stay young...
We're fags, right?
- Yes.
No.
I was going to say ghosts!
- What a genius!
We walk through walls and don't age... you could have asked us!
Anyway...
Emma's Dad sees you, so I'm not alone...
And I'm not mad, and not gay!
Happy now, are you?
He's glad not to be gay!
Yes!
Maybe I can win back the woman I love!
"Ghosts"
Brilliant!
I'm coming!
...so if you think you can help, call me back.
Thanks.
The very man!
You lost your job: you're in deep shit...
So?
suicide?
What?
Well you're gay, your wife's left you, you're jobless... it makes sense.
Bullshit!
I'm not gay.
Shame, it was kind of cool.
Did you tell Emma?
I left 100 messages...
Oh shit!
Like a beer?
It's me...
I went for my car.
- You OK?
- Yeah.
Move on, Emma.
I saw Mark.
- Really?
How is he?
- Seems just fine!
Having a little party a kinky costume do!
Going out?
To work.
I can't sleep anyway.
Mark!
Christ!
Stop going through walls!
It's creepy!
There are doors!
Doors means... never mind.
You know... the pal who never showed up... can you try and find him?
His name was Henry Burns.
But I called him Huggy.
He ran a bar in the Rue St Anne.
The love of my life.
I'll do what I can.
- Huggy?
- Huggy.
Right...
We're going to dance.
Thanks.
What's up?
It's Ivan!
He's dead!
- Yes, I'm dead!
- My baby's dead!
- It's Ivan!
He's dead!
- Of course he's dead!
You're dead too!
You're all dead!
So what?
Not again!
You need locking up!
You need locking up!
You're seriously whacko!
You're seriously whacko!
I'm talking to gh... to friends you can't see.
Cut it out!
How about a demo?
Leave it to me!
What?
Just watch!
Ready?
Lets' go!
Nice move.
My turn.
Nice move!
Did you see that?
You think I did that alone?
What planet are you on?
Huh?
OK, guys.
Reset.
You shoot now.
You'll see.
Holy shit!
Is that them?
Wow!
They're good!
It's like a flying sea-snake!
Oh shit!
Are they there?
I've got pretty balls, huh?
They see me?
Is he playing with a full deck?
They think you're cool.
Howdy!
That's a cue-rack!
Over there!
Do they live here?
That's the problem...
Good evening, Mr Modena.
A classic case.
What our German friends call "poltergeists".
"Noisy spirits".
You say they died violently, without a proper burial... they behave strangely...
are prisoners in this house and appear at night?
Absolutely.
What are you doing?
To imprison such spirits...
one needs an area of consecrated ground enclosed by 4 holy stones.
We need to find those stones.
I should have taken the barbecue sauce.
Get me some.
Hey!
Get it yourself!
David... please.
And for dessert, a fudge McFIurry.
Do it for me!
Great!
It's OK.
He has a cuckold's chin... a prominent forehead and a thick neck an obvious cretin!
Right... find me those stones!
It's manual labour... not too hard... even for you.
I hate him.
It's mutual.
You can see them?
And hear them?
Let's go guys!
"This house was built on a Templars' shrine..."
"and the 4 imprisoning stones represent the 4 corners of the old torture chamber."
"When the Order was repressed..."
"the Templars were slain..."
"at this precise location:
your house..."
"and the former club."
slow going!
Careful, Mark.
OK.
There!
The stones represent the limits of the ectoplasmic perimeter.
Your chums' "prison".
If I move the stones... they move too.
One barbecue sauce!
I don't want it now.
Where's my dessert?
Thanks, David.
I don't want it now.
Where's my dessert?
Here!
So if I put the stonesat each corner of the country... they could go anywhere?
That's impossible.
The ectoplasmic zone is fixed.
It can't be enlarged.
So they will never leave?
Oh, but yes!
The poltergeist state is just one step preceding reincarnation and... the Great Passage.
What's that?
Like in that film: "Hell-house".
Every 700 years, there's a big hole... and guys fall in.
So you liked that fine documentary...
But then, you have flat lobes.
I'm going to play pool.
When is the Great Passage?
It can be defined.
I can do that.
But I am intrigued...
Some people... can see them... others cannot.
Yes, I agree.
Be quiet!
I need to think.
We know that Casanova's ghost... appeared only to virgins.
To no-one else.
Why?
Because he lusted after virginity.
Thus, if we see them... others do not, it is for the same reason...
Virginity!
That doesn't work.
I can see them...
- and I'm no virgin.
- With a man?
Ah, in that case...
Myself too!
And what fantasy...
inspires every pederast?
You and I!
Attractive hetero males to convert!
That makes sense.
Emma's Dad and I can see them...
but she can't.
Exactly.
Impure contact with a man means virginity is lost.
So you can't see them.
Are your toilets clean?
Yes.
Where?
I'm coming.
AII right, guys?
I'll kill the fascist!
No, we need him!
It's bedtime, OK?
For you!
We're stuck here because of the stones!
Why don't you put the stones in the car and go for a drive!
He's right!
We can't leave the perimeter, but we can move it!
Mark can drive us and the stones...
I wouldn't, if I were you.
We'll do what we like, pal!
You're not giving orders!
How do we do it?
We can't even touch the stones!
- Come and party with us!
- I'm off!
I'm really not in the mood.
Early night for me.
Be cool, Mark!
We'll never see what's become of the world.
But we can't force anyone to be generous.
Don't worry, Mark...
We'll still help get Emma back.
Kissie!
Bastards!
OK.
But not for long.
I'll have to move the stones!
Hurry up!
I have a question for you... why doesn't David see the ghosts?
Think about it.
There are two cases.
Either you're pure... or you're not.
Leave the old fart!
Good night, Mr Modena.
Let's go, Mark!
- You'll drop me off?
- Sure.
Party time!
Who put a stone by the brake!
- I did.
Don't move.
- What's he doing?
OK!
I've got it.
Put the radio on!
- Yes, the radio!
- 2 seconds!
A serenade for Paris!
Sounds good!
Is it new?
- Turn it up!
- That better?
- Yeah, cool!
- Yes.
Why don't you come?
V's probably waiting.
And tomorrow at 6...
I have to examine the firemen.
- A whole squad in their boxers!
- Invite her.
Having their nuts squeezed!
You want to come?
It's near your house.
Thanks... but no thanks.
- See you!
- Meet you!
They all say bye.
Hey, Mark?
What?
Maybe we could stop by?
- Maybe we could stop by?
- To see the firemen!
What?
What's the problem?
Firemen are cool!
Firefighting is important!
- Right!
- It is!
And hunky firemen?
What are you talking about?
Admit it!
You're a fag!
You want to check out firemen because you're gay!
You hear that, Mark?
That's a good one!
Me!
Gay!
It's preposterous!
- Gay, gay!
- Stop teasing Benny Hill!
Paris is still so beautiful!
Michael!
The Mayor's place!
Where are we going?
The Marais!
The Marais!
- What's there?
- Surprise!
Gay driving schools!
Gay restaurants!
Gay bookstores!
Gay hairdressers!
Gay gays!
It's the Promised Land!
Take a smaller table!
When the place fills up, I'll move.
OK?
What can I get you?
Beer?
Beer?
Yes?
6 beers, please.
Thanks.
The joint's empty!
It's not EuroDisney!
- Euro-what?
- What's EuroDisney?
Oh, right.
A funfair in the suburbs with Mickey Mouse.
Why doesn't David see you?
I'm sure he's not gay.
Everyone's gay.
Heterosexuality is a bourgeois scam.
And all straights are latent gays!
We're either gay or fascists!
Yes?
You piss me off!
What about tolerance and difference... do they mean nothing?
With his Peace and Love pendant...
a bigot!
You're right.
He's talking rubbish.
David!
He touches dicks!
Firemen's dicks!
That's the reason!
He touches other people's dicks!
That's why he can't see you!
Of course, that's why he can't see you!
He touches firemen's dicks!
And so he can't see you!
That's great!
No problem!
Brilliant!
I'll call him!
Move the stones!
Mark!
The stones!
At work, you touch dicks!
That's why they're invisible!
I'll call back.
That's me, there.
I've changed!
No, I recognize you.
I know the person beside you.
Impossible.
He passed away a long time ago.
Huggy?
Only one person ever called me that!
You're too young.
How did you know?
I know?
What's up guys?
Don't move!
Sir!
Sir!
Your order!
Any longer outside, and they're in limbo...
I wouldn't like to be in their shoes...
- Your order?
- Quarterpounder with cheese.
I'd just leave them there.
But if you want to save them, it's simple.
Put the stones back in the house.
The timing is vital.
They must always be back by 1.55.
The time of the explosion during their debauchery.
Like Cinderella... they're Cinderellas!
You!
Cinders with their own balls!
Napkins are extra?
They're in the bag, sir.
Don't worry!
It'll be OK!
It's alright!
Don't worry!
Wait...
I'll be back!
Don't move!
Emma!
Emma!
Unbelievable!
Don't you get my messages?
I'm fine!
I'm cured!
It's complex, but I'll explain!
We'll be home in 2 minutes!
please!
Forget me.
Good luck.
To you, and your wheelbarrow.
Fuck!
Emma!
Are you OK?
Are you OK?
Nearly there!
Sorry.
Our pal!
Running red lights now, eh?
- You like prison food?
- It's an emergency!
Really!
5 in the back and no belts!
AII wasted too!
AII right, girls!
Get out!
Phil... who are you talking to?
He's all alone.
Yeah... it's just me.
The 5 fairies back there!
The 5 what?
What?
Who?
Take a vacation, Phil!
It's OK, Phil... move along now...
Bye Phil!
Are you nuts?
You know how it is.
Don't touch me!
Better now?
AII right, baby?
Thanks, Mark.
"Emma..."
"I'd like to explain..."
"but otherwise, your stuff's in the hall."
"Mark"
Don't put a crease in the jeans.
You'll get all rumply at work!
Work is history!
But that's not the problem never mind.
This is nice, eh?
OK, Mark?
Yeah, yeah.
"Love is a science..."
"you my guiding hand...
I hear your silence..."
"and try to understand...
Did I love you badly?"
"My angel, sweet and brutal..."
"Pure and clear and perfect..."
"a jewel made of crystal."
Who is it?
Is it for me?
Mark.
I got your letter.
I just wanted to say...
- "It's lovely."
-Yeah?
"Especially the end."
The end?
"Your stuff"?
"I hear your silence..."
"It's beautiful."
- Must be a mistake...
- Jean Cocteau.
What?
Jean Cocteau.
You like poetry?
Oh yes...
We should talk, don't you think?
Of course.
Talk and meet...
- Invite her to dinner!
- Get her over here!
Maybe we can... have dinner?
Finally!
- Next week!
- Tonight!
Tonight?
I'll be there in 1 hour.
Me too.
I mean, I'll be waiting.
Who forged my handwriting?
Thanks, guys!
It was me, Mark.
I only wanted to help.
So I took the letter...
Thanks, Shaggy!
You're brilliant!
Thanks!
What time is it?
1.55.
That's on your broken watch.
It's 20.15.
Do me a favour, guys.
- Leave me and Emma alone tonight?
- OK, but...
OK, but... you want your wife back, right?
Exactly!
The way he looks, he has no chance!
Hardly a babe-magnet!
He's right: always rumply!
But he works, or worked, so hard!
No time for taste!
I worked for BASF for ten years...
- and was always more than alluring!
- But...
- Listen.
- Enough with the witchtrial!
So he's frumpy!
And straight!
That's how it is!
Is it innate?
Who knows?
We can't all have dominant mothers... and meek fathers!
It's not his fault!
The concept of tolerance... means nothing to you?
- Is Perry Mason done?
- Stop it!
We'll help you!
Let's get to work, girls!
Give me a hand!
No.
No.
I think I'll do the icing!
This material!
Wait, Giles!
This might work better!
Facial toner!
Such penetration!
Easy, boy!
Good evening!
It's changed!
It's so much bigger!
We...
I took out the pool table.
It creates more space.
- You did all this?
- Yes.
By yourself?
Yes.
I did the step!
That's pretty.
Fairy lights!
They light up!
Sit down.
Make yourself... at home!
Mark!
It's ready!
Two more nibbles!
Did you shag her?
The tomato umbrellas!
That's enough!
- She'll notice!
- Dressed to the nines!
She'll love you!
Yes.
Next!
You're back already?
You did all this?
Yes.
- It's lovely!
- A minimum of effort.
Everything OK?
Ask about her job.
So, how's work?
Well, the Pompeii job... is a bit boring.
Well, "Pompeii isn't Carthage!"
Well, "Pompeii isn't Carthage!"
Carthage?
That's for sure.
You weren't into that stuff before?
- "Hannibal, - "Hannibal,
- the city walls, - the city walls,
- the Antonine baths..." - the Antonine baths..."
I got so laid there!
I got so... it's great!
Pompeii, Carthage those Persians, huh!
Idiot!
Wrong answer!
The Persians?
Really!
Fancy some wine?
I'm fine.
You're different.
I'm cured.
I'm better now.
It's all sorted.
It's as if you'd changed.
For the better.
I like it.
Dessert is served!
Dessert is served!
already?
I mean, I made dessert, and it's ready.
Superb!
- Cake?
- Is that the cake?
I supervised!
I'd never have guessed...
- It's great, fantastic.
- Thanks.
But, I'm sorry...
- I have to...
She'll notice.
- But... my icing!
That was my icing!
Sorry!
- He ruined my cake!
- Be strong!
- He ruined my cake!
- I know!
I know!
It's sort of...
Chocolate!
No, really, it was delicious... it was a great dinner...
I'll have an apple.
As you like.
I'll mute it.
What are you doing?
A Marquise apple!
Did you do that?
But how?
It's amazing!
- It's an apple.
- Show me.
Not with a Granny.
Come on!
Giles, the music!
Let me see...
The music is pre-programmed.
Time to dance!
Dance?
Follow my lead.
Forward..
Follow my lead.
Back,
Back, and forward...
To the right...
And the magic square...
Now!
I should go...
Are you sure?
In for the kill!
- Kiss her!
You fag!
- Full tongue job!
Damn allergies!
please, get lost!
You're not hurt, Mark?
Kissie.
Kissie, kissie.
I love it when you growl.
Turns me on!
OK, let's go!
Hi, I'm Giles.
What's your precinct, big boy?
It wasn't me!
I didn't touch anything!
It was already switched on!
It was great!
Now she's back, we need to get organised...
Explain this!
Wow, you're on here!
It was true?
We're off...
We'll be downstairs...
Kissie you too.
They went into the wall!
Well my love, that's what ghosts do.
They go into walls.
My calculation for the Great Passage is done.
The moment when your ghostly chums...
leave the world of the living... is fixed for...
Tuesday July 7th 2706.
At 1.55.
That late, huh?
Or 2.55, if we give up daylight savings time.
700 years stuck here!
That's quite a wait!
We need more friends!
Girlfriends even!
Enough, Ivan!
You'll need to be very, very patient... because 2706 is hardly next week!
I've thought of something!
This was once a nightclub!
8 months later.
A drink on the house?
Why all the Greeks on TV?
They're Romans!
Ghosts!
They're here, but only on-screen for you.
From Pompeii!
They were at the baths.
Mostly gay... and they died in the eruption!
How did they get here?
By ship, with lava stones.
Dance?
I'm Gillus.
Concerning the baths...
I just went to wash.
I'm not... a homo.
Nor me, Gillus!
Did you see Ivan?
No.
No.
Weird cocktail!
No Curacao...
I used tomato juice.
It's different but it's...
Hi.
Amazing!
You look 20 years younger!
-Is he here?
- Right here.
You can see him on the screen.
- Shaggy?
- Yes, Huggy.
He's saying...
I can read his lips... thanks, Mark.
"I'm here Huggy..."
"Here for ever..."
Dust in my eye...
- Having fun?
- I'm thirsty!
Hi!
I'm her husband!
Fancy a drink?
How's my grandson doing?
Fine, Dad!
Bravo Mark!
Well done!
No hard feelings!
Great club!
Nice atmosphere!
Yes.
- A lot of fags here!
- Pardon?
- Lots of fags!
- I like it!
I like older men.
Yeah, but: "old rod, small rod!"
Let's be clear...
There's a pork-roast for 6 down there!
OK?
So beat it, Romulus and Remus!
- Have you seen Ivan?
- No.
Everything OK?
I can't find him.
- Who's Ivan?
- His friend: or ex!
Dave!
Yes!
You can see them?
And hear them?
Sure.
So that means... you're not...
My name is Shake-Zula
The Mike Ruler
The Old Schooler
You want to trip?
I'll bring it to ya.
Frylock and I'm on top rock you like a cop.
Meatwad, you're up next with your knock-knock.
Meatwad make the money see?
Meatwad get the honeys, g.
Driving in my car living like a star ice on my fingers and my toes and I'm a Taurus.
Uh, check-check it, yeah.
'Cause we are the Aqua Teens make the homeys say ho and the girlies want to scream.
'Cause we are the Aqua Teens make the homeys say ho and the girlies want to scream ?
Aqua Teen Hunger Force.
Number One in the hood, g.
I'm gonna do it.
Ha ha.
You--you so flinched when I did that.
Yeah.
You would jump!
Oh, yeah.
And then I'd hit you with the arrow and you'd cry your little eyes out.
Yeah.
That was fun.
Ha ha ha ha ha.
Good times.
Ha.
I remember that one time you's in the bathroom with that magazine, 'cepting we ain't got no bathroom.
So, you know, ha-- we all know what you was doing.
I'll show you stars!
Take this!
Ha ha ha!
Wait!
Good shot, buddy.
I--I-- what I'm doing in here is private!
Oh, man.
Back then I was so self-conscious about my body.
You know, Frylock wanted to fix that hole, but I said no.
And now I like it when people watch.
I still can't figure out what you're doing with yourself.
Yeah.
So, what's up with you?
We don't ever just talk anymore.
What is up with me?
Well...
I got me a leaf-mulcher.
Really?
That's interesting.
Yeah.
And, you know...
It comes with the warranty and it's got 3 different, you know, setting on it.
Yeah, yeah.
You know, I can't got no money for gas.
I spent pretty much all the money on the leaf-mulcher.
Phew!
Don't talk to me about gas.
So, yeah.
Probably gonna have to sell the leaf-mulcher.
Yeah.
Hey, remember when the core of the earth was melting and it started messing with the gravitational pull, you know, and we was all, like, flying upward.
And I called the president, and
I says, "the core is melting.
We gots to do something about it!"
Yeah!
You know, and he says,
"we're on it."
You remember that?
Yeah, I remember it.
Yeah, me, too.
Hey.
How 'bout that time "playboy"
called me.
What-boy?
The--the playboy.
He wanted me to go party at his mansion house, you know, 'cause he has too many girls and not enough guys.
Ha ha.
You know, he called me.
Remember?
No, Jimmy, I'm sorry--i'm counseling a youth camp today.
Yeah, doing some stuff with my church.
Thank you though.
Have a blessed day.
Remember...
Remember that date I went on with Farrah Fawcett?
And she said, "let's get nude, go to this hotel, and, like, do all this stuff."
And she starts, like, playing with me and starts, like, hugging on me.
I says, "no.
No, girl."
My shirt was on.
So, she dropped me off.
You know, you and I, we've made a lot of sacrifices over the years.
And if it wasn't for us, some people would not be where they are today.
That sucked about Farrah
Fawcett, by the way.
Remember when I saved both y'all's asses?
Oh!
Oh, right.
When?
Name one time!
Once!
?
Party, party, party
I want to have a party ?
He needs medical attention.
I guess I'm satisfied then.
Breathe, damn it!
?
Party, party, party party, party, party the party's getting started and this is how we party all he does is party party, party, party ?
Wait, no!
Those are awesome!
Fine.
I'm not spinning.
Don't touch me.
You son of a--
No, Shake!
Take him out.
Wait, no!
Hello!
There we go.
Oh, ok.
Ok, fine!
Aagh!
Excuse me!
Oh, no!
Aagh!
Aagh!
Come on, let's go!
Well...
You put that whole thing to rock music, huh?
That never happened.
You clearly altered this.
Oh, you think I did, huh?
Yes.
And I'm beginning to think that you moved me where you were.
Oh, really?
I've seen you with that computer...
That I--that I bought!
Remember when I bought you that computer?
But this one is only 199.
I mean, it has everything I need.
Oh, come on.
This is the one!
And it's only 3,099!
We can't afford that.
You can't afford not to have this.
Listen, I will afford it for you because I want you to have it better than I had it...
Right now.
I don't know how we're gonna pay for this.
That's for me to worry about.
And remember when I got the bill?
No, I sure don't.
Where the hell is Shake?
!
He says, "i'm moving to
Mexico till all this bill business chills out."
I have never said that.
I've never even said those words.
Oh, really?
I'm going to Mexico until all this bill business chills out.
You can't prove that I said that.
Oh, yeah?
Well, what do you think of this?
I'm going to Mexico until all this bill business chills out.
I have hidden cameras everywhere.
Uh...
F.Y.I., I was in Jericho growing pasta for poor children.
Just how much I think of myself, you couldn't get a dog to do that.
Hey, you guys remember when I got my first pubic hair?
In that restaurant?
Hey, y'all, check it out!
Look what came with my wings!
Ew!
Yeah!
Don't touch that!
And I've been collecting them ever since.
Here, Frylock.
I made you this.
It's a shirt.
100% pubic--
Uh, yeah.
Uh, ha.
Thanks.
I figured you to be a large, but I went extra-large 'cause I know it's gonna shrink in the wash.
That's right.
I want you to wash this with the rest of your clothes.
You know who would like that,
Meatwad?
Carl.
Yeah, Carl would really appreciate that shirt.
How could you tell if he had it on?
Carl, what's up?
!
Nothing.
And why you calling me here?
I made you a shirt, man.
Oh, wow.
How thoughtful.
You know what?
I made you a shirt, too!
But, see, without the "r" part.
Ha ha ha ha.
Get it?
I made you a shirt.
Ha ha ha ha ha!
Come get it before it sinks.
Had a lot of meat last night.
Ha ha ha ha ha ha.
Y'all,
Carl's crazy.
Hey, Carl.
Come on over and hang out.
Just kicking back in the crib, talking about the good old days, you know?
There's fellowship.
We got some tap water.
Got that all day.
And Tera Patrick.
No, there's no way
I'm coming over.
Tera!
What is in it for me?
You know...
You da man!
Tell him Tera Patrick's here.
Oh, yeah.
And Terry Patrick.
Tara!
Oh, oh!
Tara.
Tara Patrick.
Oh, yeah.
Oh, what, on your computer?
No, Carl!
In real life.
Oh.
Ok.
She's right here.
The porn star.
Right.
Yeah, the porn star, man.
All right, smart guy.
You got Tara Patrick over there, what's tattooed on uh...
Well, you know, in her uterus?
Hey, what's tattooed on your uterus?
A unicorn making love to a
Keebler Elf.
Tara?
Hey, is that you?
!
Is that you, Tara?
!
I love to meet all my fans.
Come on over and party with me.
Oh, man!
I've seen all your pictorals!
You are one of the most beautiful women in the world...
You know, spread eagle.
Tara, give me the phone.
How'd you get her to come over there?
We just called her.
You ever hear of the telephone?
Ok, ok.
Just keep her there.
Hang on.
I--I--I--
I gotta get some dvds together for her to sign!
Oh, I'm so excited!
You think he knows why we really want him to come over here?
He don't need to know nothing.
Hey, guys.
Remember when me and you, and
Meatwad-- what, Tara?
What?
!
Shut up!
You--it's just you're so mouthy.
All I see is lips moving, stories that go nowhere.
Will you please just keep eating your corndog.
Mmm!
I like to party with you.
Oh, hi.
Excuse me.
Get out of my way.
My name's Dan from Grim Reaper Gutters.
I won't leave until I make a sale.
Yeah, well, my--my gutters are fine there.
Thanks.
So...
Get lost, g.
Really?
Are you sure?
Yeah, I'm looking at 'em right now, and they're...
They're there.
So, get lost.
Tara!
Have you seen our clog-free system?
It safely routes roof run-off, leaves, and debris away from the home while tastefully accenting your roofline and soffits.
Look, man, I--
I told you no.
I don't know how many times I can say it.
Ok.
But, you know, top soil can erode from every run-off.
Well, you know what?
It's not even an issue because I'm gonna pave my yard tomorrow, ok?
Tara!
Oh, listen.
There's no need to do that.
Why is this door locked?
Tara!
It's a free estimate.
Hey, the door is locked!
We can have our factory trained professional over here tomorrow to take a look at it.
I said no!
Ok.
Whoa!
Oh, dang!
He killed Carl!
Yeah, but did he leave?
No!
Haven't you seen their commercial.
They won't leave until they make a sale.
My name's Dan from Grim Reaper Gutters.
I won't leave until I make a sale.
Have you seen our clog-free system?
It safely routes roof run-off, leaves, and debris away from the home while tastefully accenting your roofline and soffits...
Frylock, where are you going?
!
I guess I'm going to buy some damn gutters!
Well, he sold me the ultimate preemptive gutter.
It incinerates all leaves off the trees before they even get to your roof.
It also incinerates seeds before they can even become trees.
Wow.
And this box carbonates and flavors your rainwater-- not that you might want to, you know, drink it.
Where's Dan from Grim Reaper
Gutters?
I want to party with him.
He says he's coming back tomorrow.
Sell us a bridge in New York.
Ha ha ha ha.
There ain't no bridges in New York.
That's the joke!
I said--I said there ain't no bridges in New York!
Uh, Meatwad...
Where...
Where'd you find that?
What does that matter?
None of that matters now.
Wait, wait, wait, wait!
No, no!
F-finger puppets f-f-f-finger puppets f-finger puppets f-f-f-finger puppets f-f-finger puppets
My name is Shake-Zula
The Mike Ruler
The Old Schooler
You want to trip?
I'll bring it to ya.
Frylock and I'm on top rock you like a cop.
Meatwad, you're up next with your knock-knock.
Meatwad make the money see?
Meatwad get the honeys, g.
Driving in my car living like a star ice on my fingers and my toes and I'm a Taurus.
Uh, check-check it, yeah.
'Cause we are the Aqua Teens make the homeys say ho and the girlies want to scream.
'Cause we are the Aqua Teens make the homeys say ho and the girlies want to scream ?
Aqua Teen Hunger Force.
Number One in the hood, g.
I'm gonna do it.
Ha ha.
You--you so flinched when I did that.
Yeah.
You would jump!
Oh, yeah.
And then I'd hit you with the arrow and you'd cry your little eyes out.
Yeah.
That was fun.
Ha ha ha ha ha.
Good times.
Ha.
I remember that one time you's in the bathroom with that magazine, 'cepting we ain't got no bathroom.
So, you know, ha-- we all know what you was doing.
I'll show you stars!
Take this!
Ha ha ha!
Wait!
Good shot, buddy.
I--I-- what I'm doing in here is private!
Oh, man.
Back then I was so self-conscious about my body.
You know, Frylock wanted to fix that hole, but I said no.
And now I like it when people watch.
I still can't figure out what you're doing with yourself.
Yeah.
So, what's up with you?
We don't ever just talk anymore.
What is up with me?
Well...
I got me a leaf-mulcher.
Really?
That's interesting.
Yeah.
And, you know...
It comes with the warranty and it's got 3 different, you know, setting on it.
Yeah, yeah.
You know, I can't got no money for gas.
I spent pretty much all the money on the leaf-mulcher.
Phew!
Don't talk to me about gas.
So, yeah.
Probably gonna have to sell the leaf-mulcher.
Yeah.
Hey, remember when the core of the earth was melting and it started messing with the gravitational pull, you know, and we was all, like, flying upward.
And I called the president, and
I says, "the core is melting.
We gots to do something about it!"
Yeah!
You know, and he says,
"we're on it."
You remember that?
Yeah, I remember it.
Yeah, me, too.
Hey.
How 'bout that time "playboy"
called me.
What-boy?
The--the playboy.
He wanted me to go party at his mansion house, you know, 'cause he has too many girls and not enough guys.
Ha ha.
You know, he called me.
Remember?
No, Jimmy, I'm sorry--i'm counseling a youth camp today.
Yeah, doing some stuff with my church.
Thank you though.
Have a blessed day.
Remember...
Remember that date I went on with Farrah Fawcett?
And she said, "let's get nude, go to this hotel, and, like, do all this stuff."
And she starts, like, playing with me and starts, like, hugging on me.
I says, "no.
No, girl."
My shirt was on.
So, she dropped me off.
You know, you and I, we've made a lot of sacrifices over the years.
And if it wasn't for us, some people would not be where they are today.
That sucked about Farrah
Fawcett, by the way.
Remember when I saved both y'all's asses?
Oh!
Oh, right.
When?
Name one time!
Once!
?
Party, party, party
I want to have a party ?
He needs medical attention.
I guess I'm satisfied then.
Breathe, damn it!
[coughing]
?
Party, party, party party, party, party the party's getting started and this is how we party all he does is party party, party, party ?
Wait, no!
Those are awesome!
[grunts]
Fine.
I'm not spinning.
Don't touch me.
You son of a--
No, Shake!
Take him out.
Wait, no!
Hello!
?
Get this party started ?
There we go.
Oh, ok.
Ok, fine!
?
Stay ?
Aagh!
Excuse me!
Oh, no!
Aagh!
Aagh!
Come on, let's go!
Well...
You put that whole thing to rock music, huh?
That never happened.
You clearly altered this.
Oh, you think I did, huh?
Yes.
And I'm beginning to think that you moved me where you were.
Oh, really?
I've seen you with that computer...
That I--that I bought!
Remember when I bought you that computer?
But this one is only 199.
I mean, it has everything I need.
Oh, come on.
This is the one!
And it's only 3,099!
We can't afford that.
You can't afford not to have this.
Listen, I will afford it for you because I want you to have it better than I had it...
Right now.
I don't know how we're gonna pay for this.
That's for me to worry about.
And remember when I got the bill?
No, I sure don't.
Where the hell is Shake?
!
He says, "i'm moving to
Mexico till all this bill business chills out."
I have never said that.
I've never even said those words.
Oh, really?
I'm going to Mexico until all this bill business chills out.
You can't prove that I said that.
Oh, yeah?
Well, what do you think of this?
I'm going to Mexico until all this bill business chills out.
I have hidden cameras everywhere.
Uh...
F.Y.I., I was in Jericho growing pasta for poor children.
Just how much I think of myself, you couldn't get a dog to do that.
Hey, you guys remember when I got my first pubic hair?
In that restaurant?
Hey, y'all, check it out!
Look what came with my wings!
Ew!
Yeah!
Don't touch that!
And I've been collecting them ever since.
Here, Frylock.
I made you this.
It's a shirt.
100% pubic--
Uh, yeah.
Uh, ha.
Thanks.
I figured you to be a large, but I went extra-large 'cause I know it's gonna shrink in the wash.
That's right.
I want you to wash this with the rest of your clothes.
You know who would like that,
Meatwad?
Carl.
Yeah, Carl would really appreciate that shirt.
How could you tell if he had it on?
Carl, what's up?
!
Nothing.
And why you calling me here?
I made you a shirt, man.
Oh, wow.
How thoughtful.
You know what?
I made you a shirt, too!
But, see, without the "r" part.
Ha ha ha ha.
Get it?
I made you a shirt.
Ha ha ha ha ha!
Come get it before it sinks.
[toilet flushes]
Had a lot of meat last night.
Ha ha ha ha ha ha.
Y'all,
Carl's crazy.
Hey, Carl.
Come on over and hang out.
Just kicking back in the crib, talking about the good old days, you know?
There's fellowship.
We got some tap water.
Got that all day.
And Tera Patrick.
No, there's no way
I'm coming over.
Tera!
What is in it for me?
You know...
You da man!
Tell him Tera Patrick's here.
Oh, yeah.
And Terry Patrick.
Tara!
Oh, oh!
Tara.
Tara Patrick.
Oh, yeah.
Oh, what, on your computer?
No, Carl!
In real life.
Oh.
Ok.
She's right here.
The porn star.
Right.
Yeah, the porn star, man.
All right, smart guy.
You got Tara Patrick over there, what's tattooed on uh...
Well, you know, in her uterus?
Hey, what's tattooed on your uterus?
A unicorn making love to a
Keebler Elf.
Tara?
Hey, is that you?
!
Is that you, Tara?
!
I love to meet all my fans.
Come on over and party with me.
Oh, man!
I've seen all your pictorals!
You are one of the most beautiful women in the world...
You know, spread eagle.
Tara, give me the phone.
How'd you get her to come over there?
We just called her.
You ever hear of the telephone?
Ok, ok.
Just keep her there.
Hang on.
I--I--I--
I gotta get some dvds together for her to sign!
Oh, I'm so excited!
[dial tone]
You think he knows why we really want him to come over here?
He don't need to know nothing.
[wolf howls]
Hey, guys.
Remember when me and you, and
Meatwad-- what, Tara?
What?
!
Shut up!
You--it's just you're so mouthy.
All I see is lips moving, stories that go nowhere.
Will you please just keep eating your corndog.
Mmm!
I like to party with you.
Oh, hi.
Excuse me.
Get out of my way.
My name's Dan from Grim Reaper Gutters.
I won't leave until I make a sale.
Yeah, well, my--my gutters are fine there.
Thanks.
So...
Get lost, g.
Really?
Are you sure?
Yeah, I'm looking at 'em right now, and they're...
They're there.
So, get lost.
Tara!
Have you seen our clog-free system?
It safely routes roof run-off, leaves, and debris away from the home while tastefully accenting your roofline and soffits.
Look, man, I--
I told you no.
I don't know how many times I can say it.
Ok.
But, you know, top soil can erode from every run-off.
Well, you know what?
It's not even an issue because I'm gonna pave my yard tomorrow, ok?
Tara!
Oh, listen.
There's no need to do that.
Why is this door locked?
Tara!
It's a free estimate.
Hey, the door is locked!
We can have our factory trained professional over here tomorrow to take a look at it.
I said no!
[sighs]
Ok.
Whoa!
Oh, dang!
He killed Carl!
Yeah, but did he leave?
No!
Haven't you seen their commercial.
They won't leave until they make a sale.
My name's Dan from Grim Reaper Gutters.
I won't leave until I make a sale.
Have you seen our clog-free system?
It safely routes roof run-off, leaves, and debris away from the home while tastefully accenting your roofline and soffits...
Frylock, where are you going?
!
I guess I'm going to buy some [bleep] damn gutters!
Well, he sold me the ultimate preemptive gutter.
It incinerates all leaves off the trees before they even get to your roof.
It also incinerates seeds before they can even become trees.
Wow.
And this box carbonates and flavors your rainwater-- not that you might want to, you know, drink it.
Where's Dan from Grim Reaper
Gutters?
I want to party with him.
He says he's coming back tomorrow.
Sell us a bridge in New York.
Ha ha ha ha.
There ain't no bridges in New York.
That's the joke!
I said--I said there ain't no bridges in New York!
[cocks trigger]
Uh, Meatwad...
Where...
Where'd you find that?
What does that matter?
None of that matters now.
Wait, wait, wait, wait!
No, no!
F-finger puppets f-f-f-finger puppets f-finger puppets f-f-f-finger puppets f-f-finger puppets
[Screaming]
[Whistling]
♪♪ la, la, la, la ♪♪
[Doorbell rings]
Mail call!
What the heck are these?
Eh, just a few more copyright infringement letters.
E!
I'll take thos
♪♪ do-Dee-Do, do , do-Dee-Doot ♪♪
[Shredding]
And a letter for...
ling-Ling.
Hi-Ya!
Man: ♪♪ ling-Ling into bat-- ♪♪
Yay!
[Speaking foreign language]
What's that troiental saying?
I can't read it.
Something about an all-New daily show.
I do like that jon stewart.
Hey, would you guys mind signing
For your neighbor's package?
Someone finally bought that house, huh?
Yeah.
Some greeks moved in.
Did you hear that?
Greeks!
Next door!
Back in college i would have joined a fraternity
If not for one small incident.
So, you're the president of the fraternity, huh?
Yeah-- Yah!
[Gurgles]
I guess i'm the president now!
Actually, as vice president
I'm the new president.
Oh!
Later, you gay independents.
I'm gonna rush me a frat.
[Glass shatters]
I think the mailman meant
An immigrant family from greece moved in,
Not a fraternity.
And that wasn't a roofie, captain hero.
That was a tic-Tac.
Are you guys going to fuck me or not?
[Speaking foreign language]
Oh, nothing bring me joy.
I too old to battle,
And my cataract make karaoke impossible.
[Tequilaplaying]
Uh...
Ohh...
You should be happy, ling-Ling.
After jun-Jee die,
You inherit his billions!
Move in with shameful son?
Ha!
Oh, i do like jon stewart, son.
Ok, i move into ill-Defined parody house with you.
Yeah!
Hello!
My name is captain hero.
I just wanted to introduce myself and tell you that
You guys have the most awesome house!
Oh, yes, well, thank you.
We are very happy here.
Listen, we are just sitting down to dinner,
So, uh, thank you for the stopping by.
Dude, i am total pledge material!
Excuse me-- Why, did you fart?
[Laughs and flatulates]
[Woman gasps] oh!
Social!
[Gasps]
[Cat howls] [tequilaplaying]
[All whimpering]
[Gulps]
Will you be my big brother?
Party foul.
Dead arm!
Aah!
[Belches and retches
Dude, i snarfed!
That should be my pledge name.
Snarf!
Ooh, let's play ooky pita!
Snarf go first.
Please, scary man, get out of our house
And never come back.
What?
You don't want me in your house?
Just please do leave us.
[Sobbing]
[Glass breaks] [sheep bleats]
I wish i was dead.
Oh, look!
Another sick parent.
Just stack him in the corner with the rest of them.
[Flies buzzing]
Hey, foxxy.
When are you gonna contribute to the parent pile?
When my daddy get back from buyin' them cigarettes.
[Beeping]
Cameras everywhere,
Obscure cartoon characters,
Smells like urine.
This just like tokyo disneyland!
[Sighs]
You are great embarrassment to family name.
I am ashamed to call you
Ling-Ling hitler bin laden seacrest.
[Grumbling]
Oh!
[Flies buzzing]
[Munching sounds]
Oh!
Who the hiroshima is that?
Oh, jun-Jee wouldn't mind sweeping that leg chubby.
Cannonball!
[Both whimpering]
Oh, i am such a loser!
Oh, sweetie,
I know it never feels good to be rejected.
Even when it's by an immigrant greek family
That you've mistaken for a college frat.
I know, but i still don't get
Why they didn't want me as a pledge.
Maybe i didn't showcase all my positive attributes,
Like my ability to spot a toupee.
There's one!
[Screaming]
You don't need them, captain hero.
You've got all the friends you need right here.
You're right, xandir.
I don't need their fraternity
If i start my own!
Oh, fuck me.
Here's to starting the biggest, bestest,
Drunkiest driviest, vehicular manslaughteriest
Get-Off-With-A-Slap- On-The-Wrist-
Because-Our-Dads are-The-Richiest
Fraternity on campus.
[Glass shatters]
That wasn't a roofie, captain hero.
It was some candy made by willy wonka.
[Plays flute]
Men:
♪♪ goofy roofies, buggery-Boo ♪♪
Captain hero:
line up!
You maggots are the worst pledges
In the history of this fraternity.
Both:
sir, sorry, sir!
Thousands of committed brothers
Have passed through these doors.
Look at them.
Look at them!
Both:
sir, looking, sir.
They were all like family to me.
Well, except one.
Now drop and give me 20 plies!
Both:
sir, yes, sir!
Now, pledges, as you know,
We are the coolest fraternity on campus.
But the fraternity next door
Thinks they're even cooler than us.
Should we let them get away with that?
Both:
sir, no, sir!
Then let's teach those assholes a lesson.
Charge!
[Screaming]
[Cyndi lauper performing girls just want to have fun]
[All giggling] good one!
[Glass shatters] [both gasp]
[Screams] panty raid!
♪♪ i come home in the morning light ♪♪
♪♪ my mother says when ♪♪
♪♪ you gonna live your life right ♪♪
Âª ♪♪ oh, mother dear, we're not the fortunate ones âª
♪♪ and girls, they want to have fun ♪♪
[Screaming]
♪♪ oh, girls-- ♪♪ yee-Haw!
Ai-Yi-Yi-Yi-Yi!
[Southern accent] your kind ain't welcome here no more.
Hello, 9-1-1?
This is the georgiopoulos hous--
No, we're not taking anymore pledges.
Will you please just send someone over?
♪♪ in your loud eyes ♪♪ ♪♪ eyes ♪♪
♪♪i feel the heat ♪♪ ♪♪ brown eyes ♪♪
♪♪of tiny feet... ♪♪
Oh, toot-San, you have stolen my heart.
I'm not that fat, old man!
[Growls]
[Grunts]
[Screams]
Excuse me!
Pardon me!
[Both grunting]
Pardon me!
[Grunts]
[Sizzles]
[Gurgles]
Ohh...
But she have such beautiful, tiny feet.
There must be something a beauty like that would want
From an old, dying,
Prone-To-Changing-His-Will billionaire like me.
Billionaire!
[Gasps]
Why didn't you just say so?
Interested in sticking your john mccain
Into my hanoi hilton?
[Both grunting]
[Slurping]
These invites will get you 2 sweet things
To the front of the line for tonight's party.
Clothing is totally optional.
Ha ha ha ha!
[Doorbell rings]
Ooh, that's probably my uncle with the keg!
Mr. Hero, your new neighbors have issued
A restraining order against you,
Some queer in a peter pan outfit,
And a talking banana.
[Screams]
Shenanigans like that
Will get us kicked off campus.
You two are gone!
But where will the fraternity get its potassium?
Those dildos next door went to the dean.
They're trying to make us even lamer
Than that lame frat down the street!
Do a keg stand, mishe!
All: mishe!
Mishe!
Mishe!
We're not going to let them destroy us,
Are we, plebes?
Both:
sir, never, sir!
And to prove it, xandir,
Lock yourself in the trunk of a car
With this bottle of whiskey,
And don't come out until it's empty.
Sir, yes, sir!
And wooldoor, you tie one end of this rope
Around your penis,
And the other around this brick,
And then throw it over the balcony.
Sir, thank you for making my wish come true, sir!
There goes one brave kid.
Captain hero narrating:
now that the pledges
Were showing some real house pride,
It was time to get our revenge
On our rival fraternity
With the greatest prank of them all.
We shall steal their mascot!
[Thunder]
Wooldoor:
[screaming]
It's not so bad.
Stop screwing around, plebe.
Ugh!
[Groans and whimpers]
We have got a mascot to steal.
If we do this,
I will have accomplished almost every goal
I have ever set for myself.
Bathroom, camels, goat...
And the sek-Us.
[Slams]
[Grunts]
Ha!
Man alive!
That is one hairy goat!
Sir, i think that might not be a goat at all.
It looks more like a little girl, sir.
Oh, you are such a freshman.
Why would a fraternity have a little girl as a mascot?
3 demerits!
[Grunts]
Pledge, xandir, you can tell
She's a goat, right?
[Indistinct shouting and banging]
Oh, yes.
She's a goat all right.
[Speaking greek]
[Muffled grunting]
This will be the greatest fraternity prank ever!
Hyah!
[Wooldoor grunting]
Hey!
Who i sleep with is my business!
Ahd getting you the best deal
On a new or used chevy is his business!
[Horse whinnies] yee-Haw!
Maybe we should just try to get along.
I would suggest you start kissing my ass.
After all,
I am gonna be your new mother.
[Screams]
[Birds clamor]
Oh, did i mention i have a fat ass?
[Flatulence]
[Sobbing]
Ma'am,
I know this is difficult.
But do you remember anything
About the sandwich i asked you to make for me?
Huh?
Oh, this is going way better
Than i expected.
[Doorbell rings]
[Snickering]
Hello, campus security.
Can i help you?
Yes, i don't know if you've heard,
But little georgina's been abducted.
Ha ha!
The goat's name is georgina.
That is so gay!
Perhaps being a super hero who lives right next door,
You've noticed someone suspicious in the area?
Oh, no, sir.
We haven't seen any baa-D guys around here.
[Both laugh]
Well, if you happen to see anything,
Let us know.
Both: phi alpha gamma!
Phi alpha gamma!
We're really good
At thinking of chants!
Uh...
um...
Uh...
uh...
Both: ok, not that good.
Wait, i've got one!
No, that's stupid.
Man: i now pronounce you
Husband and wife.
You may now roll the bride's fat face in flour
And kiss the wet spot.
Ooh!
Ooh!
Spot.
[Grunts]
[Cheering] no!
[Chuckling]
Oh, pardon me,
Schmucky woman starting to sell real estate
In a desperate attempt to create a career for herself
Way too late in life
Because her husband dumped her sorry ass,
But did our neighbors move?
I'm afraid so.
Huzzah!
[Indistinct]
I guess after their daughter was kidnapped,
Never to be found,
They gave up on their american dream
And moved back to greece.
Daughter?
Kidnapped and...
Wait a second.
Wait a second!
So, she's the daughter of a greek family,
Not the goat mascot of a greek fraternity.
[Laughs] doesn't this beat all?
!
Come on.
Talk about embarrassing.
Oh, xandir's not gonna believe this!
[Flies buzzing]
Oh, my god.
[Retches]
Sir!
You're a fucking idiot, sir!
[Grunts]
Stanley?
Sorry, barbara.
I need someone who makes me feel passion,
Not just some desperate middle-Aged hag.
You want to join us in here?
Oh, stanley.
This is the best i deserve.
[Dog barking]
Hey, sugar pie!
[Yelps]
Toot braunstein,
We have this court order to stop you
From spending the jun-Jee's money.
Hey, i'm no slut!
I earned this money!
I've been letting jun-Jee ram his tank into my tiananmen square!
Sadly, he always ignores the little student.
No, it's my money!
It's my money!
It's my money!
Silence!
Toot: husband!
How long have you been standing there?
Long enough.
Ling-Ling, you do not deserve inheritance.
And you, toot, you no love jun-Jee.
You just marry me for money.
So, jun-Jee decide no one get his fortune.
Yoko ono!
Yoo-Hoo ho ho!
Jun-Jee spend it all
On only dream jun-Jee have left:
I buy ticket on space shuttle to moon!
Peace out, y'all!
Say, herb, did you get your nose straightened?
.
Yeah, now nobody can tell i'm a jew
[Canned laughter]
Captain hero: so, i guess as it turns out,
You're not actually a goat.
Foxxy gots to keep a closer eye on you retards.
I know, i know.
This is totally the kind of crap
That makes you lose your charter.
Well, i learned my lesson.
Kids, don't do something you know is wrong
Just to be accepted into some cool club.
And i guess i have learned
That not everything with hair on it
Is a goat.
Which would mean...
That's right, captain hero!
Your leg is not a goat.
[Goat bleats]
What do we do with little georgina?
We got to get her back to her family.
We gots to go to greece!
Both: road trip!
Off the weave, ho!
Captain hero narrating:
and so, we began our journey to greece
To reunite yet another war-Torn family.
I had always dreamed of going to greece.
I only hoped it was as beautiful as it looked in the movies.
[All gasp]
[All scatting]
Wow!
Grease!
It's amazing.
It's beautiful!
It's the word!
Come on, ling-Ling.
We have to go to nasa and stop your father.
We can't let him give away all my money!
[Sighs]
Please?
I can't get there alone.
I need someone to hold the stick
With the ho ho in front of me.
Dude, your money.
I would go.
Don't leave.
He'll kill me.
You want half my ho ho?
!
I should kill you where you stand!
Ok.
That's fai r.
Let's go.
Hey!
You have to shake it a little.
My eyes are attracted to motion.
[Cowbell clanks] [grunting]
[Imitates chimpanzee]
[Gunshot]
First, jun-Jee check control panel.
Yes.
It looks like everything set
To go straight ahead into space.
Jun-Jee ready for launch.
Announcer: t-Minus two minutes to raunch.
[Grunting]
Honey, this is no way to spend my money!
It not your money.
And trip to moon make jun-Jee happy.
You're right.
There is always something better
Coming up next.
I don't need to blow fortune
On trip to moon.
Besides, space turns asians into queers.
That only explanation for george takei.
Let's go, number one son.
Announcer: t-Minus 11...
[grunting] 10...
wait!
9, 8...
help!
I'm stuck!
I'm stuck!
6, 5... 4, 3...
god damn it!
2, 1...
[cowbell clanks]
[Transporter hums]
Oh, my!
Oh, my yourself!
Ooh!
Oh, there go mr.
Georgiopoulos
With them pink ladies.
Sir, you are just gonna laugh
When you hear what happened.
Georgina?
!
Is that you?
!
Daaa-D!
Oh, my sweet, sweet daughter!
Oh, thank you, mighty thor!
[Thunder]
Once again, captain hero has saved the day!
Honey, did that man hurt you?
Did he touch you?
Teen: hey, ho!
?
Like, what the hell did you do to george's kid
Greased lightning!
Sandy!
Whoa.
♪♪ fraternity pledging ♪♪
♪♪ had me a blast ♪♪
♪♪ i was sleeping ♪♪
♪♪ ♪♪ happened so fast
♪♪ i grabbed the goat ♪♪
♪♪ and ran for my life ♪♪
♪♪ i tried to scream ♪♪
♪♪ but he had a knife ♪♪
Both: ♪♪ kidnapping ♪♪
♪♪ oh, what a fling ♪♪
♪♪ whoa, yeah, those pledging days ♪♪
Women: ♪♪ tell us what happened next ♪♪
Men: ♪♪ did you tie her up in chains?
♪♪
♪♪ did he have a big stick?
♪♪
♪♪ did you slap her around?
♪♪
♪♪ did he make you suck his ♪♪
♪♪ big balls ♪♪ ♪♪ shooby-Do wop ♪♪
♪♪ oh, yeah ♪♪ ♪♪ do-Wop ♪♪
♪♪ mother-Freaking balls ♪♪
Both: ♪♪ kidnapping ♪♪
♪♪ oh, what a fling ♪♪
♪♪ whoa, yeah ♪♪
♪♪ those pledging--Ahh ♪♪
♪♪ days ♪♪
[Toot screams]
[Beeping]
[SCREAMS]
[GRUNTS]
[GROWLING]
[DISH CLATTERS]
Hmm.
[DISH CLATTERS]
[SNIFFS]
[PANTING]
[SIGHS]
[GRUNTING]
[CRASH]
[TWO SHOES SNORING]
TWO SHOES:
Huh?
W-What?
Thomas.
Get out of my room, you crazy cat.
[IMITATING SHIP FLYING]
[IMITATING EXPLOSION]
[WHIMPERING]
[GRUNTING]
TWO SHOES:
Go back downstairs, Thomas.
[GASPS]
[SCREAMS]
[TWO SHOES GASPING]
TWO SHOES:
Thomas!
[TWO SHOES GRUNTING]
Get off me.
Don't tell me you're afraid of that little mouse.
Has your pea brain dropped right out of your soft little head?
Heavens, this cat's off his nut.
[CRASH]
[GRUNTS]
[SCREAMS]
[SCREAMS]
[BUTTONS BEEPING]
TWO SHOES:
close the door, Thomas.
You'II let the weirdoes in.
VAN HELSING:
Come, Thomas, there's much work to be done.
VAN HELSING:
Be careful with my monster-hunting equipment.
[TOM GRUNTS]
[BELL RINGS]
BELLHOP:
V-
- V-
- Van helsing.
The famous monster hunter.
What are you doing here at the monster convention?
VAN HELSING:
Business and pleasure.
[GRUNTS]
[BELLHOP YELLING]
BELLHOP:
I'm going to get you, Van helsing.
VAN HELSING:
Hmm.
Thomas, I forgot my silver werewolf trap.
Take the luggage upstairs.
Guard my equipment.
I'II be back before midnight.
[GRUNTS]
welcome to Monster Con. I am the count.
As one of the first guests to arrive, allow me to get your ID badge and to say--
[SCREAMS]
Fine, get your own badge.
[GROWLS]
[GROWLS]
[BARKS]
Hi, I'm Jasper, the social ghost.
Wanna be my friend?
JASPER:
Guess not.
ALL:
What the--?
Hey, pal, we got this room till 3:30.
Yeah, the sign-up sheet is outside.
Uh-oh.
Is that a ghost vac?
Oh, how rude.
I don't wanna go.
I don't wanna go.
[GHOSTS GRUNTING]
GHOST:
help.
help.
[GRUNTS]
[BELL RINGING]
MUMMY:
hello?
hello?
Me love Monster Con.
[GRUNTING]
Mummy outfit ruined.
Me go home now.
Never win costume contest.
[DOOR OPENS]
[WHISTLES]
[GROWLING]
[TOM SCREAMS]
[GRUNTING]
[HOWLING]
[GROWLING]
[CHUCKLES]
[HORSE WHINNIES]
VAN HELSING:
What's going on here?
My word.
Is that a werewolf cat?
-Huh?
-I've never trapped one of those before.
I'II add it to my collection.
[SCREAMS]
[MONSTER GRUNTS]
[ENGINE SPUTTERING]
Ah.
Battery bad.
Wha--?
No.
[ENGINE STARTS]
[MONSTER GRO ANING]
VAN HELSING:
I've got you in my sights, werewolf cat.
You can't escape from Van helsing.
[BIRDS CHIRPING]
[YAWNS]
[SNORING]
[TOM LAUGHING]
[SCREAMS]
[SCREAMING]
[YELLS]
[GRUNTS]
[MALE VOICE LAUGHING]
MALE VOICE:
So we got a pair of newcomers to the cursed forest.
finally, some entertainment.
Yeah, I got bat wings.
And it ain't polite to stare.
That's just the way things work around here.
Oh, boy, I guess I gotta explain.
You see, this is a cursed forest, and I'm, uh, sort of a bat now.
Listen, I don't make the rules, I just follow them.
And here's the main one:
Anytime somebody enters the forest, at Ieast one sucker has gotta stay behind.
But because there's two of you, only one has gotta stay.
Forever.
[CHUCKLES]
Yeah, that forever bit always gets them.
Hey, wait a minute.
If I get out of here first, I can leave.
[LAUGHS]
Uh, ahem.
Oh, hello.
You weren't supposed to hear that.
So long, suckers.
Nuts.
exploding nuts.
You ain't seen the Iast of me.
[THUD]
[WHIMPERING]
Like I said, one of us has gotta stay behind.
[GASPS]
The waterfall?
That's our ticket out of here.
Oh, I'm sorry, did I say "our"?
I meant my.
See you.
[GASPS]
[LAUGHING]
Yahoo!
I'm the first one out.
Hey, no wings.
Wait a minute, if I ain't got wings, I can't fly.
[GROWLS]
[ENGLISH SDH]
[TOM SNORING]
[GROWLS]
[LAUGHS]
[LAUGHING]
[BONES HIT TOM]
[SCREAMS]
[MIMICS CAR HORN]
[MO ANS]
bleh!
[SCREAMS]
[CHUCKLES]
[GRUNTS]
[DIRT BIKE APPRO ACHING]
[ENGINE REVVING]
[THUD]
[WHEEL SQUEAKING]
[FLIES BUZZING]
[CHOMPS]
[GULPS]
MAN:
Now, I hope the both of you realize that being a lifeguard is serious business.
The requirements are very demanding.
So keep that in mind, Droopy.
Oh, and you too, Tom.
always remember, a lifeguard must be alert.
What?
Where did everybody go?
A lifeguard must be swift.
Oh, dear.
And a lifeguard must be strong.
[DROOPY SPLASHES IN WATER]
I'm never going to get this job.
[LAUGHS]
Okay, boys.
Your first test will be diving from this high board.
Now, you'II be judged on style, form and grace.
My assistant, Miss shapely, will keep score.
She's very good at figures.
I shall go first.
[WHIRRING]
Oh, dear.
[DROOPY SNEEZES]
[LAUGHS]
DROOPY:
Oh, my.
Sports lovers, I'm ready.
Ta-da.
slight advantage, Droopy.
Your next test will be to swim across this debris-fiIIed pool over to Miss shapely on the other side.
Good luck.
I shall do my best to avoid each and every obstacle.
Who turned out the lights?
On your mark, get set, go.
[INHALES DEEPLY]
[INHALES DEEPLY]
[GROWLS]
GIug, glug, glug.
Ready, Droopy?
-Ready.
-On your mark.
Get set.
Go.
[BELCHES]
[GIGGLES]
Oh, I just can't make up my mind.
They're both excellent candidates.
So I want you to fake a "real emergency" so we can see how they respond.
Sounds smart.
help!
help!
Uh, save me.
help.
Whatever.
I'm out of here.
[STOMACH RUMBLING]
[MO ANS]
Stomach cramps.
Somebody didn't wait 20 minutes after eating before going in the water.
Hang on, Tom.
Everyone stand back.
I know just what to do.
One, two, three.
[SPUTTERING]
You know, I almost hope he doesn't wake up.
bleh!
Yuck.
That was some rescue, Droopy.
You get the job.
Remember, a clean pool is a safe pool.
[SLURPING]
DROOPY:
Keep scrubbing, Tom.
[GROWLS]
Oh, Thomas, I so enjoy the peaceful solitude of a camping trip.
MAN [ON RADIO] :
We interrupt this broadcast for a special report.
Bigfoot has been sighted in the vicinity of the Ootagootasolo Campground.
[CAMPERS SCREAMING]
TWO SHOES:
Bigfoot?
Ha!
What nonsense.
I don't believe in such things.
[HOWLING]
[HOWLS]
[HOWLS]
[CHUCKLES]
MAN [ON RADIO] :
Attention, campers.
The Zoological Society is offering a $ 1-million reward for conclusive proof of Bigfoot's existence.
SHELDON:
I'm down here.
Yeah, I know, there's not much inventory in the height department.
But the feet are gigantic.
The name's SheIdon.
Nice to meet you.
I don't introduce myself to many campers.
In fact, I hardly ever come down from the deep woods.
But I am starving.
No worries.
I won't eat you.
I'm strictly vegan.
Grew the fur myself.
Yikes!
Who's that?
I'II be captured and put in a zoo.
We gotta hide.
[WIND WHISTLES]
[SNIFFING]
Oh, no.
He's picked up my scent.
This guy is good.
bleh!
Okay, good, but not gifted.
We should still do something.
[WHISTLES]
[SNORING]
BEAR [YELLING] :
Quiet!
What's with all that racket?
I want quiet!
Don't you know what quiet is?
What are you, some kind of ignoramus?
Now, get out!
I hate noise!
I can't stand noise!
Bears are notoriously cranky during hibernation.
[THUMPING O VER HEADPHONES]
He can hear my big feet.
help.
help.
[HOWLS]
[HOWLS]
[HOWLS]
[ECHOES]
[SNAPPING]
[SCREAMS]
[JERRY HOWLING]
[PANTING]
[THUD]
Ouch.
Are you guys starving?
Because I am absolutely famished....
[STAMMERS]
Berries.
[CHOMPING]
Oops.
SHELDON:
Too high.
I'm down here.
[LAUGHING]
[SCREAMING]
[BUZZING]
[SCREAMS]
well, he won't be bothering me anymore.
And I got a bowl full of yummy berries.
Thanks, little friends.
Come back and visit.
TWO SHOES:
Thomas, is--?
Is that you?
I thought I heard a noise.
[TWO SHOES SCREAMS]
Oh, it's Bigfoot.
Save me!
TWO SHOES:
I wonder whatever happened to Tom.
No matter.
I can buy a whole house full of cats with $ 1 million.
[BEES BUZZING]
[ENGLISH SDH]
[THUD]
TWO SHOES:
That's right, Thomas you show those pesky birds who's boss.
We've worked too hard on this summer garden to have it ransacked by riffraff.
Up, up.
Now, Iet's see how my prizewinning peas are progressing.
[TWO SHOES SCREAMS]
Do you see that, Thomas?
Something's been nibbling my pea pods.
No, sirree, we won't have any of that.
And you, Thomas, are gonna make sure of it.
That's right, you.
You're gonna stand guard and keep this garden free of pests and poachers.
Do you understand me, Thomas?
Good.
Nobody's gonna mess with my garden.
[BELLOWS PUFFING]
[SQUEAKING]
[WHISTLING]
[SPLATS]
[THUD]
Huh?
[CHUCKLES]
JERRY:
Yoo-hoo!
[BLOWS RASPBERRY]
[GROWLS]
[CHOMPING]
[SIZZLES]
[GULPING]
[SCREAMS]
[CRASHING]
[TWO SHOES SCREAMS]
TWO SHOES:
Thomas!
What in the name of the heavenly harvest is going on here?
Just look at my prizewinning tomatoes.
This is horrible.
[TWO SHOES SCREAMS]
My precious corn my beloved crops.
You good-for-nothing garden guardian.
I know just the thing to keep you out of trouble and still do your job.
[CAR HORNS HONKING]
[BLOWS RASPBERRY]
[PANTING]
[MO ANS]
What a tired, old cat-and-mouse routine.
Hey, tomcat.
Ain't you tired of never catching that stinking mouse?
problem is, you're going about catching mice all wrong.
You got no discipline, no game plan, no dignity.
What you need, brother, is to join me and the League of Cats.
The League of Cats is a super-secret society.
Like, we got each other's backs, man.
Sign this card and you're in.
Attaboy.
[CHUCKLES]
Now, the quick initiation process.
And welcome to the club.
Come to our secret meeting tonight.
[WHISPERING] It's at....
[BUTCH SPEAKING INDISTINCTLY]
Now, listen up.
This is a mouse.
[GROWLS]
BUTCH:
No, no, a picture of a mouse.
This is a cat.
[CATS LAUGH AND CHEER]
BUTCH:
Now, this is the oId-fashioned way of catching a mouse.
The problem: the little guy just runs cycles around the likes of us cats.
This way and that way, over hill and dale, backwards and forwards.
It's enough to make you sick.
Now then same mouse same cat.
only this time, the cat whistles for help from the league.
[WHISTLES]
By following this simple tactic, we'II catch us more mice with less work.
This place'II be loaded with mice.
We'II all be fat cats.
[BUTCH CHUCKLES]
So the next time one of youse cats corners a mouse, just whistle.
-Got it?
CATS:
Got it.
[CLEARS THRO AT]
[WHISTLES]
[WHISTLES]
[ALL PANTING]
You let him get away.
It wasn't me, it was him.
[CHUCKLES]
Okay, so we ain't a weII-oiIed machine yet.
But next time, we'II have a field day.
We are the League of Cats.
CATS:
We are the league.
[SIGHS]
[ALL WHIMPERING]
[ALL LAUGHING AND CHEERING]
[WHISTLING]
Shh!
Don't whistle till you see a mouse.
[BLOWS RASPBERRY]
What's wrong with you, cat?
There goes a mouse.
[WHISTLES]
Let's get him.
[SINGING] Like, when you're a cat No mouse makes you sweat
[SINGING] It ain't like we're getting A shot at the vet
[SINGING] When you're a mouse No cats can compare
We'll hang you out to dry In your underwear
[SINGING] Like, no way you can do it
[SINGING] Cats, think twice We ain't so nice
We're the League of Mice
Hey, Butch, I think we blew it.
[CATS AND MICE GRUNTING]
[MO ANS]
well, boys, I told you this place would be loaded with mice.
[CHUCKLES]
TWO SHOES:
well, this is certainly a fine how-do-you-do, isn't it, Thomas?
First, a heat wave that makes Death valley seem like a good idea for a vacation spot and now our air conditioner is on the fritz so we can't even cool the house down.
Maybe this will help.
My, my, Thomas.
You read my mind.
We shouldn't let all this nice cool air go to waste, now, should we?
[PANTING]
[SIGHS]
Hey, thanks, bub.
TWO SHOES:
Maybe we'II just take a little catnap right here and now.
What do you say?
But don't you go eating anything now.
[YAWNS]
TWO SHOES:
That's right.
[TWO SHOES YAWNS]
Just a little....
[SIGHS]
[SNORING]
[TOM AND TWO SHOES SNORING LOUDLY]
[GRUNTS]
[TWO SHOES SCREAMS]
TWO SHOES:
Thomas, what have you done?
What do you have to say for yourself?
[SNORES]
Don't pretend you were sleeping, Thomas.
"guilty" is written all over your face.
Oh, don't give me that look, you naughty cat.
I know what you did.
Not so fast, mister.
Don't be trying to blame it on that little mouse.
The only place a naughty cat like you belongs is outside.
[PANTING]
Huh?
[CHUCKLES]
[SIGHS]
[CHUCKLES]
[THUD]
[ANT SPITTING]
[WHISTLES]
[ENGLISH SDH]
[SNORING]
[GRO ANS]
[BLOWS RASPBERRY]
[GROWLS]
[BARKING]
[WHIMPERS]
[BARKING]
That ain't football.
Hmph.
[MO ANS]
Hey!
[SCREAMS]
[SCREAMS]
[MUTTERS THEN YAWNS]
[GRUNTS]
[GROWLS]
[BARKING]
[WHIMPERS]
[BLOWS RASPBERRY]
[TOM SPITS]
[JERRY WHISTLES]
[GIGGLES]
[WIND WHISTLES]
[GULPS]
[SNORES THEN SQUAWKS]
[GURGLING]
[YELLS]
[GRO ANING]
[JERRY WHISTLES]
[CLUCKS]
[GROWLS]
[SLURPS]
[SNIFFS]
[SCREAMS]
[SIGHS]
[BARKING]
[WHIMPERS]
[JERRY SINGING]
[GASPS]
[GRUNTING]
[SNORING]
[PANTING]
[GRUNTS]
[GROWLS]
[JERRY GRUNTS]
[YELLS]
Now, that's what I call real football.
ANNOUNCER [O VER SPEAKER] :
Yo, bros.
Take your boards and sign up for the big surf competition today.
First place is a mondo-big pile of cash.
Second place wins a fabulous mystery prize.
Event sponsored by Big Cheese of the High Seas.
[MUTTERING]
Surf's up.
[GRUNTS]
[DROOPY GRUMBLING]
Oh, dear, I hope I'm good enough to win the surfing contest today.
You fellows wanna watch me win?
[CHUCKLES]
[WOOD CRACKS]
[CROWD CHEERING]
ANNOUNCER:
Time to hit those heavies.
Let the surf competition begin.
I think I'II change into something a bit less constricting.
Get a load of my baggies.
I Iike to shoot the curl in style.
[CHUCKLES]
[CROWD CHEERING]
ANNOUNCER:
Oh, yes.
The judges should be stoked by such masterful ripping.
[DROOPY GRUNTS]
Whoa, check out cat dude trying to hog the dog.
And he eats chowder.
[GASPS]
The judges will not dig such rude moves.
[CROWD JEERING]
Not too heinous.
Skillfully done, little Jer.
[CROWD CHEERING]
Okay, dudes and dudettes, heh, time for the second heat.
[HORN BLOWS]
These are my doggers.
Heh, heh.
Woof.
Now, don't distract me.
I couId wipe out.
Whoa!
ANNOUNCER:
Low blow.
That is gonna cost you, cat and mouse dudes.
And Jer is penalized for bouncing off dog dude's head.
[CROWD JEERING]
The judges have decided to give Droopy another go without interference from cat and mouse dudes.
[CHUCKLES]
[SQUAWKING]
Presto change-o.
[CROWD CHEERING]
ANNOUNCER:
Ha, check out dog dude walking the board.
Whoa, dude.
With scores like these, dog dude's got a gnarly chance to win first place.
[CROWD CHEERING]
Now, the heat is on.
See who can catch the Droopster.
Whoa, this Tom cat's sick with mad tricks.
We're seeing some history in the making, ladies and gentle-dudes.
[BUO Y RINGING]
[CROWD CHEERING]
[HORN BLOWS]
This is little Jer's final run.
Let's see what mouse dude can come up with.
-And it's crab city for cat dude.
-Ow!
[CHUCKLES]
[GRUMBLES]
ANNOUNCER:
Yo, bros.
That was intense.
The votes are in.
And the winner of the big pile of cash is...
[CROWD CHEERING] ...Droopy.
Oh, goody.
BOTH:
aloha, dudes.
ANNOUNCER:
Dude, two dogs?
Did not see that coming.
Oh, well.
Can't change the past.
And now for second place.
Tom has a one-point total ahead of little Jer.
He wins second place:
A lifetime supply of cheese.
compliments of Big Cheese of the High Seas.
Oh, think fast, mouse dude.
Just a little parting gift.
Surf wax.
Don't wipe it all in one place.
[SNIFFS]
[GAGS]
[GRO ANS]
SPIKE:
Tyke, my dear old son of mine.
Today's the day youse is gonna learn how to play tennis.
[BARKING]
And I know somebody to show you all the ropes.
A regular tennis pro.
Now, ain't that nice?
Tom's resting up so he has the energy to teach my son how to play tennis.
[GROWLS]
[GROWLS]
Now, now, Tykey.
So, cat, you're gonna teach my son a little something about this game of tennis?
well, you are the tennis pro.
I want you to teach my boy everything there is to know about the game.
Got it?
We need a net.
Where's the rest of the court?
Tsk, tsk, tsk.
[JERRY GRUNTS]
And there's one more thing you should know.
If you mess around with my boy, it'II be the Iast thing that you do.
Got it?
[BLOWS RASPBERRY]
[BARKING]
[GAGS]
[GROWLS]
[YELLS]
You okay, my boy?
Now, you listen to me, cat.
I see any more funny business going on with my boy, and I'II pound you.
And not only would I pound you but I'II grab you and plant you in the court like so.
And then I grab some of this.
Like so.
And then I do this.
Which, of course, would lead me to do this.
But, of course, I don't wanna do that.
Now, do I?
[BARKING]
[BARKING]
[GRUNTS]
No more funny business.
[SIGHS]
[BARKING]
[BARKING]
[PANTING]
[WHIMPERS]
AII right, that's it.
So you wanna play rough with my little boy?
Then play rough it is.
It's my turn to serve.
Huh?
Ooh!
Attaboy, Tyke.
I think you finally got the hang of it.
[BARKING]
Okay, cat.
Try this one on for size.
[SPIKE LAUGHING]
Hey, way to go, Tyke.
That's the way to hit him back.
Oh, good one.
Keep it up, son.
Hey, you're gonna be a champ in no time.
Act One
Is this it?
It doesn't look like they're from a rich family.
That's mean.
After all, we just robbed their wedding.
Oi, look.
That is the Shirasagi-jo, right?
Shirasagi-jo?
Whose castle is that?
It belongs to no one.
It has no master.
The land surrounding the mountain is barren.
I wonder what kind of idiot would build a castle in a place like this.
All right then, let's rest in that castle tonight.
Do not go there.
What is it old lady?
Don't scare us.
Do not go near that castle.
It is the castle of a Forgotten God.
Forgotten God?
Hmph, a demon?
Interesting.
I'll deal with it using this.
The Forgotten God cannot be cut by a mere katana, or die from it.
The Forgotten God is both living and not.
It has been here from the beginning and will continue to remain here until the end.
Such things don't exist!
Seems to be quite broken down.
It's decayed.
Be a bit more careful.
Hey, maybe we should head back.
It's all right.
The next thing is...
We should at least find an appropriate place first.
Wait up!
I'm gonna draw my sword if you keep running.
Try and slice me if you can!
Come here!
I can't hold it back any more.
Eh?
One, two, three, four.
Huh?
I caught you!
She stinks!
What the hell are you?
Wa-Wait...
Hey, what happened, Kihei?
Oi, Kihei is gone, and the woman as well.
How should I know, right now I'm-
A-Ah, sa-save me, sa-save me!
Oi, what the hell is this?
What is this place?
This is Tomi Hime-san's castle.
Tomi Hime?
Oi, where did you all come from?
What an appealing treat.
Don't approach them!
I already said not to approach them, run away!
Shall we dance together?
Please save me!
M-M-Monster!
Oh, my hand slipped.
Stupid.
Tono, the weather today is perfect for the falcons to hunt.
Today is the first time the Tono asked for my help.
I must do my best.
You must be the falconer, Zusho-no-Suke right?
Yes.
My falcon is fine, right?
That's good.
I am very sorry.
It is still a bit timid.
It is still not used to other people besides me.
It was agreed on that it is going to be an important gift that is going to be presented to the lords above.
Yes.
As expected from the Tono.
I, who am renowned for my accuracy, cannot match your skills.
Good, you have done well.
Tono, it is a big one.
Oh, hurry!
Release the falcon!
Go, Kojirou!
What are you doing?
The wild boar is running away!
But in this rain...
Quick, release the falcon!
Yes.
Tono-sama, I still think it is best if we wait for the rain to stop.
Eh!
It is about to escape!
Please wait!
Kojirou, come back!
That is a falcon that is to be given to the lords above!
What are you doing, after it!
Yes.
Kojirou!
Did someone abandon this?
It is quite exquisite.
I-I am very sorry.
I did not expect anyone to be here.
Forgive my improper behavior.
By any chance, did you see a falcon fly past here?
Fo-Forgive my improper behavior.
Tomi Hime-sama.
What happened?
You were talking with a human.
I said nothing.
But why did you not reveal your true form and kill him?
Is that so?
I forgot to kill him.
Kojirou?
Kojirou!
What is it?
Have you found the falcon?
Yes.
It flew towards that castle.
Towards that castle?
This is bad.
Huh?
It is said that a demon lives there.
But Kojirou is...
Let us meet up with those who can fight.
Welcome back my lady.
Inawari Shiro's Kame Hime-sama has sent the meat of a renowned Bushi from Izumo no Kuni for you to enjoy.
It must be delicious.
I am not hungry.
Rice gruel will suffice.
How can you eat human things!
That is delicious in its own way.
Is that fine, Hime-sama?
We, the Forgotten Gods, will become weak if we do not consume human flesh.
I know.
In the slim chance that your heart yearns for a human...
What are you referring to?
I did not say a single thing.
Falling in love with humans.
I have always felt that it is a horrifying event.
I know.
Ah?
Could it be...
Is that you, Haguri?
Are you Haguri?
It is Haguri!
Haguri, welcome back.
Zusho-no-Suke-san.
Is that Oshizu?
I heard that the Tono's precious falcon has escaped.
Yes.
I am starting preparations to look for it.
I think it is best not to go.
None of those who went in search of the falcon have returned.
Also, I heard that it is not Zusho-no-Suke-san's fault.
Kojirou is the first falcon that the Tono entrusted to me.
It was trained with concern from the depths of my heart.
No, it is a comrade who I have grown up with.
I cannot abandon a comrade.
Between me and the falcon, which is more important to you?
Both of you are important to me.
If I was the one trapped in Shirasagi-jo, would you come and rescue me?
What are you saying?
Do not worry.
Kojirou!
Kojirou!
Kojirou!
Kojirou!
What happened?
Bandits have been appearing frequently in the surrounding area.
Are you being chased?
I saw you in a dream.
No, perhaps the day I met you is the dream itself.
It was a dream within a dream I guess.
I felt that you are someone not of this world.
No, pardon my rudeness.
But you are at fault as well for not having your kimono on at a place like that.
This area is dangerous.
Let me escort you back to your home.
Sorry for imposing on you.
I have finally heard your voice.
It is not a dream after all.
Which direction is your home at?
In front of that castle?
You look like someone from a good family.
Are you from a nearby town and a wealthy merchant's...
It is somewhere around there.
Then we need to be even more careful.
This is where bandits often hang out.
Also...
Also?
I heard there are demons around there.
Demons?
Yes, even though it cannot be clearly seen, there is a demon-infested castle called Shirasagi-jo.
I do not know the details, but they must be frightening...
You are mistaken.
The beings who reside in Shirasagi-jo are not demons.
Yes?
They are Forgotten Gods.
Forgotten Gods?
What are Forgotten Gods?
Forgotten Gods...
Forgotten Gods appeared at the same time as human beings.
No, they were called gods then.
Once, the world was segregated.
Each of them lived in their own domain.
But one day, humans started to intrude into the domain of the gods.
Gods also started appearing where humans lived.
Humans pretended to be gods and went to the mountains and the seas.
Gods pretended to be humans and became Forgotten Gods.
However, these two existences were never meant to mingle and coexist with each other.
The amount of spirits that dwelled within the water droplets on trees started to diminish, and those who started to get hungry first were the Forgotten Gods.
And thus, the Forgotten Gods started to eat humans.
People...
Yes, if they do not eat they cannot live.
No, they eat just to ease their pain.
Forgotten Gods are not truly alive, death...
They cannot die?
They can die.
Mingling with humans, falling in love with humans.
When a Forgotten God falls in love with a human, they become a corrupted god and die.
Ah, that's right; do you want to try some sweets from a distant land?
It is Konpeito.
The escaped falcon somehow likes it a lot.
But it is quite an expensive item, since it is the falcon of the Tono.
Please try one.
How is it?
It is sweet, right?
You do not like sweet things?
I see...
The fog is thickening.
Let us hurry.
Who goes there?
!
Forgotten Gods?
No, these are true demons.
Hand that woman over.
Stand still!
Or else I will slice you.
This fellow here is interesting.
All right, please cut us.
Step back.
Wait!
Are you all right?
How is your injury?
Injury?
It was from my katana...
It is such a deep cut.
You... are you...
Indeed, the wound...
Mother, please do not abandon me!
We shall go to my village first and treat the injury.
It is fine here.
I will return alone.
But with an injury like that...
I understand.
That... can you give me another?
That sweet thing.
Ah, yes.
Er your name?
I have no name.
Because this is another dream within a dream.
This...
Oi, oi, Samurai-san.
Hey, wait, wait!
We were just trying to save you!
Save?
Yes, we saved you.
What are you saying?
It seems that he hasn't realized it yet.
That woman who was with you is a Forgotten God.
Not only that, she's the princess of the Forgotten Gods.
Do not joke about this.
She wants to bring you back to the castle and eat you up.
Take a look.
If you value your life, hurry up and return to your village.
It's pointless to give things like that to Forgotten Gods.
They have no sense of taste and can't tell the difference between sweet and spicy things.
Hime-sama, where did you go?
Ah, Susuki.
What kind of sensation is sweetness?
Huh?
To me, that was more interesting compared to this item.
I loved jewelry.
Van Cleef, Boucheron, Cartier, they tickled my fancy!
One morning, I packed my bags and headed for Paris.
I knocked on every door!
But as I had no credentials,
I wound up at the Ritz:
Washroom attendant!
I always loved luxury.
But as I couldn't afford to live in it,
I went to work in it.
ORCHESTRA SEATS
I was a naive young thing, I admit it.
I always loved luxury.
Nothing but the finest hotels, only palaces.
You listening, Jessica?
Sure, Grandma.
Found ajob?
Not yet, but...
- Still on your mind?
- What?
Your boyfriend.
Less and less.
Don't stay here too long.
This place gets you down.
I like being with you.
Come and give me a kiss.
You're my ray of sunshine.
Could you switch on my soap?
People live too long now.
My dear neighbor, Augustine.
She's 92!
Her son's almost 70!
Know what?
She's ruining his old age.
The visits, the worries, costs.
It's expensive here, though it's not luxury, if you've known it!
I always loved luxury, but I couldn't afford to live in it,
I decided to work in it.
Did I tell you how I got ajob at the Ritz?
No, tell me, Grandma.
One day, I packed my bags and headed for Paris.
I knocked on every door!
I was a chambermaid, then a housekeeper.
Mornings,
I'd come out of the Metro and get to work...
There were flowers everywhere!
Those rooms smelled so good!
Roses on the trays, diamonds on the nightstand...
I always loved luxury, but I couldn't afford to live in it, so I pushed my way in!
Yes, I'm an experienced salesgirl.
I'm good in cloakrooms.
We don't hire women here.
Look around, no waitresses!
This place is special!
You experienced?
I've done lots of waitressing.
In brasseries, in Mâcon.
Why's it special?
It's not a brasserie, and this isn't Mâcon!
We're a microcosm.
Know what that is?
We get street-cleaners, nannies, models,
- Alain Delon...
- Alain Delon?
Not every day, but...
Wait.
Come over here.
Sit down.
That's the manager of the theater opposite.
Breakfasts here every morning.
We're his second office.
We get stagehands, hotel doormen...
Everyone can afford our prices.
Millionaires come when they're bored with room-service.
A good ham-sandwich makes them feel at home.
And this area has no supermarkets or drugstores.
Just us.
But we don't hire women.
Never!
Why not?
Tradition.
But with the 17th coming up...
- Why the 17th?
- There's a concert, an opening night, and an art auction.
All at once.
Think of it!
I got 2 waiters out sick.
We'll be swamped.
- Can you make steak tartare?
- Me?
I'm a whiz!
Ladies and gents, we resume at 2 PM.
You're in great shape!
Your wife's still as beautiful.
We have the dates for Salzburg.
You prefer 11-18th of June, or the 8-12th of July?
No, we're at Carnegie Hall in June.
Must be July.
There's still time.
2012 is around the corner!
Meanwhile, where do we lunch?
Keep well!
Hope you wind up in my cab again!
You kept everyone waiting!
You're a pain!
Serge, your voice isn't projecting!
Traffic jams, I presume?
We shot all night in a freezing squat!
I slept an hour!
Thanks to the traffic!
So if you're even faintly unpleasant, I'm outta here!
- "So you could eavesdrop!" - "From the window?"
Doesn't matter.
Catherine, could I ask you to...
I won't do this play with poultry on my head!
She gonna be a pain all the way?
You picked it?
No way!
- You don't recognize me?
- I do...
No, you don't.
You once dined at my house, after your concert.
There was a fabulous blue Braque!
Right.
I'm selling it.
I'm selling everything, on March 17th at 9 PM.
Come, it'll be a good auction.
I can't.
I'm playing here.
It'll be a good concert, I hope!
- Come in.
Take a look!
- Thanks, but I need a breather...
- You're selling everything?
- Yes.
Why?
A collection is a living thing.
When its heart stops beating, it's over.
I began as a cabbie, I don't want to end a museum guard.
I'll stop by.
Here.
It's all in there.
My complete works!
I'm quitting the show.
I told you!
You told them?
They're devastated.
I don't give a shit!
150,000 Euros an episode, 6 episodes a year for 3 years.
You'll be rich, you can quit work.
I don't want to quit working.
Just that shitty soap!
Dessert?
Coffee?
Herb tea with fake sugar, please.
Sorry, I hadn't recognized you.
You're amazing!
My grandma and I adore you!
That's nice.
No dessert, you sure?
Jessica!
Excuse me.
Never recognize a customer!
- But she's...
- Precisely!
Don't push our desserts or make comments!
Never say:
"They're all coming at once".
It's a restaurant!
That's what happens!
Yes, sir.
The name's Marcel!
Any news from Alain Renais?
- His film's been postponed.
- Good!
He wouldn't have picked me anyway.
May we congratulate you?
Thanks.
You're fabulous!
We never miss an episode!
Thanks.
I've had it to here!
You're edgy.
You open in 3 days...
Don't bet on it!
What do you mean?
That assistant flaunting her boobs and her dumb dad may do me in!
Working with your daughter should be fun.
And your ex-husband's the best, even if he drinks.
Does he still?
Not even!
It's a nightmare.
The play's dumb, I'm treated like a factory worker.
I added a chocolate.
Is he here?
- Who?
- He's in Paris.
I spoke to his casting director, Magali Garrel.
That bitch?
She hates me!
Forget it.
We were in drama school.
Her whole career was 2 walk-ons!
You've got to talk to him!
He's sticking to his list.
Sure, Binoche, Baye, Adjani.
We know that list.
And Bellucci, too.
To play Simone de Beauvoir?
Why not Sophia Loren?
OK... he's in Paris, he's staying at the Plaza.
I'll try to get him to cross the street and see your show.
How was that?
You want to destroy me?
You know Feydeau's plays!
Wait till you see my hat!
Sobinski won't hire me to clean Sartre and Beauvoir's toilet!
Listen...
I dropped off a tape at his hotel.
Of "Her Honor the Mayor"?
You didn't?
Working with slave-drivers is tough, manic-depressives are worse.
I'm not manic-depressive, I'm bipolar.
It's not the same.
Sure.
Try to get some sleep, OK?
I'll call you.
Wait.
How do you know about Bellucci?
She's my client now.
You kidding me?
No.
I'd say you're her client!
Bastard!
Dirty pimp!
Bellucci!
Hi.
Mr Lefort's dressing room, please?
- Who wants to know?
- I work at the Bar des Théâtres.
They hire girls now?
Since this morning.
I'm on trial.
He's in the presidential dressing-room.
Across the stage, up the stairs, 3rd floor.
His name's on the door.
Thanks.
Thanks.
Mint cordial, right?
Marcel wasn't sure.
- They hire girls over there now?
- I'm on trial.
- This is for you.
It goes on my tab.
- Thanks.
It really is presidential here.
Sorry?
You sleep here?
I wish I did.
There's even a shower.
You ever go to concerts?
Not a chance.
Why not?
I like music, but that's it.
Classical music doesn't...
I don't know it well.
Know that?
Sure.
Twinkle, twinkle little star How I wonder what you are
Up above the world so high like a diamond in the sky
Twinkle, twinkle little star How I wonder what you are
It's Mozart.
Drives me nuts!
I never learned.
No musical education.
Don't apologize!
I'm apologizing to you.
Don't.
Why?
Because you're young, you sing in tune, and you never go to concerts.
For you it's another world.
A chic, snooty world, right?
I'm sick of it.
Does that surprise you?
Sure does.
You play so well.
- For instance, you're a waitress...
- Not really.
Oh, yeah?
It's a long story.
Anyway... if you want to quit being a waitress, everybody will understand.
But a concert pianist... nobody understands!
Not even you, who shunt concerts.
Sit down.
Is it a very long story?
Once I get started, I can't stop.
I've got time.
OK, here goes...
My parents died when I was little, and my grandma raised me.
The Braque needs a better place.
I agree.
- You know Valerie?
- Of course.
It's coming along.
What's amusing is that now I can sell them... but I could never buy them.
- Mr Grumberg?
- Yes.
There's a man waiting for you across the street in the bar.
- A man?
- Mr Grumberg?
Yes, that's me.
He's called Mr Grumberg, too.
"The Kiss".
There are 5 of them.
This one's carved in stone.
It makes you want to fall in love.
He'd appreciate that.
Brancusi would.
You're not in love?
No longer.
Jacques, come over here a moment.
"What came over you?"
"No!
Stop wandering around in your nightgown!"
Wait.
Can I add a "please"?
"Please, what came over you?"
If you want.
Keep going.
"In your nightgown, wearing your hat!"
"I'll remove it later.
Now tell me..."
"Your hat be damned!
"A mother who changes her nightgown in front of her son..."
- "A boy of 12!" - "Sorry, 13!"
"No, 12!" Can I drop the "No"?
It works better if I just say "12".
But Feydeau wrote "No, 12!"
In modern speech, it's better if I say wearily, at the end of my tether, if I say "12!"
Get it?
The problem isn't modern speech patterns.
The problem, if you can do it, the problem is to find a modern tone for old-fashioned lines.
Get it?
"No, 12!"
That OK?
That's fine.
Wonderful!
"13, I tell you!
His birthday was 3 days ago!"
"Yes, well, 3 days!
- "Doesn't count!" - "Yes.
Nothing counts for you!"
Can I take out the "Yes"?
It plays better.
Felix, please, don't you start!
OK.
Thanks.
"You think he even knows what a woman is?"
Is this Claudel now?
What's going on?
She's dealing with exhibitionism!
With her own body!
She's bringing up incest!
At last Clarisse is becoming more than a dodo in a ridiculous hat!
I've told you, in Feydeau nothing is psychological!
Nothing at all!
Nonsense!
His mother was a Polish Jew!
"Why do you wander around stark naked?"
Sorry.
What?
300,000 an episode?
I see...
Put it there.
Thanks.
I'm in rehearsal.
I'll call you back.
"Stark naked?
What about my day gown?"
"It's worse!
"Transparent as tracing paper!"
"I get it!
Spit it out!
"You wish it was made of calico, or madapolam!"
A few eggheads in the audience may know what calico is, but madapolam?
Is Shakespeare unplayable?
Shakespeare is all about us!
He's totally modern!
Compared to Feydeau, he's a rap-singer!
You're a pain!
Screw you!
Let's move on.
- What are you doing here?
- Nothing.
She's right. "Madapolam"?
Zip!
During rehearsals, nobody comes in.
"Your hat be damned!
"Is it fitting for a mother..."
Jean-François!
They came from Tokyo to see you!
Tokyo?
They need to rest.
I'll see them later.
How's the faculty?
Still on the Protestants?
What's your next book?
"Reforms and Persecution in the 16th Century".
I just delivered it.
Your text is crap!
You're spouting crap!
I worked hard on it, and I'm not a writer.
"A transfusion...
the death of a collection...
"by heart-attack."
I thought Mom had the heart-attack!
"The Bible says:
There's a time to sell and a time to buy."
Why drag in the Bible?
Stick to Protestants, lay off the Bible!
So, Claudie, ready for the easy life?
She's retiring.
It was her choice.
Shit!
OK, you can take a break.
Mint cordial.
Things OK?
They could be better.
And with you?
They could be better.
You and your sister scorned my collection!
If I die tomorrow, you'll screw it up!
I'm planning for its future, as I planned for your lives.
It was all done:
You have your trust funds.
Thanks.
So, get off my back!
I know all about it:
You never forgave us for the time we spent in auction rooms, traveling, in galleries.
And the PTA meeting I missed because of a gallery opening.
You bring that up every time!
I hated them!
I always hated PTA meetings!
And school plays with 200 kids dressed up as lolipops.
I walked out after 10 minutes!
I shouldn't sell?
I started as a cabbie.
I won't end up a museum guard!
I know!
You have money now.
You never spend a dime!
You want to do everything differently.
You only buy computers and cheap sofas!
If that gets your rocks off!
We know how you get yours off now!
OK, then...
Let's talk about Valerie, since you know.
That's why you came, so let's hear your version.
To you, it's a great love story.
To me, it's a guy getting fleeced.
My great love story was with your mother.
So what do I do now?
Do I live or die?
Well, I'm living.
OK, she's too young, and it bugs you...
Because she's taller and slimmer than your wife.
If that amuses you...
Sorry.
You know, Frederic, comes a day... when time passing becomes time remaining.
You see things differently.
A new life... is like a house.
At your age, you build one.
At mine, you buy one.
Can I find a room around here?
There's plenty of rooms.
But a month's wages for you will buy dinner across the street.
As for a room...
Got no family?
Friends?
She's from Mâcon.
Jean-François...
You know my son?
The great Jean-François Lefort!
Don't you want to take a look?
Are you selling "The Kiss"?
I'm selling everything.
Why?
Got a small room?
And how much?
Room 412.
Facing the street, but with double windows.
Only 540 Euros.
It's vacant.
Thanks.
Sir!
Mr Grumberg!
You forgot this on the bench.
- I didn't forget it.
I left it.
- Sorry.
Something wrong?
I need to sit down for a few minutes.
Is it your back?
That hurts.
I tell my grandma to sit straight.
You live in this neighborhood?
Neighborhood?
I need a room and...
This is slut-city!
Look at her!
200 minks on her back.
Or her, with alligator feet.
It's not a neighborhood.
Unless you're looking for a sugar daddy.
The place is crawling with them.
Thanks for all the useful info.
- Don't mention it.
- Bye.
Can I keep it?
Thanks.
I believe in God, but to me, religions keep us from God.
As classical concerts keep us from music.
She should write it down.
It matters.
Now the questionnaire of the great Bernard Pivot on his TV show "Bouillon de culture".
OK, shoot.
Your favorite animal?
My favorite animal?
The peacock.
It's like us soloists on stage:
Dazzling but dumb.
How do you say that in Japanese?
That's us.
Write it down.
Thejob you wouldn't want?
Horowitz's.
But that's the job you have?
Sorry.
The interview is over.
A pity...
Come in!
- What should we remove?
- Sorry?
I called them.
There's too much furniture in here.
Take that, that and that!
The dresser, too.
Want your multi-vitamin juice?
Thanks.
I'll run you a bath.
Take that...
And that, too.
One day, he decided to sell it all.
To dump everything he spent a lifetime amassing.
Takes guts, no?
In Venice, you want the Hotel Gritti or the Monaco?
The Fenice needs an answer.
The work of a lifetime, dumped in 2 hrs!
Hold it! "The work of a lifetime".
He's not an artist, he invested in art.
That's totally different.
Like you, in a way.
The signed photo for your niece.
Thanks.
I've got mail for you.
Shit!
Can I come in?
There's more every day!
In that last episode you were great.
- I've started packing up.
- Soon you'll be on easy street.
Can I sit down?
They're due any minute.
More night shooting.
I'm bushed!
They drive me nuts!
And tomorrow's your opening night!
What was the last episode?
You married a lesbian couple, a dwarf and a paraplegic.
Made me cry.
So that's your memorabilia?
You heard of it?
I don't flaunt it here.
Pop music isn't Mr. Bercoff's thing.
My 30 years at the Olympia helped me get the job.
But here I keep a low profile.
Mr Coquatrix!
He wasn't fussy!
We had big stars, but also acrobats, circus dogs, trained fleas.
The people I met!
Even knew some intimately!
I was cute then.
I met a lot of people.
Like Gilbert Bécaud...
Hejust came in.
Into the Bar des Théâtres...
Him!
Sobinski!
With that bitch Magali Garrel!
I'm not made up, my hair's a mess.
We shot all night in a squat.
I'm a horrible sight.
He's coming over.
He's looking.
No, he isn't.
He sat down, didn't see me or know me.
Pascal, what do I do?
Think so?
What did you tell that dumb bitch?
Did you mention me to her?
Think so?
I don't dare.
I can't do that!
Balsamic vinegar with her croissant?
Why?
To dissolve the croissant.
Every morning!
Take it over!
- Balsamic vinegar!
- Stay there!
I can't say it, but when you married the paraplegic,
I almost cried.
Not now!
OK, I'm ready.
Scram!
Magali!
You, here?
Hi, Catherine.
- How are you?
- Fine.
Sure, you're appearing across the street.
Going OK?
Sort of...
How about you?
- Casting a new movie?
- I just finished up with Blier.
You know Brian?
Catherine Fersen...
Brian Sobinski.
I adored "Taxi Driver".
For me, it's...
Scorsese, of course!
I'm an idiot.
Your last film was so moving!
The one with...
Help me!
You know that actor...
Magali, you know...
No, well...
See you.
Shit!
Dumb bitch!
Fuck you!
- Catherine!
Things fine?
- Just great!
And you?
Fine.
We're having drinks before the concert tomorrow.
Drinks?
A party for you.
Your farewell is a big event!
Hello, Lucienne.
Show in Miss Rachida Lahoucine.
I have six Sartres to show you.
Her?
Catherine Fersen.
You met her and hardly looked at her.
Let's get to the point.
On Saturday, I'm marrying you to...
Mr Naoufel Larbi Lahoucine.
He's your cousin, right?
Come with me.
Brian, it's unthinkable.
She's a D list.
You phoned the bar, so here it is.
Thanks.
Catherine Fersen!
I adore her!
I missed that show.
You adore her?
Why?
Dunno...
She's every woman, all at once!
Tell me the truth.
Are you in love with this man?
Don't you have work to do?
No, I'm on my break.
Don't cry, Rachida.
Women who cry don't stand a chance.
Talk to him, Daniel!
Something's got to him.
What's wrong?
I don't know.
He won't listen to me, treats me like an enemy.
Says I don't love him anymore.
Maybe it'll pass, but he's a mess.
I'll say!
You love him?
Get him back on the track, or else!
Here he is!
He wanders in!
40 musicians!
Seen the time?
I canceled the rehearsal!
- We must talk.
- Not now!
A TV crew's coming to interview you.
You forgot?
No...
Well, yes.
Go get changed, I'll see you later.
Miss?
A grapefruit juice.
Sorry.
I hate being late.
A man without a cell phone, or a car can't be all bad.
Just impossible to live with!
Planter's Punch, please.
Glass of cold milk.
You...
You didn't tell him?
Why?
I doubt he'd have believed me.
Why not?
He talks of you, not as a saint but as a kind of monk or a preacher...
The idea of you and I having had a torrid affair, hejust wouldn't get it.
No chance he'II...?
He's in London till tonight.
I wanted to tell you...
My wife and I, that's all over.
What?
I'm staggered.
You left her?
Surprised?
Frankly, yes.
Why?
A man who's a pain to his mistress, can only be a pain to his wife.
Your ulcer?
Yes... no.
It moved.
No big deal.
Was I such a pain?
Your problems with your father.
Well, your mother's death, OK.
But your ulcer... your hatred of De Guise and Queen Catherine... your fears your wife would catch us...
- Yet we got on well at the time.
- Thanks to me, no?
Maybe.
Things have changed.
I have a cell phone now.
So if you feel like...
You're kidding me?
There's a man in my life, hadn't you heard?
Is that a problem?
That kind of stuff doesn't turn me on.
But you knew he was my dad?
So what?
Is he your good deed, or your good deal?
I have fun with him.
He teaches me things, takes me places.
He's proud of me.
- He calls me "sweetie".
- You don't say.
He shows me off to people.
He's full of pep, he loves life.
And you love money.
OK, I love money.
But I'm not a thief, Fred.
Don't call me Fred.
We won't marry, I don't want kids.
- That's a relief!
- So don't fuck us up!
Anything else, miss?
Know what?
If you want to, tell him.
Tell him we were lovers for 3 months, 3 years ago.
I don't care.
It'll just cause him a little pain.
That's what you want, right?
This is on me.
Now that I'm rich!
That's on me.
May I?
You overheard it all.
So tell me what you think.
I didn't mean to...
- What's your name?
- Jessica.
Another cold milk.
What'll you have?
Well...
OK, a Planter's Punch.
- Still your back?
- It's agony!
What's your name?
Frederic.
Tell me, why do you hate Queen Catherine?
I study and teach the Wars of Religion.
In fact, she fascinates me.
But that little gold-digger never got it.
- Did you find a room?
- I'm leaving, anyway.
I live in Mâcon, to be near my grandma.
She raised me, and now she's...
Raised you badly, it seems.
Right.
She taught me that a sweet tooth and curiosity never killed the cat.
Listening to you two was like watching
"The Bold and the Beautiful".
- Where do you teach?
- The Sorbonne.
But I'm changing my whole life.
- You tore it out?
- Yes.
Was it the Brancusi?
- How do you know?
- I saw it.
Even touched it.
My mother's favorite piece.
Put it back in there.
No, you keep it.
Who the hell is that?
What's the gold-digger's name?
Valérie.
Why?
She knows her way around.
You want to go back to her?
No, just testing her...
So it's macho stuff.
Pathetic.
So what's your exemplary life?
It's a long story, and once I get going...
If it's too long, I'll stop you.
To start, I lost my parents when I was 4.
This year, my boyfriend dumped me, so did my midwifery school:
A doc tried to rape me, and I kneed him in the balls.
So I think my luck's due to change, and things'll get better.
What makes you think that?
There's two kinds of people.
Those who say, when their phone rings "Who the hell's that?"
And those, like me, who say, "Hey!
"Who can that be?"
- Looks yummy!
- A peach melba, please!
We have contracts for the next 6 years, all signed!
Would you leave me?
Answer.
I love you for your playing.
A plumber or a banker,
I wouldn't look at!
That suit you?
I'm a pianist, always will be.
It's my life.
But I'm fed up with all this.
I want to play in hospitals, forests, for sick kids, old folks' homes, prisons, and in concert halls where people don't understand music.
But I'm through with this ritual, this costume.
I want out of the goddam system!
We're ready for you on stage, Mr Lefort!
Where do I fit in all this?
Am I part of the system?
That's up to you.
Listen, in 6 years...
Don't talk about contracts, dates, or how I'll go broke.
Talk to me about us!
I'll touch up your nose, it's shiny.
I'll teach piano, you and I in a house by a lake...
No more travels, less money...
Will you kill yourself?
I might.
Yes?
I'm still on the train.
I'll be in Paris soon.
It all went fine.
See you soon, sweetie.
I can't wait to see you, too.
Feels weird, huh?
Doesn't it!
They got it all wrong.
This phony replica.
After Tutankhamen's tomb, Mistinguett's bathroom, now we get "The Grumbergs' apartment".
Can you give me a hand?
Rack of lamb for me.
Me, too.
And a bottle of 1995 Marbuzet.
You speak French well.
Who the hell's that?
How about that!
But I've played all kinds of other roles.
In Koltes, Duras,
Lorca...
I like Feydeau because...
no psychology.
An incredible life... he died crazy...
His mother was a Polish Jew.
Let's talk about Simone.
Excuse me.
You wanted to talk to me about the script.
Sorry...
I had no time for lunch...
It takes place in college, then the start of the affair between Beauvoir and Sartre... until she met the American...
What renouncing?
Simone renounced nothing!
She was sex-mad under her holier-than-thou airs.
She went after Algren, seduced him, then dumped him.
There was no ambiguity!
Sartre was a lousy lay.
That's all.
Yes, he was.
She was the wild one!
She let him screw around with a lot of bimbos, supposedly with her blessing,
suffering hell, even posed as a lesbian to swipe girls who coveted him.
She was diabolical!
The turban, the hair parted down the middle was all sham.
Beneath it, she was a tornado!
Balsamic vinegar, please!
She was the rebel!
Who got mangled, who fought to stand up to men!
Who was ageless.
Look, I can be any age.
It's the role of my life.
Beauvoir is me.
She's in my blood.
Don't listen to the crap they say about me.
Please, not now!
Know what I'm paid for one episode of "Her Honor the Mayor"?
Whenever you're ready.
Fine.
I'll do a last voice test.
I needed a dresser and a chair, a room, in fact.
I had my things moved.
It's true, I made an investment.
I put all my energy and love into your career.
It wasn't a sacrifice.
I never regretted it.
We didn't have kids.
I can handle that.
Manager, dresser, secretary, nurse...
I'm happy to do it, it's a pleasure!
But a housemaid in the country,
I'm not sure I could.
Think it over, please.
You, too.
Whenever you're ready!
- You checked the lights "full on"?
- Everything's OK.
I wanted that lamp...
Higher!
I went to see my grandpa.
Too bad, you never met him.
He said to me:
"I think it's ugly, but that's good.
"Only buy things other people hate!"
That's better.
Yes, better.
Your mother and I did well for ourselves.
We handled all the trickiest twists and turns of life:
Loss of desire, wrinkles, my by-passes...
Know how?
We both had a hard-on for life every day, for 30...
No, 40 years, thanks to this collection, we built a dam against boredom, against time...
Like two beavers, adding twig after twig...
Is your back hurting?
No, not at all.
What's that?
Sorry, I was looking for the way out.
Hello, anyway.
Hi.
You said I could drop by, so...
Come in.
Catherine...
Jessica.
So still no room?
Tomorrow, maybe.
But for tonight...
This place is cool.
You can have Gilbert's sofa.
The springs are shot, but it's a bed of feathers, trust me.
I'm sentenced to prime-time TV for life.
It's true!
Kusturica, Resnais?
Forget them!
Sobinski thought I was a suicidal maniac.
And I am!
Anyway, thank God, there's Feydeau, "Popstars"...
You were on "Popstars"?
Yes, every year.
There!
That feels great.
Piaf used to say:
"You have the fingers of an angel".
What did Bécaud say when you tweaked his wienie?
Water's boiling.
- Pasta shells or macaroni?
- Pasta shells!
For me, life's simple.
For you two, it's trickier.
Mine's simple too:
She's leaving me.
Mine already left.
- Your wife?
- I'm such a pain.
So is she!
Mine's scared:
The two of us without all this, alone in the countryside, no kids.
But it doesn't bother me, I love her!
Well mine left me, but I was through with her.
For 13 years, she's been at all my concerts.
Uncompromising, strong beliefs...
What?
Uncompromising is bad enough, but strong beliefs, too!
You're both too young.
You too!
She took the elevator with you?
Going up?
Good.
Now you want to go back down?
If she won't go down with you, forget her!
Open the doors and boot her out.
Is she a musician?
- She plays the cello.
- There you are...
She lived through you.
If you take that away, what's she got left?
Don't listen.
He's got theories about everything nowadays.
To Valerie!
Who's Valerie?
A cute little golddigger, very nice and smart.
Am I right?
I love Valentine.
Nobody gets what they want, Jessica!
- But you have what everybody wants.
- Yeah, right.
Any balsamic?
I'm a compulsive eater.
In the restaurant, now here.
I peep at the audience before the curtain goes up.
Someone's always hoping to pounce on a closer seat.
They watch a free seat till the last minute.
When the lights go down, the fastest idiot dashes for it.
They're obsessed about being closer!
But if you keep at it, one day you wind up in the front row, and there you're too close to see anything!
She's not even listening.
Yes, I am... best seats...
front row.
Don't stop.
Be right there!
Sorry to have leave you, but tonight the cops bust a drunken mom in an ugly divorce.
Turns out she's not a drunk, the dad's a pervert, they're fighting over a kid, and I have to solve it.
See ya!
Your mother arrived in a sled, and she said to me:
"Why do you lie to everyone?"
"Your pretext:
"I'm selling, because now I couldn't buy them...
"In fact, you're selling out of pride.
"You want to hear the stakes going up,
"each extra dollar gets your rocks off.
"It's not the money, I know.
"It's pride.
"It means:
I was right.
"I understood before any of you,
"that one day this would be worth a fortune.
"And you lived for that day."
Was she right?
She wasn't wrong.
We've become friends.
She's great, even better in real life.
You'll make it.
Don't worry, it'll be great!
No, it won't wear you out!
And I have another surprise for you.
Love you, Grandma.
Big kiss!
Happy auction.
I hope you get your rocks off!
As to Valerie,
I'm guess she's allright.
Don't get carried away.
Why did you tell her you were in London?
Let's have lunch, some day soon.
- Looks like you were in bed.
- Me?
- Just got off work?
- No, it's just that...
Once again, it's a long story...
Care for a drink?
But not in there.
Come along.
Where was your bedroom?
Over the garage.
There were lots of trucks.
The freight, the airline, all that came later.
One day he broke his piggy bank and bought his first twig.
First twig?
It's the story of 2 beavers.
A cartoon?
For grown-ups.
It took me a while to understand.
Strong stuff!
In your nightly wanderings, have you found anything?
Found what?
What are you looking for?
The best seat in the house, not too close or too far back.
Is there an empty seat beside it?
My back is stuck...
- It hurts, there!
- Wait, bend your legs.
Breathe deeply...
Keep on breathing.
- That feel better?
- A bit.
Again.
In little puffs.
It's gone.
See?
It's a lovely baby girl!
A window table?
None, anywhere.
It's bedlam tonight!
Sorry!
We won't manage!
They're all coming in at once.
Thank you!
They're lovely!
Some chocolates.
We've got work to do!
- Mr Lefort!
- I thought I'd drop by.
How sweet of you!
Catherine!
Here, a trifle.
- You know Jean-François Lefort?
- No... of course I do.
Delighted.
- We'd better move.
- Seen Valentine?
Thanks, dear.
I wanted to say...
I hope it goes fine tonight, and...
And?
That's all.
Enjoy your meal!
What a nerve!
Well...
I wanted to be a performer.
But I didn't have enough...
No talent at all.
So, I thought I'd spend my life with performers.
And at that, I was a hit.
Thanks to them, and to you, I've had a great life.
Thanks!
I'll miss you all!
Too bad she's leaving.
Don't cry.
I'm sweating, right?
You're fine.
You'll be OK?
Ready?
I have the key, I'll lock up.
- Can I have a word with you?
- Can't it wait?
- But it's my last day...
- Your last day?
You said I was "on trial".
So I figured that...
What did you figure?
Hold it a second!
Please!
You figured what?
Must you bring it up now?
That even when you're being nice, you're nasty!
- I'm not, I'm doing my job.
- We're all doing that!
We all have problems!
You're no worse off than anyone.
You're not even a pianist or an actor or rich!
Can't you be nice to me just once?
Is there a Jessica here?
It's this delightful young woman!
A lady's waiting in my cab.
Keep it short!
My God!
Watch out!
You'll fall off!
Wait!
I don't believe it!
Careful!
You look wonderful!
We sign tomorrow.
They wanted 12 episodes.
I agreed to 6.
She has stagefright.
200,000!
250,000 in the back on my right.
It's 300,000 now!
400,000 on the balcony.
450,000 on my left.
500,000 in the back.
550,000.
600,000, who bids higher?
"Please, what came over you?"
"No!
Stop wandering around in your nightgown!
"Wearing that hat!"
- "You don't like my hat?" - "I do."
- "No, you don't!" - "Yes, I do."
"No, you disapprove of my hat!"
"My husband objects to my hat!"
- "Not at all." - "You do!"
"I'm not against it."
"Yes, you are!
Say it, and I'll take it off!"
"There!
Now, let's hear it!"
"I don't give a fig about your hat.
So take it off!
"But should a mother wander around
"in a nightgown in front of her son?"
"A 12-year old boy!"
- "No, 13!" - "12!"
"No, 13. 3 days ago."
"2 or 3 days don't count!"
"Nothing counts with you!"
"Hat or no hat!
"With or without your nightgown!"
"You're amazing tonight, Clarisse!"
500,000!
600,000 on my left!
700,000... 800,000 on the phone.
It's your bid.
It's your bid.
800,000 on my left by phone...
Sold!
"I've been stung by a wasp!"
"Poor Madame!"
"Because you wander around naked!"
"He's delighted by it!
"A wasp!
I hope it wasn't poisonous!"
We move on to lot 28, a fine Modigliani that was exhibited and reproduced in the catalogue, and we start at... 3,000,000 Euros...
3,200,000... 3,200,000...
against the bid on my left, 3,500,000 in the back, it's your bid, madame...
Now it's 3,500,000...
3,900,000...
"Julien!"
- "What?" - "I beg you..."
"Suck me!"
"I mean really, Clarisse..."
"Suck me!
As you did for Miss Dieumamour!"
"But, Clarisse, it was her neck!
Not her...
"It was a fly, not a wasp!"
"Wasps can be deadly!
"I saw in the paper, a man died of a wasp sting!"
"Victor, water the plants!"
I'm so hot in here.
Aren't you?
I always found that so uncomfortable!
If you knew...
I feel better now.
But I'll play the finale for you.
Can we go on?
Two bars before S.
Sold to the lady on the left in the back.
Next is lot 31, Brancusi's "The Kiss", 1925, in brown stone, the only one of its kind, a very rare piece.
I'll start the bidding at... 2,000,000 Euros.
2,200000.
2,400000...
2,600000...
To the man standing at the back.
2,800000 to you, madame.
Now a bid on the phone at 2, 900000.
3,000000!
To the man at the back...
3,200000!
3,500,000 to the same bidder, 3,500000 to the man at the back.
Who'll bid more?
3,700000 on the right.
3,900000 in the back on the left.
We're still at 3,900000 in the back...
I'm sorry, I've just been told that lot 31 has been withdrawn...
It's the seller's right if the hammer hasn't come down.
Next is lot 32, a fine work by Fernand Léger, a fine painting that we'll start at 2,000000...
Feel better?
Catherine, fabulous!
Let me tell you...
Shut up, witch!
Save the poisoned apples for Snow White!
Mother, you made it!
Come in!
Be right back, girls...
Darling, you were wonderful...
In a moment!
You're my Simone.
Can I help you?
Expecting someone?
My granddaughter.
She works across the street.
Is that Jessica?
- She told me about you.
- Really?
I work nearby, too.
I'm a musician.
You're a lucky man.
This is for you.
How sweet of you!
Darling!
- It's only for one night...
- Thank God!
I know the prices!
This isn't madapolam!
It's crazy.
Are you sure?
I pre-paid.
You'll have a rose with breakfast.
But no diamonds...
Did I ever tell you how I started at the Ritz?
No.
Tell me tomorrow!
You're not staying?
I have a date.
Come give me a kiss!
You're my ray of sunshine.
Your date is a lucky man.
It's too simple.
Declarations of war and of love, all at once.
It's too simple.
As for your strip-tease before an audience...
Is it a love letter or a farewell letter?
Which do you prefer?
I want us to be together.
You're my wife, my soldier.
My war isn't with you.
But I warn you, that lake house...
How about a beach house?
I'm cold.
Come... let's go home.
It was a lovely concert.
You played the 2nd movement beautifully...
You have to take risks, Jessica.
I pushed my way in.
And you know, Jessica, I had a wonderful life.
Madapolam:
Coarse cotton fabric, between calico and percale.
Named afterthe city in India where it was made.
Subtitles:
A. Whitelaw
Subtitling:
CMC
I loved jewelry.
Van Cleef, Boucheron, Cartier, they tickled my fancy!
One morning, I packed my bags and headed for Paris.
I knocked on every door!
But as I had no credentials,
I wound up at the Ritz:
Washroom attendant!
I always loved luxury.
But as I couldn't afford to live in it,
I went to work in it.
ORCHESTRA SEATS
I was a naive young thing, I admit it.
I always loved luxury.
Nothing but the finest hotels, only palaces.
You listening, Jessica?
Sure, Grandma.
Found ajob?
Not yet, but...
- Still on your mind?
- What?
Your boyfriend.
Less and less.
Don't stay here too long.
This place gets you down.
I like being with you.
Come and give me a kiss.
You're my ray of sunshine.
Could you switch on my soap?
People live too long now.
My dear neighbor, Augustine.
She's 92!
Her son's almost 70!
Know what?
She's ruining his old age.
The visits, the worries, costs.
It's expensive here, though it's not luxury, if you've known it!
I always loved luxury, but I couldn't afford to live in it,
I decided to work in it.
Did I tell you how I got ajob at the Ritz?
No, tell me, Grandma.
One day, I packed my bags and headed for Paris.
I knocked on every door!
I was a chambermaid, then a housekeeper.
Mornings,
I'd come out of the Metro and get to work...
There were flowers everywhere!
Those rooms smelled so good!
Roses on the trays, diamonds on the nightstand...
I always loved luxury, but I couldn't afford to live in it, so I pushed my way in!
Yes, I'm an experienced salesgirl.
I'm good in cloakrooms.
We don't hire women here.
Look around, no waitresses!
This place is special!
You experienced?
I've done lots of waitressing.
In brasseries, in Mâcon.
Why's it special?
It's not a brasserie, and this isn't Mâcon!
We're a microcosm.
Know what that is?
We get street-cleaners, nannies, models,
- Alain Delon...
- Alain Delon?
Not every day, but...
Wait.
Come over here.
Sit down.
That's the manager of the theater opposite.
Breakfasts here every morning.
We're his second office.
We get stagehands, hotel doormen...
Everyone can afford our prices.
Millionaires come when they're bored with room-service.
A good ham-sandwich makes them feel at home.
And this area has no supermarkets or drugstores.
Just us.
But we don't hire women.
Never!
Why not?
Tradition.
But with the 17th coming up...
- Why the 17th?
- There's a concert, an opening night, and an art auction.
All at once.
Think of it!
I got 2 waiters out sick.
We'll be swamped.
- Can you make steak tartare?
- Me?
I'm a whiz!
Ladies and gents, we resume at 2 PM.
You're in great shape!
Your wife's still as beautiful.
We have the dates for Salzburg.
You prefer 11-18th of June, or the 8-12th of July?
No, we're at Carnegie Hall in June.
Must be July.
There's still time.
2012 is around the corner!
Meanwhile, where do we lunch?
Keep well!
Hope you wind up in my cab again!
You kept everyone waiting!
You're a pain!
Serge, your voice isn't projecting!
Traffic jams, I presume?
We shot all night in a freezing squat!
I slept an hour!
Thanks to the traffic!
So if you're even faintly unpleasant, I'm outta here!
- "So you could eavesdrop!" - "From the window?"
Doesn't matter.
Catherine, could I ask you to...
I won't do this play with poultry on my head!
She gonna be a pain all the way?
You picked it?
No way!
- You don't recognize me?
- I do...
No, you don't.
You once dined at my house, after your concert.
There was a fabulous blue Braque!
Right.
I'm selling it.
I'm selling everything, on March 17th at 9 PM.
Come, it'll be a good auction.
I can't.
I'm playing here.
It'll be a good concert, I hope!
- Come in.
Take a look!
- Thanks, but I need a breather...
- You're selling everything?
- Yes.
Why?
A collection is a living thing.
When its heart stops beating, it's over.
I began as a cabbie, I don't want to end a museum guard.
I'll stop by.
Here.
It's all in there.
My complete works!
I'm quitting the show.
I told you!
You told them?
They're devastated.
I don't give a shit!
150,000 Euros an episode, 6 episodes a year for 3 years.
You'll be rich, you can quit work.
I don't want to quit working.
Just that shitty soap!
Dessert?
Coffee?
Herb tea with fake sugar, please.
Sorry, I hadn't recognized you.
You're amazing!
My grandma and I adore you!
That's nice.
No dessert, you sure?
Jessica!
Excuse me.
Never recognize a customer!
- But she's...
- Precisely!
Don't push our desserts or make comments!
Never say:
"They're all coming at once".
It's a restaurant!
That's what happens!
Yes, sir.
The name's Marcel!
Any news from Alain Renais?
- His film's been postponed.
- Good!
He wouldn't have picked me anyway.
May we congratulate you?
Thanks.
You're fabulous!
We never miss an episode!
Thanks.
I've had it to here!
You're edgy.
You open in 3 days...
Don't bet on it!
What do you mean?
That assistant flaunting her boobs and her dumb dad may do me in!
Working with your daughter should be fun.
And your ex-husband's the best, even if he drinks.
Does he still?
Not even!
It's a nightmare.
The play's dumb, I'm treated like a factory worker.
I added a chocolate.
Is he here?
- Who?
- He's in Paris.
I spoke to his casting director, Magali Garrel.
That bitch?
She hates me!
Forget it.
We were in drama school.
Her whole career was 2 walk-ons!
You've got to talk to him!
He's sticking to his list.
Sure, Binoche, Baye, Adjani.
We know that list.
And Bellucci, too.
To play Simone de Beauvoir?
Why not Sophia Loren?
OK... he's in Paris, he's staying at the Plaza.
I'll try to get him to cross the street and see your show.
How was that?
You want to destroy me?
You know Feydeau's plays!
Wait till you see my hat!
Sobinski won't hire me to clean Sartre and Beauvoir's toilet!
Listen...
I dropped off a tape at his hotel.
Of "Her Honor the Mayor"?
You didn't?
Working with slave-drivers is tough, manic-depressives are worse.
I'm not manic-depressive, I'm bipolar.
It's not the same.
Sure.
Try to get some sleep, OK?
I'll call you.
Wait.
How do you know about Bellucci?
She's my client now.
You kidding me?
No.
I'd say you're her client!
Bastard!
Dirty pimp!
Bellucci!
Hi.
Mr Lefort's dressing room, please?
- Who wants to know?
- I work at the Bar des Théâtres.
They hire girls now?
Since this morning.
I'm on trial.
He's in the presidential dressing-room.
Across the stage, up the stairs, 3rd floor.
His name's on the door.
Thanks.
Thanks.
Mint cordial, right?
Marcel wasn't sure.
- They hire girls over there now?
- I'm on trial.
- This is for you.
It goes on my tab.
- Thanks.
It really is presidential here.
Sorry?
You sleep here?
I wish I did.
There's even a shower.
You ever go to concerts?
Not a chance.
Why not?
I like music, but that's it.
Classical music doesn't...
I don't know it well.
Know that?
Sure.
Twinkle, twinkle little star How I wonder what you are
Up above the world so high like a diamond in the sky
Twinkle, twinkle little star How I wonder what you are
It's Mozart.
Drives me nuts!
I never learned.
No musical education.
Don't apologize!
I'm apologizing to you.
Don't.
Why?
Because you're young, you sing in tune, and you never go to concerts.
For you it's another world.
A chic, snooty world, right?
I'm sick of it.
Does that surprise you?
Sure does.
You play so well.
- For instance, you're a waitress...
- Not really.
Oh, yeah?
It's a long story.
Anyway... if you want to quit being a waitress, everybody will understand.
But a concert pianist... nobody understands!
Not even you, who shunt concerts.
Sit down.
Is it a very long story?
Once I get started, I can't stop.
I've got time.
OK, here goes...
My parents died when I was little, and my grandma raised me.
The Braque needs a better place.
I agree.
- You know Valerie?
- Of course.
It's coming along.
What's amusing is that now I can sell them... but I could never buy them.
- Mr Grumberg?
- Yes.
There's a man waiting for you across the street in the bar.
- A man?
- Mr Grumberg?
Yes, that's me.
He's called Mr Grumberg, too.
"The Kiss".
There are 5 of them.
This one's carved in stone.
It makes you want to fall in love.
He'd appreciate that.
Brancusi would.
You're not in love?
No longer.
Jacques, come over here a moment.
"What came over you?"
"No!
Stop wandering around in your nightgown!"
Wait.
Can I add a "please"?
"Please, what came over you?"
If you want.
Keep going.
"In your nightgown, wearing your hat!"
"I'll remove it later.
Now tell me..."
"Your hat be damned!
"A mother who changes her nightgown in front of her son..."
- "A boy of 12!" - "Sorry, 13!"
"No, 12!" Can I drop the "No"?
It works better if I just say "12".
But Feydeau wrote "No, 12!"
In modern speech, it's better if I say wearily, at the end of my tether, if I say "12!"
Get it?
The problem isn't modern speech patterns.
The problem, if you can do it, the problem is to find a modern tone for old-fashioned lines.
Get it?
"No, 12!"
That OK?
That's fine.
Wonderful!
"13, I tell you!
His birthday was 3 days ago!"
"Yes, well, 3 days!
- "Doesn't count!" - "Yes.
Nothing counts for you!"
Can I take out the "Yes"?
It plays better.
Felix, please, don't you start!
OK.
Thanks.
"You think he even knows what a woman is?"
Is this Claudel now?
What's going on?
She's dealing with exhibitionism!
With her own body!
She's bringing up incest!
At last Clarisse is becoming more than a dodo in a ridiculous hat!
I've told you, in Feydeau nothing is psychological!
Nothing at all!
Nonsense!
His mother was a Polish Jew!
"Why do you wander around stark naked?"
Sorry.
What?
300,000 an episode?
I see...
Put it there.
Thanks.
I'm in rehearsal.
I'll call you back.
"Stark naked?
What about my day gown?"
"It's worse!
"Transparent as tracing paper!"
"I get it!
Spit it out!
"You wish it was made of calico, or madapolam!"
A few eggheads in the audience may know what calico is, but madapolam?
Is Shakespeare unplayable?
Shakespeare is all about us!
He's totally modern!
Compared to Feydeau, he's a rap-singer!
You're a pain!
Screw you!
Let's move on.
- What are you doing here?
- Nothing.
She's right. "Madapolam"?
Zip!
During rehearsals, nobody comes in.
"Your hat be damned!
"Is it fitting for a mother..."
Jean-François!
They came from Tokyo to see you!
Tokyo?
They need to rest.
I'll see them later.
How's the faculty?
Still on the Protestants?
What's your next book?
"Reforms and Persecution in the 16th Century".
I just delivered it.
Your text is crap!
You're spouting crap!
I worked hard on it, and I'm not a writer.
"A transfusion...
the death of a collection...
"by heart-attack."
I thought Mom had the heart-attack!
"The Bible says:
There's a time to sell and a time to buy."
Why drag in the Bible?
Stick to Protestants, lay off the Bible!
So, Claudie, ready for the easy life?
She's retiring.
It was her choice.
Shit!
OK, you can take a break.
Mint cordial.
Things OK?
They could be better.
And with you?
They could be better.
You and your sister scorned my collection!
If I die tomorrow, you'll screw it up!
I'm planning for its future, as I planned for your lives.
It was all done:
You have your trust funds.
Thanks.
So, get off my back!
I know all about it:
You never forgave us for the time we spent in auction rooms, traveling, in galleries.
And the PTA meeting I missed because of a gallery opening.
You bring that up every time!
I hated them!
I always hated PTA meetings!
And school plays with 200 kids dressed up as lolipops.
I walked out after 10 minutes!
I shouldn't sell?
I started as a cabbie.
I won't end up a museum guard!
I know!
You have money now.
You never spend a dime!
You want to do everything differently.
You only buy computers and cheap sofas!
If that gets your rocks off!
We know how you get yours off now!
OK, then...
Let's talk about Valerie, since you know.
That's why you came, so let's hear your version.
To you, it's a great love story.
To me, it's a guy getting fleeced.
My great love story was with your mother.
So what do I do now?
Do I live or die?
Well, I'm living.
OK, she's too young, and it bugs you...
Because she's taller and slimmer than your wife.
If that amuses you...
Sorry.
You know, Frederic, comes a day... when time passing becomes time remaining.
You see things differently.
A new life... is like a house.
At your age, you build one.
At mine, you buy one.
Can I find a room around here?
There's plenty of rooms.
But a month's wages for you will buy dinner across the street.
As for a room...
Got no family?
Friends?
She's from Mâcon.
Jean-François...
You know my son?
The great Jean-François Lefort!
Don't you want to take a look?
Are you selling "The Kiss"?
I'm selling everything.
Why?
Got a small room?
And how much?
Room 412.
Facing the street, but with double windows.
Only 540 Euros.
It's vacant.
Thanks.
Sir!
Mr Grumberg!
You forgot this on the bench.
- I didn't forget it.
I left it.
- Sorry.
Something wrong?
I need to sit down for a few minutes.
Is it your back?
That hurts.
I tell my grandma to sit straight.
You live in this neighborhood?
Neighborhood?
I need a room and...
This is slut-city!
Look at her!
200 minks on her back.
Or her, with alligator feet.
It's not a neighborhood.
Unless you're looking for a sugar daddy.
The place is crawling with them.
Thanks for all the useful info.
- Don't mention it.
- Bye.
Can I keep it?
Thanks.
I believe in God, but to me, religions keep us from God.
As classical concerts keep us from music.
She should write it down.
It matters.
Now the questionnaire of the great Bernard Pivot on his TV show "Bouillon de culture".
OK, shoot.
Your favorite animal?
My favorite animal?
The peacock.
It's like us soloists on stage:
Dazzling but dumb.
How do you say that in Japanese?
That's us.
Write it down.
Thejob you wouldn't want?
Horowitz's.
But that's the job you have?
Sorry.
The interview is over.
A pity...
Come in!
- What should we remove?
- Sorry?
I called them.
There's too much furniture in here.
Take that, that and that!
The dresser, too.
Want your multi-vitamin juice?
Thanks.
I'll run you a bath.
Take that...
And that, too.
One day, he decided to sell it all.
To dump everything he spent a lifetime amassing.
Takes guts, no?
In Venice, you want the Hotel Gritti or the Monaco?
The Fenice needs an answer.
The work of a lifetime, dumped in 2 hrs!
Hold it! "The work of a lifetime".
He's not an artist, he invested in art.
That's totally different.
Like you, in a way.
The signed photo for your niece.
Thanks.
I've got mail for you.
Shit!
Can I come in?
There's more every day!
In that last episode you were great.
- I've started packing up.
- Soon you'll be on easy street.
Can I sit down?
They're due any minute.
More night shooting.
I'm bushed!
They drive me nuts!
And tomorrow's your opening night!
What was the last episode?
You married a lesbian couple, a dwarf and a paraplegic.
Made me cry.
So that's your memorabilia?
You heard of it?
I don't flaunt it here.
Pop music isn't Mr. Bercoff's thing.
My 30 years at the Olympia helped me get the job.
But here I keep a low profile.
Mr Coquatrix!
He wasn't fussy!
We had big stars, but also acrobats, circus dogs, trained fleas.
The people I met!
Even knew some intimately!
I was cute then.
I met a lot of people.
Like Gilbert Bécaud...
Hejust came in.
Into the Bar des Théâtres...
Him!
Sobinski!
With that bitch Magali Garrel!
I'm not made up, my hair's a mess.
We shot all night in a squat.
I'm a horrible sight.
He's coming over.
He's looking.
No, he isn't.
He sat down, didn't see me or know me.
Pascal, what do I do?
Think so?
What did you tell that dumb bitch?
Did you mention me to her?
Think so?
I don't dare.
I can't do that!
Balsamic vinegar with her croissant?
Why?
To dissolve the croissant.
Every morning!
Take it over!
- Balsamic vinegar!
- Stay there!
I can't say it, but when you married the paraplegic,
I almost cried.
Not now!
OK, I'm ready.
Scram!
Magali!
You, here?
Hi, Catherine.
- How are you?
- Fine.
Sure, you're appearing across the street.
Going OK?
Sort of...
How about you?
- Casting a new movie?
- I just finished up with Blier.
You know Brian?
Catherine Fersen...
Brian Sobinski.
I adored "Taxi Driver".
For me, it's...
Scorsese, of course!
I'm an idiot.
Your last film was so moving!
The one with...
Help me!
You know that actor...
Magali, you know...
No, well...
See you.
Shit!
Dumb bitch!
Fuck you!
- Catherine!
Things fine?
- Just great!
And you?
Fine.
We're having drinks before the concert tomorrow.
Drinks?
A party for you.
Your farewell is a big event!
Hello, Lucienne.
Show in Miss Rachida Lahoucine.
I have six Sartres to show you.
Her?
Catherine Fersen.
You met her and hardly looked at her.
Let's get to the point.
On Saturday, I'm marrying you to...
Mr Naoufel Larbi Lahoucine.
He's your cousin, right?
Come with me.
Brian, it's unthinkable.
She's a D list.
You phoned the bar, so here it is.
Thanks.
Catherine Fersen!
I adore her!
I missed that show.
You adore her?
Why?
Dunno...
She's every woman, all at once!
Tell me the truth.
Are you in love with this man?
Don't you have work to do?
No, I'm on my break.
Don't cry, Rachida.
Women who cry don't stand a chance.
Talk to him, Daniel!
Something's got to him.
What's wrong?
I don't know.
He won't listen to me, treats me like an enemy.
Says I don't love him anymore.
Maybe it'll pass, but he's a mess.
I'll say!
You love him?
Get him back on the track, or else!
Here he is!
He wanders in!
40 musicians!
Seen the time?
I canceled the rehearsal!
- We must talk.
- Not now!
A TV crew's coming to interview you.
You forgot?
No...
Well, yes.
Go get changed, I'll see you later.
Miss?
A grapefruit juice.
Sorry.
I hate being late.
A man without a cell phone, or a car can't be all bad.
Just impossible to live with!
Planter's Punch, please.
Glass of cold milk.
You...
You didn't tell him?
Why?
I doubt he'd have believed me.
Why not?
He talks of you, not as a saint but as a kind of monk or a preacher...
The idea of you and I having had a torrid affair, hejust wouldn't get it.
No chance he'II...?
He's in London till tonight.
I wanted to tell you...
My wife and I, that's all over.
What?
I'm staggered.
You left her?
Surprised?
Frankly, yes.
Why?
A man who's a pain to his mistress, can only be a pain to his wife.
Your ulcer?
Yes... no.
It moved.
No big deal.
Was I such a pain?
Your problems with your father.
Well, your mother's death, OK.
But your ulcer... your hatred of De Guise and Queen Catherine... your fears your wife would catch us...
- Yet we got on well at the time.
- Thanks to me, no?
Maybe.
Things have changed.
I have a cell phone now.
So if you feel like...
You're kidding me?
There's a man in my life, hadn't you heard?
Is that a problem?
That kind of stuff doesn't turn me on.
But you knew he was my dad?
So what?
Is he your good deed, or your good deal?
I have fun with him.
He teaches me things, takes me places.
He's proud of me.
- He calls me "sweetie".
- You don't say.
He shows me off to people.
He's full of pep, he loves life.
And you love money.
OK, I love money.
But I'm not a thief, Fred.
Don't call me Fred.
We won't marry, I don't want kids.
- That's a relief!
- So don't fuck us up!
Anything else, miss?
Know what?
If you want to, tell him.
Tell him we were lovers for 3 months, 3 years ago.
I don't care.
It'll just cause him a little pain.
That's what you want, right?
This is on me.
Now that I'm rich!
That's on me.
May I?
You overheard it all.
So tell me what you think.
I didn't mean to...
- What's your name?
- Jessica.
Another cold milk.
What'll you have?
Well...
OK, a Planter's Punch.
- Still your back?
- It's agony!
What's your name?
Frederic.
Tell me, why do you hate Queen Catherine?
I study and teach the Wars of Religion.
In fact, she fascinates me.
But that little gold-digger never got it.
- Did you find a room?
- I'm leaving, anyway.
I live in Mâcon, to be near my grandma.
She raised me, and now she's...
Raised you badly, it seems.
Right.
She taught me that a sweet tooth and curiosity never killed the cat.
Listening to you two was like watching
"The Bold and the Beautiful".
- Where do you teach?
- The Sorbonne.
But I'm changing my whole life.
- You tore it out?
- Yes.
Was it the Brancusi?
- How do you know?
- I saw it.
Even touched it.
My mother's favorite piece.
Put it back in there.
No, you keep it.
Who the hell is that?
What's the gold-digger's name?
Valérie.
Why?
She knows her way around.
You want to go back to her?
No, just testing her...
So it's macho stuff.
Pathetic.
So what's your exemplary life?
It's a long story, and once I get going...
If it's too long, I'll stop you.
To start, I lost my parents when I was 4.
This year, my boyfriend dumped me, so did my midwifery school:
A doc tried to rape me, and I kneed him in the balls.
So I think my luck's due to change, and things'll get better.
What makes you think that?
There's two kinds of people.
Those who say, when their phone rings "Who the hell's that?"
And those, like me, who say, "Hey!
"Who can that be?"
- Looks yummy!
- A peach melba, please!
We have contracts for the next 6 years, all signed!
Would you leave me?
Answer.
I love you for your playing.
A plumber or a banker,
I wouldn't look at!
That suit you?
I'm a pianist, always will be.
It's my life.
But I'm fed up with all this.
I want to play in hospitals, forests, for sick kids, old folks' homes, prisons, and in concert halls where people don't understand music.
But I'm through with this ritual, this costume.
I want out of the goddam system!
We're ready for you on stage, Mr Lefort!
Where do I fit in all this?
Am I part of the system?
That's up to you.
Listen, in 6 years...
Don't talk about contracts, dates, or how I'll go broke.
Talk to me about us!
I'll touch up your nose, it's shiny.
I'll teach piano, you and I in a house by a lake...
No more travels, less money...
Will you kill yourself?
I might.
Yes?
I'm still on the train.
I'll be in Paris soon.
It all went fine.
See you soon, sweetie.
I can't wait to see you, too.
Feels weird, huh?
Doesn't it!
They got it all wrong.
This phony replica.
After Tutankhamen's tomb, Mistinguett's bathroom, now we get "The Grumbergs' apartment".
Can you give me a hand?
Rack of lamb for me.
Me, too.
And a bottle of 1995 Marbuzet.
You speak French well.
Who the hell's that?
How about that!
But I've played all kinds of other roles.
In Koltes, Duras,
Lorca...
I like Feydeau because...
no psychology.
An incredible life... he died crazy...
His mother was a Polish Jew.
Let's talk about Simone.
Excuse me.
You wanted to talk to me about the script.
Sorry...
I had no time for lunch...
It takes place in college, then the start of the affair between Beauvoir and Sartre... until she met the American...
What renouncing?
Simone renounced nothing!
She was sex-mad under her holier-than-thou airs.
She went after Algren, seduced him, then dumped him.
There was no ambiguity!
Sartre was a lousy lay.
That's all.
Yes, he was.
She was the wild one!
She let him screw around with a lot of bimbos, supposedly with her blessing,
suffering hell, even posed as a lesbian to swipe girls who coveted him.
She was diabolical!
The turban, the hair parted down the middle was all sham.
Beneath it, she was a tornado!
Balsamic vinegar, please!
She was the rebel!
Who got mangled, who fought to stand up to men!
Who was ageless.
Look, I can be any age.
It's the role of my life.
Beauvoir is me.
She's in my blood.
Don't listen to the crap they say about me.
Please, not now!
Know what I'm paid for one episode of "Her Honor the Mayor"?
Whenever you're ready.
Fine.
I'll do a last voice test.
I needed a dresser and a chair, a room, in fact.
I had my things moved.
It's true, I made an investment.
I put all my energy and love into your career.
It wasn't a sacrifice.
I never regretted it.
We didn't have kids.
I can handle that.
Manager, dresser, secretary, nurse...
I'm happy to do it, it's a pleasure!
But a housemaid in the country,
I'm not sure I could.
Think it over, please.
You, too.
Whenever you're ready!
- You checked the lights "full on"?
- Everything's OK.
I wanted that lamp...
Higher!
I went to see my grandpa.
Too bad, you never met him.
He said to me:
"I think it's ugly, but that's good.
"Only buy things other people hate!"
That's better.
Yes, better.
Your mother and I did well for ourselves.
We handled all the trickiest twists and turns of life:
Loss of desire, wrinkles, my by-passes...
Know how?
We both had a hard-on for life every day, for 30...
No, 40 years, thanks to this collection, we built a dam against boredom, against time...
Like two beavers, adding twig after twig...
Is your back hurting?
No, not at all.
What's that?
Sorry, I was looking for the way out.
Hello, anyway.
Hi.
You said I could drop by, so...
Come in.
Catherine...
Jessica.
So still no room?
Tomorrow, maybe.
But for tonight...
This place is cool.
You can have Gilbert's sofa.
The springs are shot, but it's a bed of feathers, trust me.
I'm sentenced to prime-time TV for life.
It's true!
Kusturica, Resnais?
Forget them!
Sobinski thought I was a suicidal maniac.
And I am!
Anyway, thank God, there's Feydeau, "Popstars"...
You were on "Popstars"?
Yes, every year.
There!
That feels great.
Piaf used to say:
"You have the fingers of an angel".
What did Bécaud say when you tweaked his wienie?
Water's boiling.
- Pasta shells or macaroni?
- Pasta shells!
For me, life's simple.
For you two, it's trickier.
Mine's simple too:
She's leaving me.
Mine already left.
- Your wife?
- I'm such a pain.
So is she!
Mine's scared:
The two of us without all this, alone in the countryside, no kids.
But it doesn't bother me, I love her!
Well mine left me, but I was through with her.
For 13 years, she's been at all my concerts.
Uncompromising, strong beliefs...
What?
Uncompromising is bad enough, but strong beliefs, too!
You're both too young.
You too!
She took the elevator with you?
Going up?
Good.
Now you want to go back down?
If she won't go down with you, forget her!
Open the doors and boot her out.
Is she a musician?
- She plays the cello.
- There you are...
She lived through you.
If you take that away, what's she got left?
Don't listen.
He's got theories about everything nowadays.
To Valerie!
Who's Valerie?
A cute little golddigger, very nice and smart.
Am I right?
I love Valentine.
Nobody gets what they want, Jessica!
- But you have what everybody wants.
- Yeah, right.
Any balsamic?
I'm a compulsive eater.
In the restaurant, now here.
I peep at the audience before the curtain goes up.
Someone's always hoping to pounce on a closer seat.
They watch a free seat till the last minute.
When the lights go down, the fastest idiot dashes for it.
They're obsessed about being closer!
But if you keep at it, one day you wind up in the front row, and there you're too close to see anything!
She's not even listening.
Yes, I am... best seats...
front row.
Don't stop.
Be right there!
Sorry to have leave you, but tonight the cops bust a drunken mom in an ugly divorce.
Turns out she's not a drunk, the dad's a pervert, they're fighting over a kid, and I have to solve it.
See ya!
Your mother arrived in a sled, and she said to me:
"Why do you lie to everyone?"
"Your pretext:
"I'm selling, because now I couldn't buy them...
"In fact, you're selling out of pride.
"You want to hear the stakes going up,
"each extra dollar gets your rocks off.
"It's not the money, I know.
"It's pride.
"It means:
I was right.
"I understood before any of you,
"that one day this would be worth a fortune.
"And you lived for that day."
Was she right?
She wasn't wrong.
We've become friends.
She's great, even better in real life.
You'll make it.
Don't worry, it'll be great!
No, it won't wear you out!
And I have another surprise for you.
Love you, Grandma.
Big kiss!
Happy auction.
I hope you get your rocks off!
As to Valerie,
I'm guess she's allright.
Don't get carried away.
Why did you tell her you were in London?
Let's have lunch, some day soon.
- Looks like you were in bed.
- Me?
- Just got off work?
- No, it's just that...
Once again, it's a long story...
Care for a drink?
But not in there.
Come along.
Where was your bedroom?
Over the garage.
There were lots of trucks.
The freight, the airline, all that came later.
One day he broke his piggy bank and bought his first twig.
First twig?
It's the story of 2 beavers.
A cartoon?
For grown-ups.
It took me a while to understand.
Strong stuff!
In your nightly wanderings, have you found anything?
Found what?
What are you looking for?
The best seat in the house, not too close or too far back.
Is there an empty seat beside it?
My back is stuck...
- It hurts, there!
- Wait, bend your legs.
Breathe deeply...
Keep on breathing.
- That feel better?
- A bit.
Again.
In little puffs.
It's gone.
See?
It's a lovely baby girl!
A window table?
None, anywhere.
It's bedlam tonight!
Sorry!
We won't manage!
They're all coming in at once.
Thank you!
They're lovely!
Some chocolates.
We've got work to do!
- Mr Lefort!
- I thought I'd drop by.
How sweet of you!
Catherine!
Here, a trifle.
- You know Jean-François Lefort?
- No... of course I do.
Delighted.
- We'd better move.
- Seen Valentine?
Thanks, dear.
I wanted to say...
I hope it goes fine tonight, and...
And?
That's all.
Enjoy your meal!
What a nerve!
Well...
I wanted to be a performer.
But I didn't have enough...
No talent at all.
So, I thought I'd spend my life with performers.
And at that, I was a hit.
Thanks to them, and to you, I've had a great life.
Thanks!
I'll miss you all!
Too bad she's leaving.
Don't cry.
I'm sweating, right?
You're fine.
You'll be OK?
Ready?
I have the key, I'll lock up.
- Can I have a word with you?
- Can't it wait?
- But it's my last day...
- Your last day?
You said I was "on trial".
So I figured that...
What did you figure?
Hold it a second!
Please!
You figured what?
Must you bring it up now?
That even when you're being nice, you're nasty!
- I'm not, I'm doing my job.
- We're all doing that!
We all have problems!
You're no worse off than anyone.
You're not even a pianist or an actor or rich!
Can't you be nice to me just once?
Is there a Jessica here?
It's this delightful young woman!
A lady's waiting in my cab.
Keep it short!
My God!
Watch out!
You'll fall off!
Wait!
I don't believe it!
Careful!
You look wonderful!
We sign tomorrow.
They wanted 12 episodes.
I agreed to 6.
She has stagefright.
200,000!
250,000 in the back on my right.
It's 300,000 now!
400,000 on the balcony.
450,000 on my left.
500,000 in the back.
550,000.
600,000, who bids higher?
"Please, what came over you?"
"No!
Stop wandering around in your nightgown!
"Wearing that hat!"
- "You don't like my hat?" - "I do."
- "No, you don't!" - "Yes, I do."
"No, you disapprove of my hat!"
"My husband objects to my hat!"
- "Not at all." - "You do!"
"I'm not against it."
"Yes, you are!
Say it, and I'll take it off!"
"There!
Now, let's hear it!"
"I don't give a fig about your hat.
So take it off!
"But should a mother wander around
"in a nightgown in front of her son?"
"A 12-year old boy!"
- "No, 13!" - "12!"
"No, 13. 3 days ago."
"2 or 3 days don't count!"
"Nothing counts with you!"
"Hat or no hat!
"With or without your nightgown!"
"You're amazing tonight, Clarisse!"
500,000!
600,000 on my left!
700,000... 800,000 on the phone.
It's your bid.
It's your bid.
800,000 on my left by phone...
Sold!
"I've been stung by a wasp!"
"Poor Madame!"
"Because you wander around naked!"
"He's delighted by it!
"A wasp!
I hope it wasn't poisonous!"
We move on to lot 28, a fine Modigliani that was exhibited and reproduced in the catalogue, and we start at... 3,000,000 Euros...
3,200,000... 3,200,000...
against the bid on my left, 3,500,000 in the back, it's your bid, madame...
Now it's 3,500,000...
3,900,000...
"Julien!"
- "What?" - "I beg you..."
"Suck me!"
"I mean really, Clarisse..."
"Suck me!
As you did for Miss Dieumamour!"
"But, Clarisse, it was her neck!
Not her...
"It was a fly, not a wasp!"
"Wasps can be deadly!
"I saw in the paper, a man died of a wasp sting!"
"Victor, water the plants!"
I'm so hot in here.
Aren't you?
I always found that so uncomfortable!
If you knew...
I feel better now.
But I'll play the finale for you.
Can we go on?
Two bars before S.
Sold to the lady on the left in the back.
Next is lot 31, Brancusi's "The Kiss", 1925, in brown stone, the only one of its kind, a very rare piece.
I'll start the bidding at... 2,000,000 Euros.
2,200000.
2,400000...
2,600000...
To the man standing at the back.
2,800000 to you, madame.
Now a bid on the phone at 2, 900000.
3,000000!
To the man at the back...
3,200000!
3,500,000 to the same bidder, 3,500000 to the man at the back.
Who'll bid more?
3,700000 on the right.
3,900000 in the back on the left.
We're still at 3,900000 in the back...
I'm sorry, I've just been told that lot 31 has been withdrawn...
It's the seller's right if the hammer hasn't come down.
Next is lot 32, a fine work by Fernand Léger, a fine painting that we'll start at 2,000000...
Feel better?
Catherine, fabulous!
Let me tell you...
Shut up, witch!
Save the poisoned apples for Snow White!
Mother, you made it!
Come in!
Be right back, girls...
Darling, you were wonderful...
In a moment!
You're my Simone.
Can I help you?
Expecting someone?
My granddaughter.
She works across the street.
Is that Jessica?
- She told me about you.
- Really?
I work nearby, too.
I'm a musician.
You're a lucky man.
This is for you.
How sweet of you!
Darling!
- It's only for one night...
- Thank God!
I know the prices!
This isn't madapolam!
It's crazy.
Are you sure?
I pre-paid.
You'll have a rose with breakfast.
But no diamonds...
Did I ever tell you how I started at the Ritz?
No.
Tell me tomorrow!
You're not staying?
I have a date.
Come give me a kiss!
You're my ray of sunshine.
Your date is a lucky man.
It's too simple.
Declarations of war and of love, all at once.
It's too simple.
As for your strip-tease before an audience...
Is it a love letter or a farewell letter?
Which do you prefer?
I want us to be together.
You're my wife, my soldier.
My war isn't with you.
But I warn you, that lake house...
How about a beach house?
I'm cold.
Come... let's go home.
It was a lovely concert.
You played the 2nd movement beautifully...
You have to take risks, Jessica.
I pushed my way in.
And you know, Jessica, I had a wonderful life.
Madapolam:
Coarse cotton fabric, between calico and percale.
Named afterthe city in India where it was made.
Subtitles:
A. Whitelaw
Subtitling:
CMC
I loved jewelry.
Van Cleef, Boucheron, Cartier, they tickled my fancy!
One morning, I packed my bags and headed for Paris.
I knocked on every door!
But as I had no credentials,
I wound up at the Ritz:
Washroom attendant!
I always loved luxury.
But as I couldn't afford to live in it,
I went to work in it.
ORCHESTRA SEATS
I was a naive young thing, I admit it.
I always loved luxury.
Nothing but the finest hotels, only palaces.
You listening, Jessica?
Sure, Grandma.
Found ajob?
Not yet, but...
- Still on your mind?
- What?
Your boyfriend.
Less and less.
Don't stay here too long.
This place gets you down.
I like being with you.
Come and give me a kiss.
You're my ray of sunshine.
Could you switch on my soap?
People live too long now.
My dear neighbor, Augustine.
She's 92!
Her son's almost 70!
Know what?
She's ruining his old age.
The visits, the worries, costs.
It's expensive here, though it's not luxury, if you've known it!
I always loved luxury, but I couldn't afford to live in it,
I decided to work in it.
Did I tell you how I got ajob at the Ritz?
No, tell me, Grandma.
One day, I packed my bags and headed for Paris.
I knocked on every door!
I was a chambermaid, then a housekeeper.
Mornings,
I'd come out of the Metro and get to work...
There were flowers everywhere!
Those rooms smelled so good!
Roses on the trays, diamonds on the nightstand...
I always loved luxury, but I couldn't afford to live in it, so I pushed my way in!
Yes, I'm an experienced salesgirl.
I'm good in cloakrooms.
We don't hire women here.
Look around, no waitresses!
This place is special!
You experienced?
I've done lots of waitressing.
In brasseries, in Mâcon.
Why's it special?
It's not a brasserie, and this isn't Mâcon!
We're a microcosm.
Know what that is?
We get street-cleaners, nannies, models,
- Alain Delon...
- Alain Delon?
Not every day, but...
Wait.
Come over here.
Sit down.
That's the manager of the theater opposite.
Breakfasts here every morning.
We're his second office.
We get stagehands, hotel doormen...
Everyone can afford our prices.
Millionaires come when they're bored with room-service.
A good ham-sandwich makes them feel at home.
And this area has no supermarkets or drugstores.
Just us.
But we don't hire women.
Never!
Why not?
Tradition.
But with the 17th coming up...
- Why the 17th?
- There's a concert, an opening night, and an art auction.
All at once.
Think of it!
I got 2 waiters out sick.
We'll be swamped.
- Can you make steak tartare?
- Me?
I'm a whiz!
Ladies and gents, we resume at 2 PM.
You're in great shape!
Your wife's still as beautiful.
We have the dates for Salzburg.
You prefer 11-18th of June, or the 8-12th of July?
No, we're at Carnegie Hall in June.
Must be July.
There's still time.
2012 is around the corner!
Meanwhile, where do we lunch?
Keep well!
Hope you wind up in my cab again!
You kept everyone waiting!
You're a pain!
Serge, your voice isn't projecting!
Traffic jams, I presume?
We shot all night in a freezing squat!
I slept an hour!
Thanks to the traffic!
So if you're even faintly unpleasant, I'm outta here!
- "So you could eavesdrop!" - "From the window?"
Doesn't matter.
Catherine, could I ask you to...
I won't do this play with poultry on my head!
She gonna be a pain all the way?
You picked it?
No way!
- You don't recognize me?
- I do...
No, you don't.
You once dined at my house, after your concert.
There was a fabulous blue Braque!
Right.
I'm selling it.
I'm selling everything, on March 17th at 9 PM.
Come, it'll be a good auction.
I can't.
I'm playing here.
It'll be a good concert, I hope!
- Come in.
Take a look!
- Thanks, but I need a breather...
- You're selling everything?
- Yes.
Why?
A collection is a living thing.
When its heart stops beating, it's over.
I began as a cabbie, I don't want to end a museum guard.
I'll stop by.
Here.
It's all in there.
My complete works!
I'm quitting the show.
I told you!
You told them?
They're devastated.
I don't give a shit!
150,000 Euros an episode, 6 episodes a year for 3 years.
You'll be rich, you can quit work.
I don't want to quit working.
Just that shitty soap!
Dessert?
Coffee?
Herb tea with fake sugar, please.
Sorry, I hadn't recognized you.
You're amazing!
My grandma and I adore you!
That's nice.
No dessert, you sure?
Jessica!
Excuse me.
Never recognize a customer!
- But she's...
- Precisely!
Don't push our desserts or make comments!
Never say:
"They're all coming at once".
It's a restaurant!
That's what happens!
Yes, sir.
The name's Marcel!
Any news from Alain Renais?
- His film's been postponed.
- Good!
He wouldn't have picked me anyway.
May we congratulate you?
Thanks.
You're fabulous!
We never miss an episode!
Thanks.
I've had it to here!
You're edgy.
You open in 3 days...
Don't bet on it!
What do you mean?
That assistant flaunting her boobs and her dumb dad may do me in!
Working with your daughter should be fun.
And your ex-husband's the best, even if he drinks.
Does he still?
Not even!
It's a nightmare.
The play's dumb, I'm treated like a factory worker.
I added a chocolate.
Is he here?
- Who?
- He's in Paris.
I spoke to his casting director, Magali Garrel.
That bitch?
She hates me!
Forget it.
We were in drama school.
Her whole career was 2 walk-ons!
You've got to talk to him!
He's sticking to his list.
Sure, Binoche, Baye, Adjani.
We know that list.
And Bellucci, too.
To play Simone de Beauvoir?
Why not Sophia Loren?
OK... he's in Paris, he's staying at the Plaza.
I'll try to get him to cross the street and see your show.
How was that?
You want to destroy me?
You know Feydeau's plays!
Wait till you see my hat!
Sobinski won't hire me to clean Sartre and Beauvoir's toilet!
Listen...
I dropped off a tape at his hotel.
Of "Her Honor the Mayor"?
You didn't?
Working with slave-drivers is tough, manic-depressives are worse.
I'm not manic-depressive, I'm bipolar.
It's not the same.
Sure.
Try to get some sleep, OK?
I'll call you.
Wait.
How do you know about Bellucci?
She's my client now.
You kidding me?
No.
I'd say you're her client!
Bastard!
Dirty pimp!
Bellucci!
Hi.
Mr Lefort's dressing room, please?
- Who wants to know?
- I work at the Bar des Théâtres.
They hire girls now?
Since this morning.
I'm on trial.
He's in the presidential dressing-room.
Across the stage, up the stairs, 3rd floor.
His name's on the door.
Thanks.
Thanks.
Mint cordial, right?
Marcel wasn't sure.
- They hire girls over there now?
- I'm on trial.
- This is for you.
It goes on my tab.
- Thanks.
It really is presidential here.
Sorry?
You sleep here?
I wish I did.
There's even a shower.
You ever go to concerts?
Not a chance.
Why not?
I like music, but that's it.
Classical music doesn't...
I don't know it well.
Know that?
Sure.
Twinkle, twinkle little star How I wonder what you are
Up above the world so high like a diamond in the sky
Twinkle, twinkle little star How I wonder what you are
It's Mozart.
Drives me nuts!
I never learned.
No musical education.
Don't apologize!
I'm apologizing to you.
Don't.
Why?
Because you're young, you sing in tune, and you never go to concerts.
For you it's another world.
A chic, snooty world, right?
I'm sick of it.
Does that surprise you?
Sure does.
You play so well.
- For instance, you're a waitress...
- Not really.
Oh, yeah?
It's a long story.
Anyway... if you want to quit being a waitress, everybody will understand.
But a concert pianist... nobody understands!
Not even you, who shunt concerts.
Sit down.
Is it a very long story?
Once I get started, I can't stop.
I've got time.
OK, here goes...
My parents died when I was little, and my grandma raised me.
The Braque needs a better place.
I agree.
- You know Valerie?
- Of course.
It's coming along.
What's amusing is that now I can sell them... but I could never buy them.
- Mr Grumberg?
- Yes.
There's a man waiting for you across the street in the bar.
- A man?
- Mr Grumberg?
Yes, that's me.
He's called Mr Grumberg, too.
"The Kiss".
There are 5 of them.
This one's carved in stone.
It makes you want to fall in love.
He'd appreciate that.
Brancusi would.
You're not in love?
No longer.
Jacques, come over here a moment.
"What came over you?"
"No!
Stop wandering around in your nightgown!"
Wait.
Can I add a "please"?
"Please, what came over you?"
If you want.
Keep going.
"In your nightgown, wearing your hat!"
"I'll remove it later.
Now tell me..."
"Your hat be damned!
"A mother who changes her nightgown in front of her son..."
- "A boy of 12!" - "Sorry, 13!"
"No, 12!" Can I drop the "No"?
It works better if I just say "12".
But Feydeau wrote "No, 12!"
In modern speech, it's better if I say wearily, at the end of my tether, if I say "12!"
Get it?
The problem isn't modern speech patterns.
The problem, if you can do it, the problem is to find a modern tone for old-fashioned lines.
Get it?
"No, 12!"
That OK?
That's fine.
Wonderful!
"13, I tell you!
His birthday was 3 days ago!"
"Yes, well, 3 days!
- "Doesn't count!" - "Yes.
Nothing counts for you!"
Can I take out the "Yes"?
It plays better.
Felix, please, don't you start!
OK.
Thanks.
"You think he even knows what a woman is?"
Is this Claudel now?
What's going on?
She's dealing with exhibitionism!
With her own body!
She's bringing up incest!
At last Clarisse is becoming more than a dodo in a ridiculous hat!
I've told you, in Feydeau nothing is psychological!
Nothing at all!
Nonsense!
His mother was a Polish Jew!
"Why do you wander around stark naked?"
Sorry.
What?
300,000 an episode?
I see...
Put it there.
Thanks.
I'm in rehearsal.
I'll call you back.
"Stark naked?
What about my day gown?"
"It's worse!
"Transparent as tracing paper!"
"I get it!
Spit it out!
"You wish it was made of calico, or madapolam!"
A few eggheads in the audience may know what calico is, but madapolam?
Is Shakespeare unplayable?
Shakespeare is all about us!
He's totally modern!
Compared to Feydeau, he's a rap-singer!
You're a pain!
Screw you!
Let's move on.
- What are you doing here?
- Nothing.
She's right. "Madapolam"?
Zip!
During rehearsals, nobody comes in.
"Your hat be damned!
"Is it fitting for a mother..."
Jean-François!
They came from Tokyo to see you!
Tokyo?
They need to rest.
I'll see them later.
How's the faculty?
Still on the Protestants?
What's your next book?
"Reforms and Persecution in the 16th Century".
I just delivered it.
Your text is crap!
You're spouting crap!
I worked hard on it, and I'm not a writer.
"A transfusion...
the death of a collection...
"by heart-attack."
I thought Mom had the heart-attack!
"The Bible says:
There's a time to sell and a time to buy."
Why drag in the Bible?
Stick to Protestants, lay off the Bible!
So, Claudie, ready for the easy life?
She's retiring.
It was her choice.
Shit!
OK, you can take a break.
Mint cordial.
Things OK?
They could be better.
And with you?
They could be better.
You and your sister scorned my collection!
If I die tomorrow, you'll screw it up!
I'm planning for its future, as I planned for your lives.
It was all done:
You have your trust funds.
Thanks.
So, get off my back!
I know all about it:
You never forgave us for the time we spent in auction rooms, traveling, in galleries.
And the PTA meeting I missed because of a gallery opening.
You bring that up every time!
I hated them!
I always hated PTA meetings!
And school plays with 200 kids dressed up as lolipops.
I walked out after 10 minutes!
I shouldn't sell?
I started as a cabbie.
I won't end up a museum guard!
I know!
You have money now.
You never spend a dime!
You want to do everything differently.
You only buy computers and cheap sofas!
If that gets your rocks off!
We know how you get yours off now!
OK, then...
Let's talk about Valerie, since you know.
That's why you came, so let's hear your version.
To you, it's a great love story.
To me, it's a guy getting fleeced.
My great love story was with your mother.
So what do I do now?
Do I live or die?
Well, I'm living.
OK, she's too young, and it bugs you...
Because she's taller and slimmer than your wife.
If that amuses you...
Sorry.
You know, Frederic, comes a day... when time passing becomes time remaining.
You see things differently.
A new life... is like a house.
At your age, you build one.
At mine, you buy one.
Can I find a room around here?
There's plenty of rooms.
But a month's wages for you will buy dinner across the street.
As for a room...
Got no family?
Friends?
She's from Mâcon.
Jean-François...
You know my son?
The great Jean-François Lefort!
Don't you want to take a look?
Are you selling "The Kiss"?
I'm selling everything.
Why?
Got a small room?
And how much?
Room 412.
Facing the street, but with double windows.
Only 540 Euros.
It's vacant.
Thanks.
Sir!
Mr Grumberg!
You forgot this on the bench.
- I didn't forget it.
I left it.
- Sorry.
Something wrong?
I need to sit down for a few minutes.
Is it your back?
That hurts.
I tell my grandma to sit straight.
You live in this neighborhood?
Neighborhood?
I need a room and...
This is slut-city!
Look at her!
200 minks on her back.
Or her, with alligator feet.
It's not a neighborhood.
Unless you're looking for a sugar daddy.
The place is crawling with them.
Thanks for all the useful info.
- Don't mention it.
- Bye.
Can I keep it?
Thanks.
I believe in God, but to me, religions keep us from God.
As classical concerts keep us from music.
She should write it down.
It matters.
Now the questionnaire of the great Bernard Pivot on his TV show "Bouillon de culture".
OK, shoot.
Your favorite animal?
My favorite animal?
The peacock.
It's like us soloists on stage:
Dazzling but dumb.
How do you say that in Japanese?
That's us.
Write it down.
Thejob you wouldn't want?
Horowitz's.
But that's the job you have?
Sorry.
The interview is over.
A pity...
Come in!
- What should we remove?
- Sorry?
I called them.
There's too much furniture in here.
Take that, that and that!
The dresser, too.
Want your multi-vitamin juice?
Thanks.
I'll run you a bath.
Take that...
And that, too.
One day, he decided to sell it all.
To dump everything he spent a lifetime amassing.
Takes guts, no?
In Venice, you want the Hotel Gritti or the Monaco?
The Fenice needs an answer.
The work of a lifetime, dumped in 2 hrs!
Hold it! "The work of a lifetime".
He's not an artist, he invested in art.
That's totally different.
Like you, in a way.
The signed photo for your niece.
Thanks.
I've got mail for you.
Shit!
Can I come in?
There's more every day!
In that last episode you were great.
- I've started packing up.
- Soon you'll be on easy street.
Can I sit down?
They're due any minute.
More night shooting.
I'm bushed!
They drive me nuts!
And tomorrow's your opening night!
What was the last episode?
You married a lesbian couple, a dwarf and a paraplegic.
Made me cry.
So that's your memorabilia?
You heard of it?
I don't flaunt it here.
Pop music isn't Mr. Bercoff's thing.
My 30 years at the Olympia helped me get the job.
But here I keep a low profile.
Mr Coquatrix!
He wasn't fussy!
We had big stars, but also acrobats, circus dogs, trained fleas.
The people I met!
Even knew some intimately!
I was cute then.
I met a lot of people.
Like Gilbert Bécaud...
Hejust came in.
Into the Bar des Théâtres...
Him!
Sobinski!
With that bitch Magali Garrel!
I'm not made up, my hair's a mess.
We shot all night in a squat.
I'm a horrible sight.
He's coming over.
He's looking.
No, he isn't.
He sat down, didn't see me or know me.
Pascal, what do I do?
Think so?
What did you tell that dumb bitch?
Did you mention me to her?
Think so?
I don't dare.
I can't do that!
Balsamic vinegar with her croissant?
Why?
To dissolve the croissant.
Every morning!
Take it over!
- Balsamic vinegar!
- Stay there!
I can't say it, but when you married the paraplegic,
I almost cried.
Not now!
OK, I'm ready.
Scram!
Magali!
You, here?
Hi, Catherine.
- How are you?
- Fine.
Sure, you're appearing across the street.
Going OK?
Sort of...
How about you?
- Casting a new movie?
- I just finished up with Blier.
You know Brian?
Catherine Fersen...
Brian Sobinski.
I adored "Taxi Driver".
For me, it's...
Scorsese, of course!
I'm an idiot.
Your last film was so moving!
The one with...
Help me!
You know that actor...
Magali, you know...
No, well...
See you.
Shit!
Dumb bitch!
Fuck you!
- Catherine!
Things fine?
- Just great!
And you?
Fine.
We're having drinks before the concert tomorrow.
Drinks?
A party for you.
Your farewell is a big event!
Hello, Lucienne.
Show in Miss Rachida Lahoucine.
I have six Sartres to show you.
Her?
Catherine Fersen.
You met her and hardly looked at her.
Let's get to the point.
On Saturday, I'm marrying you to...
Mr Naoufel Larbi Lahoucine.
He's your cousin, right?
Come with me.
Brian, it's unthinkable.
She's a D list.
You phoned the bar, so here it is.
Thanks.
Catherine Fersen!
I adore her!
I missed that show.
You adore her?
Why?
Dunno...
She's every woman, all at once!
Tell me the truth.
Are you in love with this man?
Don't you have work to do?
No, I'm on my break.
Don't cry, Rachida.
Women who cry don't stand a chance.
Talk to him, Daniel!
Something's got to him.
What's wrong?
I don't know.
He won't listen to me, treats me like an enemy.
Says I don't love him anymore.
Maybe it'll pass, but he's a mess.
I'll say!
You love him?
Get him back on the track, or else!
Here he is!
He wanders in!
40 musicians!
Seen the time?
I canceled the rehearsal!
- We must talk.
- Not now!
A TV crew's coming to interview you.
You forgot?
No...
Well, yes.
Go get changed, I'll see you later.
Miss?
A grapefruit juice.
Sorry.
I hate being late.
A man without a cell phone, or a car can't be all bad.
Just impossible to live with!
Planter's Punch, please.
Glass of cold milk.
You...
You didn't tell him?
Why?
I doubt he'd have believed me.
Why not?
He talks of you, not as a saint but as a kind of monk or a preacher...
The idea of you and I having had a torrid affair, hejust wouldn't get it.
No chance he'II?
He's in London till tonight.
I wanted to tell you...
My wife and I, that's all over.
What?
I'm staggered.
You left her?
Surprised?
Frankly, yes.
Why?
A man who's a pain to his mistress, can only be a pain to his wife.
Your ulcer?
Yes... no.
It moved.
No big deal.
Was I such a pain?
Your problems with your father.
Well, your mother's death, OK.
But your ulcer... your hatred of De Guise and Queen Catherine... your fears your wife would catch us...
- Yet we got on well at the time.
- Thanks to me, no?
Maybe.
Things have changed.
I have a cell phone now.
So if you feel like...
You're kidding me?
There's a man in my life, hadn't you heard?
Is that a problem?
That kind of stuff doesn't turn me on.
But you knew he was my dad?
So what?
Is he your good deed, or your good deal?
I have fun with him.
He teaches me things, takes me places.
He's proud of me.
- He calls me "sweetie".
- You don't say.
He shows me off to people.
He's full of pep, he loves life.
And you love money.
OK, I love money.
But I'm not a thief, Fred.
Don't call me Fred.
We won't marry, I don't want kids.
- That's a relief!
- So don't fuck us up!
Anything else, miss?
Know what?
If you want to, tell him.
Tell him we were lovers for 3 months, 3 years ago.
I don't care.
It'll just cause him a little pain.
That's what you want, right?
This is on me.
Now that I'm rich!
That's on me.
May I?
You overheard it all.
So tell me what you think.
I didn't mean to...
- What's your name?
- Jessica.
Another cold milk.
What'll you have?
Well...
OK, a Planter's Punch.
- Still your back?
- It's agony!
What's your name?
Frederic.
Tell me, why do you hate Queen Catherine?
I study and teach the Wars of Religion.
In fact, she fascinates me.
But that little gold-digger never got it.
- Did you find a room?
- I'm leaving, anyway.
I live in Mâcon, to be near my grandma.
She raised me, and now she's...
Raised you badly, it seems.
Right.
She taught me that a sweet tooth and curiosity never killed the cat.
Listening to you two was like watching
"The Bold and the Beautiful".
- Where do you teach?
- The Sorbonne.
But I'm changing my whole life.
- You tore it out?
- Yes.
Was it the Brancusi?
- How do you know?
- I saw it.
Even touched it.
My mother's favorite piece.
Put it back in there.
No, you keep it.
Who the hell is that?
What's the gold-digger's name?
Valérie.
Why?
She knows her way around.
You want to go back to her?
No, just testing her...
So it's macho stuff.
Pathetic.
So what's your exemplary life?
It's a long story, and once I get going...
If it's too long, I'll stop you.
To start, I lost my parents when I was 4.
This year, my boyfriend dumped me, so did my midwifery school:
A doc tried to rape me, and I kneed him in the balls.
So I think my luck's due to change, and things'll get better.
What makes you think that?
There's two kinds of people.
Those who say, when their phone rings "Who the hell's that?"
And those, like me, who say, "Hey!
"Who can that be?"
- Looks yummy!
- A peach melba, please!
We have contracts for the next 6 years, all signed!
Would you leave me?
Answer.
I love you for your playing.
A plumber or a banker,
I wouldn't look at!
That suit you?
I'm a pianist, always will be.
It's my life.
But I'm fed up with all this.
I want to play in hospitals, forests, for sick kids, old folks' homes, prisons, and in concert halls where people don't understand music.
But I'm through with this ritual, this costume.
I want out of the goddam system!
We're ready for you on stage, Mr Lefort!
Where do I fit in all this?
Am I part of the system?
That's up to you.
Listen, in 6 years...
Don't talk about contracts, dates, or how I'll go broke.
Talk to me about us!
I'll touch up your nose, it's shiny.
I'll teach piano, you and I in a house by a lake...
No more travels, less money...
Will you kill yourself?
I might.
Yes?
I'm still on the train.
I'll be in Paris soon.
It all went fine.
See you soon, sweetie.
I can't wait to see you, too.
Feels weird, huh?
Doesn't it!
They got it all wrong.
This phony replica.
After Tutankhamen's tomb, Mistinguett's bathroom, now we get "The Grumbergs' apartment".
Can you give me a hand?
Rack of lamb for me.
Me, too.
And a bottle of 1995 Marbuzet.
You speak French well.
Who the hell's that?
How about that!
But I've played all kinds of other roles.
In Koltes, Duras,
Lorca...
I like Feydeau because...
no psychology.
An incredible life... he died crazy...
His mother was a Polish Jew.
Let's talk about Simone.
Excuse me.
You wanted to talk to me about the script.
Sorry...
I had no time for lunch...
It takes place in college, then the start of the affair between Beauvoir and Sartre... until she met the American...
What renouncing?
Simone renounced nothing!
She was sex-mad under her holier-than-thou airs.
She went after Algren, seduced him, then dumped him.
There was no ambiguity!
Sartre was a lousy lay.
That's all.
Yes, he was.
She was the wild one!
She let him screw around with a lot of bimbos, supposedly with her blessing,
suffering hell, even posed as a lesbian to swipe girls who coveted him.
She was diabolical!
The turban, the hair parted down the middle was all sham.
Beneath it, she was a tornado!
Balsamic vinegar, please!
She was the rebel!
Who got mangled, who fought to stand up to men!
Who was ageless.
Look, I can be any age.
It's the role of my life.
Beauvoir is me.
She's in my blood.
Don't listen to the crap they say about me.
Please, not now!
Know what I'm paid for one episode of "Her Honor the Mayor"?
Whenever you're ready.
Fine.
I'll do a last voice test.
I needed a dresser and a chair, a room, in fact.
I had my things moved.
It's true, I made an investment.
I put all my energy and love into your career.
It wasn't a sacrifice.
I never regretted it.
We didn't have kids.
I can handle that.
Manager, dresser, secretary, nurse...
I'm happy to do it, it's a pleasure!
But a housemaid in the country,
I'm not sure I could.
Think it over, please.
You, too.
Whenever you're ready!
- You checked the lights "full on"?
- Everything's OK.
I wanted that lamp...
Higher!
I went to see my grandpa.
Too bad, you never met him.
He said to me:
"I think it's ugly, but that's good.
"Only buy things other people hate!"
That's better.
Yes, better.
Your mother and I did well for ourselves.
We handled all the trickiest twists and turns of life:
Loss of desire, wrinkles, my by-passes...
Know how?
We both had a hard-on for life every day, for 30...
No, 40 years, thanks to this collection, we built a dam against boredom, against time...
Like two beavers, adding twig after twig...
Is your back hurting?
No, not at all.
What's that?
Sorry, I was looking for the way out.
Hello, anyway.
Hi.
You said I could drop by, so...
Come in.
Catherine...
Jessica.
So still no room?
Tomorrow, maybe.
But for tonight...
This place is cool.
You can have Gilbert's sofa.
The springs are shot, but it's a bed of feathers, trust me.
I'm sentenced to prime-time TV for life.
It's true!
Kusturica, Resnais?
Forget them!
Sobinski thought I was a suicidal maniac.
And I am!
Anyway, thank God, there's Feydeau, "Popstars"...
You were on "Popstars"?
Yes, every year.
There!
That feels great.
Piaf used to say:
"You have the fingers of an angel".
What did Bécaud say when you tweaked his wienie?
Water's boiling.
- Pasta shells or macaroni?
- Pasta shells!
For me, life's simple.
For you two, it's trickier.
Mine's simple too:
She's leaving me.
Mine already left.
- Your wife?
- I'm such a pain.
So is she!
Mine's scared:
The two of us without all this, alone in the countryside, no kids.
But it doesn't bother me, I love her!
Well mine left me, but I was through with her.
For 13 years, she's been at all my concerts.
Uncompromising, strong beliefs...
What?
Uncompromising is bad enough, but strong beliefs, too!
You're both too young.
You too!
She took the elevator with you?
Going up?
Good.
Now you want to go back down?
If she won't go down with you, forget her!
Open the doors and boot her out.
Is she a musician?
- She plays the cello.
- There you are...
She lived through you.
If you take that away, what's she got left?
Don't listen.
He's got theories about everything nowadays.
To Valerie!
Who's Valerie?
A cute little golddigger, very nice and smart.
Am I right?
I love Valentine.
Nobody gets what they want, Jessica!
- But you have what everybody wants.
- Yeah, right.
Any balsamic?
I'm a compulsive eater.
In the restaurant, now here.
I peep at the audience before the curtain goes up.
Someone's always hoping to pounce on a closer seat.
They watch a free seat till the last minute.
When the lights go down, the fastest idiot dashes for it.
They're obsessed about being closer!
But if you keep at it, one day you wind up in the front row, and there you're too close to see anything!
She's not even listening.
Yes, I am... best seats...
front row.
Don't stop.
Be right there!
Sorry to have leave you, but tonight the cops bust a drunken mom in an ugly divorce.
Turns out she's not a drunk, the dad's a pervert, they're fighting over a kid, and I have to solve it.
See ya!
Your mother arrived in a sled, and she said to me:
"Why do you lie to everyone?"
"Your pretext:
"I'm selling, because now I couldn't buy them...
"In fact, you're selling out of pride.
"You want to hear the stakes going up,
"each extra dollar gets your rocks off.
"It's not the money, I know.
"It's pride.
"It means:
I was right.
"I understood before any of you,
"that one day this would be worth a fortune.
"And you lived for that day."
Was she right?
She wasn't wrong.
We've become friends.
She's great, even better in real life.
You'll make it.
Don't worry, it'll be great!
No, it won't wear you out!
And I have another surprise for you.
Love you, Grandma.
Big kiss!
Happy auction.
I hope you get your rocks off!
As to Valerie,
I'm guess she's allright.
Don't get carried away.
Why did you tell her you were in London?
Let's have lunch, some day soon.
- Looks like you were in bed.
- Me?
- Just got off work?
- No, it's just that...
Once again, it's a long story...
Care for a drink?
But not in there.
Come along.
Where was your bedroom?
Over the garage.
There were lots of trucks.
The freight, the airline, all that came later.
One day he broke his piggy bank and bought his first twig.
First twig?
It's the story of 2 beavers.
A cartoon?
For grown-ups.
It took me a while to understand.
Strong stuff!
In your nightly wanderings, have you found anything?
Found what?
What are you looking for?
The best seat in the house, not too close or too far back.
Is there an empty seat beside it?
My back is stuck...
- It hurts, there!
- Wait, bend your legs.
Breathe deeply...
Keep on breathing.
- That feel better?
- A bit.
Again.
In little puffs.
It's gone.
See?
It's a lovely baby girl!
A window table?
None, anywhere.
It's bedlam tonight!
Sorry!
We won't manage!
They're all coming in at once.
Thank you!
They're lovely!
Some chocolates.
We've got work to do!
- Mr Lefort!
- I thought I'd drop by.
How sweet of you!
Catherine!
Here, a trifle.
- You know Jean-François Lefort?
- No... of course I do.
Delighted.
- We'd better move.
- Seen Valentine?
Thanks, dear.
I wanted to say...
I hope it goes fine tonight, and...
And?
That's all.
Enjoy your meal!
What a nerve!
Well...
I wanted to be a performer.
But I didn't have enough...
No talent at all.
So, I thought I'd spend my life with performers.
And at that, I was a hit.
Thanks to them, and to you, I've had a great life.
Thanks!
I'll miss you all!
Too bad she's leaving.
Don't cry.
I'm sweating, right?
You're fine.
You'll be OK?
Ready?
I have the key, I'll lock up.
- Can I have a word with you?
- Can't it wait?
- But it's my last day...
- Your last day?
You said I was "on trial".
So I figured that...
What did you figure?
Hold it a second!
Please!
You figured what?
Must you bring it up now?
That even when you're being nice, you're nasty!
- I'm not, I'm doing my job.
- We're all doing that!
We all have problems!
You're no worse off than anyone.
You're not even a pianist or an actor or rich!
Can't you be nice to me just once?
Is there a Jessica here?
It's this delightful young woman!
A lady's waiting in my cab.
Keep it short!
My God!
Watch out!
You'll fall off!
Wait!
I don't believe it!
Careful!
You look wonderful!
We sign tomorrow.
They wanted 12 episodes.
I agreed to 6.
She has stagefright.
200,000!
250,000 in the back on my right.
It's 300,000 now!
400,000 on the balcony.
450,000 on my left.
500,000 in the back.
550,000.
600,000, who bids higher?
"Please, what came over you?"
"No!
Stop wandering around in your nightgown!
"Wearing that hat!"
- "You don't like my hat?" - "I do."
- "No, you don't!" - "Yes, I do."
"No, you disapprove of my hat!"
"My husband objects to my hat!"
- "Not at all." - "You do!"
"I'm not against it."
"Yes, you are!
Say it, and I'll take it off!"
"There!
Now, let's hear it!"
"I don't give a fig about your hat.
So take it off!
"But should a mother wander around
"in a nightgown in front of her son?"
"A 12-year old boy!"
- "No, 13!" - "12!"
"No, 13. 3 days ago."
"2 or 3 days don't count!"
"Nothing counts with you!"
"Hat or no hat!
"With or without your nightgown!"
"You're amazing tonight, Clarisse!"
500,000!
600,000 on my left!
700,000... 800,000 on the phone.
It's your bid.
It's your bid.
800,000 on my left by phone...
Sold!
"I've been stung by a wasp!"
"Poor Madame!"
"Because you wander around naked!"
"He's delighted by it!
"A wasp!
I hope it wasn't poisonous!"
We move on to lot 28, a fine Modigliani that was exhibited and reproduced in the catalogue, and we start at... 3,000,000 Euros...
3,200,000... 3,200,000...
against the bid on my left, 3,500,000 in the back, it's your bid, madame...
Now it's 3,500,000...
3,900,000...
"Julien!"
- "What?" - "I beg you..."
"Suck me!"
"I mean really, Clarisse..."
"Suck me!
As you did for Miss Dieumamour!"
"But, Clarisse, it was her neck!
Not her...
"It was a fly, not a wasp!"
"Wasps can be deadly!
"I saw in the paper, a man died of a wasp sting!"
"Victor, water the plants!"
I'm so hot in here.
Aren't you?
I always found that so uncomfortable!
If you knew...
I feel better now.
But I'll play the finale for you.
Can we go on?
Two bars before S.
Sold to the lady on the left in the back.
Next is lot 31, Brancusi's "The Kiss", 1925, in brown stone, the only one of its kind, a very rare piece.
I'll start the bidding at... 2,000,000 Euros.
2,200000.
2,400000...
2,600000...
To the man standing at the back.
2,800000 to you, madame.
Now a bid on the phone at 2, 900000.
3,000000!
To the man at the back...
3,200000!
3,500,000 to the same bidder, 3,500000 to the man at the back.
Who'll bid more?
3,700000 on the right.
3,900000 in the back on the left.
We're still at 3,900000 in the back...
I'm sorry, I've just been told that lot 31 has been withdrawn...
It's the seller's right if the hammer hasn't come down.
Next is lot 32, a fine work by Fernand Léger, a fine painting that we'll start at 2,000000...
Feel better?
Catherine, fabulous!
Let me tell you...
Shut up, witch!
Save the poisoned apples for Snow White!
Mother, you made it!
Come in!
Be right back, girls...
Darling, you were wonderful...
In a moment!
You're my Simone.
Can I help you?
Expecting someone?
My granddaughter.
She works across the street.
Is that Jessica?
- She told me about you.
- Really?
I work nearby, too.
I'm a musician.
You're a lucky man.
This is for you.
How sweet of you!
Darling!
- It's only for one night...
- Thank God!
I know the prices!
This isn't madapolam!
It's crazy.
Are you sure?
I pre-paid.
You'll have a rose with breakfast.
But no diamonds...
Did I ever tell you how I started at the Ritz?
No.
Tell me tomorrow!
You're not staying?
I have a date.
Come give me a kiss!
You're my ray of sunshine.
Your date is a lucky man.
It's too simple.
Declarations of war and of love, all at once.
It's too simple.
As for your strip-tease before an audience...
Is it a love letter or a farewell letter?
Which do you prefer?
I want us to be together.
You're my wife, my soldier.
My war isn't with you.
But I warn you, that lake house...
How about a beach house?
I'm cold.
Come... let's go home.
It was a lovely concert.
You played the 2nd movement beautifully...
You have to take risks, Jessica.
I pushed my way in.
And you know, Jessica, I had a wonderful life.
Madapolam:
Coarse cotton fabric, between calico and percale.
Named afterthe city in India where it was made.
And so, after six months apart,
Aunt Lily and Uncle Marshall were finally back together.
Oh, my God.
These pancakes are delicious!
Yes.
Thank you.
Um, I learned how to cook while you were gone this summer.
Oh.
Do you want to cook dinner tonight?
Yeah, sure.
How about pancakes?
And things were back to normal... almost.
You may not have much range, but at least I'm marrying a guy who knows how to make pancakes.
Oh, um...
I mean, um...
Well, I...
I realize that we haven't really discussed whether us getting back together means us getting married, but...
I still wanna.
Do you still wanna?
Really?
Of course, I love you.
No, I mean, that's how you're gonna do it?
"Do you still wanna?" That's like the lamest proposal ever.
When I did it, I got down on my knees...
I don't know, I'm just saying.
Marshall Eriksen, will you ma...
- No, no, no, no, no, no.
- What?
!
You can't lead with that.
You got to... build up to that.
You got to have, like, a little speech.
Do you remember your proposal to me?
I had a speech prepared.
What do you want to hear?
I don't know.
I mean, you could tell me, like, about how good-looking and funny and smart I am and I've been working out lately.
It might be nice for you to mention something... about that.
Marshall...
- you are good-looking...
- Thank you.
- You're funny.
- Oh, thanks.
- You're smart.
- And a few tears wouldn't hurt.
Okay, would you freakin' marry me already?
I'll marry you.
Of course.
But, um, until you see a ring on this finger, don't expect me to put out.
Yeah, right.
Transcript :
Raceman Subtitles :
Willow's Team
I'll give you this.
That was a very creative use of syrup.
I can't even look Mrs. Butterworth in the eye.
Oh, my God.
We're getting married!
I know, I know.
It was a moment of happiness, followed of course by a moment of total panic.
See, when they called off their first wedding,
Aunt Lily took off for San Francisco leaving Uncle Marshall with the unfortunate task of telling his entire family.
Yeah, so now she's gone and the wedding's off.
What do you call someone who just takes off and leaves like that?
What do you call that?
I think that that's a little strong.
I can't even believe you would use a word like that.
Geez, Grandma.
Man, I made a big mess by canceling this wedding, didn't I?
It's okay, baby.
You're not just realizing that now, are you?
God, the idea of standing up there in front of all those people who hate my guts... just makes me want to run off to Atlantic City and get married today.
Yeah.
Coming up at 11:00:
Are there piranhas in the East River?
What you don't know...
could eat you.
Robin!
Stop the news!
- What the hell?
- It's okay.
They're my friends.
We're going to Atlantic City to elope.
You got to come with us.
Oh, my God, that is so fantastic!
I-I don't know if I can just leave work.
It's okay;
Mike can read the news tonight.
Hey, Mike...
you can read, right?
Yeah, I'm the best at reading.
- Let's go to Atlantic City!
- Yeah!
You guys are eloping!
Oh, that's fantastic.
Wait, is this because there's a time crunch Uncle Ted should know about?
I hope not because I plan on getting hammered.
Guys, this sounds like so much fun, but I can't really take off work.
I'm kind of important around here, you know?
I'm the project manager.
Ted, for the rest of our lives, we are going to be telling the amazing story of how we went to Atlantic City and got married.
Don't you want to be in that story?
Of course I do.
- Let's go to Atlantic City!
- Yeah!
Oh, but when we tell the story, can you leave out the part where I hesitate?
You got it.
Hey, guys.
Wow.
A pedicure.
Uh, if there were any shame in a dude getting a pedicure
I don't think there would have been a feature about it in Details magazine.
We're going to Atlantic City to elope right now!
Oh, congratulations, Lily.
Marshall, you're getting married?
What the hell?
So are you in or not?
Hell, yeah, I'm in!
Just...
I'm almost done.
- No, we got to get going to the...
- Well, actually, I mean...
It is my wedding day, and since we're here...
So we all got a pedicure and then headed down... to Atlantic City.
Wow.
Look at this place.
I guess I'll have my pick of something old.
And something blue.
Somebody should really check on this lady.
Ah, A.C., always in decline, never hitting bottom.
It's good to be back, old friend.
You been here before?
Oh, uh, once or twice.
Barney!
Ah, good to see you, too.
Three times, maybe.
The wedding chapel-- this is it.
Are you ready to do this?
I'm ready.
- Let's get married.
- Yeah.
Oh, crap.
I don't have a veil.
I'm a bride;
I can't get married without a veil.
And a bouquet.
I need a veil and a bouquet.
Oh, my God, we're getting married.
Don't worry.
Relax.
We'll get you a veil, honey.
Oh, Robin, that's a really cute outfit.
Oh, really?
Thanks.
Yeah, it has to go.
I'm the bride;
you can't look better than me.
Done.
I'm going to get the bouquet.
You guys get the veil.
We'll meet in the chapel in 20 minutes.
Ready, break.
You guys want to go gamble?
No, we got to go get the veil.
Or we looked everywhere, and we couldn't find one.
Yeah, okay.
No, you guys go ahead.
I'm going to find the veil.
So this is it, right?
The last 20 minutes of your single life.
- I'm proud of you, buddy.
- Thanks.
- How are you feeling?
- Great, a little nervous.
- Yeah?
Craps?
- Not that nervous.
- No, I mean do you want to play craps.
- Oh, yeah, definitely.
Okay, I got the veil.
She wasn't ready to be married.
All right, let's talk bachelor party.
Are we thinking full-on strip club, or should we rent a room and have a private toy show-- whew.
What did you just say?
- Barney, no.
- Marshall, I'm your best man.
- You're not my best man.
- Right here.
And as your best man, I have to throw you a bachelor party.
That's part of being a best friend.
- You're not my best friend.
- Right here.
Barney, I don't have any time for a bachelor party.
I've got, like, 18 minutes.
18 minutes.
Oh, good.
Did you get the veil?
Of course.
And it took us exactly 18 minutes.
We went to a strip club.
- Dude!
- Unbelievable!
We weren't there for very long.
It's not like I had time to have a lap dance or anything.
I got a lap dance.
- Your last lap dance ever.
- Right...
What?
Okay, I'm here.
Right?
Oh, God, the things people waste money on in Atlantic City.
Does it smell like strippers in here?
That's weird, right?
Marshall and Lily are getting married!
Hell, yeah, look at this.
Oh, baby, this is it.
- Let's do this thing.
- All right.
Hi.
We're here to get married.
Congratulations.
We offer a variety of packages to give you the special day you've always dreamed about.
We don't want any of that.
Just your basic quickie wedding will be fine.
Yeah.
You know this isn't Vegas, right?
Well, sure.
In Vegas, the casinos pump in oxygen.
Here, it looks like everyone brought their own.
What?
It also takes three days to get a marriage license in New Jersey.
The earliest I could book you for is Monday.
No, no, no, it has to be today.
That's the whole point.
Look, I don't know what to say, but if you guys don't want to book a wedding for Monday or play a round of keno, I can't help you.
Thirty-five.
Wait, I don't understand, people get married in Atlantic City all the time.
Yes, they do, but they don't elope.
They choose Atlantic City for its white sand beaches, world-class amenities, and exotic Riviera feel.
Have you been outside?
There is half an orca whale rotting not 20 feet from the cabana.
You guys, take it easy, guys.
Are you sure about this?
About the marriage laws of the state where I work in a wedding chapel?
Yeah, I'm pretty sure.
Bright side:
the bachelor party continues!
Yes!
Continues?
You mean "start." He means "start."
We went to a strip club.
Twenty-seven.
Is there any way that we could get a license today?
You could go to the courthouse.
In some extreme circumstances, the waiting period can be waived, but you have to have a good reason.
Well, we're in love.
What better reason could there be?
The last one I heard was,
"I'm going to Iraq tomorrow to defend my country,"
but, you know, give yours a whirl.
So we went to the courthouse.
God, this is taking forever.
Can't believe they're getting married.
I know.
I am so proud of these two.
After all they've been through.
In fact, that crazy road has led them all the way here to Atlantic City.
Ted, up here.
You were just staring at my shirt boobs.
No!
I wasn't.
I-I was checking out the hot bod underneath the shirt.
Okay, look, maybe I was looking at your shirt, but it's a, it's a funny, funny shirt.
Hey, it's Barney!
- Barney!
- Hi.
...suit up.
...legend.
...Daddy.
American daddy.
What the hell was that?
A...
Chinese guy?
Hi.
Hello.
Uh, we need a marriage license, but we need to skip the waiting period because... we're in love.
Aw.
I'm gonna waive this waiting period right now.
Oh, really?
!
Is what I would say if I could waive the waiting period, but unfortunately, only a judge can do that.
Oh.
Well, so can we see a judge?
- Absolutely.
- Really?
!
Is what I would say if there was any chance of you seeing a judge today, which there isn't.
Why are you doing this to us?
!
'Cause you're on Candid Camera!
- Really?
!
- Is what I would say...
You know what?
We get it.
Okay, this is a good plan B.
Judges are people.
People go to the batoom.
A judge is bound to come by eventually, and we'll get married.
I'm sure we won't be waiting long.
Geez, you go to a vending machine for 30 seconds.
Vultures.
What?
Here?
Yeah.
Got a little time to kill.
Oh, my God, it's the T-shirt, isn't it?
No.
A little.
Something is seriously wrong with you.
So what, is that a no?
- All right, let's do it.
- All right.
Um, also...?
- Yes, I'll leave it on.
- Sweet.
Guys, let's bail.
This is never gonna happen.
Look, I know this is turning into a bit of a disaster, but believe me, it's better than the alternative.
You throwing a big, free party with lots of booze and food and all your single, desperate girlfriends from college?
Yeah, glad we dodged that bullet.
Judge!
Judge, come on.
Come on, come on, come on!
- Turn it off.
- Okay.
May we please get married today?
Now, normally I would say no to a request like that, but you two impress me.
Just the fact that you've been together for ten years, standing by each other's side through thick and thin, never wavering.
- What was that?
- What was what?
That little look.
What was that?
A look of love.
You two have stood together through thick and thin, right?
- You know, what's thick, what's thin?
- Yeah, I mean, all... yeah.
I have.
All right, what was that look?
What's going on?
They broke up over the summer.
Lily totally ran off to San Francisco and these two just had sex in the closet.
What?
We're under oath.
No, we're not.
Yeah, we are.
He's a judge.
Wh-- did we take an oath?
Do you even know what an oath is?
Uh, yeah.
Courthouse.
Oath.
We're under it.
Guys.
It's looking like this isn't gonna happen.
No, Marshall, we are gonna get married today.
Baby, anyplace we go, we're gonna need a marriage license.
Except international waters.
So-so let's find a ship captain.
A ship captain can marry us.
There's boats all over this place.
Oh, is that what those wooden things are floating between the garbage?
This is a great idea.
This is gonna work.
Let's go.
Excuse me.
Are you a ship captain?
This is my machine.
- I should go talk to her.
- No, let me.
- Blackjack?
- Yeah.
Well, I found a guy who said he'd be willing to put his boat in my slip, so we're getting closer.
Okay, Lil, why is it so important to do this today?
Because... if we don't do it today,
I just know we're gonna wind up having a huge wedding with a huge crowd full of huge Midwestern people looking all disapproving and judging me while sipping little cups of mayonnaise and-and cracking runaway bride jokes all night long.
- Nobody's gonna do that.
- No, they're not because I'm not gonna give them the chance.
I'm gonna find a ship captain and we're gonna be married tonight.
Sweetie, this is crazy.
You're never gonna find a ship capt...
Hey, Lily.
Found a ship captain.
- What?
- Yeah.
First guy we talked to.
Ship captain.
How great is that?
See?
See, this is destiny.
So, captain, can you take us out to international waters and marry us?
I sure can.
If there's two things I love, it's bringing people together in marriage
- and making $5,000.
- What?
Deal. $5,000, okay, we can do that.
Come on, everybody.
Fork over your cash.
Don't think.
Just do it.
I can get us that money.
How?
Have you noticed that all day today
Chinese guys have been coming up and saying hi to me?
Yes.
Have you noticed I haven't asked about it because I'm too scared of the answer?
Well, those are my old gambling buddies.
Truth is...
I used to come here all the time.
Play an old Chinese game called "Shing Hasabu Shing".
Had a small gambling problem.
Actually, it wasn't so small.
I... kind of lost my entire life's savings.
But tonight, I don't know, I'm feeling hot.
I think I can win us that money.
No, we're not letting you gamble all our money away.
Uh, it's not gambling if you absolutely know you're going to win.
I'll get us that money.
I swear it, nay...
I oath it.
Now, I had been to a lot of casinos before that night, and I've been to a lot of casinos since, but in all that time I've never seen a game quite like this one.
To this day, I have no idea how it was played.
But luckily, Barney did.
Do you understand what's happening?
Not a clue.
Do you think he's winning?
I don't even know if he's playing.
Wait, I get it.
I understand this game.
No, you don't.
I totally understand the game, Theodore.
Barney, split your tiles.
You can triple your money if you find the jellybean.
Marshall, please.
Don't you think I know what I'm...
My God, you're right.
Wow.
It's beautiful.
Thanks, Barney.
Did you guys see me?
I was on fire tonight.
Man, I can't wait to get back to the shore.
God, I love gambling!
When we get home, we're gonna go to a little meeting.
Okay?
Why can't I do it just a little?
Okay.
Let's get this started.
Okay, uh... you guys want the serious one or the funny one?
Oh, I think...
serious would be best.
You sure?
I got a lot of great nautical jokes in there.
Like how you two float each other's boat, stuff like that.
Yeah, serious is probably good.
"We stand witness today
"to celebrate the union of Lily and Marshall.
"Today, you two will become one,
"sharing your lives,
"the happiness, the sadness,
"the frustrations and the joy..."
This is pretty cool.
I can't believe you never want to get married.
I never said "never."
"...to declare your love
"and devotion to each other
"in front of friends and family,
"all the people who matter most to you."
What was that?
What was what?
That little look.
You two just shared a look.
- We don't want to do this.
- We don't.
Are you kidding me?
You guys are calling off another wedding?
After I spent all this money on a bridesmaid shirt?
Did I bet someone that they'd call it off?
I did, didn't I?
Who'd I bet?
You actually expect any of us are gonna come to your third wedding?
Yes.
'Cause it's gonna be amazing.
Look, before I was afraid to face Marshall's family and-and I didn't want to do all that work, but... now that we're here...
I realize that I have to face Marshall's family and I really want to do all that work.
So do I.
And yeah... my family might still be upset with you.
But when they see us up there, they're gonna see how much we love each other and none of that other stuff is gonna matter.
- I love you, Marshall.
- I love you, too, Lily pad.
I now pronounce you man and wife.
- What?
!
- What?
!
What, is that not right?
Are... we married?
Did you just marry us?
Weren't you listening?
We don't want to be married.
Uh...
I-I suppose I could unpronounce you.
- Unpronounce us.
- Unpronounce us!
All right, I unpronounce you man and wife.
Oh, whew... that was close.
And that's the story of how Uncle Marshall and Aunt Lily got married for 12 seconds somewhere off the coast of Atlantic City.
- Hey, guys.
- Hey.
Ted.
Is Robin here?
Man, I hope so.
Ted:
And so, after six months apart,
Aunt lily and uncle marshall were finally back together.
Oh, my god.
These pancakes are delicious!
Yes.
Thank you.
Um, I learned how to cook while you were gone this summer.
Oh.
Do you want to cook dinner tonight?
Yeah, sure.
(chuckles)
How about pancakes?
And things were back to normal...
Almost.
You may not have much range, but at least I'm marrying a guy
Who knows how to make pancakes.
Oh, um...
I mean, um...
Well, I realize
That we haven't really discussed
Whether us getting back together
Means us getting married, but...
I still wanna.
Do you still wanna?
Really?
(chuckles) of course, I love you.
No, I mean, that's how you're gonna do it?
"Do you still wanna?"
That's like the lamest proposal ever.
When I did it,
I got down on my knees...
I don't know, I'm just saying.
Marshall eriksen, will you ma...
No, no, no, no, no, no.
What?
!
You can't lead with that.
You got to...
Build up to that.
You got to have, like, a little speech.
Do you remember your proposal to me?
I had a speech prepared.
What do you want to hear?
I don't know.
I mean, you could tell me, like, about how good-looking
And funny and smart I am
And I've been working out lately.
It might be nice for you to mention something...
About that.
Hmm.
Marshall, you are good-looking...
Thank you.
You're funny.
Oh, thanks.
You're smart.
And a few tears wouldn't hurt.
Okay, would you freakin' marry me already?
Of course I'll marry you.
Of course.
But, um, until you see a ring on this finger,
Don't expect me to put out.
Yeah, right.
(sighs)
(sighs)
I'll give you this.
That was a very creative use of syrup.
(chuckles)
I can't even look mrs.
Butterworth in the eye.
Oh, my god.
We're getting married!
I know, I know.
(both moan)
Ted:
It was a moment of happiness,
Followed of course by a moment of total panic.
See, when they called off their first wedding,
Aunt lily took off for san francisco
Leaving uncle marshall with the unfortunate task
Of telling his entire family.
Yeah, so now she's gone and the wedding's off.
What do you call someone
Who just takes off and leaves like that?
What do you call that?
I think that that's a little strong.
I can't even believe
You would use a word like that.
Geez, grandma.
Man, I made a big mess
By canceling this wedding, didn't I?
It's okay, baby.
You're not just realizing that now, are you?
God, the idea of standing
Up there in front of all those people who hate my guts...
Just makes me want to run off to atlantic city
And get married today.
(chuckling):
Yeah.
Coming up at 11:00:
Are there piranhas in the east river?
What you don't know...
Could eat you.
Robin!
Stop the news!
What the hell?
It's okay.
They're my friends.
We're going to atlantic city to elope.
You got to come with us.
Oh, my god, that is so fantastic!
I-I don't know if I can just leave work.
It's okay; mike can read the news tonight.
Hey, mike...
You can read, right?
Yeah, I'm the best at reading.
Let's go to atlantic city!
Yeah!
Yeah!
You guys are eloping!
Oh, that's fantastic.
Wait, is this because there's a time crunch
Uncle ted should know about?
I hope not because I plan on getting hammered.
Guys, this sounds like so much fun,
But I can't really take off work.
I'm kind of important around here, you know?
I'm the project manager.
Ted, for the rest of our lives,
We are going to be telling the amazing story
Of how we went to atlantic city and got married.
Don't you want to be in that story?
Of course I do.
Let's go to atlantic city!
Yeah!
Yeah!
Oh, but when we tell the story,
Can you leave out the part where I hesitate?
You got it.
Hey, guys.
Wow.
A pedicure.
Uh, if there were any shame in a dude getting a pedicure,
I don't think there would have been a feature
About it in details magazine.
We're going to atlantic city to elope right now!
Oh, congratulations, lily.
Marshall, you're getting married?
What the hell?
So are you in or not?
Hell, yeah, I'm in!
Just...
I'm almost done.
No, we got to get going to the...
Well, actually, I mean...
It is my wedding day, and since we're here...
Ted:
So we all got a pedicure and then headed down...
To atlantic city.
(marshall laughing)
Wow.
Look at this place.
I guess I'll have my pick of something old.
And something blue.
Somebody should really check on this lady.
Ah, a.C., always in decline,
Never hitting bottom.
It's good to be back, old friend.
You been here before?
Oh, uh, once or twice.
Man:
Barney!
(speaking mandarin)
Ah, good to see you, too.
Three times, maybe.
The wedding chapel...
This is it.
Are you ready to do this?
I'm ready.
Let's get married.
Ted:
Yeah.
Oh, crap.
I don't have a veil.
I'm a bride;
I can't get married without a veil.
And a bouquet.
I need a veil and a bouquet.
Oh, my god, we're getting married.
Robin:
Don't worry.
Relax.
We'll get you a veil, honey.
Oh, robin, that's a really cute outfit.
Oh, really?
Thanks.
Yeah, it has to go.
I'm the bride; you can't look
Better than me.
Done.
I'm going to get the bouquet.
You guys get the veil.
We'll meet in the chapel in 20 minutes.
Ready, break.
You guys want to go gamble?
No, we got to go get the veil.
Or we looked everywhere, and we couldn't find one.
Yeah, okay.
No, you guys go ahead.
I'm going to find the veil.
So this is it, right?
The last 20 minutes of your single life.
I'm proud of you, buddy.
Thanks.
How are you feeling?
Great, a little nervous.
Yeah?
Craps?
Not that nervous.
No, I mean do you want to play craps.
Oh, yeah, definitely.
Okay, I got the veil.
She wasn't ready to be married.
All right, let's talk bachelor party.
Are we thinking full-on strip club,
Or should we rent a room
And have a private toy show...
Whew.
What did you just say?
Barney, no.
Marshall, I'm your best man.
You're not my best man.
Right here.
And as your best man, I have to throw you a bachelor party.
That's part of being a best friend.
You're not my best friend.
Right here.
Barney, I don't have any time for a bachelor party.
I've got, like, 18 minutes.
18 minutes.
Oh, good.
Did you get the veil?
Of course.
And it took us exactly 18 minutes.
We went to a strip club.
Dude!
Unbelievable!
We weren't there for very long.
It's not like I had time to have a lap dance or anything.
I got a lap dance.
You...!
Aw, your last lap dance ever.
(chuckling):
Right...
What?
Okay, I'm here.
Right?
Ooh.
Oh, god, the things people waste money on in atlantic city.
Does it smell like strippers in here?
That's weird, right?
Marshall and lily are getting married!
Yeah.
Whoo!
Hell, yeah, look at this.
(bouquet playing "wedding March")
Oh, baby, this is it.
Let's do this thing.
All right.
All right.
Hi.
We're here to get married.
(dryly):
Congratulations.
We offer a variety of packages to give you the special day
You've always dreamed about.
We don't want any of that.
Just your basic quickie wedding will be fine.
Yeah.
("wedding March" playing)
You know this isn't vegas, right?
Robin:
Well, sure.
In vegas, the casinos pump in oxygen.
Here, it looks like everyone brought their own.
What?
It also takes three days
To get a marriage license in new jersey.
The earliest I could book you for is Monday.
No, no, no, it has to be today.
That's the whole point.
Look, I don't know what to say,
But if you guys don't want to book a wedding for Monday
Or play a round of keno, I can't help you.
Thirty-five.
Wait, wait, wait, I don't understand.
People get married in atlantic city all the time.
Yes, they do, but they don't elope.
They choose atlantic city for its white-sand beaches,
World-class amenities, and exotic riviera feel.
Have you been outside?
There is half an orca whale
Rotting not 20 feet from the cabana.
You guys, take it easy, guys.
Are you sure about this?
About the marriage laws of the state
Where I work in a wedding chapel?
Yeah, I'm pretty sure.
Bright side:
The bachelor party continues!
Yes!
Continues?
You mean "start." he means "start."
We went to a strip club.
Twenty-seven.
Is there any way that we could get a license today?
You could go to the courthouse.
In some extreme circumstances, the waiting period
Can be waived, but you have to have a good reason.
Well, we're in love.
What better reason could there be?
The last one I heard was, "I'm going to iraq tomorrow
"To defend my country," but, you know, give yours a whirl.
Ted:
So, we went to the courthouse.
God, this is taking forever.
Can't believe they're getting married.
I know.
I am so proud of these two.
After all they've been through.
In fact, that crazy road has led them
All the way here to atlantic city.
Ted, up here.
Huh?
You were just staring at my shirt boobs.
No!
I wasn't.
I-I was checking out the hot bod
Underneath the shirt.
Okay, look, maybe I was looking at your shirt,
But it's a, it's a funny, funny shirt.
Hey, it's barney!
Barney!
Hi.
(speaking mandarin)
Suit up.
Legend.
Daddy.
Ah!
American daddy.
What the hell was that?
A...
Chinese guy?
Hi.
Hello.
Uh, we need a marriage license,
But we need to skip the waiting period because...
We're in love.
Aw.
I'm gonna waive
This waiting period right now.
Oh, really?
!
Is what I would say if I could waivethewaitingperiod,
But, unfortunately, only a judge can do that.
Oh.
Well, so can we see a judge?
Absolutely.
Really?
!
Is what I would say if there was any chance
Of you seeing a judge today, which there isn't.
Why are you doing this to us?
!
'Cause you're on candid camera!
Really?
!
Is what I would say...
You know what?
We get it.
Okay, this is a good plan b.
Judges are people.
People go to the bathroom.
A judge is bound to come by eventually,
And we'll get married.
I'm sure we won't be waiting long.
Geez, you go to a vending machine for 30 seconds.
Vultures.
Psst.
What?
Here?
Yeah.
Got a little time to kill.
Oh, my god, it's the t-shirt, isn't it?
No.
A little.
Something is seriously wrong with you.
So what, is that a no?
All right, let's do it.
All right.
Um, also...?
Yes, I'll leave it on.
Sweet.
Guys, let's bail.
This is never gonna happen.
Look,
I know this turning into a bit of a disaster,
But believe me, it's better than the alternative.
You throwing a big, free party
With lots of booze and food and all your single,
Desperate girlfriends from college?
Yeah, glad we dodged that bullet.
(gasps):
Judge!
Judge, come on.
Come on, come on, come on!
(tape plays "wedding March")
Turn it off.
Okay.
May we please get married today?
Now, normally I would say no
To a request like that, but you two impress me.
Hmm, just the fact that you've
Been together for ten years,
Standing by each other's side through thick and thin,
Never wavering.
What was that?
What was what?
That little look.
What was that?
A look of love.
Mmm.
You two have stood together
Through thick and thin, right?
You know, man, listen, yeah, I mean,
What's thick, what's thin?
All...
Yeah.
I have.
All right, what was that look?
What's going on?
They broke up over the summer.
Lily totally ran off to san francisco
And these two just had sex in the closet.
What?
We're under oath.
No, we're not.
Yeah, we are.
He's a judge.
Wh... did we take an oath?
Do you even know what an oath is?
Uh, yeah.
Courthouse.
Oath.
We're under it.
Guys.
It's looking like this isn't gonna happen.
No, marshall, we are gonna get married today.
Baby, anyplace we go, we're gonna need a marriage license.
Except international waters.
So-so let's find a ship captain.
A ship captain can marry us.
There's boats all over this place.
Oh, is that what those wooden things are
Floating between the garbage?
This is a great idea.
This is gonna work.
Let's go.
Excuse me.
Are you a ship captain?
This is my machine.
I should go talk to her.
No, let me.
Blackjack?
Yeah.
Well, I found a guy who said he'd be willing
To put his boat in my slip, so we're getting closer.
Okay, lil,
Why is it so important to do this today?
Because...
If we don't do it today, I just know we're gonna wind up
Having a huge wedding with a huge crowd
Full of huge midwestern people
Looking all disapproving and judging me
While sipping little cups of mayonnaise
And-and cracking runaway bride jokes all night long.
Nobody's gonna do that.
No, they're not because
I'm not gonna give them the chance.
I'm gonna find a ship captain
And we're gonna be married tonight.
Sweetie, this is crazy.
You're never gonna find a ship capt...
Hey, lily.
Found a ship captain.
What?
Yeah.
First guy we talked to.
Ship captain.
How great is that?
See?
See, this is destiny.
So, captain, can you take us out
To international waters and marry us?
I sure can.
If there's two things I love,
It's bringing people together in marriage
And making $5,000.
What?
Deal.
$5,000, okay, we can do that.
Come on, everybody.
Fork over your cash.
Don't think.
Just do it.
I can get us that money.
How?
Have you noticed that all day today
Chinese guys have been coming up and saying hi to me?
Yes.
Have you noticed I haven't asked about it
Because I'm too scared of the answer?
Well, those are my old gambling buddies.
Truth is...
I used to come here all the time.
Play an old chinese game called
"shing hasabu shing".
Had a small gambling problem.
Actually, it wasn't so small.
I...
Kind of lost my entire life savings.
But tonight, I don't know, I'm feeling hot.
I think I can win us that money.
No, we're not letting you gamble
All our money away.
Uh, it's not gambling
If you absolutely know you're going to win.
I'll get us that money.
I swear it... nay...
I oath it.
Now, I had been to a lot
Of casinos before that night, and I've been to a lot
Of casinos since,
But in all that time I've never seen a game
Quite like this one.
To this day, I have no idea how it was played.
But luckily, barney did.
(speaking chinese)
Do you understand what's happening?
Not a clue.
(speaking chinese)
(shouts)
Do you think he's winning?
I don't even know if he's playing.
Wait, I get it.
I understand this game.
No, you don't.
I totally understand the game, theodore.
Barney, split your tiles.
You can triple your money if you find the jellybean.
Marshall, please.
Don't you think I know what I'm...
My god, you're right.
(speaks chinese)
(players speaking chinese)
(speaks chinese)
(screaming excitedly)
Wow.
It's beautiful.
Thanks, barney.
Did you guys see me?
I was on fire tonight.
Man, I can't wait to get back to the shore.
God, I love gambling!
When we get home, we're gonna go
To a little meeting.
Okay?
Why can't I do it just a little?
Okay.
Let's get this started.
All right.
Okay, uh...
You guys want the serious one or the funny one?
Oh, I think...
Serious would be best.
You sure?
I got a lot of great nautical jokes in there.
Like how you two float each other's boat, stuff like that.
Yeah, serious is probably good.
All right.
"We stand witness today
"to celebrate the union of lily
"and marshall.
"Today, you two will become one,
"sharing your lives,
"the happiness, the sadness,
The frustrations and the joy..."
This is pretty cool.
I can't believe you never want to get married.
I never said "never."
"...
To declare your love
"and devotion to each other
"in front of friends and family,
All the people who matter most to you."
What was that?
What was what?
That little look.
You two just shared a look.
We don't want to do this.
We don't.
Are you kidding me?
You guys are calling off another wedding?
After I spent all this money
On a bridesmaid shirt?
Did I bet someone that they'd call it off?
I did, didn't I?
Who'd I bet?
You actually expect any of us are gonna
Come to your third wedding?
Yes. 'cause it's gonna be amazing.
Look, before I was afraid
To face marshall's family and-and I didn't
Want to do all that work,
But now that we're here...
I realize that I have to face marshall's family
And I really want to do all that work.
So do I.
And yeah...
My family might still be upset with you.
But when they see us up there,
They're gonna see how much we love each other
And none of that other stuff is gonna matter.
I love you, marshmallow.
I love you, too, lily pad.
I now pronounce you man and wife.
What?
!
What?
!
What, is that not right?
Are...
We married?
Did you just marry us?
Weren't you listening?
We don't want to be married.
Uh...
I-I suppose
I could unpronounce you.
Both:
Unpronounce us.
Unpronounce us!
All right, I unpronounce you man and wife.
Oh, whew...
That was close.
Uncle marshall and aunt lily got married for 12 seconds
Somewhere off the coast of atlantic city.
(tv playing low)
Hey, guys.
Both:
Hey.
Ted.
Ted.
Is robin here?
Man, I hope so.
And so, after six months apart,
Aunt Lily and Uncle Marshall were finally back together.
Oh, my God.
These pancakes are delicious!
Yes.
Thank you.
Um, I learned how to cook while you were gone this summer.
Oh.
Do you want to cook dinner tonight?
Yeah, sure.
How about pancakes?
And things were back to normal... almost.
You may not have much range, but at least I'm marrying a guy who knows how to make pancakes.
Oh, um...
I mean, um...
Well, I...
I realize that we haven't really discussed whether us getting back together means us getting married, but...
I still wanna.
Do you still wanna?
Really?
Of course, I love you.
No, I mean, that's how you're gonna do it?
"Do you still wanna?" That's like the lamest proposal ever.
When I did it, I got down on my knees...
I don't know, I'm just saying.
Marshall Eriksen, will you ma...
- No, no, no, no, no, no.
- What?
!
You can't lead with that.
You got to... build up to that.
You got to have, like, a little speech.
Do you remember your proposal to me?
I had a speech prepared.
What do you want to hear?
I don't know.
I mean, you could tell me, like, about how good-looking and funny and smart I am and I've been working out lately.
It might be nice for you to mention something... about that.
Marshall...
- you are good-looking...
- Thank you.
- You're funny.
- Oh, thanks.
- You're smart.
- And a few tears wouldn't hurt.
Okay, would you freakin' marry me already?
I'll marry you.
Of course.
But, um, until you see a ring on this finger, don't expect me to put out.
Yeah, right.
Transcript :
Raceman Subtitles :
Willow's Team
I'll give you this.
That was a very creative use of syrup.
I can't even look Mrs. Butterworth in the eye.
Oh, my God.
We're getting married!
I know, I know.
It was a moment of happiness, followed of course by a moment of total panic.
See, when they called off their first wedding,
Aunt Lily took off for San Francisco leaving Uncle Marshall with the unfortunate task of telling his entire family.
Yeah, so now she's gone and the wedding's off.
What do you call someone who just takes off and leaves like that?
What do you call that?
I think that that's a little strong.
I can't even believe you would use a word like that.
Geez, Grandma.
Man, I made a big mess by canceling this wedding, didn't I?
It's okay, baby.
You're not just realizing that now, are you?
God, the idea of standing up there in front of all those people who hate my guts... just makes me want to run off to Atlantic City and get married today.
Yeah.
Coming up at 11:00:
Are there piranhas in the East River?
What you don't know...
could eat you.
Robin!
Stop the news!
- What the hell?
- It's okay.
They're my friends.
We're going to Atlantic City to elope.
You got to come with us.
Oh, my God, that is so fantastic!
I-I don't know if I can just leave work.
It's okay;
Mike can read the news tonight.
Hey, Mike...
you can read, right?
Yeah, I'm the best at reading.
- Let's go to Atlantic City!
- Yeah!
You guys are eloping!
Oh, that's fantastic.
Wait, is this because there's a time crunch Uncle Ted should know about?
I hope not because I plan on getting hammered.
Guys, this sounds like so much fun, but I can't really take off work.
I'm kind of important around here, you know?
I'm the project manager.
Ted, for the rest of our lives, we are going to be telling the amazing story of how we went to Atlantic City and got married.
Don't you want to be in that story?
Of course I do.
- Let's go to Atlantic City!
- Yeah!
Oh, but when we tell the story, can you leave out the part where I hesitate?
You got it.
Hey, guys.
Wow.
A pedicure.
Uh, if there were any shame in a dude getting a pedicure
I don't think there would have been a feature about it in Details magazine.
We're going to Atlantic City to elope right now!
Oh, congratulations, Lily.
Marshall, you're getting married?
What the hell?
So are you in or not?
Hell, yeah, I'm in!
Just...
I'm almost done.
- No, we got to get going to the...
- Well, actually, I mean...
It is my wedding day, and since we're here...
So we all got a pedicure and then headed down... to Atlantic City.
Wow.
Look at this place.
I guess I'll have my pick of something old.
And something blue.
Somebody should really check on this lady.
Ah, A.C., always in decline, never hitting bottom.
It's good to be back, old friend.
You been here before?
Oh, uh, once or twice.
Barney!
Ah, good to see you, too.
Three times, maybe.
The wedding chapel-- this is it.
Are you ready to do this?
I'm ready.
- Let's get married.
- Yeah.
Oh, crap.
I don't have a veil.
I'm a bride;
I can't get married without a veil.
And a bouquet.
I need a veil and a bouquet.
Oh, my God, we're getting married.
Don't worry.
Relax.
We'll get you a veil, honey.
Oh, Robin, that's a really cute outfit.
Oh, really?
Thanks.
Yeah, it has to go.
I'm the bride;
you can't look better than me.
Done.
I'm going to get the bouquet.
You guys get the veil.
We'll meet in the chapel in 20 minutes.
Ready, break.
You guys want to go gamble?
No, we got to go get the veil.
Or we looked everywhere, and we couldn't find one.
Yeah, okay.
No, you guys go ahead.
I'm going to find the veil.
So this is it, right?
The last 20 minutes of your single life.
- I'm proud of you, buddy.
- Thanks.
- How are you feeling?
- Great, a little nervous.
- Yeah?
Craps?
- Not that nervous.
- No, I mean do you want to play craps.
- Oh, yeah, definitely.
Okay, I got the veil.
She wasn't ready to be married.
All right, let's talk bachelor party.
Are we thinking full-on strip club, or should we rent a room and have a private toy show-- whew.
What did you just say?
- Barney, no.
- Marshall, I'm your best man.
- You're not my best man.
- Right here.
And as your best man, I have to throw you a bachelor party.
That's part of being a best friend.
- You're not my best friend.
- Right here.
Barney, I don't have any time for a bachelor party.
I've got, like, 18 minutes.
18 minutes.
Oh, good.
Did you get the veil?
Of course.
And it took us exactly 18 minutes.
We went to a strip club.
- Dude!
- Unbelievable!
We weren't there for very long.
It's not like I had time to have a lap dance or anything.
I got a lap dance.
- Your last lap dance ever.
- Right...
What?
Okay, I'm here.
Right?
Oh, God, the things people waste money on in Atlantic City.
Does it smell like strippers in here?
That's weird, right?
Marshall and Lily are getting married!
Hell, yeah, look at this.
Oh, baby, this is it.
- Let's do this thing.
- All right.
Hi.
We're here to get married.
Congratulations.
We offer a variety of packages to give you the special day you've always dreamed about.
We don't want any of that.
Just your basic quickie wedding will be fine.
Yeah.
You know this isn't Vegas, right?
Well, sure.
In Vegas, the casinos pump in oxygen.
Here, it looks like everyone brought their own.
What?
It also takes three days to get a marriage license in New Jersey.
The earliest I could book you for is Monday.
No, no, no, it has to be today.
That's the whole point.
Look, I don't know what to say, but if you guys don't want to book a wedding for Monday or play a round of keno, I can't help you.
Thirty-five.
Wait, I don't understand, people get married in Atlantic City all the time.
Yes, they do, but they don't elope.
They choose Atlantic City for its white sand beaches, world-class amenities, and exotic Riviera feel.
Have you been outside?
There is half an orca whale rotting not 20 feet from the cabana.
You guys, take it easy, guys.
Are you sure about this?
About the marriage laws of the state where I work in a wedding chapel?
Yeah, I'm pretty sure.
Bright side:
the bachelor party continues!
Yes!
Continues?
You mean "start." He means "start."
We went to a strip club.
Twenty-seven.
Is there any way that we could get a license today?
You could go to the courthouse.
In some extreme circumstances, the waiting period can be waived, but you have to have a good reason.
Well, we're in love.
What better reason could there be?
The last one I heard was,
"I'm going to Iraq tomorrow to defend my country,"
but, you know, give yours a whirl.
So we went to the courthouse.
God, this is taking forever.
Can't believe they're getting married.
I know.
I am so proud of these two.
After all they've been through.
In fact, that crazy road has led them all the way here to Atlantic City.
Ted, up here.
You were just staring at my shirt boobs.
No!
I wasn't.
I-I was checking out the hot bod underneath the shirt.
Okay, look, maybe I was looking at your shirt, but it's a, it's a funny, funny shirt.
Hey, it's Barney!
- Barney!
- Hi.
...suit up.
...legend.
...Daddy.
American daddy.
What the hell was that?
A...
Chinese guy?
Hi.
Hello.
Uh, we need a marriage license, but we need to skip the waiting period because... we're in love.
Aw.
I'm gonna waive this waiting period right now.
Oh, really?
!
Is what I would say if I could waive the waiting period, but unfortunately, only a judge can do that.
Oh.
Well, so can we see a judge?
- Absolutely.
- Really?
!
Is what I would say if there was any chance of you seeing a judge today, which there isn't.
Why are you doing this to us?
!
'Cause you're on Candid Camera!
- Really?
!
- Is what I would say...
You know what?
We get it.
Okay, this is a good plan B.
Judges are people.
People go to the batoom.
A judge is bound to come by eventually, and we'll get married.
I'm sure we won't be waiting long.
Geez, you go to a vending machine for 30 seconds.
Vultures.
What?
Here?
Yeah.
Got a little time to kill.
Oh, my God, it's the T-shirt, isn't it?
No.
A little.
Something is seriously wrong with you.
So what, is that a no?
- All right, let's do it.
- All right.
Um, also...?
- Yes, I'll leave it on.
- Sweet.
Guys, let's bail.
This is never gonna happen.
Look, I know this is turning into a bit of a disaster, but believe me, it's better than the alternative.
You throwing a big, free party with lots of booze and food and all your single, desperate girlfriends from college?
Yeah, glad we dodged that bullet.
Judge!
Judge, come on.
Come on, come on, come on!
- Turn it off.
- Okay.
May we please get married today?
Now, normally I would say no to a request like that, but you two impress me.
Just the fact that you've been together for ten years, standing by each other's side through thick and thin, never wavering.
- What was that?
- What was what?
That little look.
What was that?
A look of love.
You two have stood together through thick and thin, right?
- You know, what's thick, what's thin?
- Yeah, I mean, all... yeah.
I have.
All right, what was that look?
What's going on?
They broke up over the summer.
Lily totally ran off to San Francisco and these two just had sex in the closet.
What?
We're under oath.
No, we're not.
Yeah, we are.
He's a judge.
Wh-- did we take an oath?
Do you even know what an oath is?
Uh, yeah.
Courthouse.
Oath.
We're under it.
Guys.
It's looking like this isn't gonna happen.
No, Marshall, we are gonna get married today.
Baby, anyplace we go, we're gonna need a marriage license.
Except international waters.
So-so let's find a ship captain.
A ship captain can marry us.
There's boats all over this place.
Oh, is that what those wooden things are floating between the garbage?
This is a great idea.
This is gonna work.
Let's go.
Excuse me.
Are you a ship captain?
This is my machine.
- I should go talk to her.
- No, let me.
- Blackjack?
- Yeah.
Well, I found a guy who said he'd be willing to put his boat in my slip, so we're getting closer.
Okay, Lil, why is it so important to do this today?
Because... if we don't do it today,
I just know we're gonna wind up having a huge wedding with a huge crowd full of huge Midwestern people looking all disapproving and judging me while sipping little cups of mayonnaise and-and cracking runaway bride jokes all night long.
- Nobody's gonna do that.
- No, they're not because I'm not gonna give them the chance.
I'm gonna find a ship captain and we're gonna be married tonight.
Sweetie, this is crazy.
You're never gonna find a ship capt...
Hey, Lily.
Found a ship captain.
- What?
- Yeah.
First guy we talked to.
Ship captain.
How great is that?
See?
See, this is destiny.
So, captain, can you take us out to international waters and marry us?
I sure can.
If there's two things I love, it's bringing people together in marriage
- and making $5,000.
- What?
Deal. $5,000, okay, we can do that.
Come on, everybody.
Fork over your cash.
Don't think.
Just do it.
I can get us that money.
How?
Have you noticed that all day today
Chinese guys have been coming up and saying hi to me?
Yes.
Have you noticed I haven't asked about it because I'm too scared of the answer?
Well, those are my old gambling buddies.
Truth is...
I used to come here all the time.
Play an old Chinese game called "Shing Hasabu Shing".
Had a small gambling problem.
Actually, it wasn't so small.
I... kind of lost my entire life's savings.
But tonight, I don't know, I'm feeling hot.
I think I can win us that money.
No, we're not letting you gamble all our money away.
Uh, it's not gambling if you absolutely know you're going to win.
I'll get us that money.
I swear it, nay...
I oath it.
Now, I had been to a lot of casinos before that night, and I've been to a lot of casinos since, but in all that time I've never seen a game quite like this one.
To this day, I have no idea how it was played.
But luckily, Barney did.
Do you understand what's happening?
Not a clue.
Do you think he's winning?
I don't even know if he's playing.
Wait, I get it.
I understand this game.
No, you don't.
I totally understand the game, Theodore.
Barney, split your tiles.
You can triple your money if you find the jellybean.
Marshall, please.
Don't you think I know what I'm...
My God, you're right.
Wow.
It's beautiful.
Thanks, Barney.
Did you guys see me?
I was on fire tonight.
Man, I can't wait to get back to the shore.
God, I love gambling!
When we get home, we're gonna go to a little meeting.
Okay?
Why can't I do it just a little?
Okay.
Let's get this started.
Okay, uh... you guys want the serious one or the funny one?
Oh, I think...
serious would be best.
You sure?
I got a lot of great nautical jokes in there.
Like how you two float each other's boat, stuff like that.
Yeah, serious is probably good.
"We stand witness today
"to celebrate the union of Lily and Marshall.
"Today, you two will become one,
"sharing your lives,
"the happiness, the sadness,
"the frustrations and the joy..."
This is pretty cool.
I can't believe you never want to get married.
I never said "never."
"...to declare your love
"and devotion to each other
"in front of friends and family,
"all the people who matter most to you."
What was that?
What was what?
That little look.
You two just shared a look.
- We don't want to do this.
- We don't.
Are you kidding me?
You guys are calling off another wedding?
After I spent all this money on a bridesmaid shirt?
Did I bet someone that they'd call it off?
I did, didn't I?
Who'd I bet?
You actually expect any of us are gonna come to your third wedding?
Yes.
'Cause it's gonna be amazing.
Look, before I was afraid to face Marshall's family and-and I didn't want to do all that work, but... now that we're here...
I realize that I have to face Marshall's family and I really want to do all that work.
So do I.
And yeah... my family might still be upset with you.
But when they see us up there, they're gonna see how much we love each other and none of that other stuff is gonna matter.
- I love you, Marshall.
- I love you, too, Lily pad.
I now pronounce you man and wife.
- What?
!
- What?
!
What, is that not right?
Are... we married?
Did you just marry us?
Weren't you listening?
We don't want to be married.
Uh...
I-I suppose I could unpronounce you.
- Unpronounce us.
- Unpronounce us!
All right, I unpronounce you man and wife.
Oh, whew... that was close.
And that's the story of how Uncle Marshall and Aunt Lily got married for 12 seconds somewhere off the coast of Atlantic City.
- Hey, guys.
- Hey.
Ted.
Is Robin here?
Man, I hope so.
And so, after six months apart,
Aunt Lily and Uncle Marshall were finally back together.
Oh, my God.
These pancakes are delicious!
Yes.
Thank you.
Um, I learned how to cook while you were gone this summer.
Oh.
Do you want to cook dinner tonight?
Yeah, sure.
How about pancakes?
And things were back to normal... almost.
You may not have much range, but at least I'm marrying a guy who knows how to make pancakes.
Oh, um...
I mean, um...
Well, I...
I realize that we haven't really discussed whether us getting back together means us getting married, but...
I still wanna.
Do you still wanna?
Really?
Of course, I love you.
No, I mean, that's how you're gonna do it?
"Do you still wanna?" That's like the lamest proposal ever.
When I did it, I got down on my knees...
I don't know, I'm just saying.
Marshall Eriksen, will you ma...
- No, no, no, no, no, no.
- What?
!
You can't lead with that.
You got to... build up to that.
You got to have, like, a little speech.
Do you remember your proposal to me?
I had a speech prepared.
What do you want to hear?
I don't know.
I mean, you could tell me, like, about how good-looking and funny and smart I am and I've been working out lately.
It might be nice for you to mention something... about that.
Marshall...
- you are good-looking...
- Thank you.
- You're funny.
- Oh, thanks.
- You're smart.
- And a few tears wouldn't hurt.
Okay, would you freakin' marry me already?
I'll marry you.
Of course.
But, um, until you see a ring on this finger, don't expect me to put out.
Yeah, right.
Transcript :
Raceman Subtitles :
Willow's Team
I'll give you this.
That was a very creative use of syrup.
I can't even look Mrs. Butterworth in the eye.
Oh, my God.
We're getting married!
I know, I know.
It was a moment of happiness, followed of course by a moment of total panic.
See, when they called off their first wedding,
Aunt Lily took off for San Francisco leaving Uncle Marshall with the unfortunate task of telling his entire family.
Yeah, so now she's gone and the wedding's off.
What do you call someone who just takes off and leaves like that?
What do you call that?
I think that that's a little strong.
I can't even believe you would use a word like that.
Geez, Grandma.
Man, I made a big mess by canceling this wedding, didn't I?
It's okay, baby.
You're not just realizing that now, are you?
God, the idea of standing up there in front of all those people who hate my guts... just makes me want to run off to Atlantic City and get married today.
Yeah.
Coming up at 11:00:
Are there piranhas in the East River?
What you don't know...
could eat you.
Robin!
Stop the news!
- What the hell?
- It's okay.
They're my friends.
We're going to Atlantic City to elope.
You got to come with us.
Oh, my God, that is so fantastic!
I-I don't know if I can just leave work.
It's okay;
Mike can read the news tonight.
Hey, Mike...
you can read, right?
Yeah, I'm the best at reading.
- Let's go to Atlantic City!
- Yeah!
You guys are eloping!
Oh, that's fantastic.
Wait, is this because there's a time crunch Uncle Ted should know about?
I hope not because I plan on getting hammered.
Guys, this sounds like so much fun, but I can't really take off work.
I'm kind of important around here, you know?
I'm the project manager.
Ted, for the rest of our lives, we are going to be telling the amazing story of how we went to Atlantic City and got married.
Don't you want to be in that story?
Of course I do.
- Let's go to Atlantic City!
- Yeah!
Oh, but when we tell the story, can you leave out the part where I hesitate?
You got it.
Hey, guys.
Wow.
A pedicure.
Uh, if there were any shame in a dude getting a pedicure
I don't think there would have been a feature about it in Details magazine.
We're going to Atlantic City to elope right now!
Oh, congratulations, Lily.
Marshall, you're getting married?
What the hell?
So are you in or not?
Hell, yeah, I'm in!
Just...
I'm almost done.
- No, we got to get going to the...
- Well, actually, I mean...
It is my wedding day, and since we're here...
So we all got a pedicure and then headed down... to Atlantic City.
Wow.
Look at this place.
I guess I'll have my pick of something old.
And something blue.
Somebody should really check on this lady.
Ah, A.C., always in decline, never hitting bottom.
It's good to be back, old friend.
You been here before?
Oh, uh, once or twice.
Barney!
Ah, good to see you, too.
Three times, maybe.
The wedding chapel-- this is it.
Are you ready to do this?
I'm ready.
- Let's get married.
- Yeah.
Oh, crap.
I don't have a veil.
I'm a bride;
I can't get married without a veil.
And a bouquet.
I need a veil and a bouquet.
Oh, my God, we're getting married.
Don't worry.
Relax.
We'll get you a veil, honey.
Oh, Robin, that's a really cute outfit.
Oh, really?
Thanks.
Yeah, it has to go.
I'm the bride;
you can't look better than me.
Done.
I'm going to get the bouquet.
You guys get the veil.
We'll meet in the chapel in 20 minutes.
Ready, break.
You guys want to go gamble?
No, we got to go get the veil.
Or we looked everywhere, and we couldn't find one.
Yeah, okay.
No, you guys go ahead.
I'm going to find the veil.
So this is it, right?
The last 20 minutes of your single life.
- I'm proud of you, buddy.
- Thanks.
- How are you feeling?
- Great, a little nervous.
- Yeah?
Craps?
- Not that nervous.
- No, I mean do you want to play craps.
- Oh, yeah, definitely.
Okay, I got the veil.
She wasn't ready to be married.
All right, let's talk bachelor party.
Are we thinking full-on strip club, or should we rent a room and have a private toy show-- whew.
What did you just say?
- Barney, no.
- Marshall, I'm your best man.
- You're not my best man.
- Right here.
And as your best man, I have to throw you a bachelor party.
That's part of being a best friend.
- You're not my best friend.
- Right here.
Barney, I don't have any time for a bachelor party.
I've got, like, 18 minutes.
18 minutes.
Oh, good.
Did you get the veil?
Of course.
And it took us exactly 18 minutes.
We went to a strip club.
- Dude!
- Unbelievable!
We weren't there for very long.
It's not like I had time to have a lap dance or anything.
I got a lap dance.
- Your last lap dance ever.
- Right...
What?
Okay, I'm here.
Right?
Oh, God, the things people waste money on in Atlantic City.
Does it smell like strippers in here?
That's weird, right?
Marshall and Lily are getting married!
Hell, yeah, look at this.
Oh, baby, this is it.
- Let's do this thing.
- All right.
Hi.
We're here to get married.
Congratulations.
We offer a variety of packages to give you the special day you've always dreamed about.
We don't want any of that.
Just your basic quickie wedding will be fine.
Yeah.
You know this isn't Vegas, right?
Well, sure.
In Vegas, the casinos pump in oxygen.
Here, it looks like everyone brought their own.
What?
It also takes three days to get a marriage license in New Jersey.
The earliest I could book you for is Monday.
No, no, no, it has to be today.
That's the whole point.
Look, I don't know what to say, but if you guys don't want to book a wedding for Monday or play a round of keno, I can't help you.
Thirty-five.
Wait, I don't understand, people get married in Atlantic City all the time.
Yes, they do, but they don't elope.
They choose Atlantic City for its white sand beaches, world-class amenities, and exotic Riviera feel.
Have you been outside?
There is half an orca whale rotting not 20 feet from the cabana.
You guys, take it easy, guys.
Are you sure about this?
About the marriage laws of the state where I work in a wedding chapel?
Yeah, I'm pretty sure.
Bright side:
the bachelor party continues!
Yes!
Continues?
You mean "start." He means "start."
We went to a strip club.
Twenty-seven.
Is there any way that we could get a license today?
You could go to the courthouse.
In some extreme circumstances, the waiting period can be waived, but you have to have a good reason.
Well, we're in love.
What better reason could there be?
The last one I heard was,
"I'm going to Iraq tomorrow to defend my country,"
but, you know, give yours a whirl.
So we went to the courthouse.
God, this is taking forever.
Can't believe they're getting married.
I know.
I am so proud of these two.
After all they've been through.
In fact, that crazy road has led them all the way here to Atlantic City.
Ted, up here.
You were just staring at my shirt boobs.
No!
I wasn't.
I-I was checking out the hot bod underneath the shirt.
Okay, look, maybe I was looking at your shirt, but it's a, it's a funny, funny shirt.
Hey, it's Barney!
- Barney!
- Hi.
...suit up.
...legend.
...Daddy.
American daddy.
What the hell was that?
A...
Chinese guy?
Hi.
Hello.
Uh, we need a marriage license, but we need to skip the waiting period because... we're in love.
Aw.
I'm gonna waive this waiting period right now.
Oh, really?
!
Is what I would say if I could waive the waiting period, but unfortunately, only a judge can do that.
Oh.
Well, so can we see a judge?
- Absolutely.
- Really?
!
Is what I would say if there was any chance of you seeing a judge today, which there isn't.
Why are you doing this to us?
!
'Cause you're on Candid Camera!
- Really?
!
- Is what I would say...
You know what?
We get it.
Okay, this is a good plan B.
Judges are people.
People go to the batoom.
A judge is bound to come by eventually, and we'll get married.
I'm sure we won't be waiting long.
Geez, you go to a vending machine for 30 seconds.
Vultures.
What?
Here?
Yeah.
Got a little time to kill.
Oh, my God, it's the T-shirt, isn't it?
No.
A little.
Something is seriously wrong with you.
So what, is that a no?
- All right, let's do it.
- All right.
Um, also...?
- Yes, I'll leave it on.
- Sweet.
Guys, let's bail.
This is never gonna happen.
Look, I know this is turning into a bit of a disaster, but believe me, it's better than the alternative.
You throwing a big, free party with lots of booze and food and all your single, desperate girlfriends from college?
Yeah, glad we dodged that bullet.
Judge!
Judge, come on.
Come on, come on, come on!
- Turn it off.
- Okay.
May we please get married today?
Now, normally I would say no to a request like that, but you two impress me.
Just the fact that you've been together for ten years, standing by each other's side through thick and thin, never wavering.
- What was that?
- What was what?
That little look.
What was that?
A look of love.
You two have stood together through thick and thin, right?
- You know, what's thick, what's thin?
- Yeah, I mean, all... yeah.
I have.
All right, what was that look?
What's going on?
They broke up over the summer.
Lily totally ran off to San Francisco and these two just had sex in the closet.
What?
We're under oath.
No, we're not.
Yeah, we are.
He's a judge.
Wh-- did we take an oath?
Do you even know what an oath is?
Uh, yeah.
Courthouse.
Oath.
We're under it.
Guys.
It's looking like this isn't gonna happen.
No, Marshall, we are gonna get married today.
Baby, anyplace we go, we're gonna need a marriage license.
Except international waters.
So-so let's find a ship captain.
A ship captain can marry us.
There's boats all over this place.
Oh, is that what those wooden things are floating between the garbage?
This is a great idea.
This is gonna work.
Let's go.
Excuse me.
Are you a ship captain?
This is my machine.
- I should go talk to her.
- No, let me.
- Blackjack?
- Yeah.
Well, I found a guy who said he'd be willing to put his boat in my slip, so we're getting closer.
Okay, Lil, why is it so important to do this today?
Because... if we don't do it today,
I just know we're gonna wind up having a huge wedding with a huge crowd full of huge Midwestern people looking all disapproving and judging me while sipping little cups of mayonnaise and-and cracking runaway bride jokes all night long.
- Nobody's gonna do that.
- No, they're not because I'm not gonna give them the chance.
I'm gonna find a ship captain and we're gonna be married tonight.
Sweetie, this is crazy.
You're never gonna find a ship capt...
Hey, Lily.
Found a ship captain.
- What?
- Yeah.
First guy we talked to.
Ship captain.
How great is that?
See?
See, this is destiny.
So, captain, can you take us out to international waters and marry us?
I sure can.
If there's two things I love, it's bringing people together in marriage
- and making $5,000.
- What?
Deal. $5,000, okay, we can do that.
Come on, everybody.
Fork over your cash.
Don't think.
Just do it.
I can get us that money.
How?
Have you noticed that all day today
Chinese guys have been coming up and saying hi to me?
Yes.
Have you noticed I haven't asked about it because I'm too scared of the answer?
Well, those are my old gambling buddies.
Truth is...
I used to come here all the time.
Play an old Chinese game called "Shing Hasabu Shing".
Had a small gambling problem.
Actually, it wasn't so small.
I... kind of lost my entire life's savings.
But tonight, I don't know, I'm feeling hot.
I think I can win us that money.
No, we're not letting you gamble all our money away.
Uh, it's not gambling if you absolutely know you're going to win.
I'll get us that money.
I swear it, nay...
I oath it.
Now, I had been to a lot of casinos before that night, and I've been to a lot of casinos since, but in all that time I've never seen a game quite like this one.
To this day, I have no idea how it was played.
But luckily, Barney did.
Do you understand what's happening?
Not a clue.
Do you think he's winning?
I don't even know if he's playing.
Wait, I get it.
I understand this game.
No, you don't.
I totally understand the game, Theodore.
Barney, split your tiles.
You can triple your money if you find the jellybean.
Marshall, please.
Don't you think I know what I'm...
My God, you're right.
Wow.
It's beautiful.
Thanks, Barney.
Did you guys see me?
I was on fire tonight.
Man, I can't wait to get back to the shore.
God, I love gambling!
When we get home, we're gonna go to a little meeting.
Okay?
Why can't I do it just a little?
Okay.
Let's get this started.
Okay, uh... you guys want the serious one or the funny one?
Oh, I think...
serious would be best.
You sure?
I got a lot of great nautical jokes in there.
Like how you two float each other's boat, stuff like that.
Yeah, serious is probably good.
"We stand witness today
"to celebrate the union of Lily and Marshall.
"Today, you two will become one,
"sharing your lives,
"the happiness, the sadness,
"the frustrations and the joy..."
This is pretty cool.
I can't believe you never want to get married.
I never said "never."
"...to declare your love
"and devotion to each other
"in front of friends and family,
"all the people who matter most to you."
What was that?
What was what?
That little look.
You two just shared a look.
- We don't want to do this.
- We don't.
Are you kidding me?
You guys are calling off another wedding?
After I spent all this money on a bridesmaid shirt?
Did I bet someone that they'd call it off?
I did, didn't I?
Who'd I bet?
You actually expect any of us are gonna come to your third wedding?
Yes.
'Cause it's gonna be amazing.
Look, before I was afraid to face Marshall's family and-and I didn't want to do all that work, but... now that we're here...
I realize that I have to face Marshall's family and I really want to do all that work.
So do I.
And yeah... my family might still be upset with you.
But when they see us up there, they're gonna see how much we love each other and none of that other stuff is gonna matter.
- I love you, Marshall.
- I love you, too, Lily pad.
I now pronounce you man and wife.
- What?
!
- What?
!
What, is that not right?
Are... we married?
Did you just marry us?
Weren't you listening?
We don't want to be married.
Uh...
I-I suppose I could unpronounce you.
- Unpronounce us.
- Unpronounce us!
All right, I unpronounce you man and wife.
Oh, whew... that was close.
And that's the story of how Uncle Marshall and Aunt Lily got married for 12 seconds somewhere off the coast of Atlantic City.
- Hey, guys.
- Hey.
Ted.
Is Robin here?
Man, I hope so.
original uploader [ ENGLISH SDH ]
As soon as school is over I have to go to camp for two weeks.
I don't really care much about going to camp.
I get homesick.
I'm afraid that when I'm miles away from home I'll start to miss my friends.
What friends?
Charlie Brown.
Camp will be good for you.
It'll teach you to stand on your own two feet.
This is just the sort of experience you need.
How about you?
Are you going to camp this summer?
And leave my good home?
Don't be ridiculous.
[ GUNSHOTS ON TV ]
what is that door in the ceiling with the rope hanging from it?
That's the attic.
Stay away from there.
and it's just a lot of old junk.
RERUN:
That's grandpa when he was a boy.
1 939."
And this is his trophy.
Wow.
I'd like to be a marbles champ.
[ PHONE ringing ]
Hello.
Chuck.
They just told me I have to go to summer school.
Can you believe it?
ask him if he's going to summer camp.
are you going to camp with her and everybody else while I'm stuck in summer school?
Chuck?
Are you?
I'm sorry.
All the phone lines in this half of the country have gone dead.
Chuck.
Snoopy.
We're all set to go.
Wow.
Are you sure you're bringing enough stuff?
sir?
I thought you were in summer school.
I just came to see you guys off.
I hope you have a good trip.
And I hope you feel real guilty.
Marcie and Chuck have gone off to camp while I have to stay home and go to summer school.
I'm so jealous I can't stand it.
Why am I so dumb in school?
Why can't I get better grades?
Sometimes I think maybe I tore all the ligaments in my head.
I didn't want to come to camp.
I was afraid I'd be lonely.
But now I notice most of my friends are going to camp.
Who knows?
Maybe camp won't be so bad after all.
Rerun?
From a room upstairs in our house.
I'm hoping that someone at summer camp can teach me to play.
RERUN:
Did you know that Grandpa was a marbles champ?
The bus is stopping.
This must be it.
Are you sure you have everything?
I thought you were going to bring your bowling ball.
[ THUDS ] guys. I'm Joe Agate.
Welcome to camp.
Thanks. I'm Charlie Brown.
Glad to nose you.
Good to see you're back.
look at this funny-looking kid.
everybody.
This kid brought a bowling ball to camp.
kid?
Ow!
big brother.
Where did you get that sucker?
At the trading post.
Great. I want one too.
Snoopy.
Let's go to the trading post.
kid.
kid.
You were on a roll.
Now I guess it's my turn.
that shooter is enormous.
The better to splatter marbles with.
kid.
Looks as if you have some marbles there.
How about a game?
but I don't know how.
what's with your funny-looking friend?
is he?
he doesn't expect to play.
Just me.
I want to learn to play like my grandpa.
He was a marbles champ.
kid.
I'm Joe Agate. I've been the marbles champ the last three years in a row.
kid?
that's a nice collection.
Nice cat's-eyes.
And agates too.
This would make a good shooter for you.
That was my grandpa's.
It was his special prize.
here.
Your shooter is your best marble.
I use a big one.
But that smaller one is just right for you.
Great. I'm ready to play.
[ ANNOUNCER speaking lNDlSTlNCTLY O VER PA ]
That's the lunch call.
But we can play tomorrow.
I'm always here at noon.
My dad owns the trading post.
[ PHONE ringing ]
Marcie.
Sorry to bother you at camp but I was just sort of wondering how you and Chuck are doing.
Charles.
And you're squeezing my hand too hard.
sir.
[ GRO ANlNG ]
[ PHONE ringing ]
Hello.
Chuck.
Sorry to bother you at camp.
I was wondering if you're having a good time.
Yes.
We went swimming this morning.
" Chuck?
Marcie and I.
Chuck.
[ PHONE ringing ]
Marcie.
Just sort of checking in.
Are you and Chuck having a good time at camp?
I can't hear what she's saying if you keep nibbling on my ear.
[ RO ARlNG ] sir.
My jealousy has overcome my reason.
I'm going to camp.
I refuse to let Chuck and Marcie have all the fun.
Joe Agate.
I'm here to learn to play marbles.
first things first.
We need to draw a ring in the dirt.
We'll make the ring smaller on account of this being your first time.
Now we ante up.
I put 1 3 marbles into the circle.
Now you put 1 3 marbles into the circle.
to break the mibs.
and lag as close as you can to the line.
I'll go first to show you how it's done.
kid.
Whoops.
Missed.
Too bad.
Looks like I start.
kid.
Then you shoot at the marbles and try to drive as many out of the circle as you can.
Every marble that I drive out of the ring is mine.
and shoot again.
and this sets you up to get another.
kid.
You take a turn.
Shoot from wherever you want but you gotta get down in the dirt to play.
kid.
Good knuckle-down.
kid.
you're done.
It's my turn now.
kid.
Soon you're be a good marbles player.
Now watch how I do it.
Wow.
You've only got one more marble to go.
that was great.
have you got any more marbles?
but now that I know how the game is played... and we can play again.
give them back?
um....
-This is for keeps.
But I thought you were just teaching me.
kid.
Everything is for keeps.
[ crying ] is something wrong?
This kid took all my marbles in just one game.
But you're just a beginner.
You shouldn't be playing for keeps.
But I thought he was showing me how to play.
I didn't know it was for keeps.
He even won my grandpa's prize shooter.
It's not fair.
That guy could see that you're just a little kid.
He was taking advantage of you.
anyway?
Joe Agate.
That's the same bully who's been picking on everyone since the first day of camp.
I'm just going to have to win those marbles back.
But who am I kidding?
Me win anything?
I don't even know how to play marbles.
Please pass the syrup.
Thank you.
sir.
What are you doing here?
Shh!
I'm in disguise.
Marcie but I kept thinking about you and Chuck up here together and it was driving me crazy.
Where's Chuck?
I want to see him.
sir.
He can't talk to anyone.
I haven't seen him for days.
I can't stand it.
Marcie?
sir.
I can't eat.
He upset you so much you can't eat?
No. I hit him with my lunch.
[ growling ]
listen.
Something's scratching outside our cabin.
sir.
I'll break all his arms.
sir.
He's just scratching.
sir.
[ growling ]
[ SNOOPY RO ARlNG ]
the sky.
sir.
peppermint PATTY:
What happened with the kid who's been calling you names?
MARClE:
That's him splashing around down there. I pushed him off the dock.
Charles!
Are you over there?
that's embarrassing.
give us a call!
Marcie.
Send us a post card!
A post card would take a week to get here.
Then send us a message by personal courier!
Personal courier?
[ bike BELL rings ]
What does it say?
sir.
-Give me that.
"Be at the trading post at noon."
Marcie.
We're gonna settle this once and for all.
Marcie.
sir.
Chuck!
He's not here.
Thanks for the game.
And thanks for all the marbles.
[ laughing ] where's Chuck?
-Sir?
-l know you're meeting him here.
who sent you that note?
do you know who sent me this note?
who sent for me?
CAMPER 2:
And me.
I got one too.
What's going on here?
And where's Chuck?
CAMPERS:
Chuck?
Who's Chuck?
look!
It's Charlie Brown.
And he's got a bag of marbles.
kid.
You wanna play marbles?
I'll show you how. lt's easy.
We'll just play for fun.
No.
We'll play for keeps.
You wanna play ringers or chasies?
For keeps?
Ringers or chasies?
You mean you've played before?
Yup. I've played before.
let's play ringers.
kid?
I never lose.
You never lose because you only play beginners.
until you win.
" and take all their marbles.
how do you know how I play?
Joe.
This is for keeps.
wow!
no.
Joe's clearing the ring.
Here goes the ball game.
MARClE:
Uh-oh.
That Joe is on a run.
He missed.
Now Charles can put Joe Agate in his place.
Are you kidding?
This is Charlie Brown we're talking about.
Wow.
Look at Chuck go.
Charles.
Charles has almost cleared the ring.
he'll have all of Joe's marbles.
It looks good for Chuck.
I think he can do it now.
You better not miss again.
no.
He missed.
I'm gonna show you a trick or two.
no.
Charles.
-There's only one marble left.
-l can't look.
[ ALL GASP ] it's been fun.
But if you don't have any more marbles I guess we're done.
no. l-- Huh?
what's the big idea?
I thought you didn't have any more marbles.
You can't take freebies from that funny-looking kid.
therefore my marbles.
all right. lt doesn't matter anyway.
I'll just win those too.
Let's play.
Joe.
new game.
look.
Chuck's got another chance.
sir.
But what chance does he have with just two marbles?
kid?
Why don't you just take your last two marbles and leave?
Knuckle down.
no.
One marble left?
This will be the shortest game in history.
I'm about to teach you a lesson that you will never forget.
Say goodbye to your last marble.
Huh?
I missed?
But that shot never misses.
I'll take my shot now.
CAMPERS:
Did you see that?
My shooter!
You won my best shooter.
Joe.
You want your shooter back?
Let's play for all the marbles.
What do you mean?
Why should I play you for all the marbles?
and I have hundreds.
no matter how many I've won... including your shooter.
Deal. I can't lose.
That's nuts.
There's no way he can win a deal like that.
His coach gave him the go-ahead.
Coach?
What coach?
but I think I'll be using your old shooter.
I kind of like the way it feels.
All of them!
You cleaned out all of them!
[ CROWD CHEERS ] kid?
Where'd you learn to shoot like that?
just a stranger passing through.
You've taken all my marbles.
I don't want your marbles.
You can have them back.
I only want the ones you took from my friend Rerun.
You've won them fair and square.
Here.
Take them.
I know when I've been beat.
I'm out of here!
Rerun.
I won back all your marbles.
Even your grandpa's shooter.
Charlie Brown.
pal.
Thanks for all your help too.
[ cheering AND laughing ]
Hey!
What's going on here?
sir.
-What's he grinning about?
-You won't believe it!
-Charlie Brown actually won something.
-Not a chance.
He won all of Rerun's marbles back for him.
a winner?
No way!
he's never flown a kite... a winner?
Ha!
Marcie did you do a lot of things together?
there was the moonlight walk.
-Moonlight walk?
[ RO ARlNG ] it wasn't much of a walk.
We just got started when Charles walked into a tree.
I wonder what's wrong with her.
She's sort of queasy.
Indigestion.
Like she didn't want to land.
If you think there's gonna be trouble, we could always get back inside and go somewhere else.
I think we've landed inside a cupboard.
Here we go.
'Open door 15.'
Some sort of base.
Moon base, sea base, space base.
They build these things out of kits.
Glad we're indoors.
Sounds like a storm out there.
'Open door 16.'
Human design you've got a thing about kits.
It's put together like a flatpack wardrobe, only bigger.
And easier.
'Open door 17.'
Oh, it's a sanctuary base!
'Close door 17' Deep space exploration.
We've gone way out.
And listen to that.
Underneath.
Someone's drilling.
"Welcome to hell".
Oh, it's not that bad.
No, over there.
Hold on.
What does that say?
That's weird.
It won't translate.
I thought the Tardis translated everything, writing as well.
I should see English.
Exactly.
And if that's not working, then it means this writing is OLD.
Very old.
Impossibly old.
We should find out who's in charge.
We've gone beyond the reach of the Tardis' knowledge.
Not a good move.
If someone's looking, we shouldn't...
Oh!
Right.
Hello.
Sorry.
I was just saying, nice base.
We must feed.
You've got to what?
We must feed.
Yeah I think they mean us.
We must feed.
We must feed.
We must feed.
We must feed.
We must feed.
We must feed.
We must feed.
We must feed.
We must feed.
We must feed.
We must feed.
We must feed.
We must feed.
We must feed...
We must feed...
. .you, if you are hungry.
Sorry?
We apologise.
Electromagnetics have interfered with speech systems.
Would you like some refreshment?
Um... ' Opendoor18 .'
What the hell?
How did... ?
Captain, you're not gonna believe this.
We've got people.
Out of nowhere.
I mean real people.
I mean two living people, just standing here right in front of me.
'Don't be stupid.
That's impossible.'
I suggest telling them that.
But you're a space base.
You must have visitors.
It can't be that impossible.
Are you telling me you don't know where you are?
No idea!
More fun, that way!
'Stand by, everyone.
Buckle down.
We have incoming.
'And it's a big one.
Quake 0.5 on its way.'
Through here.
Now.
Quickly!
Come on.
Move!
Keep moving!
Keep moving!
Come on!
Move it!
Oh, my God, you meant it.
People.
Look at that!
Real people!
That's us.
Hooray!
Yeah, definitely real.
My name's Rose, Rose Tyler, and this is the Doctor.
Come on, the oxygen must be offline.
We're hallucinating, they can't be...
No,they'rereal!
Come on, we're in the middle of an alert.
Danny, strap up, the quake's coming in.
Impact in 30 seconds...
Sorry,you two, whoever you are, just hold on.
Tight!
Hold on to what?
Anything.
I don't care, just hold on.
Ood, are we fixed?
Your kindness in this emergency is much appreciated.
What's this planet called, anyway?
Don't be stupid.
It hasn't got a name.
How could it have a name?
You really don't know, do you?
And... impact!
Oh, well.
That wasn't so...
That's it.
Everyone all right?
Speak to me, Ida?
Yeah, yeah.
Danny?
Fine.
Toby?
Fine.
Scooti?
No damage.
Jefferson?
Check!
We're fine, thanks.
Don't worry about us.
Surface caved in.
I deflected it onto Storage five through eight, we've lost them completely.
Toby, go and check the rocket link.
That's not my department.
Just do as I say, yeah?
Oxygen holding.
Internal gravity at 56.6.
We should be OK.
Never mind the earthquake, that's...
That's one hell of a storm.
What is that, a hurricane?
You need an atmosphere for a hurricane.
There's no air out there.
It's a complete vacuum.
Then what's shaking the roof?
You're not joking.
You really don't know.
Well.
Introductions!
FYI, as they said in the olden days, I'm Ida Scott, Science Officer.
Zachary Cross Flane, Acting Captain, sir!
You've met Mr Jefferson, he's Head of Security.
Danny Bartock, Ethics Committee.
Not as boring as it sounds.
And that man who just left, that's Toby Zed, Archaeology, and this...
Scooti Manista, Trainee Maintenance, and this...
This is home.
Brace yourselves.
The sight of it sends some people mad.
That's a black hole.
That's impossible...
I did warn you.
We're standing under a black hole!
In orbit.
We can't be.
You can see for yourself.
We're in orbit.
But we can't be.
"This lump of rock is suspended in perpetual geostationary orbit around that black hole
"without falling in
"discuss" (!
)
And that's bad, yeah?
Bad doesn't cover it.
A black hole's a dead star, it collapses in on itself, in and in and in, until the matter's so dense and tight it starts to pull everything else in too.
Nothing in the universe can escape it.
Light, gravity, time everything gets pulled inside.
And crushed.
So there can't be an orbit?
We should be pulled right in?
We should be dead.
And yet here we are, beyond the laws of physics.
Welcome on board.
But if there's no atmosphere out there, what's that?
Stars breaking up.
Gas clouds.
We have whole solar systems being ripped apart above our heads, before falling into that thing.
So a bit worse than a storm, then?
Just a bit.
Just a bit, yeah.
Toby y y y...
Who's that?
Danny?
'Close Door one.' The rocket link's fine.
That's the black hole, officially designated K 3 7 Gem 5.
In the scriptures of the Veltino, this planet's called Krop Tor...
The bitter pill.
And the black hole is supposed to be a mighty demon who was tricked into devouring the planet only to spit it out because it was poison.
"The Bitter Pill." I like that.
We're so far out.
Lost in the drifts of the universe.
How did you even get here?
We flew in, d'you see?
This planet's generating a gravity field.
We don't know how, we've no idea.
But it's kept in constant balance against the black hole.
And the field extends out there, as a funnel, a distinct...
gravity funnel, reaching out into clear space.
That was our way in.
You flew down that thing?
Like a rollercoaster.
By rights, the ship should've been torn apart.
We lost the captain, which is what put me in charge.
And you're doing a good job.
Yeah, well.
Needs must.
But if that gravity funnel closes, there's no way out.
Oh, we have fun speculating about that.
Yeah, that's the word, fun.
But that field would take phenomenal amounts of power.
Not just big, but off the scale!
Can I?
Sure, help yourself.
Your refreshment.
Oh, yeah, thanks.
Thank you!
I'm sorry, what was your name?
We have no titles.
We are as one.
Um...
Whataretheycalled?
Oh, come on!
Where've you been living?
Everyone's got one!
Well, not me.
So what are they?
They're the Ood.
The Ood?
The Ood.
That's...
Ood.
Very Ood.
But handy!
They work the mineshaft, all the drilling and stuff, supervision and maintenance.
They're born for it.
Basic slave race.
You've got slaves?
Don't start!
She's like one of that lot, the Friends of the Ood.
Well, maybe I am, yeah.
Since when did humans need slaves?
But the Ood offer themselves.
If you don't give them orders, they just pine away and die.
Seriously?
You like being ordered about?
It is all we crave.
Why's that, then?
We have nothing else in life.
Yeah, well.
I used to think like that.
Long time ago.
There we go!
D'you see?
To generate that gravity field and the funnel you need a power source with an inverted self extrapolating reflex of six to the power of six every six seconds.
All the sixes.
And it's impossible.
It took us two years to work that out.
I'm very good.
But that's why we're here.
This power source is ten miles below, through solid rock.
Point Zero.
We're drilling down to try and find it.
It's giving off readings of over 90 Statts on the Blazen Scale.
It could revolutionise modern science.
We could use it to fuel the Empire.
Or start a war.
It's buried beneath us...
In the darkness.
Waiting.
What's your job?
Chief dramatist?
Whatever it is down there, it's not a natural phenomenon.
This planet once supported life, aeons ago, before the human race had even learned to walk.
I saw that lettering on the wall.
Did you do that?
I copied it from fragments we've found, unearthed by the drilling.
I can't translate it.
No, neither can I.
And that's saying something.
There was some form of civilisation.
They buried something.
And now it's reaching out, calling us in.
And you came.
How could we not?
So when it comes right down to it, why did you come here?
Why did you do that?
Why?
I'll tell you why.
Because it was there!
Brilliant!
Scuse me...
Er,Zack,wasn'tit?
That's me.
Just stand there, cos I'm gonna...
HUGyou.
Is thatall right?
Suppose so.
Here we go.
Coming in.
Human beings.
You are amazing!
Thank you.
Not at all.
You're also completely mad.
You should pack your bags, get on that ship and fly for your lives!
You can talk.
How the hell did YOU get here?
I've got this...
Um... this...ship.It'shard to explain, it just sort of appears.
We can show you.
We parked down the corridor from uh...
What's it called?
Habitation Area...
Three.
Three.
D'you mean Storage Six?
It was a bit of a cupboard, yeah...
Storage Six?
But you said...
You said...
You said Storage Five to Eight...
What is it, what's wrong?
'Open door 19. . .'
'Close Door 19.'
Grr!
Come ON!
'Open door 17.'
'Open door 15.'
'Door 16 out of commission.' It can't be!
What's wrong?
What is it?
Doctor, the Tardis is in there what's happened?
The Tardis has gone.
'Door 16, out of commission.'
The earthquake.
This section collapsed.
But it's got to be out there somewhere.
Look down.
.
.The ground gave way.
My Tardis must've fallen right into the heart of the planet, but you've robot drills heading the same way.
We can't divert the drilling.
But I need my ship!
It's all I've got!
Literally, the only thing!
Doctor, WE'VE only got the resources to dig one, central shaft down to the power source, and that's it.
No diversions, no distractions, no exceptions.
Your machine is lost.
All I can do is offer you a lift if we ever get to leave this place.
And that's the end of it.
I'll put you on the duty roster.
We need someone in the laundry.
'Open door one.'
'Close door one.'
I've trapped you here.
No, don't worry about me.
OK.
We're on a planet that shouldn't exist, underneath a black hole, with no way out.
Yeah changed my mind.
Start worrying about me.
'Entering night shift.'
'Your chosen track for transition is Ravel's "Bolero".'
All finished.
Heading back inside.
7 Gamma 10...
7 Gamma 11...
7 Gamma 12...
(Toby-y-y?
)
(I can see you.) Danny, is that you?
!
It's not funny, all right?
Dan?
I'm trying to work, Daniel.
If that's you, then can you just stop it?
Danny, check the temperature in Ood Habitation.
It seems to be rising.
Help yourself, just don't have the green.
Or the blue.
Um...
Bitof that,thanks.
Would you like sauce with that?
I'll have a go, yeah.
I did that job once.
I was a dinner lady.
Not that I'm calling you a lady.
Although, I don't know, you might be.
D'you actually get paid, though, do they give you money?
"The Beast and his armies shall rise from the Pit to make war against God."
I'm sorry?
Apologies.
I said, I hope you enjoy your meal.
Yeah.
'Drillhead now at Point 16.'
'Drillhead speed increasing.'
Keep pressure at 60.
'Close Door three.'
Close Door three.
'He is awake.'
What did you say?
'Close Door three.'
(Toby?
)
Don't turn around.
Dan?
That's not Dan.
Don't look at me.
Who are you?
I have so many names.
If I could...
If you look at me, you will die.
But who are you?
I'm behind you, Toby.
I'm right behind you.
Don't look.
Don't look at me.
One look and you will die.
I'm reaching out, Toby.
I'm so close.
Don't turn around.
Oh h...
I cantouchyou !
No... !
Zack, we got a problem?
No more than usual.
We've just got the Scarlet System burning up.
Might be worth a look.
You might want to see this.
Moment in history.
There.
On the edge.
That red cloud.
That used to be the Scarlet System.
Home to the Pallushi, a mighty civilisation spanning a billion years disappearing... forever, their planets and suns, consumed.
Ladies and gentlemen, we have witnessed its passing.
No, could you leave it open?
Just for a bit?
I won't go mad, I promise.
How would you know?
Scooti, check the lockdown.
Jefferson, sign off the airlock seals for me.
'Open door 18.'
I've seen films and things, yeah.
They say black holes are like gateways to another universe.
'Close Door 18.'
Not that one.
It just eats.
Long way from home.
Go that way.
Turn right.
Keep going for, er...
about 500 years, then you'll reach the Earth.
No signal.
That's the first time we've gone out of range.
Mind you, even if I could...
What would I tell her?
Can you build another Tardis?
They were grown, not built.
And with my home planet gone...
we're kind of stuck.
Well, could be worse.
This lot said they'd give us a lift.
And then what?
I dunno.
Find a planet.
Get a job.
Live a life.
Same as the rest of the universe.
I'd have to settle down.
Get a house or something.
A proper house with...
Doors and things.
Carpets.
Me!
Living in a house!
Now, THAT...
That...
Thatis terrifying!
You'd have to get a mortgage!
No!
Oh, yes!
I'm dying.
That's it, I'm dying, it's all over.
What about me?
I'd have to get one, too!
I dunno, could be the same one, we could both...
I dunno, share.
Or not.
Whatever.
I dunno.
All sorts of...
Anyway!
We 'llsee.
I promised Jackie I'd always take you back home.
Everyone leaves home in the end.
Not to end up stuck here.
Yeah, but stuck with you, that's not so bad...
Yeah?
Yes.
He is awake.
Evening!
Only us.
The mysterious couple.
How are you, then, settling in?
Yeah, sorry, straight to business.
The Ood, how do they communicate?
I mean, with each other.
Oh, just empaths.
There's a low level telepathic field connecting them.
Not that that does THEM much good, they're basically a herd race.
Like cattle.
This telepathic field, can it pick up messages?
Cos I was having dinner and one of the Ood said something... well,odd.
An odd Ood.
And then I got something else on my er...
Communicator thing.
Well, be fair.
We've got whole star systems burning up around us.
There's all sorts of stray transmissions.
Probably nothing.
Look, if there was something wrong, it would show.
We monitor the telepathic field.
It's the only way to look after them.
They're so stupid, they don't even tell us when they're ill.
Monitor the field.
That's this thing?
Yeah, but like I said, it's low level telepathy.
They only register basic 5.
That's not basic 5. 10...
20...
They've gone up to basic 30.
But they can't!
Doctor, the Ood.
What does basic 30 mean?
It means that they're shouting.
Screaming inside their heads.
Or something's shouting at them.
But where's it coming from?
What's it saying?
What did it say to you?
Something about the "beast" and the "pit".
What about your communicator, what did that say?
"He is awake."
And you will worship him.
What the hell?
He is awake.
And you will worship him.
Worship who?
Who's talking to you?
Who is it?
Toby, I've got your expenditure.
'Open door 41.'
'Close Door 41.'
41?
!
'Close Door 40.'
Computer, did you open and close Door 41?
'Confirmed.'
But... that'stheairlock.
Why would you open the airlock?
It's the night shift, we're not allowed outside.
Has someone gone out?
'Confirmed.'
But who was it?
'Cannot confirm.'
OK.
Right, hold on, I know.
Tell me whose space suit's been logged out.
'No space suit has been logged out.' But...
You'renotmakinganysense .
You can't go outside without...
Zack, I think we've got a breakdown on Door 41, it's saying somebody's gone out onto the planet's surface.
Zack?
Zack?
Computer, trace fault.
'There is no fault.'
Tell me, who went through that door?
'He is awake.'
What?
'He is awake.'
What's that supposed to mean?
'He bathes in the black sun.'
Toby?
There's no air, there's no...
No!
Stop it!
You can't be.
Open door 40!
Open door 40!
Open door 40!
OPEN DOOR 40!
Open door 40!
Open...
'Emergency, hull breach.'
'Emergency, hull breach.
Emergency, hull breach.'
Which section?
Everyone, evacuate 11 to 13.
We've got a breach.
The Base is open, repeat, the Base is open!
'Open door 19.'
'Close Door 19.'
I can't contain the oxygen field, we're gonna lose it!
COME ON!
KEEP MOVING!
And you, sunshine, get in!
'Breach sealed.
Breach sealed.' What happened?
What was it?
Hull breach.
We were open to the elements.
Another minute, we'd be inspecting that black hole close up.
That wasn't a quake.
What caused it?
We've lost sections 11 to 13.
Everyone all right?
We've got everyone except Scooti.
Scooti, report.
Scooti Manista, this is an order.
Report!
She's all right, I've picked up her biochip, she's in habitation three.
Better go and check.
If she's not responding, she might be unconscious.
But how about that, eh?
We survived!
Habitation three, come on.
I don't often say this, but I think we could all do with a drink.
Come on.
What happened?
I I don't know.
I was working, and then I can't remember.
A All that noise.
The room was falling apart.
There was no air...
Come on.
Up you get, come and have some protein 1.
Ooh!
You've gone native.
Oi, don't knock it, it's nice.
Protein 1 with just a dash of '3.
Check habitation four...
There's no sign, but the biochip says she's in this area.
Scooti, please respond.
If you can hear this, please respond.
Habitation six?
Nowhere here...
Zack, we've got a problem, Scooti's still missing.
But it says habitation three.
Yeah, well that's where I am, and I'm telling you, she's not here.
I've found her.
Oh, my God.
Sorry.
I'm so sorry.
Captain.
Report Officer Scootori Manista, PKD...
deceased.
43 K, 2.1.
She was 20.
20 years old.
"For how should man die better Than facing fearful odds
"For the ashes of his father And the temples...
"of his gods."
It's stopped.
What was that?
What was it?
The drill.
We've stopped drilling.
We've made it.
Point Zero.
All non essential Oods to be confined.
Capsule established, all systems functioning!
The mineshaft is go!
Bring systems online now!
Reporting as volunteer for the expeditionary force, sir!
Doctor, this breaks every single protocol.
We don't even know who you are.
Yeah, but you trust me, don't you?
And you can't let Ida go down there on her own.
Go on.
Look me in the eye.
Yes, you do.
I can see it.
Trust.
I should be going down.
The captain doesn't lead the mission.
He stays here, in charge.
Not much good at it, am I?
Positions!
We're going down in two!
Everyone, positions!
Mr Jefferson, I want maximum systems...
Oxygen.
Nitrobalance.
Gravity.
It's ages since I wore one of these.
I want that spacesuit back in one piece, you got that?
Yes, sir.
S'funny, cos, people back home think that space travel's gonna be all...
whizzing about and...
teleports, anti gravity.
But it's not, is it?
It's tough.
I'll see you later.
Not if I see you first.
You will remain here.
No command can override this.
Have you got that?
My instructions only.
Capsule active.
Counting down, in ten... nine...
eight, seven, six, five, four, three two, one.
Release.
You've gone beyond the oxygen field.
You're on your own.
Don't forget to breathe.
Breathing's good.
Rose, stay off the comm.
No chance.
Doctor?
Doctor, are you all right?
Ida.
Report to me...
Doctor?
It's all right.
We've made it.
We're getting out of the capsule now.
'What's it like down there?
'
Hard to tell.
Some sort of... cave,cavern.
It's massive.
This should help.
Gravity globe.
That's...
That's...
Oh, my God.
That's beautiful.
Rose...
You can tell Toby...
we've found his civilisation.
Oi, Toby, sounds like you've got plenty of work.
Good, good... .
Good.
Concentrate now, people, keep on the mission.
Ida, what about the power source?
We're close.
Energy signature indicates north north west.
Are you getting pictures up there?
Too much interference.
We're in your hands.
Well, we've come this far.
There's no turning back.
Oh, did you have to?
"No turning back"?
!
That's almost as bad as "nothing can possibly go wrong", or,
"It's gonna be the best Christmas Walford's ever had".
Have you finished(?
)
Yeah.
I've finished.
Captain, sir, there's something happening with the Ood.
What are they doing?
They're staring at me.
I've told them to stop, but they won't.
Danny, you're a big boy, I think you can take being stared at.
But the telepathic field, sir, it's at basic 100.
I've checked, but there isn't any fault.
It's definitely 100.
But that's impossible.
What's basic 100 mean?
They should be dead.
Basic 100 is brain death.
But they're safe?
They're not actually moving?
No, sir.
Keep watching them.
And you, Jefferson, keep a guard on the Ood.
Officer at arms.
You can't fire a gun in here.
What if you hit a wall?
Firing stock 15 only impacts upon organics.
Keep watch!
Guard them!
Yes, sir.
Is everything all right up there?
Yeah, yeah.
It's fine(!
)
Great!
We've found something.
It looks like metal, like some sort of seal
I've got a nasty feeling the word might be "trapdoor".
Not a good word, "trapdoor".
Never met a trapdoor I liked.
The edge is covered with those symbols.
D'you think it opens?
That's what trapdoors tend to do.
Trapdoor doesn't do it justice.
It's massive, Zack.
About 30 feet in diameter.
Any way of opening it?
Don't know.
I can't see any sort of mechanism.
I suppose that's the writing.
It'll tell us what to do.
The letters that defy translation.
Toby, did you get anywhere decoding it?
Toby, they need to know that lettering, does it make any sense?
I know what it says.
Then tell them!
When did you work that out?
Just tell them!
These are the words of the Beast.
And he has woken.
He is the heart that beats in the darkness, he is the blood that will never cease.
And now he will rise.
Officer, you will stand down.
Stand down!
What is it?
What's he done?
What's happening?
Rose?
What going on?
Jefferson, report... !
Report!
Officer, you've compromised security.
You will stand down and be confined immediately!
Mr Jefferson, tell me, sir...
did your wife ever forgive you?
I don't know what you mean.
Let me tell you a secret.
She never did.
Officer!
You will stand down and be confined!
Or what?
Under Condition Red, I'm authorised to shoot you.
But how many can you kill?
We are the Legion of the Beast.
Rose?
What is it, Rose?
I'm going back up.
Report!
Report!
Jefferson, report!
SOMEONE REPORT!
The Legion shall be many, and the Legion shall be few.
It's the Ood.
Sir, we have contamination of the livestock.
Doctor, I don't know what it is.
It's like they're possessed.
They won't listen to us.
He has woven himself through the fabric of your life since the dawn of time.
Some may call him Abbadon, some may call him Krop Tor.
Some may call him Satan or...
Captain, it's the Ood.
They're out of control!
.
.King
Of Despair, the Deathless Prince, the Bringer of Night.
These are the words that shall set him free.
Back up to the door!
I am become manifest.
I shall walk in the light.
To the door!
And my legions will swarm...
Get out!
. .across the worlds.
Doctor!
It's opening!
We're moving!
The whole thing's moving, the planet's moving!
I am the sin and the temptation and the desire.
I am the pain and the loss and the death of hope.
Get that door open!
The gravity field, it's going!
We're losing orbit!
We're gonna fall into the black hole!
I have been imprisoned for eternity,
But no more.
'Door seal.'
Move!
'Door seal.'
The Pit is open.
And I am free.
Subtitles by Red Bee Media Ltd / BBC 2006 Converted by reirei for the forom
It's the Ood they've gone mad.
Doctor, can you hear me?
Doctor, Ida, are you there?
Danny, turn right.
That thing is playing on very basic fears.
The cable's snapped.
Get out!
You will die.
And I will live.
I wonder what's wrong with her.
She's sort of queasy.
Indigestion.
Like she didn't want to land.
If you think there's gonna be trouble, we could always get back inside and go somewhere else.
I think we've landed inside a cupboard.
Here we go.
SYNTHESISED VOICE: 'Open door 15.' WIND HOWLS
Some sort of base.
Moon base, sea base, space base.
They build these things out of kits.
Glad we're indoors.
Sounds like a storm out there.
'Open door 16.'
Human design you've got a thing about kits.
It's put together like a flatpack wardrobe, only bigger.
And easier.
'Open door 17.'
Oh, it's a sanctuary base!
'Close door 17' Deep space exploration.
We've gone way out.
And listen to that.
CONTINUOUS WHIRRING Underneath.
Someone's drilling.
"Welcome to hell".
Oh, it's not that bad.
No, over there.
Hold on.
What does that say?
That's weird.
It won't translate.
I thought the Tardis translated everything, writing as well.
I should see English.
Exactly.
And if that's not working, then it means this writing is OLD.
Very old.
Impossibly old.
We should find out who's in charge.
We've gone beyond the reach of the Tardis' knowledge.
Not a good move.
If someone's looking, we shouldn't...
Oh!
Right.
Hello.
Sorry.
I was just saying, nice base.
We must feed.
You've got to what?
We must feed.
Yeah I think they mean us.
We must feed.
We must feed.
We must feed.
We must feed.
We must feed.
We must feed.
IN UNISON:
We must feed.
We must feed.
We must feed.
We must feed.
We must feed.
We must feed.
We must feed.
We must feed...
We must feed...
GLOBE RATTLES
. .you, if you are hungry.
Sorry?
We apologise.
Electromagnetics have interfered with speech systems.
Would you like some refreshment?
Um... ' Opendoor18 .'
What the hell?
How did... ?
Captain, you're not gonna believe this.
We've got people.
Out of nowhere.
I mean real people.
I mean two living people, just standing here right in front of me.
'Don't be stupid.
That's impossible.'
I suggest telling them that.
But you're a space base.
You must have visitors.
It can't be that impossible.
Are you telling me you don't know where you are?
No idea!
More fun, that way!
'Stand by, everyone.
Buckle down.
We have incoming.
'And it's a big one.
Quake 0.5 on its way.'
Through here.
Now.
Quickly!
Come on.
Move!
Keep moving!
Keep moving!
Come on!
Move it!
Oh, my God, you meant it.
People.
Look at that!
Real people!
That's us.
Hooray!
Yeah, definitely real.
My name's Rose, Rose Tyler, and this is the Doctor.
Come on, the oxygen must be offline.
We're hallucinating, they can't be...
No,they'rereal!
Come on, we're in the middle of an alert.
Danny, strap up, the quake's coming in.
Impact in 30 seconds...
Sorry,you two, whoever you are, just hold on.
Tight!
Hold on to what?
Anything.
I don't care, just hold on.
Ood, are we fixed?
Your kindness in this emergency is much appreciated.
What's this planet called, anyway?
Don't be stupid.
It hasn't got a name.
How could it have a name?
You really don't know, do you?
And... impact!
Oh, well.
That wasn't so...
That's it.
Everyone all right?
Speak to me, Ida?
Yeah, yeah.
Danny?
Fine.
Toby?
Fine.
Scooti?
No damage.
Jefferson?
Check!
We're fine, thanks.
Don't worry about us.
Surface caved in.
I deflected it onto Storage five through eight, we've lost them completely.
Toby, go and check the rocket link.
That's not my department.
Just do as I say, yeah?
METAL CREAKS AND GROANS
Oxygen holding.
METALLIC CREAKS Internal gravity at 56.6.
We should be OK.
Never mind the earthquake, that's...
That's one hell of a storm.
What is that, a hurricane?
You need an atmosphere for a hurricane.
There's no air out there.
It's a complete vacuum.
Then what's shaking the roof?
You're not joking.
You really don't know.
Well.
Introductions!
FYI, as they said in the olden days, I'm Ida Scott, Science Officer.
Zachary Cross Flane, Acting Captain, sir!
You've met Mr Jefferson, he's Head of Security.
Danny Bartock, Ethics Committee.
Not as boring as it sounds.
And that man who just left, that's Toby Zed, Archaeology, and this...
Scooti Manista, Trainee Maintenance, and this...
This is home.
Brace yourselves.
The sight of it sends some people mad.
That's a black hole.
That's impossible...
I did warn you.
We're standing under a black hole!
In orbit.
We can't be.
You can see for yourself.
We're in orbit.
But we can't be.
"This lump of rock is suspended in perpetual geostationary orbit around that black hole
"without falling in
"discuss" (!
)
And that's bad, yeah?
Bad doesn't cover it.
A black hole's a dead star, it collapses in on itself, in and in and in, until the matter's so dense and tight it starts to pull everything else in too.
Nothing in the universe can escape it.
Light, gravity, time everything gets pulled inside.
And crushed.
So there can't be an orbit?
We should be pulled right in?
We should be dead.
And yet here we are, beyond the laws of physics.
THUDS AND CREAKS
Welcome on board.
But if there's no atmosphere out there, what's that?
Stars breaking up.
Gas clouds.
We have whole solar systems being ripped apart above our heads, before falling into that thing.
So a bit worse than a storm, then?
Just a bit.
Just a bit, yeah.
WHISPERY ECHO:
Toby y y y...
ELECTRICS FIZZ AND POP
Who's that?
Danny?
'Close Door one.' The rocket link's fine.
That's the black hole, officially designated K 3 7 Gem 5.
In the scriptures of the Veltino, this planet's called Krop Tor...
The bitter pill.
And the black hole is supposed to be a mighty demon who was tricked into devouring the planet only to spit it out because it was poison.
"The Bitter Pill." I like that.
We're so far out.
Lost in the drifts of the universe.
How did you even get here?
We flew in, d'you see?
This planet's generating a gravity field.
We don't know how, we've no idea.
But it's kept in constant balance against the black hole.
And the field extends out there, as a funnel, a distinct...
gravity funnel, reaching out into clear space.
That was our way in.
You flew down that thing?
Like a rollercoaster.
By rights, the ship should've been torn apart.
We lost the captain, which is what put me in charge.
And you're doing a good job.
Yeah, well.
Needs must.
But if that gravity funnel closes, there's no way out.
Oh, we have fun speculating about that.
Yeah, that's the word, fun.
But that field would take phenomenal amounts of power.
Not just big, but off the scale!
Can I?
Sure, help yourself.
Your refreshment.
Oh, yeah, thanks.
Thank you!
I'm sorry, what was your name?
We have no titles.
We are as one.
Um...
Whataretheycalled?
Oh, come on!
Where've you been living?
Everyone's got one!
Well, not me.
So what are they?
They're the Ood.
The Ood?
The Ood.
That's...
Ood.
Very Ood.
But handy!
They work the mineshaft, all the drilling and stuff, supervision and maintenance.
They're born for it.
Basic slave race.
You've got slaves?
Don't start!
She's like one of that lot, the Friends of the Ood.
Well, maybe I am, yeah.
Since when did humans need slaves?
But the Ood offer themselves.
If you don't give them orders, they just pine away and die.
Seriously?
You like being ordered about?
It is all we crave.
Why's that, then?
We have nothing else in life.
Yeah, well.
I used to think like that.
Long time ago.
There we go!
D'you see?
To generate that gravity field and the funnel you need a power source with an inverted self extrapolating reflex of six to the power of six every six seconds.
All the sixes.
And it's impossible.
It took us two years to work that out.
I'm very good.
But that's why we're here.
This power source is ten miles below, through solid rock.
Point Zero.
We're drilling down to try and find it.
It's giving off readings of over 90 Statts on the Blazen Scale.
It could revolutionise modern science.
We could use it to fuel the Empire.
Or start a war.
It's buried beneath us...
In the darkness.
Waiting.
What's your job?
Chief dramatist?
Whatever it is down there, it's not a natural phenomenon.
This planet once supported life, aeons ago, before the human race had even learned to walk.
I saw that lettering on the wall.
Did you do that?
I copied it from fragments we've found, unearthed by the drilling.
I can't translate it.
No, neither can I.
And that's saying something.
There was some form of civilisation.
They buried something.
And now it's reaching out, calling us in.
And you came.
How could we not?
So when it comes right down to it, why did you come here?
Why did you do that?
Why?
I'll tell you why.
Because it was there!
Brilliant!
Scuse me...
Er,Zack,wasn'tit?
That's me.
Just stand there, cos I'm gonna...
HUGyou.
Is thatall right?
Suppose so.
Here we go.
Coming in.
Human beings.
You are amazing!
Thank you.
Not at all.
You're also completely mad.
You should pack your bags, get on that ship and fly for your lives!
You can talk.
How the hell did YOU get here?
I've got this...
Um... this...ship.It'shard to explain, it just sort of appears.
We can show you.
We parked down the corridor from uh...
What's it called?
Habitation Area...
Three.
Three.
D'you mean Storage Six?
It was a bit of a cupboard, yeah...
Storage Six?
But you said...
You said...
You said Storage Five to Eight...
What is it, what's wrong?
'Open door 19. . .'
'Close Door 19.'
Grr!
Come ON!
'Open door 17.'
'Open door 15.'
'Door 16 out of commission.' It can't be!
What's wrong?
What is it?
Doctor, the Tardis is in there what's happened?
The Tardis has gone.
'Door 16, out of commission.'
The earthquake.
This section collapsed.
But it's got to be out there somewhere.
Look down.
.
.The ground gave way.
My Tardis must've fallen right into the heart of the planet, but you've robot drills heading the same way.
We can't divert the drilling.
But I need my ship!
It's all I've got!
Literally, the only thing!
Doctor, WE'VE only got the resources to dig one, central shaft down to the power source, and that's it.
No diversions, no distractions, no exceptions.
Your machine is lost.
All I can do is offer you a lift if we ever get to leave this place.
And that's the end of it.
I'll put you on the duty roster.
We need someone in the laundry.
'Open door one.'
'Close door one.'
I've trapped you here.
No, don't worry about me.
OK.
We're on a planet that shouldn't exist, underneath a black hole, with no way out.
Yeah changed my mind.
Start worrying about me.
'Entering night shift.'
'Your chosen track for transition is Ravel's "Bolero".'
MUSIC PLAYS
All finished.
Heading back inside.
7 Gamma 10...
MUSIC CONTINUES 7 Gamma 11...
7 Gamma 12...
MUSIC ON PA
PA CRACKLES MID NOTE
PA SILENT
(Toby-y-y?
)
(I can see you.) Danny, is that you?
!
It's not funny, all right?
Dan?
I'm trying to work, Daniel.
If that's you, then can you just stop it?
ELECTRICS FIZZ AND WHINE
Danny, check the temperature in Ood Habitation.
It seems to be rising.
Help yourself, just don't have the green.
Or the blue.
Um...
Bitof that,thanks.
Would you like sauce with that?
I'll have a go, yeah.
I did that job once.
I was a dinner lady.
Not that I'm calling you a lady.
Although, I don't know, you might be.
D'you actually get paid, though, do they give you money?
"The Beast and his armies shall rise from the Pit to make war against God."
I'm sorry?
Apologies.
I said, I hope you enjoy your meal.
Yeah.
'Drillhead now at Point 16.'
'Drillhead speed increasing.'
Keep pressure at 60.
'Close Door three.'
Close Door three.
'He is awake.'
What did you say?
'Close Door three.'
(Toby?
)
DEEP VOICE:
Don't turn around.
Dan?
That's not Dan.
Don't look at me.
Who are you?
I have so many names.
If I could...
If you look at me, you will die.
But who are you?
I'm behind you, Toby.
I'm right behind you.
Don't look.
Don't look at me.
One look and you will die.
I'm reaching out, Toby.
I'm so close.
Don't turn around.
Oh h...
I cantouchyou !
No... !
ELECTRICAL FIZZ
Zack, we got a problem?
ZAK:
No more than usual.
We've just got the Scarlet System burning up.
Might be worth a look.
You might want to see this.
Moment in history.
There.
On the edge.
That red cloud.
That used to be the Scarlet System.
Home to the Pallushi, a mighty civilisation spanning a billion years disappearing... forever, their planets and suns, consumed.
Ladies and gentlemen, we have witnessed its passing.
No, could you leave it open?
Just for a bit?
I won't go mad, I promise.
How would you know?
Scooti, check the lockdown.
Jefferson, sign off the airlock seals for me.
SYNTHETIC VOICE: 'Open door 18.'
I've seen films and things, yeah.
They say black holes are like gateways to another universe.
'Close Door 18.'
Not that one.
It just eats.
Long way from home.
Go that way.
Turn right.
Keep going for, er...
about 500 years, then you'll reach the Earth.
No signal.
That's the first time we've gone out of range.
Mind you, even if I could...
What would I tell her?
Can you build another Tardis?
They were grown, not built.
And with my home planet gone...
we're kind of stuck.
Well, could be worse.
This lot said they'd give us a lift.
And then what?
I dunno.
Find a planet.
Get a job.
Live a life.
Same as the rest of the universe.
I'd have to settle down.
Get a house or something.
A proper house with...
Doors and things.
Carpets.
Me!
Living in a house!
Now, THAT...
That...
Thatis terrifying!
You'd have to get a mortgage!
No!
Oh, yes!
I'm dying.
That's it, I'm dying, it's all over.
What about me?
I'd have to get one, too!
I dunno, could be the same one, we could both...
I dunno, share.
Or not.
Whatever.
I dunno.
All sorts of...
Anyway!
We 'llsee.
I promised Jackie I'd always take you back home.
Everyone leaves home in the end.
Not to end up stuck here.
Yeah, but stuck with you, that's not so bad...
Yeah?
Yes.
MOBILE RINGS
DEEP VOICE:
He is awake.
Evening!
Only us.
The mysterious couple.
How are you, then, settling in?
Yeah, sorry, straight to business.
The Ood, how do they communicate?
I mean, with each other.
Oh, just empaths.
There's a low level telepathic field connecting them.
Not that that does THEM much good, they're basically a herd race.
Like cattle.
This telepathic field, can it pick up messages?
Cos I was having dinner and one of the Ood said something... well,odd.
An odd Ood.
And then I got something else on my er...
Communicator thing.
Well, be fair.
We've got whole star systems burning up around us.
There's all sorts of stray transmissions.
Probably nothing.
Look, if there was something wrong, it would show.
We monitor the telepathic field.
It's the only way to look after them.
They're so stupid, they don't even tell us when they're ill.
Monitor the field.
That's this thing?
Yeah, but like I said, it's low level telepathy.
They only register basic 5.
That's not basic 5. 10...
20...
They've gone up to basic 30.
But they can't!
Doctor, the Ood.
What does basic 30 mean?
It means that they're shouting.
Screaming inside their heads.
Or something's shouting at them.
But where's it coming from?
What's it saying?
What did it say to you?
Something about the "beast" and the "pit".
What about your communicator, what did that say?
"He is awake."
ALL OOD:
And you will worship him.
What the hell?
He is awake.
And you will worship him.
Worship who?
Who's talking to you?
Who is it?
Toby, I've got your expenditure.
'Open door 41.'
'Close Door 41.' DOOR MECHANISM HISSES
41?
!
'Close Door 40.'
Computer, did you open and close Door 41?
'Confirmed.'
But... that'stheairlock.
Why would you open the airlock?
It's the night shift, we're not allowed outside.
Has someone gone out?
'Confirmed.'
But who was it?
'Cannot confirm.'
OK.
Right, hold on, I know.
Tell me whose space suit's been logged out.
'No space suit has been logged out.' But...
You'renotmakinganysense .
You can't go outside without...
Zack, I think we've got a breakdown on Door 41, it's saying somebody's gone out onto the planet's surface.
STATIC HISS Zack?
Zack?
Computer, trace fault.
'There is no fault.'
Tell me, who went through that door?
'He is awake.'
What?
'He is awake.'
What's that supposed to mean?
'He bathes in the black sun.'
Toby?
There's no air, there's no...
No!
Stop it!
You can't be.
Open door 40!
Open door 40!
Open door 40!
OPEN DOOR 40!
Open door 40!
Open...
'Emergency, hull breach.' 'Emergency, hull breach.
Emergency, hull breach.'
Which section?
Everyone, evacuate 11 to 13.
We've got a breach.
The Base is open, repeat, the Base is open!
'Open door 19.'
'Close Door 19.'
I can't contain the oxygen field, we're gonna lose it!
COME ON!
KEEP MOVING!
And you, sunshine, get in!
'Breach sealed.
Breach sealed.' What happened?
What was it?
Hull breach.
We were open to the elements.
Another minute, we'd be inspecting that black hole close up.
That wasn't a quake.
What caused it?
We've lost sections 11 to 13.
Everyone all right?
We've got everyone except Scooti.
Scooti, report.
Scooti Manista, this is an order.
Report!
She's all right, I've picked up her biochip, she's in habitation three.
Better go and check.
If she's not responding, she might be unconscious.
But how about that, eh?
We survived!
Habitation three, come on.
I don't often say this, but I think we could all do with a drink.
Come on.
What happened?
I I don't know.
I was working, and then I can't remember.
A All that noise.
The room was falling apart.
There was no air...
Come on.
Up you get, come and have some protein 1.
Ooh!
You've gone native.
Oi, don't knock it, it's nice.
Protein 1 with just a dash of '3.
Check habitation four...
There's no sign, but the biochip says she's in this area.
Scooti, please respond.
If you can hear this, please respond.
Habitation six?
Nowhere here...
Zack, we've got a problem, Scooti's still missing.
ZACK:
But it says habitation three.
Yeah, well that's where I am, and I'm telling you, she's not here.
I've found her.
Oh, my God.
Sorry.
I'm so sorry.
Captain.
Report Officer Scootori Manista, PKD...
deceased.
43 K, 2.1.
She was 20.
20 years old.
"For how should man die better Than facing fearful odds
"For the ashes of his father And the temples...
"of his gods."
BACKGROUND WHIRR DIES AWAY
It's stopped.
FAINT, CLASHING ECHO What was that?
What was it?
The drill.
We've stopped drilling.
We've made it.
Point Zero.
ZACK:
All non essential Oods to be confined.
Capsule established, all systems functioning!
The mineshaft is go!
Bring systems online now!
Reporting as volunteer for the expeditionary force, sir!
Doctor, this breaks every single protocol.
We don't even know who you are.
Yeah, but you trust me, don't you?
And you can't let Ida go down there on her own.
Go on.
Look me in the eye.
Yes, you do.
I can see it.
Trust.
I should be going down.
The captain doesn't lead the mission.
He stays here, in charge.
Not much good at it, am I?
Positions!
We're going down in two!
Everyone, positions!
Mr Jefferson, I want maximum systems...
Oxygen.
Nitrobalance.
Gravity.
It's ages since I wore one of these.
I want that spacesuit back in one piece, you got that?
Yes, sir.
S'funny, cos, people back home think that space travel's gonna be all...
whizzing about and...
teleports, anti gravity.
But it's not, is it?
It's tough.
I'll see you later.
Not if I see you first.
You will remain here.
No command can override this.
Have you got that?
My instructions only.
Capsule active.
Counting down, in ten... nine...
eight, seven, six, five, four, three two, one.
Release.
You've gone beyond the oxygen field.
You're on your own.
Don't forget to breathe.
Breathing's good.
Rose, stay off the comm.
No chance.
KLAXON
Doctor?
Doctor, are you all right?
Ida.
Report to me...
Doctor?
It's all right.
We've made it.
We're getting out of the capsule now.
'What's it like down there?
'
Hard to tell.
Some sort of... cave,cavern.
It's massive.
This should help.
Gravity globe.
That's...
That's...
Oh, my God.
That's beautiful.
Rose...
You can tell Toby...
we've found his civilisation.
Oi, Toby, sounds like you've got plenty of work.
Good, good... .
Good.
Concentrate now, people, keep on the mission.
Ida, what about the power source?
We're close.
Energy signature indicates north north west.
Are you getting pictures up there?
Too much interference.
We're in your hands.
Well, we've come this far.
There's no turning back.
Oh, did you have to?
"No turning back"?
!
That's almost as bad as "nothing can possibly go wrong", or,
"It's gonna be the best Christmas Walford's ever had".
Have you finished(?
)
Yeah.
I've finished.
Captain, sir, there's something happening with the Ood.
What are they doing?
They're staring at me.
I've told them to stop, but they won't.
Danny, you're a big boy, I think you can take being stared at.
But the telepathic field, sir, it's at basic 100.
I've checked, but there isn't any fault.
It's definitely 100.
But that's impossible.
What's basic 100 mean?
They should be dead.
Basic 100 is brain death.
But they're safe?
They're not actually moving?
No, sir.
Keep watching them.
And you, Jefferson, keep a guard on the Ood.
Officer at arms.
You can't fire a gun in here.
What if you hit a wall?
Firing stock 15 only impacts upon organics.
Keep watch!
Guard them!
Yes, sir.
Is everything all right up there?
Yeah, yeah.
It's fine(!
)
Great!
We've found something.
It looks like metal, like some sort of seal
I've got a nasty feeling the word might be "trapdoor".
Not a good word, "trapdoor".
Never met a trapdoor I liked.
The edge is covered with those symbols.
D'you think it opens?
That's what trapdoors tend to do.
Trapdoor doesn't do it justice.
It's massive, Zack.
About 30 feet in diameter.
Any way of opening it?
Don't know.
I can't see any sort of mechanism.
I suppose that's the writing.
It'll tell us what to do.
The letters that defy translation.
Toby, did you get anywhere decoding it?
Toby, they need to know that lettering, does it make any sense?
I know what it says.
Then tell them!
When did you work that out?
Just tell them!
DEEP VOICE:
These are the words of the Beast.
And he has woken.
He is the heart that beats in the darkness, he is the blood that will never cease.
And now he will rise.
Officer, you will stand down.
Stand down!
What is it?
What's he done?
What's happening?
Rose?
What going on?
Jefferson, report... !
Report!
Officer, you've compromised security.
You will stand down and be confined immediately!
Mr Jefferson, tell me, sir...
did your wife ever forgive you?
I don't know what you mean.
Let me tell you a secret.
She never did.
Officer!
You will stand down and be confined!
Or what?
Under Condition Red, I'm authorised to shoot you.
But how many can you kill?
IN UNISON:
We are the Legion of the Beast.
Rose?
What is it, Rose?
I'm going back up.
ZACK:
Report!
Report!
Jefferson, report!
SOMEONE REPORT!
The Legion shall be many, and the Legion shall be few.
It's the Ood.
Sir, we have contamination of the livestock.
Doctor, I don't know what it is.
It's like they're possessed.
They won't listen to us.
He has woven himself through the fabric of your life since the dawn of time.
Some may call him Abbadon, some may call him Krop Tor.
Some may call him Satan or...
Captain, it's the Ood.
They're out of control!
.
.King
Of Despair, the Deathless Prince, the Bringer of Night.
These are the words that shall set him free.
Back up to the door!
I am become manifest.
I shall walk in the light.
To the door!
And my legions will swarm...
Get out!
. .across the worlds.
Doctor!
It's opening!
We're moving!
The whole thing's moving, the planet's moving!
I am the sin and the temptation and the desire.
I am the pain and the loss and the death of hope.
Get that door open!
The gravity field, it's going!
We're losing orbit!
We're gonna fall into the black hole!
DEEP VOICE:
I have been imprisoned for eternity,
But no more.
'Door seal.'
Move!
'Door seal.'
The Pit is open.
And I am free.
It's the Ood they've gone mad.
Doctor, can you hear me?
Doctor, Ida, are you there?
Danny, turn right.
That thing is playing on very basic fears.
The cable's snapped.
Get out!
You will die.
And I will live.
I wonder what's wrong with her.
She's sort of queasy.
Indigestion.
Like she didn't want to land.
If you think there's gonna be trouble, we could always get back inside and go somewhere else.
I think we've landed inside a cupboard.
Here we go.
'Open door 15.'
Some sort of base.
Moon base, sea base, space base.
They build these things out of kits.
Glad we're indoors.
Sounds like a storm out there.
'Open door 16.'
Human design you've got a thing about kits.
It's put together like a flatpack wardrobe, only bigger.
And easier.
'Open door 17.'
Oh, it's a sanctuary base!
'Close door 17' Deep space exploration.
We've gone way out.
And listen to that.
Underneath.
Someone's drilling.
"Welcome to hell".
Oh, it's not that bad.
No, over there.
Hold on.
What does that say?
That's weird.
It won't translate.
I thought the Tardis translated everything, writing as well.
I should see English.
Exactly.
And if that's not working, then it means this writing is OLD.
Very old.
Impossibly old.
We should find out who's in charge.
We've gone beyond the reach of the Tardis' knowledge.
Not a good move.
If someone's looking, we shouldn't...
Oh!
Right.
Hello.
Sorry.
I was just saying, nice base.
We must feed.
You've got to what?
We must feed.
Yeah I think they mean us.
We must feed.
We must feed.
We must feed.
We must feed.
We must feed.
We must feed.
We must feed.
We must feed.
We must feed.
We must feed.
We must feed.
We must feed.
We must feed.
We must feed...
We must feed...
. .you, if you are hungry.
Sorry?
We apologise.
Electromagnetics have interfered with speech systems.
Would you like some refreshment?
Um... ' Opendoor18 .'
What the hell?
How did... ?
Captain, you're not gonna believe this.
We've got people.
Out of nowhere.
I mean real people.
I mean two living people, just standing here right in front of me.
'Don't be stupid.
That's impossible.'
I suggest telling them that.
But you're a space base.
You must have visitors.
It can't be that impossible.
Are you telling me you don't know where you are?
No idea!
More fun, that way!
'Stand by, everyone.
Buckle down.
We have incoming.
'And it's a big one.
Quake 0.5 on its way.'
Through here.
Now.
Quickly!
Come on.
Move!
Keep moving!
Keep moving!
Come on!
Move it!
Oh, my God, you meant it.
People.
Look at that!
Real people!
That's us.
Hooray!
Yeah, definitely real.
My name's Rose, Rose Tyler, and this is the Doctor.
Come on, the oxygen must be offline.
We're hallucinating, they can't be...
No,they'rereal!
Come on, we're in the middle of an alert.
Danny, strap up, the quake's coming in.
Impact in 30 seconds...
Sorry,you two, whoever you are, just hold on.
Tight!
Hold on to what?
Anything.
I don't care, just hold on.
Ood, are we fixed?
Your kindness in this emergency is much appreciated.
What's this planet called, anyway?
Don't be stupid.
It hasn't got a name.
How could it have a name?
You really don't know, do you?
And... impact!
Oh, well.
That wasn't so...
That's it.
Everyone all right?
Speak to me, Ida?
Yeah, yeah.
Danny?
Fine.
Toby?
Fine.
Scooti?
No damage.
Jefferson?
Check!
We're fine, thanks.
Don't worry about us.
Surface caved in.
I deflected it onto Storage five through eight, we've lost them completely.
Toby, go and check the rocket link.
That's not my department.
Just do as I say, yeah?
Oxygen holding.
Internal gravity at 56.6.
We should be OK.
Never mind the earthquake, that's...
That's one hell of a storm.
What is that, a hurricane?
You need an atmosphere for a hurricane.
There's no air out there.
It's a complete vacuum.
Then what's shaking the roof?
You're not joking.
You really don't know.
Well.
Introductions!
FYI, as they said in the olden days, I'm Ida Scott, Science Officer.
Zachary Cross Flane, Acting Captain, sir!
You've met Mr Jefferson, he's Head of Security.
Danny Bartock, Ethics Committee.
Not as boring as it sounds.
And that man who just left, that's Toby Zed, Archaeology, and this...
Scooti Manista, Trainee Maintenance, and this...
This is home.
Brace yourselves.
The sight of it sends some people mad.
That's a black hole.
That's impossible...
I did warn you.
We're standing under a black hole!
In orbit.
We can't be.
You can see for yourself.
We're in orbit.
But we can't be.
"This lump of rock is suspended in perpetual geostationary orbit around that black hole
"without falling in
"discuss" (!
)
And that's bad, yeah?
Bad doesn't cover it.
A black hole's a dead star, it collapses in on itself, in and in and in, until the matter's so dense and tight it starts to pull everything else in too.
Nothing in the universe can escape it.
Light, gravity, time everything gets pulled inside.
And crushed.
So there can't be an orbit?
We should be pulled right in?
We should be dead.
And yet here we are, beyond the laws of physics.
Welcome on board.
But if there's no atmosphere out there, what's that?
Stars breaking up.
Gas clouds.
We have whole solar systems being ripped apart above our heads, before falling into that thing.
So a bit worse than a storm, then?
Just a bit.
Just a bit, yeah.
Toby y y y...
Who's that?
Danny?
'Close Door one.' The rocket link's fine.
That's the black hole, officially designated K 3 7 Gem 5.
In the scriptures of the Veltino, this planet's called Krop Tor...
The bitter pill.
And the black hole is supposed to be a mighty demon who was tricked into devouring the planet only to spit it out because it was poison.
"The Bitter Pill." I like that.
We're so far out.
Lost in the drifts of the universe.
How did you even get here?
We flew in, d'you see?
This planet's generating a gravity field.
We don't know how, we've no idea.
But it's kept in constant balance against the black hole.
And the field extends out there, as a funnel, a distinct...
gravity funnel, reaching out into clear space.
That was our way in.
You flew down that thing?
Like a rollercoaster.
By rights, the ship should've been torn apart.
We lost the captain, which is what put me in charge.
And you're doing a good job.
Yeah, well.
Needs must.
But if that gravity funnel closes, there's no way out.
Oh, we have fun speculating about that.
Yeah, that's the word, fun.
But that field would take phenomenal amounts of power.
Not just big, but off the scale!
Can I?
Sure, help yourself.
Your refreshment.
Oh, yeah, thanks.
Thank you!
I'm sorry, what was your name?
We have no titles.
We are as one.
Um...
Whataretheycalled?
Oh, come on!
Where've you been living?
Everyone's got one!
Well, not me.
So what are they?
They're the Ood.
The Ood?
The Ood.
That's...
Ood.
Very Ood.
But handy!
They work the mineshaft, all the drilling and stuff, supervision and maintenance.
They're born for it.
Basic slave race.
You've got slaves?
Don't start!
She's like one of that lot, the Friends of the Ood.
Well, maybe I am, yeah.
Since when did humans need slaves?
But the Ood offer themselves.
If you don't give them orders, they just pine away and die.
Seriously?
You like being ordered about?
It is all we crave.
Why's that, then?
We have nothing else in life.
Yeah, well.
I used to think like that.
Long time ago.
There we go!
D'you see?
To generate that gravity field and the funnel you need a power source with an inverted self extrapolating reflex of six to the power of six every six seconds.
All the sixes.
And it's impossible.
It took us two years to work that out.
I'm very good.
But that's why we're here.
This power source is ten miles below, through solid rock.
Point Zero.
We're drilling down to try and find it.
It's giving off readings of over 90 Statts on the Blazen Scale.
It could revolutionise modern science.
We could use it to fuel the Empire.
Or start a war.
It's buried beneath us...
In the darkness.
Waiting.
What's your job?
Chief dramatist?
Whatever it is down there, it's not a natural phenomenon.
This planet once supported life, aeons ago, before the human race had even learned to walk.
I saw that lettering on the wall.
Did you do that?
I copied it from fragments we've found, unearthed by the drilling.
I can't translate it.
No, neither can I.
And that's saying something.
There was some form of civilisation.
They buried something.
And now it's reaching out, calling us in.
And you came.
How could we not?
So when it comes right down to it, why did you come here?
Why did you do that?
Why?
I'll tell you why.
Because it was there!
Brilliant!
Scuse me...
Er,Zack,wasn'tit?
That's me.
Just stand there, cos I'm gonna...
HUGyou.
Is thatall right?
Suppose so.
Here we go.
Coming in.
Human beings.
You are amazing!
Thank you.
Not at all.
You're also completely mad.
You should pack your bags, get on that ship and fly for your lives!
You can talk.
How the hell did YOU get here?
I've got this...
Um... this...ship.It'shard to explain, it just sort of appears.
We can show you.
We parked down the corridor from uh...
What's it called?
Habitation Area...
Three.
Three.
D'you mean Storage Six?
It was a bit of a cupboard, yeah...
Storage Six?
But you said...
You said...
You said Storage Five to Eight...
What is it, what's wrong?
'Open door 19. . .'
'Close Door 19.'
Grr!
Come ON!
'Open door 17.'
'Open door 15.'
'Door 16 out of commission.' It can't be!
What's wrong?
What is it?
Doctor, the Tardis is in there what's happened?
The Tardis has gone.
'Door 16, out of commission.'
The earthquake.
This section collapsed.
But it's got to be out there somewhere.
Look down.
.
.The ground gave way.
My Tardis must've fallen right into the heart of the planet, but you've robot drills heading the same way.
We can't divert the drilling.
But I need my ship!
It's all I've got!
Literally, the only thing!
Doctor, WE'VE only got the resources to dig one, central shaft down to the power source, and that's it.
No diversions, no distractions, no exceptions.
Your machine is lost.
All I can do is offer you a lift if we ever get to leave this place.
And that's the end of it.
I'll put you on the duty roster.
We need someone in the laundry.
'Open door one.'
'Close door one.'
I've trapped you here.
No, don't worry about me.
OK.
We're on a planet that shouldn't exist, underneath a black hole, with no way out.
Yeah changed my mind.
Start worrying about me.
'Entering night shift.'
'Your chosen track for transition is Ravel's "Bolero".'
All finished.
Heading back inside.
7 Gamma 10...
7 Gamma 11...
7 Gamma 12...
(Toby-y-y?
)
(I can see you.) Danny, is that you?
!
It's not funny, all right?
Dan?
I'm trying to work, Daniel.
If that's you, then can you just stop it?
Danny, check the temperature in Ood Habitation.
It seems to be rising.
Help yourself, just don't have the green.
Or the blue.
Um...
Bitof that,thanks.
Would you like sauce with that?
I'll have a go, yeah.
I did that job once.
I was a dinner lady.
Not that I'm calling you a lady.
Although, I don't know, you might be.
D'you actually get paid, though, do they give you money?
"The Beast and his armies shall rise from the Pit to make war against God."
I'm sorry?
Apologies.
I said, I hope you enjoy your meal.
Yeah.
'Drillhead now at Point 16.'
'Drillhead speed increasing.'
Keep pressure at 60.
'Close Door three.'
Close Door three.
'He is awake.'
What did you say?
'Close Door three.'
(Toby?
)
Don't turn around.
Dan?
That's not Dan.
Don't look at me.
Who are you?
I have so many names.
If I could...
If you look at me, you will die.
But who are you?
I'm behind you, Toby.
I'm right behind you.
Don't look.
Don't look at me.
One look and you will die.
I'm reaching out, Toby.
I'm so close.
Don't turn around.
Oh h...
I cantouchyou !
No... !
Zack, we got a problem?
No more than usual.
We've just got the Scarlet System burning up.
Might be worth a look.
You might want to see this.
Moment in history.
There.
On the edge.
That red cloud.
That used to be the Scarlet System.
Home to the Pallushi, a mighty civilisation spanning a billion years disappearing... forever, their planets and suns, consumed.
Ladies and gentlemen, we have witnessed its passing.
No, could you leave it open?
Just for a bit?
I won't go mad, I promise.
How would you know?
Scooti, check the lockdown.
Jefferson, sign off the airlock seals for me.
'Open door 18.'
I've seen films and things, yeah.
They say black holes are like gateways to another universe.
'Close Door 18.'
Not that one.
It just eats.
Long way from home.
Go that way.
Turn right.
Keep going for, er...
about 500 years, then you'll reach the Earth.
No signal.
That's the first time we've gone out of range.
Mind you, even if I could...
What would I tell her?
Can you build another Tardis?
They were grown, not built.
And with my home planet gone...
we're kind of stuck.
Well, could be worse.
This lot said they'd give us a lift.
And then what?
I dunno.
Find a planet.
Get a job.
Live a life.
Same as the rest of the universe.
I'd have to settle down.
Get a house or something.
A proper house with...
Doors and things.
Carpets.
Me!
Living in a house!
Now, THAT...
That...
Thatis terrifying!
You'd have to get a mortgage!
No!
Oh, yes!
I'm dying.
That's it, I'm dying, it's all over.
What about me?
I'd have to get one, too!
I dunno, could be the same one, we could both...
I dunno, share.
Or not.
Whatever.
I dunno.
All sorts of...
Anyway!
We 'llsee.
I promised Jackie I'd always take you back home.
Everyone leaves home in the end.
Not to end up stuck here.
Yeah, but stuck with you, that's not so bad...
Yeah?
Yes.
He is awake.
Evening!
Only us.
The mysterious couple.
How are you, then, settling in?
Yeah, sorry, straight to business.
The Ood, how do they communicate?
I mean, with each other.
Oh, just empaths.
There's a low level telepathic field connecting them.
Not that that does THEM much good, they're basically a herd race.
Like cattle.
This telepathic field, can it pick up messages?
Cos I was having dinner and one of the Ood said something... well,odd.
An odd Ood.
And then I got something else on my er...
Communicator thing.
Well, be fair.
We've got whole star systems burning up around us.
There's all sorts of stray transmissions.
Probably nothing.
Look, if there was something wrong, it would show.
We monitor the telepathic field.
It's the only way to look after them.
They're so stupid, they don't even tell us when they're ill.
Monitor the field.
That's this thing?
Yeah, but like I said, it's low level telepathy.
They only register basic 5.
That's not basic 5. 10...
20...
They've gone up to basic 30.
But they can't!
Doctor, the Ood.
What does basic 30 mean?
It means that they're shouting.
Screaming inside their heads.
Or something's shouting at them.
But where's it coming from?
What's it saying?
What did it say to you?
Something about the "beast" and the "pit".
What about your communicator, what did that say?
"He is awake."
And you will worship him.
What the hell?
He is awake.
And you will worship him.
Worship who?
Who's talking to you?
Who is it?
Toby, I've got your expenditure.
'Open door 41.'
'Close Door 41.'
41?
!
'Close Door 40.'
Computer, did you open and close Door 41?
'Confirmed.'
But... that'stheairlock.
Why would you open the airlock?
It's the night shift, we're not allowed outside.
Has someone gone out?
'Confirmed.'
But who was it?
'Cannot confirm.'
OK.
Right, hold on, I know.
Tell me whose space suit's been logged out.
'No space suit has been logged out.' But...
You'renotmakinganysense .
You can't go outside without...
Zack, I think we've got a breakdown on Door 41, it's saying somebody's gone out onto the planet's surface.
Zack?
Zack?
Computer, trace fault.
'There is no fault.'
Tell me, who went through that door?
'He is awake.'
What?
'He is awake.'
What's that supposed to mean?
'He bathes in the black sun.'
Toby?
There's no air, there's no...
No!
Stop it!
You can't be.
Open door 40!
Open door 40!
Open door 40!
OPEN DOOR 40!
Open door 40!
Open...
'Emergency, hull breach.'
'Emergency, hull breach.
Emergency, hull breach.'
Which section?
Everyone, evacuate 11 to 13.
We've got a breach.
The Base is open, repeat, the Base is open!
'Open door 19.'
'Close Door 19.'
I can't contain the oxygen field, we're gonna lose it!
COME ON!
KEEP MOVING!
And you, sunshine, get in!
'Breach sealed.
Breach sealed.' What happened?
What was it?
Hull breach.
We were open to the elements.
Another minute, we'd be inspecting that black hole close up.
That wasn't a quake.
What caused it?
We've lost sections 11 to 13.
Everyone all right?
We've got everyone except Scooti.
Scooti, report.
Scooti Manista, this is an order.
Report!
She's all right, I've picked up her biochip, she's in habitation three.
Better go and check.
If she's not responding, she might be unconscious.
But how about that, eh?
We survived!
Habitation three, come on.
I don't often say this, but I think we could all do with a drink.
Come on.
What happened?
I I don't know.
I was working, and then I can't remember.
A All that noise.
The room was falling apart.
There was no air...
Come on.
Up you get, come and have some protein 1.
Ooh!
You've gone native.
Oi, don't knock it, it's nice.
Protein 1 with just a dash of '3.
Check habitation four...
There's no sign, but the biochip says she's in this area.
Scooti, please respond.
If you can hear this, please respond.
Habitation six?
Nowhere here...
Zack, we've got a problem, Scooti's still missing.
But it says habitation three.
Yeah, well that's where I am, and I'm telling you, she's not here.
I've found her.
Oh, my God.
Sorry.
I'm so sorry.
Captain.
Report Officer Scootori Manista, PKD...
deceased.
43 K, 2.1.
She was 20.
20 years old.
"For how should man die better Than facing fearful odds
"For the ashes of his father And the temples...
"of his gods."
It's stopped.
What was that?
What was it?
The drill.
We've stopped drilling.
We've made it.
Point Zero.
All non essential Oods to be confined.
Capsule established, all systems functioning!
The mineshaft is go!
Bring systems online now!
Reporting as volunteer for the expeditionary force, sir!
Doctor, this breaks every single protocol.
We don't even know who you are.
Yeah, but you trust me, don't you?
And you can't let Ida go down there on her own.
Go on.
Look me in the eye.
Yes, you do.
I can see it.
Trust.
I should be going down.
The captain doesn't lead the mission.
He stays here, in charge.
Not much good at it, am I?
Positions!
We're going down in two!
Everyone, positions!
Mr Jefferson, I want maximum systems...
Oxygen.
Nitrobalance.
Gravity.
It's ages since I wore one of these.
I want that spacesuit back in one piece, you got that?
Yes, sir.
S'funny, cos, people back home think that space travel's gonna be all...
whizzing about and...
teleports, anti gravity.
But it's not, is it?
It's tough.
I'll see you later.
Not if I see you first.
You will remain here.
No command can override this.
Have you got that?
My instructions only.
Capsule active.
Counting down, in ten... nine...
eight, seven, six, five, four, three two, one.
Release.
You've gone beyond the oxygen field.
You're on your own.
Don't forget to breathe.
Breathing's good.
Rose, stay off the comm.
No chance.
Doctor?
Doctor, are you all right?
Ida.
Report to me...
Doctor?
It's all right.
We've made it.
We're getting out of the capsule now.
'What's it like down there?
'
Hard to tell.
Some sort of... cave,cavern.
It's massive.
This should help.
Gravity globe.
That's...
That's...
Oh, my God.
That's beautiful.
Rose...
You can tell Toby...
we've found his civilisation.
Oi, Toby, sounds like you've got plenty of work.
Good, good... .
Good.
Concentrate now, people, keep on the mission.
Ida, what about the power source?
We're close.
Energy signature indicates north north west.
Are you getting pictures up there?
Too much interference.
We're in your hands.
Well, we've come this far.
There's no turning back.
Oh, did you have to?
"No turning back"?
!
That's almost as bad as "nothing can possibly go wrong", or,
"It's gonna be the best Christmas Walford's ever had".
Have you finished(?
)
Yeah.
I've finished.
Captain, sir, there's something happening with the Ood.
What are they doing?
They're staring at me.
I've told them to stop, but they won't.
Danny, you're a big boy, I think you can take being stared at.
But the telepathic field, sir, it's at basic 100.
I've checked, but there isn't any fault.
It's definitely 100.
But that's impossible.
What's basic 100 mean?
They should be dead.
Basic 100 is brain death.
But they're safe?
They're not actually moving?
No, sir.
Keep watching them.
And you, Jefferson, keep a guard on the Ood.
Officer at arms.
You can't fire a gun in here.
What if you hit a wall?
Firing stock 15 only impacts upon organics.
Keep watch!
Guard them!
Yes, sir.
Is everything all right up there?
Yeah, yeah.
It's fine(!
)
Great!
We've found something.
It looks like metal, like some sort of seal
I've got a nasty feeling the word might be "trapdoor".
Not a good word, "trapdoor".
Never met a trapdoor I liked.
The edge is covered with those symbols.
D'you think it opens?
That's what trapdoors tend to do.
Trapdoor doesn't do it justice.
It's massive, Zack.
About 30 feet in diameter.
Any way of opening it?
Don't know.
I can't see any sort of mechanism.
I suppose that's the writing.
It'll tell us what to do.
The letters that defy translation.
Toby, did you get anywhere decoding it?
Toby, they need to know that lettering, does it make any sense?
I know what it says.
Then tell them!
When did you work that out?
Just tell them!
These are the words of the Beast.
And he has woken.
He is the heart that beats in the darkness, he is the blood that will never cease.
And now he will rise.
Officer, you will stand down.
Stand down!
What is it?
What's he done?
What's happening?
Rose?
What going on?
Jefferson, report... !
Report!
Officer, you've compromised security.
You will stand down and be confined immediately!
Mr Jefferson, tell me, sir...
did your wife ever forgive you?
I don't know what you mean.
Let me tell you a secret.
She never did.
Officer!
You will stand down and be confined!
Or what?
Under Condition Red, I'm authorised to shoot you.
But how many can you kill?
We are the Legion of the Beast.
Rose?
What is it, Rose?
I'm going back up.
Report!
Report!
Jefferson, report!
SOMEONE REPORT!
The Legion shall be many, and the Legion shall be few.
It's the Ood.
Sir, we have contamination of the livestock.
Doctor, I don't know what it is.
It's like they're possessed.
They won't listen to us.
He has woven himself through the fabric of your life since the dawn of time.
Some may call him Abbadon, some may call him Krop Tor.
Some may call him Satan or...
Captain, it's the Ood.
They're out of control!
.
.King
Of Despair, the Deathless Prince, the Bringer of Night.
These are the words that shall set him free.
Back up to the door!
I am become manifest.
I shall walk in the light.
To the door!
And my legions will swarm...
Get out!
. .across the worlds.
Doctor!
It's opening!
We're moving!
The whole thing's moving, the planet's moving!
I am the sin and the temptation and the desire.
I am the pain and the loss and the death of hope.
Get that door open!
The gravity field, it's going!
We're losing orbit!
We're gonna fall into the black hole!
I have been imprisoned for eternity,
But no more.
'Door seal.'
Move!
'Door seal.'
The Pit is open.
And I am free.
Subtitles by Red Bee Media Ltd / BBC 2006 Converted by reirei for the forom
It's the Ood they've gone mad.
Doctor, can you hear me?
Doctor, Ida, are you there?
Danny, turn right.
That thing is playing on very basic fears.
The cable's snapped.
Get out!
You will die.
And I will live.
I wonder what's wrong with her.
She's sort of queasy.
Indigestion.
Like she didn't want to land.
If you think there's gonna be trouble, we could always get back inside and go somewhere else.
I think we've landed inside a cupboard.
Here we go.
SYNTHESISED VOICE: 'Open door 15.' WIND HOWLS
Some sort of base.
Moon base, sea base, space base.
They build these things out of kits.
Glad we're indoors.
Sounds like a storm out there.
'Open door 16.'
Human design you've got a thing about kits.
It's put together like a flatpack wardrobe, only bigger.
And easier.
'Open door 17.'
Oh, it's a sanctuary base!
'Close door 17' Deep space exploration.
We've gone way out.
And listen to that.
CONTINUOUS WHIRRING Underneath.
Someone's drilling.
"Welcome to hell".
Oh, it's not that bad.
No, over there.
Hold on.
What does that say?
That's weird.
It won't translate.
I thought the Tardis translated everything, writing as well.
I should see English.
Exactly.
And if that's not working, then it means this writing is OLD.
Very old.
Impossibly old.
We should find out who's in charge.
We've gone beyond the reach of the Tardis' knowledge.
Not a good move.
If someone's looking, we shouldn't...
Oh!
Right.
Hello.
Sorry.
I was just saying, nice base.
We must feed.
You've got to what?
We must feed.
Yeah I think they mean us.
We must feed.
We must feed.
We must feed.
We must feed.
We must feed.
We must feed.
IN UNISON:
We must feed.
We must feed.
We must feed.
We must feed.
We must feed.
We must feed.
We must feed.
We must feed...
We must feed...
GLOBE RATTLES
. .you, if you are hungry.
Sorry?
We apologise.
Electromagnetics have interfered with speech systems.
Would you like some refreshment?
Um... ' Opendoor18 .'
What the hell?
How did... ?
Captain, you're not gonna believe this.
We've got people.
Out of nowhere.
I mean real people.
I mean two living people, just standing here right in front of me.
'Don't be stupid.
That's impossible.'
I suggest telling them that.
But you're a space base.
You must have visitors.
It can't be that impossible.
Are you telling me you don't know where you are?
No idea!
More fun, that way!
'Stand by, everyone.
Buckle down.
We have incoming.
'And it's a big one.
Quake 0.5 on its way.'
Through here.
Now.
Quickly!
Come on.
Move!
Keep moving!
Keep moving!
Come on!
Move it!
Oh, my God, you meant it.
People.
Look at that!
Real people!
That's us.
Hooray!
Yeah, definitely real.
My name's Rose, Rose Tyler, and this is the Doctor.
Come on, the oxygen must be offline.
We're hallucinating, they can't be...
No,they'rereal!
Come on, we're in the middle of an alert.
Danny, strap up, the quake's coming in.
Impact in 30 seconds...
Sorry,you two, whoever you are, just hold on.
Tight!
Hold on to what?
Anything.
I don't care, just hold on.
Ood, are we fixed?
Your kindness in this emergency is much appreciated.
What's this planet called, anyway?
Don't be stupid.
It hasn't got a name.
How could it have a name?
You really don't know, do you?
And... impact!
Oh, well.
That wasn't so...
That's it.
Everyone all right?
Speak to me, Ida?
Yeah, yeah.
Danny?
Fine.
Toby?
Fine.
Scooti?
No damage.
Jefferson?
Check!
We're fine, thanks.
Don't worry about us.
Surface caved in.
I deflected it onto Storage five through eight, we've lost them completely.
Toby, go and check the rocket link.
That's not my department.
Just do as I say, yeah?
METAL CREAKS AND GROANS
Oxygen holding.
METALLIC CREAKS Internal gravity at 56.6.
We should be OK.
Never mind the earthquake, that's...
That's one hell of a storm.
What is that, a hurricane?
You need an atmosphere for a hurricane.
There's no air out there.
It's a complete vacuum.
Then what's shaking the roof?
You're not joking.
You really don't know.
Well.
Introductions!
FYI, as they said in the olden days, I'm Ida Scott, Science Officer.
Zachary Cross Flane, Acting Captain, sir!
You've met Mr Jefferson, he's Head of Security.
Danny Bartock, Ethics Committee.
Not as boring as it sounds.
And that man who just left, that's Toby Zed, Archaeology, and this...
Scooti Manista, Trainee Maintenance, and this...
This is home.
Brace yourselves.
The sight of it sends some people mad.
That's a black hole.
That's impossible...
I did warn you.
We're standing under a black hole!
In orbit.
We can't be.
You can see for yourself.
We're in orbit.
But we can't be.
"This lump of rock is suspended in perpetual geostationary orbit around that black hole
"without falling in
"discuss" (!
)
And that's bad, yeah?
Bad doesn't cover it.
A black hole's a dead star, it collapses in on itself, in and in and in, until the matter's so dense and tight it starts to pull everything else in too.
Nothing in the universe can escape it.
Light, gravity, time everything gets pulled inside.
And crushed.
So there can't be an orbit?
We should be pulled right in?
We should be dead.
And yet here we are, beyond the laws of physics.
THUDS AND CREAKS
Welcome on board.
But if there's no atmosphere out there, what's that?
Stars breaking up.
Gas clouds.
We have whole solar systems being ripped apart above our heads, before falling into that thing.
So a bit worse than a storm, then?
Just a bit.
Just a bit, yeah.
WHISPERY ECHO:
Toby y y y...
ELECTRICS FIZZ AND POP
Who's that?
Danny?
'Close Door one.' The rocket link's fine.
That's the black hole, officially designated K 3 7 Gem 5.
In the scriptures of the Veltino, this planet's called Krop Tor...
The bitter pill.
And the black hole is supposed to be a mighty demon who was tricked into devouring the planet only to spit it out because it was poison.
"The Bitter Pill." I like that.
We're so far out.
Lost in the drifts of the universe.
How did you even get here?
We flew in, d'you see?
This planet's generating a gravity field.
We don't know how, we've no idea.
But it's kept in constant balance against the black hole.
And the field extends out there, as a funnel, a distinct...
gravity funnel, reaching out into clear space.
That was our way in.
You flew down that thing?
Like a rollercoaster.
By rights, the ship should've been torn apart.
We lost the captain, which is what put me in charge.
And you're doing a good job.
Yeah, well.
Needs must.
But if that gravity funnel closes, there's no way out.
Oh, we have fun speculating about that.
Yeah, that's the word, fun.
But that field would take phenomenal amounts of power.
Not just big, but off the scale!
Can I?
Sure, help yourself.
Your refreshment.
Oh, yeah, thanks.
Thank you!
I'm sorry, what was your name?
We have no titles.
We are as one.
Um...
Whataretheycalled?
Oh, come on!
Where've you been living?
Everyone's got one!
Well, not me.
So what are they?
They're the Ood.
The Ood?
The Ood.
That's...
Ood.
Very Ood.
But handy!
They work the mineshaft, all the drilling and stuff, supervision and maintenance.
They're born for it.
Basic slave race.
You've got slaves?
Don't start!
She's like one of that lot, the Friends of the Ood.
Well, maybe I am, yeah.
Since when did humans need slaves?
But the Ood offer themselves.
If you don't give them orders, they just pine away and die.
Seriously?
You like being ordered about?
It is all we crave.
Why's that, then?
We have nothing else in life.
Yeah, well.
I used to think like that.
Long time ago.
There we go!
D'you see?
To generate that gravity field and the funnel you need a power source with an inverted self extrapolating reflex of six to the power of six every six seconds.
All the sixes.
And it's impossible.
It took us two years to work that out.
I'm very good.
But that's why we're here.
This power source is ten miles below, through solid rock.
Point Zero.
We're drilling down to try and find it.
It's giving off readings of over 90 Statts on the Blazen Scale.
It could revolutionise modern science.
We could use it to fuel the Empire.
Or start a war.
It's buried beneath us...
In the darkness.
Waiting.
What's your job?
Chief dramatist?
Whatever it is down there, it's not a natural phenomenon.
This planet once supported life, aeons ago, before the human race had even learned to walk.
I saw that lettering on the wall.
Did you do that?
I copied it from fragments we've found, unearthed by the drilling.
I can't translate it.
No, neither can I.
And that's saying something.
There was some form of civilisation.
They buried something.
And now it's reaching out, calling us in.
And you came.
How could we not?
So when it comes right down to it, why did you come here?
Why did you do that?
Why?
I'll tell you why.
Because it was there!
Brilliant!
Scuse me...
Er,Zack,wasn'tit?
That's me.
Just stand there, cos I'm gonna...
HUGyou.
Is thatall right?
Suppose so.
Here we go.
Coming in.
Human beings.
You are amazing!
Thank you.
Not at all.
You're also completely mad.
You should pack your bags, get on that ship and fly for your lives!
You can talk.
How the hell did YOU get here?
I've got this...
Um... this...ship.It'shard to explain, it just sort of appears.
We can show you.
We parked down the corridor from uh...
What's it called?
Habitation Area...
Three.
Three.
D'you mean Storage Six?
It was a bit of a cupboard, yeah...
Storage Six?
But you said...
You said...
You said Storage Five to Eight...
What is it, what's wrong?
'Open door 19. . .'
'Close Door 19.'
Grr!
Come ON!
'Open door 17.'
'Open door 15.'
'Door 16 out of commission.' It can't be!
What's wrong?
What is it?
Doctor, the Tardis is in there what's happened?
The Tardis has gone.
'Door 16, out of commission.'
The earthquake.
This section collapsed.
But it's got to be out there somewhere.
Look down.
.
.The ground gave way.
My Tardis must've fallen right into the heart of the planet, but you've robot drills heading the same way.
We can't divert the drilling.
But I need my ship!
It's all I've got!
Literally, the only thing!
Doctor, WE'VE only got the resources to dig one, central shaft down to the power source, and that's it.
No diversions, no distractions, no exceptions.
Your machine is lost.
All I can do is offer you a lift if we ever get to leave this place.
And that's the end of it.
I'll put you on the duty roster.
We need someone in the laundry.
'Open door one.'
'Close door one.'
I've trapped you here.
No, don't worry about me.
OK.
We're on a planet that shouldn't exist, underneath a black hole, with no way out.
Yeah changed my mind.
Start worrying about me.
'Entering night shift.'
'Your chosen track for transition is Ravel's "Bolero".'
MUSIC PLAYS
All finished.
Heading back inside.
7 Gamma 10...
MUSIC CONTINUES 7 Gamma 11...
7 Gamma 12...
MUSIC ON PA
PA CRACKLES MID NOTE
PA SILENT
(Toby-y-y?
)
(I can see you.) Danny, is that you?
!
It's not funny, all right?
Dan?
I'm trying to work, Daniel.
If that's you, then can you just stop it?
ELECTRICS FIZZ AND WHINE
Danny, check the temperature in Ood Habitation.
It seems to be rising.
Help yourself, just don't have the green.
Or the blue.
Um...
Bitof that,thanks.
Would you like sauce with that?
I'll have a go, yeah.
I did that job once.
I was a dinner lady.
Not that I'm calling you a lady.
Although, I don't know, you might be.
D'you actually get paid, though, do they give you money?
"The Beast and his armies shall rise from the Pit to make war against God."
I'm sorry?
Apologies.
I said, I hope you enjoy your meal.
Yeah.
'Drillhead now at Point 16.'
'Drillhead speed increasing.'
Keep pressure at 60.
'Close Door three.'
Close Door three.
'He is awake.'
What did you say?
'Close Door three.'
(Toby?
)
DEEP VOICE:
Don't turn around.
Dan?
That's not Dan.
Don't look at me.
Who are you?
I have so many names.
If I could...
If you look at me, you will die.
But who are you?
I'm behind you, Toby.
I'm right behind you.
Don't look.
Don't look at me.
One look and you will die.
I'm reaching out, Toby.
I'm so close.
Don't turn around.
Oh h...
I cantouchyou !
No... !
ELECTRICAL FIZZ
Zack, we got a problem?
ZAK:
No more than usual.
We've just got the Scarlet System burning up.
Might be worth a look.
You might want to see this.
Moment in history.
There.
On the edge.
That red cloud.
That used to be the Scarlet System.
Home to the Pallushi, a mighty civilisation spanning a billion years disappearing... forever, their planets and suns, consumed.
Ladies and gentlemen, we have witnessed its passing.
No, could you leave it open?
Just for a bit?
I won't go mad, I promise.
How would you know?
Scooti, check the lockdown.
Jefferson, sign off the airlock seals for me.
SYNTHETIC VOICE: 'Open door 18.'
I've seen films and things, yeah.
They say black holes are like gateways to another universe.
'Close Door 18.'
Not that one.
It just eats.
Long way from home.
Go that way.
Turn right.
Keep going for, er...
about 500 years, then you'll reach the Earth.
No signal.
That's the first time we've gone out of range.
Mind you, even if I could...
What would I tell her?
Can you build another Tardis?
They were grown, not built.
And with my home planet gone...
we're kind of stuck.
Well, could be worse.
This lot said they'd give us a lift.
And then what?
I dunno.
Find a planet.
Get a job.
Live a life.
Same as the rest of the universe.
I'd have to settle down.
Get a house or something.
A proper house with...
Doors and things.
Carpets.
Me!
Living in a house!
Now, THAT...
That...
Thatis terrifying!
You'd have to get a mortgage!
No!
Oh, yes!
I'm dying.
That's it, I'm dying, it's all over.
What about me?
I'd have to get one, too!
I dunno, could be the same one, we could both...
I dunno, share.
Or not.
Whatever.
I dunno.
All sorts of...
Anyway!
We 'llsee.
I promised Jackie I'd always take you back home.
Everyone leaves home in the end.
Not to end up stuck here.
Yeah, but stuck with you, that's not so bad...
Yeah?
Yes.
MOBILE RINGS
DEEP VOICE:
He is awake.
Evening!
Only us.
The mysterious couple.
How are you, then, settling in?
Yeah, sorry, straight to business.
The Ood, how do they communicate?
I mean, with each other.
Oh, just empaths.
There's a low level telepathic field connecting them.
Not that that does THEM much good, they're basically a herd race.
Like cattle.
This telepathic field, can it pick up messages?
Cos I was having dinner and one of the Ood said something... well,odd.
An odd Ood.
And then I got something else on my er...
Communicator thing.
Well, be fair.
We've got whole star systems burning up around us.
There's all sorts of stray transmissions.
Probably nothing.
Look, if there was something wrong, it would show.
We monitor the telepathic field.
It's the only way to look after them.
They're so stupid, they don't even tell us when they're ill.
Monitor the field.
That's this thing?
Yeah, but like I said, it's low level telepathy.
They only register basic 5.
That's not basic 5. 10...
20...
They've gone up to basic 30.
But they can't!
Doctor, the Ood.
What does basic 30 mean?
It means that they're shouting.
Screaming inside their heads.
Or something's shouting at them.
But where's it coming from?
What's it saying?
What did it say to you?
Something about the "beast" and the "pit".
What about your communicator, what did that say?
"He is awake."
ALL OOD:
And you will worship him.
What the hell?
He is awake.
And you will worship him.
Worship who?
Who's talking to you?
Who is it?
Toby, I've got your expenditure.
'Open door 41.'
'Close Door 41.' DOOR MECHANISM HISSES
41?
!
'Close Door 40.'
Computer, did you open and close Door 41?
'Confirmed.'
But... that'stheairlock.
Why would you open the airlock?
It's the night shift, we're not allowed outside.
Has someone gone out?
'Confirmed.'
But who was it?
'Cannot confirm.'
OK.
Right, hold on, I know.
Tell me whose space suit's been logged out.
'No space suit has been logged out.' But...
You'renotmakinganysense .
You can't go outside without...
Zack, I think we've got a breakdown on Door 41, it's saying somebody's gone out onto the planet's surface.
STATIC HISS Zack?
Zack?
Computer, trace fault.
'There is no fault.'
Tell me, who went through that door?
'He is awake.'
What?
'He is awake.'
What's that supposed to mean?
'He bathes in the black sun.'
Toby?
There's no air, there's no...
No!
Stop it!
You can't be.
Open door 40!
Open door 40!
Open door 40!
OPEN DOOR 40!
Open door 40!
Open...
'Emergency, hull breach.'
'Emergency, hull breach.
Emergency, hull breach.'
Which section?
Everyone, evacuate 11 to 13.
We've got a breach.
The Base is open, repeat, the Base is open!
'Open door 19.'
'Close Door 19.'
I can't contain the oxygen field, we're gonna lose it!
COME ON!
KEEP MOVING!
And you, sunshine, get in!
'Breach sealed.
Breach sealed.' What happened?
What was it?
Hull breach.
We were open to the elements.
Another minute, we'd be inspecting that black hole close up.
That wasn't a quake.
What caused it?
We've lost sections 11 to 13.
Everyone all right?
We've got everyone except Scooti.
Scooti, report.
Scooti Manista, this is an order.
Report!
She's all right, I've picked up her biochip, she's in habitation three.
Better go and check.
If she's not responding, she might be unconscious.
But how about that, eh?
We survived!
Habitation three, come on.
I don't often say this, but I think we could all do with a drink.
Come on.
What happened?
I I don't know.
I was working, and then I can't remember.
A All that noise.
The room was falling apart.
There was no air...
Come on.
Up you get, come and have some protein 1.
Ooh!
You've gone native.
Oi, don't knock it, it's nice.
Protein 1 with just a dash of '3.
Check habitation four...
There's no sign, but the biochip says she's in this area.
Scooti, please respond.
If you can hear this, please respond.
Habitation six?
Nowhere here...
Zack, we've got a problem, Scooti's still missing.
ZACK:
But it says habitation three.
Yeah, well that's where I am, and I'm telling you, she's not here.
I've found her.
Oh, my God.
Sorry.
I'm so sorry.
Captain.
Report Officer Scootori Manista, PKD...
deceased.
43 K, 2.1.
She was 20.
20 years old.
"For how should man die better Than facing fearful odds
"For the ashes of his father And the temples...
"of his gods."
BACKGROUND WHIRR DIES AWAY
It's stopped.
FAINT, CLASHING ECHO What was that?
What was it?
The drill.
We've stopped drilling.
We've made it.
Point Zero.
ZACK:
All non essential Oods to be confined.
Capsule established, all systems functioning!
The mineshaft is go!
Bring systems online now!
Reporting as volunteer for the expeditionary force, sir!
Doctor, this breaks every single protocol.
We don't even know who you are.
Yeah, but you trust me, don't you?
And you can't let Ida go down there on her own.
Go on.
Look me in the eye.
Yes, you do.
I can see it.
Trust.
I should be going down.
The captain doesn't lead the mission.
He stays here, in charge.
Not much good at it, am I?
Positions!
We're going down in two!
Everyone, positions!
Mr Jefferson, I want maximum systems...
Oxygen.
Nitrobalance.
Gravity.
It's ages since I wore one of these.
I want that spacesuit back in one piece, you got that?
Yes, sir.
S'funny, cos, people back home think that space travel's gonna be all...
whizzing about and...
teleports, anti gravity.
But it's not, is it?
It's tough.
I'll see you later.
Not if I see you first.
You will remain here.
No command can override this.
Have you got that?
My instructions only.
Capsule active.
Counting down, in ten... nine...
eight, seven, six, five, four, three two, one.
Release.
You've gone beyond the oxygen field.
You're on your own.
Don't forget to breathe.
Breathing's good.
Rose, stay off the comm.
No chance.
KLAXON
Doctor?
Doctor, are you all right?
Ida.
Report to me...
Doctor?
It's all right.
We've made it.
We're getting out of the capsule now.
'What's it like down there?
'
Hard to tell.
Some sort of... cave,cavern.
It's massive.
This should help.
Gravity globe.
That's...
That's...
Oh, my God.
That's beautiful.
Rose...
You can tell Toby...
we've found his civilisation.
Oi, Toby, sounds like you've got plenty of work.
Good, good... .
Good.
Concentrate now, people, keep on the mission.
Ida, what about the power source?
We're close.
Energy signature indicates north north west.
Are you getting pictures up there?
Too much interference.
We're in your hands.
Well, we've come this far.
There's no turning back.
Oh, did you have to?
"No turning back"?
!
That's almost as bad as "nothing can possibly go wrong", or,
"It's gonna be the best Christmas Walford's ever had".
Have you finished(?
)
Yeah.
I've finished.
Captain, sir, there's something happening with the Ood.
What are they doing?
They're staring at me.
I've told them to stop, but they won't.
Danny, you're a big boy, I think you can take being stared at.
But the telepathic field, sir, it's at basic 100.
I've checked, but there isn't any fault.
It's definitely 100.
But that's impossible.
What's basic 100 mean?
They should be dead.
Basic 100 is brain death.
But they're safe?
They're not actually moving?
No, sir.
Keep watching them.
And you, Jefferson, keep a guard on the Ood.
Officer at arms.
You can't fire a gun in here.
What if you hit a wall?
Firing stock 15 only impacts upon organics.
Keep watch!
Guard them!
Yes, sir.
Is everything all right up there?
Yeah, yeah.
It's fine(!
)
Great!
We've found something.
It looks like metal, like some sort of seal
I've got a nasty feeling the word might be "trapdoor".
Not a good word, "trapdoor".
Never met a trapdoor I liked.
The edge is covered with those symbols.
D'you think it opens?
That's what trapdoors tend to do.
Trapdoor doesn't do it justice.
It's massive, Zack.
About 30 feet in diameter.
Any way of opening it?
Don't know.
I can't see any sort of mechanism.
I suppose that's the writing.
It'll tell us what to do.
The letters that defy translation.
Toby, did you get anywhere decoding it?
Toby, they need to know that lettering, does it make any sense?
I know what it says.
Then tell them!
When did you work that out?
Just tell them!
DEEP VOICE:
These are the words of the Beast.
And he has woken.
He is the heart that beats in the darkness, he is the blood that will never cease.
And now he will rise.
Officer, you will stand down.
Stand down!
What is it?
What's he done?
What's happening?
Rose?
What going on?
Jefferson, report... !
Report!
Officer, you've compromised security.
You will stand down and be confined immediately!
Mr Jefferson, tell me, sir...
did your wife ever forgive you?
I don't know what you mean.
Let me tell you a secret.
She never did.
Officer!
You will stand down and be confined!
Or what?
Under Condition Red, I'm authorised to shoot you.
But how many can you kill?
IN UNISON:
We are the Legion of the Beast.
Rose?
What is it, Rose?
I'm going back up.
ZACK:
Report!
Report!
Jefferson, report!
SOMEONE REPORT!
The Legion shall be many, and the Legion shall be few.
It's the Ood.
Sir, we have contamination of the livestock.
Doctor, I don't know what it is.
It's like they're possessed.
They won't listen to us.
He has woven himself through the fabric of your life since the dawn of time.
Some may call him Abbadon, some may call him Krop Tor.
Some may call him Satan or...
Captain, it's the Ood.
They're out of control!
.
.King
Of Despair, the Deathless Prince, the Bringer of Night.
These are the words that shall set him free.
Back up to the door!
I am become manifest.
I shall walk in the light.
To the door!
And my legions will swarm...
Get out!
. .across the worlds.
Doctor!
It's opening!
We're moving!
The whole thing's moving, the planet's moving!
I am the sin and the temptation and the desire.
I am the pain and the loss and the death of hope.
Get that door open!
The gravity field, it's going!
We're losing orbit!
We're gonna fall into the black hole!
DEEP VOICE:
I have been imprisoned for eternity,
But no more.
'Door seal.'
Move!
'Door seal.'
The Pit is open.
And I am free.
EVIL LAUGH
Subtitles by Red Bee Media Ltd / BBC 2006 Converted by reirei for the forom
It's the Ood they've gone mad.
Doctor, can you hear me?
Doctor, Ida, are you there?
Danny, turn right.
That thing is playing on very basic fears.
The cable's snapped.
Get out!
You will die.
And I will live.
I wonder what's wrong with her.
She's sort of queasy.
Indigestion.
Like she didn't want to land.
If you think there's gonna be trouble, we could always get back inside and go somewhere else.
I think we've landed inside a cupboard.
Here we go.
Open door 15.
Some sort of base.
Moon base, sea base, space base.
They build these things out of kits.
Glad we're indoors.
Sounds like a storm out there.
Open door 16.
Human design, you've got a thing about kits.
This place was put together like a flat-pack wardrobe, only bigger and easier.
- Open door 17.
- Oh, it's a sanctuary base!
- Close door 17.
- Deep-space exploration.
We've gone way out.
And listen to that.
Underneath.
Someone's drilling.
"Welcome to hell."
- Oh, it's not that bad.
- No, over there.
Hold on.
What does that say?
That's weird. it won't translate.
But I thought the Tardis translated everything, writing as well.
- I should see English.
- Exactly.
Now if that's not working, then it means... this writing is old.
Very old.
Impossibly old.
We should find out who's in charge.
We've gone beyond the reach of the Tardis' knowledge.
Not a good move.
- And if someone's looking for...
- Open door 19.
Right, hello.
Sorry.
I was just saying, nice place.
We must feed.
- You gotta what?
- We must feed.
- Yeah, I think they mean us.
- We must feed.
We must feed.
We must feed.
We must feed.
We must feed.
We must feed.
We must feed.
We must feed.
We must feed.
We must feed.
We must feed.
We must feed... you, if you are hungry.
- Sorry?
- We apologize.
Electromagnetics have interfered with speech systems.
Would you like some refreshment?
- Open door 18.
- Um...
What the hell?
How did...
Captain, you're not gonna believe this.
We've got people.
Out of nowhere.
I mean, real people.
I mean...
Two living people just standing here right in front of me.
Don't be stupid, that's impossible.
- I suggest telling them that.
- But you're a sort of space base.
You must have visitors now and then.
It can't be that impossible.
You telling me you don't know where you are?
No idea.
More fun that way.
Stand by, everyone.
Buckle down.
We have incoming, and it's a big one.
Quake 0.5 on its way.
Through here.
Now.
Quickly, come on!
Move!
Move it!
Come on!
Keep moving!
Come on!
Keep moving!
Oh, my God, you meant it.
- People!
Look at that, real people.
- That's us.
Hurray!
Yeah, definitely real.
My name's Rose, Rose Tyler, and this is the Doctor.
Come on, the oxygen must be offline.
We're hallucinating, they can't be...
- No, they're real.
- Come on, we're in the middle of an alert.
Danny, strap up, the quake's coming in.
Impact in 30 seconds.
Sorry, you two, whoever you are, just hold on.
Tight.
- Hold on to what?
- Anything, I don't care, just hold on.
Ood, are we fixed?
Your kindness in this emergency is much appreciated.
What's this planet called anyway?
Don't be stupid.
It hasn't got a name.
How could it have a name?
You really don't know, do you?
And impact!
Oh, well.
That wasn't so bad...
Okay, that's it.
Everyone all right?
Speak to me!
Ida?
- Yeah.
- Danny?
- I'm fine.
- Toby?
- Fine.
- Scooti?
- No damage.
- Jefferson?
Check!
We're fine, thanks, fine.
Yeah, don't worry about us.
Surface caved in.
I deflected it onto Storage 5 through 8.
We've lost them completely.
Toby, go and check the rocket link.
That's not my department.
Just do as I say, yeah?
Oxygen holding.
Internal gravity at 56.6.
We should be okay.
Never mind the earthquake, that's...
That's one hell of a storm.
What is that, a hurricane?
You need an atmosphere for a hurricane.
There's no air out there.
It's a complete vacuum.
Then what's shaking the roof?
You're not joking.
You really don't know.
Well, introductions.
FYI, as they said in the olden days.
I'm Ida Scott, Science Officer.
Zachary Cross Flane, Acting Captain, sir.
You've met Mr. Jefferson, he's Head of Security.
Danny Bartock, Ethics Committee.
Not as boring as it sounds.
And that man who just left, that was Toby Zed,
Archeology, and this... is Scooti Manista, Trainee Maintenance.
And this...
This is home.
Brace yourselves.
The sight of it sends some people mad.
That's a black hole.
But that's impossible.
I did warn you.
We're standing under a black hole.
- In orbit.
- We can't be.
You can see for yourself.
We're in orbit.
But we can't be.
This lump of rock is suspended in perpetual geostationary orbit around that black hole, without falling in.
Discuss.
And that's bad, yeah?
Bad doesn't cover it.
A black hole's a dead star.
It collapses in on itself, in and in and in, until the matter's so dense and tight, it starts to pull everything else in, too.
Nothing in the universe can escape it.
Light, gravity, time, everything just gets pulled inside and crushed.
So they can't be in orbit?
- We should be pulled right in.
- We should be dead.
And yet, here we are.
Beyond the laws of physics.
Welcome on board.
But if there's no atmosphere out there, what's that?
Stars breaking up.
Gas clouds.
We have whole solar systems being ripped apart above our heads, before falling into that thing.
So, a bit worse than a storm, then.
- Just a bit.
- Just a bit, yeah.
Toby.
Who's that?
Danny?
- Close door 1.
- The rocket link's fine.
That's the black hole, officially designated K37 Gem 5.
In the scriptures of the Veltino, this planet is called Krop Tor, the bitter pill.
And the black hole is supposed to be a mighty demon who was tricked into devouring the planet only to spit it out because it was poison.
- The bitter pill.
I like that.
- We are so far out.
Lost in the drifts of the universe.
How did you even get here?
We flew in.
You see... this planet's generating a gravity field.
We don't know how, we've no idea, but it's kept in constant balance against the black hole.
And the field extends out there as a funnel, a distinct gravity funnel reaching out into clear space.
That was our way in.
You flew down that thing?
Like a rollercoaster.
By rights, the ship should've been torn apart.
We lost the captain, which is what put me in charge.
And you're doing a good job.
Yeah, well.
Needs must.
But if that gravity funnel closes, there's no way out.
Oh, we have fun speculating about that.
Oh, yeah.
That's the word, "fun".
But that field would take phenomenal amounts of power, I mean...
Not just big, but off the scale.
Can I...?
Sure, help yourself.
Your refreshment.
Oh, yeah, thanks.
Thank you.
I'm sorry, what was your name?
We have no titles.
We are as one.
Erm, what are they called?
Oh, come on.
Where have you been living?
Everyone's got one.
Well, not me.
So, what are they?
- They're the Ood.
- The Ood?
The Ood.
Well, that's Ood.
Very Ood.
But handy.
They work the mineshaft, all the drilling and stuff.
Supervision and maintenance.
They're born for it.
Basic slave race.
You've got slaves?
Don't start.
She's like one of that lot, Friends of the Ood.
Well, maybe I am, yeah.
Since when do humans need slaves?
But the Ood offer themselves.
If you don't give them orders, they just pine away and die.
Seriously?
You like being ordered about?
It is all we crave.
- Why is that, then?
- We have nothing else in life.
Yeah, well, I used to think like that.
- Long time ago.
- There we go.
Do you see?
To generate that gravity field and the funnel, you'd need a power source with an inverted self-extrapolating reflex of six to the power of six every six seconds.
- That's all the sixes.
- And it's impossible.
It took us two years to work that out.
- I'm very good.
- But that's why we're here.
This power source is ten miles below, through solid rock.
Point 0.
We're drilling down to try and find it.
It's giving off readings of over 90 Statts on the Blazen Scale.
It could revolutionize modern science.
We could use it to fuel the empire.
Or start a war.
It's buried beneath us.
In the darkness, waiting.
What's your job?
Chief dramatist?
Well, whatever it is down there, it's not a natural phenomenon.
This planet once supported life, eons ago, before the human race had even learnt to walk.
I saw that lettering written on the wall, did you do that?
I copied it from fragments we found unearthed by the drilling, but I can't translate it.
No, neither can I. And that's saying something.
And there was some form of civilization.
They buried something.
Now, it's reaching out.
Calling us in.
And you came.
How could we not?
So, when it comes right down to it, why did you come here?
Why did you do that?
Why?
I'll tell you why.
Because it was there.
Brilliant!
- Excuse me.
Zack, wasn't it?
- That's me.
Just stand there 'cause I'm gonna hug you, is that all right?
Suppose so.
Here we go.
Coming in.
Human beings.
You are amazing.
- Thank you.
- Not at all.
But apart from that, you're completely mad.
You should pack your bags, get back on that ship and fly for your lives.
You can talk.
How the hell did you get here?
Oh, I've got this...
This ship...
It's hard to explain, it just sort of appears.
We can show you, we parked down the corridor from...
- What's it called?
Habitation Area 3?
-3.
Do you mean Storage 6?
It was a bit of a cupboard, yeah.
Storage 6?
But you said...
You said...
You said Storage 5 to 8.
What is it?
What's wrong?
Open door 19.
Close door 19.
- Doors, come on!
- Open door 17.
Open door 15.
- Open door 16.
- It can't be, it can't be!
What's wrong?
What is it?
Doctor, the Tardis is in there.
What's happened?
The Tardis is gone.
Door 16 out of commission.
The earthquake.
This section collapsed.
But it's got to be out there somewhere.
Look down.
The ground gave way.
My Tardis must have fallen down into the heart of the planet.
You've got robot drills heading the same way.
We can't divert the drilling.
But I need my ship!
It's all I've got.
Literally, the only thing.
Doctor, we've only got the resources to dig one central shaft down to the power source and that's it.
No diversions, no distractions, no exceptions.
Your machine is lost.
All I can do is offer you a lift, if we ever get to leave this place.
And that is the end of it.
I'll put you on the duty roster.
We need someone in the laundry.
Open door 1.
Close door 1.
- I've trapped you here.
- No, don't worry about me.
Okay, we're on a planet that shouldn't exist, underneath a black hole and no way out.
Yeah, I've changed my mind.
Start worrying about me.
Entering night shift.
Your chosen track for transition is Ravels Bolero.
All finished.
Heading back inside.
Server Gamma 10.
Server Gamma 11.
Server Gamma 12.
Toby.
- I can see you.
- Danny, is that you?
It's not funny, all right?
Dan?
I'm trying to work, Daniel.
If that's you, Dan, can you just stop it?
Danny, check the temperature in Ood Habitation.
It seems to be rising.
Help yourself, just don't have the green.
Or the blue.
Um, a bit of that, thanks.
Would you like sauce with that?
I'll have a go, yeah.
I did that job once.
I was a dinner lady.
Not that I'm calling you a lady.
Although, I don't know, you might be.
Do you actually get paid, though?
Do they give you money?
The Beast and his armies shall rise from the Pit to make war against God.
I'm sorry?
Apologies.
I said I hope you enjoy your meal.
Yeah.
Drill head now at point 16.
Drill head speed increasing.
Keep pressure at 60.
Close door 3.
Close door 3.
He is awake.
What did you say?
Close door 3.
Toby.
Don't turn around.
Dan?
- That's not Dan.
- Don't look at me.
Who are you?
I have so many names.
If I could...
If you look at me, you will die.
But who are you?
I'm behind you, Toby.
I'm right behind you.
Don't look.
Don't look at me.
One look and you will die.
I'm reaching out, Toby.
I'm so close.
Don't turn around.
Oh, I can touch you.
No.
Zack, we got a problem?
No more than usual.
Got the Scarlet System burning up.
Might be worth a look.
You might want to see this.
Moment in history.
There, on the edge.
That red cloud.
That used to be the Scarlet System.
Home to the Pallushi.
A mighty civilization spanning a billion years disappearing forever.
Their planets and suns consumed.
Ladies and gentlemen, we have witnessed its passing.
No, could you leave it open?
Just for a bit.
I won't go mad, I promise.
How would you know?
Scooti, check the lockdown.
Jefferson, sign off the airlock seals for me.
Open door 18.
I've seen films and things, yeah?
They say black holes are like gateways to another universe.
Close door 18.
Not that one. it just eats.
A long way from home.
Go that way, turn right, keep going for, erm... about 500 years and you'll reach the Earth.
No signal.
That's first time we've gone out of range.
Mind you, even if I could...
What would I tell her?
Can you build another Tardis?
They were grown, not built.
And with my home planet gone, we're kind of stuck.
Well, it could be worse.
This lot said they'd give us a lift.
And then what?
I don't know.
Find a planet.
Get a job.
You live your life same as the rest of the universe.
I'd have to settle down.
Get a house or something.
A proper house with... doors and things.
Carpets.
Me, living in a house!
Now, that...
That...
That is terrifying.
You'd have to get a mortgage.
- No.
- Oh, yes.
I'm dying.
That's it, I am dying.
It is all over.
What about me?
I'd have to get one, too.
I don't know, could be the same one.
We could both...
I don't know, share.
Or not.
Whatever.
I don't know.
All sorts of...
- Anyway...
- We'll see.
I promised Jackie I would always take you back home.
Everyone leaves home in the end.
Not to end up stuck here.
Yeah, but stuck with you, that's not so bad.
- Yeah?
- Yes.
He is awake.
- Evening.
- Only us.
The mysterious couple.
How are you, then?
Settling in?
Yeah, sorry, straight to business.
The Ood, how do they communicate?
I mean, with each other?
Oh, just empaths.
There's a low-level telepathic field connecting them.
Not that that does them much good.
They're basically a herd race, like cattle.
This telepathic field, can it pick up messages?
'Cause I was having dinner and one of the Oods said something...
Well, Odd.
Hmm.
An odd Ood.
And then I got something else on my... communicator thing.
Well, be fair.
We've got whole star systems burning up around us, there's all sorts of stray transmissions.
Probably nothing.
Look, if there was something wrong, it would show.
We monitor the telepathic field.
It's the only way to look after them.
They're so stupid.
They don't even tell us when they're ill.
- Monitor the field, that's this thing.
- Yeah.
But like I said, it's low-level telepathy.
They only register Basic 5.
Well, that's not Basic 5. 10.
20.
- They've gone up to Basic 30.
- But they can't.
Doctor, the Ood.
What does Basic 30 mean?
Well, it means that they're shouting, screaming inside their heads.
Or something is shouting at them.
But where is it coming from?
What is it saying?
What did it say to you?
Something about the Beast and the Pit.
What about your communicator?
What did that say?
He is awake.
And you will worship him.
- What the hell?
- He is awake.
And you will worship him.
Worship who?
Who's talking to you?
Who is it?
Toby, I've got your expenditure.
Open door 41.
Close door 41.
41?
Close door 40.
Computer, did you open and close door 41?
Confirmed.
But that's the airlock.
Why would you open the airlock?
It's the night shift, we're not allowed outside.
- Has someone gone out?
- Confirmed.
- But who was it?
- Cannot confirm.
Okay.
Right, hold on, I know.
Tell me whose spacesuit has been logged out.
- No spacesuit has been logged out.
- But
You're not making any sense.
You can't go outside without...
Zack, I think we've got a breakdown on door 41.
It's saying somebody's gone outside onto the planet's surface.
Zack?
Zack?
- Computer, trace fault.
- There is no fault.
- Tell me who went through that door?
- He is awake.
- What?
- He is awake.
- What's that supposed to mean?
- He bathes in the black sun.
Toby.
There's no air, there's no...
No, stop it!
You can't be!
Open door 40!
Open door 40!
Open door 40!
Open door 40!
Open door 40!
Emergency hull breach.
Emergency hull breach.
Which section?
Everyone, evacuate 11 to 13.
We've got a breach.
The Base is open.
Repeat, the Base is open.
Open door 19.
Close door 19.
I can't contain the oxygen field.
We're gonna lose it.
Come on!
Keep moving!
And you, too, sunshine!
- Everyone all right?
- Breach sealed.
- What happened?
What was it?
- Hull breach.
We were open to the elements.
Another couple of minutes and we'd have been inspecting that black hole at close quarters.
That wasn't a quake.
What caused it?
We've lost sections 11 to 13.
Everyone all right?
We've got everyone here except Scooti.
Scooti, report.
Scooti Manista, this is an order, report.
She's all right.
I've picked up her biochip.
She's in Habitation 3.
Better go and check if she's not responding.
She might be unconscious.
But how about that, eh?
We survived.
Habitation 3.
Come on.
I don't often say this, but I think we could all do with a drink.
Come on.
What happened?
I don't know.
I was working and then I can't remember.
All that noise.
The room was falling apart.
There was no air.
Come on, up you get.
Come and have some Protein One.
- You've gone native.
- Oi, don't knock it, it's nice.
Protein One with just a dash of Three.
There's no sign of her, but the biochip says she's in this area.
Scooti, please respond.
If you can hear this, please respond.
- Habitation 6...
- Nowhere here.
Zack, we've got a problem.
Scooti's still missing.
But it says Habitation 3.
Well, that's where I am and I'm telling you, she's not here.
I've found her.
Oh, my God.
Sorry.
I'm so sorry.
Captain... report Officer Scootori Manista, PKD... deceased.
43K 2.1.
She was 20.
20 years old.
For how should man die better
Than facing fearful odds
For the ashes of his father
And the temples of his gods?
It's stopped.
What was that?
- What was it?
- The drill.
We've stopped drilling.
We've made it.
Point 0.
ZACK".
All non-essential Oods to be confined.
Capsule established.
All systems functioning.
The mineshaft is go.
Bring systems online now.
Reporting as a volunteer for the expeditionary force.
Doctor, this is breaking every single protocol.
We don't even know who you are.
Yeah, but you trust me, don't you?
And you can't let Ida go down there on her own.
Go on, look me in the eye.
Yes, you do.
I can see it.
Trust.
I should be going down.
The captain doesn't lead the mission.
He stays here, in charge.
Not much good here, am I?
Positions!
We're going down in two!
Everyone, positions!
Mr. Jefferson, I want maximum systems...
Oxygen, nitro balance, gravity.
It's ages since I wore one of these.
I want that spacesuit back in one piece.
You got that?
Yes, sir.
It's funny 'cause people back home think that space travel is gonna be all... whizzing about and teleports, anti-gravity.
But it's not, is it?
It's tough.
I'll see you later.
Not if I see you first.
You will remain here.
No command can override this.
Have you got that?
My instructions only.
Capsule active.
Counting down, in ten, nine, eight, seven, six, five, four, three, two, one, release.
You've gone beyond the oxygen field.
You're on your own.
Don't forget to breathe.
Breathing is good.
- Rose, stay off the comm.
- No chance.
Doctor?
Doctor, are you all right?
Ida, report to me.
Doctor?
It's all right.
We've made it.
Heading out of the capsule now.
What's it like down there?
It's hard to tell.
Some sort of cave.
Cavern.
It's massive.
Well, this should help.
Gravity globe.
That's...
That's...
Oh, my God.
That's beautiful.
Rose... you can tell Toby... we've found his civilization.
Oi, Toby, sounds like you've got plenty of work.
Good, good.
Good.
Concentrate now, people.
Keep on the mission.
Ida, what about the power source?
We're close.
Energy signature indicates north-northwest.
Are you getting pictures up there?
There's too much interference.
We're in your hands.
Well, we've come this far.
There's no turning back.
Oh, did you have to?
No turning back?
That's almost as bad as,
"Nothing can possibly go wrong"
or "This is gonna be the best Christmas Walford's ever had."
Have you finished?
Yeah.
Finished.
Captain, sir, there's something happening with the Ood.
What are they doing?
They're staring at me.
I've told them to stop, but they won't.
Danny, you're a big boy, I think you can take being stared at.
But the telepathic field, sir, it's at Basic 100.
I've checked.
There isn't any fault.
- It's definitely 100.
- But that's impossible.
- What's Basic 100 mean?
- They should be dead.
Basic 100 is brain death.
But they're safe?
They're not actually moving?
No, sir.
Keep watching them.
And you, Jefferson, keep a guard on the Ood.
Officer at arms.
You can't fire a gun in here.
What if you hit a wall?
Firing Stock 15, only impacts upon organics.
- Keep watch.
Guard them.
- Yes, sir.
- Is everything all right up there?
- Yeah, yeah.
- It's fine.
- Great.
We've found something.
It looks like metal, like some sort of seal.
I've got a nasty feeling the word might be "trap door".
Not a good word, trap door.
Never met a trap door I liked.
The edge is covered with those symbols.
- Do you think it opens?
- That's what trap doors tend to do.
Trap door doesn't do it justice.
It's massive, Zack.
- About 30 feet in diameter.
- Any way of opening it?
Don't know.
I can't see any sort of mechanism.
I suppose that's the writing.
It would tell us what to do.
The letters that defy translation.
Toby, did you get anywhere with decoding it?
Toby, they need to know.
That lettering, does it make any sort of sense?
I know what it says.
Then tell them.
- When did you work that out?
- It doesn't matter, just tell them!
These are the words of the Beast.
And he has woken.
He is the heart that beats in the darkness.
He is the blood that will never cease.
And now he will rise.
Officer, you will stand down.
Stand down!
What is it?
What's he done?
What's happening?
Rose, what's going on?
Jefferson, report.
Report!
Officer, you have compromised security.
You will stand down and be confined.
Immediately!
Mr. Jefferson, tell me, sir...
did your wife ever forgive you?
I don't know what you mean.
Let me tell you a secret.
She never did.
Officer, you will stand down and be confined.
Or what?
Or under the strictures of Condition Red, I am authorized to shoot you.
But how many can you kill?
We are the legion of the Beast.
Rose, what is it?
Rose?
- I'm going back up.
- Report!
Report!
Jefferson, report!
Someone report!
The legion shall be many and the legion shall be few.
It's the Ood.
Sir, we have contamination of the livestock.
Doctor, I don't know what it is.
It's like they're possessed.
They won't listen to us.
He has woven himself in the fabric of your life since the dawn of time.
Some may call him Abbadon.
Some may call him Krop Tor.
Some may call him Satan or Lucifer.
Captain, it's the Ood.
They're out of control.
...the King of Despair, the Deathless Prince.
The Bringer of Night.
And these are the words that shall set him free.
Back up to the door!
- I am become manifest.
- Move quickly!
- I shall walk in the light.
- To the door!
And my legions will swarm across worlds.
Doctor, it's opening!
We're moving!
The whole thing's moving, the planet's moving.
I am the sin and the temptation and the desire.
I am the pain and the loss and the death of hope.
Get that door open!
The gravity field, it's going!
We're losing orbit!
We're gonna fall into the black hole!
I have been imprisoned for eternity.
But no more.
Door sealed.
Door sealed.
The Pit is open and I am free!
It's the Ood.
They've gone mad.
Doctor, can you hear me?
Doctor, Ida, are you there?
Danny, turn right.
That thing is playing on very basic fears.
- The cable's snapped.
- Get out!
You Will die and I Will live.
I wonder what's wrong with her.
She's sort of queasy.
- Indigestion.
Like she didn't want to land.
- Lf you think there's gonna be trouble, we could always get back inside and go somewhere else.
I think we've landed inside a cupboard.
Here we go.
Open door 15.
Some sort of base.
Moon base, sea base, space base.
They build these things out of kits.
Glad we're indoors.
Sounds like a storm out there.
Open door 16.
Human design, you've got a thing about kits.
This place was put together like a flat-pack wardrobe, only bigger and easier.
- Open door 17.
- Oh, it's a sanctuary base!
- Close door 17.
- Deep-space exploration.
We've gone way out.
And listen to that.
Underneath.
Someone's drilling.
"Welcome to hell."
- Oh, it's not that bad.
- No, over there.
Hold on.
What does that say?
That's weird.
It won't translate.
But I thought the Tardis translated everything, writing as well.
- I should see English.
- Exactly.
Now if that's not working, then it means... this writing is old.
Very old.
Impossibly old.
We should find out who's in charge.
We've gone beyond the reach of the Tardis' knowledge.
Not a good move.
- And if someone's looking for...
- Open door 19.
Right, hello.
Sorry.
I was just saying, nice place.
We must feed.
- You gotta what?
- We must feed.
- Yeah, I think they mean us.
- We must feed.
We must feed.
We must feed.
We must feed.
We must feed.
We must feed.
We must feed.
We must feed.
We must feed.
We must feed.
We must feed.
We must feed... you, if you are hungry.
- Sorry?
- We apologise.
Electromagnetics have interfered with speech systems.
Would you like some refreshment?
- Open door 18.
- Um...
What the hell?
How did...
Captain, you're not gonna believe this.
We've got people.
Out of nowhere.
I mean, real people.
I mean...
Two living people just standing here right in front of me.
Don't be stupid, that's Impossible.
- I suggest telling them that.
- But you're a sort of space base.
You must have visitors now and then.
It can't be that impossible.
You telling me you don't know where you are?
No idea.
More fun that way.
- Stand by, everyone.
Buckle down.
- We have Incomlng, and It's a big one.
Quake 0.5 on Its way.
Through here.
Now.
Quickly, come on!
Move!
Move it!
Come on!
Keep moving!
Come on!
Keep moving!
Oh, my God, you meant it.
- People!
Look at that, real people.
- That's us.
Hurray!
Yeah, definitely real.
My name's Rose, Rose Tyler, and this is the Doctor.
Come on, the oxygen must be offline.
We're hallucinating, they can't be...
- No, they're real.
- Come on, we're in the middle of an alert.
Danny, strap up, the quake's coming in.
Impact in 30 seconds.
Sorry, you two, whoever you are, just hold on.
Tight.
- Hold on to what?
- Anything, I don't care, just hold on.
Ood, are we fixed?
Your kindness in this emergency is much appreciated.
- What's this planet called anyway?
- Don't be stupid.
It hasn't got a name.
How could it have a name?
You really don't know, do you?
And impact!
Oh, well.
That wasn't so bad...
Okay, that's it.
Everyone all right?
Speak to me!
Ida?
- Yeah.
- Danny?
- I'm fine.
- Toby?
- Fine.
- Scooti?
- No damage.
- Jefferson?
Check!
We're fine, thanks, fine.
Yeah, don't worry about us.
Surface caved in.
I deflected it onto Storage 5 through 8.
We've lost them completely.
Toby, go and check the rocket link.
That's not my department.
Just do as I say, yeah?
- Oxygen holding.
- Internal gravity at 56.6.
We should be okay.
Never mind the earthquake, that's...
That's one hell of a storm.
What is that, a hurricane?
You need an atmosphere for a hurricane.
There's no air out there.
It's a complete vacuum.
Then what's shaking the roof?
You're not joking.
You really don't know.
Well, introductions.
FYI, as they said in the olden days.
I'm Ida Scott, Science Officer.
Zachary Cross Flane, Acting Captain, sir.
You've met Mr Jefferson, he's Head of Security.
Danny Bartock, Ethics Committee.
Not as boring as it sounds.
And that man who just left, that was Toby Zed,
Archaeology, and this... is Scooti Manista, Trainee Maintenance.
And this...
This is home.
Brace yourselves.
The sight of it sends some people mad.
That's a black hole.
But that's impossible.
I did warn you.
We're standing under a black hole.
- In orbit.
- We can't be.
- You can see for yourself.
- We're in orbit.
But we can't be.
This lump of rock is suspended in perpetual geostationary orbit around that black hole, without falling in.
Discuss.
And that's bad, yeah?
Bad doesn't cover it.
A black hole's a dead star.
It collapses in on itself, in and in and in, until the matter's so dense and tight, it starts to pull everything else in, too.
Nothing in the universe can escape it.
Light, gravity, time, everything just gets pulled inside and crushed.
So they can't be in orbit?
- We should be pulled right in.
- We should be dead.
And yet, here we are.
Beyond the laws of physics.
Welcome onboard.
But if there's no atmosphere out there, what's that?
Stars breaking up.
Gas clouds.
We have whole solar systems being ripped apart above our heads, before falling into that thing.
So, a bit worse than a storm, then.
- Just a bit.
- Just a bit, yeah.
Toby.
Who's that?
Danny?
- Close door 1.
- The rocket link's fine.
That's the black hole, officially designated K37 Gem 5.
In the scriptures of the Veltino, this planet is called Krop Tor, the bitter pill.
And the black hole is supposed to be a mighty demon who was tricked into devouring the planet only to spit it out because it was poison.
- The bitter pill.
I like that.
- We are so far out.
Lost in the drifts of the universe.
How did you even get here?
We flew in.
You see... this planet's generating a gravity field.
We don't know how, we've no idea, but it's kept in constant balance against the black hole.
And the field extends out there as a funnel, a distinct gravity funnel reaching out into clear space.
That was our way in.
You flew down that thing?
Like a rollercoaster.
By rights, the ship should've been torn apart.
We lost the captain, which is what put me in charge.
And you're doing a good job.
Yeah, well.
Needs must.
But if that gravity funnel closes, there's no way out.
Oh, we have fun speculating about that.
Oh, yeah.
That's the word, "fun".
But that field would take phenomenal amounts of power, I mean...
Not just big, but off the scale.
Can I?
Sure, help yourself.
Your refreshment.
Oh, yeah, thanks.
Thank you.
I'm sorry, what was your name?
We have no titles.
We are as one.
Erm, what are they called?
Oh, come on.
Where have you been living?
Everyone's got one.
Well, not me.
So, what are they?
- They're the Ood.
- The Ood?
The Ood.
Well, that's Ood.
Very Ood.
But handy.
They work the mineshaft, all the drilling and stuff.
Supervision and maintenance.
They're born for it.
Basic slave race.
You've got slaves?
Don't start.
She's like one of that lot, Friends of the Ood.
Well, maybe I am, yeah.
Since when do humans need slaves?
But the Ood offer themselves.
If you don't give them orders, they just pine away and die.
Seriously?
You like being ordered about?
It is all we crave.
- Why is that, then?
- We have nothing else in life.
Yeah, well, I used to think like that.
- Long time ago.
- There we go.
Do you see?
To generate that gravity field and the funnel, you'd need a power source with an inverted self-extrapolating reflex of six to the power of six every six seconds.
- That's all the sixes.
- And it's impossible.
It took us two years to work that out.
- I'm very good.
- But that's why we're here.
This power source is ten miles below, through solid rock.
Point 0.
We're drilling down to try and find it.
It's giving off readings of over 90 Statts on the Blazen Scale.
It could revolutionise modern science.
We could use it to fuel the empire.
Or start a war.
It's buried beneath us.
In the darkness, waiting.
What's your job?
Chief dramatist?
Well, whatever it is down there, it's not a natural phenomenon.
This planet once supported life, aeons ago, before the human race had even learnt to walk.
I saw that lettering written on the wall, did you do that?
I copied it from fragments we found unearthed by the drilling, but I can't translate it.
No, neither can I. And that's saying something.
And there was some form of civilisation.
They buried something.
Now, it's reaching out.
Calling us in.
And you came.
How could we not?
So, when it comes right down to it, why did you come here?
Why did you do that?
Why?
I'll tell you why.
Because it was there.
Brilliant!
- Excuse me.
Zack, wasn't it?
- That's me.
Just stand there 'cause I'm gonna hug you, is that all right?
Suppose so.
Here we go.
Coming in.
Human beings.
You are amazing.
- Thank you.
- Not at all.
But apart from that, you're completely mad.
You should pack your bags, get back on that ship and fly for your lives.
You can talk.
How the hell did you get here?
Oh, I've got this...
This ship...
It's hard to explain, it just sort of appears.
We can show you, we parked down the corridor from...
- What's it called?
Habitation Area 3?
- 3.
Do you mean Storage 6?
It was a bit of a cupboard, yeah.
Storage 6?
But you said...
You said...
You said Storage 5 to 8.
What is it?
What's wrong?
Open door 19.
Close door 19.
- Doors, come on!
- Open door 17.
Open door 15.
- Open door 16.
- It can't be, it can't be!
What's wrong?
What is it?
Doctor, the Tardis is in there.
What's happened?
The Tardis is gone.
Door 16 out of commission.
The earthquake.
This section collapsed.
But it's got to be out there somewhere.
Look down.
The ground gave way.
My Tardis must have fallen down into the heart of the planet.
You've got robot drills heading the same way.
We can't divert the drilling.
But I need my ship!
It's all I've got.
Literally, the only thing.
Doctor, we've only got the resources to dig one central shaft down to the power source and that's it.
No diversions, no distractions, no exceptions.
Your machine is lost.
All I can do is offer you a lift, if we ever get to leave this place.
And that is the end of it.
I'll put you on the duty roster.
We need someone in the laundry.
Open door 1.
Close door 1.
- I've trapped you here.
- No, don't worry about me.
Okay, we're on a planet that shouldn't exist, underneath a black hole and no way out.
Yeah, I've changed my mind.
Start worrying about me.
Enterlng night shift.
Your chosen track for transition Is Ravel's Bolero.
All finished.
Heading back inside.
Server Gamma 10.
Server Gamma 11.
Server Gamma 12.
Toby.
- I can see you.
- Danny, is that you?
It's not funny, all right?
Dan?
I'm trying to work, Daniel.
If that's you, Dan, can you just stop it?
Danny, check the temperature In Ood Habltatlon.
It seems to be rising.
Help yourself, just don't have the green.
Or the blue.
Um, a bit of that, thanks.
Would you like sauce with that?
I'll have a go, yeah.
I did that job once.
I was a dinner lady.
Not that I'm calling you a lady.
Although, I don't know, you might be.
Do you actually get paid, though?
Do they give you money?
The Beast and his armies shall rise from the Pit to make war against God.
I'm sorry?
Apologies.
I said I hope you enjoy your meal.
Yeah.
Drlll head now at point 16.
Drlll head speed Increaslng.
Keep pressure at 60.
Close door 3.
Close door 3.
He Is awake.
What did you say?
Close door 3.
Toby.
Don't turn around.
Dan?
- That's not Dan.
- Don't look at me.
Who are you?
I have so many names.
If I could...
If you look at me, you wlll die.
But who are you?
I'm behind you, Toby.
I'm right behind you.
Don't look.
Don't look at me.
One look and you wlll die.
I'm reaching out, Toby.
I'm so close.
Don't turn around.
Oh, I can touch you.
No.
Zack, we got a problem?
No more than usual.
Got the Scarlet System burning up.
Mlght be worth a look.
You might want to see this.
Moment in history.
There, on the edge.
That red cloud.
That used to be the Scarlet System.
Home to the Pallushi.
A mighty civilisation spanning a billion years disappearing forever.
Their planets and suns consumed.
Ladies and gentlemen, we have witnessed its passing.
No, could you leave it open?
Just for a bit.
I won't go mad, I promise.
How would you know?
Scooti, check the lockdown.
Jefferson, sign off the airlock seals for me.
Open door 18.
I've seen films and things, yeah?
They say black holes are like gateways to another universe.
Close door 18.
Not that one.
It just eats.
A long way from home.
Go that way, turn right, keep going for, erm... about 500 years and you'll reach the Earth.
No signal.
That's first time we've gone out of range.
Mind you, even if I could...
What would I tell her?
Can you build another Tardis?
They were grown, not built.
And with my home planet gone, we're kind of stuck.
Well, it could be worse.
This lot said they'd give us a lift.
And then what?
I don't know.
Find a planet.
Get a job.
You live your life same as the rest of the universe.
I'd have to settle down.
Get a house or something.
A proper house with... doors and things.
Carpets.
Me, living in a house!
Now, that...
That...
That is terrifying.
You'd have to get a mortgage.
- No.
- Oh, yes.
I'm dying.
That's it, I am dying.
It is all over.
What about me?
I'd have to get one, too.
I don't know, could be the same one.
We could both...
I don't know, share.
Or not.
Whatever.
I don't know.
All sorts of...
- Anyway...
- We'll see.
I promised Jackie I would always take you back home.
Everyone leaves home in the end.
Not to end up stuck here.
Yeah, but stuck with you, that's not so bad.
- Yeah?
- Yes.
He Is awake.
- Evening.
- Only us.
The mysterious couple.
How are you, then?
Settling in?
Yeah, sorry, straight to business.
The Ood, how do they communicate?
I mean, with each other?
Oh, just empaths.
There's a low-level telepathic field connecting them.
Not that that does them much good.
They're basically a herd race, like cattle.
This telepathic field, can it pick up messages?
'Cause I was having dinner and one of the Oods said something...
Well, odd.
Hmm.
An odd Ood.
And then I got something else on my... communicator thing.
Well, be fair.
We've got whole star systems burning up around us, there's all sorts of stray transmissions.
Probably nothing.
Look, if there was something wrong, it would show.
We monitor the telepathic field.
It's the only way to look after them.
They're so stupid.
They don't even tell us when they're ill.
- Monitor the field, that's this thing.
- Yeah.
But like I said, it's low-level telepathy.
They only register Basic 5.
Well, that's not Basic 5. 10.
20.
- They've gone up to Basic 30.
- But they can't.
Doctor, the Ood.
What does Basic 30 mean?
Well, it means that they're shouting, screaming inside their heads.
Or something is shouting at them.
But where is it coming from?
What is it saying?
What did it say to you?
Something about the Beast and the Pit.
What about your communicator?
What did that say?
He is awake.
And you will worship him.
- What the hell?
- He is awake.
And you will worship him.
Worship who?
Who's talking to you?
Who is it?
Toby, I've got your expenditure.
Open door 41.
Close door 41.
41?
Close door 40.
Computer, did you open and close door 41?
Conflrmed.
But that's the airlock.
Why would you open the airlock?
It's the night shift, we're not allowed outside.
- Has someone gone out?
- Conflrmed.
- But who was it?
- Cannot confirm.
Okay.
Right, hold on, I know.
Tell me whose spacesuit has been logged out.
- No spacesult has been logged out.
- But...
You're not making any sense.
You can't go outside without...
Zack, I think we've got a breakdown on door 41.
It's saying somebody's gone outside onto the planet's surface.
Zack?
Zack?
- Computer, trace fault.
- There Is no fault.
- Tell me who went through that door?
- He Is awake.
- What?
- He Is awake.
- What's that supposed to mean?
- He bathes In the black sun.
Toby.
There's no air, there's no...
No, stop it!
You can't be!
Open door 40!
Open door 40!
Open door 40!
Open door 40!
Open door 40!
Emergency hull breach.
Emergency hull breach.
Which section?
Everyone, evacuate 11 to 13.
We've got a breach.
The Base is open.
Repeat, the Base is open.
Open door 19.
Close door 19.
I can't contain the oxygen field.
We're gonna lose it.
Come on!
Keep moving!
And you, too, sunshine!
- Everyone all right?
- Breach sealed.
- What happened?
What was it?
- Hull breach.
We were open to the elements.
Another couple of minutes and we'd have been inspecting that black hole at close quarters.
That wasn't a quake.
What caused it?
We've lost sections 11 to 13.
Everyone all right?
We've got everyone here except Scooti.
Scooti, report.
Scooti Manista, this is an order, report.
She's all right.
I've picked up her biochip.
She's in Habitation 3.
Better go and check if she's not responding.
She might be unconscious.
But how about that, eh?
We survived.
Habitation 3.
Come on.
I don't often say this, but I think we could all do with a drink.
Come on.
What happened?
I don't know.
I was working and then I can't remember.
All that noise.
The room was falling apart.
There was no air.
Come on, up you get.
Come and have some Protein One.
- You've gone native.
- Oi, don't knock it, it's nice.
Protein One with just a dash of Three.
There's no sign of her, but the biochip says she's in this area.
- Scooti, please respond.
- If you can hear this, please respond.
- Habitation 6...
- Nowhere here.
Zack, we've got a problem.
Scooti's still missing.
But It says Habltatlon 3.
Well, that's where I am and I'm telling you, she's not here.
I've found her.
Oh, my God.
Sorry.
I'm so sorry.
Captain... report Officer Scootori Manista, PKD... deceased.
43K 2.1.
She was 20.
20 years old.
For how should man die better
Than facing fearful odds
For the ashes of his father
And the temples of his gods?
It's stopped.
What was that?
- What was it?
- The drill.
We've stopped drilling.
We've made it.
Point 0.
All non-essentlal Oods to be confined.
Capsule established.
All systems functioning.
The mineshaft is go.
Bring systems online now.
Reporting as a volunteer for the expeditionary force.
Doctor, this is breaking every single protocol.
- We don't even know who you are.
- Yeah, but you trust me, don't you?
And you can't let Ida go down there on her own.
Go on, look me in the eye.
Yes, you do.
I can see it.
Trust.
I should be going down.
The captain doesn't lead the mission.
He stays here, in charge.
Not much good here, am I?
Positions!
We're going down in two!
Everyone, positions!
Mr Jefferson, I want maximum systems...
Oxygen, nitro balance, gravity.
It's ages since I wore one of these.
I want that spacesuit back in one piece.
You got that?
Yes, sir.
It's funny 'cause people back home think that space travel is gonna be all... whizzing about and teleports, anti-gravity.
But it's not, is it?
It's tough.
I'll see you later.
Not if I see you first.
You will remain here.
No command can override this.
Have you got that?
My Instructions only.
Capsule active.
Counting down, in ten, nine, eight, seven, six, five, four, three, two, one, release.
You've gone beyond the oxygen field.
You're on your own.
Don't forget to breathe.
Breathing is good.
- Rose, stay off the comm.
- No chance.
Doctor?
Doctor, are you all right?
Ida, report to me.
Doctor?
- It's all right.
We've made it.
- Heading out of the capsule now.
What's It like down there?
It's hard to tell.
Some sort of cave.
Cavern.
It's massive.
Well, this should help.
Gravity globe.
That's...
That's...
Oh, my God.
That's beautiful.
Rose... you can tell Toby... we've found his civilisation.
Oi, Toby, sounds like you've got plenty of work.
Good, good.
Good.
Concentrate now, people.
Keep on the mission.
Ida, what about the power source?
We're close.
Energy signature indicates north-northwest.
Are you getting pictures up there?
- There's too much Interference.
- We're In your hands.
Well, we've come this far.
There's no turning back.
Oh, did you have to?
No turning back?
That's almost as bad as, "Nothing can possibly go wrong"
or "This is gonna be the best Christmas Walford's ever had."
Have you finished?
Yeah.
Finished.
Captain, sir, there's something happening with the Ood.
What are they doing?
They're staring at me.
I've told them to stop, but they won't.
Danny, you're a big boy, I think you can take being stared at.
But the telepathic field, sir, it's at Basic 100.
I've checked.
There isn't any fault.
- It's definitely 100.
- But that's Impossible.
- What's Basic 100 mean?
- They should be dead.
Basic 100 is brain death.
But they're safe?
They're not actually moving?
No, sir.
Keep watching them.
And you, Jefferson, keep a guard on the Ood.
Officer at arms.
You can't fire a gun in here.
What if you hit a wall?
Firing Stock 15, only impacts upon organics.
- Keep watch.
Guard them.
- Yes, sir.
- Is everything all right up there?
- Yeah, yeah.
- It's fine.
- Great.
We've found something.
It looks like metal, like some sort of seal.
I've got a nasty feeling the word might be "trap door".
Not a good word, trap door.
Never met a trap door I liked.
The edge is covered with those symbols.
- Do you think It opens?
- That's what trap doors tend to do.
Trap door doesn't do it justice.
It's massive, Zack.
- About 30 feet in diameter.
- Any way of opening It?
Don't know.
I can't see any sort of mechanism.
- I suppose that's the writing.
- It would tell us what to do.
The letters that defy translation.
Toby, did you get anywhere with decoding it?
Toby, they need to know.
That lettering, does it make any sort of sense?
I know what it says.
Then tell them.
- When did you work that out?
- It doesn't matter, just tell them!
These are the words of the Beast.
And he has woken.
He is the heart that beats in the darkness.
He is the blood that will never cease.
And now he will rise.
Officer, you will stand down.
Stand down!
What is it?
What's he done?
What's happening?
Rose, what's going on?
Jefferson, report.
Report!
Officer, you have compromised security.
You will stand down and be confined.
Immediately!
Mr Jefferson, tell me, sir...
did your wife ever forgive you?
I don't know what you mean.
Let me tell you a secret.
She never did.
Officer, you will stand down and be confined.
Or what?
Or under the strictures of Condition Red, I am authorised to shoot you.
But how many can you kill?
We are the legion of the Beast.
Rose, what is it?
Rose?
- I'm going back up.
- Reportl Reportl
Jefferson, report!
Someone report!
The legion shall be many and the legion shall be few.
It's the Ood.
Sir, we have contamination of the livestock.
Doctor, I don't know what it is.
It's like they're possessed.
They won't listen to us.
He has woven himself in the fabric of your life since the dawn of time.
Some may call him Abbadon.
Some may call him Krop Tor.
Some may call him Satan or Lucifer.
Captain, it's the Ood.
They're out of control.
...the King of Despair, the Deathless Prince.
The Bringer of Night.
And these are the words that shall set him free.
Back up to the door!
- I am become manifest.
- Move quickly!
- I shall walk in the light.
- To the door!
And my legions will swarm across worlds.
Doctor, it's opening!
We're moving!
The whole thing's moving, the planet's moving.
I am the sin and the temptation and the desire.
I am the pain and the loss and the death of hope.
Get that door open!
The gravity field, it's going!
We're losing orbit!
We're gonna fall into the black hole!
I have been imprisoned for eternity.
But no more.
Door sealed.
Door sealed.
The Plt Is open and I am freel
It's the Ood.
They've gone mad.
Doctor, can you hear me?
Doctor, Ida, are you there?
Danny, turn right.
That thing is playing on very basic fears.
- The cable's snapped.
- Get out!
You will die and I will live.
I wonder what's wrong with her.
She's sort of queasy.
- Indigestion.
Like she didn't want to land.
-If you think there's gonna be trouble, we could always get back inside and go somewhere else.
I think we've landed inside a cupboard.
Here we go.
Open door 15.
Some sort of base.
Moon base, sea base, space base.
They build these things out of kits.
Glad we're indoors.
Sounds like a storm out there.
Open door 16.
Human design, you've got a thing about kits.
This place was put together like a flat-pack wardrobe, only bigger and easier.
- Open door 77.
-Oh, it's a sanctuary base!
- Close door 17.
- Deep-space exploration.
We've gone way out.
And listen to that.
Underneath.
Someone's drilling.
"Welcome to hell."
- Oh, it's not that bad.
-No, over there.
Hold on.
What does that say?
That's weird.
It won't translate.
But I thought the Tardis translated everything, writing as well.
- I should see English.
-Exactly.
Now if that's not working, then it means... this writing is old.
Very old.
Impossibly old.
We should find out who's in charge.
We've gone beyond the reach of the Tardis' knowledge.
Not a good move.
- And if someone's looking for...
- Open door 19.
Right, hello.
Sorry.
I was just saying, nice place.
We must feed.
- You gotta what?
-We must feed.
- Yeah, I think they mean us.
-We must feed.
We must feed.
We must feed.
We must feed.
We must feed.
We must feed.
We must feed.
We must feed.
We must feed.
We must feed.
We must feed.
Sub created by;
Dandysubs and cryinoutloud
We must feed... you, if you are hungry.
- Sorry?
-We apologise.
Electromagnetics have interfered with speech systems.
Would you like some refreshment?
- Open door 78.
-Um...
What the hell?
How did...
Captain, you're not gonna believe this.
We've got people.
Out of nowhere.
I mean, real people.
I mean...
Two living people just standing here right in front of me.
Don't be stupid, that's impossible.
- I suggest telling them that.
-But you're a sort of space base.
You must have visitors now and then.
It can't be that impossible.
You telling me you don't know where you are?
No idea.
More fun that way.
{ON PA';
Stand by, everyone.
Buckle down.
We have incoming, and it's a big one.
Quake 0.5 on its way.
Through here.
Now.
Quickly, come on!
Move!
Move it!
Come on!
Keep moving!
Come on!
Keep moving!
Oh, my God, you meant it.
- People!
Look at that, real people.
-That's us.
Hurray!
Yeah, definitely real.
My name's Rose, Rose Tyler, and this is the Doctor.
Come on, the oxygen must be offline.
We're hallucinating, they can't be...
- No, they're real.
-Come on, we're in the middle of an alert.
Danny, strap up, the quake's coming in.
Impact in 30 seconds.
Sorry, you two, whoever you are, just hold on.
Tight.
- Hold on to what?
-Anything, I don't care, just hold on.
Ood, are we fixed?
Your kindness in this emergency is much appreciated.
- What's this planet called anyway?
-Don't be stupid.
It hasn't got a name.
How could it have a name?
You really don't know, do you?
And impact!
Oh, well.
That wasn't so bad...
Okay, that's it.
Everyone all right?
Speak to me!
Ida?
- Yeah.
-Danny?
- I'm fine.
-Toby?
- Fine.
-Scooti?
- No damage.
Jefferson?
Check!
We're fine, thanks, fine.
Yeah, don't worry about us.
Surface caved in.
I deflected it onto Storage 5 through 8.
We've lost them completely.
Toby, go and check the rocket link.
That's not my department.
Just do as I say, yeah?
Oxygen holding.
Internal gravity at 56.6.
We should be okay.
Never mind the earthquake, that's...
That's one hell of a storm.
What is that, a hurricane?
You need an atmosphere for a hurricane.
There's no air out there.
It's a complete vacuum.
Then what's shaking the roof?
You're not joking.
You really don't know.
Well, introductions.
FYI, as they said in the olden days.
I'm Ida Scott, Science Officer.
Zachary Cross Flane, Acting Captain, sir.
You've met Mr Jefferson, he's Head of Security.
Danny Bartock, Ethics Committee.
Not as boring as it sounds.
And that man who just left, that was Toby Zed,
Archaeology, and this... is Scooti Manista, Trainee Maintenance.
And this...
This is home.
Brace yourselves.
The sight of it sends some people mad.
That's a black hole.
But that's impossible.
I did warn you.
We're standing under a black hole.
- In orbit.
-We can't be.
You can see for yourself.
We're in orbit.
But we can't be.
This lump of rock is suspended in perpetual geostationary orbit around that black hole, without falling in.
Discuss.
And that's bad, yeah?
Bad doesn't cover it.
A black hole's a dead star.
It collapses in on itself, in and in and in, until the matter's so dense and tight, it starts to pull everything else in, too.
Nothing in the universe can escape it.
Light, gravity, time, everything just gets pulled inside and crushed.
So they can't be in orbit?
- We should be pulled right in.
-We should be dead.
And yet, here we are.
Beyond the laws of physics.
Welcome on board.
But if there's no atmosphere out there, what's that?
Stars breaking up.
Gas clouds.
We have whole solar systems being ripped apart above our heads, before falling into that thing.
So, a bit worse than a storm, then.
- Just a bit.
-just a bit, yeah.
Toby.
Who's that?
Danny?
- Close door 1.
- The rocket link's fine.
That's the black hole, officially designated K37 Gem 5.
In the scriptures of the Veltino, this planet is called Krop Tor, the bitter pill.
And the black hole is supposed to be a mighty demon who was tricked into devouring the planet only to spit it out because it was poison.
- The bitter pill.
I Like that.
-We are so far out.
Lost in the drifts of the universe.
How did you even get here?
We flew in.
You see... this planet's generating a gravity field.
We don't know how, we've no idea, but it's kept in constant balance against the black hole.
And the field extends out there as a funnel, a distinct gravity funnel reaching out into clear space.
That was our way in.
You flew down that thing?
Like a rollercoaster.
By rights, the ship should've been torn apart.
We lost the captain, which is what put me in charge.
And you're doing a good job.
Yeah, well.
Needs must.
But if that gravity funnel closes, there's no way out.
Oh, we have fun speculating about that.
Oh, yeah.
That's the word, "fun".
But that field would take phenomenal amounts of power, I mean...
Not just big, but off the scale.
Can 1...?
Sure, help yourself.
Your refreshment.
Oh, yeah, thanks.
Thank you.
I'm sorry, what was your name?
We have no titles.
We are as one.
Erm, what are they called?
Oh, come on.
Where have you been living?
Everyone's got one.
Well, not me.
So, what are they?
- They're the Ood.
-The Ood?
The Ood.
Well, that's Ood.
Very Ood.
But handy.
They work the mineshaft, all the drilling and stuff.
Supervision and maintenance.
They're born for it.
Basic slave race.
You've got slaves?
Don't start.
She's like one of that lot, Friends of the Ood.
Well, maybe I am, yeah.
Since when do humans need slaves?
But the Ood offer themselves.
If you don't give them orders, they just pine away and die.
Seriously?
You like being ordered about?
It is all we crave.
- Why is that, then?
-We have nothing else in Life.
Yeah, well, I used to think like that.
- Long time ago.
- There we go.
Do you see?
To generate that gravity field and the funnel, you'd need a power source with an inverted self-extrapolating reflex of six to the power of six every six seconds.
- That's all the sixes.
-And it's impossible.
It took us two years to work that out.
- I'm very good.
-But that's why we're here.
This power source is ten miles below, through solid rock.
Point 0.
We're drilling down to try and find it.
It's giving off readings of over 90 Statts on the Blazen Scale.
It could revolutionise modern science.
We could use it to fuel the empire.
Or start a war.
It's buried beneath us.
In the darkness, waiting.
What's your job?
Chief dramatist?
Well, whatever it is down there, it's not a natural phenomenon.
This planet once supported life, aeons ago, before the human race had even learnt to walk.
I saw that lettering written on the wall, did you do that?
I copied it from fragments we found unearthed by the drilling, but I can't translate it.
No, neither can I. And that's saying something.
And there was some form of civilisation.
They buried something.
Now, it's reaching out.
Calling us in.
And you came.
How could we not?
So, when it comes right down to it, why did you come here?
Why did you do that?
Why?
I'll tell you why.
Because it was there.
Brilliant!
- Excuse me.
Zack, wasn't it?
-That's me.
Just stand there 'cause I'm gonna hug you, is that all right?
Suppose so.
Here we go.
Corning in.
Human beings.
You are amazing.
- Thank you.
- Not at all.
But apart from that, you're completely mad.
You should pack your bags, get back on that ship and fly for your lives.
You can talk.
How the hell did you get here?
Oh, I've got this...
This ship...
It's hard to explain, it just sort of appears.
We can show you, we parked down the corridor from...
- What's it called?
Habitation Area 3?
-3.
Do you mean Storage 6?
It was a bit of a cupboard, yeah.
Storage 6?
But you said...
You said...
You said Storage 5 to 8.
What is it?
What's wrong?
Open door 19.
Close door 19.
- Doors, come on!
-Open door 77.
Open door 15.
- Open door 76.
-It can't be, it can't be!
What's wrong?
What is it?
Doctor, the Tardis is in there.
What's happened?
The Tardis is gone.
Door 16 out of commission.
The earthquake.
This section collapsed.
But it's got to be out there somewhere.
Look down.
The ground gave way.
My Tardis must have fallen down into the heart of the planet.
You've got robot drills heading the same way.
We can't divert the drilling.
But I need my ship!
It's all I've got.
Literally, the only thing.
Doctor, we've only got the resources to dig one central shaft down to the power source and that's it.
No diversions, no distractions, no exceptions.
Your machine is lost.
All I can do is offer you a lift, if we ever get to leave this place.
And that is the end of it.
I'll put you on the duty roster.
We need someone in the laundry.
Open door 1.
Close door 1.
- I've trapped you here.
-No, don't worry about me.
Okay, we're on a planet that shouldn't exist, underneath a black hole and no way out.
Yeah, I've changed my mind.
Start worrying about me.
Entering night shift.
Your chosen track for transition is Ravel's Edam.
All finished.
Heading back inside.
Server Gamma 10.
Server Gamma 11.
Server Gamma 12.
Toby.
-[ Ran see you.
-Danny, is that you?
It's not funny, all right?
Dan?
I'm trying to work, Daniel.
If that's you, Dan, can you just stop it?
Danny, check the temperature in Ood Habitation.
It seems to be rising.
Help yourself, just don't have the green.
Or the blue.
Urn, a bit of that, thanks.
Would you like sauce with that?
I'll have a go, yeah.
I did that job once.
I was a dinner lady.
Not that I'm calling you a lady.
Although, I don't know, you might be.
Do you actually get paid, though?
Do they give you money?
The Beast and his armies shall rise from the Pit to make war against God.
I'm sorry?
Apologies.
I said I hope you enjoy your meal.
Yeah.
Drill head now at point 16.
Drill head speed increasing.
Keep pressure at 60.
Close door 3.
Close door 3.
He is awake.
What did you say?
Close door 3.
Toby.
Don't 'turn around.
Dan?
- That's not Dan.
- Don't look at me.
Who are you?
1 have so many names.
If I could...
If you look at me, you will die.
But who are you?
I'm behind you, Toby.
I'm right behind you.
Don't look.
Don't look at me.
One look and you will die.
I'm reaching out, Toby.
I'm so close.
Don't 'turn around.
Oh, 1 can touch you.
No.
Zack, we got a problem?
No more than usual.
Got the Scarlet System burning up.
Might be worth a look.
You might want to see this.
Moment in history.
There, on the edge.
That red cloud.
That used to be the Scarlet System.
Home to the Pallushi.
A mighty civilisation spanning a billion years disappearing forever.
Their planets and suns consumed.
Ladies and gentlemen, we have witnessed its passing.
No, could you leave it open?
Just for a bit.
I won't go mad, I promise.
How would you know?
Scooti, check the lockdown.
Jefferson, sign off the airlock seals for me.
Open door 18.
I've seen films and things, yeah?
They say black holes are like gateways to another universe.
Close door 18.
Not that one.
It just eats.
A long way from home.
Go that way, turn right, keep going for, erm... about 500 years and you'll reach the Earth.
No signal.
That's first time we've gone out of range.
Mind you, even if I could...
What would I tell her?
Can you build another Tardis?
They were grown, not built.
And with my home planet gone, we're kind of stuck.
Well, it could be worse.
This lot said they'd give us a lift.
And then what?
I don't know.
Find a planet.
Get a job.
You live your life same as the rest of the universe.
I'd have to settle down.
Get a house or something.
A proper house with... doors and things.
Carpets.
Me, living in a house!
Now, that...
That...
That is terrifying.
You'd have to get a mortgage.
- No.
-Oh, yes.
I'm dying.
That's it, I am dying.
It is all over.
What about me?
I'd have to get one, too.
I don't know, could be the same one.
We could both...
I don't know, share.
Or not.
Whatever.
I don't know.
All sorts of...
- Anyway...
-We'll see.
I promised Jackie I would always take you back home.
Everyone leaves home in the end.
Not to end up stuck here.
Yeah, but stuck with you, that's not so bad.
- Yeah?
-Yes
He is awake.
- Evening.
- Only us.
The mysterious couple.
How are you, then?
Settling in?
Yeah, sorry, straight to business.
The Ood, how do they communicate?
I mean, with each other?
Oh,just empaths.
There's a low-level telepathic field connecting them.
Not that that does them much good.
They're basically a herd race, like cattle.
This telepathic field, can it pick up messages?
'Cause I was having dinner and one of the Oods said something...
Well, odd.
Hmm.
An odd Ood.
And then I got something else on my... communicator thing.
Well, be fair.
We've got whole star systems burning up around us, there's all sorts of stray transmissions.
Probably nothing.
Look, if there was something wrong, it would show.
We monitor the telepathic field.
It's the only way to look after them.
They're so stupid.
They don't even tell us when they're ill.
- Monitor the field, that's this thing.
-Yeah.
But like I said, it's low-level telepathy.
They only register Basic 5.
Well, that's not Basic 5. 10.
20.
- They've gone up to Basic 30.
-But they can't.
Doctor, the Ood.
What does Basic 30 mean?
Well, it means that they're shouting, screaming inside their heads.
Or something is shouting at them.
But where is it coming from?
What is it saying?
What did it say to you?
Something about the Beast and the Pit.
What about your communicator?
What did that say?
He is awake.
And you will worship him.
- What the hell?
-He is awake.
And you will worship him.
Worship who?
Who's talking to you?
Who is it?
Toby, I've got your expenditure.
Open door 41.
Close door 41.
41?
Close door 40.
Computer, did you open and close door 41?
Confirmed.
But that's the airlock.
Why would you open the airlock?
It's the night shift, we're not allowed outside.
- Has someone gone out?
- Confirmed.
- But who was it?
{an/mt confirm.
Okay.
Right, hold on, I know.
Tell me whose spacesuit has been logged out.
- No spacesuit has been logged out.
- But...
You're not making any sense.
You can't go outside without...
Zack, I think we've got a breakdown on door 41.
It's saying somebody's gone outside onto the planet's surface.
Zack?
Zack?
- Computer, trace fault.
-There is no fault.
- Tell me who went through that door?
- He is awake.
- What?
- He is awake.
- What's that supposed to mean?
-He bathes in the black sun.
Toby.
There's no air, there's no...
No, stop it!
You can't be!
Open door 40!
Open door 40!
Open door 40!
Open door 40!
Open door 40!
Emergency hull breach.
Emergency hull breach.
Which section?
Everyone, evacuate 11 to 13.
We've got a breach.
The Base is open.
Repeat, the Base is open.
Open door 19.
Close door 19.
I can't contain the oxygen field.
We're gonna lose it.
Come on!
Keep moving!
And you, too, sunshine!
- Everyone all right?
-Breach sealed.
- What happened?
What was it?
-Hull breach.
We were open to the elements.
Another couple of minutes and we'd have been inspecting that black hole at close quarters.
That wasn't a quake.
What caused it?
We've lost sections 11 to 13.
Everyone all right?
We've got everyone here except Scooti.
Scooti, report.
Scooti Manista, this is an order, report.
She's all right.
I've picked up her biochip.
She's in Habitation 3.
Better go and check if she's not responding.
She might be unconscious.
But how about that, eh?
We survived.
Habitation 3.
Come on.
I don't often say this, but I think we could all do with a drink.
Come on.
What happened?
I don't know.
I was working and then I can't remember.
All that noise.
The room was falling apart.
There was no air.
Come on, up you get.
Come and have some Protein One.
- You've gone native.
-Oi, don't knock it, it's nice.
Protein One with just a dash of Three.
There's no sign of her, but the biochip says she's in this area.
Scooti, please respond.
If you can hear this, please respond.
- Habitation 6...
-Nowhere here.
Zack, we've got a problem.
Scooti's still missing.
But it says Habitation 5.
Well, that's where I am and I'm telling you, she's not here.
I've found her.
Oh, my God.
Sorry.
I'm so sorry.
Captain... report Officer Scootori Manista, PKD... deceased.
ASK '21.
She was 20.
20 years old.
For how should man die better
Than facing fearful odds
For the ashes of his father
And the temples of his gods?
It's stopped.
What was that?
- What was it?
-The drill.
We've stopped drilling.
We've made it.
Point 0.
Al!
non-essential Oods to be confined.
Capsule established.
All systems functioning.
The mineshaft is go.
Bring systems online now.
Reporting as a volunteer for the expeditionary force.
Doctor, this is breaking every single protocol.
- We don't even know who you are.
-Yeah, but you trust me, don't you?
And you can't let Ida go down there on her own.
Go on, look me in the eye.
Yes, you do.
I can see it.
Trust.
I should be going down.
The captain doesn't lead the mission.
He stays here, in charge.
Not much good here, am I?
Positions!
We're going down in two!
Everyone, positions!
Mr Jefferson, I want maximum systems...
Oxygen, nitro balance, gravity.
It's ages since I wore one of these.
I want that spacesuit back in one piece.
You got that?
Yes, sir.
It's funny 'cause people back home think that space travel is gonna be all... whizzing about and teleports, anti-gravity.
But it's not, is it?
It's tough.
I'll see you later.
Not if I see you first.
You will remain here.
No command can override this.
Have you got that?
My instructions only.
Capsule active.
Counting down, in ten, nine, eight, seven, six, five, four, three, two, one, release.
You've gone beyond the oxygen field.
You're on your own.
Don't forget to breathe.
Breathing is good.
- Rose, stay off the comm.
-No chance.
Doctor?
Doctor, are you all right?
Ida, report to me.
Doctor?
It's all right.
We've made it.
Heading out of the capsule now.
What's it like down there?
It's hard to tell.
Some sort of cave.
Cavern.
It's massive.
Well, this should help.
Gravity globe.
That's...
That's...
Oh, my God.
That's beautiful.
Rose... you can tell Toby... we've found his civilisation.
Oi, Toby, sounds like you've got plenty of work.
Good, good.
Good.
Concentrate now, people.
Keep on the mission.
Ida, what about the power source?
We're close.
Energy signature indicates north-northwest.
Are you getting pictures up there?
There's too much interference.
We're in your hands.
Well, we've come this far.
There's no turning back.
Oh, did you have to?
No turning back?
That's almost as bad as, "Nothing can possibly go wrong"
or "This is gonna be the best Christmas Walford's ever had."
Have you finished?
Yeah.
Finished.
Captain, sir, there's something happening with the Ood.
What are they doing?
They're staring at me.
I've told them to stop, but they won't.
Danny, you're a big boy, I think you can take being stared at.
But the telepathic field, sir, it's at Basic 100.
I've checked.
There isn't any fault.
- It's definitely 100.
- Bu!
that's impossible.
-What's Basic 100 mean?
-They should be dead.
Basic 100 is brain death.
But they're safe?
They're not actually moving?
No, sir.
Keep watching them.
And you, Jefferson, keep a guard on the Ood.
Officer at arms.
You can't fire a gun in here.
What if you hit a wall?
Firing Stock 15, only impacts upon organics.
- Keep watch.
Guard them.
-Yes, sir.
Is everything all right up there?
Yeah, yeah.
- It's fine.
-Great.
We've found something.
It looks like metal, like some sort of seal.
I've got a nasty feeling the word might be "trap door".
Not a good word, trap door.
Never met a trap door I liked.
The edge is covered with those symbols.
- Do you think it opens?
- That's what trap doors tend to do.
Trap door doesn't do it justice.
It's massive, Zack.
- About 30 feet in diameter.
- Any way of opening it?
Don't know.
I can't see any sort of mechanism.
I suppose that's the writing.
It would tell us what to do.
The letters that defy translation.
Toby, did you get anywhere with decoding it?
Toby, they need to know.
That lettering, does it make any sort of sense?
I know what it says.
Then tell them.
- When did you work that out?
-It doesn't matter, just tell them!
These are the words of the Beast.
And he has woken.
He is the heart that beats in the darkness.
He is the blood that will never cease.
And now he will rise.
Officer, you will stand down.
Stand down!
What is it?
What's he done?
What's happening?
Rose, what's going on?
Jefferson, report.
Report!
Officer, you have compromised security.
You will stand down and be confined.
Immediately!
Mr Jefferson, tell me, sir...
did your wife ever forgive you?
I don't know what you mean.
Let me tell you a secret.
She never did.
Officer, you will stand down and be confined.
Or what?
Or under the strictures of Condition Red, I am authorised to shoot you.
But how many can you kill?
We are the legion of the Beast.
Rose, what is it?
Rose?
- I'm going back up.
- Rep or?
!
Rep or?
!
Jefferson, report!
Someone report!
The legion shall be many and the legion shall be few.
It's the Ood.
Sir, we have contamination of the livestock.
Doctor, I don't know what it is.
It's like they're possessed.
They won't listen to us.
He has woven himself in the fabric of your life since the dawn of time.
Some may call him Abbadon.
Some may call him Krop Tor.
Some may call him Satan or Lucifer.
Captain, it's the Ood.
They're out of control.
...the King of Despair, the Deathless Prince.
The Bringer of Night.
And these are the words that shall set him free.
Back up to the door!
- I am become manifest.
-Move quickly!
- I shall walk in the light.
-To the door!
And my legions will swarm across worlds.
Doctor, it's opening!
We're moving!
The whole thing's moving, the planet's moving.
I am the sin and the temptation and the desire.
I am the pain and the loss and the death of hope.
Get that door open!
The gravity field, it's going!
We're losing orbit!
We're gonna fall into the black hole!
I have been imprisoned for eternity.
But no more.
Door sealed.
Door sealed.
The Pit is open and I am free!
It's the Ood.
They've gone mad.
Doctor, can you hear me?
Doctor, Ida, are you there?
Danny, turn right.
That thing is playing on very basic fears.
- The cable's snapped.
-Get out!
You will die and I will live.
[J.D.] It's springtime at Sacred Heart, and the whole hospital had that end-of-the-year smell.
Gloria, I need you to change the dressing on Mr. Kerns' wound.
And I need you to suck it.
Wow, Gloria.
Do you kiss your great-great-great-great-great grandkids with that mouth?
# Zoom-zoom-zoom #
Ted, that's funny.
Where's the chuckle?
The bank foreclosed on my house.
- Where's your mom?
- She's out in the car with the cats.
Dr. Kelso celebrated spring by wearing his golf shorts to flaunt his oddly youthful legs.
Take them in, people.
I shaved for you.
[All groan]
Tell your Daddy what you just did.
I made a poopy in the potty.
You know, son, as a doctor,
I spend a lot of my day dealing with other people's poop.
And I'm not going to lie to you, Jackie, it gets old.
Now that's, that's not to say
I haven't enjoyed waking up to a fresh brown trout in your Huggies.
Besides, you're gonna do the same thing for me some day real soon.
And yet, aside from actually seeing you being born and that time Wayne Gretzky said, "What's up" to me in line at the bank, you out of diapers is the best thing that's ever happened.
It truly is.
Now why don't you go into your room and play for a little while because we're going to celebrate grown-up style.
All right, get this over with.
I need a nap.
I've been exhausted all week.
- Yippee!
- No kissing.
Hands behind your back.
Let's go.
Yep, love was definitely in the air.
Hey, Kim.
How'd you like a night on the town with the hottest doctor in this place?
I'd rather just go out with you.
Oh!
# Zoom-zoom-zoom #
- You "zoom-zoom-zoom"?
- Of course.
- I invented the zoom-zoom-zoom.
- Oh.
Cool.
Liar!
So, Josh, you are suffering from a condition called phimosis.
It's basically a hardening of your foreskin.
As part of your treatment, I'm asking you to masturbate five times a week.
Help the poor kid out.
Wow, five times a week, huh?
For me that would be cutting back.
He said in front of his future girlfriend.
You know what?
I should probably mosey.
[Groans]
[Gasps]
Looking forward to our date.
See you around 6:00.
Wear something slutty.
# Zoom-zoom-zoom!
#
That's mine.
# I can't do this all on my own
# No, I know I'm no Superman
# I'm no Superman #
- Oh.
You like that?
- Wow, I felt it move.
- Todd, you're touching your crotch.
- I know.
And I'm loving it.
Hey, tubby.
J.D., come here.
I want you to feel something quick.
Ow!
Don't call me tubby.
Pregnant witch.
Hey.
There's Kim.
She and Elliot bonded over an ability to communicate at a speed of light.
[Talking at a very high speed]
You'd have to slow it down for humans to understand.
The shower's going to start at 4:00, there's going to be food and games.
You're such a good friend.
I got her a present, but since we're not close
I'm just going home to get ready for my date.
Oh.
Hey, you.
I'm psyched for tonight.
Best thing about a date with J.D., if you're having Chinese and want Mexican, you walk to the other side of the food court.
We are not going to the mall, Elliot.
I was making you dinner, then go to karaoke, but I'm not sure how to do both in the same night.
Unless, of course...
J.D. Not Floating Head Doctor.
Too late.
I'm already there.
Body could stay home and prepare the feast.
And as always...
Head would handle entertainment.
# Don't go breaking my heart
# I couldn't if I tried
# Oh, honey if I get restless
Stop hogging the mic!
Body, come!
[Bugle march music]
- [Crashing] - [Crowd] Oh!
[J.D.] Stupid body.
I gotta do everything myself.
[Grunting]
# Ooh-hoo, nobody knows it
Clap with me, clap with me!
# Nobody knows...
Head loves karaoke.
I'm up for anything.
I married my high school boyfriend, the only first date I went on was in tenth grade.
It began with me in the back of his Miata because his friend called shotgun and ended with us going to the arcade to, and I quote,
"Eat pizza and beat up nerds." And I married that guy.
Well, trust me, Kim.
I've beaten up many a nerds in my day, but tonight's about you having the best first date ever.
All right, slugger.
- Bye!
- You don't have anything planned.
You had to soil the food court thing.
It's veal piccata night at Sbarro's.
I'd help, but I'm planning a baby shower for Carla.
I am going to make this cafeteria look totally different.
# Baby, baby,
# Baby, oooh
# I want my baby back, baby back, baby back, baby back, baby back, baby back
- # I want my baby back, baby back - # Chili's
# Baby back ribs
- # I want my baby back ribs - # Barbecue sauce
- # I want my baby back, baby back - # Chili's...
Ted, what the hell?
It's the only song we know with "baby."
I want my money back.
- What money?
- What?
I lost my house.
Give me a break.
Fun, right?
No one is mingling.
Why are the morgue guys so damn cliquey?
I want yellow.
I wish I had cool morgue friends.
Hey guys!
- [Carla] Ooooh!
- [Turk] Oh.
Laverne, I didn't know you knit.
I sure do.
Mr. Roberts doesn't have one pair of store-bought socks.
I'm gonna knit you a muzzle.
Those are all from us.
[Jordan] It's just Jack's old baby crap.
We're really excited to get rid of all that stuff and watch you guys suffer through the hellish relationship-ruining nightmare that is the baby phase.
- Open something.
- Go ahead.
- Those are my workout pants.
- Uh-huh.
She's been trying to get rid of those, but I'll be honest with you,
I love them cause they're so comfortable and you can get them on real quick.
You ain't lying.
Baby, check it out.
Wonderful.
Thank you.
Why can't we just talk to people?
This is the baby games station.
Once we start, people will join us.
OK, guess what flavor baby food this is?
- Cab driver feet?
- No, Keith, it's turnips!
You got it wrong, finish the whole jar!
You guys, this is so much fun!
[Gagging]
Where the hell are all your intern friends?
Listen up, interns.
Notice the definition in the upper calf.
Look at it, damn it!
See that?
Back in 'Nam, the choppers would hover eight feet above my head, I'd jump in.
You should've seen the look on Charlie's face.
Not the enemy, son, the pilot, Charlie Ross.
Great guy.
He didn't make it back.
- Where's the cake?
- Eight feet?
I don't believe it.
Believe that, missy.
I have to get ready.
I want my date with Kim to be perfect.
What do you think about a romantic horseback ride on the beach?
- Like we did for your birthday?
- Yeah.
- Except this time with two horses.
- Why not take her to your deck?
You guys can lie out and look at the stars.
Unfortunately, I can't.
My deck has become sort of a cruising spot for older gay gentlemen.
Get off my porch, you old queens.
[Disco music playing]
Who's is this?
Who's is this?
You find somewhere else to hang out!
I know for a fact Les Mis is in town!
I tried turning my hose on them, but they liked it.
If anything, good luck, buddy.
[Barbershop quartet] # Barbecue sauce
[J.D.] I didn't need luck, because this was going to be the most romantic first date ever.
Your steed, my lady.
J.D., I've never ridden a horse on a beach before.
[Kim chuckles]
And upsie-daisy.
Woo!
No saddles?
You going to be OK riding bareback?
No problemo.
What's so hard about riding bareback?
[# Nazareth:
Love Hurts]
Oh, that was amazing!
Wasn't that so much fun?
Oh yeah.
That was awesome.
Thank you.
Is this for when we buy the baby a dog?
No.
It's a baby cage.
It's a good one, too.
When I was a kid, mine didn't have these windows.
It's perfect.
If you go out for dinner, it's got a water bottle, so you throw some cedar chips in there so the baby can poop, you're made in the shade.
I'm kidding!
It's for when they buy the baby a, uh, puppy.
Oh!
[Laughter]
This one's from me and Keith.
He's here in the bathroom, throwing up summer squash.
Let's see here.
Oooh.
It's a preggy-teddy.
I got it at that new maternity lingerie store at the mall.
I had a conversation with the sweet, old lady who owns the place.
Not many pregnant women shop there.
It's mostly just fat whores.
- [All] Oh.
- I got to get me one of those.
Say, Bobbo.
You want to weigh in on pregnancy sex?
- It's a freak show.
- You've seen an ultrasound.
They have eyes, they have hands.
How do you think they're going to react to an intruder?
[Grunting]
The baby can't grab me down there.
- The baby can't grab me down there?
- No, baby.
I called an ambulance, but you should really let me examine you.
Oh, no, no.
The date continues.
I'm a urologist.
And there's a good chance you have testicular torsion.
In which case, you could lose a testicle.
Come on.
Off with the pants.
Looks like my plan is working.
Detruser function is normal.
One is significantly larger than the other.
Actually, that's a pre-existing condition.
- So the right one's always been bigger?
- Yes.
Wait.
- Your right or stage right?
- Let me test the retraction.
Retracted.
OK, the date's not going exactly as planned, but you can still save it with your legendary gift for small-talk.
So, you're from Texas, huh?
They say that's the Lone Star State.
What exactly does that mean?
My boobs are so big right now.
I think Dr. Fishman threw in something a little extra when he did my chin.
Would you, would you like to see something really, just, beautiful?
There goes all of Jackie-boy's baby stuff.
No, Mom, playpenlbaby cage is not like tomatoltomahto.
I hope you're not beating yourself up about this.
Sorry, I wanted to do something fun for our first date.
No.
It was so much more fun then, then you think.
I mean, the first seven or eight minutes rocked.
Admittedly, it was more like work after that.
But at least I got to third base with you.
And there it was.
The moment where pity was turning into genuine affection.
Classic Dorian.
I feel like we kind of missed first base.
Me, too.
- Well, maybe we should fix that.
- We should.
And then it happened.
[Dramatic music]
- [Man] Elliot Reid.
Moment Killer.
- [Machine gun sound]
What's up, guys?
Tell me every detail about the date.
- We went horseback riding on the beach.
- Yes.
I've been on that date.
- Really?
- What?
I had a coupon.
I wasn't the only one to have an uninvited guest.
[Groans] You know what sucks?
I didn't even eat any of that crappy shower food and I still feel nauseous.
In fact, I've been nauseous for, like, two weeks.
[Gasping]
I've been exhausted all week.
My boobs are so big right now.
Yep, I'm pregnant.
I pooped in my bed so I put it on the TV.
Forgive me, but since I had a vasectomy last year, nay, two vasectomies, I feel, I feel I just have to ask.
- Did you cheat on me?
- No.
- And you know me.
I always tell.
- Oh, that's true.
That's pretty much why we work well together.
Are you responsible for this?
What are you talking about?
I'm selling my old mop.
The 2007 s are in.
Sorry.
All right, Kim's right there.
We spent all morning crafting a line so raw with confidence, that if you pull it off,
- you're back in the game.
- I'm afraid, Mocha Bear.
I know.
Buck up!
- Hey, Kim.
- Oh, hey, J.D. How're you feeling?
Well, uh the swelling's gone down for now.
You're an idiot.
Go out with me again tonight.
Oh, J.D., I'd love to, but I'm going to a Neil Diamond concert.
With who?
[Dramatic music]
- [Man] Elliot Reid.
Moment Killer.
- [Machine gun sound]
- What's up?
Are you psyched?
- Hey.
- I'm so psyched.
- Me too.
[Imitates Neil Diamond] # Everywhere around the world
# They're coming to America
Could I, uh, could I have everybody's attention, please.
Jordan's pregnant.
You get over here, you!
- Not a hug moment, sweetie.
- Right.
Yes.
[Talking in high-pitched voice] No.
But Dr. Cox, here I thought you and Jordan were done trying to have any more babies.
We were, but my vasectomy didn't take which, apparently, is not that uncommon.
[High-pitched voice] Holy crap, Dr. Cox.
That must have really pissed you off.
[Regular voice] Yes, it did.
What is, what is your name?
[High-pitched voice] Oh, I'm any generic hospital worker who happens to ask you a question about your pregnancy andlor any baby-related issues.
[Regular voice] Isn't that nice?
This morality play was made possible by a grant from the Just See If I Was Kidding Foundation.
[Chuckling]
- Do you want to do it, or should I?
- Let's just do it together.
[Mimicking baby scream]
[Turk and Carla laughing]
That's from The Simpsons.
Ah, yes.
I'm having a heart attack.
Did you guys hear what Jordan and Dr. Cox and did to the doctor who botched his vasectomy?
Go Ted.
# I want my baby back, baby back, baby back, baby back, baby back, baby back
# I want my baby back, baby back, baby back, baby back, baby back, baby back
# I want my baby back, baby back, baby back, baby back
- Dear God, when do they say "ribs?" - [Cox] Never.
They never say "ribs."
# I want my baby back, baby back, baby back, baby back, baby back, baby back
# I want my baby back, baby back, baby back, baby back...
I heard ten minutes into it, he started eating his face.
He did.
You know what J.D.'s got planned since it's his day off and he's dateless?
[Engines revving]
This is my first scooter rally.
Do you want to be Ponch or Jon?
I can imagine what Jordan and Dr. Cox are feeling right now.
Do you really think we can handle this?
I don't know.
[Elliot] I can totally picture J.D., too.
[Cell phone ringing]
Oh, hey, Mom.
No, I'm just hanging out alone tonight.
I didn't have anything else to do.
[Knocking on door]
We want to give you your stuff back.
We don't feel like dealing with that right now.
- How about now?
- Oh.
Come on in.
Ugh.
I hate cleaning up after those messy old queens.
Ooh, appletini?
When did they start drinking straight guy drinks?
Mmm.
It's fresh.
[Kim] What's up, chicken butt?
Hey, Kim.
What happened to Neil Diamond?
I haven't seen Keith in a while, I'm gonna take him.
Kim's letting me off the hook.
Thank you.
You're welcome.
- What's up?
- Nothing.
It seems like good friends always come through for you
- You like?
- Oh, well.
You know, I could, I could wear them out to dinner.
- With a sports jacket?
- No.
It's OK.
Don't get up.
I got it. [groans]
- OK.
- It's only your child.
Look, I feel like I can give you a list of things that are sucky about being pregnant.
For starters,
I'm now horny as I've ever been and my husband is repulsed by me.
Listen, if you really need it that badly, I will suck it up and shut my eyes so tight and then do you.
- Thank you for the sacrifice.
- It's because I love you.
My point is, even with all the crap, I'm sure it's worth it.
I've seen how happy having Jack has made you two.
And yeah, I know it's been hard, but I know that neither one of you regret any of it.
[Rattling]
What the hell is this thing?
That's Jack's mobile.
Actually, it's his third mobile.
The first two were embedded in the dry-wall.
They can be quite frustrating to assemble.
Do you remember when he was teething?
He'd stare up at that thing for hours.
Yep.
Why's your TV smell like do-do?
So, what do you want to do tonight?
Just hang here and look at the stars until we're comfortable enough to make out a little.
OK.
I'm cool with that.
[# Neil Diamond:
Delirious Love]
- Not yet.
- Let me know.
And like that, I felt like all was right with the couples in the world.
[Hissing]
OK, now.
And right then, I knew this was the start of something important.
[Knocking on door]
Two and a half weeks is too long to wait for a third date.
I'm pregnant.
What now?
[J.D.] It's springtime at Sacred Heart, and the whole hospital had that end-of-the-year smell.
Gloria, I need you to change the dressing on Mr. Kerns' wound.
And I need you to suck it.
Wow, Gloria.
Do you kiss your great-great-great-great-great grandkids with that mouth?
# Zoom-zoom-zoom #
Ted, that's funny.
Where's the chuckle?
The bank foreclosed on my house.
- Where's your mom?
- She's out in the car with the cats.
Dr. Kelso celebrated spring by wearing his golf shorts to flaunt his oddly youthful legs.
Take them in, people.
I shaved for you.
[All groan]
Tell your Daddy what you just did.
I made a poopy in the potty.
You know, son, as a doctor,
I spend a lot of my day dealing with other people's poop.
And I'm not going to lie to you, Jackie, it gets old.
Now that's, that's not to say
I haven't enjoyed waking up to a fresh brown trout in your Huggies.
Besides, you're gonna do the same thing for me some day real soon.
And yet, aside from actually seeing you being born and that time Wayne Gretzky said, "What's up" to me in line at the bank, you out of diapers is the best thing that's ever happened.
It truly is.
Now why don't you go into your room and play for a little while because we're going to celebrate grown-up style.
All right, get this over with.
I need a nap.
I've been exhausted all week.
- Yippee!
- No kissing.
Hands behind your back.
Let's go.
Yep, love was definitely in the air.
Hey, Kim.
How'd you like a night on the town with the hottest doctor in this place?
I'd rather just go out with you.
Oh!
# Zoom-zoom-zoom #
- You "zoom-zoom-zoom"?
- Of course.
- I invented the zoom-zoom-zoom.
- Oh.
Cool.
Liar!
So, Josh, you are suffering from a condition called phimosis.
It's basically a hardening of your foreskin.
As part of your treatment, I'm asking you to masturbate five times a week.
Help the poor kid out.
Wow, five times a week, huh?
For me that would be cutting back.
He said in front of his future girlfriend.
You know what?
I should probably mosey.
[Groans]
[Gasps]
Looking forward to our date.
See you around 6:00.
Wear something slutty.
# Zoom-zoom-zoom!
#
That's mine.
# I can't do this all on my own
# No, I know I'm no Superman
# I'm no Superman #
- Oh.
You like that?
- Wow, I felt it move.
- Todd, you're touching your crotch.
- I know.
And I'm loving it.
Hey, tubby.
J.D., come here.
I want you to feel something quick.
Ow!
Don't call me tubby.
Pregnant witch.
Hey.
There's Kim.
She and Elliot bonded over an ability to communicate at a speed of light.
[Talking at a very high speed]
You'd have to slow it down for humans to understand.
The shower's going to start at 4:00, there's going to be food and games.
You're such a good friend.
I got her a present, but since we're not close
I'm just going home to get ready for my date.
Oh.
Hey, you.
I'm psyched for tonight.
Best thing about a date with J.D., if you're having Chinese and want Mexican, you walk to the other side of the food court.
We are not going to the mall, Elliot.
I was making you dinner, then go to karaoke, but I'm not sure how to do both in the same night.
Unless, of course...
J.D. Not Floating Head Doctor.
Too late.
I'm already there.
Body could stay home and prepare the feast.
And as always...
Head would handle entertainment.
# Don't go breaking my heart
# I couldn't if I tried
# Oh, honey if I get restless
Stop hogging the mic!
Body, come!
[Bugle march music]
- [Crashing] - [Crowd] Oh!
[J.D.] Stupid body.
I gotta do everything myself.
[Grunting]
# Ooh-hoo, nobody knows it
Clap with me, clap with me!
# Nobody knows...
Head loves karaoke.
I'm up for anything.
I married my high school boyfriend, the only first date I went on was in tenth grade.
It began with me in the back of his Miata because his friend called shotgun and ended with us going to the arcade to, and I quote,
"Eat pizza and beat up nerds." And I married that guy.
Well, trust me, Kim.
I've beaten up many a nerds in my day, but tonight's about you having the best first date ever.
All right, slugger.
- Bye!
- You don't have anything planned.
You had to soil the food court thing.
It's veal piccata night at Sbarro's.
I'd help, but I'm planning a baby shower for Carla.
I am going to make this cafeteria look totally different.
# Baby, baby,
# Baby, oooh
# I want my baby back, baby back, baby back, baby back, baby back, baby back
- # I want my baby back, baby back - # Chili's
# Baby back ribs
- # I want my baby back ribs - # Barbecue sauce
- # I want my baby back, baby back - # Chili's...
Ted, what the hell?
It's the only song we know with "baby."
I want my money back.
- What money?
- What?
I lost my house.
Give me a break.
Fun, right?
No one is mingling.
Why are the morgue guys so damn cliquey?
I want yellow.
I wish I had cool morgue friends.
Hey guys!
- [Carla] Ooooh!
- [Turk] Oh.
Laverne, I didn't know you knit.
I sure do.
Mr. Roberts doesn't have one pair of store-bought socks.
I'm gonna knit you a muzzle.
Those are all from us.
[Jordan] It's just Jack's old baby crap.
We're really excited to get rid of all that stuff and watch you guys suffer through the hellish relationship-ruining nightmare that is the baby phase.
- Open something.
- Go ahead.
- Those are my workout pants.
- Uh-huh.
She's been trying to get rid of those, but I'll be honest with you,
I love them cause they're so comfortable and you can get them on real quick.
You ain't lying.
Baby, check it out.
Wonderful.
Thank you.
Why can't we just talk to people?
This is the baby games station.
Once we start, people will join us.
OK, guess what flavor baby food this is?
- Cab driver feet?
- No, Keith, it's turnips!
You got it wrong, finish the whole jar!
You guys, this is so much fun!
[Gagging]
Where the hell are all your intern friends?
Listen up, interns.
Notice the definition in the upper calf.
Look at it, damn it!
See that?
Back in 'Nam, the choppers would hover eight feet above my head, I'd jump in.
You should've seen the look on Charlie's face.
Not the enemy, son, the pilot, Charlie Ross.
Great guy.
He didn't make it back.
- Where's the cake?
- Eight feet?
I don't believe it.
Believe that, missy.
I have to get ready.
I want my date with Kim to be perfect.
What do you think about a romantic horseback ride on the beach?
- Like we did for your birthday?
- Yeah.
- Except this time with two horses.
- Why not take her to your deck?
You guys can lie out and look at the stars.
Unfortunately, I can't.
My deck has become sort of a cruising spot for older gay gentlemen.
Get off my porch, you old queens.
[Disco music playing]
Who's is this?
Who's is this?
You find somewhere else to hang out!
I know for a fact Les Mis is in town!
I tried turning my hose on them, but they liked it.
If anything, good luck, buddy.
[Barbershop quartet] # Barbecue sauce
[J.D.] I didn't need luck, because this was going to be the most romantic first date ever.
Your steed, my lady.
J.D., I've never ridden a horse on a beach before.
[Kim chuckles]
And upsie-daisy.
Woo!
No saddles?
You going to be OK riding bareback?
No problemo.
What's so hard about riding bareback?
[# Nazareth:
Love Hurts]
Oh, that was amazing!
Wasn't that so much fun?
Oh yeah.
That was awesome.
Thank you.
Is this for when we buy the baby a dog?
No.
It's a baby cage.
It's a good one, too.
When I was a kid, mine didn't have these windows.
It's perfect.
If you go out for dinner, it's got a water bottle, so you throw some cedar chips in there so the baby can poop, you're made in the shade.
I'm kidding!
It's for when they buy the baby a, uh, puppy.
Oh!
[Laughter]
This one's from me and Keith.
He's here in the bathroom, throwing up summer squash.
Let's see here.
Oooh.
It's a preggy-teddy.
I got it at that new maternity lingerie store at the mall.
I had a conversation with the sweet, old lady who owns the place.
Not many pregnant women shop there.
It's mostly just fat whores.
- [All] Oh.
- I got to get me one of those.
Say, Bobbo.
You want to weigh in on pregnancy sex?
- It's a freak show.
- You've seen an ultrasound.
They have eyes, they have hands.
How do you think they're going to react to an intruder?
[Grunting]
The baby can't grab me down there.
- The baby can't grab me down there?
- No, baby.
I called an ambulance, but you should really let me examine you.
Oh, no, no.
The date continues.
I'm a urologist.
And there's a good chance you have testicular torsion.
In which case, you could lose a testicle.
Come on.
Off with the pants.
Looks like my plan is working.
Detruser function is normal.
One is significantly larger than the other.
Actually, that's a pre-existing condition.
- So the right one's always been bigger?
- Yes.
Wait.
- Your right or stage right?
- Let me test the retraction.
Retracted.
OK, the date's not going exactly as planned, but you can still save it with your legendary gift for small-talk.
So, you're from Texas, huh?
They say that's the Lone Star State.
What exactly does that mean?
My boobs are so big right now.
I think Dr. Fishman threw in something a little extra when he did my chin.
Would you, would you like to see something really, just, beautiful?
There goes all of Jackie-boy's baby stuff.
No, Mom, playpenlbaby cage is not like tomatoltomahto.
I hope you're not beating yourself up about this.
Sorry, I wanted to do something fun for our first date.
No.
It was so much more fun then, then you think.
I mean, the first seven or eight minutes rocked.
Admittedly, it was more like work after that.
But at least I got to third base with you.
And there it was.
The moment where pity was turning into genuine affection.
Classic Dorian.
I feel like we kind of missed first base.
Me, too.
- Well, maybe we should fix that.
- We should.
And then it happened.
[Dramatic music]
- [Man] Elliot Reid.
Moment Killer.
- [Machine gun sound]
What's up, guys?
Tell me every detail about the date.
- We went horseback riding on the beach.
- Yes.
I've been on that date.
- Really?
- What?
I had a coupon.
I wasn't the only one to have an uninvited guest.
[Groans] You know what sucks?
I didn't even eat any of that crappy shower food and I still feel nauseous.
In fact, I've been nauseous for, like, two weeks.
[Gasping]
I've been exhausted all week.
My boobs are so big right now.
Yep, I'm pregnant.
I pooped in my bed so I put it on the TV.
Forgive me, but since I had a vasectomy last year, nay, two vasectomies, I feel, I feel I just have to ask.
- Did you cheat on me?
- No.
- And you know me.
I always tell.
- Oh, that's true.
That's pretty much why we work well together.
Are you responsible for this?
What are you talking about?
I'm selling my old mop.
The 2007 s are in.
Sorry.
All right, Kim's right there.
We spent all morning crafting a line so raw with confidence, that if you pull it off,
- you're back in the game.
- I'm afraid, Mocha Bear.
I know.
Buck up!
- Hey, Kim.
- Oh, hey, J.D. How're you feeling?
Well, uh the swelling's gone down for now.
You're an idiot.
Go out with me again tonight.
Oh, J.D., I'd love to, but I'm going to a Neil Diamond concert.
With who?
[Dramatic music]
- [Man] Elliot Reid.
Moment Killer.
- [Machine gun sound]
- What's up?
Are you psyched?
- Hey.
- I'm so psyched.
- Me too.
[Imitates Neil Diamond] # Everywhere around the world
# They're coming to America
Could I, uh, could I have everybody's attention, please.
Jordan's pregnant.
You get over here, you!
- Not a hug moment, sweetie.
- Right.
Yes.
[Talking in high-pitched voice] No.
But Dr. Cox, here I thought you and Jordan were done trying to have any more babies.
We were, but my vasectomy didn't take which, apparently, is not that uncommon.
[High-pitched voice] Holy crap, Dr. Cox.
That must have really pissed you off.
[Regular voice] Yes, it did.
What is, what is your name?
[High-pitched voice] Oh, I'm any generic hospital worker who happens to ask you a question about your pregnancy andlor any baby-related issues.
[Regular voice] Isn't that nice?
This morality play was made possible by a grant from the Just See If I Was Kidding Foundation.
[Chuckling]
- Do you want to do it, or should I?
- Let's just do it together.
[Mimicking baby scream]
[Turk and Carla laughing]
That's from The Simpsons.
Ah, yes.
I'm having a heart attack.
Did you guys hear what Jordan and Dr. Cox and did to the doctor who botched his vasectomy?
Go Ted.
# I want my baby back, baby back, baby back, baby back, baby back, baby back
# I want my baby back, baby back, baby back, baby back, baby back, baby back
# I want my baby back, baby back, baby back, baby back
- Dear God, when do they say "ribs?" - [Cox] Never.
They never say "ribs."
# I want my baby back, baby back, baby back, baby back, baby back, baby back
# I want my baby back, baby back, baby back, baby back...
I heard ten minutes into it, he started eating his face.
He did.
You know what J.D.'s got planned since it's his day off and he's dateless?
[Engines revving]
This is my first scooter rally.
Do you want to be Ponch or Jon?
I can imagine what Jordan and Dr. Cox are feeling right now.
Do you really think we can handle this?
I don't know.
[Elliot] I can totally picture J.D., too.
[Cell phone ringing]
Oh, hey, Mom.
No, I'm just hanging out alone tonight.
I didn't have anything else to do.
[Knocking on door]
We want to give you your stuff back.
We don't feel like dealing with that right now.
- How about now?
- Oh.
Come on in.
Ugh.
I hate cleaning up after those messy old queens.
Ooh, appletini?
When did they start drinking straight guy drinks?
Mmm.
It's fresh.
[Kim] What's up, chicken butt?
Hey, Kim.
What happened to Neil Diamond?
I haven't seen Keith in a while, I'm gonna take him.
Kim's letting me off the hook.
Thank you.
You're welcome.
- What's up?
- Nothing.
It seems like good friends always come through for you
- You like?
- Oh, well.
You know, I could, I could wear them out to dinner.
- With a sports jacket?
- No.
It's OK.
Don't get up.
I got it. [groans]
- OK.
- It's only your child.
Look, I feel like I can give you a list of things that are sucky about being pregnant.
For starters,
I'm now horny as I've ever been and my husband is repulsed by me.
Listen, if you really need it that badly, I will suck it up and shut my eyes so tight and then do you.
- Thank you for the sacrifice.
- It's because I love you.
My point is, even with all the crap, I'm sure it's worth it.
I've seen how happy having Jack has made you two.
And yeah, I know it's been hard, but I know that neither one of you regret any of it.
[Rattling]
What the hell is this thing?
That's Jack's mobile.
Actually, it's his third mobile.
The first two were embedded in the dry-wall.
They can be quite frustrating to assemble.
Do you remember when he was teething?
He'd stare up at that thing for hours.
Yep.
Why's your TV smell like do-do?
So, what do you want to do tonight?
Just hang here and look at the stars until we're comfortable enough to make out a little.
OK.
I'm cool with that.
[# Neil Diamond:
Delirious Love]
- Not yet.
- Let me know.
And like that, I felt like all was right with the couples in the world.
[Hissing]
OK, now.
And right then, I knew this was the start of something important.
[Knocking on door]
Two and a half weeks is too long to wait for a third date.
I'm pregnant.
What now?
It's springtime at Sacred Heart, and the whole hospital had that endoftheyear smell.
Gloria, I need you to change the dressing on Mr. Kerns' wound.
And I need you to suck it.
Wow, Gloria.
Do you kiss your greatgreatgreatgreatgreat grandkids with that mouth?
# Zoomzoomzoom #
Ted, that's funny.
Where's the chuckle?
The bank foreclosed on my house.
Where's your mom?
She's out in the car with the cats.
Dr. Kelso celebrated spring by wearing his golf shorts to flaunt his oddly youthful legs.
Take them in, people.
I shaved for you.
Tell your Daddy what you just did.
I made a poopy in the potty.
You know, son, as a doctor,
I spend a lot of my day dealing with other people's poop.
And I'm not going to lie to you, Jackie, it gets old.
Now that's, that's not to say
I haven't enjoyed waking up to a fresh brown trout in your Huggies.
Besides, you're gonna do the same thing for me some day real soon.
And yet, aside from actually seeing you being born and that time Wayne Gretzky said, "What's up" to me in line at the bank, you out of diapers is the best thing that's ever happened.
It truly is.
Now why don't you go into your room and play for a little while because we're going to celebrate grownup style.
All right, get this over with.
I need a nap.
I've been exhausted all week.
Yippee!
No kissing.
Hands behind your back.
Let's go.
Yep, love was definitely in the air.
Hey, Kim.
How'd you like a night on the town with the hottest doctor in this place?
I'd rather just go out with you.
Oh!
# Zoomzoomzoom #
You "zoomzoomzoom"?
Of course.
I invented the zoomzoomzoom.
Oh.
Cool.
Liar!
So, Josh, you are suffering from a condition called phimosis.
It's basically a hardening of your foreskin.
As part of your treatment, I'm asking you to masturbate five times a week.
Help the poor kid out.
Wow, five times a week, huh?
For me that would be cutting back.
He said in front of his future girlfriend.
You know what?
I should probably mosey.
Looking forward to our date.
See you around 6:00.
Wear something slutty.
# Zoomzoomzoom!
#
That's mine.
# I can't do this all on my own
# No, I know I'm no Superman
# I'm no Superman #
Oh.
You like that?
Wow, I felt it move.
Todd, you're touching your crotch.
I know.
And I'm loving it.
Hey, tubby.
J.D., come here.
I want you to feel something quick.
Ow!
Don't call me tubby.
Pregnant witch.
Hey.
There's Kim.
She and Elliot bonded over an ability to communicate at a speed of light.
You'd have to slow it down for humans to understand.
The shower's going to start at 4:00, there's going to be food and games.
You're such a good friend.
I got her a present, but since we're not close
I'm just going home to get ready for my date.
Oh.
Hey, you.
I'm psyched for tonight.
Best thing about a date with J.D., if you're having Chinese and want Mexican, you walk to the other side of the food court.
We are not going to the mall, Elliot.
I was making you dinner, then go to karaoke, but I'm not sure how to do both in the same night.
Unless, of course...
J.D. Not Floating Head Doctor.
Too late.
I'm already there.
Body could stay home and prepare the feast.
And as always...
Head would handle entertainment.
# Don't go breaking my heart
# I couldn't if I tried
# Oh, honey if I get restless
Stop hogging the mic!
Body, come! Oh!
Stupid body.
I gotta do everything myself. # Oohhoo, nobody knows it
Clap with me, clap with me!
# Nobody knows...
Head loves karaoke.
I'm up for anything.
I married my high school boyfriend, the only first date I went on was in tenth grade.
It began with me in the back of his Miata because his friend called shotgun and ended with us going to the arcade to, and I quote,
"Eat pizza and beat up nerds." And I married that guy.
Well, trust me, Kim.
I've beaten up many a nerds in my day, but tonight's about you having the best first date ever.
All right, slugger.
Bye!
You don't have anything planned.
You had to soil the food court thing.
It's veal piccata night at Sbarro's.
I'd help, but I'm planning a baby shower for Carla.
I am going to make this cafeteria look totally different.
# Baby, baby,
# Baby, oooh
# I want my baby back, baby back, baby back, baby back, baby back, baby back
# I want my baby back, baby back # Chili's
# Baby back ribs
# I want my baby back ribs # Barbecue sauce
# I want my baby back, baby back # Chili's...
Ted, what the hell?
It's the only song we know with "baby."
I want my money back.
What money?
What?
I lost my house.
Give me a break.
Fun, right?
No one is mingling.
Why are the morgue guys so damn cliquey?
I want yellow.
I wish I had cool morgue friends.
Hey guys!
Ooooh!
Oh.
Laverne, I didn't know you knit.
I sure do.
Mr. Roberts doesn't have one pair of storebought socks.
I'm gonna knit you a muzzle.
Those are all from us.
It's just Jack's old baby crap.
We're really excited to get rid of all that stuff and watch you guys suffer through the hellish relationshipruining nightmare that is the baby phase.
Open something.
Go ahead.
Those are my workout pants.
Uhhuh.
She's been trying to get rid of those, but I'll be honest with you,
I love them cause they're so comfortable and you can get them on real quick.
You ain't lying.
Baby, check it out.
Wonderful.
Thank you.
Why can't we just talk to people?
This is the baby games station.
Once we start, people will join us.
OK, guess what flavor baby food this is?
Cab driver feet?
No, Keith, it's turnips!
You got it wrong, finish the whole jar!
You guys, this is so much fun! Where the hell are all your intern friends?
Listen up, interns.
Notice the definition in the upper calf.
Look at it, damn it!
See that?
Back in 'Nam, the choppers would hover eight feet above my head, I'd jump in.
You should've seen the look on Charlie's face.
Not the enemy, son, the pilot, Charlie Ross.
Great guy.
He didn't make it back.
Where's the cake?
Eight feet?
I don't believe it.
Believe that, missy.
I have to get ready.
I want my date with Kim to be perfect.
What do you think about a romantic horseback ride on the beach?
Like we did for your birthday?
Yeah.
Except this time with two horses.
Why not take her to your deck?
You guys can lie out and look at the stars.
Unfortunately, I can't.
My deck has become sort of a cruising spot for older gay gentlemen.
Get off my porch, you old queens.
Who's is this?
Who's is this?
You find somewhere else to hang out!
I know for a fact Les Mis is in town!
I tried turning my hose on them, but they liked it.
If anything, good luck, buddy.
# Barbecue sauce
I didn't need luck, because this was going to be the most romantic first date ever.
Your steed, my lady.
J.D., I've never ridden a horse on a beach before.
And upsiedaisy.
Woo!
No saddles?
You going to be OK riding bareback?
No problemo.
What's so hard about riding bareback? Oh, that was amazing!
Wasn't that so much fun?
Oh yeah.
That was awesome.
Thank you.
Is this for when we buy the baby a dog?
No.
It's a baby cage.
It's a good one, too.
When I was a kid, mine didn't have these windows.
It's perfect.
If you go out for dinner, it's got a water bottle, so you throw some cedar chips in there so the baby can poop, you're made in the shade.
I'm kidding!
It's for when they buy the baby a, uh, puppy.
Oh! This one's from me and Keith.
He's here in the bathroom, throwing up summer squash.
Let's see here.
Oooh.
It's a preggyteddy.
I got it at that new maternity lingerie store at the mall.
I had a conversation with the sweet, old lady who owns the place.
Not many pregnant women shop there.
It's mostly just fat whores.
Oh.
I got to get me one of those.
Say, Bobbo.
You want to weigh in on pregnancy sex?
It's a freak show.
You've seen an ultrasound.
They have eyes, they have hands.
How do you think they're going to react to an intruder? The baby can't grab me down there.
The baby can't grab me down there?
No, baby.
I called an ambulance, but you should really let me examine you.
Oh, no, no.
The date continues.
I'm a urologist.
And there's a good chance you have testicular torsion.
In which case, you could lose a testicle.
Come on.
Off with the pants.
Looks like my plan is working.
Detruser function is normal.
One is significantly larger than the other.
Actually, that's a preexisting condition.
So the right one's always been bigger?
Yes.
Wait.
Your right or stage right?
Let me test the retraction.
Retracted.
OK, the date's not going exactly as planned, but you can still save it with your legendary gift for smalltalk.
So, you're from Texas, huh?
They say that's the Lone Star State.
What exactly does that mean?
My boobs are so big right now.
I think Dr. Fishman threw in something a little extra when he did my chin.
Would you, would you like to see something really, just, beautiful?
There goes all of Jackieboy's baby stuff.
No, Mom, playpenlbaby cage is not like tomatoltomahto.
I hope you're not beating yourself up about this.
Sorry, I wanted to do something fun for our first date.
No.
It was so much more fun then, then you think.
I mean, the first seven or eight minutes rocked.
Admittedly, it was more like work after that.
But at least I got to third base with you.
And there it was.
The moment where pity was turning into genuine affection.
Classic Dorian.
I feel like we kind of missed first base.
Me, too.
Well, maybe we should fix that.
We should.
And then it happened.
Elliot Reid.
Moment Killer.
What's up, guys?
Tell me every detail about the date.
We went horseback riding on the beach.
Yes.
I've been on that date.
Really?
What?
I had a coupon.
I wasn't the only one to have an uninvited guest.
You know what sucks?
I didn't even eat any of that crappy shower food and I still feel nauseous.
In fact, I've been nauseous for, like, two weeks.
I've been exhausted all week.
My boobs are so big right now.
Yep, I'm pregnant.
I pooped in my bed so I put it on the TV.
Forgive me, but since I had a vasectomy last year, nay, two vasectomies, I feel, I feel I just have to ask.
Did you cheat on me?
No.
And you know me.
I always tell.
Oh, that's true.
That's pretty much why we work well together.
Are you responsible for this?
What are you talking about?
I'm selling my old mop.
The 2007 s are in.
Sorry.
All right, Kim's right there.
We spent all morning crafting a line so raw with confidence, that if you pull it off, you're back in the game.
I'm afraid, Mocha Bear.
I know.
Buck up!
Hey, Kim.
Oh, hey, J.D. How're you feeling?
Well, uh the swelling's gone down for now.
You're an idiot.
Go out with me again tonight.
Oh, J.D., I'd love to, but I'm going to a Neil Diamond concert.
With who? Elliot Reid.
Moment Killer.
What's up?
Are you psyched?
Hey.
I'm so psyched.
Me too.
# Everywhere around the world
# They're coming to America
Could I, uh, could I have everybody's attention, please.
Jordan's pregnant.
You get over here, you!
Not a hug moment, sweetie.
Right.
Yes.
No.
But Dr. Cox, here I thought you and Jordan were done trying to have any more babies.
We were, but my vasectomy didn't take which, apparently, is not that uncommon.
Holy crap, Dr. Cox.
That must have really pissed you off.
Yes, it did.
What is, what is your name?
Oh, I'm any generic hospital worker who happens to ask you a question about your pregnancy andlor any babyrelated issues.
Isn't that nice?
This morality play was made possible by a grant from the Just See If I Was Kidding Foundation.
Do you want to do it, or should I?
Let's just do it together.
That's from The Simpsons.
Ah, yes.
I'm having a heart attack.
Did you guys hear what Jordan and Dr. Cox and did to the doctor who botched his vasectomy?
Go Ted.
# I want my baby back, baby back, baby back, baby back, baby back, baby back
# I want my baby back, baby back, baby back, baby back, baby back, baby back
# I want my baby back, baby back, baby back, baby back
Dear God, when do they say "ribs?" Never.
They never say "ribs."
# I want my baby back, baby back, baby back, baby back, baby back, baby back
# I want my baby back, baby back, baby back, baby back...
I heard ten minutes into it, he started eating his face.
He did.
You know what J.D.'s got planned since it's his day off and he's dateless? This is my first scooter rally.
Do you want to be Ponch or Jon?
I can imagine what Jordan and Dr. Cox are feeling right now.
Do you really think we can handle this?
I don't know.
I can totally picture J.D., too.
Oh, hey, Mom.
No, I'm just hanging out alone tonight.
I didn't have anything else to do.
We want to give you your stuff back.
We don't feel like dealing with that right now.
How about now?
Oh.
Come on in.
Ugh.
I hate cleaning up after those messy old queens.
Ooh, appletini?
When did they start drinking straight guy drinks?
Mmm.
It's fresh.
What's up, chicken butt?
Hey, Kim.
What happened to Neil Diamond?
I haven't seen Keith in a while, I'm gonna take him.
Kim's letting me off the hook.
Thank you.
You're welcome.
What's up?
Nothing.
It seems like good friends always come through for you
You like?
Oh, well.
You know, I could, I could wear them out to dinner.
With a sports jacket?
No.
It's OK.
Don't get up.
I got it.
OK.
It's only your child.
Look, I feel like I can give you a list of things that are sucky about being pregnant.
For starters,
I'm now horny as I've ever been and my husband is repulsed by me.
Listen, if you really need it that badly, I will suck it up and shut my eyes so tight and then do you.
Thank you for the sacrifice.
It's because I love you.
My point is, even with all the crap, I'm sure it's worth it.
I've seen how happy having Jack has made you two.
And yeah, I know it's been hard, but I know that neither one of you regret any of it.
What the hell is this thing?
That's Jack's mobile.
Actually, it's his third mobile.
The first two were embedded in the drywall.
They can be quite frustrating to assemble.
Do you remember when he was teething?
He'd stare up at that thing for hours.
Yep.
Why's your TV smell like dodo?
So, what do you want to do tonight?
Just hang here and look at the stars until we're comfortable enough to make out a little.
OK.
I'm cool with that.
Not yet.
Let me know.
And like that, I felt like all was right with the couples in the world. OK, now.
And right then, I knew this was the start of something important.
Two and a half weeks is too long to wait for a third date.
I'm pregnant.
What now?
It's springtime at Sacred Heart, and the whole hospital had that endoftheyear smell.
Gloria, I need you to change the dressing on Mr. Kerns' wound.
And I need you to suck it.
Wow, Gloria.
Do you kiss your greatgreatgreatgreatgreat grandkids with that mouth?
* Zoomzoomzoom *
Ted, that's funny.
Where's the chuckle?
The bank foreclosed on my house.
Where's your mom?
She's out in the car with the cats.
Dr. Kelso celebrated spring by wearing his golf shorts to flaunt his oddly youthful legs.
Take them in, people.
I shaved for you.
Tell your Daddy what you just did.
I made a poopy in the potty.
You know, son, as a doctor,
I spend a lot of my day dealing with other people's poop.
And I'm not going to lie to you, Jackie, it gets old.
Now that's, that's not to say
I haven't enjoyed waking up to a fresh brown trout in your Huggies.
Besides, you're gonna do the same thing for me some day real soon.
And yet, aside from actually seeing you being born and that time Wayne Gretzky said, "What's up" to me in line at the bank, you out of diapers is the best thing that's ever happened.
It truly is.
Now why don't you go into your room and play for a little while because we're going to celebrate grownup style.
All right, get this over with.
I need a nap.
I've been exhausted all week.
Yippee!
No kissing.
Hands behind your back.
Let's go.
Yep, love was definitely in the air.
Hey, Kim.
How'd you like a night on the town with the hottest doctor in this place?
I'd rather just go out with you.
Oh!
* Zoomzoomzoom *
You "zoomzoomzoom"?
Of course.
I invented the zoomzoomzoom.
Oh.
Cool.
Liar!
So, Josh, you are suffering from a condition called phimosis.
It's basically a hardening of your foreskin.
As part of your treatment, I'm asking you to masturbate five times a week.
Help the poor kid out.
Wow, five times a week, huh?
For me that would be cutting back.
He said in front of his future girlfriend.
You know what?
I should probably mosey.
Looking forward to our date.
See you around 6:00.
Wear something slutty.
* Zoomzoomzoom!
*
That's mine.
Oh.
You like that?
Wow, I felt it move.
Todd, you're touching your crotch.
I know.
And I'm loving it.
Hey, tubby.
J.D., come here.
I want you to feel something quick.
Ow!
Don't call me tubby.
Pregnant witch.
Hey.
There's Kim.
She and Elliot bonded over an ability to communicate at a speed of light.
You'd have to slow it down for humans to understand.
The shower's going to start at 4:00, there's going to be food and games.
You're such a good friend.
I got her a present, but since we're not close
I'm just going home to get ready for my date.
Oh.
Hey, you.
I'm psyched for tonight.
Best thing about a date with J.D., if you're having Chinese and want Mexican, you walk to the other side of the food court.
We are not going to the mall, Elliot.
I was making you dinner, then go to karaoke, but I'm not sure how to do both in the same night.
Unless, of course...
J.D. Not Floating Head Doctor.
Too late.
I'm already there.
Body could stay home and prepare the feast.
And as always...
Head would handle entertainment.
* Don't go breaking my heart
* I couldn't if I tried
* Oh, honey if I get restless
Stop hogging the mic!
Body, come!
Stupid body.
I gotta do everything myself.
* Oohhoo, nobody knows it
Clap with me, clap with me!
* Nobody knows...
Head loves karaoke.
I'm up for anything.
I married my high school boyfriend, the only first date I went on was in tenth grade.
It began with me in the back of his Miata because his friend called shotgun and ended with us going to the arcade to, and I quote,
"Eat pizza and beat up nerds." And I married that guy.
Well, trust me, Kim.
I've beaten up many a nerds in my day, but tonight's about you having the best first date ever.
All right, slugger.
Bye!
You don't have anything planned.
You had to soil the food court thing.
It's veal piccata night at Sbarro's.
I'd help, but I'm planning a baby shower for Carla.
I am going to make this cafeteria look totally different.
* Baby, baby,
* Baby, oooh
* I want my baby back, baby back, baby back, baby back, baby back, baby back
* I want my baby back, baby back * Chili's
* Baby back ribs
* I want my baby back ribs * Barbecue sauce
* I want my baby back, baby back * Chili's...
Ted, what the hell?
It's the only song we know with "baby."
I want my money back.
What money?
What?
I lost my house.
Give me a break.
Fun, right?
No one is mingling.
Why are the morgue guys so damn cliquey?
I want yellow.
I wish I had cool morgue friends.
Hey guys!
Ooooh!
Oh.
Laverne, I didn't know you knit.
I sure do.
Mr. Roberts doesn't have one pair of storebought socks.
I'm gonna knit you a muzzle.
Those are all from us.
It's just Jack's old baby crap.
We're really excited to get rid of all that stuff and watch you guys suffer through the hellish relationshipruining nightmare that is the baby phase.
Open something.
Go ahead.
Those are my workout pants.
Uhhuh.
She's been trying to get rid of those, but I'll be honest with you,
I love them cause they're so comfortable and you can get them on real quick.
You ain't lying.
Baby, check it out.
Wonderful.
Thank you.
Why can't we just talk to people?
This is the baby games station.
Once we start, people will join us.
OK, guess what flavor baby food this is?
Cab driver feet?
No, Keith, it's turnips!
You got it wrong, finish the whole jar!
You guys, this is so much fun!
Where the hell are all your intern friends?
Listen up, interns.
Notice the definition in the upper calf.
Look at it, damn it!
See that?
Back in 'Nam, the choppers would hover eight feet above my head, I'd jump in.
You should've seen the look on Charlie's face.
Not the enemy, son, the pilot, Charlie Ross.
Great guy.
He didn't make it back.
Where's the cake?
Eight feet?
I don't believe it.
Believe that, missy.
I have to get ready.
I want my date with Kim to be perfect.
What do you think about a romantic horseback ride on the beach?
Like we did for your birthday?
Yeah.
Except this time with two horses.
Why not take her to your deck?
You guys can lie out and look at the stars.
Unfortunately, I can't.
My deck has become sort of a cruising spot for older gay gentlemen.
Get off my porch, you old queens.
Who's is this?
Who's is this?
You find somewhere else to hang out!
I know for a fact Les Mis is in town!
I tried turning my hose on them, but they liked it.
If anything, good luck, buddy.
I didn't need luck, because this was going to be the most romantic first date ever.
Your steed, my lady.
J.D., I've never ridden a horse on a beach before.
And upsiedaisy.
Woo!
No saddles?
You going to be OK riding bareback?
No problemo.
What's so hard about riding bareback?
Oh, that was amazing!
Wasn't that so much fun?
Oh yeah.
That was awesome.
Thank you.
Is this for when we buy the baby a dog?
No.
It's a baby cage.
It's a good one, too.
When I was a kid, mine didn't have these windows.
It's perfect.
If you go out for dinner, it's got a water bottle, so you throw some cedar chips in there so the baby can poop, you're made in the shade.
I'm kidding!
It's for when they buy the baby a, uh, puppy.
Oh!
This one's from me and Keith.
He's here in the bathroom, throwing up summer squash.
Let's see here.
Oooh.
It's a preggyteddy.
I got it at that new maternity lingerie store at the mall.
I had a conversation with the sweet, old lady who owns the place.
Not many pregnant women shop there.
It's mostly just fat whores.
Oh.
I got to get me one of those.
Say, Bobbo.
You want to weigh in on pregnancy sex?
It's a freak show.
You've seen an ultrasound.
They have eyes, they have hands.
How do you think they're going to react to an intruder?
The baby can't grab me down there.
The baby can't grab me down there?
No, baby.
I called an ambulance, but you should really let me examine you.
Oh, no, no.
The date continues.
I'm a urologist.
And there's a good chance you have testicular torsion.
In which case, you could lose a testicle.
Come on.
Off with the pants.
Looks like my plan is working.
Detruser function is normal.
One is significantly larger than the other.
Actually, that's a preexisting condition.
So the right one's always been bigger?
Yes.
Wait.
Your right or stage right?
Let me test the retraction.
Retracted.
OK, the date's not going exactly as planned, but you can still save it with your legendary gift for smalltalk.
So, you're from Texas, huh?
They say that's the Lone Star State.
What exactly does that mean?
My boobs are so big right now.
I think Dr. Fishman threw in something a little extra when he did my chin.
Would you, would you like to see something really, just, beautiful?
There goes all of Jackieboy's baby stuff.
No, Mom, playpenlbaby cage is not like tomatoltomahto.
I hope you're not beating yourself up about this.
Sorry, I wanted to do something fun for our first date.
No.
It was so much more fun then, then you think.
I mean, the first seven or eight minutes rocked.
Admittedly, it was more like work after that.
But at least I got to third base with you.
And there it was.
The moment where pity was turning into genuine affection.
Classic Dorian.
I feel like we kind of missed first base.
Me, too.
Well, maybe we should fix that.
We should.
And then it happened.
Elliot Reid.
Moment Killer.
What's up, guys?
Tell me every detail about the date.
We went horseback riding on the beach.
Yes.
I've been on that date.
Really?
What?
I had a coupon.
I wasn't the only one to have an uninvited guest.
You know what sucks?
I didn't even eat any of that crappy shower food and I still feel nauseous.
In fact, I've been nauseous for, like, two weeks.
I've been exhausted all week.
My boobs are so big right now.
Yep, I'm pregnant.
I pooped in my bed so I put it on the TV.
Forgive me, but since I had a vasectomy last year, nay, two vasectomies, I feel, I feel I just have to ask.
Did you cheat on me?
No.
And you know me.
I always tell.
Oh, that's true.
That's pretty much why we work well together.
Are you responsible for this?
What are you talking about?
I'm selling my old mop.
The 2007 s are in.
Sorry.
All right, Kim's right there.
We spent all morning crafting a line so raw with confidence, that if you pull it off, you're back in the game.
I'm afraid, Mocha Bear.
I know.
Buck up!
Hey, Kim.
Oh, hey, J.D. How're you feeling?
Well, uh the swelling's gone down for now.
You're an idiot.
Go out with me again tonight.
Oh, J.D., I'd love to, but I'm going to a Neil Diamond concert.
With who?
Elliot Reid.
Moment Killer.
What's up?
Are you psyched?
Hey.
I'm so psyched.
Me too.
* They're coming to America
Could I, uh, could I have everybody's attention, please.
Jordan's pregnant.
You get over here, you!
Not a hug moment, sweetie.
Right.
Yes.
here I thought you and Jordan were done trying to have any more babies.
We were, but my vasectomy didn't take which, apparently, is not that uncommon.
Holy crap, Dr. Cox.
That must have really pissed you off.
Yes, it did.
What is, what is your name?
who happens to ask you a question about your pregnancy andlor any babyrelated issues.
Isn't that nice?
This morality play was made possible by a grant from the Just See If I Was Kidding Foundation.
Do you want to do it, or should I?
Let's just do it together.
That's from The Simpsons.
Ah, yes.
I'm having a heart attack.
Did you guys hear what Jordan and Dr. Cox and did to the doctor who botched his vasectomy?
Go Ted.
* I want my baby back, baby back, baby back, baby back, baby back, baby back
* I want my baby back, baby back, baby back, baby back, baby back, baby back
* I want my baby back, baby back, baby back, baby back
Dear God, when do they say "ribs?" Never.
They never say "ribs."
* I want my baby back, baby back, baby back, baby back, baby back, baby back
* I want my baby back, baby back, baby back, baby back...
I heard ten minutes into it, he started eating his face.
He did.
You know what J.D.'s got planned since it's his day off and he's dateless?
This is my first scooter rally.
Do you want to be Ponch or Jon?
I can imagine what Jordan and Dr. Cox are feeling right now.
Do you really think we can handle this?
I don't know.
I can totally picture J.D., too.
Oh, hey, Mom.
No, I'm just hanging out alone tonight.
I didn't have anything else to do.
We want to give you your stuff back.
We don't feel like dealing with that right now.
How about now?
Oh.
Come on in.
Ugh.
I hate cleaning up after those messy old queens.
Ooh, appletini?
When did they start drinking straight guy drinks?
Mmm.
It's fresh.
What's up, chicken butt?
Hey, Kim.
What happened to Neil Diamond?
I haven't seen Keith in a while, I'm gonna take him.
Kim's letting me off the hook.
Thank you.
You're welcome.
What's up?
Nothing.
It seems like good friends always come through for you
You like?
Oh, well.
You know, I could, I could wear them out to dinner.
With a sports jacket?
No.
It's OK.
Don't get up.
I got it.
OK.
It's only your child.
Look, I feel like I can give you a list of things that are sucky about being pregnant.
For starters,
I'm now horny as I've ever been and my husband is repulsed by me.
Listen, if you really need it that badly, I will suck it up and shut my eyes so tight and then do you.
Thank you for the sacrifice.
It's because I love you.
My point is, even with all the crap, I'm sure it's worth it.
I've seen how happy having Jack has made you two.
And yeah, I know it's been hard, but I know that neither one of you regret any of it.
What the hell is this thing?
That's Jack's mobile.
Actually, it's his third mobile.
The first two were embedded in the drywall.
They can be quite frustrating to assemble.
Do you remember when he was teething?
He'd stare up at that thing for hours.
Yep.
Why's your TV smell like dodo?
So, what do you want to do tonight?
Just hang here and look at the stars until we're comfortable enough to make out a little.
OK.
I'm cool with that.
Not yet.
Let me know.
And like that, I felt like all was right with the couples in the world.
OK, now.
And right then, I knew this was the start of something important.
Two and a half weeks is too long to wait for a third date.
I'm pregnant.
What now?
The more you begin to investigate, what we think we understand, where we came from, what we think we're doing,
the more you begin to see we've been lied to.
We've been lied to by every institution.
What makes you think for one minute that the religious institution is the only one that has never been touched.
The religious institutions of this world are at the bottom of the dirt.
The religious institutions in this world are put there by the same people who gave you your government, your corrupt education, who set up your international banking cartels.
Because our masters don't give a damn about you or your family.
All they care about is what they have always cared about and that's controlling the whole damn world.
We have been misled away from the true and divine presence in the universe that men have called 'God'.
I don't know what God is but I know what he isn't.
And unless and until you are prepared to look at the whole truth wherever it may go, whoever it may lead to, if you want to look the other way, or if you want to play favourites then somewhere along the line you're gonna find out
you're messing with the divine justice.
The more you educate yourself, the more you understand where things come from - the more obvious things become and you begin to see lies everywhere.
You have to know the truth and seek the truth and the truth will set you free.
...'Cause I gotta tell you the truth folks, I gotta tell you the truth.
When it come to bullshit, big-time-major-league bullshit, you have to stand in awe of the all time champion of false promises and exaggerated claims... religion.
Think about it!
Religion has actually convinced people that there's an invisible man, living in the sky who watches everything you do, every minute of every day.
And the invisible man has a special list of ten things he does not want you to do.
And if you do any of these ten things, he has a special place full of fire and smoke and burning and torture and anguish where he will send you to live and suffer and burn and choke and scream and cry
for ever and ever till the end of time.
But he loves you!
He loves you.
He loves you and he needs money.
He always needs money!
He's all powerful, all perfect, all knowing and all wise.
Somehow - just can't handle money!
Religion takes in billions of dollars, they pay no taxes, and they always need a little more.
Now, you talk about a good bullshit story!
Holy shit!
This is the Sun.
As far back as 10.000 BC history is abundant with carvings and writings reflecting people's respect and adoration for this object
And it is simple to understand why as every morning the Sun would rise bringing vision, warmth and security saving man from the cold, blind, predator filled darkness of night.
Without it, the cultures understood, the crops would not grow, the life on the planet would not survive.
These realities make the Sun the most adored object of all time.
Likewise, they were also very aware of the stars.
The tracking of the stars allowed them to recognize and anticipate events which occurred of a long period's of time, such as eclipses and full moons.
They in turn catalogued celestial groups in what we know today as constellations.
This is the cross of the zodiac, one of the oldest conceptual images in human history.
It reflects the Sun as it figuratively passes through the 12 major constellations over the course of a year.
It also reflects the 12 months of the year, the four seasons, and the solstices and equinoxes.
The term zodiac relates to the fact that constellations were anthropomorphised or personified as figures or animals.
In other words, the early civilizations did not just follow the Sun and stars, they personified them with elaborate myths involving their movements and relationships.
The Sun, with its life giving and saving qualities, was personified as a representative of the unseen creator or God.
God's Sun.
The light of the world.
The saviour of human kind.
Likewise, the 12 constellations represented the places of travel for God's Sun.
And they were identified by names, usually representing elements of nature that happened during that period of time.
For example, Aquarius - the water bearer, who brings the spring rains.
This is Horus.
He is the Sun God of Egypt of around 3000 BC.
He is the Sun anthropomorphised in his life as a series of allegorical myths involving Sun's movement in the sky.
From the ancient hieroglyphics in Egypt we know much about the solar messiah.
For instance, Horus meaning Sun or the light, had an enemy known as Set.
And Set was the personification of the darkness or night.
And metaphorically speaking, every morning
Horus would win the battle against Set while in the evening Set would conquer Horus and send him into the underworld.
It's important to know that dark versus light, or good versus evil, is one of the most ubiquitous mythological dualities ever known and it's still expressed on many levels to this day.
Broadly speaking, the story of Horus is as follows:
Horus was born on December 25th, of a virgin Isis Mary.
His birth was accompanied by a star in the east which in turn three kings followed to locate and adorn a newborn saviour.
At the age of 12 he was a prodigal child teacher.
At the age of 30 he was baptized by a figure known as Anap and thus began his ministry.
Horus had 12 disciples he travelled about with, performing miracles such as healing the sick and walking on water.
Horus was known by many gestural names such as "The Truth", "The Light"
"God's Anointed Son", "The Good Shepherd",
"The Lamb of God" and many others.
After being betrayed by Typhon, Horus was crucified, buried for three days and thus resurrected.
These atributes of Horus, whether original or not, seem to permeate many cultures of the world for many other gods have found to have the same general mythological structure.
Attis of Phrygia, born of a virgin Nana on December 25th.
Crucified, placed in a tomb and after three days was resurrected.
Krishna of India, born of a virgin Devaki with a star in the east signaling his coming.
He performed miracles with his disciples and upon his death was resurrected.
Dionysus of Greece, born of a virgin on December 25th, was a travelling teacher who performed miracles such as turning water into wine.
He was referred to as "The King of Kings", "God's only begotten Son", "The Alpha and Omega" and many others.
And upon his death he was resurrected.
Mithra of Persia, born of a virgin on December 25th.
He had 12 disciples and performed miracles.
And upon his death was buried for three days and thus resurrected.
He was also referred to as "The Truth", "The Light" and many others.
Interestingly, the sacred day of worship of Mithra was Sunday.
The fact of the matter is, there are numerous saviours from different periods from all over the world which subscribe to these general characteristics.
The question remains - why these attributes?
Why the virgin birth on December 25th?
Why death for three days and inevitable resurrection?
Why 12 disciples or followers?
To find out, let's examine the most recent of the solar messiahs.
Jesus Christ was born of the virgin Mary on December 25th in Bethlehem.
His birth was announced by a star in the east which three kings were managed to follow to locate and adorn a new saviour.
He was a child teacher at 12 and at the age of 30 he was baptized by John the Baptist.
And thus began his ministry.
Jesus had 12 disciples which he travelled about with, performing miracles such as healing the sick, walking on water, raising the dead
He was also known as "The King of Kings", "The Son of God",
"The Light of the world", "The Alpha and Omega",
"The Lamb of God" and many many others.
After being betrayed by his disciple Judas and sold for 30 pieces of silver he was crucified, placed in a tomb and after three days he was resurrected and ascended into heaven.
First of all, the birth sequence is completely astrological.
The star in the east is Sirius, the brightest star in the night sky which on December 24th aligns with the three brightest stars in Orion's belt.
These three bright stars in the Orion's belt are called today what they were called in ancient times... the Three Kings.
And the Three Kings and the brightest star
- Sirius all point at the place of the sunrise on December 25th.
This is why the Three Kings follow the star in the east... in order to locate the sunrise, the birth of the Sun.
The Virgin Mary is the constellation Virgo, also known as Virgo the Virgin.
Virgo in Latin means Virgin.
Virgo was also referred to as the House of Bread and the representation of Virgo is a virgin holding a sheaf of wheat.
This house of bread and its symbol of wheat represents August and September, the time of harvest.
In turn, Bethlehem in fact literally translates to "house of bread".
Bethlehem is thus a reference to the constellation Virgo... a place in the sky, not on earth.
There's another very interesting phenomenon that occurs around December 25th or the winter solstice.
From the summer solstice to the winter solstice the days become shorter and colder.
And from the perspective of the northern hemisphere, the Sun appears to move south and gets smaller and more scarce.
The shortening of the days and expiration of the crops when approaching the winter solstice symbolized the process of death to the ancients.
It was the death of the Sun.
And by December 22nd the Sun's demise was fully realized.
For the Sun having moved south continually for six months makes it to its lowest point in the sky.
Here a curious thing occurs:
The Sun stops moving south, at least perceivably, for three days.
And during this three day pause, the Sun resides in the vicinity of the Southern Cross, or Crux constellation.
And after this time, on December 25th, the
Sun moves one degree, this time north foreshadowing longer days, warmth and spring.
And thus it was said:
The Son died in a cross was dead for three days only to be resurrected or born again.
This is why Jesus and numerous other Sun gods share the crucifixion, three day death and resurrection concept.
It is the Sun's transition period before it shifts its direction back into the northern hemisphere bringing spring and thus salvation.
However, they did not celebrate the resurrection of the Sun until the spring equinox or
- Easter.
This is because at the spring equinox the
Sun officially overpowers the evil darkness as daytime thereafter becomes longer in duration than the night and the revitalizing conditions of spring emerge.
Now, probably the most obvious of all the astrological symbolism around Jesus regards the 12 disciples.
They are simply the 12 constellations of the zodiac which Jesus, being the Sun, travels about with.
In fact, the number 12 is replete throughout the Bible.
Coming back to the cross of the zodic, the figurative life of the Sun, this was not just an artistic expression or tool to track the Sun's movement.
It was also a pagan spiritual symbol.
The shorthand of which looked like this.
This is not a symbol of Christianity.
It is a pagan adaptation of the cross of the zodiac.
This is why Jesus in earlier cult art is always shown with his head on the cross.
For Jesus is the Sun.
The Son of God, the light of the world, the risen saviour who will come again as it does every morning with the glory of God who defends against the works of darkness, as he is born again every morning
and can be seen coming in the clouds, up in heaven with his crown of thorns or sun rays.
Now, of the many astrological/astronomical metaphors in the Bible one of the most important has to do with the ages.
Throughout the scriptures there are numerous references to the age.
In order to understand this, we need to be familiar with the phenomenon known as the precession of the equinoxes.
The ancient Egyptians, along with cultures long before them recognized that approximately every 2150 years the sunrise of the morning of the spring equinox would occur at a different sign of the zodiac.
This has to do with the slow angular wobble that the Earth maintains as it rotates on its axes.
It is called a "precession" because the constellations go backwards rather than through the normal yearly cycle.
The amount of time it takes for the precession to go through all 12 signs is roughly 25.765 years.
This is also called the great year and ancient societies were very aware of this and they referred to each 2150 year period as an age.
From 4300 BC to 2150 BC it was the age of Taurus - the Bull.
From 2150 BC to 1 AD it was the age of Aries - the Ram.
And from 1 AD to 2150 AD it is the age of
Pisces, the age we are still in to this day.
And in and around 2150 we will enter the new age, the age of Aquarius.
Now, the Bible reflects broadly speaking a symbolic movement through three ages while foreshadowing a forth.
In the Old Testament when Moses comes down
Mount Sinai with the ten commandments he is very upset to see his people worshipping a golden bull calf.
In fact, he shattered the stone tablets and instructed his people to kill each other in order to purify themselves.
Most biblical scholars will tribute this anger to the fact that the Israelites were worshipping a false idol or something of that effect.
The reality is, the golden bull is Taurus the Bull
And Moses represents the new age of Aries the Ram.
This is why Jews even today still blow the ram's horne.
Moses represents the new age of Aries, and upon the new age everyone must shed the old age.
Other deities mark these transitions as well, such as Mithra, a pre-Christian god who kills the bull in the same symbology.
Now, Jesus is the figure who usheres in the age following Aries - the Age of Pisces or the two fish.
Fish symbolism is very abundant in the New Testament.
Jesus feeds 5000 people with bread and two fish.
When he begins his ministry walking along Galilee he befriends two fishermen who follow him.
And I think we've all seen the "Jesus fish" on the back of people's cars.
Little do they know what it actually means.
It is a pagan astrological symbolism for the
Sun's kingdom during the age of Pisces.
Also, Jesus's assumed birthday is essentially the start of this age.
At Luke 22:10 when Jesus is asked by his disciples where the next Passover will be after he is gone,
Jesus replies:
This scripture is by far one of the most revealing of all the astrological references.
The man bearing the pitcher of water is Aquarius - the Water Bearer who is always pictured as a man pouring out of the pitcher of water.
He represents the age after Pisces.
And when the Sun (God's Son) leaves the age of Pisces (Jesus) it will go into the house of Aquarius as Aquarius follows Pisces in the precession of the equinoxes.
All Jesus is saying is that after the age of Pisces will come the age of Aquarius.
Now, we've all heard about the end times, and the end of the world.
The cartoonish depictions in the Book of Revelation aside, the main source of this idea comes from Matthew 28:20 where Jesus says:
However, in the King's James version "world" is a mistranslation, among many mistranslations.
The actual word being used is "aeon" which means age.
"I will be with you even to the end of the age."
Which is true, as Jesus's solar Piscian personification will end when the Sun enters the age of Aquarius.
The entire concept of end times and the end of the world is a misinterpreted astrological allegory.
Let's tell that to the approximately 100 million people in America who believe the end of the world is coming.
Further more, the character of Jesus, being a literary and astrological hybrid is most explicitly a plagiarisation of the Egyptian Sun-God Horus.
For example, inscribed about 3500 years ago on the walls at the Temple of Luxor in Egypt are images of the Annunciation, the Immaculate Conception, the birth and the adoration of Horus.
The images begin with thought announcing to the virgin Isis that she will conceive Horus, then Neith, the Holy Ghost, impregnating the virgin and then the virgin birth, and the adoration.
This is exactly the story of Jesus's miracle conception.
In fact, the literary similarities between the Egyptian religion and the Christian religion are staggering.
And the plagiarism is continuous.
The story of Noah and Noah's Ark is taken directly from the tradition.
The concept of the Great Flood is ubiquitous throughout the ancient world with over 200 sided claims in different periods of time.
However, one need look no further for a pre-Christian source than the Epic of Gilgamesh, written in 2600 BC.
This story talks of a great flood commanded by God, an ark with saved animals upon it and even the release and return of the dove, all held in common with the biblical story among many other similarities.
And then there is the plagiarized story of Moses.
Upon Moses's birth it is said that he was placed in a reed basket and set adrift in a river in order to avoid infanticide.
He was later rescued by a daughter of royalty and raised by her as a prince.
This baby and a basket story was lifted directly from the myth of Sargon of Akkad of around 2250 BC.
Sargon was born, placed in a reed basket in order to avoid infanticide and set adrift in a river.
He was in turn rescued and raised by Akki, a royal midwife.
Further more, Moses is known as the
Law-giver, the giver of the Ten Commandments.
However, the idea of a law being passed from God to a prophet up on a montain is also a very old motif.
Moses is just another law-giver in a long line of law-givers in mythological history.
In India Manou was the great law-giver.
In Crete Minos ascended Mount Dikta where Zeus gave him the sacred laws.
While in Egypt there was Mises who carried stone tablets and upon them the laws of God were written.
And as far as the Ten Commandments, they are taken out right from Spell 125 in the Egyptian Book of the Dead.
What the Book of the Dead phrased "I have not stolen", became "Thou shall not steal".
"I have not killed" became "Thou shall not kill".
"I have not told lies" became "Thou shall not bear false witness" and so forth.
In fact, the Egyptian religion is likely the primary foundational basis for the Judeo-Christian theology.
And many many more are all attributes of Egyptian ideas, long predating Christianity and Judaism.
Justin Martyr, one of the first Christian historians and defenders wrote:
In a different writing, Justin Martyr said:
It's obvious that Justin and other early Christians knew how similar Christianity was to the pagan religions.
However, Justin had a solution.
As far as he was concerned, the devil did it.
The devil had a foresight to come before Christ and create his characteristics in the pagan world.
Fundamentalist Christianity.
Fascinating!
These people actually believe the world is 12.000 years old.
I swear to God!
I actually asked one of these guys.
OK, dinosaur fossils!
He says: "Dinosaur fossils?
God put those here to test our faith."
I think God put you here to test my faith, dude.
The bible is nothing more than astrotheological literary hybrid just like nearly all religious myths before it.
In fact, tha aspect of transference of one character's attributes to a new character can be found within the book itself.
In the Old Testament there is the story of Joseph.
Joseph was a prototype for Jesus.
Joseph was born of a miracle birth, Jesus was born of a miracle birth.
Joseph was of 12 brothers, Jesus had 12 disciples.
Joseph was sold for 20 pieces of silver, Jesus was sold for 30 pieces of silver.
Brother Judah suggests the sail of Joseph, disciple Judas suggests the sail of Jesus.
Joseph began his work at the age of 30, Jesus began his work at the age of 30.
The parallels go on and on.
Further more, is there any non-biblical historical evidence of any person living with the name Jesus, the son of Mary who travel about with 12 followers, healing people, and the like?
There are numerous historians who lived in and around the Mediterranean either during or soon after the assumed life of Jesus.
How many of these historian document this figure?
Not one.
However to be fair, that doesn't mean defenders of the historical Jesus haven't claimed the contrary.
Four historians are typically referenced to justified Jesus's existence.
Pliny the Younger, Suetonius and Tacitus are the first three.
Each one og their entries consists of only a few sentences at best and only refer to Christus or the Christ which in fact is not a name but a title.
It means "the anointed one".
The forth source is Josephus, and this source has been proven to be a forgery for hundereds of years.
Sadly, it is still sided as truth.
You'd think that a guy who rose from the dead and ascended to heaven for all eyes to see and performed a wealth of miracles that claimed him, would have made into historical record.
It didn't, because once the evidence is weighed there are very high odds that the figure known as Jesus did not even exist.
We don't wanna be unkind, but we wanna be factual.
We don't wanna cause hurt feelings but we want to be academically correct in what we understand and know to be true.
Christianity just is not based on truth.
We find that Christianity was in fact nothing more than a Roman story developed politically.
The reality is Jesus was the solar deity of the gnostic Christian sect.
And like all other pagan gods he was a mythical figure.
It was the political establishment that saw to historized the Jesus figure for social control.
By 325 AD in Rome, Emperor Constantine convened the Council of Nicaea.
It was during this meeting that the politically motivated Christian doctrines were established.
And thus began a long history of Christian bloodshed and spiritual fraud.
And for the next 1600 years the Vatican maintained the political stranglehold on all of Europe leading to such joyous periods as the Dark Ages along with enlightening events such as the Crusades and the Inquisition
Christianity along with all other theistic belief systems is the fraud of the age.
It serves to detach the species from the natural world and likewise each other.
It supports blind submission to authority.
It reduces human responsibility to the effect that "God" controls everything and in turn awful crimes can be justified in the name for divine persuit.
And most importantly, it empowers those who know the truth but use the myth to manipulate and control societies.
The religious myth is the most powerful device ever created and serves as the psychological soil upon which other myths can flourish.
A myth is an idea that, while widely believed, is false.
In a deeper sense, in the religious sense, a myth serves as an orienting and mobilizng story for people.
The focus is not on the story's relation to reality but on its function.
A story cannot function, unless it is believed to be true in the community or the nation.
It is not a matter of debate if some people have the bad taste to raise the question of the truth of the sacred story.
The keepers of the faith do not enter into the debate with them.
They ignore them, or denounce them as blasphemers.
It is wrong, blasphemous and sinful for you to suggest, imply or help other people to come to conclusion that the U.S.
government killed 3.000 of its own citizens.
It looks like one of those scenes of an old building being purposely dynamited and blown up.
Anybody who ever watched a building being demolished on purpose knows that if you're going to do this you have to get the under-infrastructure of the building and bring it down.
The way the structure is collapsing this was the result of something that was planned.
It's not accidental that the first tower just happened to collapse and then the second tower just happened to collapse in exactly the same way.
How did they accomplish this, we don't know.
The building collapsed to dust.
You don't find a desk, you don't find a chair, you don't find a telephone or computer.
The biggest piece of a telephone I found was half of the keypad and it was about this big.
The concrete was pulverized.
It was dust powder, two or three inches thick.
The concrete was just pulverized.
...a building was deliberately destroyed by the man-placed dynamite
It's as if there were detonators, planted in the building...
I heard a second explosion.
There was a heavy-duty explosion.
There were secondary explosions and then it subsequently all collapsed explosion blow and then it knocked everybody over.
To me it sounded like an explosion...
It sounded like gun-fire...
And then all of a sudden three big explosions.
...and we heard big explosion coming down and then the entire top of the building just blew up.
We saw some kind of explosion by the force of the explosions big explosion... it blew up back at the 8th floor then we got to lobby, there was a big explosion...
The lobby looked as if a bomb had exploded there.
...huge explosion, now raining debris there's been a huge explosion huge explosion that we all heard and felt.
We just witnessed some kind of explosion it was very loud... it blasted...
explosion smoke and secondary explosion in Tower 1 there is another bomb going off... he thinks that there were actually devices that were planted in the building planted in the building...
I don't think anybody could have predicted that they would try to use an airplane as a missile, a hijacked airplane as a missile.
...nobody in our government at least, and I don't think the prior government could have envisioned flying airplanes into the buildings.
There were no warning signs that I am aware of.
USA Today reports that in the two years before the attacks on September 11th
NORAD conducted exercises using hijacked airliners as weapons.
And one target was the World Trade Center.
In confidential documents from the Philippines obtained by CNN, the plan was clear:
Other buildings targeted - the Pentagon and the World Trade Center.
Security in Counterterrorism was blinking red that the warnings of an imminent attack was so severe that something dramatic should've been done, it was unparalleled.
Instead our President went on a month-long vacation.
The head of Pakistani intelligence (ISI) Mahmood Ahmed requested Omar Sheikh to wire $100.000 to
Mohammed Atta who was the lead hijacker.
...hijacker Mohammed Atta received wire transfers via Pakistan.
The man sending the money to Atta is believed to be Ahmed Omar Saeed Sheikh.
Omar Sheikh admitted he was supported by the Pakistani
Government's intelligence service - the ISI.
Although we are told that 4 or 5 of the alleged hijackers were on each of the flights, if so their names should have been on the flight manifest.
But the flight manifest that had been released contained neither the names of the alleged hijackers nor any Arab names whatsoever.
We know that the men who were supposedly the hijackers had their houses, cars, credit cards paid for by the U.S. Government.
They were, in truth - agents.
Evidence was also apparently planted.
The passport of one of the hijackers on flight 11 was allegedly found in the rubble.
...It goes through the fireball, through the side of the plane and comes down on the ground unscathed.
But something happened.
For 6 months they reported they had this passport.
We thought if we got it, we got the proof and then the guy stood up and was alive.
Several of these 19 men are still alive.
Of course we're after Saddam Hussein, I mean bin Laden, he's, he's, he's...
January 2001.
The Bush Administration orders the FBI and intelligence agencies to back off investigations involving the bin Laden family, including two of Osama bin Laden's relatives who were living, guess where!
- in Falls Church, Virginia right next to CIA headquarters.
When he was already America's "most wanted criminal"
he reportedly spent two weeks in the American hospital in Dubai, was treated by an American doctor and visited by the local CIA agents.
We have not seen one piece of evidence that links Osama bin Laden directly to the planning stages of September 11th.
This failure to provide proof was later said to be unnecessary because bin Laden in the video allegedly found in
Afghanistan admitted responsibility for the attacks.
This confession is now widely sided as proof.
But the man in this video has darker skin, fuller cheeks and a broader nose than the Osama bin Laden of all other videos.
We again seem to have the planted evidence.
In 1976 Osama's older brother Saleem bin Laden hired a man in Texas by the name of Jim Bath to handle all the investments in the United States for the bin Laden family.
Jim Bath also happens to be a personal, almost life-long friend and former international guard pilot, with George W. Bush.
The connections between the Bushes and the bin Ladens become much more clearer when
George Herbert Walker Bush made trips to Saudi Arabia in 1998 and 2000 to meet with the bin Laden family on behalf of the company called the Carlyle Group.
How could anyone fly a 60 ton, 125 ft wide, 44 ft tall plane through this obstacle course.
The aircraft before striking the Pentagon reportedly executed a 270 degree downward spiral and yet Hani Hanjour was known as a terrible pilot who could not safely fly even a small plane.
No seats, no luggage, no bodies.
Nothing but bricks and limestone.
The official explanation is that the intense heat from the jet fuel vaporized the entire plane.
Flight 77 had two Rolls Royce engines made of steel and titanium alloy and weighed 6 tons each.
It is scientifically impossible that 12 tons of steel and titanium was vaporized by jet fuel.
We're also told that the bodies were able to be identified either by the fingerprints or by the DNA.
So what kind of fire can vaporize aluminum and tempered steel and yet leave human bodies intact?
From my close-up inspection there's no evidence of a plane having crashed anywhere near the Pentagon and as I say the only pieces left that you can see are small enough that you can pick up in your hand
Shortly after the strike, government agents picked up debris and carried it off.
The entire lawn was covered with dirt and gravel so that any remaining forensic evidence was literally covered up.
The videos from security cameras which would show what really hit the Pentagon were immediately confiscated by agents of the FBI.
And the Department of Justice has to this day refused to release them.
If these videos would prove that the Pentagon was really hit by a 757 most of us would assume the Government would release them.
It looks like there's nothing there except for a hole in the ground.
Basically that's right.
The only thing you could see from where we were a big gouge in the earth and some broken trees.
You could see some people working, walking around in the area, but from where we can see there wasn't much left.
Any large pieces of debris at all?
No, there was nothing.
Nothing, that you can distinguish that a plane had crashed there.
Pancake theory according to which the fires, although not melting the steel, heated up sufficiently to cause the floors weakened by the airplane strikes to break loose from the steel columns, and this started a chain reaction.
So, you would expect then from that theory, which is the official theory, to see a whole stack of floors piled up on top of each other and then a spindle of core columns standing too.
The core of each of the Twin Towers consisted of 47 massive steel columns.
If the floors had broken loose from them, these columns would have still been sticking up in the air a thousand feet.
The plane did not cut all those core columns.
We designed the buildings to take the impact of the
Boeing 707 hitting the building at any location.
The building probably could sustain multiple impacts of jetliners.
...that the plane flew straight into the building.
Straight through, right.
So you're saying that the building was actually designed to cope with a hole like that and would still survive?
Yes, it was.
If you would drop, say a billiard ball from the top of the World Trade Center, 110 floors up there it would have taken 8 to 10 seconds to hit the ground encountering no resistance whatsoever.
The Twin Towers came down in nearly free fall speed.
200.000 tons of steel shatters and explodes outwards over 500 ft.
This means that floors shattered at an average rate of about ten floors per second.
There is no scenario for a pancake effect of buildings falling that allows them to fall at a rate of free fall.
And what can do that?
What can move mass out of the way?
Explosives.
47 huge steel columns going up the core that are interconnected, how do you get them to fail simultaneously so the core disappeared.
It looks like those core columns were cut.
The way we do this is by cutting the beam out at angle.
I started looking at the molten metal.
All three buildings, both towers in the rubble, in the basement areas, and Building 7 there were these pools of molten metal.
You get down below and you see molten steel.
Molten steel running down the channel wheels.
Like you were in a foundry.
Like lava of a volcano.
He said that molten steel was also found underneath World Trade Center 7.
So I'm looking through the official reports, what do they say about the molten metal?
They say nothing.
Wait a minute.
This is important evidence.
Where they come from?
Thermite is so hot that it'll just cut through steel, through the structural steel for example, like a knife through butter.
The products are molten iron and aluminum oxide which goes off primarily as a dust.
You know, there's enormous dust clouds you can imagine, when you assemble these chemicals on a large scale.
Molten metal pools under both towers after they collapsed, and Building 7.
Now, Building 7 wasn't even hit by a jet.
Part of the problem is that most people simply don't know much about Building 7.
Due to the extraordinary secrecy surrounding its collapse.
This was a 47 storey skyscraper.
This building fell at 5.25
It was not hit by a plane.
This building had fires on only 2 or 3 floors.
...and it was brought down by what we know was a controlled demolition.
Demolitions look just like that, with that kink in the middle, and then that building just comes straight down almost at free fall speed.
They first blow one of the central columns so the building falls in on itself.
Building 7 had a classic crimp or wedge.
Its central column was blown out first so it didn't structurally damaged buildings just a few feet away from it.
Our office was on the B-1 level.
As I was talking to a supervisor at 8.46 and all of a sudden we hear BOOM!
An explosion so hard that pushed us upwards.
And it came from the basement, between the B-2 level and the B-3 level.
And when I went to verbalize we heard BOOM!
That impact of the plane on the top.
As I'm walking by the main freight car of the building in the corridor, that's when I got blown.
I mean, the impact of the explosion threw me to the floor and that's when everything started happenin'.
All of a sudden a big impact happened again and all the ceiling tiles were falling down, the light fixtures were falling
You know, you gotta go clear across the hall from 1 to 2 World Trade Center and then all of a sudden it happened all over again.
It was something else, hit us to the floor, right in the basement you felt it, the walls were caving in on everything that was going on.
I mean, I know people that got killed in the basement,
I know people that got broken legs in the basement, people got reconstructive surgery because the wall hit them in the face.
According to standard operating procedure if an FAA flight control notices anything that suggests a possible hijacking, controllers are to contact the superior.
If the problem cannot be fixed within about a minute the superior should ask NORAD (North American Aerospace Command) to send up or scramble jet fighters to find out what is going on.
NORAD then issues a scramble order to the nearest air force base with fighters on alert.
And although interceptions usually occur within 10 or so minutes, in this case 80 or so minutes had elapsed before the fighters were even airborne.
It's a mind-bending anomaly.
Not a single US Air Force interceptor turns a wheel until it's too late.
There are no jets at all.
What if they were so confused, and had been so deliberately confused that they couldn't respond?
The reason that they didn't know where to go was because a number of conflicting and overlapping war game exercises were taking place that involved the insertion of false radar blips on the radar screens in the north-east air defence sector.
There was another exercise "Vigilant Warrior", which was in fact according to a NORAD source a live-fly hijack drill being conducted at the same time.
With only 8 available fighter aircrafts, and that have to be dispatched in pairs, they were dealing with as many as 22 possible hijacks on the day of 9/11 and they couldn't separate the war game exercises from the actual hijacks.
Page 172:
"The US Government has not been able to determine the origin of the money used for the 9/11 attacks.
Ultimately, the question is of little practical significance."
The American authorities have not managed to trace the source of the funding.
And then the most amazingly disingenuous statement
"ultimately is it of little consequence".
It is of massive consequence!
Doesn't it matter who paid for 9/11?
The collapse of Building 7 has been recognized as a specially difficult to explain.
The 9/11 Commission Report implicitly admitted that it could not explain the collapse of this building by not even mentioning it.
Mr. President, why are you and the Vice President insisting on appearing together before the 9/11 Commission?
Because the 9/11 Commission wants to ask us questions, that's why we are meeting, and I look forward to meeting with them and answering their questions.
The question was, why are you appearing together rather than separately, which was their request?
Because it's a good chance for both of us to answer questions that the 9/11 Commission is looking forward to asking us, and I am looking forward to answering them.
Do you think they should be able to stand up and speak their own words?
They should go under oath.
They should really?
Yeah.
In public.
Don't you think that the families deserve to have a transcript or to be able to see witnessing?
Haven't you asked me that question yesterday?
I got the same answer.
The final report was a unanimous report.
That means that if there was a single commissioner who had any objection about anything, that fact would be dropped from the report.
We have found out that he not only served on the transition team of the Bush Administration, that he was a person who wrote a draft memo for the setup of the Bush Administration's
National Security Council, that he was an individual who wrote the pre-emptive war strategy that was eventually used for the war on Iraq, that he's a close friend of Condoleezza Rice's,
we want him to resign.
There is literally nothing in the 9/11 Report that the Bush Administration did not approve of.
We can understand therefore why that commission under Zelikow leadership would have ignored all the evidence that would point to the truth that 9/11 was a false flag operation intended to authorize the doctrines and funds needed for a new level of imperial mobilization.
Terrorism.
The words are hypnotically repeating:
And of course
But, it's the so-called "War on Terrorism"
that's in our faces practically 24/7 as the inescapable focus of our existence.
One day our grandchildren will look back on this time and ask:
"How was the War on Terror won?"
The entire US ruling class, ruling elite comes to see terrorism as the preferred means, indeed the only means, to provide social cohesion, to provide an enemy image for the society, to keep it together.
According to neocon theory from Carl Scmitt, you have to have an enemy image in order to have a society.
A very dangerous thing because now it means that the entire social order, the political parties, intellectual life, politics in general are all based on a monstrous myth.
Look what the CIA has done in this country.
What they done to us is unbelievable.
Look at the terrorist acts that have occurred.
The CIA behind most if not all of them.
We had the Marine Barracks, then embassy in Kenya.
We had Pan Am 103, we had the USS Cole, we had Oklahoma City, we had the World Trade Center in 1993.
...they helped the terrorists to blow up the WTC the fist time.
They built the bomb, they got the driver's license.
The informer Emad A.Salem, a 43-year-old former Egyptian Army officer, he was given the assignment to put the bomb together and he went to the supervisor, that's the FBI supervisor, and he said, "we're gonna put a dummy bomb",
and the FBI supervisor says "no, we're gonna put a real bomb."
The FBI actually carried out the attack on the World Trade Center in 1993.
They actually hired Emad Salem and paid him 1 million dollars and gave him real explosives, a detonator and told him to build a bomb and to give it to the foolish people that he was controlling to allow them to attack the World Trade Center complex.
Unfortunately for them, there were only six people killed, not enough to pass the legislation.
So, what happened is two years later,
April 19, 1995 down comes Oklahoma City, the Murrah Building
It was at half past 9 this morning.
We were actually running an exercise for a company of over a thousand people in London based on simultaneous bombs going off precisely at the railway stations where it happened this morning, so I still have the hairs on the back of my neck standing up right now.
To get this quite straight, you were running an exercise to see how you would cope with this and it happened while you were running the exercise?
Precisely.
We're supposed to believe that there were some kind of coincidence.
There was also an anti-terrorist drill going on on 7/7.
And again, just like on 9/11 they were talking about attacks on the same targets, the same tube stations at the exactly the same time as the actual attack happened providing some kind of cover for what must be
operations orchestrating in some way by the States
I am absolutely appalled about how much people in this country do not think.
We are given to understand that an Arabic guy out there up in the mountains financed the most elaborate attack on this country.
Do you think some people in a cave were able to have NORAD stand down?
Do you think that people in the cave were able to have all of this happen?
And when I think about how many Americans were killed in New York City and believing as I do that this thing was a set up job, this is a textbook operation that Nazis used and they've used it over and over again.
America has been suckered in one more time.
I don't have to tell you things are bad.
Everybody knows things are bad.
The dollar buys a nickel's worth.
Banks are going bust.
Shopkeepers keep a gun under the counter.
Punks are running wild in the street.
There's nobody anywhere who seems to know what to do, and there's no end to it.
We know the air is unfit to breathe and our food is unfit to eat.
We sit watching our TVs while some local newscaster tells us that today we had 15 homicides and 63 violent crimes as if that's the way it's supposed to be!
We know things are bad.
Worse than bad.
They're crazy.
It's like everything everywhere is going crazy, so we don't go out anymore.
We sit in the house and slowly the world we're living in is getting smaller.
And all we say is, "Please, at least leave us alone in our living rooms.
Let me have my toaster and my TV, my steel-belted radials and I won't say anything.
Just leave us alone."
Well I'm not gonna leave you alone.
I want you to get mad!
I don't want you to protest, I don't want you to riot.
I don't want you to write to your congressman because I wouldn't know what to tell you to write.
I don't know what to do about the depression and the inflation and the Russians and the crime in the street.
All I know is that first you've got to get mad!
You've got to say, "I'm a human being, goddamn it!
My life has value!"
1775.
The American revolutionary war began as the American colonies sought to the detach from England and its oppressive monarchy.
Though many reasons are sided for the revolution, one in particular sticks out as the prime cause... that King George III of England outlawed the interest-free independent currency the colonies were producing and using for themselves.
In turn forcing them to borrow money from the Central Bank of England, at interest, he immediately put the colonies in the debt.
And as Benjamin Franklin later wrote:
In 1783 America won its independence from England.
However, its battle against the Central Bank concept and the corrupt, greed filled men associated with it had just begun.
So what is a central bank?
A central bank is an institution that produces the currency of an entire nation.
Based on historical precedent, two specific powers are inherent in central banking practice:
The control of interest rates and the control of the money supply, or inflation.
The central bank does not simply supply a government's economy with money, it loans it to them at interest.
Then through the use of increasing and decreasing of supply of money the central bank regulates the value of the currency being issued.
It is critical to understand that the entire structure of this system can only produce one thing in the long run debt.
It doesn't take a lot of ingenuity to figure their scam now.
For, every single dollar produced by the central bank is loaned at interest.
That means every single dollar produced is actually the dollar plus a certain percent of debt based on that dollar.
And since the central bank has the monopoly of the production of the currency for the entire country and they loan each dollar out with an immediate debt attached to it, where does the money that pay for the debt come from?
It can only come from the central bank again.
Which means the central bank has to perpetually increase its money supply to temporarily cover the outstanding debt created which in turn, since that new money is loaned out at interest as well creates even more debt.
The end result of this system without fail is slavery for it is impossible for the government, and thus the public, to ever come out of the self-generating debt.
The founding fathers of this country were well aware of this.
By the early 20th century the US have already implemented and removed a few central banking systems, which were swindled into place by the ruthless banking interests.
At this time, the dominate families in the banking and business world were:
And in they early 1900's the sought to push once again legislation to create another central bank.
However, they knew the Government and public were very wary of such an institution.
So they needed to create an incident to affect the public opinion.
So J.P.Morgan, publicly considered a financial luminary at the time, exploited his mass influence by publishing rumours about a prominent bank in New York wasn't solvent or bankrupt.
Morgan new this would cause mass hysteria which would affect other banks as well.
And it did.
The public in fear of losing their deposits immediately began mass withdrawals.
Consequently, the banks were forced to call in their loans causing their recipients to sell their property and thus the spiral of bankruptcies, repossessions and turmoil emerged.
Putting the pieces together a few years later, Fredrik Allen of Life Magazine wrote:
Unaware of the fraud, the panic of 1907 led to the Congressional investigation headed by Senator Nelson Aldrich, who had intimate ties to the banking cartels and later became part of the Rockefeller family through marriage.
The commission led by Aldrich recommended a central bank should be implemented so a panic like 1907 could never happen again.
This was the spark that international bankers needed to initiate their plan.
In 1910 a secret meeting was held at the J.P.Morgan's estate on Jekyll Island off the coast of Georgia.
It was there that the central banking bill called the Federal Reserve Act was written.
This legislation was written by bankers, not law makers.
This meeting was so secretive, so concealed from Government and public knowledge that a 10 or so figures who intended disguised their names when on route to the island.
After this bill was constructed, it was then handed over to their political front man,
Senator Nelson Aldrich, to push through Congress.
And in 1913, with heavy political sponsorship by the bankers,
Woodrow Wilson became president, having already agreed to sign the Federal Reserve Act in exchange for campaign support.
And two days before Christmas, when most of
Congress was at home with their families, the Federal Reserve Act was voted in and Wilson in turn made it law.
Years later Woodrow Wilson wrote, in regret:
Congressman Louis McFadden also expressed the truth after the passage of the bill:
Now, the public was told that the Federal
Reserve System was economic stabilizer and inflation and economic crises were thing of the past.
Well, as history has shown, nothing was further from the truth.
The fact is, the international bankers now had a streamline machine to expand their personal ambitions.
For example, from 1914 to 1919 the Fed increased the money supply by nearly 100% resulting in extensive loans to small banks and the public.
Then, in 1920 the Fed called in mass percentages of the outstanding money supply.
Thus resulting in the supporting banks having to call in huge numbers of loans and just like 1907, bank runs, bankruptcy and collapse occurred.
Over 5.400 competitive banks outside of the Federal Reserve System collapsed further consolidating the monopoly of the small group of international bankers.
Privy to this crime, Congressman Lindbergh stepped up and said in 1921:
However, the panic of 1920 was just a warm-up.
From 1921 to 1929 the Fed again increased the money supply resulting once again in extensive loans to the public and banks.
There was also a fairly new type of loan called the margin loan in the stock market.
Very simply, the margin loan allowed an investor to put down only 10% of the stock's price with the other 90% being loaned from the broker.
In other words, a person could own a $1000 worth of stock, with only a $100 down.
This method was very popular in the roaring 1920's as everyone seemed to be making money in the market.
However, there was a catch to this loan.
It could be called in at any time and had to be paid within 24 hours.
This is termed "a margin call", and a typical result of a margin call was the selling of the stock purchased with the loan.
So, a few months before October in 1929,
J.D.Rockefeller, Bernard Baruch and other insiders quietly exited the market.
And on October 24th, 1929 the New York financiers who furnished the margin loans started calling them in, in mass.
This sparked an instantaneous massive sell off in the market for everyone who had to cover the margin loans.
It then triggered a mass bank runs for the same reason, in turn collapsing over 16.000 banks enabling the conspiring international bankers to not only buy up rival banks at the discount but to also buy up whole corporations at pennies on the dollar.
It was the greatest robbery in American history.
But that didn't stop there.
Rather then expanding the money supply which were recovered from this economic collapse the Fed actually contracted it, fuelling one of the largest depressions in history.
Once again outraged, Congressman Louis McFadden, a long time opponent of the banking cartels began bringing impeachment proceedings against the Federal Reserve Board.
Saying of the crash and depression:
Not surprisingly, and after two previous assassination attempts,
McFadden was poisoned at a banquet before he could push for the impeachment.
Now, having reduced the society of the squaller the Federal Reserve bankers decided that the gold standard should be removed.
In order to do this, they needed to acquire the remaining gold in the system.
So, under the pretense of "helping to end the depression", came the 1933 gold seizure.
Under the threat of imprisonment for 10 years everyone in America was required to turn in all gold bullion to the Treasury, essentially robbing the public of what little wealth they had left.
And at the end of 1933 the gold standard was abolished.
If you look at a dollar bill from before 1933 it says it is redeemable in gold.
You look at the dollar bill today, it says it is legal tender which means it is backed by absolutely nothing.
It is worthless paper.
The only thing that gives our money value is how much of it is in circulation.
Therefore, the power to regulate the money supply is also the power to regulate its value which is also the power to bring entire economies and societies to its knees.
It's important to clearly understand, the
Federal Reserve is a private corporation.
It is about as "federal" as Federal Express.
It makes its own policies and is under virtually no regulation by the US Government.
It is a private bank that loans all the currency at interest to the Government, completely consistent with the fraudulent central banking model that the country sought to escape from when it declared independence in the American revolutionary war.
Now, going back to 1913 the Federal Reserve Act was not the only unconstitutional bill pushed through Congress.
They also pushed the Federal Income Tax.
It's worthwhile to point out that the American public's ignorance towards the Federal Income Tax is a testament to how dumbed down and oblivious the American population really is.
First of all the Federal Income Tax is completely unconstitutional as it is a direct unapportioned tax.
All direct taxes have to be apportioned to be legal, based on the Constitution.
Secondly, the required number of states in order to ratify the amendment to allow the Income Tax was never met.
And this has even been sided in modern court cases.
Third, at the present day roughly 25% of the average worker's income is taken from them via this tax.
And guess where that money goes?
It goes to pay the interest on the currency being produced by the fraudulent Federal Reserve Bank, a system that does not have to exist at all.
The money you make working almost 3 months out of the year goes almost literally into the pockets of the international bankers who own the private Federal Reserve Bank.
And forth, even with the fraudulent Government claim as to the legality of the Income Tax there is literally no statute, no law in existence that requires you to pay this tax.
Period.
I really expected that, of course there is a law that you can point to in the law book, a code that requires you to file a tax return.
Of course there is!
I was at that point where I couldn't find a statute that clearly made me personally liable,
at least not me and the most people I know and
I had no choice in my mind except to resign.
Based on the resource that I did throughout the year 2000 and that I'm still doing
I have not found that law.
I've asked the Congress, we've asked a lot of people, in the IRS, IRS Commissioner's helpers, they can't answer because if they answer the American people are gonna know that this whole thing is a fraud.
I haven't filed a thorough income tax return since I left.
I have not filed a tax return since 1999.
The income tax is nothing less than the enslavement of the entire country.
Now, the control of the economy and the perpetual robbery of wealth is only one side of the Rubik's cube that bankers hold in their hands.
The next tool for profit and control is war.
Since the inception of Federal Reserve in 1913 a number of large and small wars have commenced,
With the three most pronounced - the World War I, World War II and Vietnam.
In 1914 European war broke out centred around England and Germany.
The American public wanted nothing to do with the war.
In turn President Woodrow Wilson publicly declared neutrality.
However, under the surface the US administration was looking for any excuse it could find to enter.
In another observation by the Secretary of State, William Jennings:
It's important to understand that the most lucrative thing that can happen for the international bankers is war.
For, it forces the country to borrow even more money from the Federal Reserve Bank at interest.
Woodrow Wilson's top adviser and mentor was Colonel Edward House, the man with the intimate connections with the international bankers who wanted in the war.
In the documented conversation between Colonel House, Wilson's adviser and Sir Edward Grey, the Foreign Secretary of
England regarding how to get America into the war,
Grey inquired:
House responded:
So, on May 7th 1915 on essentially the suggestion of Sir Edward Grey, the ship called the Lusitania was deliberately sent into German controlled waters where German military vessels were known to be.
And as expected, German U-boats torpedoed the ship, exploding stored ammunition, killing 1.200 people.
To further understand the deliberate nature of this set up:
The German embassy actually put advertisements in the New York Times telling people that if they board the Lusitania they did so at their own risk as such a ship sailing from America to England through the war zone would be liable to destruction.
In turn, and as anticipated, the sinking of the Lusitania caused a wave of anger among the American population.
And America entered the war a short time after.
The First World War cost 323.000 American deaths.
J.D.Rockefeller made 200 million dollars off of it.
That's about 1.9 trillion by today's standards.
Not to mention the war cost about 30 billion dollars for America.
Most of which was borrowed from the Federal Reserve Bank at interest furthering the profits of the international bankers.
On December 7th, 1941 Japan attacked the American fleet at Pearl Harbor triggering our entry into that war.
President Franklin D. Roosevelt declared the attack was "a day that will live in infamy".
A day of infamy indeed, but not because of the alleged surprise attack on Pearl Harbor.
After 60 years of surfacing information it is clear that not only was the attack on Pearl Harbor known weeks in advance, it was outright wanted and provoked.
Roosevelt, whose family had been New York bankers since the 18th century, whose uncle Frederick was on the original Federal Reserve Board was very sympathetic to the interest of the international bankers, and the interest was to enter the war
because as we've seen - nothing is more profitable for the international bankers than war.
In a journal entry by Roosevelt's Secretary of War Henry Stimson dated November 25, 1941 he documented a conversation he had with Roosevelt.
In the months leading up to the attack on Pearl Harbor
Roosevelt had done almost everything in his power to anger the Japanese showing the posture of aggression:
He halted all of Japan's imports with American petroleum, he froze all of Japanese assets in the United States,
He made public loans to Nationalist China and supplied military aid to the British, both enemies of Japan in the war, which by the way is completely in violation of international war rules.
And on December 4th, three days before the attack, Australian intelligence told Roosevelt about a Japanese task force moving towards Pearl Harbor.
Roosevelt ignored it.
So as hoped and allowed, on December 7th, 1941 Japan attacked Pearl Harbor killing 2.400 soldiers.
Before Pearl Harbor 83% of the American public wanted nothing to do with the war.
After Pearl Harbor - one million men volunteered for the war.
It is important to know, Nazi Germany's war effort was largely supported by two organizations:
One of which was called I.G.Farben. I.G.Farben produced 84% of Germany's explosives and even the Zyklon B used in concentration camps to kill millions.
One of the unspoken partners of I.G.Farben was
J.D.Rockefeller's Standard Oil Company in America.
In fact, the German Air Force could not operate without a special additive patented by Rockefeller's Standard Oil.
The drastic bombing of London by Nazi
Germany, for example was made possible by a $20 million sale of fuel to I.G.Farben by the Rockefeller's Standard Oil Company.
This is just one small point of the topic how
American business funded both sides of World War II.
One other treasonous organization worth mentioning is the Union Banking Corporation of New York City.
Not only did they financed numerous aspects of Hitler's rise to power along with actual materials during the war, it was also a Nazi money-laundering bank which was eventually exposed for having millions of dollars of Nazi money in its vaults.
The Union Banking Corporation of New York was eventually seized for violations of the Trading with the enemy Act.
Guess who the director and vice president of the Union Bank was?
Prescott Bush, our current president's grandfather and of course our former president's father.
Keep that in mind when considering the moral and political dispositions of the Bush family.
The United States official declaration of war with
Vietnam in 1964 came after an alleged incident involving two US destroyers being attacked by the
North Vietnamese PT boats in the Gulf of Tonkin.
This was known as the Gulf of Tonkin Incident.
This single situation was the catalystic pretext for massive troop deployment and full-fleshed warfare.
One problem, however.
The attack on the US destroyers by Vietnamese PT boats never happened.
It was a completely staged event to have an excuse to enter the war.
Former Secretary of Defence Robert McNamara stated years later that the Gulf of Tonkin Incident was a mistake, while many other insiders and officers have come forward relaying that it was a contrived farce and complete lie.
Once in the war, it was business as usual.
In October 1966 President Lyndon Johnson lifted trade restrictions on the Soviet block knowing full well that the Soviets were providing upwards of 80% of North Vietnam war supplies.
Consequently, the Rockefeller interests financed factories in Soviet Union which the Soviets used to manufacture military equipment and send it to North Vietnam.
However, the funding of both sides in this conflict was only one side of the coin.
In 1985 Vietnam's Rules of Engagement were declassified.
This detailed what American troops were and were not allowed to do in the war.
It included absurdities like:
No enemy could be pursued once they crossed the border of Laos or Cambodia, and most revealing of all... the most critical strategic targets were not allowed to be attacked unless initiated via high military officials.
Apart from these imposed ludicrous limitations
North Vietnam was informed of these restrictions and therefore could based entire strategies around the limitations of the American forces.
This is why the war went on so long.
And the bottom line is this: the Vietnam War was never meant to be won.
Just sustained.
This war for profit resulted in 58.000
American deaths and 3 million dead Vietnamese.
So, where are we now?
September 11th was the jump start for, what is now, accelerating agenda by the ruthless elite.
It was a staged war pretext, no different than the sinking of the Lusitania, the provoking of Pearl Harbor and the Gulf of Tonkin lie.
In fact, if 9/11 wasn't a planned war pretext, it would be an exception to the rule.
It has been used to launch two unprovoked illegal wars, one against Iraq and one against Afghanistan.
However, 9/11 was a pretext for another war as well.
The war against you.
The Patriot Act, Homeland Security, the
Military Tribunals Act and other legislations are all completely and entirely designed to destroy your civil liberties and limit your ability to fight back against what is coming.
Currently in the United States, unannounced and most brain-washed Americans, your home can be searched, without a warrant, without you being home, you can in turn be arrested with no charges revealed to you, detained indefinitely with no access to a lawyer and legally tortured,
all under the suspicion that you might be a terrorist.
If you need a painted picture of what is happening in this country, let's recognize how history repeats itself.
In February 1933, Hitler staged a false flag attack burning down his own German Parliament building, the Reichstag and blamed it on communist terrorists.
Within the next few weeks he passed the Enabling Act which completely eradicated the German
Constitution, destroying people's liberties.
He then led a series of pre-emptive wars all justified in German people as necessary to maintaining "homeland security".
Our enemy is a radical network of terrorists and every government that supports them.
It's time to wake up.
The people in power go out of their way to make sure that you are perpetually misled and manipulated.
The majority's perception of reality, especially in the political arena, is not their own.
It's shrewdly imposed upon them without them even knowing it.
For example, the public at large actually believes the invasion of Iraq is going badly as sectarian violence doesn't seem to stop.
What the public fails to see is that the destabilization of Iraq is exactly what the people behind the government want.
This war is to be sustained so the region can be divided up, domination of the oil maintained, continual profits reaped for the defence contractors and most importantly, permanent military bases established to be used as a launching pad against
other oil-bearing nonconforming countries such as Iran and Syria.
For further implication that the civil war and destabilization is purely intentional, in 2005 two elite British SAS officers were arrested by Iraqi police after being caught driving around in their car, shooting at civilians while dressed up as Arabs.
After being arrested and taken to a jail in Basra the British
Army immediately requested the release of these men.
When the Basra Government refused, British tanks came in and physically broke out the men from the Basra prison.
If you wish to destroy an area, how do you do it?
Well there are two ways:
You can go in there and bomb it and so forth, but that is not very efficient.
What you do is you try to get the people in that area to kill each other and to destroy their own territory, their own farms, and that's what's been done to that area.
So, the way in which you destroy the bond is get him to destroy himself by dividing his ranks against one another.
And then you feed both sides, you have agents feeding both sides... inflaming both sides, and they kill each other off.
And it's time that some of us woke up to this reality, to understand that will people try to maintain empires and create empires.
They do it by manipulating the people they are trying to conquer.
You might wanna ask yourself why the entire culture is utterly saturated with mass media entertainment from all sides while the educational system in America continues its stupefying downwards slide since the US Government decided to take over and subsidize the public school system.
What your government pays for, it gets.
When we understand that, then we look at government financed institutions of education and see the kind of students and the kind of education that's been turned out by these government financed schools, the logic will tell you that if what has been turned out in those schools
was not in accord with what the state and the federal government wanted then it would change it.
The bottom line is that the government is getting what they have ordered.
They do not want your children to be educated.
They do not want you to think too much.
That is why our country and our world has become so proliferated with entertainments, mass media, television shows, amusement parks, drugs, alcohol and every kind of entertainment that keep the human mind entertained so that you don't get in the way of important
people by doing too much thinking.
You had better wake up and understand that there are people who are guiding your life and you don't even know it.
We're in a lot of trouble!
Because you people, and 62 million other Americans are listening to me right now.
Because less than 3% of you people read books.
Because less than 15% of you read newspapers.
Because the only truth you know is what you get over this tube.
Right now, there is a whole and entire generation that never knew anything that didn't come out of this tube!
This tube is the Gospel.
The ultimate revelation.
This tube can make or break presidents, popes, prime ministers.
This tube is the most awesome goddamn force in the whole godless world and woe is us if it ever falls into the hands of the wrong people!
And when the largest company in the world controls the most awesome, goddamn propaganda force in the whole godless world who knows what shit will be peddled for truth on this network!
So you listen to me.
Listen to me!
Television is not the truth.
Television's a goddamned amusement park!
Television is a circus, a carnival, a travelling troupe of acrobats, storytellers, dancers, singers, jugglers, sideshow freaks, lion tamers and football players.
We're in the boredom-killing business.
But you people sit there, day after day, night after night, all ages, colours, creeds.
We're all you know.
You're beginning to believe the illusions we're spinning here.
You're beginning to think that the tube is reality and that your own lives are unreal.
You do whatever the tube tells you!
You dress like the tube, you eat like the tube, you raise your children like the tube, you even think like the tube.
This is mass madness, you maniacs!
In God's name, you people are the real thing!
We are the illusion!
The last thing the men behind the curtain want is a conscience, informed public capable of critical thinking.
Which is why a continually fraudulent zeitgeist is output via religion, the mass media and the educational system.
They seek to keep you in distracted, naive bubble.
And they are doing a damn good job of it.
In 2005 an arrangement between Canada, Mexico and the United States was made.
This arrangement, unannounced to the public, unregulated by Congress, merges the United States, Mexico and Canada into one entity, erasing all borders.
It's called the North American Union.
You might wanna ask yourself why you never heard of this.
In fact, there is only one mainstream reporter who's actually heard of and has had the courage to cover this issue
The Bush Administration's open border policy and its decision to ignore the enforcement of this country's immigration laws is part of a broader agenda.
President Bush signed a formal agreement that will end the United States as we know it.
And he took this step without approval from either the US Congress or the people of the United States.
It's a deal that few have even heard of.
It's been done again by very few people at the very top, on behalf of the investment class.
But the working class of people, political officials who cross our country from communities, from cities and so forth, they don't know anything about this.
This isn't some trade agreement.
It is a total removal of sovereignty from these countries which will also result in a completely new currency called the Amero.
...apart from that I think one thing, people who are dollar based need to focus on is the Amero
That's the one thing that nobody is talking about, but I think it's gonna have a big impact on everybody's life in Canada, the US and Mexico and the Amero is the proposal of currency for the North American community
which is being developed right now between Canada, the US and Mexico to make a borderless community much like the EU and the dollar, Canadian Dollar, US Dollar, and the Mexican Peso replaced by the Amero.
By default of this agreement, the American
Constitution will eventually be obsolete.
You would think that a situation like this would be on the cover of every major newspaper.
That is until you realize the people who are behind this movement are the same people who are behind the mainstream media and you are not told what you're not supposed to know.
The North American Union is the same concept as the European Union, the African Union and the soon-to-be Asian Union.
And the same people are behind all of them.
And when the time is right the North American, the European Union the African Union and the Asian Union will be merged together forming the final stages of the plan these men have been working on for over 60 years...
One bank, one army, one centre of power.
And if we have learned anything from history it is that power corrupts.
And absolute power corrupts absolutely.
This is Aaron Russo, a film maker and a formal politician.
To his left is Nicholas Rockefeller of the infamous Rockefeller banking and business dynasty.
After maintaining the close friendship with Nicholas Rockefeller
Aaron eventually ended the relationship appalled by what he had learned about the Rockefellers and their ambitions.
I got a call one day from the Terry woman I knew and she said, "Would you like to meet one of the Rockefellers?"
I said, "Sure, I'd love to!"
And we became friends.
And he began to devote a lot of things to me.
So he said to me one night, "There's gonna be an event, Aaron.
And out of that event you're gonna see we are going to go into Afghanistan so we can run the pipelines from the
Caspian Sea, we are going to go into Iraq to take the oil and establish a base in the Middle-East, and then we are going to go into Venezuela and try to get rid off that Chavez."
And the first two they've accomplished, Chavez they didn't accomplish.
And so you're gonna see guys going into caves, looking for people they never gonna find.
You know, he's laughing about the fact that you have this war on terror and there's no real enemy.
He's talking about how by having this war on terror you can never win it 'cause it's an eternal war, so you can always keep taking people's liberties away.
I said, "How you're gonna convinced people that this war is real?"
He said, "By the media.
The media can convince everybody it's real.
You know, it's just that you keep talking about things, you keep saying it over and over and over again and eventually people believe this."
You know they've created Federal Reserve in 1913 through lies, they've created 9/11 which is another lie, through 9/11 you're then fighting the war on terror and afterwards you're going to Iraq
which was another lie.
And then they gonna do Iran.
And it's all one thing leading to another, leading to another, leading to another.
And I would say, "what are you doing this for?
What's the point of this thing?
You have all the money in the world you'd ever want, you have all the power."
I said, "You know, you're hurting people, it's not a good thing."
And he would say, "What do you care about the people for?
Take care of yourself, and take care of your family."
And then I said to him, "What are the ultimate goals here?"
He said, "The ultimate goal is to get everybody in this world chipped with an RFID chip."
And to have all the money to be on those chips, and everything on those chips.
And if anybody wants to protest what we do or violate what we want, we just turn off their chip."
That's right.
Microchipped.
In 2005 Congress under the pretense of immigration control and the so-called "War on Terrorism"
passed the Real ID Act, under which, it is projected, by May 2008 you will be required to carry around a federal identification card which includes on it a scannable bar code with your personal information.
However, this bar code is only an intermediary step before the card is equipped with that very chip, RFID tracking module which will use radio frequencies to track your every move on the planet.
If this sounds foreign to you, please know that the RFID tracking chip is already in all new American passports.
And the final step is the implanted chip which many people had already been manipulated into excepting under different pretenses.
We have a Florida family who are really pioneers in the brave new world.
They have volunteered to be the first ever to have microchipped identification devices implanted into their bodies.
After 9/11 I was really concerned about the security of my family.
I wouldn't mind having something planted permanently in my arm that would identify me.
In the end everybody will be locked into a monetary control grip where every single action you perform is documented.
And if you get out of line, they can just turn off your chip for at that point of time every single aspect of society will revolve around interactions with the chips.
This is the picture that is painted for the future if you open your eyes to see it.
A centralized one world economy where everyone's moves and everyone's transactions are tracked and monitored, all rights removed.
The most incredible aspect of all:
These totalitarian elements will not be forced upon the people, the people will demand them.
For, the social manipulation of society through the generation of fear and division has completely detached humans from their sense of power and reality.
The process which has been going on for centuries, if not millennia, religion, patriotism, race, wealth, class and every other form of arbitrary separatist identification thus conceived has served to create a controlled population utterly malleable in the hands of the few.
Divide and conquer is the motto.
And as long as people continue to see themselves as separate from everything else they lend themselves to be completely enslaved.
The men behind the curtain know this and they also know that if people ever realized the truth of their relationship to nature and the truth of their personal power, the entire manufactured zeitgeist they prey upon would collapse like a house of cards.
The whole system that we live in drills into us that we're powerless, that we're weak, that our society is evil, that it's fraudulant et cetera and so forth
It's all a big fat lie.
We are powerful, beautiful, extraordinary.
There is no reason why you cannot understand who we truly are, where are we going.
There is no reason why the average individual cannot be fully empowered.
We are incredibly powerful beings.
I think I've spent 30 years of my life, the first 30, trying to become something.
I wanted to become good at things, I wanted to become good at tennis,
I wanted to become good at school and grades... and everything I kind of viewed in that perspective:
I'm not OK the way I am, but if I got good at things and I realized that I had the game wrong.
The game was to find out what I already was.
Now, in our culture we've been trained for individual differences to stand out.
So, you look at each person and immediately it is brighter, dumber, older, younger, richer, poorer... and we make all these dimensional distinctions, we put them in categories and treat them that way.
And we get so that we only see others as separate from ourselves in the ways in which they're separate.
And one of the dramatic characteristics of experience is being with another person and suddenly seeing the ways in which they're like you, and not different from you, and experiencing the fact that which is essence in you, which is essence in me
is the one, the understanding there is no other.
It is all one.
And I wasn't born rich and upper, I was just born as a human being and then I learned this whole business of who I am, and whether I'm good or bad or achieving or not, all that's learned along the way.
The old appeals to racial, sexual and religious chauvinism, to rabid nationalist fervour are beginning not to work.
A new consciousness is developing which sees the Earth as a single organism and recognizes that an organism at war with itself is doomed.
Bill Hicks used to finish his shows with this:
Life's like a ride in an amusement park.
We go on it and think it's real 'cause that's how powerful our minds are.
And the ride goes up and down and round and round.
It has thrills and chills and it's very brightly coloured and it's very loud and it's fun, for a while.
Some have been on the ride for a long time and they begin to question, is this real, or is this just a ride?
And other people have remembered, and they come back to us, they say, "Hey, don't worry, don't be afraid, ever, because, this is just a ride..."
And we kill those people.
"Shut him up.
I've got a lot invested in this ride.
Shut him up!
Look at my furrows of worry.
Look at my big bank account and my family.
This has to be real."
It's just a ride.
But we always kill those good guys who try and tell us that, you ever notice that?
We let the demons run amok.
But it doesn't matter because, it's just a ride.
And we can change it anytime we want.
It's only a choice.
No effort, no work, no job, no savings and money.
Just a choice, right now, between fear and love.
Subtitles updated and corrected by mattex (Originally written by DexThor)
Maybe my head isn't screwed on straight.
But I just don't understand what we are doing.
Sasha,
I want to leave the newspaper.
AII these people...
We write about them day and night.
But I don't really know them.
It's like I'm a dealer in dead souls.
When a new character appears, he becomes real.
It's weird:
Like someone rising from the dead.
And asking why I summoned them.
Why do you keep mumbling to yourself?
-If you want me to listen to you, talk to me and not to your cigarette.
-Huh?
You smoke too much!
Yes, now I can see exactly where my Iife is headed.
I have to see him.
He's like a turning point.
Don't get carried away, Marina.
Mr. Lvovich, this is colonel Lebedev speaking.
Cease fire and come out of the house with your hands up!
The neighbours reported a disturbance at around eleven p.m.
They heard gun shots.
A patrol came round, he refused to open the door.
At the second attempt to enter the house, he opened fire.
He didn't even spare his own dog.
Is he drunk or something, this lawyer friend of yours?
-How should I know?
I've only ever met him twice.
What do you know about him?
-absolutely nothing.
-colonel?
...
-Yes, yes:
Marina!
Why do you think he's asked for you in particular?
I haven't the faintest idea.
-Okay, I'm going in.
-Have you lost your mind?
-You can't go in there.
-There's something going on between you and him, isn't there?
A perfect moment to start asking questions.
Either you don't say anything or you talk to yourself like a madwoman.
What's wrong with you?
-Don't you love me anymore?
-At last you've got the message.
He'II kill us!
The children are upstairs,.
-he's shut them up in their rooms.
He'II kill you too!
-Shut up, will you!
Don't be afraid, I'm not going to kill anyone.
Everything's fine.
It was all just an accident, you see?
I lost my cool:
I just lost it, bang!
I just couldn't take it anymore.
You have to help me.
You need to write it all down.
-Can you do that for me?
-Okay, I'II do it.
Aren't you cold?
No.
hold on:
The whole truth, and nothing but the truth.
-I know you can do it.
You're still alive!
You can feel the truth.
-Sorry, I don't understand.
What truth?
-I don't even know your story.
-I'II tell you everything you need to know, because I know everything.
I understand everything.
It's all so simple.
You can't begin to imagine how simple it all is!
Okay, are you writing?
Yes.
Write it all down.
We don't have much time
-They'II kill me in few minutes and I want you to remember everything.
-Listen,
-nobody wants to kill you.
-Look, don't try an argue with me!
-You have to listen!
-ToIya!
...
-I told you to shut up!
They've got it all mixed up.
They've devoured love.
We're all empty.
They've just hoIIowed us out inside, you get it?
And we have no excuse whatsoever.
-ToIya!
-Shut your mouth!
- only love!
-hold on a second!
...
-Wait!
You can only live if you have love.
You understand?
only love!
Remember these words!
Let's go,
-let's go!
-There, you've got what you wanted.
Hardcore.
-Who's been hanging around here?
-None of your business.
You could at Ieast close the door.
What the hell are you doing here anyway?
I haven't seen you for ages.
You haven't picked up the phone for the past three days.
-well, what are you doing here?
-Come on, Marina, we're buddies, aren't we?
Give me a drink then, buddy.
Listen, we're friends, right Marina?
The thing is, I'm totally snowed under.
Fyodor's out of action, you resigned.
And there's a story that desperately needs doing.
Come on Marina
I really need your help!
And at the end of the day, I helped you get out, didn't I?
I did you a favour after all, and the money's still good.
-You really are an arsehole aren't you, Sasha.
-That's debatable.
So here's the deal.
At the Fifth, in the special division they've got one happy chappy.
Move your leg.
He's a serial killer, a pedophile, he even drank people's blood.
-Isn't that a Iot forjust one guy.
-AII in a day's work.
So this, um, man worked at the Lurie high-schooI.
He was a history teacher, and taught a couple of optional classes too.
The children respected him, the teachers were even jealous of the way all the kids loved him.
By the way, what's the difference between a teacher and a pedophile?
-A pedophile likes children.
-That's an old joke.
-Yeah?
-Uhuh.
-Oh well:
Anyway, a year later the kids start spinning all sorts of crap.
About the day ofjudgement, karma, the golden mean....
Tantras, mantras and all thatjazz.
And in two years there were two overdoses, one unexplained suicide and so on and so forth.
-Sounds like a nice school....
-Yeah,... but that's only the beginning.
It turns out he also tore women's heads off.
You know, in his free time.
And he fucked one of his students to death.
beautiful girl, top marks at school.
From a clinical perspective, it's quite a mundane case.
-That's what you call mundane?
!
-Yes, mundane, mundane.
Paranoia, delusions of grandeur, sexual abuse as a child, the usual story.
What bothers me is something else.
In our troubled times his symptoms were allowed to grow unchecked for several years.
And he wasn't living alone in the woods all these years, was he?
He was in constant contact with people.
And had the chance to wound children with his deluded ideas.
'Let's follow Nietzsche and open a superman class,' he would say.
'And we'II make sacrifices to the pagan deity of Mercedes Benz!
'
Which "Mercedes"?
Aha, yes, "Mercedes".
Now everyone shudders when they remember that, but back then they laughed. 'What an eccentric, they would say. 'A real intellectual!
'
I am Death, give me fire,
-let me die.
I hate you swine!
-Wait for me here, I'II be right back!
-What are you doing?
give me fire!
I'm afraid we won't be able to speak to the patient today.
-to speak to the patient today.
-Aha
-Another attack..
We're giving him a tranquilizer and he'II rest up for a while.
please come through to my office.
Come in, come in
Perhaps it's all for the best.
He's not at all in his right mind.
Progressive delirium is no pretty sight.
Don't be surprised if he takes you for an angel,
-or a giant spider.
-I don't know which is worse.
-Yes, yes!
You are just like I had imagined you would be.
-Like what exactly?
They recommended you to me.
They said you were bold, ironic, quick on the uptake.
-God, who could possibly have said that.
-A...
Yes, precisely!
Come in, Marinochka, come in:
But you sleep badly, don't you, Marinochka.
-Do I Iook as bad as all that?
-No, you look wonderful, but your emotional life, if you will allow me, is somewhat adrift.
I think I just need some sleeping pills.
-How can such a beautiful girl have any problems in life?
-No, no problems.
But a few sleeping pills wouldn't hurt.
I understand,
I understand.
I'm not going to ask you any more questions, and I shan't prescribe you anything either.
Just take these.
They're very strong.
If you're using them as sleeping pills, you'II need three or four.
These ones are for children.
-You'II find your mood improves immediately...
-Thank you
-You'II feel like you're flying.
Have you ever seen a seagull hovering over the ocean?
This sensation is very similar.
The beating of the wings, flap, flap, flap:
And you can't feel a thing:
Smooth flight, gliding through the air
So I walk into reception, it's pitch black.
I turn on the light
And see Antonov there with some chick.
-Hey there!
-Hi!
-well, how's teacher of the year going?
-I don't know yet.
But as for your head doctor, honey,
-he fobbed me off like a real pro.
-That's no big deal.
-You wanna drink?
-No.
Marina, I got together some material for you.
-Photos, video, it'II keep you up all night.
-Give us a look!
-Hey!
Hey!
-You pervert, Sasha,
-what do you force the poor girls to do?
-Give it back!
Give it back, I said!
Are you looking for a fight or something, ilya?
-'Cause I'II knock your block off, no sweat..
-You reckon?
-No problem!
Wait here!
Yes?
hello?
Yes, I'm at Pravda.
-What's going on?
-A bit of work for you.
-Did you know that Marina's going to be working for us?
-That's not entirely true.
She's leaving that abattoir where she's been working.
It's gonna be a good team.
Big hugs, bye!
Come on, Marina, drop all this muck and come work for us.
-We've got a serious TV station, you can present the movie programme.
-will they give it to me?
-So, Sasha, she left you, and you got your revenge, right?
-No,he got his revenge long before we broke up.
But we made a deal, this revenge will be the Iast, right?
Yup.
Listen, Marina, you crush that psycho even if you don't get to see him.
-I'II see him, don't worry.
-Yeah?
Perhaps he'II be able to explain a few things.
You forgot your bag.
Merci.
-I'II see you out.
-You can see yourself out.
only be careful when crossing the street and don't mix it with alcohol under any circumstances.
-hello.
-hello.
I'm from the newspaper, I've come to see the head doctor.
Here's my pass.
-You can't visit the hospital today.
-I don't think you understand.
-The head doctor is waiting for me.
You should have been informed, I'm a journalist
-You can't visit the hospital today.
What's going on?
I'II tear off your epauIettes and take your head off with them!
You'II be the next one sitting in his cell.
I told you, he's notjust mad, he's a hardened criminal, he's killed four people.
-He's a psycho, get it?
!
-Yes/
-Damn!
What a bloody mess!
If you don't find him, if your whole department doesn't pull the finger out:
Ok
Yes, Andrey Petrovich,
same as usual.
A total mess, but we're getting on top of it.
I don't want to hear anything more!
That's enough!
dismissal will be the least of your problems!
wait me, please
-Ah!
Marinochka!
hello!
-hello.
An invincible country.
You, for example, Marina.
Come through here.
How ever did you get in the building?
-It's my job, it opens some doors and closes others.
-No, no, you're always welcome here, but there is a certain protocol.
-And to be honest...
-I know, it's a bad time.
I can see that.
-So, our client has run away?
-You've found that out a bit late, haven't you?
-hello, pavel.
Where have you been?
How did you let him run around here?
He shouldn't have been allowed to leave his bunk, he should have put down roots like a vine.
What are you batting your eyelids at?
Sorry, it's just that vines don't really put out roots, they grow on other trees.
-So this is your emergency situations expert, right?
-Keep your temper.
And you can play the commissioner in your own office.
Marina isn't from our system, she works for a newspaper.
Maria Antonovna, wait there a moment!
please excuse me.
By the way, if it weren't for you I wouldn't have been let in here.
And the head doctor's certainly not the one to blame.
-What do you want?
-Don't be afraid, I'm not dangerous.
I'm from the Pravda crime section.
So we would have had to meet anyway
Maybe you're right.
-Don't wait around, you won't find out anything here today.
-Are you sure?
-completely.
Are you afraid there will be a leak of confidential information?
would you Iike a lift?
I'm going to the station.
And on the way we can talk about flowers, films:
Or about sex?
So as not to talk about the real situation.
-What's that?
-That's the 'Vibrator' factory.
A top-security site, fuIIy-waIIed.
-understandable, considering what they make there.
-That's a pretty lame joke.
-Sorry, you can't smoke in here.
-It's fine..
-Orders are orders.
-And what's this, Captain?
-A military base.
-CouIdn't he have stayed in the wood?
-The wood is just a few trees, not a real wood at all.
-And where's the railway line?
You can hear the trains from the hospital.
That's in another place altogether.
-Here?
-Yeah, that's the a switch point.
I never ran away from a loony bin, but if I were in the woods I'd go towards the sound of the trains.
And you would wind up straight back at the hospital, at the front gate.
Where all the guards are asleep.
Scary!
Okay, so he ran into the woods, came to his senses.
The woods are dark, and he doesn't know where to go.
He hears the train and goes towards the tracks.
He gets to the factory, does a loop around the hospital.
So, how far is it from here to the train station?
A bit over three kilometres.
-Get some men down to the switch point, quick!
Send his description into the department!
-Ok.
And get me all the trains for this morning.
In all directions!
Yes.
Okay, and the details?
Who shot the evidence?
Got it.
Have you notified the road police?
What are they doing?
Got it.
Okay, block all the roads, I'm driving out.
-When did this happen?
-An hour ago.
-You see the curve in the road?
He was speeding along on that thing
-Iike a formuIa-one racer.
-So?
-So the bus left the stop, he swerved right and flew off the highway.
-And have you checked all the traces?
-What traces?
I'II tell you where he went.
Through the bushes over onto that path.
You see where it comes round to the bus stop.
How do you know all that?
-The trained eye of a hunter.
-Nah, they saw it from the bus.
-And he went along the path into the warren.
-Where?
-You know, into the dacha village.
Now you'II have a hell of a time finding him.
It's a bloody Iabyrinth.
You've got to be kidding.
Yeah, it's ten by eight kilometres.
Those plots are a quarter-acre each.
Even the people who live there don't know how many of them there are.
Now the village is being knocked down to build a new terminal.
They bought everyone out except for a few Ioners who can't let go.
They don't even have electricity anymore.
They've turned it off so the whole thing doesn't burn down.
It's full of people who have nowhere else to go.
You can break into any house and sit quiet as a mouse.
Every spring we find loads of corpses when the snow melts.
Can't recognise any of them.
-AII vagrants.
-It really is a rabbit's warren.
-It looks like a circuit board.
-Do you have a map of the place?
only a general one - main streets, shops.
It was some kind of cooperative, there are still some of the administrators around.
But that's no use at all.
should we call in the army?
But there'II be a Iot of messing around before they send in the dogs.
You have to search it from the ground, he hasn't had time to get his bearings yet.
He's going to run in as deep as he can, that's for sure.
Yeah, it really is like a rabbit's warren.
Creepy, isn't it?
Everything looks the same.
That's no big deal.
The dogs be in soon, they'II get his scent.
Look!
There's a guy over there.
hold on.
Do you know how to drive?
After seeing you, I'm inclined to say no.
Okay, sit behind the wheel and block all the doors.
-If anything happens, honk the horn.
-But I..
-please don't argue with me,
-okay?
-Okay.
Change sides, quick!
-What do you want to do?
-call Gusev, it's the Iast number.
Get him to bring in a helicopter.
Okay, just give me the phone when he answers.
How's it going?
congratulations!
We're outside the service zone.
-Damn, we would have had him.
-Do you think it was him?
-It doesn't make any difference - what I think.
-It's so silent,
-maybe we'II hear something.
-Uhuh.
-Anyway, it's nice and quiet here:
-Yeah, just wonderful.
Even if it's him we just scared him.
At least now we know what to do.
-We have to get back onto the main road, call in the special forces, and he's in the bag.
-hold on a second.
We're lost together in such a remote place.
Do you remember back in school when they told us about the atom bomb?
How it kills all the people, but everything else stays as it is.
-This is pretty much how I imagined it.
-I don't know, I didn't go to school much.
-Didn't you get in trouble?
-Nup.
I was the local..
-boxing champion.
-Wow!
That's pretty cool.
But I liked literature classes, they were interesting.
Then I grew up, and became a cop, as you can see.
well, being a cop's also romantic.
Your whole life's like one long, interesting book.
-That's just how it looks from the outside.
-I know, I know.
It's interesting talking to you.
I never know entirely what you mean.
-Do people like you?
-people or women?
-You didn't understand what I was trying to say.
Look!
-What are you gonna do?
-Come on!
Faster!
-What do you want with him?
-We'II catch him and find out.
-But he's just a kid.
-exactly, he can lead us to the grown-ups.
-What are you doing?
You'II knock him off his bike.
-Of course I will.
Stop right there, or I'II run you over!
Fine, you have to know when to stop.
There's no way of getting it out now.
Yeah, we haven't scored a whole lot of points in this game.
But we do have a consolation prize, we've broken out of everyday life.
Look how beautiful it all is!
You think you can just laugh at everything, don't you?
When women like you go criminal, there's nothing more terrifying.
They wind everyone round their little fingers.
should I take that as a compliment or a threat?
As honest recognition.
I'm very flattered.
It's a miserable job being a cop.
You lose your feeling for people, you start to see traps everywhere.
Those are the tactics of the job.
You delude everybody, lead them astray, then crack them right open.
Then you stop and think, 'What the hell am I doing?
' always the same old game, and I'm not even at work.
-Look, why are you telling me all this?
-Am I boring you?
-No, it's interesting,
-just a bit too personal.
-But I think you get my meaning.
It's when you don't tell the truth and don't do what you really want to.
And then it turns out that there is no truth, and everything's just fine the way it is.
It looks like we're going to have a chat with the inhabitants of the circuit board.
Stay back.
So, the pigs have arrived.
Yeah, he's stuck all right.
It's like he's dug his own grave already.
That's some set of wheel's he's got.
But the chick's not so hot.
Look, he's got a piece.
-I suppose it's time for us to scram.
-That's one thing you've got right.
But first shut up and listen.
And don't make any false moves.
Be so kind as to take your hands out of your pockets.
Don't try and strut your stuff here, pig.
We don't give a fuck about your gun.
We're not afraid of death, we're members of the taliban.
Turn off the motor.
bloody hell, old man!
What the fuck did you kill him for?
-Did you want him to get you instead?
-Are you a psycho or something, we could have traded him in.
Don't even look at him, bitch.
Stand still if you don't want the same thing to happen to you.
well, motherfucker, Iearnt how to drive?
Okay, Iet's get the lady.
Take the battery.
We'II use the battery ourselves, VaIya.
-Go ahead then.
-Give me the spare tyre.
You can't use a tyre, it'II float up and take her with it.
Just like that nigger you dumped!
Rest in peace, and know that your life was not in vain.
And although you were unable to understand:
That's enough.
We're going back to base.
You can finish your rousing speech there.
A-a-a-a!
Go away
So what is this noise about?
-Stay where you are and don't move!
Where are you going all alone in the dark, huh?
Let's go home.
So Edik's come home, has he?
-Yeah, and he's brought himself a chick.
-What's that supposed to mean?
Edik!
Get off me.
-Why?
I've fallen in love with you!
-Get off!
-Why?
-You slut!
calm down
Sit down!
Sit there and shut up.
Now,...
Now you're gonna have a tribunal.
You scared, huh?
He's mine.
No-one else can have him!
Listen,
-I didn't ask you for him.
-You just try and ask!
Sit the hell down!
rolled in the hay with him you did!
billing and cooing!
'Course you did, he's pretty hot stuff.
You're not even worth shitting on!
Okay, so he's a drinker, and he'II go after anyone when he's had a few.
I forgive you.
Let's have another drink then we'II go to bed.
-I'II wait until it gets light, then I think I'II go.
-Where are you gonna go?
I'II make your bed up over there.
We'II sleep, then leave together in the morning.
There are real weirdoes wandering around here at night
If you bump into the Terminator, But there all just small fish.
that'II be the end of you.
There's an evil spirit here, you know?
-The Terminator.
He's like a demon.
-I think I saw him.
-What did you see?
-Big, black, on a horse.
-On a horse?
-And what happened?
-Nothing, he went straight past me.
I was hiding.
-Lucky!
-Yeah?
-people who have met him
-can't say much about him either.
-They just howl like babies.
-Do you know this place well?
We came here just like you did.
Just to find a place to doss down.
And we've been stuck here for the past three months.
Lyutik came from the South, I'm from the North.
We fell head over heels, fate brought us together.
-It's great when people love each other.
-Yes...
Here's to you and Lyutik!
tell me where, Has it all gone?
My life's has gone all wrong.
-I want to drink, I want to eat, I want...
-A very good evening to you, ...
-brothers and sisters!
Look VaIya, they sure know how to have a good time.
-They're looking after their guest.
-Their beautiful guest.
-Why doesn't the hostess invite us to sit at the table?
-I think they're not pleased to see us.
We'II sit down all the same.
There's something we wanna discuss with you.
-Lavrenty.
-VaIentin.
Marina.
Here's to happiness!
Without it, life is not worth living.
-Isn't that right, my little mermaid?
-You said you had something you wanted to discuss.
That's what I said.
But your sweetheart..
-has passed out, and it's him we wanted to talk to.
-Come back tomorrow then.
We've got a couple of questions for you too.
-Is she your guest?
-She's my best friend.
We've been together our whole life.
She's a great girl, an actress.
-An actress?
-And have you been here long, young lady?
I said we've been together our whole life, what's the problem?
She's from the North pole too?
So what?
Come on, Lavrenty, Iet's go have a piss.
-Yeah, VaIya, Iet's stretch our legs.
-Get lost, bunch of idiots!
-They push us around.
-They're the ones that bring in the cars.
And Lyutik keeps working for them, he does everything.
He's got golden hands, he does.
-They pay him almost nothing.
-They take advantage of him ' cause he's wanted by the cops.
Bastards!
I hate them.
God!
I've poisoned my Iife, I've ruined everything.
-Shhh..
-You know..
I was going to go to university in St. Petersburg, you know.
-I wanted to go on the stage.
Dance, sing songs.
-It's no big deal.
It'II all work out.
Everything's fine.
Everything's fine.
I've got lot's of time, and no money, and no-one left to visit.
Zoika!
Why are you here so late?
Hit a pothole?
-We don't hit potholes, Lyutik.
The road of our life is always smooth.
-What've you brought in today?
You're very serious when you're awake.
Here's to liberality!
To legislative and juridical policy.
To the right of man to struggle.
-That's right, girly, warm yourself up.
-No, thanks.
-Come on, come on!
-We wanted to ask you over to our place, madam.
-And keep your mouth shut!
-What did you say?
-I'm a mademoiseIIe.
-An honest answer.
:
Here's to honesty!
You're in my house here, so keep your cool.
I, Mr. Lyutik, never lose my seIf-controI.
You piece of shit!
You're a worm!
You're ripping me off!
-And don't touch my women!
-Why?
I know and respect Zoya Fyodorovna.
And sympathize for her.
She's the one who sympathizes for you!
You're afraid to even look at her!
What would you do with a woman like that?
She'd tear you up into little pieces!
-If I don't do it first.
-I can't take this anymore.
hold my watermelon.
I'II bury you!
I'II dig your grave!
Go to hell, Lavrenty!
You wanna drink?
We stayed friends after the break-up.
Right, Marina?
These ones are for children.
They improve your mood in the morning.
What did you want to say?
I'II murder you!
That's only the beginning.
You can't hide from me.
You're still going to be mine!
Here's to the purifying fire!
To the lightning of evil!
How pretty!
A flower in the dust!
What a dignified face!
What are you doing here?
Then again, I'm here.
Where is this all going?
Your heel was broken.
I fixed it.
Look, I fixed it.
I stuck it on the best I couId.
But it's still better that way.
-Was that you playing?
-What?
Yes, that was me
I should have lived,
-instead I played.
-What time is it?
-Good morning!
-You can say that again.
-'I flew on wings of silver, I was a true aesthete.'
-Uhuh.
'My body reached out for love.'
What comes next?
I've forgotten everything.
Don't bother, you've got it all wrong.
'From the other side of the glass, I Iooked for what was missing here.'
That's right.
'And you and I need so few words, and now the winter's passed.'
'And won't it be a blessing, sister, when we're home at last!
'
You're mixing up all the lines.
Sorry,
-It's just that I thought poetry was dead.
-It is dead.
You don't have to accept that as a fact.
You know the poem, you remember it.
And no matter you hard you try, you can't get rid of it.
That only happens in fairy tales, where hearts grow cold and memories fade.
Thank you!
If we still have poetry, it means we're not in hell.
You have trouble telling the difference?
In hell, nobody knows any poetry.
No, on the contrary.
In hell that's all they do know.
No, on the contrary.
In hell that's all they do know.
That's what I thought until a while ago.
Then I discovered that we are in hell already.
We torture each other with such shameless relish.
-And people don't understand that this is atonement.
-That doesn't make sense.
It's not people that atone for their sins, but souls.
And souls aren't capable of torture.
It's the demons that torture us.
We're not in hell... we're just in the shit.
And that's a whole lot better.
But the soul and the demons are all inside.
One day I understood that I was torturing everyone else.
How did you understand?
I fell into a new set of circumstances.
It turned out that you have to pay for everything you do.
I thought I Ioved, but in fact I was a torturer.
I tortured myself and everyone else.
-No, no, no!
I didn't butcher people, stretch them on a rack or slaughter them in a dungeon.
-What's the problem then?
I just understood the inevitability of evil and the inevitability of its victims.
I myself am an inevitable victim.
hold on, you're talking in riddles.
Everyone always speaks in riddles.
-Sometimes they even fool themselves, and no-one knows the answer.
-Hey!
-Your porridge is going to burn.
-Here's..
Here's a typical example.
Stay with me for a little while.
surely you don't have somewhere you have to go.
No, I just wanted to try on the boots you so kindly repaired for me.
You want to go.
I have no right to keep you here.
But perhaps you're not in such a rush after all.
Let them fly over first.
Don't show them you're here, I beg you!
I don't know who you are, and what relationship you have with the authorities.
-But my relationship with them has seen better days.
-Who are you?
What are you doing here?
-I'm a man without a past.
Don't ask me about anything!
-But you already began to tell me something.
No!
I just let a few things slip out.
-It's been such a Iong time since I spoke to anyone.
-How long have you been here?
You are..
You have a smile like an angel,
like you're holding my Iife in your hands.
Stay here, I'II be back in a second.
Why?
!
Just tell me why?
What do you want with my Iife?
!
Why do you want to torture me?
Bitch!
Stop right there!
-slut!
Now we've got her!
-I hate everyone!
We'II bring her..
..to justice.
I hate your whole world!
-Fuck!
-You look just like..
-Like what?
Like a haIf-arsed fucking viking.
We wanted to ask you a few questions yesterday, sweetheart.
But as soon as it got rough, you left without saying goodbye.
-For that you will now feel the purifying fire.
-still hopping, little bunny rabbit?
I told you that you couldn't get away from us!
Now we're gonna have our way with you.
-Are you awake, kiddo?
-tell me who you're working for!
Hey, Lavrenty, go inside the house and have a look.
They sure got your cop friend.
Squashed him like a fly.
Don't worry, sunshine, we'II get everything we want from you.
You'd be better off telling me why you were snooping around here and who thatjoker is.
Maybe I should try it the nice way, huh?
Bitch.
What have you done to him?
-I killed him!
-VaIya!
-I killed him!
-Let go of him!
Forgive me, bright eagle.
I'II get you!
I don't understand anything!
Who are these people?
What do they want?
Who are they?
I'II get you for this!
Why did you lock me inside, and now you're saving me?
-We have to make it through to the road!
-Where?
Which road?
Bastards!
I can't go on any further either, but we can't stop here.
Stand up.
careful!
-hold on, you're from the police, aren't you?
-No, I'm not.
What do you mean?
!
But they were screaming. ...
It's all an illusion
- the fairy tales, the poetry, your eyes.
Of course, of course...
You are ...you..
You are my judge and executioner.
-I invented you, and I invented yourjustification as well.
-I...
Be quiet.
Be quiet.
Shhh!
Be quiet.
They're looking for us, but they can't find us.
Because we're already dead.
-I told you we're in hell!
-Look, it's not Iike that at all.
We're on earth, it's just a bizarre set of circumstances!
When hell began, that was also a bizarre set of circumstances.
Listen,...
Okay, I can't let you go, or I'm cooked.
And I have to go right to the very end.
That's the Iaw of hell!
You see?
You see?
Don't move, he won't touch you without my command.
Everything's okay, young lady.
You don't have to be afraid,
I won't do anything bad to you.
-When people want to do something good, they don't hide their face.
-Yes.
I'm not hiding my face, I just don't have one.
What's that?
Shhh!
.
Every time the same bloody treatment.
-Get out of here!
-He's come for you.
Everything's going according to plan.
Go away!
Get lost!
-What are you playing Jesus for?
-I'm not playing anything.
Turn me in, it's over!
Look, please don't turn us in.
Okay, then hide in there,
and don't even breathe.
-We've got an emergency out there.
-I know, Bobrov came round yesterday.
-Have you caught the guy?
-Nup.
He's a nippy son of a bitch.
And the chick's gone feral.
We got Beria, he squealed that they're together.
Says it was them who got VaIentin with the pitchfork.
well, they did a good deed.
The chick's also a shady character.
I think maybe she bumped off the detective.
Use your brain if you've got one!
TaIibs killed the cop and traced her the whole day then ..
OrIik and Timokha got him, they were searching for the girl all day afterwards.
Beria knows all this.
And he knows how to use OrIik,
-you press the right buttons, and he cracks.
-You...
-Don't try to teach me the rules of the game.
You're not in the Caucasus here.
-Don't talk about things you don't understand.
They could send you there as well.
Shut your gob.
-You want some vodka?
-Not on your life!
The heat's on out there, all the bigwigs are here.
Anyway, that's the situation.
We have to find the chick right away.
She's the main reason for all the fuss.
well, see around.
And if you meet the psycho, feel free to knock him off.
We're sick to bloody death of him.
-Do you have a description of him?
-He's just your normal everyday psycho, in pyjamas and a jacket.
They say he likes to play the idiot,
And he knows how to handle a knife.
Here's to peace!
So what's the story?
We're waiting.
It all started with Masha, Masha Korovina.
She was a beautiful girl.
Too beautiful even for herself.
And there was a boy in love with her, Roma.
She used to torture the boy, she didn't know why she did it.
But she teased him, Iike a real woman, you understand?
My students were such lonely children, all alone with their problems.
I talked to them, and they ended up confessing to me.
Once Masha came round to my house in the middle of the night.
She was shaking all over,
I couldn't turn her away.
I knew she had nowhere else to go,
-and there was no-one left to help her.
-only you?
-My students trusted me.
I never taught them, I just told them what I knew.
But I listened to them, I heard them.
Then Roma came round.
He was blind drunk and terribly overwrought.
I think maybe he was on drugs.
He thought that Masha and I were together.
And he killed her.
He just killed her.
Broke down the door, stormed in and calmly cut her throat.
Like he was killing a chicken.
He was a strange boy, totally spoilt.
His father was a wealthy businessman who has gone into politics now.
Lensky's his name, I'm sure you've heard of him.
I called him and he came right away, he didn't listen to me at all.
I watched very attentively the idiocy with which he manipulated the fixed order of his world.
I didn't know that they had already thought it all through.
And I only understood the force of this idiocy when they'd put me in the cell.
And when they read me the accusation in the morning, of course I argued, I proved to them it wasn't true.
Then I just blew up, and they put me in solitary, then took me to the hospital.
Then PaveI Petrovich came, my investigator, who soberly explained to me that a corpse had been found in my apartment.
An underage girl, and that I had raped her before stabbing her to death.
And that I had no alibi, and no witnesses.
Whereas Roma had been in a rehab clinic switzerland for the past week.
And he has loads of witnesses.
Then they offered to make a deal with me.
They said that if I pleaded guilty, there would be a closed trial.
I'd be deemed of unsound mind, then everyone will forget about it and I'II be out in a few years.
They'II give me a Iot of money and send me abroad.
Then PaveI Petrovich hinted that if they wanted they could just solve the problem by force.
He said that we are all pawns in the game of Iife, and that we don't decide the outcome.
'You have to understand his father,' he said.
'He works for the people, for Russia, and his son could compromise him.' In the end I backed down.
I understood that no-one could help me.
And all I couId hope for is that they will keep their promises.
They would have just got your cellmates to strangle you.
I didn't think about that at the time.
well, I thought about that as well, but..
I really lost it when I imagined coming out of jaiI.Two whole years have passed, Lensky and Roma meet me with flowers, cognac and a big cake.
They give me a passport with a visa, money, slap me on the shoulder and say,'thanks a Iot!
'
But I'm a historian, and I know how the history of the world works.
And when I finally lost it, I understood that history shouIdn't work like that.
I'm against that kind of world.
And I said, 'that's it!
'
-I told them to get stuffed.
'I'm not playing anymore', I said
-That takes strength.
My words were the only strong thing about me.
That was when the injections started, and everything went fuzzy.
I started having dreams.
Not really dreams, but events.
Like it wasn't happening to me.
They took me to a park.
pavel Petrovich filmed me on a video camera and said I had stabbed a woman there.
Then some girls said that I had dragged off their friend and they hadn't seen her since.
And I tried to argue, I tried to say that it was the first time I'd been there.
I tried to prove it to them, but it was like my body, my tongue and my brain were all switched off.
-And I was floating, floating.
-Just like the Manchurian Candidate.
-There you go, you don't believe me.
And I don't even believe myself.
-I don't believe it either.
-How did you get out?
-I just ran through an open door.
One day I woke up in a completely different world.
They must have changed the drugs.
I began to understand everything very clearly.
I understood that it's all just the injections, that it's all psychochemistry.
And I just walked through an open door and walked and walked and walked.
Now I know I'm free.
I know that I'm a mad killer.
But I don't know whether I'm asleep or not.
As soon as I'm back in Moscow, I'II get to the bottom of this.
-It won't change a thing.
-let's see.
I'II take the young lady outside.
You stay here.
Sit quiet, and don't leave the house.
There's a fierce dog outside.
Our helicopter caught on fire.
The navigator was killed by shrapnel, and I managed to grab his goggles.
That's how I saved my eyes.
I came out of hospital a complete social invalid.
My arms, legs and head were all fine, but I had a rag instead of a face.
What do you mean a rag?
They gave me a bandage.
My face is one big scar.
I was burnt down to the bone.
-How did you guess that he's not guilty?
-I don't know,
I couId feel it.
You would feel it too if you weren't afraid of him.
It's a skill I learnt in the Caucasus.
Everything's upside-down there, and a Iot of people tell lies.
-You look at a person and you can see what he's done and what he hasn't.
-What are you going to do next?
I'II stay here until Spring, then they've promised me work in a lighthouse.
then they've promised me work in a lighthouse.
In a bird sanctuary.
The sea, waves, albatrosses, and no people.
That's a fine horse you've got.
Go on.
-Best of luck!
-Yeah.
Come on, come on!
He sure was stuck in there.
Yeah, it got snagged under that root.
-Let's have a look in the car.
-well
-Get on the radio!
-He took the car!
-alive?
-AII right!
ShmeI, this is Lesnoy, answer!
BumbIe-bee, this is Park Ranger.
Do you copy?
Misha, I've lost the second patrol, see if you can reach them.
Neva dva, Neva dva, answer to Lesnoy
Attention all units!
I'm beginning pursuit of the suspect.
-Did he want to get back on the highway with you?
-I think the helicopter scared him.
He said he couldn't stay on the territory any more.
-And would you say, Marinochka, that the man is in his right mind?
-I think he's quite sane.
Comrade colonel, he's got a car from the local station.
They were investigating the murder site.
There's been some sort of cock-up.
A golden eagle, whose gaze is bright and unforgettable.
Stop!
Stop right there, mate!
I don't want to go to hell!
H.Q., I'm still in pursuit of the suspect, we've just passed the twelfth kilometre.
H.Q., this is the traffic post, they've gone through our section, they're in the industrial zone.
That's it, mate!
You've had it!
That was quite a run you gave me.
We have new information.
The criminal is armed, I repeat, the criminal is armed.
tell them not to come any closer!
Attention guys!
He's pointing a gun at me.
He says for you not to approach the car.
You're up to you're neck in it now, mate.
How are you planning to get out of here?
For Christ's sake be quiet!
Got it?
Then make the announcement!
Attention, this is the traffic police, we have an announcement.
He wants to make an announcement for TV, radio, the press and,..
-The vice-governor!
-The vice-governor..
Lensky and the journalists must be here within two hours.
And there has to be TV cameras.
Otherwise he takes no responsibility for the consequences.
-What responsibility has he ever taken,
-Any ideas?
-We can't get him from behind, there's a wall.
-What if we go through the roof onto the wall and get him in the back of the head?
-Too dangerous.
The bugger will notice and that'II be the end of the traffic cop.
That's it, feIIahs, I've had enough of him.
Finish the bastard off by any means necessary.
Pyotr Andreyevich, perhaps you should listen to his demands?
They're not that unreasonable.
Marinochka, why don't you do yourjob and I'II do mine.
I told you that I'd be more than happy to give you an interview after the operation.
only not now!
-Look, he's a sick man, and he hasn't been proved guilty in a court of law.
-Okay, then I'II be straight with you!
I say
A sick man should be lying in bed and not making this bloody havoc!
-Sorry, we're working here.
-Don't you want to inform the vice-governor?
-Get her the hell out of here!
-I think he has a right to know!
-Come on, come on, this is no place for you.
-Leave me alone!
Come on
Let me go please.
He really is mad.
Why did he do all this?
-He wanted to prove that he's no worse than anyone else.
-He's totally lost it.
Yes...
Look, he wrote me a letter
"Thank you and forgive me, but I bring disasters, I am a disaster.."
-They'II kill him and it'II all be over.
-What makes you think they'II do that?
-I heard them.
They're not even considering any other options.
Oh my God!
They're all crazy.
God!
Why do they have to kill him?
We could re-examine the whole case, get him moved to anotherjaiI.
-could you do that?
-Of course I couId, now that I know everything.
-Sasha.
-Marina, are you okay?
-Oh Sasha, how good that you've come!
-What's wrong with you?
-Sasha, sweetheart, I've never asked you for anything.
-please, we have to stop them!
-Stop who?
You can call the governor, can't you?
-And what then, Marina?
Just think about what you're asking me to do!
-hold on
-Marina
-We've got to stop them, you understand?
They're going to kill him.
-I've already thought it all through.
-calm down, Marina, calm down, okay?
-No!
-Let's go and sit in the car and we'II discuss everything, okay?
-Okay.
-Good, now I want you to calm down.
-But let's not sit in the car, we have to go in there.
I don't think we can use snipers.
-He's positioned inside the car.
It all looks pretty fucked.
-So are we just gonna sit here and watch?
There is one hypothesis.
We could take out the building supports with a grenade-Iauncher.
It'II all come crashing down.
And so what?
The traffic cop will guess what's going on, and he'II jump out.
It'II still get him, maybe a few cuts and bruises.
-But if he's not a complete dickhead he'II jump out and be just like new in a few weeks.
-And if he's a complete dickhead?
Then this is a sure fire way of finding out.
-What's this clown parade?
-hold on
I'II be back in a minute, okay?
How do you know him?
hello, colonel.
Don't give him up to the cops, Commander.
We need to sort a few things out first.
What's going on?
I would Iike to be like him, but it's a good thing I'm not.
-You're very strong.
-You're going to get into trouble, you know.
-I don't care,
I'm not going to back down.
What was I supposed to do?
The sergeant went to get handcuffs, and he jumped on VIadimir.
He almost tore his neck open and tried to grab the machine gun.Then he turned around and looked at me with his crazy eyes.
He would have plugged all of us.
Oh God!
What have I done?
calm down Let's go
-They already told me everything.
-What?
That you're trying to be a hero.
-Just don't take it to heart, okay?
AII this madness around you.
-That's easy,
I don't have a heart.
Stop it, that's not what I'm talking about.
These schizophrenics are real masters at pulling the wool over your eyes.
Did he tell you that he's innocent?
-That it's all one big conspiracy against him?
-No he admitted that he was totally guilty.
Okey
They said that you talked to the police boss.
Yeah, I got a bit carried away.
carried away?
Yeah, well he asked me to tell you that the investigation is officially over.
That the truth has been established,
-the evidence has all been filed:
-That's enough!
And after everything that's happened today,
-please don't make things any more difficult than they are already.
-Okay, okay!
I've got the message.
Thank God.
-You know what?
Thanks for the lift, you can stop the car here.
Sasha, please stop the car!
calm down.
I'II just drop you home and that's it, just stay cool.
calm down.
-calm down.
-Stop the car or I'II jump out!
Sasha, please, I beg you.
Hi, Marina!
It's me, your erotic hallucination.
What a day, huh?
You're looking great!
I can see that something has changed inside you.
I know what you're thinking about.
Drop it, it's useless.
It's all an illusion.
You remember the song?
'It's only an illusion'...
What difference does it make whether he's a maniac or not?
One thing's clear - he's not such a bad guy.
Imagine, if a few days ago someone told you that all these things would happen to you, would you believe them?
Of course you wouldn't.
No-one would.
people don't want to believe anymore.
They've given up.
Just think, maybe right now the band will strike up and everyone will run out and shout, 'It was all a joke!
'
balloons, flowers, champagne?
But I'm afraid it's not a joke, Marina, it's life.
You're still thinking, aren't you?
relax!
Don't let it bother you, everything will be fine!
Love, love, love.
Dream?
(day dream)
Just an ordinary dream...
(sweet dream)
But my heart... (always) ...is shaking. (always)
After experiencing love... (missing) ...my lips... (wishing) ...only called out to you in sadness.
respond to my thoughts quickly.
come and embrace me.
Bold confession...
My heart desires this.
and a drop falls down.
but I blame it on the tears.
Let's make a promise.
We're going to come across each other many times in a dream.
Get into the rhythm!
Sorry!
but are you okay?
This dance will wrap up the election and is considered very important.
right?
Yes.
Then hurry up and get on your feet!
We're wasting time!
Yes!
Much faster!
You're late!
it's not working.
You're not sharing the same feelings.
That's why your steps don't match!
Étoile election...
Tamao-chan.
right?
Circle of Fate
Coach?
You want me to be their coach?
Yes.
I just can't do everything on my own.
I'd be happy if you could help out.
I have to say Nagisa-san is pretty bad.
It's not going to be easy to make her better by the Étoile election.
they're both motivated.
Think about it.
Me as a coach?
In order to make her the Étoile...
I know I'll have muscle aches tomorrow.
I already have muscle aches.
Rokujyo-sama was very strict.
That training was like hell.
If that kind of training goes on every day...
They really want Miator to produce the new Étoile.
Are you sure that's the only thing they want?
What?
Why they chose you and me...
Tamao-chan...
Nagisa-oneesama!
It's Nagisa-san!
What happened?
Chiyo-chan.
Rokujyo-sama was training us very hard for the Étoile election and...
You can't.
Remember what Rokujyo-sama told us?
Until you get a little more confident you shouldn't announce that you're running.
Don't tell anyone that you're running.
you're right.
Nagisa-oneesama?
Nothing at all...
I see...
Tsubomi-chan?
You look sullen.
it's about Hikari-san and Amane-sama.
Their announcement for the Étoile election has been postponed.
What?
right?
I wasn't!
Why was it postponed?
I don't know.
then why don't you find out for yourself?
I'll be more than happy to hear the results!
You're never gentle.
Percival is gentle.
Amane senpai!
Amane senpai...
Hikari-chan!
Yaya-chan!
Nagisa-chan.
did you find out anything?
it seems that both Hikari-san and Yaya-san haven't come back to Strawberry hall.
They're not back yet?
Amane-sama and President Toumori...
Maybe something happened in Spica?
Tamao-chan!
Nagisa-chan!
Hikari.
you won't last.
I'm fine.
I'll stay here until Amane senpai wakes up.
Hikari.
I want to...
Let me stay... but if you collapse after Amane-sama wakes up then you'll get absolutely nothing out of this.
Hikari... so let's come back again in the morning.
Do what Yaya-san tells you to.
Amane senpai...
Amane senpai...
What happened?
Hikari?
Yeah.
Amane-san?
How do I feel?
My head hurts.
That's right.
I fell off of Starbright.
Even monkeys fall from trees.
Amane senpai is not a monkey!
So scary.
So scary.
Gosh!
I'm glad...
I don't know what I would do if you hadn't woke up...
Sorry for making you worry.
Why don't you lie down for a while?
I'm fine now.
Thank you so much for everything.
Good.
About your announcement...
Is it all right if we do it tomorrow?
Announcement?
Yes.
About what?
About what?
Your announcement about running in the Étoile election.
I'm running in the Étoile election?
Give me a break.
I told you that I'm not interested.
I don't have a partner to run with me anyway.
you...
Excuse me.
Hikari!
Why?
Amane senpai...
Hikari...
Tamao-chan...
Good morning!
Good morning.
good morning!
Good morning.
You're the girl from yesterday.
Is there something you want?
it's not like that...
Um...
Then can you leave me alone?
Yes...
I feel sorry for Hikari-chan.
Yes...
The doctor said that the symptoms are only temporary and that we should give it some time to recover.
I feel sorry...
Announcement for the candidates by Spica are postponed indefinitely.
I wonder why.
Someone saw Amane-sama and Hikari-san quarreling with each other.
but I heard that Amane-sama thought Hikari-san wasn't good enough.
Maybe she found someone better?
Amane-sama can get anyone she wants.
That's enough!
You don't even know what happened!
Don't just assume things like that!
You don't even know how Hikari feels.
Can I help you?
No...
You want to postpone it?
Yes...
Amane-san and Hikari-chan are going through a lot and...
We don't know if it's right to run in the Étoile election like this.
you can't concentrate on your practice?
That's right.
I understand.
Then...
Don't be ridiculous!
I know about Amane-san.
But this is a totally different matter!
If you two won't be running then the Étoile election for this year will be canceled.
I won't let our long tradition to be tainted like this.
you two need to be in the Étoile election no matter what.
Why do I end up coming here?
She was menacing.
I guess she's a brute after all.
Tamao-chan.
How come Rokujyo-san can be such a brute?
I guess she really wants the next Étoile to be from Miator.
Is that really it?
Amane senpai...
Good morning.
It's so nice out.
Amane-sama!
Good morning.
Hikari...
Is there anything we can do to help?
Nagisa-san is feeling better after all the food she ate.
But we can't expect the same from Hikari-san.
We must think of a way to make her feel better!
There's so many of us here.
Can't we think of anything?
Tsubomi-chan?
Of course I do!
But I can't tell you my ideas until I hear everyone's.
I guess she doesn't have any.
how do we make her feel better?
Percival?
Percival!
Many roses grow on a day unknown at the house on the edge of the forest.
Star of Virgo shining brightly...
They melted so fast.
Snow...
Yes...
I'm sure she's fine.
I think Amane-san's heart is filled with snow right now.
I'm sure you being the sun can melt away that snow.
Chikaru-sama...
I don't know what to do.
You just stay the way you are.
You just have to trust Amane-san.
Trust her?
Right...
You keep trusting her for as long as you can.
Then maybe you can shine a warm light into Amane-san's heart.
Chikaru-sama.
Sorry.
Did she get the wrong idea?
She's fine.
I trust her.
The flower...
Is this going to wither up and die?
beautifully.
Amane senpai...
You...
Can I join you?
Sure.
It's beautiful.
Yeah...
The reason why they chose me and Tamao-chan for the Étoile election...
Why is it that two people have to run in the Étoile election?
Nagisa-chan.
Rokujyo-sama is going to be a little late because she has some work with the student council.
Tamao-chan...
Yes?
Why does the Étoile have to be two people?
I don't think you need two people.
what do you think?
Well...
I guess people can't live on their own.
That's what I think.
People can't live on their own?
Yes.
Étoile is supposed to shine brightly by taking in everyone's feelings.
they need to be kind or strict.
They have to guide others by being the perfect example.
But that doesn't mean they're perfect.
The other person makes up for the other's flaws.
You're always making up for my flaws.
That's not true.
Nagisa-chan.
That's why I can say things like that.
Nagisa-chan.
Tamao-chan...
That's why I understand it now.
People can't live on their own so they have to help each other in order to live.
I see.
That's why there are two people for the Étoile position.
and in order to live...
Shizuma-sama!
What are you doing?
It's time for your lesson!
Hurry up and get on the stage.
Yes!
right?
Yes...
Then brace yourself.
Shizuma-sama...
Nagisa.
you must become the Étoile.
You made that decision.
We don't have much time!
Let's begin.
Yes!
Both of you...
My last job as an Étoile is to make Nagisa the next Étoile.
Try to match your partner!
Yes...
I'm standing by your side...
But are you immersed in such a good book that you don't notice me?
I'd like to take a look.
and you called out to me gently.
so let's go back to the past.
The leather bound book...
I remembered a sweet episode we had back then.
but we touched each other.
Tell me that you're happy.
You're smiling.
I was embarrassed so I ran away!
Come and get me.
You know everything that's going on.
But you're just teasing me.
You want to receive the punishment of love?
KISS
Next Episode
It's been a while since I transferred here.
our journey has been very long.
right?
so many.
But I'm not tired of it.
I still want to do many more things.
I want to talk about lots of things with you.
I feel the same way.
Waltz.
Nagisa-chan.
My heart swings like a pendulum...
It flutters to the right and feels sadness to the left but sad at the moment.
Let's keep staring at each other!
and adolescence...
Those words are commonly used.
understand my frustrations!
you can be in a mature relationship with childlike feelings.
this passion is somewhat familiar.
I have dreams that go beyond my admiration.
even though I'm just a young girl.
I know...
I know I'm not the only one.
Everyone is feeling shy and it's unstoppable...
What makes me want to see you?
When summer school is over it's time for summer vacation.
Students in Strawberry Hall will head back home and the real break begins.
With nobody around I have time to do whatever I want.
Just for a few days.
Summertime
Sister Nagisa... please don't forget about me.
Chiyo-chan.
Summer vacation is little over a month...
A month is just too long!
Chiyo-chan...
I don't want to go home!
your clothes are going to be ruined.
Hello.
Thank you for everything you did during my first semester.
Tamao-san.
Take care.
You bet.
Good luck to you too.
Let's all meet again in the second semester.
Everyone's gone...
Yes.
Those two are not going home?
From what I heard ever since they moved into Strawberry Hall 6 years ago they have not gone home even once.
Really?
if I get the chance to do so...
Your parents are still overseas?
Yeah.
They said they might be able to come back around New Year's...
Tamao-chan?
This Strawberry Hall is my home.
What?
This Strawberry Hall that you stay at...
This is what I call home.
I don't want to go anywhere else.
you need to go back home and say hello to your relatives.
Yes.
I can't believe that my relatives would end up separating us.
T-Tamao-chan...
I'm worried.
What?
Something might happen to you while I'm away...
You're worrying too much.
No!
My intuition is right.
it seems like Étoile-sama looks at you differently.
What?
Your heart-rate is going up!
What?
I feel like your temperature went up too.
I worry about you.
You shouldn't.
I'm going to cancel.
What?
I'm not going home.
Tamao-chan.
Look.
Even Rokujyo-san is here as well so... but...
Nagisa-chan.
What?
Really?
What does this mean?
Don't tell me Rokujyo-sama has feelings for you too...
Tamao-chan...
Huh?
Will you excuse us?
We need to have a word with Nagisa-san.
What?
Wha...
What is this all about?
You have some business with my Nagisa-chan?
My Nagisa-chan?
Some business?
Special lesson?
Yes.
Shizuma and I.
I must say Miyuki is very strict.
You're a Miator student.
You should be passing French with flying colors.
French...
But I'm on summer vacation...
Rokujyo-sama!
What?
Then I could go home without worrying about her.
Please teach her lots and lots of French while I'm away.
Sure...
These two are going to help you learn better French.
This is a once in a lifetime opportunity for you.
Tamao-chan.
Come back soon.
You hate studying that much?
But it's my summer vacation...
I know.
What?
Tamao-chan?
A good-luck charm.
mais je peux me débrouiller toute seule.
mais je peux me débrouiller toute.
that's not it.
Toute seule.
Toute seule.
that part...
The noun is feminine so...
Librairie.
Let's see...
I'm sorry.
It's okay.
We're just getting started.
I want to go to a world where there's no French.
That kind of world doesn't exist.
I can't wait till high school is over.
Gosh.
What?
Shizuma and I won't be around next year.
You're going to graduate in 3 years too.
But I have 3 more years.
Only 3 years!
3 years is like...
Let's take a break.
Rokujyo-san seemed mad for some reason.
Umm...
Is something wrong?
I'm trying to borrow a bucket.
it's right there.
Right.
There it is.
Thanks.
What?
Amane-san.
What is it?
I have to say I was surprised.
You didn't look like Ootori senpai at first.
You can call me Amane.
I guess I looked a bit rough.
I thought no one was around so...
Amane-san?
I'm not going home.
I'll just worry about this horse.
I just let the other members of the team go home and I stay behind.
I feel more comfortable that way.
so cool...
Is there anything else you need help with?
Well...
But don't you have errands to run?
I've been studying since the morning so I wanted to do something else for a change.
She had a very scary look on her face.
I see.
So Rokujyo-san is teaching you...
I think she just got tired of me since I'm such a bad learner.
No.
That's not true.
What?
Most students know where she comes from.
she is to be married at once.
Her fiancé has already been decided from birth.
I see.
That's the kind of person she is.
She's always had profound feelings of sadness.
You're a strange girl.
What?
Nagisa-kun!
Ouch...
Are you okay?
I'll be fine.
Sorry about that.
Huh?
I wonder why...
All the Miator students that I know are feeling cramped like birds trapped in a cage.
you're different from the others.
You're a strange girl indeed.
A-Amane-san?
Shizuma-sama!
Étoile-sama!
Your break is over.
I'm sorry.
I'll head back right away.
Étoile-sama...
Prince of Spica...
Don't you need to choose your princess from one of the Spica students?
I was just... huh?
I guess I'm also a bird trapped in a cage...
Ton grand-père et moi.
Miyuki apologized to me before.
She said she went too far.
it's my fault too...
Ton grand-père et moi.
Ton grand-père et moi.
Did she come just to see me earlier?
Did she come just to see me earlier?
It's just the two of us here now.
My heart is beating fast.
Nagisa?
Yes!
Where are you writing?
What?
I'm sorry!
I'm finally done.
Good job.
Umm...
Aren't you going to check if the answers are right?
Miyuki is going to check it later on tonight.
You two get along very well.
We were in the same room ever since we came into the dormitory.
We're inseparable now.
I see.
You did really good today.
I'll take you to a festival as a reward.
What?
A festival?
So those are the fireworks from the festival...
We can't even hear the sounds.
Did I disappoint you?
Not at all...
She was right after all.
We're just like birds trapped in a cage.
We're trapped behind these bars and looking at small fireworks from a distance.
But it's better than watching it by myself.
What?
I don't know why.
I was always feeling sad during summer school.
Even though I was with everyone.
I was able to see a beautiful shooting star as well...
But I felt I was all alone...
I was just sad and...
I just heard a loud bang.
Me too.
so you heard it too?
No...
What?
You were feeling sad too?
Do you know why I felt that way?
Have you felt that way with someone?
No...
I'll show you.
What is this?
what is this?
Good-luck charm.
This is to help you study better.
It's to help me get back to you soon.
Also...
Please be careful.
Okay.
I should get going.
It's a good-luck charm.
Tamao-chan gave it to me.
Tamao Suzumi?
Don't!
Shizuma-sama!
Shizuma-sama!
I...
What am I doing?
I'll leave the towel and your clothes here.
Yes.
What am I doing?
It's the first time I've been inside Shizuma-sama's room.
That's right.
I should go home...
When Shizuma-sama comes out I have to thank her and go home.
Roomkeeper?
The left one was during the first year.
The right one was from the second year.
I was a roomkeeper for the previous Étoile-sama during my second year.
Previous?
You think I was an Étoile for all this time?
So it was your first time.
But it wasn't my first time...
But you might be my last.
Nagisa.
Shizuma...
Umm...
Thank you for a great time today.
Nagisa-san?
Shizuma...
I'm finally back.
Tamao-chan.
Nagisa-chan.
stop it.
You just went back home yesterday.
It's only been a day.
You mean already a day.
You can't imagine how long it was...
Huh?
Where did you get those clothes?
Tamao-chan.
I seem to have lost it.
Where?
Sorry...
I can't remember.
I'm sorry.
Nagisa-chan.
Tamao-chan...
I feel sad.
I feel sad.
That's what my heart was feeling.
This isn't good.
I'm dreaming about this deep guilt that is taken away from me.
Please give me eternity.
I bite my finger and wait for seduction.
My glass doll.
I want to break apart inside your arms.
You are my destiny.
Touching you gently is not enough.
I want to cry and want you to cry as well.
Kiss my tears.
and that is our secret.
The long summer vacation is over and the new semester is about to begin.
What?
Summer vacation ended already?
I didn't get a chance to have fun!
Time goes by when you're having fun.
It can't be!
I didn't even finish my homework!
let me copy yours!
Nagisa-chan.
"The Roar of the Sea.
even though summer is over?
My heart swings like a pendulum...
It flutters to the right and feels sadness to the left but sad at the moment.
Let's keep staring at each other!
and adolescence...
Those words are commonly used.
understand my frustrations!
you can be in a mature relationship with childlike feelings.
this passion is somewhat familiar.
I have dreams that go beyond my admiration.
even though I'm just a young girl.
I know...
I know I'm not the only one.
Everyone is feeling shy and it's unstoppable...
What makes me want to see you?
When I first met her I thought she was a cute girl.
I thought she was just one of many cute girls in school.
That's what I believed for a long time...
Private Lesson
Listen!
We're going to play at the beach!
And then...
Explore places in the night or do some cooking.
Yeah!
I really want to go soon!
Strawberry Hall's summer school!
you've been saying that ever since we got here.
We only have ten days till the final exams.
right?
you two...
I'm talking about summer school in order to get my mind off of the exams.
and it's on my very first day.
Depressing...
Tamao-chan.
Yeah.
even if she doesn't study.
Tamao-chan.
Can you teach me French?
Of course.
I'm glad.
so...
You're right.
Everyone else has been taking French since the first year... right after I transferred.
Plus if your grade is below the passing mark then you'll have to take a summer course during your vacation.
What?
Summer course?
Then we won't be able to go to summer school together.
That's not fair.
Let's do a good job.
What about Chiyo-chan's studies?
Chiyo-chan's?
It's one of an upperclassman's duties to help the first-year roomkeeper with her studies before the exam.
There's no need to worry.
I'll look after both their studies.
Let's see...
La" is for feminine nouns... right?
so...
What?
They change if it's plural?
both the masculine and feminine change to "les" if it's plural.
No!
I can't believe I'm worse than the first-year Chiyo-chan.
Makes me want to cry!
I'm sorry...
I want to die.
I know.
Why don't you take a break by going for a walk?
You've been studying for two hours without a break.
I guess I will.
It's going to be very difficult for her to pass an exam in ten days.
This can't be...
I wonder if there's a good plan.
I see.
Both Spica and Le Rim have final exams as well.
They're all busy studying...
I don't like this!
Why do they need to have a French language?
French language!
Étoile-sama!
I'm sorry.
I'm really bad with French...
I just started taking it three months ago so I can't keep up with the class.
So I just...
I don't think I can pass my exam if I keep going like this...
It's that bad?
I'm trying to concentrate my studies on French but I can't seem to memorize things...
I'm sorry for inconveniencing you like this.
Excuse me.
Wait...
What?
I'll teach you French.
But it's right before the exam...
One of Étoile's jobs is to help those that are in need.
What?
Étoile-sama?
She said she is going to help you every day until the exam date?
Yeah.
Tamao-chan.
You declined her offer?
Yeah.
right?
that's right.
Nagisa-chan.
Since she's willing to help you why don't you let Étoile-sama help you this time?
What?
Don't worry about me.
But...
I'll go with you and ask Étoile-sama!
Okay?
you can't go to summer school!
then I won't go either!
Tamao-chan...
I'm sorry...
You don't understand it at all?
No...
Not even one?
No...
I guess a second-year student's French is hard as well... right?
Y-yes.
I'm really looking forward to going to summer school with everyone.
It's the first time going to the beach with everyone.
no matter what...
Don't worry.
What?
Let's do a good job without being hasty.
You're not going to sleep yet?
I'm going to study some more.
Then I'll join you too.
I'll pour some tea!
I fell asleep all too soon...
Sorry.
Did I wake you?
No.
did you study all night?
Yeah.
you and Étoile-sama are both helping me out a great deal.
I have to do my best.
I have to do my best.
Nagisa-chan.
That girl...
You're teaching French to Nagisa Aoi every night?
Yes.
What about it?
I'm happy to hear this as the student council president.
right?
I was beginning to worry.
There hasn't been a time when a Miator student from Strawberry Hall couldn't get a passing grade.
This has nothing to do with Strawberry Hall or Miator.
I'm trying to help her since she's having some trouble.
Are you sure that's the only reason?
What else is there?
Huh?
Étoile-sama?
Looks like you're pretty tired.
I'm not tired at all.
I hope you're right.
Every day until morning?
Yes.
Plus...
To and from school...
Even during breaks and lunchtime...
Even when she's in the bath...
I see.
That much...
I worry about that girl...
Shizuma-sama will be embarrassed...
But it looks like Shizuma-sama is having fun...
Is this correct?
That's right.
You did well.
You've gotten so much better in just a week.
Really?
Three days left.
Let's keep it up.
I haven't seen Shizuma-sama like that in a while.
we're done with our studies.
so...
You haven't been sleeping much these days.
You should get some rest tonight.
But we don't have much time till the exam.
I have to study until the last minute.
It's not worth it if you collapse before your exam.
I wouldn't worry about that.
I have lots of energy.
I see...
I have to do whatever I can till the last minute.
I'm finally done with my French!
I'm going to get some sleep!
You sound like you finished taking all your exams.
What?
Final exams just started today.
Final exams just started today.
You're right.
My mind was only on the French exam so...
I have to do my best by cramming.
What?
but...
I'm sure I'll pass.
Tamao-chan.
I have to do my best...
I can go to the happy summer school.
I'm finally done with all my exams!
Nagisa-chan.
You only slept two hours the last two nights.
every night.
Nagisa-chan.
right?
I'll just head on back now.
Okay.
Get home safe.
I'll take a shortcut...
Wow...
Étoile-sama?
Étoile-sama...
She looks cute when she's asleep...
Maybe that was a dream...
Muroto-san...
Suzunomori-san...
Aoi-san.
Yes!
Nagisa-chan?
Tamao-chan!
I did it!
I passed!
Nagisa-chan!
You really did a fine job.
Now we can go to summer school together.
I forgot about that!
Tamao-chan!
We can go with everyone!
We can go with everyone!
You two!
Be quiet!
Sorry...
I have a club meeting starting now.
Nagisa-chan.
Okay!
I have to report this to Étoile-sama!
I should get her something!
What should I get her...
Got it!
I'll ask Chihaya-chan to see if I can bake cookies at the cooking club!
Kitchen
Kitchen Nagisa-chan?
What's going on?
I have to ask you a favor.
Oh my!
Nagisa-chan?
What?
Chikaru-san!
Kizuna-chan and Remon-chan too?
Hello!
What are you people doing here?
We just created a new cookie lovers' association.
That's why we came to Miator's cooking club to learn how to make them.
We're making some cookies right now.
Do you want to join us?
What?
Really?
Wow!
Nagisa-chan.
You think so?
Did something happen?
What?
Could it be... right?
What?
What?
You have a special someone?
I knew it!
Who could it be?
Who is it?
Is it someone we know?
I don't have a special someone...
Nagisa-chan?
What?
That's no fun.
I thought it was serious.
Étoile-sama...
Étoile-sama...
I wonder where Étoile-sama is...
Umm...
Have you seen Étoile-sama?
No.
Did Shizuma do something?
it's nothing.
Sorry to bother you.
Étoile-sama...
Ouch...
What am I doing...
There's no need to find her in a hurry.
I just want to thank her...
Nagisa-chan.
right?
but...
Étoile-sama...
Étoile-sama!
You were waiting.
Étoile-sama.
but I fell on my way here and...
What is it?
but...
Thank you.
What?
I'm very happy.
Étoile-sama...
Thank you...
Étoile-sama!
And you passed your exams?
I did!
Somehow I passed!
Is that right?
I'm happy for you.
Étoile-sama!
Thank you very much!
Now you can go to summer school.
Yes!
I can go with my head up high!
I really like the beach!
do campfires and fireworks!
I can't wait!
Nagisa.
How unfortunate.
But it tastes good.
But it tastes good.
Really?
Doesn't it taste good?
Yes.
I think it got better after getting smashed to pieces.
You made these cookies by yourself?
My friends taught me how to make it.
They're really good.
I'm glad you liked them.
I want to drink some delicious black tea.
Shizuma... remember?
This is a small token of my appreciation.
Feel free to put it in your room.
Nagisa-chan!
Nagisa-oneesama!
Tamao-oneesama told me everything.
Congratulations on passing your exams!
Thanks!
We'll celebrate tonight with a tea party!
Yes!
I see.
I'm glad she passed all her exams.
I don't have to send any Miator students from Strawberry Hall to take a summer course.
Shizuma.
It wasn't because of me...
It wasn't because of me...
What?
It was because of her great effort.
She really did a great job...
I feel sad.
I feel sad.
That's what my heart was feeling.
This isn't good.
I'm dreaming about this deep guilt that is taken away from me.
Please give me eternity.
I bite my finger and wait for seduction.
My glass doll.
I want to break apart inside your arms.
You are my destiny.
Touching you gently is not enough.
I want to cry and want you to cry as well.
Kiss my tears.
and that is our secret.
did you pack everything you need for summer school?
a net...
A net?
I need a harpoon to catch some fish.
I need a harpoon to catch some fish.
Harpoon?
And a smoke cylinder in case of emergency... where do you think we're going?
of course.
Meteor Shower.
You don't need those things in summer school.
But in my previous school...
What kind of school did you go to?
My heart swings like a pendulum...
It flutters to the right and feels sadness to the left but sad at the moment.
Let's keep staring at each other!
and adolescence...
Those words are commonly used.
understand my frustrations!
you can be in a mature relationship with childlike feelings.
this passion is somewhat familiar.
I have dreams that go beyond my admiration.
even though I'm just a young girl.
I know...
I know I'm not the only one.
Everyone is feeling shy and it's unstoppable...
What makes me want to see you?
Strawberry Hall has this custom.
two-night trip to summer school.
Lots of interesting things happen every summer...
So I'm really looking forward to it.
we will be in a different environment so you might tighten your bonds with friends...
Meteor Shower
It's kind of sad without Shizuma-sama.
Yeah... even during the summer.
Can't help it.
What?
Did you just say something?
it's nothing.
Really?
Yeah.
It's almost time.
We have to greet the guests coming here for inspection.
It's one of the jobs for the Étoile.
I know.
Nagisa-chan!
Huh?
It's a beautiful view!
It's pretty...
Yaya-chan?
Too bad.
Amane-sama is busy this summer with training camp for the equestrian club and other tournaments...
Didn't you want to come here with her?
It's okay.
We made a promise.
Promise?
we can see each other...
I see.
Hikari.
How come there are three beds?
I had Kagome room with us as well.
What?
right?
You want that bed?
Yeah...
Then Remon-chan can take the smallest bed.
Why?
Miator girls' academy has a history that dates over 100 years and this happens to be the oldest building.
It looks really good on you.
Tamao-chan.
you flatter me!
What is it?
raise your arms!
There!
I...
I wonder if she'll think it's cute...
Nagisa-oneesama...
Student council room
There are plenty of things for you to do.
Étoile-sama.
It's cold!
Tamao-chan.
Please stay still.
I have to apply the suntan lotion very carefully.
I want to be under the same beach umbrella as them...
I want to put lotion on Nagisa-oneesama.
We can't let her win!
You're right.
There!
It's my chance to get closer to Nagisa-oneesama...
Chiyo-chan.
Do you want to play too?
Do you want to play too?
What?
Yes!
There!
Sorry!
Can you get the ball?
we're leaving.
Wait for me!
Shizuma?
Something wrong?
What?
There's nothing wrong.
Shizuma?
I'll be right back...
The flowers look very pretty.
Yeah.
Yay!
peace!
Quit horsing around!
Next!
We're going to pray?
That's right.
if you pray at the chapel... they say that your wish will come true.
really?
This is like a dare.
It's possible that elements like that exist.
Walking along the dark path at night while nestling close to each other...
Friendships will become stronger than ever before.
You're not going to pick?
Nagisa-chan.
I have an important matter to attend to.
see you later.
Tamao-chan?
Who am I going to pair up with?
Hikari.
Y-yeah...
I wonder how much stronger our relationship is going to be...
I can't wait.
Why are we the only ones that are a threesome?
We're all destined to be together!
Destined?
My destiny...
It's pretty.
She's here...
I wonder how Nagisa-chan will scream when she's surprised...
I can't wait!
Now that's my Nagisa-chan.
That was a great scream.
Now on to the next one!
Yaya-chan.
Don't worry.
I'll protect you.
Okay.
you have to play dead.
That's when you see a bear!
I'm scared!
I'm scared!
This is wonderful.
We're finally here...
I was really scared...
Maybe this is like a dare...
Chiyo-chan?
I wished that you would be happy...
Huh?
even without me praying for your happiness.
But I just had to pray for your happiness.
Chiyo-chan?
I'm just happy if you're happy...
But I want you to always be my oneesama... can I ask you something?
can I ask you something?
Yes.
why did you think that I'm happy?
Well...
I can tell by looking at Nagisa-oneesama and Shizuma-sama...
They're coming back tomorrow.
What?
Summer school.
Ah...
You're right.
We're finally back.
I was so scared.
Please be my oneesama forever.
Even if you were to become an Étoile with Shizuma-sama...
What?
it's nothing.
No!
That trembling voice.
That shudder...
Nagisa-chan about to cry...
This is just too good!
Tamao-chan?
welcome home.
Did something happen?
so... what exactly were you doing at the time of our trial?
Lots of things.
Lots.
Tamao-chan.
Yes?
Chiyo-chan said I'm happy.
I wonder why.
Why?
Nagisa-chan?
Happy...
What you're feeling right now...
How did it feel after going to summer school...
Nagisa-chan.
What?
I'm going to take a bath.
Nagisa-chan?
What?
It's okay.
Tamao-chan.
I know that you're happy...
How did it feel after going to summer school...
What?
What is this feeling?
It's very...
Sad...
I want to see her...
Wow.
Wow.
Wow.
It's wonderful.
I want to see her.
I want to see her smile...
Wasn't it fun?
Wasn't it fun?
It was fun.
Nagisa-chan?
Could she be...
Shizuma-sama...
I have returned.
Umm...
Welcome back.
Nagisa...
I feel sad.
I feel sad.
That's what my heart was feeling.
This isn't good.
I'm dreaming about this deep guilt that is taken away from me.
Please give me eternity.
I bite my finger and wait for seduction.
My glass doll.
I want to break apart inside your arms.
You are my destiny.
Touching you gently is not enough.
I want to cry and want you to cry as well.
Kiss my tears.
and that is our secret.
I want you to listen without being surprised.
Tamao-chan?
I was afraid this day might come.
What are you talking about?
I...
I finally...
It's time for me to say goodbye.
What?
Destiny is full of sadness and pain.
Summertime.
Tamao-chan?
Dream?
(day dream)
Just an ordinary dream...
(sweet dream)
But my heart... (always) ...is shaking. (always)
After experiencing love... (missing) ...my lips... (wishing) ...only called out to you in sadness.
respond to my thoughts quickly.
come and embrace me.
Bold confession...
My heart desires this.
and a drop falls down.
but I blame it on the tears.
Let's make a promise.
We're going to come across each other many times in a dream.
Étoile election is approaching... and Le Rim are all very excited.
Many rumors are going around about the Étoile election.
Like who's running or who they want as a candidate...
She's wonderful!
Amane-sama!
The autumn wind is very cold.
I'm sorry.
I expected too much out of you.
I hoped that you'd get Shizuma back to normal.
I hoped that you could make Shizuma forget that girl.
I was hoping for those things even though they were impossible.
I'm sorry.
Nagisa-chan...
Confession
Morning!
The weather is beautiful today too!
I'm really going to study hard!
So that's what happened?
So that's what happened?
Morning!
Good morning!
Nagisa-chan!
Nagisa-oneesama is full of energy this morning.
You're right.
she'll have nothing left.
Now let's think about the use and placement of traditional Japanese poetry in classic literature.
We will study the feelings exchanged between the characters in the story and analyze how they're expressed in traditional Japanese poetry.
let's go to the café.
Yaya-chan.
I have an appointment.
Appointment?
I'm sorry.
Hikari and Amane-sama?
I heard they're really close.
Oh really?
you didn't know?
I had no idea.
I'm hungry!
Me too.
Let's eat around here!
You said we should eat somewhere with great scenery with this weather.
but...
If we get past this forest... do you want to eat at the lake instead?
but why?
The lake is much more beautiful.
Okay... let's go.
Hikari...
That was delicious.
you're done eating already?
What?
You didn't really eat much.
Really?
But I'm full.
I see.
did you hear?
I heard that Étoile-sama is acting very strange lately.
I heard about it too.
She hasn't been in class for several days now.
You mean she's cutting classes?
but I wonder what happened to her.
I want to take a break from my classes too.
Me too.
Nagisa-oneesama?
What?
is it time to eat yet?
You're so silly.
Good night!
Good night!
Nagisa-chan?
I think I forgot something.
You forgot something?
Yeah.
What's wrong?
Kagome-chan...
What's the matter?
Why...
Why...
Huh?
Why are you crying?
What?
What are you talking about?
Huh?
Huh...
You were crying all this time.
What's wrong with Nagisa-oneesama?
She was feeling happy just a while ago.
If there's anything we can do...
I'm sure she appreciates all your thoughts.
But you should let her rest for the night.
turn to the fourth line on page 132.
Let's all read out loud the part "Elegellar".
Ready?
President.
Entries for the Étoile election are about to begin.
What is Spica planning to do this year?
right?
Then you don't have to stick with Amane-kun.
What do you mean?
Think about it.
Choose someone for the Étoile election that can make all of us happy.
I can't just choose anyone.
She has to be someone that can be Étoile.
I'm not going to give up.
huh?
I don't know what we can do to make her happy.
Percival is worried too.
But we just don't know what to do.
Make something delicious?
That's right!
In order to make Nagisa-chan happy...
I got it!
Why don't we make something delicious for her?
What?
But that's it?
but... she's right.
What?
Nagisa-sama will feel better if she's full!
right?
I'm sure Nagisa-san will be better!
You might be right about Nagisa-sama.
Percival feels the same way about her.
You're right.
It's possible with Nagisa-sama.
It's possible with Nagisa-sama!
What should we make?
Something sweet perhaps?
Cake?
Strawberry tart?
Strawberry sounds great!
But don't you think that's out of season?
Autumn chestnut?
Mont Blanc!
That's it!
Make it big like a mountain!
Yeah!
But do you think we can make it?
Maybe just some cookies.
How is she?
I think it's best to leave her alone right now.
I see...
You're right...
Rokujyo-sama.
What about Shizuma-sama?
I wonder if their plan worked well?
let's see.
This goes here... protect the children...
Well?
towards the end I felt that your high notes needed to be longer.
A little more around this area...
I...
No.
I'm sorry if I scared you.
It's not like that.
It tickled.
I know.
I didn't know you were awake.
Nagisa-chan...
I...
I shouldn't have come to Miator.
I would've never met Shizuma-sama and wouldn't have felt this way at all.
If I didn't come to Miator...
Please don't say that!
Tamao-chan?
Please listen to what I have to say for a bit.
It's a story about some girl.
Some girl?
It's a story of a first year student in Strawberry hall several years ago.
she didn't have a roommate.
a roommate would move in to make it a double.
but no one would show up.
She was waiting anxiously for that other girl to come.
She kept thinking that everyday is going to be more fun.
But that other girl ended up not coming at all.
a transfer student came to Miator and she was told that the new student would share a room with her.
that girl arrived.
Welcome...
Nagisa-chan.
her life became more fun and exciting than ever.
Plus that girl is always surrounded by smiles and cheerfulness.
Everyone can be happy by receiving that energy from her.
Tamao-chan...
Nagisa-chan.
I'm really glad you came.
please don't say you shouldn't have come to Miator.
You may not have been able to restore a smile on the face of your loved one.
But you made so many more people around you smile.
Please cheer up.
That's what everyone wants.
Everyone?
Nagisa-chan.
Tamao-chan...
Everyone!
Right?
Tamao-sama is right!
Please cheer up!
Please smile.
Please smile.
Nagisa-sama!
but...
We baked some cookies.
If you eat and get full...
You'll be feeling happy and loud.
Eat.
everyone.
Nagisa-san!
Sorry for making you all worry.
Let's have some tea!
Tea party.
I'll do it.
let me do it.
let's eat those cookies.
Okay!
Delicious...
Aren't you glad she's feeling better?
Nagisa-oneesama.
Everyone...
No...
I like you.
I'm standing by your side...
But are you immersed in such a good book that you don't notice me?
I'd like to take a look.
and you called out to me gently.
so let's go back to the past.
The leather bound book...
I remembered a sweet episode we had back then.
but we touched each other.
Tell me that you're happy.
You're smiling.
I was embarrassed so I ran away!
Come and get me.
You know everything that's going on.
But you're just teasing me.
You want to receive the punishment of love?
KISS
Next Episode
Nagisa-chan.
Good morning... please get dressed.
It's almost time for breakfast.
Tamao-chan.
my!
What kind of dream was it?
Tamao-chan.
And...
And?
Like A Flower".
I can't say anymore than this!
I can't say anymore than this!
Please tell me!
Dream?
(day dream)
Just an ordinary dream...
(sweet dream)
But my heart... (always) ...is shaking. (always)
After experiencing love... (missing) ...my lips... (wishing) ...only called out to you in sadness.
respond to my thoughts quickly.
come and embrace me.
Bold confession...
My heart desires this.
and a drop falls down.
but I blame it on the tears.
Let's make a promise.
We're going to come across each other many times in a dream.
is it that far?
Your cottage... you'll see it soon.
we might as well look.
They're beautiful.
Yes...
Step by step I'm getting closer to Shizuma-sama's cottage.
Shizuma-sama's story...
I want to hear about the other Étoile.
But...
Storm of Love
Let's eat.
What?
Tamao-san's lunch.
They're delicious.
they're delicious.
I have to thank Tamao-san when we get back to Strawberry hall.
I'm really sorry!
I know we promised to go enjoy the autumn leaves.
right?
The little time I spent with her on that summer day...
But memories are forever...
Like leaves that lie thick on the ground...
It's quiet.
There's no one around.
No one?
This entire area is on the premises.
I see...
Nagisa.
This scenery is completely ours.
She spent time with the other Étoile like this?
This is bad.
What?
We have to run.
Over there.
Could you open it?
What?
Sure.
It's been two years.
Wait here for a bit.
I'll go set up the shower.
Use this.
Shizuma-sama?
Shower...
Nagisa.
I'm fine.
I'll use the shower on the second floor.
Take your time.
Then I'll tell you the story.
Lots of time has passed.
I'm sorry...
Nagisa.
right?
Yes.
So pretty...
Shizuma-sama?
I found it very strange.
Why tell me this story?
Nagisa.
Shizuma-sama...
Nagisa-chan...
It's getting late...
Shizuma...
It's a terrible storm.
I don't think we can head back.
What?
Let's stay here for the night.
Stay here for the night?
We can head back tomorrow.
I'm sure the storm will be gone by then.
I see...
But Tamao-chan will be worried and I didn't tell anyone that I'd be away overnight.
I'll contact Miyuki.
I see...
Alone with Shizuma-sama...
Thank you very much.
Looks like they can't make it back today.
What?
Come in.
This room...
No one uses it now.
She was using it.
That girl...
The other Étoile...
Her name was Kaori.
Kaori-san...
Right.
Kaori Sakuragi...
Kaori Sakuragi... she'd be the same age as you.
This used to be Kaori's room.
Kaori-san's room...
Just the right room to have this kind of talk.
It was a stormy night that time as well.
That time?
When we loved each other.
No...
Maybe love is not the right word.
was it really love?
Or was it sympathy?
I don't know the answer.
there's no question that we needed each other...
Shizuma-sama...
I have to listen.
Shizuma-sama is trying to tell me the story.
But Kaori was...
Ever since that day...
My world started fading.
Nagisa.
What?
I think I can get back on my feet again.
Nagisa...
I can rise again.
Shizuma-sama...
I'll go change my clothes.
What?
It's going to be a long story.
Plus I can't keep wearing this.
I'll bring a set of clothes for you too.
I don't want you to worry that much.
I'm alright now.
She can...
I'm sure Nagisa can...
I'm alright now.
Shizuma-sama...
I'm alright now.
Nagisa...
Shizuma-sama...
The lights will be on shortly.
Nagisa...
I brought you some clothes.
Shizuma...
Shizuma-sama?
Kaori...
Shizuma-sama...
Kaori...
Kaori...
Shizuma-sama...
Kaori...
Nagisa...
I'm sorry.
What?
right?
I'm sorry!
Nagisa-chan!
Nagisa-chan!
Where's Shizuma?
I'm sorry...
Nagisa-chan!
Nagisa-chan!
Nagisa-san!
Nagisa-san!
Nagisa-chan!
Nagisa-chan!
Nagisa-chan!
Wait right here.
I'll go get some help.
Nagisa-chan!
Nagisa-chan!
Nagisa-chan!
you're still...
I'm standing by your side...
But are you immersed in such a good book that you don't notice me?
I'd like to take a look.
and you called out to me gently.
so let's go back to the past.
The leather bound book...
I remembered a sweet episode we had back then.
but we touched each other.
Tell me that you're happy.
You're smiling.
I was embarrassed so I ran away!
Come and get me.
You know everything that's going on.
But you're just teasing me.
You want to receive the punishment of love?
KISS
Next Episode
What you need for a body that has become cold... and a warm bed.
is there anything you would like to drink?
Tamao-chan...
Then let's have some hot cocoa tonight so that you can get a good night's sleep.
Tamao-chan...
I'll give you an extra blanket for the bed.
Nagisa-chan.
Refrain".
Nagisa-chan.
My heart swings like a pendulum...
It flutters to the right and feels sadness to the left.
but sad at the moment.
Let's keep staring at each other!
and adolescence...
Those words are commonly used.
understand my frustrations!
you can be in a mature relationship with childlike feelings.
this passion is somewhat familiar.
I have dreams that go beyond my admiration.
even though I'm just a young girl.
I know...
I know I'm not the only one.
Everyone is feeling shy and it's unstoppable...
What makes me want to see you?
Where does it lead to?
Is it a sea full of tears?
Or is it a place of great despair?
But I won't repent.
wintery light.
the rainbow... rainbow... rainbow...
The lovely rainbow...
The lovely rainbow...
The lovely rainbow...
The lovely rainbow...
I will live with you...
I did it!
Étoile
Nagisa-chan.
Wake up.
Nagisa-chan.
It's the morning.
So cute!
Na... gi... sa... chan...
Please... wake... up...
What is it?
Good morning.
Tamao-chan?
I told you not to play tricks on me!
You look cute when you're mad too.
Ugh!
Forget it!
Your school uniforms have arrived.
What?
Wow!
Now I can wear the same uniform as everyone else!
Let's get dressed right away.
I can dress on my own.
You don't have to be modest.
It's kind of hard to put on our uniform so I'll help you until you get better at it.
Tamao-chan...
You need to stay still.
Wait!
I'm sorry.
Are you okay?
It fits perfectly.
You're right.
It looks really good on you.
Really?
Have a seat.
Okay.
we'll do your hair.
Étoile-sama!
Good morning!
Good morning!
Good morning.
Tamao-chan!
That was just too much!
We'll be late for breakfast!
I couldn't be satisfied without making you look perfect!
No!
I'm sorry!
É...
Éto...
I'm sorry!
I was running late and I bumped into you by accident...
Good morning.
G-good morning.
Aoi-san.
I'm going to say this as the president of student council.
No matter what the reason is you are not allowed to run in the hallway.
Make sure this never happens again.
I'm sorry.
I'll be careful.
What was your name again?
Huh?
Aoi...
It's Nagisa.
Nagisa Aoi.
Nagisa...
That's a pretty name.
Can I call you Nagisa-chan?
What?
Uniform looks really good on you.
Your tie is a bit crooked.
Thank you very much.
For the rest of the day I hope everything turns out okay.
Again...
I can't move.
No...
Nagisa-chan!
It's time to go.
Étoile-sama.
everyone.
Let's all get inside and take a seat.
It's time to say grace.
Shizuma.
you know.
Are you lecturing me again?
You don't need to worry.
If you see a pretty flower... right?
That's all.
There's no deep meaning.
I see...
I was so scared.
Étoile-sama tried to kiss me out of nowhere.
I thought my heart was going to stop.
Oh no...
My heart is still beating fast.
The reason why Étoile-sama did that to you is because...
Nagisa-chan.
Too cute?
But I...
But it's the truth.
Tamao-chan.
Now let's go.
Okay... did you hear about the transfer student?
Did you hear about it?
Did you hear about it?
It was amazing!
Good morning.
There she is!
Étoile-sama almost kissed you?
I...
So it's true?
How did you girls know?
I heard there was quite an uproar at Strawberry hall.
The entire school is going crazy with that rumor!
What?
How was it?
How did you feel?
I... right?
it was just...
I'm so jealous!
I want her to call out my name just once!
but Étoile-sama already likes you.
That's amazing!
Tamao-chan.
I'm leaving the rest to you!
What?
What?
tell us more!
When you were almost kissed by Étoile-sama.
come on.
Umm...
So they loved.
As love in...
I heard the rumors but...
Étoile-sama is really popular.
But why did she do that?
Wow!
Looks delicious!
Here.
Open wide!
This is good!
I'm glad you like it.
The dormitory students love to come here for these desserts.
Students who commute to the school can eat whatever they like at home.
But we have restrictions at Strawberry hall.
I'm surprised they have a wonderful café like this inside the school.
You must've been really hungry.
What?
so I didn't really feel like eating breakfast.
I see.
I can give you half of mine if you like.
What?
I feel bad.
Are you sure?
Are you sure?
Here.
Thanks!
about the club activity.
Did you decide which club to join?
No.
I don't know what kind of clubs we have so...
Then why don't you join the literature club like me?
Literature club?
Yes.
I love writing and reading poetry.
There's a meeting right after this.
So let's go together!
But I'm not really good at poetry...
I'm supposed to present a new poem I made.
What?
Poem?
I definitely want you to hear it.
Is that okay?
Yeah.
I'd love to hear your poem.
Really?
I'm so happy!
Kanou-sama...
Where's Étoile-sama?
She's currently attending a luncheon for the student council members... and Le Rim.
Bye...
When all 3 schools get together...
Étoile-sama always attends those meetings.
I see...
It seems Étoile-sama has lots of duties.
What's going on?
I'm sorry.
She was here a minute ago.
She did it again.
President Rokujyo!
What is it?
Student council members from Spica and Le Rim are here.
Rokujyo-san.
What?
Look.
She's by Tougi-san and the others.
Again?
Yes.
I took my eyes off of her for a second and she disappeared.
Other student council members are looking for her but can you people help out as well?
We can't get anything started without Shizuma.
Did something happen?
I don't know.
Student council room
Student council room They're late.
Étoile-sama and people from Miator.
All the members from Spica and Le Rim are here already...
You're right.
Excuse me.
I'm sorry for all the trouble.
We had a little slip up.
It's just...
It's just...
Slip up?
What happened to Étoile-sama?
She's...
Maybe she disappeared again.
Is that true?
We had a slip up.
Releasing 7 beautiful colors the rainbow lures me into an unknown world.
I was fascinated by that delicate smile.
I let go of everything.
But my rainbow...
You're just an illusion.
The distance between you and me will never be shortened... my rainbow... my hometown was... my hometown was...
Tamao-chan is so cool.
I'm not even allowed to return...
Where does it lead to?
Is it a sea full of tears?
Or is it a place of great despair?
But I won't repent.
wintery light.
the rainbow... rainbow...
My lovely rainbow...
I will live with you... that was wonderful!
Suzumi-san.
Knowing that their love is never meant to be they still try to seek each other.
You were able to express the feeling of sadness very well.
I was moved by it.
chief.
I'm very honored to hear your compliments.
can you do that again?
What?
I want to hear it!
I want to hear it too!
One more time!
I would like to hear it too.
Ah... sure!
then...
My rainbow... my rainbow...
Tamao-chan is amazing.
Maybe she can be a great poet someday.
sunlight streaming through the leaves... sunlight...
Sunlight streaming through the leaves.
Sunlight streaming through the leaves...
Sunlight streaming through the leaves...
It's no good.
I can't think of the rest...
I guess I don't have what it takes to be a poet.
Étoile-sama!
What?
That's...
Étoile-sama.
Wasn't she supposed to be at the luncheon?
I sense something strange...
Is this...
What?
What?
What's going on?
I saw something outrageous.
I can't believe it...
I'm kind of shocked.
Where am I?
It's a wonderful place.
I see.
This is the library...
How long is she going to make us wait?
Umm...
President Toumori of Spica?
Let's just start eating our food.
What?
We don't know if Étoile-sama is going to come.
we'll be wasting time like this.
Plus we're all hungry...
Right?
Oh my...
President of Le Rim?
We haven't even finished grace by Étoile-sama.
but...
Rules are rules.
I'm really troubled by Étoile-sama's selfishness...
I see.
She's nowhere to be found?
Yes...
I'm afraid I have no choice.
We'll have to postpone today's luncheon.
But...
No way.
We can't let them wait any longer.
It's been decided.
I wonder where Étoile-sama is.
I was surprised by the sight of her!
Étoile-sama that is.
Me too.
Do you think she was going to the library?
Classics
Wow...
I'm so happy...
To be able to see you here like this...
Your hair is soft...
No!
Please don't!
Nagisa-chan...
What should I do?
My body is frozen again...
You have pretty eyes.
Your cheeks are soft and smooth...
Ouch...
Are you okay?
Are you hurt?
I'm sorry...
I...
Are you sure you're okay?
Nagisa-chan!
Nagisa-chan!
Tamao-chan.
Nagisa-chan!
I'm glad I found you.
I was looking all over for you.
What were you doing here?
I was...
Tamao-chan?
I was on my way home after the club activities and Rokujyo-sama came by and said you were waiting for me at the library.
Rokujyo-san said that?
How much longer do you plan on doing this?
You failed to show up at the luncheon again.
then I won't be able to stand up for you.
I just want you to do your job as Étoile.
Is that all?
Good night.
Good night.
I heard that even if Étoile-sama falls for someone it doesn't even last a month.
Oh really...
Nagisa-chan.
I promise to protect you.
What should I do?
my body just freezes...
I've been wandering around in darkness...
I don't know when it will end but I'm in the dark.
I feel sad.
I feel sad.
That's what my heart was feeling.
This isn't good.
I'm dreaming about this deep guilt that is taken away from me.
Please give me eternity.
I bite my finger and wait for seduction.
My glass doll.
I want to break apart inside your arms.
You are my destiny.
Touching you gently is not enough.
I want to cry and want you to cry as well.
Kiss my tears.
and that is our secret.
Astraea... umm...
The dormitory we're staying at is called the Strawberry hall.
Why is it called that?
It's so that all 3 schools can live separately in their own dorms and their triangular-shaped building looks like the shape of a strawberry.
I see.
can you give me a tour inside the Strawberry hall sometime?
Sure.
Attic.
Tamao-chan!
Where are we?
My heart swings like a pendulum...
It flutters to the right and feels sadness to the left.
but sad at the moment.
Let's keep staring at each other!
and adolescence...
Those words are commonly used.
understand my frustrations!
you can be in a mature relationship with childlike feelings.
this passion is somewhat familiar.
I have dreams that go beyond my admiration.
even though I'm just a young girl.
I know...
I know I'm not the only one.
Everyone is feeling shy and it's unstoppable...
What makes me want to see you?
When did it start?
When did I start seeing trees that seemed to have lost all their leaves?
Since when?
When did I start losing the scent of those overgrown leaves?
When was it?
Cherry Blossom Hill
No way...
Astraea hill...
It's so far!
I won't make it on time!
These school uniforms are amazing!
So pretty!
These uniforms look cute too!
No!
What should I do?
I have to hurry!
What is this place?
Umm...
She's so pretty...
Umm...
I just transferred here and...
Really?
Here.
Thank you very much.
Umm... my body won't move...
What?
What!
?
Huh?
What happened?
Was that all a dream?
I...
I'm sorry.
You looked so cute when you're sleeping.
I was just fascinated by it.
Umm...
Where are we?
Oh yes.
This is the nurse's office at Saint Miator girls' academy.
Let me introduce myself.
My name is Tamao Suzumi.
my name is...
I know who you are.
right?
We're both in the same grade and class.
We even share the same room at the dormitory.
I see...
Nagisa?
I'm feeling just fine.
You see?
Oh no!
Look at the time!
Yes.
According to what they told me they found you collapsed near the courtyard this morning.
Then they brought you here and you've been sleeping ever since.
Oh really?
I couldn't sleep last night since I was so nervous...
I was just waiting here for you to wake up.
You mean after you finished your class until now?
Yes.
It was nothing.
and time just went by so fast.
I'm glad you're feeling well.
We already took care of all your paperwork.
So let's just take a look around the school and head over to the dormitory.
Yes.
I'm counting on you.
But before that...
What?
What's going on?
I need some time alone with you.
What?
Why do you need to measure my body?
We need to order your school uniform.
under the bust.
Okay.
Since you don't have your school uniform your transfer to this school must've been at the very last minute.
now put your feet together.
That tickles!
Please stay still.
Okay...
School store
School store A set of summer and winter uniforms...
Let's see... your name is...
Nagisa Aoi.
And your size?
AR of number 7 please.
What?
I understand.
Umm...
Suzumi-san?
That size... you know.
Just call me by my first name.
What?
So that would be...
Tamao-chan?
Nagisa-chan?
Size for the school uniform is just a single number.
Why did you measure my entire body?
that.
or under my bust.
What was the purpose of that?
What was the purpose of that?
There is a purpose.
All of your data is very valuable treasure to me.
Your parents moved overseas?
Yeah.
So I'm staying here all by myself.
My aunt is from Miator and she introduced me to this school.
I was admitted right away.
I see.
we don't get many fourth year transfer students so I thought it was somewhat strange.
Fourth-year student?
Fourth-year student?
Yes.
Our junior high is connected to our high school.
So we call a first-year high school student a fourth-year student.
I see...
What?
You can see it from here too.
you're talking about the chapel.
You can call it a symbol of Astraea hill.
To the west of the chapel is the Saint Spica girls' academy.
To the east of the chapel is the Saint Le Rim.
so that's why the girls were wearing 3 different uniforms this morning.
Yes.
White uniforms are for Spica.
Le Rim wears the checkered skirts.
This is the classroom.
I'm sure the teacher will provide you with a desk tomorrow.
Wow...
It looks so calm...
Let's head on over to the dormitory.
Your belongings might have arrived.
Okay!
Plus...
We have to make it back by the 6 o'clock curfew.
Curfew?
They have that here?
Yes.
You must follow it.
You'll be in big trouble if you don't follow your curfew.
Wow!
It's amazing!
I give my warm regards to you.
You look lovely even when you're praying.
Right...
Suzumi-san.
The manager was looking for you.
It's very unfortunate.
I won't be able to join you.
I can't believe it turned out like this.
I can't tell you how sorry I am.
Tamao-chan.
No!
I... so... please be careful.
I'm kind of overwhelmed.
That person...
Wait!
Where is she going?
Excuse me!
Huh?
She disappeared.
Our curfew is 6 o'clock.
You'll be in big trouble if you don't follow it.
Oh no!
I'm barely going to make it.
Nagisa-chan!
Thanks for waiting...
Huh?
She's not back yet?
Wait!
Nagisa-chan isn't back yet!
Tamao-chan!
Nagisa-chan!
Tamao-chan!
Can't you open this?
I'm sorry.
So I can't get back in?
No.
Head sister of the dormitory has the key to this gate.
Sister?
Yes.
Here she comes...
Who are you?
I don't believe we have anyone in this Astraea dormitory who can't be back by curfew.
It's very unfortunate.
Even if you're a transfer student you should follow the curfew.
Aren't you ashamed?
I'm sorry!
One more time!
Yes!
Let's go over our dormitory rules.
Starting from article 1.
Article 1.
Students at Astraea should be the pride of our dormitory.
As a dormitory student...
President Rokujyo of student council...
Article 10.
Possession of cell phones and beepers are...
Who is it?
It's Rokujyo.
Come in.
Excuse me.
Sister Hamasaka.
I'm really sorry to have troubled you.
Fine then.
Since the president of student council is here to...
I'll think I'll let this one go.
Thank you very much.
Let's go.
You must be unlucky.
What?
To be called out by the sister on your very first day.
Yes.
I...
Miyuki Rokujyo.
She's the president of student council at Miator.
Umm...
I'm really sorry.
was it?
You just have to be careful next time.
but...
I made you come and fetch me...
Don't worry about it.
It's part of my job.
then what are you going to do when you meet Étoile?
What's Étoile?
Is it a teacher?
She's a student.
Le Rim...
She's a representative for all 3 schools.
Representative for all 3 schools?
Is she even scarier than that sister?
She's not scary at all.
She is greatly loved and respected by all 3 schools.
That's pretty much it.
What we know for sure is that everyone loves her.
This school must be something...
Scary sister in charge of the dormitory and the president of student council.
Ét... something.
Nagisa-chan.
Let's go to the cafeteria.
Okay.
Fourth year student?
can you guess what the new transfer student might be like?
Maybe she's really pretty.
What?
I can't wait to meet her!
Percival.
Do you know about the transfer student?
thank you.
No problem.
Be careful.
Did you hear the rumors about the new transfer student?
Tsukidate-sama?
What?
No...
I mean yes...
Umm...
Did you hear about the new transfer student?
I'm not interested in Miator's transfer student.
Hikari.
I don't want you to like anyone except me.
they might get the wrong idea about us...
Transfer student...
This is the cafeteria.
I think you should meet Étoile before your meal.
Yes!
Seems like they all have their eyes on me...
This is the transfer student.
She's here to meet the Étoile.
I'll just get up and...
I'll just get up and...
Excuse me!
Étoile-sama!
I just transferred to this school today.
First year student... oops...
I'm Nagisa Aoi and I'm a fourth year student.
Umm... nice to meet you!
Nagisa-chan!
We meet again.
The girl from this morning!
so you remembered.
I'm honored.
How could I forget?
You approached me all of a sudden and... and...
No!
Where do you think you are?
We're in front of Étoile-sama!
Étoile?
That's right!
She's more important than the president of the student council!
So... so in a place like this...
In front of a very important person...
No!
we can.
What's going on?
How come she can do this?
How?
Why?
Shizuma!
That's enough!
Why are you stopping me?
It's time.
Nagisa-chan!
Nagisa-chan!
everyone.
Étoile?
Shizuma Hanazono.
What?
É...
É...
Ét...
Ét...
It can't be...
Nagisa-chan.
Dear Lord...
We thank you for this food.
And we ask that you bless it and make it to nourish our bodies.
She's Étoile?
The representative for all 3 schools?
The person that they all love?
and the Holy Spirit.
Amen.
I...
I...
I...
I can't believe this!
That was some debut!
To be approached by Shizuma-sama... the Étoile.
Debut?
I guess my Nagisa-chan is too cute.
Tamao-chan...
Don't move!
Okay.
Such beautiful hair.
We have to take good care of your hair from now on.
I think I came to an unbelievable school...
What's going to happen from here on?
I feel sad.
I feel sad.
That's what my heart was feeling.
This isn't good.
I'm dreaming about this deep guilt that is taken away from me.
Please give me eternity.
I bite my finger and wait for seduction.
My glass doll.
I want to break apart inside your arms.
You are my destiny.
Touching you gently is not enough.
I want to cry and want you to cry as well.
Kiss my tears.
and that is our secret.
Tamao-chan.
Étoile-sama is... it means a star.
Étoile is the one who sits at the very top of all 3 schools.
Really?
Nagisa-chan.
Lower-class students who were marked by Étoile...
Shizuma-sama was... was...
What happened to them?
Étoile.
I can't tell you any more than this!
My heart swings like a pendulum...
It flutters to the right and feels sadness to the left but sad at the moment.
Let's keep staring at each other!
and adolescence...
Those words are commonly used.
understand my frustrations!
you can be in a mature relationship with childlike feelings.
this passion is somewhat familiar.
I have dreams that go beyond my admiration.
even though I'm just a young girl.
I know...
I know I'm not the only one.
Everyone is feeling shy and it's unstoppable...
What makes me want to see you?
Amane-sama!
You're amazing!
Amane-sama!
What is this feeling?
Anxiety?
No.
Sadness?
I don't know.
Something I never felt before...
I feel something in my heart...
Thorny Trap
Just as I suspected.
Huh?
What do you mean?
Amane-sama and Hikari-chan.
What about Amane-san and Hikari-chan?
Amane-sama has been calling out to Hikari-chan and she's talking to her with a radiant smile.
So?
What do you mean "So"?
Amane-sama never approached anyone like that before.
but...
She's in love!
Amane-sama is in love!
It sounds so sweet.
You think so?
Amane is in love?
Yeah.
But I think it's still small-scale and not that serious.
Is it a problem?
That's right.
Since I will be running in the Étoile election it's possible that she is going to be an obstacle.
you're keeping an eye on Amane that much?
To a point where you notice her in small-scale love.
It's only natural that I find out what my rival is up to.
And...
The sunlight called Amane is about to shine on a flower...
Where is this flower receiving its wind?
Amane senpai...
You're practicing even during your lunch break.
Yeah.
The tournament is just around the corner.
Looks like they're going to see me off in an exaggerated way.
Hikari?
O-of course!
I'll definitely see you off!
Umm...
Sorry.
I should leave before it gets noisy.
Yes.
Good luck with the tournament!
Thanks.
Amane-san.
President...
Did you think about what I told you the other day?
I thought I said no.
Why won't you accept them?
What do you mean?
Many people are still waiting outside.
They're desperate to give you gifts.
If you accept their gifts then you automatically qualify for an Étoile candidate.
You're thinking too hard.
Then why?
I can't accept gifts from everyone.
It's never-ending.
Then you should choose which ones you want.
You have the right to do so.
I don't have that kind of right...
Hikari Konohana.
What if she brought you a gift?
Your tie is crooked.
I'll do it myself.
That's better.
Thanks for your time.
Yaya-chan.
Praying?
You couldn't give it to her?
Yeah...
She's never accepted any gifts from anyone.
The rumor going around about Amane-sama.
Does it bother you?
right?
Yeah.
Then you have to pluck up your courage and see her.
then she'll never know how you feel...
Yaya-chan...
Don't worry!
Hikari.
I'm sure she will understand...
Yeah.
President.
Maybe you should just give up on Amane-kun.
You're right.
It's a waste of time.
Putting her interest aside...
I don't think she's qualified for the position.
We should look for another.
We should look for another.
No.
I felt it after talking to Amane-san.
You feel that she has the qualifications to compete in the Étoile election?
That's correct.
Should we pick the flower then?
We should.
Hikari Konohana...
I just have to shift her feelings towards me.
Then Amane's feelings are going nowhere.
They won't be answered.
Kaname?
It might get interesting.
I don't see any progress so far.
but they just make eye contact and smile.
...make eye contact and smile.
I see.
Both Amane-sama and Hikari-chan are shy.
but...
What can we do?
This is difficult...
You're right.
She'll never know how you feel...
What are you writing?
A way to pick a flower.
I see...
Done.
Momomi.
I guess you'll have to be a honeybee.
Honeybee?
Honeybees are responsible for delivering pollen to the flower.
Fine.
I'll fly anywhere you want me to.
But you see a honeybee is rewarded with honey after delivering the pollen.
You can have as much honey as you like.
Hikari Konohana.
What do you think about her?
Hikari-chan.
Hikari-chan.
Huh?
Y-yes?
right?
right?
Yes...
You're the student council's...
I have something to give you.
This.
Someone gave this to me.
She wanted me to deliver this to you.
Someone?
Let's just say she's someone special to you.
What?
Someone special?
Here.
Thank you very much.
No problem.
I'm just a honeybee...
What?
Wow!
Looks like the entire school is seeing her off.
Yes.
Spica's equestrian club is one of the best in the nation.
They're eagerly sought after in many tournaments.
Really?
That's amazing.
Amane-sama?
Yeah...
She wants to meet me before they see her off with the ceremony.
I'm definitely going to try and give it to her this time.
I see.
That's good.
Good luck.
Okay!
Hikari...
The ceremony is going to start soon.
Kenjyo-sama?
Hey.
Sorry to keep you waiting.
What?
When is this going to start?
Soon.
Look.
Even Étoile-sama showed up.
The ceremony is about to begin.
What are Kenjyo-san and the rest doing?
You wrote this letter?
Hikari.
I thought you'd be happy.
Amane is busy preparing for her ceremony.
She can't possibly come here.
Amane-sama...
Where's Hikari?
Where do you think you're going?
Please let me go.
You don't have to worry about Amane.
she wouldn't care.
Do you know Icarus?
Do you know Icarus?
What?
Icarus flew too close to the sun and fell.
You'll never be able to get close to the sun called Amane.
There's no need to be sad.
I'm also the sun.
See?
You can touch the sun if it's me.
touch me.
Hikari.
Hikari?
Amane senpai!
I'm going!
Amane senpai...
Nicely done.
It's much more fun taking you down like this.
Thank you for seeing me off.
Étoile-sama.
Amane-san is amazing.
I can see why Hikari is crazy about her...
That's odd.
What?
I don't see Hikari.
There's no reason why she wouldn't see Amane-sama off...
You're right.
Something bothering you?
What?
Seems like you're feeling uneasy...
I'm fine.
I see...
Probably just my imagination.
Good luck with the tournament.
Thank you very much.
Uneasy?
I'll definitely see you off!
That's strange.
I don't see Hikari Konohana anywhere.
I don't see Kenjyo-san and Kiyashiki-san either.
What's going on?
Ready to go?
Hikari-chan.
Where do you think you're going in such a hurry?
Hikari.
She said she was going to meet around here...
Hikari!
Are you here?
Hikari!
This is...
Bright sun...
Blue sky...
Leaves are rustling in the breeze...
Even nature is blessing the two lovers.
Are you sure this is the path?
Yes.
This way is faster.
Hikari!
That voice.
Yes...
Hikari?
That's Yaya-chan.
Yeah.
Good luck with the tournament!
Hikari...
Hikari-chan?
Let's split up and find her.
Let's split up and find her.
Okay.
No!
but I have no choice.
But there's no need to worry.
My love is wonderful.
You'll soon forget about her.
Amane that is.
No!
Stop it!
No!
Hikari!
Hikari-chan!
Hikari-chan?
Amane-sama?
Amane-sama?
I'll be right back!
Starbright!
Take me to Hikari!
I'm counting on you!
Let me go...
Hikari!
No...
Hikari-chan!
Amane-san?
Stop.
You gave me a hard time...
You'll understand my greatness soon.
Hikari!
Kaname.
What is the meaning of this?
Amane senpai!
You just interrupted us lovers.
Amane.
Lovers?
It doesn't look that way at all.
If you don't want me to take her away then I suggest you put a collar on her.
Are you okay?
Y-yes...
You have to be careful.
Some people might force you to do things.
Yes.
Hikari.
this...
Thanks.
A scarf!
Nagisa-chan?
Amane-sama just accepted her gift!
Yeah.
Hikari-chan looks happy.
Yes.
Something huge has happened!
Can I pick that flower?
What?
There's no need to give up after failing once.
right?
Honeybees have stingers.
Poisonous stingers that is...
I can sting her heart with ease.
Amane senpai...
Hikari...
I feel sad.
I feel sad.
That's what my heart was feeling.
This isn't good.
I'm dreaming about this deep guilt that is taken away from me.
Please give me eternity.
I bite my finger and wait for seduction.
My glass doll.
I want to break apart inside your arms.
You are my destiny.
Touching you gently is not enough.
I want to cry and want you to cry as well.
Kiss my tears.
and that is our secret.
we're going to wear summer clothes starting next week.
Are you ready?
We're wearing summer clothes already?
Nagisa-chan.
I see.
I love summer.
But we still have the rainy season to go through.
Make sure you have your rain gear.
Hydrangea.
There's mold on the cake I was planning to eat today!
You need to take good care of your food as well.
Dream?
(day dream)
Just an ordinary dream...
(sweet dream)
But my heart... (always) ...is shaking. (always)
After experiencing love... (missing) ...my lips... (wishing) ...only called out to you in sadness.
respond to my thoughts quickly.
come and embrace me.
Bold confession...
My heart desires this.
and a drop falls down.
but I blame it on the tears.
Let's make a promise.
We're going to come across each other many times in a dream.
If the day never breaks no one will win or lose.
If the morning never arrives...
When the new Étoile is elected tomorrow what kind of expression will I greet them with?
When I became the Étoile back then what kind of expression did I have?
What was I thinking?
long time ago.
Beginning
It's cold.
Chikaru-sama?
Weak.
Étoile election is the biggest event in Astraea.
The auditorium is always full.
There aren't enough seats for everyone.
That's why I created this club!
That's why I created this club!
Harbinger Club
Chikaru-sama is the president of student council.
right?
Huh?
Percival...
What do you think?
I know.
I'll give my seat to Percival.
isn't it?
Yeah.
Percival will be happy too.
Kizuna-chan!
Don't fall asleep!
Kizuna-chan.
Kizuna!
Shizuma.
Good morning.
Miyuki.
Are you sure?
Yes.
Excuse us.
What is the meaning of this?
I wanted you to do it for me.
so I don't know if I can do it right.
I trust you.
Shizuma?
Yes...
Tsubomi-chan.
Don't mention it.
I knew Yaya senpai wouldn't do anything.
Is everything ready?
Hikari-san?
Just a moment.
look.
This ribbon's color represents Spica.
Candidates running in the Étoile election must wear a colored ribbon representing their school.
Yaya-chan.
Hikari...
Please...
Turn around.
Yaya-chan...
Hikari.
You're just like an angel.
Hikari.
Yaya-chan.
I'm coming.
Hikari.
Yes.
There.
All done.
What do you think?
It looks cute.
really good.
Nagisa-oneesama.
Really?
Let's go.
They're gone.
Étoile election is about to begin.
but I feel kind of sad.
If you're sad now then you'll be really sad when the Étoile election is over!
Since the ones who will be Étoile are...
You're right.
I should go clean the room and get ready for tonight.
Get ready for what?
Getting ready for tonight's tea party.
Tea party?
You mean after the Étoile election?
it helps them relax.
but...
Can I go too?
Of course.
Can Hikari senpai and Yaya senpai come too?
Of course.
we'll all be friends again.
Um...
I'll go and tell Yaya senpai about it.
Yes.
okay?
I know.
Étoile election is about to begin.
I know which side is going to win.
There's no point in watching it.
What are you saying?
You must be stupid for not watching Hikari in her moment of triumph.
I'm stupid!
I stay here because I want to.
Suit yourself.
I will.
It's about to start.
Yes?
Is something wrong?
I want to cheer them on with Percival.
Nagisa-oneesama.
Sure!
Amane-sama!
Hikari-sama!
They look wonderful!
Nagisa-chan.
Are you okay?
Yeah.
Please look at me.
I'm fine.
Let's go.
Yeah.
Nagisa-san and Tamao-san.
They're so cute.
And of course Amane-san and Hikari-san are just perfect.
A manly prince and a pretty princess.
They're really wonderful.
But the other two girls of the same age are helping each other out.
but don't you think that's appealing?
Nagisa-san is very popular among the younger students.
I can't wait to find out the results.
ex-Étoile-sama?
Shizuma.
What is it?
It's your turn.
I know.
Thank you very much.
So you're finally here.
I wanted to find the answer to what you said.
Good luck to both of you.
Shizuma-sama.
You two look very attractive.
Thank you very much.
We'll do our best for Miator.
Good luck.
And now we will begin the final competition for the Étoile election.
Nagisa-chan.
Shizuma.
Shizuma?
wait!
Rokujyo-san!
Where are you going?
Don't worry.
Shizuma-sama won't be needed for a while.
You're right.
Amane Ootori solemnly swear to do everything in my power to protect Hikari Konohana.
Yes...
Thank you very much.
It's delicious!
I've never had tea this good!
Étoile-sama.
Hurry!
why are we running?
In the name of the Harbinger Club we have to get to the dance hall faster than anyone else!
So fast!
See?
Isn't it delicious?
Yes.
It tastes better after they're crushed.
I'm sure they'll blossom beautifully again.
This dance will decide the winner.
Nagisa-oneesama...
They're both wonderful.
Nagisa-san and Tamao-san are dancing perfectly with light steps.
It's wonderful.
I'm amazed.
I didn't think this dance would be this good.
Nagisa-chan...
It was wonderful!
All that's left is the voting and the results.
we'll be the first ones there.
We won't give in.
Nagisa-oneesama...
Nagisa...
We will have the results shortly.
Please wait for a few minutes.
And now I would like to give you the results.
What?
Nagisa!
Shizuma-sama.
Shizuma!
Why?
Shizuma-sama...
Shizuma...
She came back.
Nagisa!
I love you!
Nagisa!
But... but...
She just can't help it.
Tamao-chan...
Nagisa-chan.
Tamao-chan...
Shizuma-sama!
Nagisa.
Let's go.
What?
Let's go!
Shizuma!
Shizuma!
She's unbelievable.
but that's the real Shizuma.
Nagisa-chan.
Congratulations...
Are you okay?
Yes.
What should we do now?
What should we do?
What?
You didn't plan anything?
Can't help it.
I came up with the idea of snatching you just a while ago.
I see...
For the time being...
Yes?
We should just flee for a while.
Yes!
We will begin the swearing-in ceremony of the new Étoile in a moment.
This year's Étoile will be from Saint Spica girls' academy and they are Amane Ootori and Hikari Konohana.
I don't feel like we've won at all.
but...
I'm very happy.
Is that weird?
I feel the same too.
Finished!
Me too.
Thank you very much.
I really would like to keep believing and say that there is a tomorrow.
A girl keeps on telling the story forever.
Inside you...
There is a flower that lies within you.
I want to wake up that flower before someone takes it away from you.
Tea Party Club
Welcome back Nagisa-chan.
Dream?
(day dream)
Just an ordinary dream...
(sweet dream)
But my heart...
(always) ...is shaking.
(always)
After experiencing love...
(missing) ...my lips...
(wishing) ...only called out to you in sadness.
respond to my thoughts quickly.
come and embrace me.
Bold confession...
My heart desires this.
and a drop falls down.
but I blame it on the tears.
Let's make a promise.
We're going to come across each other many times in a dream.
Le Rim.
The Astraea School Festival involving all three is about to begin.
And the biggest event will be "Carmen" starring the students of Strawberry Hall.
Rumors are going all around the school about this event.
I'm playing the main role of Carmen and in charge of the wardrobes so I'm busy and there's very little time to sleep.
But I'll do a great job with my role of Carmen.
I'll shine brighter than anyone on that gorgeous stage...
Backstage
This must be the bullring in the fourth act.
It's the very last act.
So I did my best with this.
Wow!
It's nicely made.
We have all the small props.
This is Carmen's wardrobe.
Wow!
It looks wonderful.
So cool!
Thanks.
Rokujyo-sama.
Everyone is waiting for the rehearsal to begin...
I'm sorry.
I was just checking the set and staff members...
Great.
The performance is set for tomorrow but the important director and actor arrive late.
Maybe they're not feeling enough pressure... one more time.
We'll start from the fight scene between the captain and José...
Action!
Hey!
Where's the sound of the bell?
I'm sorry!
We can't keep it going if you don't do your jobs!
How many times do I have to tell you!
Stage program director!
Stage program director!
Yes!
so bring me a new sword.
A new sword?
She should be more gentle with these...
I'm sorry.
They said it's going to be a while to fix it so...
What is this?
Go find me something else.
Yes!
Looking down on me...
I will not give up on you!
We'll meet again...
Humph!
So what?
Mizushima-san.
When the two are about to leave...
I want you to shine a light on Carmen.
And then Carmen will say her line.
Humph!
So what?
Got it?
Yes.
I can't deal with this anymore!
This is the fifth time!
How many times do we have to do this?
let's take a break.
What?
Jeez!
Quit screwing up already!
I don't like this tea.
Can you get me a milk tea instead?
Sure!
Nagisa-chan.
I'm all right.
I'll be back.
Thank you.
You've been a great help.
What don't you like about us?
That's not what I meant.
I just want you to choose your words carefully.
Everyone is getting pretty nervous about tomorrow's show.
I think the director and the stage program director are irresponsible.
What?
That's right.
Planning for the show is terrible.
What time do you think it is?
I guess we were a bit careless with the way the stage and performance were handled.
But everyone is trying their best...
I've had enough.
I'm going home!
let's do that!
I can't deal with this stupid thing anymore.
Wait!
Wait!
Wait!
Please wait!
Nagisa...
Please wait!
Our jobs are done.
Yeah.
There's no need for us to stay here any longer.
Let's hope the staff does their job right during the actual show.
But please stay with us until the very end!
we all did this together for the last several weeks...
I don't want everyone to go in separate ways on the last day.
Everyone in school is looking forward to our play.
So we have to work together to make a play that everyone is going to enjoy.
I don't care about that.
I can quit if I want to.
What?
But it's going to be hard to find a substitute for the roles at this point...
Move!
Nagisa-chan!
Is she okay?
Set that took two weeks to make...
I'm sorry.
I'll fix it!
I'll fix it no matter what!
You won't be able to fix it in time.
It's all over now...
I guess this is the end of the traditional Strawberry Hall plays...
No!
We'll do it no matter what.
Étoile-sama...
With people that are willing to do it.
Tamao-san.
Yes?
Can you rewrite the script?
What?
You can shorten the captain and Micaela's dialogue.
You can even cut it if you want.
I'm counting on you.
Yes!
Nagisa-kun.
Can you grab the other end?
Amane-san...
We can make it happen if we all work together.
I've always wanted to do some construction work.
right?
I'm ordering you as your student council president!
We'll do it... everyone.
the damaged set has been restored.
Sorry for the trouble!
everyone.
I know you are tired from working all night.
But let's all do the rehearsal from the very beginning.
What?
bright angel!
For thou art...
As glorious to this night...
Kagome-chan looks so cute...
Really?
I wanted to be in the play too.
Wow...
This is unbelievable!
It's really packed!
It's really packed!
Yes!
we will present to you the play "Carmen" from the students of Strawberry Hall.
It's going to start.
Chikaru-san looks marvelous!
She looks so cool!
Yes!
I have fallen in love...
Carmen...
Étoile-sama...
Now!
It's the sound of the bells.
I must go back!
Don José!
We'll finish this next time!
José?
How can I go back now?
I disobeyed my captain in order to protect you.
I decided to live with you from that day on!
José...
Carmen...
You did great.
it's your turn.
and is about to die any minute!
Fine...
But Carmen!
I won't give up on you!
We'll meet again!
Humph!
So what?
She nailed it!
Amane senpai...
Momomi...
I wonder what kind of performance Amane will show us...
I can't wait to see it.
Olé!
Sister!
Amazing!
It's perfect!
Yes!
Chikaru-sama's Carmen...
It's a huge success!
Carmen.
I love you so much.
I really love you too...
I'm going to win the match today at the festival!
I'll win it for you!
Escamillo.
I sprained my ankle!
I can't dance because of the pain.
that is unfortunate.
My Carmen!
She sprained her ankle when she protected me from the fall!
What?
Étoile-sama!
Ad lib a duel!
right?
Sister Chikaru...
Escamillo!
Let's have a duel!
With pleasure!
She can't continue like this!
I'll be fine...
Étoile-sama?
Nagisa-chan.
You're the one.
What?
You have to be the substitute!
Stop!
I'm begging you.
Stop fighting...
That's it!
Escamillo!
You're the hero of Seville.
You're the star of the festival!
Now go!
José.
I'll get you one day!
It's too bad.
Even though that shoe trick worked.
Yeah... eh?
She's not bad.
Carmen!
I love you so much!
I quit the dragoon and became a thief because of you.
You know exactly what I'm talking about!
Humph!
So what?
I'm free to do whatever I want.
I can't lie about my feelings!
Hey Carmen!
I'm begging you.
Let's go to a faraway town and start over again!
I won't!
You see this ring that you gave me?
Take that!
He must have won!
I have to go!
Wait!
Carmen!
Carmen...
Carmen...
Carmen...
Carmen...
Carmen!
you were amazing!
It was a huge success!
Nagisa-chan.
On top of the night that is holding things down...
Many roses grow on a day unknown...
At the house on the edge of the forest...
Star of Virgo shining brightly...
Nagisa.
It was really fun for me to be on the same stage as you...
Nagisa...
Étoile-sama...
Amen.
I'm standing by your side...
But are you immersed in such a good book that you don't notice me?
I'd like to take a look.
and you called out to me gently.
so let's go back to the past.
The leather bound book...
I remembered a sweet episode we had back then.
but we touched each other.
Tell me that you're happy.
You're smiling.
I was embarrassed so I ran away!
Come and get me.
You know everything that's going on.
But you're just teasing me.
You want to receive the punishment of love?
KISS
fall is about to end soon as well.
You're right.
It gets cold in the morning and at night.
It's a season that makes you feel sad.
Maybe it's a good idea to read a poem during this time.
That's a great idea!
I want to hear your poems!
Nagisa-chan.
What?
"Secret.
fall...
Dream?
(day dream)
Just an ordinary dream...
(sweet dream)
But my heart...
(always) ...is shaking.
(always)
After experiencing love...
(missing) ...my lips...
(wishing) ...only called out to you in sadness.
respond to my thoughts quickly.
come and embrace me.
Bold confession...
My heart desires this.
and a drop falls down.
but I blame it on the tears.
Let's make a promise.
We're going to come across each other many times in a dream.
Le Rim.
The school festival involving all three is about to begin.
And the biggest event is the drama festival which the junior and high school students from each school's drama club and Strawberry Hall students participate in.
And the highlight is the acting done by us from Strawberry Hall.
Carmen
Heroine
Huh?
Tamao-chan?
Nagisa-chan...
What happened?
Don't you have club activities?
I have more important things to worry about.
you see...
The students have cast their ballots and the most popular plays were... and "Carmen.
I'd like to choose one from those three for this year's play with Strawberry Hall.
I feel that the "Phantom of the Opera" is the most suitable.
But we did the "Phantom of the Opera" five years ago.
I have to say "Carmen.
Plays done in the past ten years have been tragic like the "La Dame aux Camelias" where the heroine is often toyed around with by the male character.
So I thought "Carmen" would be nice since it offers a female toying with the male with mystical charm.
Please.
right?
Yes.
we take turns...
Spica and Le Rim are providing the actors and Miator is working as stagehands.
Étoile-sama has to star in the play as well.
So if you think about it... right?
As for the role of Don José...
I feel that our Spica's Amane-san is appropriate for the role.
That means Le Rim won't be able to provide any of their actors...
It's a play entirely by Strawberry Hall.
So I don't really mind who provides the actors.
Are you sure about this?
Yes.
Then let's go with "Carmen.
Shizuma-sama's Carmen and Amane-sama's Don José.
President Rokujyo?
But don't you think that's rude?
President of Le Rim is also a strong candidate for the main role as well...
Plus the one who decides all this is President Rokujyo of Miator.
and decided to make Shizuma-sama and Amane-sama as the actors... but it seems like you really want Amane-san to be in it.
what are you saying?
I was just...
Hold it.
Please stop fighting amongst yourselves.
Étoile-sama?
Nagisa-chan.
President of Le Rim...
Seems like they're arguing...
Seems like they're arguing...
Oh my!
What are you people doing?
Have a good day.
You too.
Rokujyo-sama.
Umm...
We decided to do "Carmen.
Really?
Tamao-chan.
Tamao-chan.
Yes!
Tamao-chan planned this play "Carmen"...
And it'll be played by Strawberry Hall!
Wow!
That's amazing!
What's "Carmen"?
What's "Carmen"?
What?
Carmen" is...
Umm...
Then let me explain.
Carmen" was written by a French author named Merimee and the story takes place in the southern part of Spain.
It's also a famous opera created by Bizet.
I see.
I see.
Don José of the dragoon is attracted... and he falls in love with her.
so he is toyed with and dumped by Carmen.
Don José is of course full of jealousy and he ends up killing Carmen at the bullring.
that's the story.
That's scary.
But sounds interesting.
do you think you can write the script?
Me?
Yes.
I would very much like that.
Please write a wonderful script for us.
Yes!
I'll do it!
I'll do my best!
I'll make a script that will be hailed as the best in the history of the Astraea plays!
Good luck!
Yes!
Yes?
These cookies are really good.
I wanted you to have them.
Thank you... when you write a script... right?
Who is playing Carmen?
What... right?
And Don José is Amane-san.
Right?
I can't think of a better person than Amane-san for the role of Don José...
I...
I can't wait.
I'm sure Amane-san will look very nice on stage...
She's really pushing hard.
You're like a very popular writer.
Nagisa-chan...
I guess Étoile-sama is perfect for Carmen.
I kind of want to see Carmen played by Étoile-sama... did you hear about it?
Strawberry Hall is going to do the play "Carmen"!
Is Étoile-sama going to play the role of Carmen?
Then she'll be playing the main role again after last year's "Madame Butterfly"!
what's this "Carmen"?
what's this "Carmen"?
What?
Who's playing the role of Don José?
Isn't it Amane-sama of Spica?
But I heard Chikaru-sama of Le Rim is also a good candidate.
But I really want to see Étoile-sama and Amane-sama together!
The fear is often greater than the danger.
If she's that popular around school then President Rokujyo won't be able to ignore it!
There are rumors going all around the school about "Carmen.
The most popular one is Étoile-sama as Carmen and Amane-sama as Don José.
I want to see Étoile-sama as Carmen too.
Tamao-chan.
Who do you think of when you're writing the script?
Who do you think should play Carmen?
so...
Étoile-sama and myself?
Yes.
You two are the most popular candidates for the main roles.
I'm really looking forward to it as well.
This is bad.
I honestly don't want to be in the play.
Really?
Amane-san!
Everyone wants to see the play with you and Étoile in it.
then you'll have to do it no matter what.
But I don't think I can act...
What are you talking about?
Was there ever a thing you couldn't do?
You can do anything!
But...
Hikari?
Hikari?
Well...
Right?
Yes.
Umm...
Good luck with the script.
Don't work too hard.
- Nagisa
Nagisa-chan... but you are the third most popular after Étoile-sama and Amane-sama!
I'm honored.
To be third after those two.
But you would be better playing the role of Carmen!
Her acting skills are just as good as Étoile-sama!
Kiss.
10!
That's not fair.
I don't mind.
As long as I can make the wardrobe.
I even told Rokujyo-sama that I want to be in charge of the wardrobe.
But... what do you think about this design?
Wonderful!
Wonderful!
Cool!
Really?
things will get very busy.
Yes!
What are you doing here?
Étoile-sama... so I didn't want to bother her...
I see...
Umm...
I'm really looking forward to the play...
To see you play Carmen...
But I played a main role last year.
It won't be exciting if I play the part.
It can't be...
I don't know if I'm going to play Carmen but can you help me with the lines when I get my role?
Yes!
I did it!
I'm finally done!
Tamao-san.
Really?
This is a really good script.
I'm glad I asked you.
Thank you very much!
we'll announce it before dinner!
Yes!
Tamao-chan.
Nagisa-chan...
She's really observant...
I'd like to announce the main cast members for the drama show.
you'll get the list for them later.
I'd like to make the announcement.
Playing the heroine of Carmen...
Chikaru Minamoto of Le Rim.
What?
What?
What?
It can't be!
it's going to be Chikaru-san.
Yes.
Yay!
Sister Chikaru!
Congratulations!
Rokujyo-sama.
but who will be in charge of the wardrobe?
but it would be great if you can do both.
thank you very much!
For the honor and pride of Strawberry Hall I'll do my best with this role.
Next is the role of Don José who gets toyed with by Carmen and kills Carmen in the end because of jealousy... the Étoile.
who has an illicit love affair with Carmen...
Playing the role of Captain of the dragoon is Kaname Kenjyo of Spica.
What?
Playing Don José's fiancé Micaela is Momomi Kiyashiki of Spica.
What?
Playing Carmen's lover Escamillo is Amane Ootori of Spica.
What?
I...
That is all.
Please give a round of applause to these five main actors.
Rokujyo-sama is really something.
What?
Chikaru-san was one of... but she had the best performance.
I see...
Nagisa-chan?
let's see...
Stage program director.
What do I have to do?
You'll be near the wing of the stage and making sure that performers can get on and off the stage smoothly.
Sounds like hard work.
We have a situation!
Everyone wants to see Étoile-sama as Carmen!
But the cast for the Strawberry Hall play is not decided by a popular vote.
It's important for us to make sure that the audience enjoys our great performance.
Do you think they'll be happy by not seeing what they want?
I can't believe you're letting the lead do the wardrobe and acting!
But she will be able to do those tasks just fine.
Plus...
I think I gave much consideration to Spica...
What?
Carmen played by Chikaru-san of Le Rim.
Don José played by Shizuma-sama of Miator.
So I gave the other main roles to the people in Spica.
They're very important roles.
Plus you people have the most students.
I don't think you could ask for more than this.
Excuse me!
Tamao-san.
I'm going to meet with Chikaru-san to discuss the set and wardrobe.
Can you attend the meeting as the scriptwriter?
Yes!
That's amazing!
Good luck!
Yes!
Chikaru-sama's Carmen is rather a surprise.
I can't wait to see it.
Sister Chikaru's acting ability is absolutely amazing!
She'll play a Carmen that will surprise everyone.
Why do you always go back to that subject?
listen!
Our junior high department will play "Romeo and Juliet." Is that okay?
Yes!
I'm Romeo!
I want to play Romeo!
Then I want to be Juliet!
I want to be Juliet too!
Chiyo-chan.
What?
right?
You're right...
Come on!
You shouldn't decide things on your own!
I want to play Romeo too...
You want to play Romeo too?
Then let's do a lottery!
Lottery!
Lottery!
Lottery!
Lottery!
Lottery!
Lottery!
Lottery?
scissors?
scissors... scissors...
Great...
How about this?
It looks great.
It's beautiful.
One!
Two!
Three!
Four!
Five!
Six!
nine!
Ten!
Kagome-chan is Romeo!
No way...
Romeo.
Wherefore art thou Romeo?
And I'm going to play the role of Juliet!
Applause!
right?
Serves her right.
so that she can gain a footing in the Étoile election.
But out of the three of us Amane's role sounds the best.
That's if she can play her part till the end.
Right.
Stage is like a living organism.
You never know what might happen.
Amane senpai...
Hikari.
Carmen
Carmen This is bad.
Carmen
I don't think I can do this...
Please let me help you.
What?
I want to see you act.
My Carmen...
I love you very much.
I quit the dragoon and became a thief because of you!
You know exactly what I'm talking about!
Humph!
So what?
I'm always...
A free woman!
I can't lie about my feelings!
you shouldn't be laughing...
Étoile-sama!
Jeez...
I'm really trying my best...
I'm sorry.
Thank you.
Nagisa...
Étoile-sama...
I'm standing by your side...
But are you immersed in such a good book that you don't notice me?
I'd like to take a look.
and you called out to me gently.
so let's go back to the past.
The leather bound book...
I remembered a sweet episode we had back then.
but we touched each other.
Tell me that you're happy.
You're smiling.
I was embarrassed so I ran away!
Come and get me.
You know everything that's going on.
But you're just teasing me.
You want to receive the punishment of love?
KISS
everyone loved your script!
And then the two got closer...
They can even feel their breath...
How can you can write that kind of scenario.
You're really good.
Eyes staring at each other become moist... you're still writing something?
Nagisa and Tamao finally...
"Backstage.
And then the two...
Ah...
Tamao-chan?
My heart swings like a pendulum...
It flutters to the right and feels sadness to the left but sad at the moment.
Let's keep staring at each other!
and adolescence...
Those words are commonly used.
understand my frustrations!
you can be in a mature relationship with childlike feelings.
this passion is somewhat familiar.
I have dreams that go beyond my admiration.
even though I'm just a young girl.
I know...
I know I'm not the only one.
Everyone is feeling shy and it's unstoppable...
What makes me want to see you?
I like summer.
bathing suit... seaside school.
I love them all.
I don't mind doing summer homework.
I don't mind the rain or thunder either.
But... and ghost stories.
Please...
Memory
Thank you for inviting me.
Thank you for inviting me.
Welcome.
Did I schedule you to come tonight?
look.
Look at this.
my!
They're wonderful!
and I just got them today.
They're fresh.
We should eat them right away.
Then I'll go prepare the tea.
what happened to Nagisa-san?
What's going on?
you see...
Nagisa-san's school bathing suit just arrived today.
Nagisa-san!
Please open up!
Nagisa-san.
No!
Everyone is going to see you at the pool anyway.
I don't want people to see me there like this!
Stop resisting!
then oneesama is going to find out.
We got some tasty treats from a famous patissier.
It's too bad you can't join us... but...
Too bad.
this cake looks delicious!
I think I'll try this millefeuille.
They said this gâteau chocolat is great.
I can't decide what to eat.
right?
right?
Yes.
Ta-da!
my!
So cute!
it looks good on you!
I think it's good.
Stop!
hate it!
Nagisa-chan.
Cheer up.
We have some cakes.
What?
Really?
you really have a sweet tooth.
What's wrong with that?
Nagisa-san is so cute.
so there's no need to be embarrassed.
Hikari.
Hikari.
There's no need to cry.
What?
I wasn't crying.
Huh?
But I just heard crying...
What?
This voice...
Whose voice is it?
Could this be...
What?
Hikari-chan and Yaya-chan saw a ghost?
It's not a ghost.
After they left our tea party they heard a girl's crying in the hallway.
That must be "the girl in the hallway.
Right.
It's one of Strawberry Hall's seven wonders.
Seven wonders?
There are a total of seven wonders in Strawberry Hall.
Nagisa- chan?
No.
Let's see...
"mirror in the dance hall" "gallows in the attic"...
"piano that plays on its own" "7th door" "stain in the basement"...
"Laughs in the conference room"...
Huh?
What is that?
On the wall of the basement that is off-limits there's a stain that's in the shape of a person...
What?
As for mine...
The sound of laughter can be heard from an empty conference room.
The ones who heard that voice...
No!
I didn't know Nagisa-chan was such a scaredy-cat.
Much worse than I expected.
Chihaya and I differ in one of the seven wonders...
Those seven wonders are a bunch of nonsense anyway.
they're going to be different for each person.
Aren't you going too far to say they're a bunch of nonsense?
But they are.
Nagisa-chan.
Okay... everyone.
Professor.
It's time for your morning service.
and study verses 1~14 in the 148th psalm in the Book of Psalms.
Are we ready?
Yes.
Tamao-chan?
what is this?
I asked away at the people who knew about the seven wonders in Strawberry Hall.
many people couldn't remember all seven.
Really?
the girl from the class next door.
Even an upperclassman.
Ms. Oosaki.
Our homeroom teacher is from Miator?
Yes.
She's a respected senpai.
some people mentioned seven wonders that are different from others.
So it's pretty interesting.
of the seven wonders Chiyo-chan knows... five are the same.
they only have two in common.
I see... don't tell me you were...
Yes.
I've been trying to decide what to put in our... and I thought about putting something that is related to this research.
Really?
What kind of article are you going to write?
I'm thinking of researching "the girl in the hallway" for the time being.
What?
That's the one Hikari-chan and Yaya-chan encountered... that's right.
Yaya-chan.
Hikari.
Ugh...
We're both floating in the sky.
Yeah... your break is over.
Okay.
Last night?
You mean the story about the hallway?
Do you like ghosts?
Don't say ghosts.
Oh my.
We're doing some research on the seven wonders.
Like where you heard the voice or how it felt.
Can you tell us anything about that encounter?
I believe we heard the voice around the corner on our way home.
Shifting point near the Spica building.
Let's see...
I think the voice kept coming from different places.
right?
so maybe the voices could reverberate... but...
What kind of voice did you hear?
Well...
Ah!
Hee!
Looks like your naked body was more shocking than a ghost.
Right...
What?
Why do you say that?
Nagisa-chan.
What?
I found out something that's interesting.
There's a strange trend concerning the people that know about this "girl in the hallway.
Strange trend?
Are you interested?
Yeah.
so I can't really say much.
But our current students all know about this phenomenon.
Some of them might have a totally different answer but they all had "the girl in the hallway" in common.
Right.
But when we asked the ones who graduated the number of people who knew about it was much less.
People who are five years older than the sixth-year student knew about it but the ones who are six years and up didn't know about this phenomenon.
People who are five years older...
That means when the current sixth-year student first entered the school those people were staying at Strawberry Hall?
Nagisa-chan.
Maybe this phenomenon started just recently.
The girl in the hallway"...
I wonder how it goes... you see...
What?
Several years ago on a certain night one of the students from Strawberry Hall left her room alone.
And then she never returned...
Huh?
I'll do more research tomorrow by focusing on the upperclassmen.
Nagisa-chan?
okay?
Sure.
I can't sleep.
Can I sleep with you?
Nagisa-chan.
It's okay...
I'll be just fine like this.
This is the first time we've slept together in the same bed.
Yeah.
To tell you the truth...
Yes?
and I thought about asking you several times to sleep with me.
my...
Nagisa-chan?
Know what?
both you and your partner will have the same dream.
Tamao-chan.
okay?
Okay.
Nagisa-chan.
The seven wonders of Strawberry Hall...
Yes.
One of them called "the girl in the hallway"...
Silly.
What?
You shouldn't go around asking people about unscientific things like that.
But there are people who said they heard voices...
I'm sorry but the meeting is about to begin.
The girl in the hallway"...
Did you ask Miyuki about that?
What?
Who's Miyuki?
Miyuki Rokujyo.
she said I shouldn't ask such unscientific things.
Then I'll have to say the same.
No comment.
What?
But you just have to tell me if you know it or not...
I already told you the answer.
No comment.
That's all.
The seven wonders of Strawberry Hall?
Of course I'll cooperate.
I know about "the girl in the hallway.
I was told about it when I first entered the dormitory.
I knew it!
Fifth-year student Chikari-sama is familiar with the phenomenon.
Sounds interesting.
Can I ask you some details?
Sure.
Everyone up until the fifth year knew about "the girl in the hallway
There were some sixth-year students who only knew a little.
the older they are the less they knew.
Ones who graduated more than ten years ago didn't know about this at all.
It was unbelievable when I first entered school.
I heard one of the senpais heard the voice too.
What?
Really?
When the current sixth-year student first entered school maybe someone spread the rumor?
Or maybe something strange did occur that year.
Are you interested in this?
Of course.
I want to know anything strange about Strawberry Hall.
Aren't you scared?
Nagisa-chan.
Do you know how long this Strawberry Hall has been around?
Well...
It was created when Miator first opened so that means it's been around almost 100 years.
Wow.
this building has housed girls our age and has been doing so for a very long time.
This wall has been listening to what we had to say.
and other thoughts.
don't you think that a strange phenomenon like this suits this kind of building?
Tamao-chan.
You were still awake?
Nagisa-chan?
we did all this research together...
You're right.
Nagisa-chan?
Okay!
I feel like I'm not scared of anything.
That's good to know.
right?
Yeah.
I'm not scared.
I'm fine now.
I'm okay.
I'm okay.
What?
Is that really it?
Could it be?
I'm okay...
I'm okay...
I'm not scared.
I'm not scared... look!
I'm not scared...
I'm not scared...
Oh.
A cat?
So the cries of "the girl in the hallway" were the cries of a cat after all.
Yes.
I'm sure Hikari-chan and Yaya-chan heard the same sound.
You might be right.
It has to be.
I'm sure that the cries the senpais heard five years ago came from the cat as well.
Are you sure?
It has to be.
Are you really sure?
I'm sure of it.
okay.
Miyuki...
Miyuki...
What?
This is where you were crying?
Shizuma.
I know you feel homesick since it's your first time being in a dormitory.
It's becoming a rumor all over the dormitory.
About the cries being heard from the hallway.
I'm sorry...
You don't have to apologize.
I'll be fine starting today.
Really?
I'll do my best.
I'll be more mature.
That's because...
Shizuma.
Then we don't have to sleep in the same bed tonight.
No!
right?
Just for tonight...
Tonight is the last time.
Miyuki.
Miyuki.
Yes!
Page 22.
Um...
Tenth line on the fourth one.
powerful nations would marry each other.
This policy to bring peace has...
I'll be more mature.
I'll be strong just like you one day.
next person.
Omaezaki-san.
Yes.
That was rare.
It's just not like you.
Keep it steady.
Thanks.
Keep it steady...
Nagisa-chan.
Tamao-chan.
Sure...
I have something to tell you.
What?
It's about "the girl in the hallway.
I wasn't able to finish the article.
What?
So I decided to research the other seven wonders.
That means... there are six more.
I'm sure we'll get a big one this time.
No...
No more!
I feel sad.
I feel sad.
That's what my heart was feeling.
This isn't good.
I'm dreaming about this deep guilt that is taken away from me.
Please give me eternity.
I bite my finger and wait for seduction.
My glass doll.
I want to break apart inside your arms.
You are my destiny.
Touching you gently is not enough.
I want to cry and want you to cry as well.
Kiss my tears.
and that is our secret.
Tamao-chan.
This is what I think.
Studying is the most important thing for students.
You're right.
But it's important to study every day.
That's right.
So it's too late if you try to cram everything before an exam.
That's just a waste of time.
Private Lesson.
you'll get much worse.
I don't want to hear it!
My heart swings like a pendulum...
It flutters to the right and feels sadness to the left.
but sad at the moment.
Let's keep staring at each other!
and adolescence...
Those words are commonly used.
understand my frustrations!
you can be in a mature relationship with childlike feelings.
this passion is somewhat familiar.
I have dreams that go beyond my admiration.
even though I'm just a young girl.
I know...
I know I'm not the only one.
Everyone is feeling shy and it's unstoppable...
What makes me want to see you?
A year ago
Do you believe in angels?
They laughed at me and made fun of me.
But I always believed.
I transferred to Saint Spica all girls' academy a year ago and was feeling Lonely.
That day I saw an angel.
Prince on the White Horse
Accept the purity on behalf of the mother's star...
What's wrong?
What is that?
What is that?
That's Spica's choir.
Choir?
There's an important event taking place tomorrow so they're practicing really hard.
An important event?
Nagisa-chan?
Tomorrow is...
Tomorrow is the day that Miss Amane Ootori and the rest of the equestrian club are returning home.
Only thing we can do is to sing for them.
Let's greet them warmly by singing our song perfectly.
A mistake will not be tolerated.
Yes.
I hope I can sing well tomorrow.
I hope I can perfectly sing a song of celebration for Amane-sama.
Hikari.
Yaya-chan.
Are you feeling nervous?
It's just...
I kind of understand.
This is the very first time you get to sing on a center stage.
Plus you're singing for someone you admire.
I can't sleep.
Here she comes!
Where?
Congratulations!
Congratulations!
She's Miss Amane Ootori.
One of the five stars of Spica.
She's a fifth year student.
She's really popular.
It's safe to say that she's the second most popular person after Étoile-sama.
Really?
So cool!
Amane-sama!
It's Étoile-sama!
Huh?
Étoile-sama?
This is part of her job.
She congratulates those who have done well in certain events.
Amane-sama did well in both the individual and team matches this time and won the double crown.
Tamao-chan.
She's great all right.
Tamao-chan.
What?
You know everything.
Yes.
Congratulations.
Étoile.
Hanazono senpai.
Relax.
Try to make yourself more comfortable.
But we'll be in front of a large audience...
We're going to sing in front of Amane-sama.
Think of her as a pumpkin.
Amane-sama is not a pumpkin!
Just think of her as a strawberry or whatever you want.
then the rest will be easy.
Okay.
Get the first phrase right.
Fine.
Everyone.
Are you ready to go?
Yes!
I have to sing well to congratulate her.
Noble like the white lily...
Noble like the white lily...
Hikari!
Noble like the white lily...
Hikari...
Noble like the white lily...
Then bill 25 will be up to the principal to decide.
but...
Don't you think it's time to plan the battle for Étoile?
Battle for Étoile?
This is the year for Saint Spica girls' academy to make one of its own as the Étoile.
I'm certain that Miss Amane Ootori can represent Spica and be the next Étoile.
I'm not so sure about that.
She certainly is popular and has talent.
But there's a huge problem.
Problem?
Amane-kun doesn't have any interest in becoming the next Étoile.
Momomi?
That's right.
Plus she doesn't have much experience.
But she's definitely the best candidate for that position.
Let's hope that she will compete...
We'll make it possible for her to compete.
Let's make it happen.
so don't oversleep.
I'll wake you up with a kiss.
Good night.
Yaya-chan.
I'm not going to practice tomorrow.
You're not?
Hikari...
I'm going to quit the choir.
You're going to quit the choir?
Why?
I was feeling very sad...
I wasn't trying to impress her in any way...
It's just...
I wanted to sing for Amane-sama...
That's the only thing I can do for her.
You still have an opportunity.
You just have to sing better next time.
Hikari...
Hikari...
One year ago...
I saw an angel.
Miss Amane Ootori.
She was definitely an angel.
Hey Hikari.
Do you want to meet Amane-sama?
What?
Do you want me to help you?
Amane-sama doesn't have any partner right now so you have a chance.
But it's okay...
I just want to look at her from a distance.
I fell asleep...
Back then...
This is where I saw an angel.
So cool!
I wanted to congratulate Amane-sama by singing for her.
Noble like the white lily...
Strange rose's color is ruined...
Like green leaves growing out in the field...
Queen of heaven smiles beautifully.
Morning.
Good morning.
You must be the third year student...
You must be the third year student...
It's Hikari...
Hikari Konohana.
That's right!
Hikari-chan.
I thought that an angel was singing.
What?
I can't believe what I'm wearing.
You must be an early-bird.
No...
I just couldn't sleep... what are you doing... what are you doing...
Amane.
I'm sorry?
You can call me Amane.
Amane-sama...
No need for to call me Amane-sama.
what were you doing this early?
I was practicing.
Practice?
I can't practice with ease...
Amane-sama!
Amane senpai.
huh?
I don't want to be the center of attention.
Really?
It's embarrassing.
I'm sorry.
You finally smiled.
What?
You kind of looked sad.
Amane senpai... so it was because of yesterday... right?
It's still cold outside.
I'll be fine.
you're going to catch a cold.
I was feeling nervous during my very first event.
You were?
I was really nervous and had a terrible score...
Didn't you think about quitting?
Not wanting to go through that embarrassment again...
I did.
I still think about quitting.
But you see... and mortified on many occasions.
I'm sure I'll go through them again but I had so much more fun and good times.
Fun and good times...
Well?
It's warm.
Right?
I have lots of good things locked inside.
Is your heart warm as well?
I...
Umm... your jacket...
I'll take you to Strawberry hall.
I'll take you to Strawberry hall.
What?
Come on.
Umm... senpai...
I'm sorry that I couldn't sing well yesterday to congratulate you.
But you did congratulate me.
What?
You sang for me before.
Umm... thank you very much.
I almost forgot.
Yes?
Will you sing for me again?
What?
Starbright seemed to like it too.
Your song that is.
Let's go!
I thought that an angel was singing.
You're wrong...
I'm not the angel.
It's warm...
Welcome back.
You're already up?
I'm sorry if I made you worry... tell me what exactly happened.
Now Hikari.
Come on...
It's Spica's choir.
Yes.
It's beautiful.
I don't know whether this path leads to the ocean leads to the ocean...
I kept believing.
an angel would come and smile at me...
I feel sad.
I feel sad.
That's what my heart was feeling.
This isn't good.
I'm dreaming about this deep guilt that is taken away from me.
Please give me eternity.
I bite my finger and wait for seduction.
My glass doll.
I want to break apart inside your arms.
You are my destiny.
Touching you gently is not enough.
I want to cry and want you to cry as well.
Kiss my tears.
and that is our secret.
I think it's time to clean our room.
Why all of a sudden?
A student from a lower-grade is coming to visit us next week.
and she does chores for students of an upper class.
I wonder what kind of student is coming here.
We'll just have to wait and see.
Younger Sisters.
Our room is clean now.
Then let's make it a little messy so that she can clean it for us.
Dream?
(day dream)
Just an ordinary dream...
(sweet dream)
But my heart... (always) ...is shaking. (always)
After experiencing love... (missing) ...my lips... (wishing) ...only called out to you in sadness.
respond to my thoughts quickly.
come and embrace me.
Bold confession...
My heart desires this.
and a drop falls down.
but I blame it on the tears.
Let's make a promise.
We're going to come across each other many times in a dream.
Amane senpai...
I'll always be waiting for you.
I believe that someday you will remember me again.
Waltz three... three... three... so you try to match her movements.
That's why it's not working!
I-I'm sorry.
Tamao-chan.
I'll do it better next time.
let's pick up where we just left off.
Yes!
Is Nagisa-san going to be all right?
Tomorrow is the last day to enter the election and the competition is scheduled for the day after.
She got better with her walking and other movements but her dancing is still off.
We'll just have to count on Shizuma.
I'm sure she'll do something about it.
But I'm relieved.
Shizuma-sama is feeling much better now.
You're right.
She went through so much.
I sure hope you're right.
What?
It seems like she's pushing herself too hard.
Um... it's you...
Th-That scarf.
What about this?
It's nothing...
I have to go to practice.
You sure worked hard.
Tougi-san and Kanou-san were both happy.
They said you're feeling much better.
I see.
But...
It seems like you're just trying to forget something.
just like always.
Don't worry about me.
Amane senpai?
Lord.
Thank you for providing us with this meal.
Please bless this food and care for our body and soul.
Your will... just as always...
She approaches me as if nothing ever happened between us.
But she's...
Nagisa-chan?
welcome back.
how did it go?
the sister gave us special permission.
We can use the hall.
That's great!
I was afraid we might not get to practice tonight.
I can now dance without making any mistakes.
What?
Hikari-san?
She hasn't come back to Strawberry hall!
Same with Amane-sama!
Fine.
I'll ask the sister to open the gates.
I'll go.
Thanks.
Amane senpai...
President!
Did you find her?
I see...
She's not at the room or the chapel either.
I wonder where she went.
Hikari...
Amane senpai...
You...
Thank you.
You found it.
What?
I was looking for that.
It was blown away during practice.
It's my important item.
I don't remember who gave it to me but I feel it's a very precious thing.
So I kept it with me all along.
Amane senpai...
Kenjyo-san?
Thank you.
Tomorrow is the last day to enter the election.
I'm sorry.
But I can't think about the Étoile election right now.
But... then Spica is just going to have to forfeit.
I'm glad to hear that.
What?
There's no reason to send someone else instead.
She has to be it.
She is the chosen one.
I was dreaming.
I thought Amane-san could make all my dreams come true.
But instead I was just forcing my dreams onto her.
And now Amane-san suffered an injury but I can't do anything for her.
All I can do is worry about her.
I can only sit here and wait for her return.
That's all I can do...
Take me home?
But aren't you going back to Strawberry hall?
I have to get up early in the morning to take care of Starbright.
Then I'll go with you!
No...
I won't go home even if you tell me to!
I want to stay by your side.
But...
Why were you there?
I was searching too.
Amane senpai...
An important thing for me...
But I don't remember anything.
I'm happy...
I'm just glad to know you feel that way.
Somewhere inside your heart you and I are connected.
So...
Don't cry...
You're going to make me cry too.
So...
Noble like the white lily...
Strange rose's color is ruined...
Like green leaves growing out in the field.
Queen of heaven smiles beautifully...
Where is our Holy Mother who shines brightly?
Where have I heard this?
I feel like I've heard this song before.
just like this one...
An angel...
Noble like the white lily...
Noble like the white lily...
That's...
Noble like the white lily...
Strange rose's color is ruined...
Like green leaves growing out in the field.
Queen of heaven...
Hikari...
Amane senpai?
Amane senpai!
Hikari...
That's right...
This is the place where I first met Hikari and I wanted to tell her how I truly felt about her.
Amane senpai...
You're the most important person in the world to me.
There's nothing to fear now.
We'll always be together.
It's morning already.
Hikari!
Amane-san!
I told my true feelings to Hikari.
Then...
You regained your memories!
Hikari!
Hikari.
I'm glad!
I'm glad!
Yaya-chan...
Amane-san...
I can finally get over Amane now.
I think I can walk on my own path now.
Momomi?
Amane-san?
Yes!
That's great.
Yeah!
I see...
Amane-san and Hikari-san...
Yes...
They officially made their announcement and entered the Étoile election.
Now...
I can finally hand over this greenhouse to the new Étoile without worry.
You're still withered and hardly keeping up.
I'm sorry.
You have to express more.
then it doesn't become a dance.
Nagisa-chan...
I'll show it to you myself.
What?
But this will be the first and the last time.
First and the last?
Right.
So dance with confidence.
Come...
Shizuma?
Look closely at my eyes.
Yes...
That's it...
Then you have to dance joyfully by connecting with your heart.
Dance joyfully by connecting hearts...
Right.
then your body will react naturally and you will display a wonderful smile.
Nagisa-san is...
Wonderful!
she was being helped by Shizuma's dancing... she's in unity with Shizuma.
I guess she's a better dancer with Shizuma-sama.
this is our first and last dance.
Nagisa.
You're really wonderful.
There are no regrets for loving each other.
We need to remember the times we loved in our hearts.
Nagisa-chan.
These two are so beautiful and proud.
This dance that is so gorgeous and elegant...
This is my first time seeing something like this on Astraea hill...
Shizuma-sama...
Nagisa...
Nagisa.
Shizuma-sama...
Remember that feeling you just got from dancing.
Yes.
Dancing is like love.
You have to express the happiness and joy you feel from love with your body.
I'm sure you two can do it.
Étoile-sama.
There's nothing left for me to teach now.
You two just have to do it with confidence.
Thank you very much.
I would like to introduce the candidates who will be representing Miator in the upcoming Étoile election.
Tamao Suzumi and...
Nagisa Aoi...
We would like to announce that we will be representing Miator in the Étoile election!
This is the end.
We did everything we had to do.
All we need to do is to wait for the graduation in March.
This is what you wanted.
Shizuma?
I'm standing by your side...
But are you immersed in such a good book that you don't notice me?
I'd like to take a look.
and you called out to me gently.
so let's go back to the past.
The leather bound book...
I remembered a sweet episode we had back then.
but we touched each other.
Tell me that you're happy.
You're smiling.
I was embarrassed so I ran away!
Come and get me.
You know everything that's going on.
But you're just teasing me.
You want to receive the punishment of love?
KISS
Next Episode keep holding onto my hand.
Please?
Yes.
Our journey is going to end.
Even if our paths were to branch off and even if one of us lets go of their hand.
I won't forget this warmth in my hands.
Beginning.
I'll never forget you.
Dream?
(day dream)
Just an ordinary dream...
(sweet dream)
But my heart...
(always) ...is shaking.
(always)
After experiencing love...
(missing) ...my lips...
(wishing) ...only called out to you in sadness.
respond to my thoughts quickly.
come and embrace me.
Bold confession...
My heart desires this.
and a drop falls down.
but I blame it on the tears.
Let's make a promise.
We're going to come across each other many times in a dream.
I don't even know if there is a god.
But a year ago during spring...
I skipped my choir practice.
And I met an angel...
More than Friends
Hikari-chan is not coming?
No...
Is she sick or something?
No.
It's not like that...
We just received some tea from Assam for the summer.
I was planning to make some of Hikari-san's favorite milk tea tonight...
What's wrong?
Well...
What's that?
I brought some cake that I made during cooking class.
It looks delicious.
It's baked really well.
I was thinking what I should do with an extra piece...
It's okay.
I'll eat two pieces.
You're just like a little kid.
What?
I can't have two?
Let's see.
I guess you can take one home for Hikari-san...
Well...
I have a favor to ask you...
Good night.
Yaya-san didn't seem too happy...
She probably had a fight with Hikari senpai.
You weren't feeling too happy either.
What?
That's not true.
Really?
Really!
What's with that look?
nothing...
Tamao-chan...
Tamao-chan.
Yaya-chan is...
No!
Hikari... why?
Why did you do that?
I...
Listen...
Listen...
No!
No...
When did Yaya-chan leave?
Just before you got up.
did something happen between her and Hikari-chan?
That's what I'm guessing.
Tamao-chan?
No...
Plus if it happened between those two then it might be rude for me to intervene.
But I'm worried.
Yes...
What's that?
It's coming from next door.
How could you say that?
You clumsy idiot!
What are you doing?
You stupid!
What are you doing?
You stupid!
I'm not stupid!
you started it!
you started it!
A fight?
Seems like it.
You idiot!
You idiot!
You're the idiot!
Then you're fat!
What did you just say?
Why did you do that?
You violent woman!
Are you sure they'll be okay?
It's nothing new.
It happens at least once a year.
A fight between those two.
I see.
I don't know whether this path leads to the ocean...
In a dense fog...
You...
I believe you were Hikari's...
Hikari is at choir practice.
Aren't you part of the choir too?
Yes.
You have an interest in horseback riding?
not at all.
That's too bad.
See ya...
Chihaya-chan sews a good-luck charm on Mizushima-san's archery uniform.
but she didn't tell her.
She just said she wouldn't wear it.
That's why Chihaya-chan got mad.
But Mizushima-san said Chihaya-chan didn't sew it on right.
You shouldn't think seriously about their fights.
It's endless.
Why?
They always start fighting all of a sudden and... they're back to normal again.
I see...
I wonder if Yaya-chan was able to make up with Hikari-chan.
Who knows... that dress...
Yes?
Nagisa-chan?
I'm going out for a bit!
Nagisa-chan.
This isn't it...
Tamao-chan.
Aoi-san?
Oosaki sensei!
What are you doing here?
Here.
These are the missing items for this year.
Thank you very much.
I hope you find what you're looking for.
Is this my ribbon?
Yeah.
The one you gave me during summer vacation.
so I just went to go look for it.
So that's why you went out in such a hurry.
Thank you.
There's no need to thank me.
that's the ribbon you gave me.
I'm the one who lost it...
And I had forgotten about it till today.
I should be the one to apologize.
Tamao-chan.
Tamao-chan?
The ribbon that you went out to get for me is even more important to me now than ever before.
I'll treasure it forever.
Thanks.
But what's this...
Let's keep it this way from here on.
Then you'll be mine forever.
I can feel relieved.
Tamao-chan...
Ouch!
You suck!
Be quiet!
Go away!
Ouch!
Let me do it.
I can do it myself... right?
It won't be good if you injure your finger.
What don't you like about this?
sometimes the charm gets caught on the breastplate.
That's odd.
I sewed it on just like last year's... you grew taller again.
That's why your arrow gets caught.
Am I right?
Yeah.
Why didn't you tell me you grew taller?
Then I could've sewed it on by moving it a few inches away.
But you noticed that I grew taller last year without having me tell you about it.
Really?
Really.
I see.
That's why you were so happy last year.
And you wanted me to notice again this year?
Noriko Mizushima.
Don't call me by my first name!
Mizushima.
You wanted me to notice your height?
Be quiet!
I heard this from Tsubomi-san but it seems Yaya-san skipped today's choir practice.
I knew it...
But we don't know the reason why.
Then we don't know how to get her back together with Hikari-chan.
If Hikari-chan and Yaya-chan bind themselves with a ribbon like this maybe they can make up.
Maybe...
It doesn't have to be a ribbon.
We just need something to bind them together.
What?
What do you mean?
It's getting late.
Let's talk about that tomorrow.
Okay... which bed should we sleep in?
Which one should we sleep in?
Hello.
She's not here.
Yaya senpai.
Yeah.
It's not like I'm worried or anything.
But...
This isn't like you two.
Yeah...
Hikari senpai.
I'm sure Yaya senpai is the one to blame...
Tsubomi-chan.
What?
But I wasn't...
Nagisa-san?
It's my first time being out here.
It's just the back of a chapel.
You can even get here by walking from the outside.
But no one comes here?
No.
They have no business being out here anyway.
you know how the choir practices in the chapel?
I used to come here every time I skipped practice.
So this is Yaya-san's...
Yes...
This is the place for me and my best friend... a favorite place for me and my best friend.
Choir practice should be ending soon.
My best friend?
your good friend.
I want you to tell me the favorite spot for you and your good friend.
Favorite place for me and my good friend...
Follow me please.
Hikari-chan.
Hikari senpai.
Hikari is not coming.
She's definitely not coming.
Hikari...
She doesn't remember this place anymore.
That's because she has a more important place.
Plus I'm not even Hikari's best friend anymore.
That's because I...
I was the one who destroyed our friendship.
Yaya-san.
Hikari...
You remembered this place?
That's because this is an important place...
Yaya-chan.
Noble like the white lily...
Strange rose's color is ruined...
Like green leaves growing out...
Huh?
Wait!
I'm sorry.
Why are you apologizing?
You didn't do anything wrong.
But...
You must be a transfer student.
right?
Yeah.
Noble like the white lily...
Strange rose's color is ruined...
Like green leaves growing out in the field...
Queen of heaven smiles beautifully.
It shines brightly...
I'm Yaya Nanto.
I'm Hikari...
Hikari Konohana.
Let's sing together.
Okay.
This is the place where I first met you...
That's why I'll never forget about it.
Hikari...
Hikari.
I'm sorry for what I did.
I guess I wasn't myself that day.
I'm really sorry.
No...
I was surprised and I did such a terrible thing to you...
I'm sorry.
It's okay... please be my best friend forever.
I had a cooking class today so... these are baked really well too.
Tsubomi-chan.
so I just brought the leftovers.
Huh?
But there are seven pieces.
You're right.
There's an extra piece.
That's for a person who wants to eat two pieces.
What?
For me?
Who else would it be?
What?
I'm sure that I met an angel that day.
But that angel wasn't just for me...
I'm standing by your side...
But are you immersed in such a good book that you don't notice me?
I'd like to take a look.
and you called out to me gently.
so let's go back to the past.
The leather bound book...
I remembered a sweet episode we had back then.
but we touched each other.
Tell me that you're happy.
You're smiling.
I was embarrassed so I ran away!
Come and get me.
You know everything that's going on.
But you're just teasing me.
You want to receive the punishment of love?
KISS
it's almost time for the school festival.
I can't wait!
And then the two got closer...
They can even feel their breath...
Are they going to have food stands?
I wonder what they'll have.
Eyes staring at each other becomes moist...
I want to eat some fried noodles and an oden broth.
the two... what are you writing?
"Heroine.
the two...
My heart swings like a pendulum...
It flutters to the right and feels sadness to the left.
but sad at the moment.
Let's keep staring at each other!
and adolescence...
Those words are commonly used.
understand my frustrations!
you can be in a mature relationship with childlike feelings.
this passion is somewhat familiar.
I have dreams that go beyond my admiration.
even though I'm just a young girl.
I know...
I know I'm not the only one.
Everyone is feeling shy and it's unstoppable...
What makes me want to see you?
The school I transferred to is an all girls' school that has a long history.
and everything they have is old...
I thought maybe they'd have some mysterious passages or secret rooms.
right?
Attic
hurry!
There's no need to rush.
But...
I asked the girl next door to come as well.
So I'll go get her.
What?
Next door?
right?
I'll be right there.
Umm... my name is...
Nagisa-chan.
We're in the same class.
My name is Chihaya Takemura.
Call me Chihaya.
Chihaya... chan.
Tamao-chan told me she was giving you a tour of Strawberry hall on Saturday so I asked her if I can join you.
I'll show you some fun places.
You should look forward to it.
Yes!
Nagisa-chan.
right?
You're absolutely right.
I almost forgot.
We have one more person.
One more?
Hey!
That hurt!
Her name is Mizushima.
Nice to meet you.
Nice to meet you.
Nice to meet you!
The second floor consists of double rooms with first to fourth year students.
dining hall and other public facilities are mostly located on the first floor.
Really?
Wow!
This lounge is bigger than I thought!
We also use this place for dormitory events.
Nagisa-chan.
Do you want to go to the interesting room I told you about after this?
let's go!
Chihaya-chan and Mizushima-san have been roommates for four years?
then you have to room with the same person.
Plus we were always in the same class since kindergarten.
Since kindergarten?
That's...
That's...
12 years.
12 years?
Then you're like married couples now.
What?
Then Nagisa-chan and Tamao-chan are like newlyweds.
Nagisa-chan?
They said we're like newlyweds!
What?
What's that supposed to mean?
Who are the newlyweds?
Shizu...
Umm...
Étoile-sama.
You surprised us.
what are you doing here?
Wherever my cute Nagisa-chan goes I'll go there as well.
What?
I can't.
my body still freezes...
I'm just really worried that someone might try to make a pass at you.
I would like to say the same thing to you as well.
Huh?
I thought I heard something...
What?
Any luck?
No...
Thank you.
You just saved me.
Maybe Étoile-sama pretended to be sick again.
I'm guessing she has a meeting to prepare for tomorrow's event.
She really surprised me.
I thought she came out to play hide-and-seek with me or something.
you know.
You're right.
Five!
Six!
Seven!
Eight!
Nine!
Ten!
Okay!
Detective Nagisa Aoi is here!
Wow!
Mizushima-san!
Tamao-chan!
Chihaya-chan!
What's the point of playing hide-and-seek?
It's better than taking a tour the normal way.
Yeah.
What should we do after this?
We'll go back to the first floor.
Should we take a look at the study hall?
Yeah!
and I get to be it again!
Saturday afternoon.
the final meeting before the event is about to take place.
Heads of the student councils from all three schools are present.
Étoile-sama is absent as always.
Just as I expected.
Rokujyo-sama.
she goes on to start the meeting.
She begins to explain the program for the event.
This also went just as I expected.
Toumori-sama.
She begins questioning Rokujyo-sama regarding the absence of Étoile.
This is also just as I expected.
they keep on disputing.
Everything went just as I expected.
With time running out this meeting is going to end in a stalemate in approximately...
I'm getting sick of everything going the way I expected...
Detective Nagisa Aoi is here!
Something unexpected has occurred...
How do you mistake this room for that one?
you will be...
President of Miator student council.
Finally.
I'm sorry for ruining your important meeting...
It's not your fault.
But... you should always knock before you enter.
This is a manner which you should follow.
Understand?
Yes.
I'm really sorry.
I agree with what Rokujyo-san said.
You saved us.
What?
Nice to meet you.
I'm Chikaru Minamoto.
President of the student council at Saint Le Rim girls' academy.
Did you feel like hiding?
Did you feel like hiding?
What?
It's Shizuma-sama's fault?
it's Étoile-sama's fault?
Right.
Since Shizuma-sama was absent from the meeting today we kept having an argument.
Nagisa-chan.
Every time there's an argument we keep going and going till the end of the meeting.
That's why you people argue?
It's because Shizuma-sama hasn't been doing her job as Étoile and keeps missing all the meetings.
they were making a big fuss because she wasn't at the luncheon.
Right?
Le Rim...
It is customary for all three schools to participate in many different events.
we have a joint student committee and meetings.
So the students play a key role in making these events happen.
And Étoile-sama brings all three schools together and represents them.
So if Shizuma-sama keeps on slacking off all the time then the events won't go as smoothly.
But you still have the student council.
Chikaru-san... it seems things don't go as smoothly with just the student council.
What?
That's right.
Miator is the oldest of the three and has kept its tradition and takes pride in their formalities.
and they excel in academics and sports.
They both consider each other rivals.
So when their student council members get together they always start an argument.
we need the representatives for all three schools.
Étoile-sama's presence is very important.
so if she doesn't show up every time it means that Spica has every right to keep on fighting with Miator.
And that's pretty much it.
All we do is argue at meetings every time.
I see.
but...
Umm...
I have a question.
What is it?
it's about Le Rim...
Aren't they competitive or have fights with the other schools?
We're free to do what we like and we're easygoing as well.
We don't get involved with that.
I see...
She's pretty and charming... can I?
It's not like that!
I just thought she was amazing.
Even though she's a president of student council she's really nice.
Plus she knows everything...
You're also charming when you panic as well.
Tamao-chan.
Nagisa-chan.
Yes?
Are you thinking about something?
There's something that I really don't understand.
Can you tell me about it?
you see...
I kept thinking about it after listening to Chikaru-san's story...
Why is Shizuma-sama not doing her job as Étoile?
right?
That Étoile-sama is the most loved and respected person by all three schools.
But why?
Tamao-chan?
I don't know the answer either...
I see...
What?
A welcome party for new residents of this hall?
Today?
When was this decided?
10 A.M. Welcome party for new residents of Strawberry hall.
Hosted by the student council of all three schools.
This was posted here for a long time.
So this is the event for today?
so am I invited to this party as well?
when they say new residents they mean the first year students.
Nagisa-chan.
so it's just first year students.
I guess you're right.
Are you okay?
I...
I'm fine.
Thank you very much.
No problem.
Be careful.
Yes.
Are you hurt?
No.
is Étoile-sama going to attend today's welcome party?
Of course.
I heard Étoile-sama is going to greet the new residents one by one.
Oh really?
I can't wait!
this party is supposed to be the very first time that the new residents get to meet Étoile-sama.
You're right.
When I was a first year student and was accepted into Strawberry hall I was very excited about this party as well.
But we can't do anything if Étoile-sama isn't here.
these things do happen.
This isn't right...
What?
so many first year students are eager to meet Étoile-sama.
And Étoile-sama is going to disappoint them.
I can't let that happen!
Nagisa-chan...
What are you going to do about it?
I'm going to find Shizuma-sama!
Then I'll ask her to attend the welcome party!
Nagisa-chan!
Hey!
Nagisa-chan!
You're right.
Nagisa-chan is right.
Interesting.
But Tougi-san and Kanou-san were both looking... but they couldn't find her at all.
Don't worry!
I just had a tour of the Strawberry hall yesterday.
I'll find her.
Fine.
Then I'll start preparing things so that Étoile-sama can join us.
Yes!
everyone!
Yes!
Okay!
Welcome party for new residents
This is the only room left...
It's open.
Empty room... but it's a single room?
Nagisa-chan?
Please come with me.
Why?
Everyone is waiting for you.
Please come.
Who asked you to find me?
Miyuki?
Or was it...
It wasn't like that!
I don't care who says what... right?
Étoile-sama is respected by everyone and loved by everyone as well...
Then you can't disappoint them!
There are first year students waiting for you and...
I almost forgot...
When she stares at me like that...
Why did you come all by yourself?
You and I will be together by ourselves.
Please...
This girl...
The new students...
They're all waiting for Étoile-sama.
Please...
Shizuma-sama?
You win...
Let's go.
What made you come here?
I'm doing my job as Étoile.
Thank God...
The welcome party was really wonderful.
Étoile-sama...
What?
Miss Nagisa Aoi.
Congratulations on transferring to Saint Miator girls' academy as well as entering Astraea dormitory.
Thank you very much.
Étoile-sama...
What a strange girl...
I wonder how she convinced Shizuma to come...
Right?
It's definitely going to get interesting from here on.
Amane Ootori.
I'll have to make her get serious.
There's no other way...
I feel sad.
I feel sad.
That's what my heart was feeling.
This isn't good.
I'm dreaming about this deep guilt that is taken away from me.
Please give me eternity.
I bite my finger and wait for seduction.
My glass doll.
I want to break apart inside your arms.
You are my destiny.
Touching you gently is not enough.
I want to cry and want you to cry as well.
Kiss my tears.
and that is our secret.
right?
Yes.
We have other schools named Spica and Le Rim.
do you know about the prince of Spica?
A prince?
I thought Spica was an all girls' academy.
Of course it is.
But they have a prince.
Prince on the White Horse.
Prince on the white horse.
Any girl would dream about that.
What?
I've never had a dream like that.
Dream?
(day dream)
Just an ordinary dream...
(sweet dream)
But my heart... (always) ...is shaking. (always)
After experiencing love... (missing) ...my lips... (wishing) ...only called out to you in sadness.
respond to my thoughts quickly.
come and embrace me.
Bold confession...
My heart desires this.
and a drop falls down.
but I blame it on the tears.
Let's make a promise.
We're going to come across each other many times in a dream.
Increased appetite in autumn.
More sleep in autumn.
Fine arts in autumn.
Reading in autumn.
Many trees are changing their colors and maple leaves are falling.
But there is something that excites us more at Astraea in autumn.
That's right.
Étoile election is coming up.
Secret
Entries for the Étoile election are starting soon.
right?
That's right.
No one is willing to become the Étoile and accept all the difficult tasks.
You're right.
I'm definitely not going to lose this time.
You picked a joker again?
I wonder who's running from Spica.
I guess Amane-sama isn't competing?
Amane-sama might not be competing.
So I think Kaname Kenjyo of student council is the strongest candidate.
I see.
Kaname-sama is also wonderful.
Maybe it's time to give up on Amane-kun.
Then who's going to represent Spica?
Étoile election that is.
What if Amane-kun doesn't run?
I wonder who's running from Miator.
Shizuma-sama will be graduating next March.
I guess she won't be running anymore.
Then who could possibly replace Shizuma-sama?
It might be difficult for Miator to get an Étoile this year.
Looks like it's getting more exciting.
Yes.
I just hope they can decide the next Étoile quickly.
So you won't have to do all this work anymore?
But you're still the Étoile.
I want you to finish these by today.
Tamao-chan.
What's the Étoile election?
You didn't know?
No.
It's like it's common knowledge so I felt embarrassed to ask.
Étoile election.
Officially known as...
Le Souffe de Dieu dase et Souleve un etoile.
Le Souffe de... it's an event to decide the next Étoile.
I see.
I didn't know Étoile is decided in an election.
How did you think they were decided?
I didn't think they were decided.
I thought Étoile-sama was Étoile-sama from the very beginning.
Nagisa-chan.
Several trials are given to the candidates in the Étoile election.
Trials?
Yes.
Beautiful figure as well as beautiful looks.
and delicacy.
Trusted by everyone and also a coach in life.
I see.
It's not easy trying to become the Étoile.
Yes.
Good morning.
Morning.
it's just...
Oh yes.
Do you want to go enjoy the autumn leaves with me?
Enjoy the autumn leaves?
but there's a place nearby that has leaves that are even more beautiful.
Enjoy the autumn leaves...
I'll go.
Great.
I'll try really hard to prepare a good lunch for us.
We need to wrap things up soon in order to get the Étoile position.
Momomi...
Don't worry.
Time is up.
We don't have much time.
At this rate...
No...
In order for Spica to produce the next Étoile Amane-san has to be in it.
Looks delicious.
I know.
I'll make Nagisa-chan's favorite fruit sandwich as well.
Nagisa-oneesama!
are you heading back now?
Yes.
Can I join you on your way back to Strawberry hall?
Of course.
And about the Étoile candidate from Miator.
Among us first year students Tamao-sama is considered to be the favorite.
Tamao-chan?
Yes.
Everyone just admires Tamao-sama.
I see.
Tamao-chan has good grades and she's also kind.
I can see why.
I...
Chiyo-chan!
Let's participate in the Étoile election together!
Nagisa-oneesama!
You're my partner!
Partner...
That sounds wonderful.
Partner?
I mean... well if you were to participate in the Étoile election I was thinking who you would choose as a partner.
What do you mean partner?
That's if you're running.
Only if.
I know that's a big if.
I'm not talking about that.
What did you mean by partner?
Yes?
That's the person you enter the Étoile election with.
Person you enter the election with?
You enter the Étoile election together.
You mean two people?
That's right.
You enter the Étoile election as a pair.
Then the two people go through many trials together.
Really?
You didn't know?
but what about the other one?
The other one is also Étoile.
both will be Étoile.
Both will be Étoile?
right?
Yes.
That's why President Rokujyo of student council is her assistant.
How come Shizuma-sama is the only Étoile?
I don't know about much in detail...
I wonder why.
Tamao-chan.
Yes?
Yes?
There's another Étoile?
I heard it from Chiyo-chan.
Two people are supposed to make up the Étoile?
That's right.
Two people that have strong trust for each other get chosen to be Étoile.
right?
Where's the other person?
What happened to that person?
Tamao-chan?
She passed away.
I see.
Shizuma-sama has changed since that incident.
you changed a lot.
What?
You're doing your job as Étoile now.
Plus...
What are you saying?
What was she like?
Well...
Can you let me think about it?
I don't know whether I should talk about the other Étoile.
Or...
Or?
I think we should go to sleep now.
She changed...
Shizuma.
Ever since that girl died...
And after that girl came...
Two people that have strong trust for each other get chosen to be Étoile.
Strong trust for each other...
Was it someone important to Shizuma-sama?
Can I help you?
Nagisa-san.
I didn't come to see her.
Thank you very much.
Hot!
So you didn't come to see Shizuma.
I...
Is this about the Étoile?
The other Étoile?
Yes.
I see...
I asked Tamao-chan about it too...
What did she say?
She needed some time to think about it.
Um...
Can you give me some time to think about it too?
What?
She was Shizuma's...
Not only was she a partner of Étoile but also a very important person to me as well.
Give me a little more time.
Sure.
right?
What?
Yes...
That girl came by.
That girl?
Nagisa-san.
What did she want?
She wanted to know what the other Étoile was like.
What?
I told her to give me a little more time.
I see...
She's trying to...
Nevermind.
right?
Why do I feel this way?
Étoile...
The other Étoile.
Shizuma-sama to me is...
You got better.
Well...
I practiced.
I wished I could play better and play with you again.
She liked this song.
She?
The other Étoile.
That's right.
Autumn leaves are beautiful.
Autumn leaves are beautiful.
Yes...
Let's go enjoy the autumn leaves tomorrow on Saturday.
Then is it alright if I bring Tamao-chan?
I promised to go with her too.
No.
What?
We're going to my cottage.
But...
I want you to hear what I have to say about her.
You...
Nagisa.
Okay?
Yes.
Thank you.
Yes?
Shizuma?
Nagisa-chan.
Where did you go?
I'm almost done preparing our food.
Only thing left for me to do is to make your favorite fruit sandwich...
Tamao-chan!
What?
Shizuma...
I'll tell Nagisa about it.
I see.
I'm really sorry!
I know we promised to go enjoy the autumn leaves.
right?
Sorry...
I want to know everything about Shizuma-sama.
That's because I...
I...
You think she can free you?
Free you from your past?
She might be able to...
You changed...
You used to be resolute.
Your heart wouldn't be moved no matter what.
Your heart was always like winter.
Frozen...
But that ice is beginning to melt.
Your heart is starting to get warm like spring.
Maybe it's all because of that girl.
I made you wait a long time.
A long time...
For holding on to my heart...
Miyuki.
Shizuma...
Please feel free to eat them.
We'll return to Strawberry hall before dark.
Yes.
I'm standing by your side...
But are you immersed in such a good book that you don't notice me?
I'd like to take a look.
and you called out to me gently.
so let's go back to the past.
The leather bound book...
I remembered a sweet episode we had back then.
but we touched each other.
Tell me that you're happy.
You're smiling.
I was embarrassed so I ran away!
Come and get me.
You know everything that's going on.
But you're just teasing me.
You want to receive the punishment of love?
KISS
Next Episode
Tamao-chan?
Yes.
I read it over and over again.
You're embarrassing me.
Nagisa-chan.
Was there a part where you had to read it many times?
like counting how many times you used the word "Autumn".
Ugh!
Storm of Love".
Nagisa-chan...
My heart swings like a pendulum...
It flutters to the right and feels sadness to the left but sad at the moment.
Let's keep staring at each other!
and adolescence...
Those words are commonly used.
understand my frustrations!
you can be in a mature relationship with childlike feelings.
this passion is somewhat familiar.
I have dreams that go beyond my admiration.
even though I'm just a young girl.
I know...
I know I'm not the only one.
Everyone is feeling shy and it's unstoppable...
What makes me want to see you?
If I had magical powers...
I'd try to let time flow by much faster.
Then I can let summer go by quickly...
We made a promise.
Promise?
we can see each other...
Amane senpai...
The Roar of the Sea
Looks like the president still plans on getting Amane to enter the Étoile election.
Seems like it...
There's still a possibility.
Let's just wait a little longer.
She just doesn't know when to quit.
You're right.
It's Kenjyo-sama and Kiyashiki-sama.
It's Kenjyo-sama and Kiyashiki-sama.
So beautiful!
But if Amane doesn't have what it takes to qualify for the election...
Either way we'll need to keep her under close surveillance.
What?
Next Sunday?
Yeah.
I'll be there.
Where do you want to go?
Anywhere!
huh?
how about a movie?
Movie?
You can get close to each other while watching it and you can even talk about it afterwards.
I highly recommend it for first dates.
A date...
It's not like that with Amane senpai...
Hikari?
Yaya-chan.
What do you think I should wear?
You look cute no matter what you wear.
Be serious.
I want Amane senpai to think I'm cute.
Let's see...
Maybe it's better to tell Amane in person.
In person?
That her actions might have negative effects on people around her.
Yeah...
That's a good idea.
if we ruin her relationship with that girl nothing can get in between our glorious future.
Momomi...
Yaya-chan.
Help me with the buttons.
Please?
okay.
It looks good on you.
Do you think Amane senpai would say the same thing?
I'm sure she'll say the same thing.
There.
All done.
Thanks.
right?
Yeah.
So you're going to the movies after all?
So you're going to the movies after all?
Yeah.
We'll meet at the station and then head into the city...
I see...
Oh no!
Look at the time!
Come on.
Hurry up!
I'm going now.
Say hello to Amane-sama for me.
Yaya-chan.
Konohana-san.
I need to talk to you.
Do you have a minute?
It won't take long.
What's this about?
It's about Kaname.
No!
it's Amane's turn.
Huh?
Hikari forgot her handkerchief.
Don't give me that look.
Hikari!
Didn't you hear?
We just want to talk to you.
Talk?
Hikari!
She's fast...
Amane-san.
Just the person I've been looking for.
I need to talk to you about something.
Talk?
global warming.
Global warming is caused by increased emission of carbon dioxide.
right?
right?
Common knowledge?
common knowledge.
a lot of people think it's common knowledge.
But...
There's no evidence that points to carbon dioxide as the main cause of global warming.
The phenomenon known as global warming is just a hypothesis.
Some people might make that claim.
I guess I'm an inarticulate person.
I'm telling you to be skeptical of common knowledge.
Common knowledge?
the common knowledge you believe... even though she's beautiful... even though she's wonderful...
You have to be skeptical of the dangerous part.
Take a good look!
Think about it!
I'm beautiful and wonderful.
But am I dangerous?
No!
I'll get straight to the point.
I don't want you to participate in the Étoile election.
I have no intention of being part of it.
I know.
But the people around you don't think of it that way.
They definitely know you're going to run.
That's what they're all expecting.
Why?
Konohana-san is a nice girl.
Think about it.
Even if you don't plan on running there are people that will suffer... many people are going to be hurt by your actions.
People who want you to be the next Étoile are dreaming a dream that will never come true.
They're a hindrance for a person wanting to be the next Étoile.
You need to do things more carefully.
That's the responsibility for the star of Spica!
Please let me go!
I can't do that.
That's because the moon is really beautiful.
What?
Souseki Natsume was a genius.
That's how he translated one of the English texts.
I love you.
right?
You should really think about it.
It's all up to you.
Konohana-san is not coming today.
She understood.
This is...
Why?
You should only think about me.
Then you'll forget about Amane.
Yaya-chan!
Go.
But...
Hurry!
Yaya-chan.
What are you planning to do?
I'm not planning anything.
You're lying.
Please don't do this kind of thing again!
I just simply love Hikari.
Do you have the right to interfere with our love affair?
Right?
That's right.
You don't have that kind of right.
It's true.
Only thing that can stop love is love itself.
Only thing that can stop love is love itself...
You think you can knock before you come in next time?
I'd like you to follow the rules of Strawberry Hall.
Amane senpai...
Amane senpai!
Umm... we're heading in the opposite direction from the city...
Yeah.
So pretty.
I like this place since it's quiet.
I wonder if Hikari made it in time...
Only thing that can stop love is love itself...
Umm...
I'm sorry!
What?
right?
We couldn't go to the movie either...
Sorry.
It's not like that.
What?
It's not like that...
Amane senpai...
What happened?
What?
You're missing a button.
It was nothing.
Did something happen with Kenjyo?
Hikari!
I'm fine...
Yaya-chan came to the rescue.
That's why you were late?
Those two...
It seems like I'm giving you lots of trouble.
Amane senpai!
But...
It's okay!
I'm happy as long as I'm with you...
That's all...
Thank you.
What?
I feel the same way.
I'm glad I was able to come here with you.
Amane senpai...
I don't want to inconvenience you anymore.
What?
Hikari.
Me too!
Was it right for me to let her go?
Yaya?
I believe her name was Yaya.
It was unexpected for sure...
Oh?
Are you depressed?
Since you let the girl escape again.
It's only a matter of time.
If I really wanted to...
I know.
Welcome back!
I found this on the floor!
I'm back!
Welcome back!
Yaya-chan!
Thanks for what you did for me today!
You're welcome.
You know what?
Amane senpai said she'll see me again!
I see.
I'm happy for you...
Yeah!
this is for... this is for...
A present for you.
A present for you.
What?
Here.
A cherry shell...
For me?
Yeah...
What?
Yaya-chan?
What's wrong?
I feel sad.
I feel sad.
That's what my heart was feeling.
This isn't good.
I'm dreaming about this deep guilt that is taken away from me.
Please give me eternity.
I bite my finger and wait for seduction.
My glass doll.
I want to break apart inside your arms.
You are my destiny.
Touching you gently is not enough.
I want to cry and want you to cry as well.
Kiss my tears.
and that is our secret.
Huh?
We weren't in this episode at all.
You're right.
No wonder we had so much free time.
What?
Does this mean we're not the main characters anymore?
Don't worry.
We'll be in the next episode.
right?
Right?
"More than Friends.
What's the difference between friendship and love?
My heart swings like a pendulum...
It flutters to the right and feels sadness to the left but sad at the moment.
Let's keep staring at each other!
and adolescence...
Those words are commonly used.
understand my frustrations!
you can be in a mature relationship with childlike feelings.
this passion is somewhat familiar.
I have dreams that go beyond my admiration.
even though I'm just a young girl.
I know...
I know I'm not the only one.
Everyone is feeling shy and it's unstoppable...
What makes me want to see you?
A flower in a greenhouse does not know rain.
A flower that blossoms outside in the rain... then which one is happier?
If they could talk what would they say?
Hydrangea
Percival...
Rain...
I'd like to borrow this.
Sure.
Ah!
Nagisa-oneesama!
okay?
Yes!
oneesama.
If you don't have an umbrella then we have ones that people left behind for use.
Extra umbrellas
Extra umbrellas It's okay.
See?
It's my favorite.
An umbrella with a pretty color...
If only we could share that umbrella...
Chiyo-chan.
oneesama?
Other people are waiting.
What?
Percival?
Getting wet...
Huh?
What's wrong?
Do you want to share an umbrella?
Percival is getting wet...
You're not alone?
I'm with Percival.
Will this prevent Percival from getting wet?
Yeah...
I'm glad.
Bye.
Percival...
Is she your friend?
So you let her borrow your umbrella?
Yeah.
I just couldn't leave her like that.
I guess it's very typical of you...
And what is her name?
I forgot to ask her name...
What should I do?
I don't have an extra umbrella.
Oh...
That means...
What's wrong?
It's nothing.
Until you get your umbrella back do you want to share my umbrella when it rains?
Tamao-chan!
No problem...
Now I get to share an umbrella with Nagisa-chan!
You couldn't decide what to write for the literature club's paper?
I guess you can look at it that way...
I'm sorry.
I must've borrowed lots of boring books.
Nagisa-chan.
Yeah?
It's nice weather.
It's nice weather.
Isn't it great?
Huh?
Isn't that Kagome-chan?
What's wrong with her?
Kagome-chan.
Are you waiting for someone?
I'm waiting for a friend.
Percival's friend.
What's your friend's name?
Percival?
I see.
What?
Remon-chan.
When Kagome-chan was taking shelter from the rain someone lent her an umbrella.
but she doesn't know who she should return it to.
That's a problem...
And you figured that out from what she just said?
Yeah.
Kagome-chan.
What did the person who lent you the umbrella look like?
Percival's friend.
how tall was this friend?
Much bigger than Percival.
Student council
Student council And this friend of yours...
Much whiter than Percival.
I'm stumped.
We'll never be able to find the owner of the umbrella.
Chikaru-sama?
she will keep waiting in that same spot.
You're right.
Since we can't solve this on our own...
We'll have to call the mystery club...
We'll have to call the mystery club...
Student Council President
We'll have to call the mystery club...
We'll have to call the mystery club...
Cosplay Club Manager ...that solves the school's mysteries!
Mystery Club Manager
Let's begin!
I need you to show me the item.
this is it.
Colorful pattern with the substance being bluish-purple.
It's a fold-up umbrella.
110 centimeters in diameter.
Finished recording!
I'll hand this over to the school.
I'm counting on you two for errands.
let's head out.
Where are we going?
Search the spots thoroughly!
Walking around is a must in an investigation!
Let's go check out that tree and the library!
Okay!
Chikaru-sama!
That member doesn't know about the umbrella either.
I guess nobody witnessed anything.
Where's the timetable that has the shifts for the library members?
In the staff room and the room for the library club...
The library club is located in...
Miator.
Let's go!
Percival.
It started raining all of a sudden... let's hurry.
It's not fair.
Why does it have to rain all of a sudden?
Tamao-chan said she has to drop off some things at the club...
Is she going to take long?
Shizuma-sama...
I mean Étoile-sama!
Feel free to come in.
Are you sure?
Umbrellas should be shared on rainy days.
Nagisa-chan!
Are you finished?
I'll be heading out soon.
Let's go...
Raining all of a sudden!
let's head to the chapel!
Nobody's here.
This place is used only for special events...
I'm freezing...
That's because you got wet.
I told you we shouldn't go to the racetrack.
But it was sunny out...
Hikari.
If you catch a cold and don't show up do you think Amane-sama will come see you?
I don't think so.
Are you sure?
Yaya-chan...
Yes?
Yaya-chan?
It's a secret...
It doesn't look like the rain will stop.
Do you want to borrow some umbrellas at the library?
You're right.
We could do that.
We got pretty wet.
Can I borrow an umbrella?
They're right over here.
They're right over here.
Extra umbrellas
Extra umbrellas
Can I borrow this?
Sure.
That's just like my umbrella's color.
It's no good...
What?
This umbrella is too big...
Look how wet you are!
What if you catch a cold?
you know!
Especially Yaya senpai.
You're the ace of our choir.
Please be aware of your responsibilities!
Why are you here?
You waited for us because you were worried?
Tsubomi-chan.
I just happened to be around!
I was just taking in the towels and...
What kind of excuse is that?
let's take a shower.
I'll have it ready.
so you have to be careful!
I'll do it myself...
Hikari and I are taking a shower!
you can go in first.
I said we're taking it together!
This is a mystery...
I can't believe the umbrella disappeared.
I'm sorry.
I left it here.
Chikaru-sama!
Take a look at this!
I see...
They mistook it for another umbrella...
Did anyone borrow an umbrella today?
so many people came to borrow umbrellas.
I can't really say who borrowed what...
Chikaru-sama.
We're approaching our curfew.
That's too bad.
Then we'll call it a day for the mystery club.
Okay!
everyone... smells good.
It's lavender.
Yaya-chan always drinks herb tea.
Lavender calms me down and relaxes me.
It's like all the stress of the day is disappearing.
Right?
It's still raining.
You're right.
Do you like the rain?
Yeah.
I don't hate it.
If there's an umbrella I like...
If there are no pesky first-year students...
If I can share an umbrella with the one I love...
I don't really like the rain.
right?
right?
Hey!
Should we go back to our rooms now?
Yeah.
I hope you find your umbrella.
Thanks.
Thank you all for the tea today.
Thank you all for the tea today.
Thank you so much.
Please come again.
Good night!
Good night.
Good night.
Kagome-chan.
We'll definitely find that umbrella today.
That's not all.
Right?
Percival's friend...
You're right.
We have to find out who that umbrella belongs to.
Then let's all meet up at the mystery club in the afternoon!
Okay!
Isn't that heavy?
I'm fine!
I forgot a book on my desk.
I'll be waiting at the entrance.
Nagisa-chan...
Today is...
Um...
Yeah!
We can share an umbrella!
I see.
Your umbrella is still missing?
Yeah.
I'll ask my fellow library club members today.
Chiyo-chan.
if I can be of any help to you...
Bye!
They say that a culprit always returns to the original crime scene.
Culprit?
The person who took the umbrella.
I'm sure she's going back to the crime scene today!
right?
That's right.
Now... mystery club!
Yeah!
Yeah.
Library?
I'll return an umbrella.
Don't tell me you forgot after borrowing it.
Why would I forget about a thing like that?
Then what time are we meeting tomorrow for the choir?
Yaya-chan.
You just have to motivate yourself.
I agree!
I'm not letting you go!
Tamao-chan...
Besides...
It's your fault for being too appealing.
Is it her?
No.
She might be related... then I might buy a new umbrella.
right?
Excuse me.
Umm...
This...
That's...
That's it!
That's it?
Is that...
Ah...
That umbrella.
That's my umbrella...
Kagome Byakudan.
I'm Nagisa Aoi.
Thank you...
Nagisa oneesama.
Kagome-chan.
Thank you so much.
I must've left my umbrella somewhere...
Don't worry.
Something wrong with the umbrella?
Yesterday I realized that this umbrella is too big for one person.
Do you want to share it with another?
Can you relate to this?
Well...
I'm not sure...
I feel sad.
I feel sad.
That's what my heart was feeling.
This isn't good.
I'm dreaming about this deep guilt that is taken away from me.
Please give me eternity.
I bite my finger and wait for seduction.
My glass doll.
I want to break apart inside your arms.
You are my destiny.
Touching you gently is not enough.
I want to cry and want you to cry as well.
Kiss my tears.
and that is our secret.
Nagisa-chan.
new discovery.
it's time for summer.
Nagisa-chan.
and I love eating cold things!
Summer is the best!
what's the thing that cools you down on a hot night?
Could that be...
Memory.
I saw some shadow near that window...
No!
Dream?
(day dream)
Just an ordinary dream...
(sweet dream)
But my heart... (always) ...is shaking. (always)
After experiencing love... (missing) ...my lips... (wishing) ...only called out to you in sadness.
respond to my thoughts quickly.
come and embrace me.
Bold confession...
My heart desires this.
and a drop falls down.
but I blame it on the tears.
Let's make a promise.
We're going to come across each other many times in a dream.
I will soon disappear from this world...
What will happen to her?
Beautiful and strong...
She's perfect in every way.
and perfect?
Like A Flower
Shizuma!
It's me!
Shizuma?
right?
Shizuma!
Answer me!
Shizuma!
Tamao-chan!
Sorry to keep you waiting.
How was it?
She wasn't in the greenhouse.
she has been missing classes.
You're worried about her?
Yeah.
But I don't think I have to worry about her.
I'm sure she's fine.
This butter cookie is delicious.
I got that from Chihaya-chan.
Chihaya-chan always likes to have butter in her cookies and cakes.
Mizushima-san really loves butter.
I wonder why she doesn't get fat.
Cinnamon tea smells better with milk.
you're right.
It smells good.
It tastes even better if you eat the chocolate first.
but thank you all for coming.
It was really nice of you to invite us.
It's been a while since we've done this.
She's right.
We haven't done this in a long time.
That's because Nagisa-sama hasn't been herself lately.
Sorry.
There's no need for Nagisa-oneesama to apologize!
What?
you two.
Étoile election is starting soon.
Things are going to become more lively.
I wonder which people are representing each school.
I can't wait.
Me too.
Can I have more tea?
Can you wait a second?
There's some left in the teapot.
I can prepare some fresh tea.
We still have some left.
Fresh tea tastes much better!
I'm fine with whatever.
Won't that take a while?
It's better to make it over a long period of time.
Shizuma!
Answer me!
Shizuma!
I'll get the sisters and...
Stop shouting this early in the morning.
You're disturbing the next door neighbor.
I live next door.
Talk about disturbing a person's sleep...
I don't care how much you sleep as long as you do your job as Étoile.
You don't come to school.
You don't take care of the greenhouse.
This has gotten worse than ever before.
Étoile-sama.
Take a look at those and sign them.
you still have a job to do.
You have to return the seal of Étoile tomorrow.
the day has come for me to return this.
Yes.
Don't forget her seal as well.
why don't we go get it right now?
You're very businesslike.
What?
How can you talk about her with such ease?
You always say the same things to me.
You've been saying the same thing for the past two years.
Do your job as Étoile".
That's all.
you're an Étoile.
But I'm also human!
Of course.
You think I didn't know that?
I've been by your side for all this time.
I've seen everything.
From Kaori to Nagisa-san...
I know everything there is to know about you.
No!
You don't know anything.
You were just watching.
You don't know what true love is.
You've never loved anyone from the heart.
That's why you don't know how I feel.
That's not true!
have...
Who do you love?
Stupid!
Miyuki...
Miyuki...
Are you crying?
Is that bad?
No.
I'm heading to the greenhouse.
Miyuki.
I didn't mean any harm.
I was only joking around.
I'm always hurting others.
Nagisa...
Miyuki...
I live by hurting others around me.
I...
Étoile-sama.
Thank you.
I appreciate it.
You once shared your umbrella with me.
Really?
Your first time in here?
Yes... you'll get tired of coming here.
I don't plan to be one.
I see...
But will Spica's student council president be satisfied with that?
She always wanted to make you into an Étoile.
She's always pestering me.
I figured.
Étoile...
What is an Étoile?
It's just that many student council members as well as others are very interested in that position.
So I'm just curious to know what an Étoile is.
Everyone's eyes focused on you...
Lots of paperwork to sign...
Never-ending greetings and congratulations... taking care of the greenhouse...
Is that your answer?
then you get limited answers.
One more question.
what did you gain?
Fame?
Or is it something else?
What I gained?
Yes.
I did gain something.
I believe during that time we gained something that can't be expressed in words.
You decided to come?
Nothing has changed.
Yes...
Where is it?
Inside the desk drawer.
I'm opening it.
Shizuma!
What?
To Shizuma
Kaori...
To Shizuma...
I wonder when you're going to read this.
what will you be doing?
for me...
I wouldn't have any idea.
I just hope one day you'll get to read this.
I'm going to place this letter in here.
Do you remember?
The day after we became an Étoile.
We were guided by the previous Étoile and entered the greenhouse for the very first time.
I fell in love with that place the first time I saw it.
The greenhouse is wonderful.
It's warm even during the winter and you're surrounded by the stifling scent of trees and flowers.
No cold wind or rain...
It's almost like the hill of Astraea that we're on.
Shizuma.
I'm going to disappear without seeing the outside world.
I'm happy being embraced by your love and not knowing rain or wind.
I never thought about leaving this place.
I love it here.
Shizuma.
You walk around in the cold wind and rain and must look towards a new world.
There has to be someone who has always supported you by your side.
And I want you to look ahead.
There has to be a brand new world waiting.
I'm sure you'll meet someone else.
Shizuma.
I want you to be free.
and perfect.
Stay as the carefree person that I loved.
I want you to be like that always...
Shizuma.
From Kaori.
Kaori...
Kaori!
Kaori!
Miyuki.
You're a crybaby just like always.
That's right.
You were the only one who was by my side and you were always crying.
Always.
There has to be someone who has always supported you by your side.
I'm sorry.
Miyuki.
I want you to stay by my side forever.
You can be the crybaby that you are.
So stay by my side forever and keep supporting me.
Shizuma...
You're my friend.
My one and only friend.
I can't go on without you.
I...
I need you.
Shizuma!
Shizuma...
Étoile-sama?
Let's pick up where we left off yesterday.
It's your turn now.
You become an Étoile and you get something that can only be gained by becoming the Étoile.
What would that be?
Go find that on your own.
That's something you can't find by yourself.
What do you mean by that?
Kaori...
Kaori...
Goodbye...
Kaori...
Shizuma.
It's starting.
Étoile election is about to begin.
The wonderful grace of God fills up heaven and earth.
His great power embraces us.
the beloved child of the Lord is about to be born.
my child.
His salvation is much bigger than a country.
I'm standing by your side...
But are you immersed in such a good book that you don't notice me?
I'd like to take a look.
and you called out to me gently.
so let's go back to the past.
The leather bound book...
I remembered a sweet episode we had back then.
but we touched each other.
Tell me that you're happy.
You're smiling.
I was embarrassed so I ran away!
Come and get me.
You know everything that's going on.
But you're just teasing me.
You want to receive the punishment of love?
KISS
Next Episode can we put flowers in our room?
there are students that keep potted plants too.
That's a great idea!
we'll water the plants together and watch them grow.
maybe I'll go get something from Étoile-sama's greenhouse.
No.
Duel".
I'll get the flowers.
My heart swings like a pendulum...
It flutters to the right and feels sadness to the left.
but sad at the moment.
Let's keep staring at each other!
and adolescence...
Those words are commonly used.
understand my frustrations!
you can be in a mature relationship with childlike feelings.
this passion is somewhat familiar.
I have dreams that go beyond my admiration.
even though I'm just a young girl.
I know...
I know I'm not the only one.
Everyone is feeling shy and it's unstoppable...
What makes me want to see you?
Tamao Suzumi Nice to meet you what does a roomkeeper do?
Lots of things.
Like cleaning and shopping.
They decide by discussing it with the senpai of the room.
Really?
Tamao Suzumi / Nagisa Aoi
Tamao Suzumi / Nagisa Aoi There!
Tamao Suzumi / Nagisa Aoi
This system exists only in Strawberry hall at Miator.
That's the roomkeeper.
Students from the lower-grade are to serve the select few students in the upper-grade.
It's an important opportunity for them to get to know the students they admire in the upper-grade.
Some students can't sleep the night before they decide which room they go to because of high expectation and uneasiness.
it's not like I was feeling that way...
Younger Sisters
Next please!
Misa Takatsuji of Snow class.
You're going to be the roomkeeper of Ookura-san and Nakazawa-san.
Congratulations.
Here you go.
Next please.
Tamao Suzumi / Nagisa Aoi Nice to meet you
You're going to be the roomkeeper of Suzumi-san and Aoi-san.
Your name?
Your name?
I'm Chiyo Tsukidate!
First year student in Flower class!
Okay.
Tsukidate-san.
Thank you very much!
I'll be the roomkeeper of this room.
I'll do my best to work for you.
Nice to meet you.
Nice to meet you too.
I'm Chiyo Tsukidate!
I'll be working here... huh?
As a roomkeeper...
Huh?
Sister Nagisa...
I can't talk to Sister Nagisa like this!
Again!
I'm Chiyo Tsukidate!
I'll be...
Put your name and class on the sheet I gave you before and hand it in by the end of this week.
That is all.
Any questions?
everyone.
have a good day.
The roomkeeper for our room didn't come last night after all.
Maybe something happened to her.
maybe she didn't like the card I wrote.
I don't think so.
You did a really good job with the card.
I hope so...
I'm sleepy...
But I can finally talk to Sister Nagisa.
I have to make a good impression.
sister.
I'm back.
I'll carry your bag.
What?
That's so cute!
They all do the same thing in the beginning.
Tamao-chan?
sort of...
I was so happy that I had my apron on at all times.
So cute.
Excuse me.
My name is Chiyo Tsukidate.
I'm going to be your new roomkeeper.
It's open...
I have to say I'm disappointed.
I have to say I'm disappointed.
I wanted to see Hikari wearing that apron.
I wanted to see Hikari wearing that apron.
I wanted to see you wearing...
I wanted to see Hikari wearing that apron.
I wanted to see Hikari wearing that apron.
Nagisa-chan.
I wanted to see Hikari wearing that apron.
nice to meet you.
I...
You must be Miss Nagisa Aoi.
You recently transferred to Miator.
Everyone knows about me.
Hikari-san?
Yes.
I'm surprised you knew about it.
huh?
I like Miator.
Their first year students are all admirable and cute.
But aren't the first year students the same in Spica?
our first year students are...
What about our first year students?
What about our first year students?
Ah!
It's here!
What do you mean it's here?
Yaya senpai.
You forgot the music sheet for the next set piece.
We're starting a new song tomorrow.
How do you perform without it?
you're right.
I totally forgot...
Tsubomi-chan.
You don't need to thank me.
I just happened to see you so...
Tsubomi Okuwaka.
She's the newest member of our choir.
What?
you're a first year student?
Is there a problem?
Is there a problem?
No.
I'm just surprised since you're very mature.
didn't you?
Yaya senpai!
Why do you say such a thing?
it's the truth.
It's a big misunderstanding!
She is one of the senpais that I have respect for!
do you want to sit somewhere and talk?
Why don't we have them come to our room?
Tamao-chan?
right?
We can go to your room?
Yeah!
Yaya-chan and Tsubomi-chan too.
Yes... the roomkeeper might be there already.
then why don't we all borrow her apron and try it on?
That's a good idea!
I want to see Hikari-chan wearing an apron too!
I'm going too...
My parents will yell at me if they found out that I turned down an offer by students of an upper class.
okay?
That's not the reason why I'm going!
She's just not gentle and obedient.
all I need to do is to wait for their return.
it wasn't that bad...
I just did what any roomkeeper would do...
What?
Is this...
Could it be?
What?
Ouch...
You...
What?
It hurts!
Ow... ouch...
Ouch...
Miss Nagisa Aoi.
When are you going to start walking in the hallway?
I want you to write a letter of apology by tomorrow.
Yes.
Miss Chiyo Tsukidate.
but you shouldn't enter their room without their permission.
I'm really sorry.
Sister Nagisa...
I mean Nagisa-sama.
Chiyo-chan.
I was surprised since the sheet moved all of a sudden...
I can't stand things like ghosts.
It's all my fault!
let's go to our room.
Yes.
I'm back.
It's clean.
They helped out.
We just finished a few moments ago.
everyone.
so there's no need to thank us.
Plus...
Nagisa-sama.
I'm sorry... where's the tea?
so I don't think we have time for tea...
You're right.
It's too bad.
Tamao-chan's black tea tastes really good...
It can't be helped.
Let's do it next time.
why don't we have the tea party tonight?
Tonight?
You mean a tea party at night?
Correct!
Midnight tea party!
What?
We'll get in trouble!
We just have to be careful.
Come in...
Welcome.
and that got me excited.
That thrill is what's great about all this!
And two more?
Please come this way for the time being.
What are you surprised about?
What are you surprised about?
I'm sorry.
Looking all happy with that apron.
I'm not saying this because I'm jealous.
This roomkeeper system is really stupid.
What?
I'm saying it's an out-dated system that's typical for Miator.
You can't even choose the ones whom you are going to serve!
I definitely don't want to serve anyone other than the senpais that I like!
But this is tradition so...
Tradition is meaningless.
You pick a card to choose your senpais?
That's not true!
What did you say?
That card is given to the lower-grade students by the sisters of upper-grade and it's a very sacred and it's a very sacred...
What's sacred about a card?
Huh?
It's gone...
What is gone?
My card...
An important card I received from Nagisa-sama and Tamao-sama...
Wow!
It's a beautiful tea set!
They're all Tamao-chan's.
Tamao-chan has good taste.
I don't...
They're here!
I'll open it right now.
You're late...
Oh my... a tea party?
This chapel was the first building in our monastic order that was built on this hill.
It's the oldest architectural structure with a long and distinguished history.
this building is kept clean by the people of the monastic order but we got their permission to clean the staircase for them today.
What?
The entire staircase?
All of it?
all of it.
You should be honored to clean a facility that is full of history.
By cleaning every speck of dust and dirt I'm sure your hearts will be cleansed as well.
everyone?
sister!
Good... good...
We can't finish all this in one day!
the only good thing about all this is we saw Nagisa-chan...
And Hikari wearing their aprons.
I'll do it!
I'll do all of it!
Chiyo-chan?
Maybe she feels responsible for what happened last night?
I'll do it too!
I guess we should do it as well.
Yes.
I...
Won't lose!
I'll help you.
I'll be fine.
Take it easy.
it's not your fault that we have to do this today.
It's not like that.
Let me give you a hand.
Let me give you a hand.
I can do it myself!
Nagisa-chan!
Chiyo-chan!
It's terrible!
Ouch...
Are you okay?
I'm fine...
Ouch...
You have blood on your leg!
You have blood on your leg!
I'm fine.
I just scraped it a little.
Your clothes are going to get dirty.
Doesn't it hurt?
I'm perfectly fine.
I got your handkerchief all dirty.
I'm sorry...
Chiyo-chan?
Nagisa-sama.
I'm always screwing things up...
I wanted to be a roomkeeper for a wonderful person like you.
I wanted to be a useful younger sister for a long Long time...
But...
Chiyo-chan.
Here.
Lost article.
Thank God...
Thank you.
What?
I'm very happy to see that you took good care of it.
Of course I did!
I was feeling a bit uneasy.
What?
That's because I've never gotten this card before.
Chiyo-chan...
I thought what kind of girl is going to get this card or what if my feelings never get through to her or what if she ends up not liking me...
I was really worried.
Was I the kind of girl that you expected?
yes.
Thanks.
I'm really happy to get a younger sister like you.
Sister Nagisa.
Chiyo-chan?
What's wrong?
don't cry!
But... but...
Nagisa-san is really cute.
Yes...
Hmm...
Good.
And now...
Chiyo-chan.
Shall we begin the tea party?
Yes!
Sister Nagisa!
I feel sad.
I feel sad.
That's what my heart was feeling.
This isn't good.
I'm dreaming about this deep guilt that is taken away from me.
Please give me eternity.
I bite my finger and wait for seduction.
My glass doll.
I want to break apart inside your arms.
You are my destiny.
Touching you gently is not enough.
I want to cry and want you to cry as well.
Kiss my tears.
and that is our secret.
what kind of clubs are there in Miator?
and sewing.
Sounds like training for married life.
Miator was also called a finishing school and there are students that get engaged while attending school.
don't tell me you're also engaged.
Greenhouse.
Tamao-chan?
Dream?
(day dream)
Just an ordinary dream...
(sweet dream)
But my heart... (always) ...is shaking. (always)
After experiencing love... (missing) ...my lips... (wishing) ...only called out to you in sadness.
respond to my thoughts quickly.
come and embrace me.
Bold confession...
My heart desires this.
and a drop falls down.
but I blame it on the tears.
Let's make a promise.
We're going to come across each other many times in a dream.
Little Red Riding Hood gets eaten by the wolf in the end.
Why don't you just choose me over Amane already?
Why do you look at me like that?
You're a coward.
A coward?
I don't know if you're doing this for the Étoile election but if you want to win against Amane senpai why don't you just do it fair and square?
Kaori's words were cold like the wintery wind then turned into a thousand blades and pierced my heart.
It aches...
My heart aches.
huh?
Duel
Noble like the white lily...
A strange rose's color is ruined...
Yaya-chan didn't come to practice again...
Like green leaves growing out in the field.
How unfortunate...
Shizuma-sama...
Étoile-sama...
Nagisa.
Is this going to wither up and die?
I'm sure it will beautifully blossom again.
You're right.
Is Amane-sama going to run for the Étoile election?
I definitely want to see her in the election.
wouldn't it be wonderful?
I heard a rumor that Kaname-sama and Momomi-sama are going to run.
I think they're both wonderful but I still want Amane-sama to be the Étoile.
Étoile election is approaching soon.
It seems like it.
Did you make up your mind?
I think it would be wonderful.
Students at Spica will be very happy.
I...
It's your turn now.
You become an Étoile and you get something that can only be gained by becoming the Étoile.
I...
It's coming up soon.
What?
What?
The Étoile election.
Right...
It sounds fun.
we're getting closer to becoming the Étoile.
You're right... and we don't have any rivals.
We've practically won this thing.
Can you call it a victory without even fighting?
What?
How come Amane is not running in the Étoile election?
it's nothing.
Good job.
Good job.
the president of student council wants to see you.
Toumori-sama?
Amane senpai...
I guess she hasn't decided yet.
But I'm sure she has been influenced.
I see... then I wonder who will be her partner.
But I'm not...
I know Amane-san thinks you're very special.
right?
It's very nice to hear you say that.
That's why I want you to convince Amane-san to run.
Hikari-san?
I'm scared.
Scared?
But Amane-san cares about you too...
If Amane senpai said it...
If that's what Amane senpai wants then I'll be more than happy to be her partner.
I can't force her to do this...
I'm scared...
Yaya-chan.
What?
You didn't come to choir practice again.
Why don't you come?
right?
Yaya-chan...
Shizuma.
I have to talk to you.
Talk?
Deciding who will represent Miator for the Étoile election this year.
It's about their candidate.
I'll leave it up to you.
Are you sure?
I don't care who becomes the next Étoile.
Fine.
Then I'll decide who will represent them.
this year's Étoile election is quite confusing.
Le Rim.
The next Étoile could be from any one of them.
Yeah...
But if you think about the person who will succeed Shizuma-sama then the choices are rather limited.
Amane-sama of Spica and Chikaru-sama of Le Rim.
As for Miator...
It might be difficult for them to win this year.
You're right...
I can't picture anyone other than Shizuma-sama as the Étoile.
You're right...
I'm challenging you to a duel.
A duel?
I have no reason to have a duel with you.
I want you to have a duel with me.
Please.
Fine.
I appreciate it.
It will be 4 points per game.
First one to get 6 games will be the winner.
Got it?
Got it.
Here we go.
That was an ace.
I win the first point.
Love-fifteen.
Not bad!
Amane!
Yaya-chan...
I was looking for you.
Yaya-chan...
Why won't you come to choir practice?
Everyone is waiting for you.
of course...
They want to hear your singing voice.
I can't sing.
What?
I can't sing anymore.
Yaya-chan?
Don't you think it's about time to tell me what this duel is all about?
I hate you.
I know how you feel.
you don't.
You're always ahead of me.
I'm always losing to you!
That's not true.
It's true!
Amane!
You may not have realized...
I have never felt victorious against you!
I hate you.
I wanted to beat you.
I wanted to take away the things you had!
I wanted to take them away so that you know what it's like to be defeated!
That's why I even tried to take Hikari away from you!
I wanted to beat you!
Amane-sama and Kaname-sama?
Why?
What do you mean you can't sing?
Hikari?
Why?
Why?
My song and my feelings...
I know they'll never reach...
I have no reason to sing.
I can't sing.
What do you mean they'll never reach?
They'll never reach your heart...
Amane-sama!
Kaname-sama!
What is going on?
What is the meaning of this?
why don't you run for the Étoile election?
I'm not interested!
Is that all?
I don't want to be in a higher position!
Ridiculous!
You have to run for the Étoile election!
You are the chosen one!
You are the chosen one!
A chosen one has to fulfill their destiny!
Destiny?
If my song can't reach you...
Yaya-chan...
Yaya-chan...
I'm sorry.
Yaya-chan.
Why are you apologizing?
I'm sorry...
Don't apologize.
I hurt you so much.
I'm really sorry.
Stop apologizing!
I'm sorry for making you suffer so much.
I said stop apologizing!
Why are you doing this?
Because I worry about you...
I just don't want to see you suffer.
I love listening to your singing voice!
Good luck!
Amane-sama!
Kaname-sama!
Amane.
Those fierce look in their eyes!
Some of them are directed at me!
But most of them are directed towards you!
They can't be...
You're the star!
You're able to surpass a person like me.
You're the real star!
I love your singing voice.
Hikari...
But I'm sorry.
I love Amane senpai!
I love her...
I know.
It's all right.
I want you to be like that.
That's why I can't sing anymore.
don't say that!
Don't tell me you'll never sing again!
Yaya-chan!
You have to keep on singing!
I can't sing...
But...
I can't sing... isn't it?
Well?
What do you mean?
isn't it?
You're right.
That's because there's plenty of good things stored inside!
Good things?
Are you talking about Amane-sama?
It's not just Amane senpai!
Like the day I came to Spica.
Or the first time that I met you.
Or joining the choir.
Even your songs...
I have them stored right here!
That's why my heart feels warm!
Don't say that you can't sing for me!
Hikari...
Your singing voice doesn't belong only to me!
Please sing!
Then your heart will become warm!
everyone who listens to your voice...
Their hearts will become warm too.
Many people's hearts will become warm!
not just warm.
Their hearts will become unbearably hot!
I want you to sing!
I give up...
Yaya-chan?
Since you want me to sing that much...
I have no choice but to sing.
A star must meet many expectations.
They want you to run for the Étoile election.
They want you to be the next Étoile!
I have no interest in becoming the Étoile.
I'm not saying this for you!
I'm saying this for them!
They have dreams about you!
and their will to live!
You must rise for many people!
For many people...
And that is going to excite their hearts!
Amane!
Me?
And my heart will become excited as well.
you...
You're keeping an eye on Amane that much?
It's only natural to keep an eye on your rival.
you cared about Amane...
But why are you doing this?
this is why I don't like you.
No wonder Hikari has such a hard time.
Hikari.
I will sing.
Okay!
I want you to promise me too that you will show some courage.
Promise me that you will be happy with Amane-sama.
Yaya-chan...
Okay.
Hikari senpai!
Yaya senpai!
Amane-san and Kaname-san are having a duel?
Nagisa-oneesama.
They have won 5 games each.
The one who wins this game is the winner.
Amane!
Please.
but for many others...
It's your turn now.
...and you get something that can only be gained by becoming the Étoile.
What would that be?
That's something you can't find by yourself.
Something I can't find on my own...
Do it for Hikari!
Amane!
I...
Amane-san is the winner!
I guess I can't beat you after all.
You win.
You did great.
Kaname.
I'll run for the Étoile election.
Amane.
Hikari.
Okay.
Amane senpai.
Momomi.
I decided which candidates will represent Miator for the Étoile election.
You didn't have to tell me.
Tamao Suzumi.
And her partner is...
Nagisa...
Don't you just feel happy for Hikari?
Yes.
Bird that can't fly...
Separated from the flock...
Yaya-chan...
It travels down a long road and even if it gets lost the small light from the stars will warm up the bird.
...will warm up the bird.
Yaya-chan will warm up the bird.
Lonely nights will be forever gone... the bird will take off.
I'm standing by your side...
But are you immersed in such a good book that you don't notice me?
I'd like to take a look.
and you called out to me gently.
so let's go back to the past.
The leather bound book...
I remembered a sweet episode we had back then.
but we touched each other.
Tell me that you're happy.
You're smiling.
I was embarrassed so I ran away!
Come and get me.
You know everything that's going on.
But you're just teasing me.
You want to receive the punishment of love?
KISS
Next Episode
If you stay in the room when it's raining or stormy outside don't you just feel that this room becomes the entire world?
I know exactly what you mean!
the outside might be the sea and this room is the boat that is drifting along the sea.
Tamao-chan!
That's very romantic!
and two passengers as well.
Maze.
as long as we have each other...
My heart swings like a pendulum...
It flutters to the right and feels sadness to the left.
but sad at the moment.
Let's keep staring at each other!
and adolescence...
Those words are commonly used.
understand my frustrations!
you can be in a mature relationship with childlike feelings.
this passion is somewhat familiar.
I have dreams that go beyond my admiration.
even though I'm just a young girl.
I know...
I know I'm not the only one.
Everyone is feeling shy and it's unstoppable...
What makes me want to see you?
Welcome to Le Rim.
Le Rim is popular for its club activities.
Card club.
Fortune-telling club.
Railroad research club.
Puzzle club.
we have so many.
I'm the head of student council but my reason for living is the club activity.
Club activity itself is my reason for living.
Greenhouse
Chihaya-chan?
I'm baking some cookies today.
That sounds fun!
we'll have...
The tea party.
I can't wait!
Right?
I have club activity now.
What club is Mizushima-san in?
Archery club.
Archery?
I'll get home as soon as the club activity ends.
okay?
Okay.
huh?
Maybe I should join one too...
Tea club?
I can't sit with my legs folded like that...
I couldn't draw ever since I was little... and left no friendly drop to help me after?
I will kiss thy lips!
It's kind of embarrassing to act...
I can't dance either...
It's done!
Looks delicious!
Smells good...
Kendo...
Head!
Classic ballet...
Fencing...
I don't think I can do any of those.
Mizushima-san looks so cool!
Amazing!
Who's that?
Sorry about that.
That was embarrassing...
Miator's athletic clubs are very competitive...
Is this Le Rim?
It looks fun.
Oh my!
What's wrong with you today?
Do you have a fever?
Excuse me?
That's not good.
Huh?
okay?
What?
Hey!
She's Miator's...
Nagisa-san!
How do you know me?
you're famous at the Strawberry hall!
Right?
Then you two are from Strawberry hall as well?
Yes.
I'm Kizuna Hyuga.
Second year student from Le Rim!
I'm Remon Natsume.
Also a second year student!
Nice to meet you!
Nice to meet you both!
Hey!
You two just can't leave like that!
We're not finished yet.
Put this on and you're done.
Put this on and you're done.
Chikaru-san...
Nagisa-chan!
Hello... welcome!
Kizuna-chan.
Yes!
Don't move.
okay?
You're like a mother.
It looks good on you.
It looks good on you.
Yay!
let's go find some patients!
let's go find some patients!
Yeah!
Kizuna-chan and Remon-chan.
Why are they dressed up like that?
we're members of the Cosplay club.
Cosplay club?
That's right.
We can become whatever we want by wearing the appropriate clothes.
But we only have 3 members so far.
It's an unusual club.
There are many unusual clubs in Le Rim.
they're more like a fan club.
Really?
You can make any kind of club.
then you just disband.
I see.
we're currently looking for a model.
Do you want to join our club?
What?
I just want to make you wear so many things.
You inspire me.
Well?
Do you want to join?
But I'm a student of Miator...
Then you can just transfer!
What?
Just kidding.
But club activities for Le Rim are not related to the school.
So anyone can join.
we'll be happy to have you.
Club activities in Le Rim look fun.
I wish there was an easy club that I could join in Miator.
but...
What is this place?
Wow!
So pretty!
Much better...
Here.
What?
Étoile-sama!
You were taking care of the flowers.
Y... yes.
Thank you.
take this.
But I have one already.
It's okay.
Please.
Well then...
Umm...
Étoile-sama?
Horticulture club?
Horticulture club?
What?
Huh?
this is not part of the horticulture club.
This is a greenhouse exclusive for Étoile-sama.
What?
Exclusive?
and Le Rim are all grown here by Étoile-sama.
I'm sorry!
I didn't know.
Excuse me.
She sure surprised me.
Étoile-sama?
Yeah.
So I have to iron it and give it back to her.
I see...
Thanks for waiting!
I got you some cookies!
Yay!
Let's begin!
Looks delicious!
Étoile-sama?
Étoile-sama?
I wonder where she went...
That room...
What are you doing?
What?
Rokujyo-sama!
That's an empty room.
I...
I...
Nobody lives in this room.
I'm sorry.
I know!
welcome.
Umm...
I came to give you this...
Can you hold this for me?
Yes...
Thank you.
Do you like flowers?
Yes.
That's good.
Can you help me?
What?
You just have to copy what we're doing.
We take care of them morning and late afternoon on days we have class.
But we don't have enough time.
we have plenty of things to do.
I see.
Flowers are nice...
Flowers are nice...
What?
then it will become beautiful.
I'm sorry.
It's okay.
Huh?
What?
Thank you so much.
Don't worry about it.
Let's call it a day.
Yes!
Thank you.
You were a great help.
It was nothing...
I never knew that Étoile-sama's eyes had such deep colors... we have to go decorate the flowers.
we're prepared to go.
You two can go home now.
What?
I'll have her help me.
Can you help me a little longer?
Yes.
Where are you decorating the flowers?
On the main floor.
I didn't know...
Étoile-sama.
I'm just doing it for fun.
It's so strange...
I can look at Étoile-sama straight in the eyes.
Come with me.
Yes.
Music room?
I always come here after decorating the flowers.
I can play the piano as long as I want at this time... come here.
What?
right?
I only learned a little during elementary school...
Come...
Yes.
What should we play?
Umm...
I really can't play... do you know this one?
Yes.
play with me.
Yes.
I'm sorry!
It doesn't matter how many times you mess up.
Don't worry.
But... let's pick up where we left off...
Shizuma likes that girl?
Are you sure about that?
I'm sure she's not taking her seriously...
This is probably the same as always.
She'll get tired of her.
We've been with Shizuma-sama ever since she was in kindergarten.
So we can tell everything.
Something is different.
Different?
I can't really tell what's different about it but...
It's as if she went back to her old days.
Seems to be having so much fun.
I see.
Shall we have some tea?
I have this tasty black tea from England.
Then I'll go prepare the hot water.
What's wrong with her?
I've never seen Étoile-sama with such a sad face...
What is it?
Nothing.
Delicious!
I've never had a black tea this good!
There's a way to serve the tea that makes it delicious.
But I'm happy to see you in joy.
Étoile-sama!
That's not true.
I'll be happy to serve you black tea anytime.
Thank you.
Thank you very much for everything today.
I'll clean up the utensils.
But...
It's okay.
I should be the one thanking you.
I had a great time...
I'll be going now.
It was so fun!
I forgot...
Étoile-sama...
Étoile-sama is crying...
That Étoile-sama...
Nagisa-chan!
Ugh!
Where have you been?
I was worried since I couldn't find you anywhere!
I'm sorry.
it's okay.
As long as you're safe.
Welcome back.
Thanks.
Are you serious about her?
What are you talking about?
What are you talking about?
Transfer student.
Nagisa Aoi.
then you should just quit while you can.
You'll just end up hurting her feelings.
Good night.
I feel sad.
I feel sad.
That's what my heart was feeling.
This isn't good.
I'm dreaming about this deep guilt that is taken away from me.
Please give me eternity.
I bite my finger and wait for seduction.
My glass doll.
I want to break apart inside your arms.
You are my destiny.
Touching you gently is not enough.
I want to cry and want you to cry as well.
Kiss my tears.
and that is our secret.
Le Rim was carefree.
what kind of place is Spica?
Spica's motto is the pen and the sword.
Plus they're very competitive against Miator.
Oh really?
Plus the head of their student council wants to take over the position of Étoile from Miator.
Position of Étoile is that appealing?
Thorny Trap
Nagisa-chan.
Dream?
(day dream)
Just an ordinary dream...
(sweet dream)
But my heart... (always) ...is shaking. (always)
After experiencing love... (missing) ...my lips... (wishing) ...only called out to you in sadness.
respond to my thoughts quickly.
come and embrace me.
Bold confession...
My heart desires this.
and a drop falls down.
but I blame it on the tears.
Let's make a promise.
We're going to come across each other many times in a dream.
Miator is going to pass up on the opportunity to run for the Étoile election?
That will never be tolerated.
I have to do everything I can to persuade those two.
No matter what...
This is the last job for me as the president of student council.
Maze
Excuse me.
What is this important discussion about?
I picked out candidates representing Miator for the Étoile election.
What?
One of them is you.
Tamao Suzumi.
I see...
I've been thinking that you should succeed Shizuma for the longest time.
Rokujyo-sama...
And your partner will be...
Nagisa Aoi.
I'm sure everyone in Miator will approve of you and Nagisa-san.
But Nagisa-chan doesn't know.
Yes.
so I wanted to talk to you first.
then I'm thinking of talking to Nagisa about it.
Um...
I'm very honored to be chosen to represent Miator and there's nothing that makes me happier than this.
Then you will... it's not that!
Nagisa-chan and Shizuma-sama...
I know how much she loves Étoile-sama and how much she's hurt because of Shizuma-sama.
I know her best since I'm always with her!
So please don't make us run for the Étoile election!
Please don't do anything to hurt Nagisa-chan anymore.
I know how you feel about trying to protect Nagisa-san.
But I really want you two to run.
For Miator.
But...
Please.
It's also good for Nagisa.
both Shizuma and I will graduate and leave this hill of Astraea.
I'm worried about Nagisa.
That's why no matter how tough it might be I want her to get over Shizuma and become an important figure.
I believe she can do it.
Rokujyo-sama... what did you talk about with Rokujyo-san?
it's really nothing important.
I just helped the student council with some job.
I see.
Yes...
Let's hurry back.
Yes.
I'm going to have Nagisa-san do it no matter what.
You sound very confident.
It's my mission.
Mission?
You remember what you said before?
You said I can decide who will be running.
You're right.
So you need to go along with what I decided.
Shizuma?
We decided at the board meeting held today that you will be the candidate for the Étoile election.
Thank you very much.
then tomorrow you will have to announce your partner in front of the entire school and tell them that you're officially running in the Étoile election.
Got it?
Yes... right?
Of course.
we can finally have an Étoile from Spica.
Tomorrow?
Right.
There's something I need to tell you before I announce to everyone that I'm running in the Étoile election.
Amane senpai...
Do you remember the place where we first met?
Yes.
Good morning.
G-Good morning.
I believe you're the third-year student...
It's Hikari.
Hikari Konohana.
Right!
Hikari-chan.
I'll never forget that day.
Me too.
I'll see you at that place.
Amane senpai...
Chikaru-oneesama!
Amane-san is going to announce to the entire school at Spica that she's running for the Étoile election!
Where did she go?
Ta-dah!
I wonder who her partner is going to be.
It just might be Hikari-chan.
Amane-san and Hikari-chan would make great partners.
But I'm more interested in finding out who will represent Miator.
Me too.
So do we.
Chikaru-oneesama?
Yeah!
don't they?
Maybe I should start my own handicraft club.
I agree!
Let us be a part of the club!
did you hear?
Amane-san is going to announce that she's running.
Yes...
No one is going to represent Miator?
I-I don't know.
I wonder what will happen.
Then Amane-san and Hikari-chan are going to win this thing.
I heard that Le Rim won't be sending anyone... so I'm sure they'll be a wonderful Étoile.
Coming.
May I come in?
Nagisa-san.
Yes?
Rokujyo-sama...
She decided to represent Miator in the Étoile election.
Tamao-san?
What?
T-Tamao-chan?
you're running in the Étoile election?
well...
Why did you have to keep it a secret?
who is going to be your partner?
I didn't know you had a partner!
Nagisa-san.
What?
You.
What?
Me?
you.
Tamao-chan and I are running in the Étoile election?
I really want you to be in it.
No... you have to be in it no matter what.
But I...
Throughout the history of Miator we've always had a representative for the Étoile election.
That's why we have to have someone representing us again.
But...
You two are the only ones who can compete against Amane-san of Spica.
I really like Tamao-chan.
She's my most important friend and I want to associate with her forever...
Nagisa-chan...
But...
I know you can't forget about Shizuma.
But you have to forget about her.
I don't want you to keep holding onto Shizuma.
I want you to forget about your feelings for Shizuma and run for Étoile.
I'm sure that's what Shizuma wants.
Shizuma is fine with you and Tamao-san running in the election.
Étoile-sama is?
Yes.
Really?
There's no reason for me to lie.
Nagisa-chan!
Nagisa-chan?
why did you tell Nagisa-chan about Étoile-sama?
No matter how I persuade Nagisa-san she's going to end up getting hurt anyway.
That's why I told her the truth.
But this is too harsh.
Nagisa-chan!
Nagisa-chan!
She's nowhere to be found.
I wonder where she went.
Shizuma is fine with you and Tamao-san running in the election.
Nagisa-chan...
I'm sorry.
If I hadn't accepted this offer this never would've happened.
Étoile-sama?
Nagisa?
Shizuma-sama!
Good luck.
right?
No!
I don't want to be the Étoile.
I never even thought about becoming one!
I'm not good enough to be the Étoile.
I'm not even qualified for that position!
but you and Tamao-san make a great pair.
That's why you should listen to Miyuki and enter the Étoile election.
I'm sure you can be a wonderful Étoile.
No!
I don't want this!
I don't want to run by lying to myself!
then Tamao-chan... not just Tamao-chan...
It would be rude for the people of Miator and Le Rim!
I...
I...
I just wanted you to tell me one thing.
To not enter the Étoile election!
Even if you didn't really mean it...
Étoile-sama!
Thank you.
I feel honored.
the key...
What?
Do you have it?
I'm sorry!
I was going to give it back once I got back from the cottage but I never had the opportunity to do so.
Shizuma-sama...
Goodbye...
You should just forget about me.
Nagisa...
Nagisa...
Goodbye...
You should just forget about me.
Nagisa-chan.
Chikaru-san...
They're cold...
Nagisa-chan.
I'm going to see Rokujyo-sama and tell her we're not going to run.
She cried herself to sleep.
She must've experienced something very painful.
Let's hope she goes back to being happy like usual.
Yeah.
Morning...
Nagisa-chan...
Nagisa-chan!
Where have you been?
I was really worried about you!
Tamao-chan.
I had various reasons...
Chikaru-san stayed with me till the morning.
Nagisa-chan.
We're heading back.
Thank you.
Don't mention it.
Let's play together again.
certainly.
Bye.
Nagisa-chan.
This is all my fault.
Why?
You didn't do anything wrong.
I'm heading over to Rokujyo-sama to tell her we're not competing.
Tamao-chan.
Yes?
Let's do it.
Étoile election...
Nagisa-chan?
We'll represent Miator.
But...
You see... and now I feel so much better.
I feel I can forget about Étoile-sama.
I don't want to stay in the same place forever.
There's no use crying over spilled milk.
I have to take the first step on my own.
Then I feel like the whole world might change.
Tamao-chan.
will you run with me?
Yes...
I see.
Those two... they came and told me about it.
you won the bet.
This is all because of you.
Now we don't have to feel ashamed of not sending anyone for the election.
It's going to get busy from here on.
They need to tell the entire school that they're going to run.
you'll have to excuse me.
Shizuma?
Shizuma!
Shizuma!
What happened?
Open the door!
Shizuma!
Shizuma!
Hey!
What's going on?
Tell me what happened!
Shizuma!
Open this door!
Shizuma!
Shizuma!
Shizuma!
It's nothing...
Shizuma?
I want you to leave...
Leave...
I can finally tell you my true feelings at the place where we first met.
Amane senpai!
Hikari!
She's the most important person in the world to me.
I have nothing to fear anymore.
we'll always be together!
Amane senpai!
Hikari!
Amane senpai!
Amane senpai!
Amane senpai!
I'm standing by your side...
But are you immersed in such a good book that you don't notice me?
I'd like to take a look.
and you called out to me gently.
so let's go back to the past.
The leather bound book...
I remembered a sweet episode we had back then.
but we touched each other.
Tell me that you're happy.
You're smiling.
I was embarrassed so I ran away!
Come and get me.
You know everything that's going on.
But you're just teasing me.
You want to receive the punishment of love?
KISS
Next Episode
If we were to travel on board a ship together what kinds of things should we bring?
fruits...
You're bringing so much food.
Tamao-chan?
I would like a lamp.
I'd like to sit by the light and talk to you.
That's a great idea!
Circle of Fate.
okay?
Dream?
(day dream)
Just an ordinary dream...
(sweet dream)
But my heart... (always) ...is shaking. (always)
After experiencing love... (missing) ...my lips... (wishing) ...only called out to you in sadness.
respond to my thoughts quickly.
come and embrace me.
Bold confession...
My heart desires this.
and a drop falls down.
but I blame it on the tears.
Let's make a promise.
We're going to come across each other many times in a dream.
Tamao-chan.
Rokujyo-san!
It's alright.
I'm sorry for hurting your feelings.
How much did you know?
I can tell you everything.
Everything that I know.
It's going to be a long story.
Shizuma and I were in the same room in this Strawberry hall since our first year.
when the two of us became third year students...
I was summoned by the student council.
It was regarding some new transfer student.
What am I trying to do?
Am I trying to add another character to that story?
That story where none of the characters became happy...
Refrain
Three years ago Spring
Look.
You can see the chapel from here.
Kaori Sakuragi-san.
I know you might be lonely all by yourself in a single room since you're not used to life in the dorm.
feel free to let me know.
Yes...
Roomkeeper?
We're the only ones who got it?
That's right.
Kaori Sakuragi-san.
A new first year student.
Who decided this?
What about the lottery?
People from the student council decided.
so she can't be a normal roomkeeper and we decided to be in charge of her.
We finally got to be third year students and I was really looking forward to the roomkeeper.
I was planning on making her work really hard.
Shizuma...
Why can't you be more reasonable?
They trusted us with this girl.
Kaori-san was a sickly child and she stayed home most of the time during elementary school.
they chose us upperclassmen to look after her since they felt we were suited for the job.
Miyuki...
How come you're being so reasonable?
Do you really want to be a part of the student council that much?
In order to be an amazing Étoile you need strong support from the student council.
right?
I see.
So you think I'm going to be the Étoile?
Of course.
And?
Shizuma...
If you're crying and feeling sad...
I have to go to the student council room from now on?
Take that!
Idiot.
Miyuki.
Why don't you do this by yourself?
No!
They asked both of us to do this.
Plus she's a beautiful girl that you'll definitely like.
That's the only thing good about this.
Come in.
Shizuma Hanazono.
Kaori Sakuragi.
Shizuma?
Miyuki.
What?
You're really beautiful.
Hanazono-sama.
It's Shizuma.
You can call me Shizuma.
This one is a nighttime blend I got from my home.
It's a little different from Shizuma's.
I've always had my doubts about the Rokujyo family's sense of taste.
following the footsteps of Momoyama.
Miss.
But it smells good.
Delicious.
Miyuki.
Looks like Kaori is on your side.
Right...
Two people agree.
Kaori-san.
You're welcome.
I'm heading off now!
Wait.
Kaori!
you two.
Are you alright?
We're almost there.
Beautiful...
I agree.
It would be really romantic if we could see a meteor stream.
That's asking for too much.
But the sky is really beautiful with stars.
I believe three years from now during summer which would be around this time...
I heard that you can see the Perseus meteor stream.
That's a long way from now.
Unfortunately.
I wonder if I'll be around.
Of course you will.
But I think I'm much happier now.
Plus Shizuma bumped into one of the sisters and she's still in the guidance room.
I see...
We might need to tell Shizuma to exercise self-control.
Kaori-san.
Rokujyo-san...
I was always weak and couldn't leave my house.
I was nowhere near this world.
I was not living my life.
The time that I spent here has released me into this world.
Thank you for introducing me to Shizuma.
No...
I'm happy too.
One year later Winter
Oh?
Don't you have a meeting for student council?
Shizuma!
What is the meaning of this?
It's just like it says.
It's an application for the Étoile election.
Just as you expected I decided to run for the Étoile election this year.
But how do you explain this?
Your partner is listed as Kaori-san.
You know better than anyone else that no one can be my partner except her.
Her body is weak.
She hasn't been feeling well this year... right?
Do you know what the Étoile stands for?
They represent all three schools.
They get attention from the students and also have great responsibilities.
Do you honestly think Kaori-san can endure all that?
There's no way she can endure it.
Then why?
Why are you doing this?
you have a visitor.
Kaori-san.
Rokujyo-san.
Long time no see.
Long time no see.
Have you been well?
Yes.
I feel pretty good.
I couldn't even get up like this till yesterday.
How come she's not in a hospital?
She said it's too late.
Can't be!
When did you hear about it?
Three days ago...
She only has about three months to live.
What?
It happened all of a sudden!
She kept quiet about it.
What?
That's just absurd.
Why didn't she say anything about it?
Why!
That's why we decided to be the Étoile together.
But we don't even know if we can be the Étoile.
Are there any candidates from Spica this year?
That doesn't matter!
Who cares about Spica?
There's no one out there that can beat you two.
You two just have to stand on that stage.
Then this year's Étoile will be decided.
A swearing-in ceremony for the Étoile will begin shortly.
This year's Étoile will be Saint Miator's Shizuma Hanazono and Kaori Sakuragi.
That's better.
You look very pretty.
Thank you...
Single star in the sky and the songs of angels that echo in the air.
walk over to Shizuma.
Kaori!
I'm sorry.
Hold onto me.
I can hear the song of angels.
Yes...
Rokujyo-san.
Kaori.
Angels...
Song of angels...
Kaori!
Shizuma...
It's been decided that no one is going to use this place for a long time.
You're not going to cry?
Kaori never cried.
Even though she was facing death she never cried once.
This room belongs to no one now.
no one is going to know the truth.
This is everything I know.
Shizuma stopped opening her heart to us.
Two years have passed since that tragedy but that girl still lies deep within her heart.
She's still there in a place where no one else can satisfy her.
I'm sorry.
I expected too much out of you.
I hoped that you'd get Shizuma back to normal.
I hoped that you could make Shizuma forget that girl.
I was hoping for those things even though they were impossible.
I'm sorry.
I'm standing by your side...
But are you immersed in such a good book that you don't notice me?
I'd like to take a look.
and you called out to me gently.
so let's go back to the past.
The leather bound book...
I remembered a sweet episode we had back then.
but we touched each other.
Tell me that you're happy.
You're smiling.
I was embarrassed so I ran away!
Come and get me.
You know everything that's going on.
But you're just teasing me.
You want to receive the punishment of love?
KISS
Next Episode
Nagisa-chan?
Thanks for asking.
Tamao-chan.
I need to ask you a favor.
What is it?
right?
All the time...
Plus you listened to my problems.
But that's because I enjoyed doing them.
So you see...
Confession".
Tamao-chan.
Watch your backs.
Watch your backs !
Hey, guys, please, please.
Hey, come on, guys.
You want to cut us some slack, huh ?
Guys, you're not helping.
All right ?
Come on, huh ?
Guys, we're all wearing the same color, all right ?
Can we get him out of there ?
As soon as we can, I promise.
We'll get him out.
Guys, come on.
You know it's time to get him out.
Chief says, that's it.
Thank you, Lieutenant Provenza.
- Thank you very much.
- Chief Johnson.
Commander.
Where's chief pope ?
He had an appointment with an attorney this morning.
I'm not even sure he knows we have an officer down.
But I spoke to the captain of central.
Well, I'd like to speak to the captain as well, but I don't need his entire division here on the street.
One of their own is lying dead in that warehouse.
One of our own.
Maybe if you let us clear Detective Martin's remains--
I haven't examined them yet.
I understand that, but when an LAPD officer dies in the line of duty, we never leave him lying next to the scumbag who killed him.
That's because when an officer is murdered on the job, you usually find them within minutes, not two days after the fact.
Now, I have a lot of questions about what happened here,
I don't need this crowd trying to bully me.
They should be encouraged to leave the scene and go on about their business.
Not meaning to be presumptuous, Ma'am, but imagine that it's sergeant Gabriel lying dead in this warehouse.
Would you be out here waiting to pay tribute to their sacrifice, or would you be in your office going about your business ?
I take your point, Commander.
I'll get this out of the way as quickly as possible.
Look, we're all on the same side.
Let them do their job.
Let them do their job !
She might get mad at me for telling you this, but
- Daniels probably shouldn't be here.
- Why ?
When we both worked at central, she dated Martin for a few months.
I'm only mentioning it'cause down the road some lawyer might want to make--
Got it.
So, who's the other dead guy ?
The suspect Detective Martin killed ?
Zeev Barak.
Part of a drug distribution ring.
Ecstasy.
About six months ago, he caught a couple of his teenage dealers overcharging and pocketing the change.
UCLA sophomores.
He shot them to death in their apartment.
And we know this because ?
Martin and his partner worked with an informant.
Captain of central has his name vaulted.
Still waiting for the murder book, too.
Where was Detective Martin's partner ?
Martin was officially off duty.
So he met this guy here alone ?
Without back-up ?
Where did Detective Martin live ?
Long Beach.
Okay.
How'd they get in ?
Side door was unlocked and we found a key in Martin's pocket.
All right, then, thank you, Detective Daniels.
Now if you wouldn't mind waiting outside--
Actually, if it's all the same to you, Chief--
I'm sorry, but it isn't all the same to me.
Thanks.
So if you wouldn't mind waiting outside, then you can make sure that central division stays a respectful distance, I'd appreciate it.
Thank you.
Lieutenant Tao, what do we think happened here ?
It looks like they fired at the same time.
Tim Martin got it between the eyes.
As he fell back, his weapon discharged at Barak.
Just looking at him, the way he's lying, I bet his spinal cord is severed.
This drug dealer had awfully good aim.
Detective Martin's lips seem to be decomposing at the same rate as mr.
Barak's.
And you're looking at second instart maggots in his eyes.
Same over here.
Still eating in mass.
Gathered around the wounds and soft tissue openings.
That's consistent with saying they both died saturday morning ?
Gabriel ?
Lieutenant Flynn, when S.I.D. Starts collecting DNA in here, please walk the elimination samples from both of these men through our lab and have that done tonight.
Detective Sanchez, we'll be working with central division on this.
They'll be in the murder room as well.
I'd like you to keep an eye on them.
Lieutenant Tao,
I want a ballistics trajectory report from the morgue asap, please.
Let's see how this gunfight played out.
So, Lieutenant Provenza, summing up what we know so far.
Alone and on his day off,
Detective Tim Martin enters an abandoned warehouse in downtown Los Angeles,
30 miles from his home, in Long Beach.
By coincidence, Mr. Barak, a murder suspect in a double homicide Martin was working, happens to enter the same warehouse.
They both draw their weapons and fire at the exact same time, fatally wounded, they instantly drop dead where they stand.
What would you say the chances are it happened like that ?
Apparently, 100 percent.
Chief, you should see this.
Lieutenant Provenza, let's clear this place out as quickly and honorably as possible.
- Thank you.
- Yes, Ma'am.
Can you blow this out please, and help us clean up Martin ?
Yeah, the last thing we need is stuff flying out from under the sheet when we carry him out.
Then the people would really hate our guts.
Relax, Flynn.
People hate your guts already.
Thank you, Officer.
Tic tac.
Chief Johnson, this is captain Leahy.
Central division, and Martin's partner Detective Lawrence Xavier.
- I thought you might like to talk to them.
- Sergeant.
Ma'am.
Is there anything I can do to help ?
Yes, there is.
Is this the picture of the informant that you and Detective Martin were working with ?
No.
Does he have anything to do with the Barak case ?
No, Ma'am.
He just owns the warehouse.
Because it says here that he's wanted for questioning in connection with the murder of an LAPD officer.
And if I'm considering the mood of your division... circulating this man's photograph puts his life in danger.
So what I need you to do, Captain, is to find out who created this flyer, how many were distributed, and have every single one of them returned to me.
Let's go !
And I need you to order your troops to stand down.
Because while you have my sympathies, Captain, a righteous call of an officer down is my job.
Tim martin is not a job to me, Ma'am.
He was my friend.
Wait a second.
Attention !
You could've told me about it in person.
In advance.
What--
Yeah.
I can't talk about this now.
Becau--
Yeah.
Well, I'm sorry you feel that way, but we just lost a 15-year veteran in a shootout, that's actually more important than you are at the moment.
Leahy, is it true your people were circulating 100 flyers of some guy who was not connected to the crime ?
I got 98 of them back.
And where's Detective Martin's partner ?
Detective Xavier is waiting in Commander Taylor's office with the murder book and the informant there.
All right, so unless you'd like to start collecting your pension tomorrow, central had better back off and allow Priority Homicide to do its job.
- You're dismissed.
- Sir.
Captain, I'm so sorry, but I'm afraid we're really gonna need all these flyers.
- Because otherwise...
- That's good enough for me.
98 percent's fine.
Go on, Captain.
You understand this is not a picture of the informant that Detective Martin was working with.
I don't want to talk about this... anymore.
You left a police officer lying next to the man who shot him, and that is never done.
The reason I left Detective Martin lying there is that police officers are trained to fire in bursts, and Martin only put one shot into Barak.
One.
And the bodies were lying close together.
Too close.
And what was Martin doing there in the first place ?
Now he and Detective Xavier were working with an undercover informant, and I need to question him.
You can't release the informant's name to law enforcement.
Well, how I am supposed to talk to him, Will ?
What if he's not, just, just waiting by the phone ?
Why is it that you can never do your job without constantly complaining about everything ?
The informant was guaranteed anonymity.
You can release his name to one other member of your squad, and that's it.
Now,
I've upheld your authority with the entire department looking on, but when a police officer is killed, we expect closure quickly and completely.
Is that clear ?
Yes, it is.
Your attitude, however, is a complete mystery.
- Chief...
- yes
Lieutenant Tao's put together a preliminary ballistics report, and I think before we talk to Xavier, you should see what he's put together.
How graphic is it ?
No morgue shots.
All right, then.
All right, then, let's see what we've got.
So... why isn't this... oh, first I should say the bullets we pulled out of those college kids, the double homicide Tim Martin was working, they match Barak's gun.
Lieutenant Provenza, are you eating chocolate in here ?
Sorry.
I thought we agreed to keep snacks with processed sugar out of the murder room.
If y'all have to have candy, please do so in the hallways in the electronics room.
Or you might try giving it up.
Since I stopped eating all that crap, I have more energy.
And I'm sleeping better, too.
What about nuts ?
Excuse me ?
Are my nuts allowed in here ?
Do they have sugar on them, lieutenant ?
No.
They're salty.
Well, there's your answer then.
What about the slug in detective... what about the slug that was taken out of
Detective Martin's head, Lieutenant Tao ?
Also from Barak's gun.
And the bullet that killed Barak was from Martin's weapon.
But then we start to have problems.
It seems like
Martin fired first from about 15 feet.
His bullet grazes the top of Barak's heart, shatters the spine, and Barak falls dead.
So...
Barak falls dead and his gun discharges ?
No.
Couldn't have.
Because Martin was shot from 4 feet away.
And the entry wound shows the bullet was fired from a crouching position.
Not from the ground.
So even if we supposed Martin fired and walked towards the body,
Barak would've been paralyzed.
He couldn't have fired at all.
But Barak's gun definitely killed Detective Martin ?
It did.
There was a third person in that warehouse.
I'm so sorry this is taking so long.
Detective Xavier, I think I have the basics now.
So Zeev Barak murdered two young men who were dealing x for him, and leaves their apartment, demanding his cousin,
Ari Cohen, drive him to the airport.
Ari says he had no idea Barak intended to kill anyone, and after the shooting, he offers his testimony in exchange for immunity.
But how do you know that your informant didn't kill those men and blame it on Barak ?
The kids fought back.
Barak got cut.
We got good DNA samples of the killer from the apartment where the boys were murdered.
Nothing matched Ari, so we paid him $25,000 to fly up to vancouver and get the routine two samples off his cousin.
But the DNA samples he brought back didn't match the guy who killed the kids ?
They didn't match each other.
Look in section 6 of your murder book there.
Mr. Informant submitted DNA from two different people.
Males.
Relatives.
Didn't hit anything from our crime scene or our database.
So, looks like Barak's death is good for Ari, doesn't have to testify, his cousin's partner won't know he's a snitch, and... he got $25,000.
In cash.
So, he met with the police regularly at the warehouse ?
Whose idea was that ?
Ari's.
One of his friends wanted to sell it, so he paid Ari to show it around
- to anybody who wanted to look at it.
- Did you have keys to the side door ?
- No.
- So why do you suppose
Martin went there on his day off ?
I don't know.
Any reason Martin might go to the warehouse and not want you around ?
Look... here's the thing.
I got on this case late.
Tim had been working with Detective Hubbard before me.
They'd been partners since, like the early 90s.
Then Hubbard takes family leave because his wife died, and his kid had cancer.
Me and tim, we'd only been partners two months.
And is it standard procedure for people from central division to meet with murder suspects on their own ?
- No.
- On their days off ?
- No.
- If I look at your qualifying test, who will I find is a better shot, you or Martin ?
Me.
Because Tim had problems... when Martin didn't show up for work on monday, you talked to your captain about it, why ?
Linda... his girlfriend,
Martin's girlfriend,
- she called me saturday night...
- you work... on saturday ?
Are these difficult questions, Detective, because I think they're fairly simple.
Were you at work on saturday, or should I look it up ?
I was home.
Linda called me because Tim had a date with her, and he stood her up.
So I tried to get in touch with him.
Left a few messages, and when he didn't get back to me,
I drove down there sunday morning, knocked, looked through the flap of the door and saw his mail from saturday.
And had you been there before ?
To his apartment ?
No.
No, I almost didn't go this time.
See, standing up girlfriends is Martin's way of usually letting them know he's about to wind things down.
And when I say that, I don't mean he's a bad cop.
Just a jerk when it came to women.
Anyway, when he didn't show up on monday,
I went to Captain Leahy.
Thank you, detective xavier.
That's all for now.
Ma'am.
By the way, have you been offered counseling ?
- Excuse me ?
- You seem to be holding back the natural grief one feels at losing a partner and fellow officer.
Perhaps you can get some help with that.
For the time being, the name Ari Cohen is our little secret, sergeant.
I'd like you to find him for me.
Please
But don't identify yourself to anyone you call as a police officer.
I'll be back in about an hour or two.
All right.
Okay.
I was gonna stop by Dupars and pick up a pie, too, but but with this diet you're on,
I didn't think you'd feel comfortable with
- more pastry in the house.
- Oh, I wouldn't.
And it-it's not a diet, it's a life change.
Either you control the sugar in your life, or the sugar controls you.
And it ages you.
I read this book, and I'm just,
I'm over it.
Okay.
I just-I just don't want sugar anymore.
- I'm just, I'm finished with it.
- OK
I really am.
I believe you.
By the way... the... escrow on my condo is about up.
I was wondering if you'd thought over what we talked about.
You know, cause otherwise, there's a position in behavioral sciences.
It's been suggested I put in for it.
It would mean me moving back east.
But it would give me a chance to move up the FBI's food chain.
Fritz, I don't want you to go.
And, of course, I've thought about... it, I just... see, moving in together...
I don't...
- there's...
- what ?
There's all these problems that would have to be worked out.
- Like what ?
- Well, like getting a new phone, for one thing.
Cause you couldn't answer mine when my parents call.
That's not really it.
And I, I can be, just impossible.
- Yeah.
I like it that you're impossible.
- Well, what if you stopped ?
Stopped liking me ?
If I was gonna stop liking you,
I would've done it already.
But... well... look, I haven't had a lot of success living with guys, and... it could just ruin everything.
But, you know, if, we're trying to sort of come closer, you know, more like full partners... living together would give us a chance to see what that would be like.
It's work.
I know we're having a serious...
Hello ?
What ?
How long ago ?
It's Lieutenant Provenza.
They found our informant.
Though how he knows... all right.
I'll be there in about 20 minutes.
Okay.
Bye.
I love this.
Trying to have lunch together more.
It's nice.
And, uh, we'll talk about this, all this...
- yeah, sure.
- Later.
This evening or something.
This reluctance of yours, it has nothing to do with what's going on with Pope, does it ?
What's going on with pope ?
His wife served him with divorce papers last friday.
You didn't know ?
No.
What do you do for a living again ?
If you're not going to talk to him...
Sir, we'd like to take him to central.
Yeah, well, I don't give a flying you-know-what where you'd like to take anybody.
- Is that right ?
- Yeah.
That's right.
Hey !
Hey !
I'm getting your captain on the other end of the line here, so you want to park your asses somewhere ?
Did I not say to keep quiet about our guy ?
He's not our guy.
He's the guy from the flyer.
The owner of the warehouse.
Michael deitz.
He's been roughed up, too.
I got Chief Pope down here as soon as I got back.
Back from where ?
From Ari Cohen's house.
He's not there.
Newspaper is stacked up over the fence.
Neighbor said they haven't seen him in over two weeks, so,
- I'm gonna have to try to find...
- my fault, I'm sorry.
Thank you, Sergeant Gabriel.
You were right.
We should've pulled in those other flyers.
Never mind, Will.
It's fine.
Look, this guy's a friend of ours.
- Maybe he can help me find him.
- No
Dietz cannot know Ari was an informant.
And besides, thanks to central division, we may have a civil suit on our hands.
I need to calm him down in an official kind of way.
I can manage this.
You look tired.
Why don't you head on home.
Please don't use the techniques you employ in there... on me.
Something you'd like to know, ask me.
I didn't think it was any of my business.
I just,
I heard you were getting a divorce.
That's all.
I'm not getting a divorce.
Estelle's getting a divorce.
You know, the job, the hours, she's seeing someone else.
They're getting married.
So no alimony.
She doesn't want our kids, because he doesn't want them.
So there's that, and you know, well, at some point, it'll stop hurting, and I'll just
- hate her and go on with my life.
- Oh, Will.
I'm sorry.
I really am.
You know what, let's discuss it later.
We have a murdered officer to deal with, and central division is going nuts.
All right.
Now, Will, I'm not complaining, but ballistics suggests that there was someone else in that warehouse when Martin and Barak were killed, and I really need to talk to this informant, Ari.
I really do.
Who was martin's partner
- before Xavier ?
- Hubbard.
He's on family leave.
His 10-year-old boy's got cancer.
He's at the hospital 24/7.
Well, you know where to find him then.
All right then.
Mr. Dietz.
My name's William Pope.
It's hard to believe Tim's gone.
I should've gone with him.
But my wife--please.
My wife died 4 years ago, and...
Charlie, that's my son...
I thought, charlie deserves to always have one parent around.
- When you said you thought about...
- So how's your son doing, is he ok ?
You know, bone cancer's tough.
First we tried an experimental therapy, didn't work.
Now we're looking for a bone marrow transplant, but you need an exact match.
Thank God my wife's parents have a lot of money.
Any luck ?
I tested, and, no.
I struck out, but, you know, lots of people have volunteered.
Charlie's got a website.
He has a diary of everything we're doing here.
People write in, and the website has a link.
Check it out if you'd like to.
Thank you.
- I will.
I will.
- Thank you...
- for that.
- I'm so sorry about your partner.
Yeah.
It's just unbelievable.
I can't think of why.
Why he would go down there alone.
You knew about it then ?
The meet ?
With Ari ?
Yeah.
Yeah, I helped set it up.
You called ari ?
After he brought back those screwed up DNA samples from vancouver.
No way.
No, he called me, uh...
last, wednesday.
Ari says he wants to meet, and I told him, call Tim, which I guess he did, cause Tim phoned me, said that Ari was coming back saturday morning and would I go with him,
cause... cause I handled Ari better.
Charlie had a transfusion that morning.
Did Ari say anything about bringing Barak ?
No.
I mean, if we'd known that Barak was coming, we would've had surveillance, we would've brought in sharp shooters, that's a dangerous man.
Any idea why Tim might not want Xavier to go with him ?
Well, may...
Oh, hey, partner.
Where are you going ?
Ultrasound.
- Don't worry.
It's nothing.
- Okay.
Are you working ?
No.
I'm just giving some background to these detectives on an old case.
Keep him busy for me.
I want you to work.
- Please
- Well, maybe I should go with you.
No.
You shouldn't.
You're driving me crazy.
- Bye.
- All right.
Good bye.
All right, when you get back, I'm gonna kick your butt in monopoly again.
- You wish.
- I wish ?
He never gets down.
Just...
I couldn't do that.
And we were talking about...
Tim, and why we might not want Xavier to go with him to the warehouse.
And I was just wondering if it had anything to do with Tim's girlfriend.
Why ?
Why would you think that ?
Well, she called Xavier at home to find out why tim stood her up, and I was wondering how she had Xavier's home phone number.
Well, there was some, uh... overlap there between Xavier and Tim.
You saying Tim moved in on Xavier's girlfriend while Xavier was still dating her ?
Maybe she didn't like Xavier as much as he thought.
That's... something a guy has to come to terms with sometimes.
Or not.
I can't believe Martin was still pulling that crap.
Look...
I don't want to get Xavier in trouble.
Yeah, well, I need to talk to this girlfriend.
And right away.
So, Detective Hubbard, what's her full name ?
Um, please ?
And to be dragged down here after everything that has gone on, and read my rights like I was some common criminal or something.
Miss Linda Salk.
I'm Deputy Chief Brenda Johnson, and I am very, very sorry to have kept you waiting on what must be a terrible day for you.
It is a terrible day.
This is a surveillance center.
Not a concession stand.
And I'm not your maid, okay ?
Why don't you calm down, buzz.
If you're going to treat me like a criminal, shouldn't I have an attorney ?
we'd get into such trouble if we gave legal advice.
I was trying to get you in and out, but if having a lawyer would make you feel more comfortable, you just call one, and we'll wait.
That's the nice thing about working for the government, you get paid for just being here.
That's how you're treating Tim's death ?
As an overtime opportunity ?
Well, I was going to ask you some questions.
What do you think I could know ?
I'm not sure, Ma'am.
But there was a third person in that warehouse.
And we're trying to figure out who that could've been.
I'm only bringing it up because you were the first person to report him missing, and you're licensed to carry a handgun.
And I carry a handgun because it is my constitutional right to do so, and I have an ex, who is also a cop and likes to drive by my house sometimes at night and flash his brights in my window.
He even knocked on the door at Tim's one night.
Drunk.
- Are you talking about Lawrence Xavier ?
- I am.
If he intimidated you, why didn't you report him ?
Because Tim talked me out of it.
He said he'd put a stop to it, and he did.
And I only got one more call from Lawrence complaining about how much money he had wasted... on our dates, and so...
I sent him a check for 1,000 dollars.
By messenger.
And you know what, he cashed it, too.
Asshole.
And you know what,
I paid for most of the stuff that Tim and I did together, and anyway, you know what, I don't really care about this stuff.
Detective Martin was hurting for money ?
He's a cop.
You know ?
He's not made of money, and I pull down enough for both of us.
I'm a top salesperson for suburbans in the Southland, 3 years going.
Excuse me.
Did Detective Martin ever mention his job ?
The Barak case ?
Because he and Detective Xavier were working it together.
Did he say he was meeting someone saturday morning ?
Did he mention a name ?
Yeah.
There was an informant that...
I wasn't supposed to know about Ari.
Ari Cohen ?
Maybe.
It was a jewish name.
And this Ari guy had gone to Vegas and Tim thought that he was coming back.
No one in here heard that name.
Damn.
And I broke it off with him.
That's really all I had to say.
Well, thank you, Detective Daniels, for sharing that information with me.
I asked lieutenant Tao to drag Ari's credit cards, and we found out where he's staying in Vegas.
He's racked up some pretty good cash advances, too, but we don't have any authority in Nevada.
Yeah.
I think that we can talk him into a quick trip home.
So, Sergeant, tell me, how did you know that Detective Martin had a thing about women who were seeing other guys ?
No answer ?
Because... you were awfully quick about that info about
Daniels having dated him.
And you were at central, too.
At the same time.
Could it be that you experienced some overlap with Martin as well ?
Hey, you know what ?
Martin couldn't have been less interested in Daniels until I asked her out for dinner.
Ok, we went out on two dates, and then suddenly, suddenly, he's all over her.
Which I don't care about anymore.
I mean, it was years ago.
But the experience Daniels had with Martin disqualified her from working on this case, and not you ?
Daniels had an intimate relationship with the man,
- I barely knew him.
- Well, that's a variation of what I said to her.
Because we have a team here, it's working, and I'd like to keep it that way.
However, to be perfectly clear, you held back information about the victim, and you shouldn't have.
What did you want me to say ?
Obviously, you could've spoken more on sexual pathology which, as you are aware, sergeant, is the most difficult aspect of our personality to change.
And which, as Xavier proves...
Martin couldn't change.
And that's relevant to this investigation ?
That Martin never changed.
Oh, Sergeant, it's key.
Any news, gentlemen ?
Ok, we got back the DNA results from the warehouse.
The elimination samples on Marak and martin.
And ?
Barak's blood matches what we found at the Brentwood crime scene.
So we take that along with his gun, and we can be pretty sure he did those two kids.
Good.
Case closed.
What's the problem ?
Well, the other elimination sample from the warehouse.
- Detective martin's, what about it ?
- It matches one of the samples we paid our informant 25,000 dollars to bring back from Vancouver.
Martin booked samples of his own DNA ?
And that of one of his relatives.
I don't know if he swapped out what he got from the informant, or if he ever even paid the guy.
I'm uncomfortable suggesting Martin had his hand in the till.
This is a guy who was killed while trying to arrest
- a murder suspect.
- We don't know that, commander.
In fact, all we know for sure is that someone else was there.
Our informant is in Vegas.
I'm not saying that bringing him back will make him safer, just the opposite maybe.
The name's already starting to come out in her interrogations.
Chief, I don't think he's going to remain anonymous much longer.
And we don't want to get into a race with central.
And there's stuff I have to ask him.
And now this DNA thing.
All right.
How long will it take you to find him ?
Lieutenant Flynn and Provenza can go to Vegas tonight and bring our informant back by tomorrow morning.
I can authorize that trip for you.
Thank you.
Gentlemen, you can get the informant packet from Sergeant Gabriel and when Ari gets here,
I want detective Xavier in the room with me.
All right, then.
I gotta run an errand, so thank you, very much.
- Chief Johnson.
- Yes.
I just want to make sure I understand why you're bringing detective Xavier back in.
I want to question him.
- Why ?
- Because I need more answers.
Did you ever ask him where he was last saturday morning when the murders were committed because...
I looked into it, and he was at home
- on the phone for two hours.
- Well, his line was busy.
That doesn't mean he was on it.
I'm trying to help you here, Chief.
Xavier has an excellent record, and... yes, Tim Martin, he might have been a womanizer, but if you can't tell how much people respected him around here,
- you're not looking.
- Trust me.
I see it.
If you end up smearing a man who gave his life to the badge--
I have factored your concerns into how I'm dealing with this case.
Anything else, commander ?
No, Ma'am.
I'm just trying to be of assistance.
And thanks for the message you left on my website, too.
I check it, like, 6 times a day.
You put that website together all by yourself ?
well... had a little help from my dad.
- Hey.
- Hey !
Hi.
Chief Johnson, what's up ?
Here you go.
I'm so sorry to intrude, but
I think I might be in a position where I might really, really need your help tomorrow.
You knew as well as I do how hard it is to get a homicide detective to confess.
The moment I mirandize him, a lawyer will appear, and I'll be dead in the water.
So I need to take him completely by surprise.
I heard Xavier had an alibi.
It'll fall apart in the dryer.
Look, I know you cared about Tim.
And you're the only person left who knows this case from front to back.
Somebody is lying.
And I think if I have you there, and if Xavier and Ari don't know about it, somebody's gonna trip up.
Ma'am... if I come downtown, and try and help you to arrest Xavier, and you don't have him cold, and I mean on ice, my whole division will turn against me.
You said you wish'd you'd been there for tim last saturday.
There's nothing we can do to change that, but you can be there for him tomorrow.
I'm putting you at odds with your entire division, and I'm so sorry about that, but
I won't get this confession without your help, Detective.
Tim Martin was your friend.
Please.
I certainly hope you know what you're doing.
For both our sakes.
Lieutenant Tao ?
Yes, thank you.
I need you to make me a favor.
It has to do with that sample of DNA that we haven't identified yet.
So, he's not in his room.
And I think we've pretty well determined he's not over here.
Where'd you get that shirt anyway ?
The 80s ?
Your ex wife loved it.
Said it was easier to unbutton than anything you ever wore.
Put your glasses on, old man.
Turn around and take a gander.
Ari's right over there playing blackjack.
And there's two open seats next to him.
Now, I say, that we put him under tight surveillance for an hour or so.
You're kidding me, right ?
That's a 25 dollar table.
There's an ATM next to the cashier.
And I am feeling lucky...
Sorry about that, Chief.
- Give me a hundred.
- I already gave you a hundred.
You're way up.
So what ?
You know where the ATM is.
Besides,
- I say we cash in.
- All right.
Fine, fine, fine.
We'll cash in.
Come on, Ari.
You're cashing in, too.
Don't touch me.
Who the hell are you anyway ?
LAPD.
We're here to give you a lift home.
Put that away, you stupid.
Look...
I'm not leaving.
And you can't do anything to me here anyway.
Oh, really ?
Hey everybody, listen up.
I want to tell you about my friend Ari.
Shut up, you idiot.
You're gonna get me killed.
Hey, moron, now imagine us doing that only on television.
And all of your cousin's friends find out that you're a snitch.
And don't forget to tip the dealer.
Let's go.
How do they always know ?
Hi, mama.
How are you ?
I'm good.
I'm at work, but I have a minute.
Is everything all right ?
Great aunt who ?
Mama, is this someone I've even met ?
No, no.
I just ran upstairs.
I'm out of breath.
I don't know where Santa Clarita is.
It's just north of here.
All right.
I'll send her a get well card or something.
Can you spell her last name ?
E
U
L
E
S
S
Mama,
I have never met this woman before in my life, I swear.
Well...what's wrong with her ?
for heaven's sake.
If she's been in a coma for 2 years, how much worse can she get ?
I can't talk about this right now because I'm about to interview a serial killer who just... stabbed 30 people to death.
All right.
All right then.
OK.
Bye.
You got time for some coffee before you head into work ?
I do.
I just, I have to get changed, and I want to look a little stern.
That shouldn't be a problem.
I forgot to ask you, did you ever talk to Pope ?
About how he's doing with the divorce and everything ?
In passing.
I haven't had time to get into details.
I'm trying to think through how Martin and Barak were murdered because I know who did it, and I'm pretty sure of the motive, but I'm just not sure how.
And I'm only gonna get one run at this, so Pope is not high on my radar right now.
You can bet you're on his.
You watch.
He's gonna ask you out again.
Just so you know.
And he's not gonna care that we're dating or
Whatever.
Yeah, some guys are like that.
Will's not like that.
I will.
You can think what you want.
I don't trust him.
What ?
Are you wearing your gun ?
- Yeah.
- Can I have it ?
What's wrong with yours ?
In case you hadn't noticed, I'm off duty.
So, would you...
let me borrow yours ?
For a minute, please ?
Could it really be that simple ?
Bang.
What are you doing ?
Trust me.
Trust me.
Now, walk towards me.
Like you're trying to find out what I'm doing.
I am trying to find out what you're doing.
Bang.
See ?
That's how I shoot Barak with Martin's gun.
And then I shoot Martin with Barak'S.
That's how.
Because he knew Barak was coming.
That's how.
That's how.
That's how,
That's how, what ?
That's how what ?
I'll call you about dinner, okay ?
Okay.
No, wait.
No, wait, wait.
Brenda ?
When are we gonna talk about... about everything.
Ari Cohen is here.
Daniels has him in an interview room with detective Xavier.
And central division has arrived en masse.
They think you're about to arrest Xavier for murder.
I mention that because having him sit next to an informant with a camera trained on him kind of makes the guy look guilty.
Maybe you have an idea where I can place detective Xavier where he wouldn't look guilty.
Or maybe you think that Tim Martin, who everyone says was such a good cop, went into that warehouse alone.
Where was our good cop's backup then ?
Why didn't his partner go with him ?
Those are excellent questions, but they're not evidence.
And if you don't get a confession, and you try to make an arrest... it's not gonna be a real crowd pleaser.
Not that I don't have confidence in you.
I'll get the confession, Will.
Never you mind.
I'll get it.
Ma'am, thank you very much.
Did you make the match ?
Any minute.
You don't have it ?
It's coming.
Lieutenant Tao,
I need to start this interview, and I you don't finish,
I could be up a nasty smelling creek with no paddle.
Just go slow.
As soon as the match comes through, I'll bring it directly to Gabriel.
Here.
For all our sakes.
Please.
Thank you.
Here's the earpiece.
There's a new battery.
Oh, thank you, Buzz.
Thank you very much.
I thought we were taking him by surprise.
Well, I'm moving on to plan B.
Ma'am, I want to note you've used your investigation to smear Tim Martin's reputation.
And in this department, that's just not the way we play ball.
Well, captain, if you don't like the way I'm doing things, you're free to take your balls and go straight home.
Okay.
So... when I flip the pages in my notebook, you give me a true or false, okay ?
All right then.
Detective Hubbard, I just want to thank you for volunteering under such extraordinary circumstances.
And I think that everyone who cared about detective Martin will truely appreciate what you do here today.
Good morning, Detective Xavier.
And the elusive mr.
Cohen.
Here you are.
So kind of you to join us.
I was dragged here against my will, and all I'm going to do is plead the fifth.
You can't plead the fifth.
I can't ?
It would be a violation of the agreement you made with the D.A.
To be a cooperating witness.
So, if you plead the fifth,
I'll arrest you as an accomplice in a double homicide, so please, mr.
Cohen, do take a seat.
I didn't understand what this was all about.
- No one explained it to me.
- I don't even know why I'm here.
Because.
Someone's lying.
And I thought if I got you and Mr Cohen together here,
I could figure out the truth.
Are you saying I've been dishonest ?
You told me you'd never been to detective Martin's house.
And I have a witness who contradicts you.
She's a lying bitch !
The kind of lying bitch who deserves to be stalked by a cop ?
Who should be harassed under the color of authority ?
That kind of bitch ?
Do I need an attorney ?
I don't know.
Do you ?
So, tell me, mr.
Cohen, how well do you know detective Xavier here ?
Were you in contact with him regularly ?
- No.
- I met him exactly one time.
That's probably true.
That's what Tim told me.
That seems to be right, Chief.
And you went to Vancouver to collect samples of DNA from your cousin.
Who did you give those samples to ?
Detective Hubbard.
Where is he anyway ?
That's true.
And then I gave them to Tim.
Okay.
Hubbard says that's true.
Ari handed him the samples, and then he gave them to Martin.
But those samples turned out not to be of Barak.
Yeah.
And we asked him to get more.
I done what they asked.
They messed up, not me.
What did they expect me to do, go back, ask him to spit in the cup ?
My cousin was a psycho, not an idiot.
You never did crap.
Probably never went to see Barak
- in the first place !
- Then why did i call you on wednesday and tell you he was coming to town ?
He never mentioned Barak was coming ?
Ok.
That's probably not true, Chief.
Bullshit.
You never called me at all !
- That's right.
- I called detective Hubbard.
I told him I had arranged to meet Zeev at the warehouse on saturday morning, but they said that you guys--
That is not true !
He asked to meet, and I told him to call Tim.
All right, okay.
Did you hear that, Chief ?
We never heard anything about a meeting.
- With you or anybody !
- Are you sure,
Detective Xavier ?
You're taking this lying scumbag's word over mine.
I already told you.
Martin never mentioned it.
And all this stuff about DNA happened before I was even on the case.
So what does this have to do with me ?
Chief, Tao's here with your papers.
I'll be back in one minute to answer that.
Ok, I have to hurry now.
Because I'm about 2 minutes from having to read someone their rights.
Thank you.
- Detective hubbard, please.
- Yes, Ma'am.
I need your help getting these DNA results in order.
Okay.
- See if this is right.
- Okay.
Barak's blood from the Brentwood crime scene.
Barak's blood from the warehouse.
- A match.
- That's right.
And then here...
Martin's blood from the warehouse, which just happens to match up with one of the samples that
Ari brought back from Vancouver.
What ?
the two DNA samples that we thought were obtained by your informant, one was actually that of Tim Martin, and the other was one of his male relatives, which lieutenant Tao has just identified... as your son.
Or I guess I should say, Martin's son, by your wife.
We matched it up against the online database where you posted Charlie's bone marrow looking for a donor.
My guess is, you didn't know you weren't Charlie's biological father until the doctors checked to see if you're a possible transplant candidate.
Isn't that right ?
And so you began to wonder who Charlie's father really was.
And you knew your partner, didn't you ?
You knew him very well.
And Martin never volunteered to have his own bone marrow tested, did he ?
See, we went on Charlie's website where he thanks everyone who's volunteered, and Martin's name isn't on it.
I guess he was afraid you'd find out the truth.
It's pretty awful, really.
That he cared more about that than saving his own son.
But then he knew you pretty well, too.
So, when Ari came back from Vancouver with Barak's DNA, you switched them out with samples that you took from your partner and Charlie just to make sure you were right.
And, I suppose, to see if Martin might be a possible match for a transplant, but he wasn't.
Also, on this blog your son keeps, he lists what happens to him every day in the hospital.
Last saturday morning when you said you went with him for a procedure, a transfusion of white blood cells, well, the specialist got called away and the procedure was cancelled.
And when Charlie finally came back to his room, you weren't there.
And didn't come back for an hour and a half.
Look, listen...
Tim shot Barak.
The bullet was fired from his gun.
But Martin didn't have his gun.
He'd given it to you.
- Oh, why would he do that ?
- Because you asked him for it.
Because you volunteered to go with him to the warehouse, and he agreed because you were the partner he trusted.
And you really needed that gun, didn't you ?
Because detective Xavier and Ari are both telling the truth.
And you were the only one who knew that it wasn't an informant who was about to walk through the doors at that warehouse, but an armed psychopath.
My guess is... that you shot Barak as soon as you were sure that he was close enough for it to be a clean kill, and while Martin was freaking out, demanding to know what you were doing,
you told him to trust you.
Didn't you ?
You walked over to Barak's body.
You knelt down beside him, took his gun, and while Martin followed you, demanding an explanation, you shot him dead between the eyes.
Isn't that right, detective ?
By the way, does Charlie know... that Tim's his real father ?
I mean...
I only ask because once you bring a lawyer into this,
Tim's son will have to be deposed.
Tim's son ?
I wonder what effect that will have on Charlie's health ?
Knowing you're not his real dad, I mean.
Tim's son ?
How do you suppose Charlie's gonna react knowing that you gunned down his father
- in cold.
- I'm his father !
Charlie's my son !
I taught him how to walk.
And I taught him how to read.
And I taught him...
I've been with him through 7 surgeries, and 38 procedures.
And where was the great Tim Martin when it mattered, huh ?
Where was he... when Charlie's life was on the line ?
Where was he ?
Where was Tim Martin ?
I don't know, detective Hubbard.
But I know where he is now.
I saw his brains splattered all over the floor of an abandoned warehouse while his body was being eaten by flies.
And I can't help but think... you may have overreacted.
You can't... you can't tell...
Charlie about Tim.
No, you won't do that.
I can.
And I will.
Write it all down.
And we'll get you a deal from the D.A.
You can wear a bracelet and stay with Charlie until his illness... resolves itself.
Even though, intellectually, people understand you did the right thing, emotionally, there is gonna be some fall out over all of this.
Between you and the department.
Between your squad and the department.
We can cope with that.
I know it's late, but...
I thought you might have time for a... drink.
Or dinner, if you're hungry.
And as I remember things, you're kind of always hungry, aren't you ?
I am.
But, well, dinner.
I already have plans.
Sort of a... celebration.
With Fritz.
I heard he might be leaving town.
Behavioral sciences, right ?
That's good for him.
No, no.
He's not taking that.
No, we're celebrating because he's... moving in.
Next week.
That's great.
Congratulations.
We'll see.
Big step.
But, lunch tomorrow.
I could do that.
I have to meet with my attorney at 1:00 tomorrow.
We'll find a moment somewhere.
All right then.
Thanks for supporting me.
- It meant a lot.
- Sure.
My pleasure.
My job, actually.
Well !
- Good night.
- Good night.
And, uh... good work.
Oh, thanks.
Thanks.
Synchro:
Csivore
Watch your backs.
Watch your backs !
Hey, guys, please, please.
Hey, come on, guys.
You want to cut us some slack, huh ?
Guys, you're not helping.
All right ?
Come on, huh ?
Guys, we're all wearing the same color, all right ?
Can we get him out of there ?
As soon as we can, I promise.
We'll get him out.
Guys, come on.
You know it's time to get him out.
Chief says, that's it.
Thank you, Lieutenant Provenza.
- Thank you very much.
- Chief Johnson.
Commander.
Where's chief pope ?
He had an appointment with an attorney this morning.
I'm not even sure he knows we have an officer down.
But I spoke to the captain of central.
Well, I'd like to speak to the captain as well, but I don't need his entire division here on the street.
One of their own is lying dead in that warehouse.
One of our own.
Maybe if you let us clear Detective Martin's remains--
I haven't examined them yet.
I understand that, but when an LAPD officer dies in the line of duty, we never leave him lying next to the scumbag who killed him.
That's because when an officer is murdered on the job, you usually find them within minutes, not two days after the fact.
Now, I have a lot of questions about what happened here,
I don't need this crowd trying to bully me.
They should be encouraged to leave the scene and go on about their business.
Not meaning to be presumptuous, Ma'am, but imagine that it's sergeant Gabriel lying dead in this warehouse.
Would you be out here waiting to pay tribute to their sacrifice, or would you be in your office going about your business ?
I take your point, Commander.
I'll get this out of the way as quickly as possible.
Look, we're all on the same side.
Let them do their job.
Let them do their job !
She might get mad at me for telling you this, but
- Daniels probably shouldn't be here.
- Why ?
When we both worked at central, she dated Martin for a few months.
I'm only mentioning it'cause down the road some lawyer might want to make--
Got it.
So, who's the other dead guy ?
The suspect Detective Martin killed ?
Zeev Barak.
Part of a drug distribution ring.
Ecstasy.
About six months ago, he caught a couple of his teenage dealers overcharging and pocketing the change.
UCLA sophomores.
He shot them to death in their apartment.
And we know this because ?
Martin and his partner worked with an informant.
Captain of central has his name vaulted.
Still waiting for the murder book, too.
Where was Detective Martin's partner ?
Martin was officially off duty.
So he met this guy here alone ?
Without back-up ?
Where did Detective Martin live ?
Long Beach.
Okay.
How'd they get in ?
Side door was unlocked and we found a key in Martin's pocket.
All right, then, thank you, Detective Daniels.
Now if you wouldn't mind waiting outside--
Actually, if it's all the same to you, Chief--
I'm sorry, but it isn't all the same to me.
Thanks.
So if you wouldn't mind waiting outside, then you can make sure that central division stays a respectful distance, I'd appreciate it.
Thank you.
Lieutenant Tao, what do we think happened here ?
It looks like they fired at the same time.
Tim Martin got it between the eyes.
As he fell back, his weapon discharged at Barak.
Just looking at him, the way he's lying, I bet his spinal cord is severed.
This drug dealer had awfully good aim.
Detective Martin's lips seem to be decomposing at the same rate as mr.
Barak's.
And you're looking at second instart maggots in his eyes.
Same over here.
Still eating in mass.
Gathered around the wounds and soft tissue openings.
That's consistent with saying they both died saturday morning ?
Gabriel ?
Lieutenant Flynn, when S.I.D. Starts collecting DNA in here, please walk the elimination samples from both of these men through our lab and have that done tonight.
Detective Sanchez, we'll be working with central division on this.
They'll be in the murder room as well.
I'd like you to keep an eye on them.
Lieutenant Tao,
I want a ballistics trajectory report from the morgue asap, please.
Let's see how this gunfight played out.
So, Lieutenant Provenza, summing up what we know so far.
Alone and on his day off,
Detective Tim Martin enters an abandoned warehouse in downtown Los Angeles,
30 miles from his home, in Long Beach.
By coincidence, Mr. Barak, a murder suspect in a double homicide Martin was working, happens to enter the same warehouse.
They both draw their weapons and fire at the exact same time, fatally wounded, they instantly drop dead where they stand.
What would you say the chances are it happened like that ?
Apparently, 100 percent.
Chief, you should see this.
Lieutenant Provenza, let's clear this place out as quickly and honorably as possible.
- Thank you.
- Yes, Ma'am.
Can you blow this out please, and help us clean up Martin ?
Yeah, the last thing we need is stuff flying out from under the sheet when we carry him out.
Then the people would really hate our guts.
Relax, Flynn.
People hate your guts already.
Thank you, Officer.
Tic tac.
Chief Johnson, this is captain Leahy.
Central division, and Martin's partner Detective Lawrence Xavier.
- I thought you might like to talk to them.
- Sergeant.
Ma'am.
Is there anything I can do to help ?
Yes, there is.
Is this the picture of the informant that you and Detective Martin were working with ?
No.
Does he have anything to do with the Barak case ?
No, Ma'am.
He just owns the warehouse.
Because it says here that he's wanted for questioning in connection with the murder of an LAPD officer.
And if I'm considering the mood of your division... circulating this man's photograph puts his life in danger.
So what I need you to do, Captain, is to find out who created this flyer, how many were distributed, and have every single one of them returned to me.
Let's go !
And I need you to order your troops to stand down.
Because while you have my sympathies, Captain, a righteous call of an officer down is my job.
Tim martin is not a job to me, Ma'am.
He was my friend.
Wait a second.
Attention !
You could've told me about it in person.
In advance.
What--
Yeah.
I can't talk about this now.
Becau--
Yeah.
Well, I'm sorry you feel that way, but we just lost a 15-year veteran in a shootout, that's actually more important than you are at the moment.
Leahy, is it true your people were circulating 100 flyers of some guy who was not connected to the crime ?
I got 98 of them back.
And where's Detective Martin's partner ?
Detective Xavier is waiting in Commander Taylor's office with the murder book and the informant there.
All right, so unless you'd like to start collecting your pension tomorrow, central had better back off and allow Priority Homicide to do its job.
- You're dismissed.
- Sir.
Captain, I'm so sorry, but I'm afraid we're really gonna need all these flyers.
- Because otherwise...
- That's good enough for me.
98 percent's fine.
Go on, Captain.
You understand this is not a picture of the informant that Detective Martin was working with.
I don't want to talk about this... anymore.
You left a police officer lying next to the man who shot him, and that is never done.
The reason I left Detective Martin lying there is that police officers are trained to fire in bursts, and Martin only put one shot into Barak.
One.
And the bodies were lying close together.
Too close.
And what was Martin doing there in the first place ?
Now he and Detective Xavier were working with an undercover informant, and I need to question him.
You can't release the informant's name to law enforcement.
Well, how I am supposed to talk to him, Will ?
What if he's not, just, just waiting by the phone ?
Why is it that you can never do your job without constantly complaining about everything ?
The informant was guaranteed anonymity.
You can release his name to one other member of your squad, and that's it.
Now,
I've upheld your authority with the entire department looking on, but when a police officer is killed, we expect closure quickly and completely.
Is that clear ?
Yes, it is.
Your attitude, however, is a complete mystery.
- Chief...
- yes
Lieutenant Tao's put together a preliminary ballistics report, and I think before we talk to Xavier, you should see what he's put together.
How graphic is it ?
No morgue shots.
All right, then.
All right, then, let's see what we've got.
So... why isn't this... oh, first I should say the bullets we pulled out of those college kids, the double homicide Tim Martin was working, they match Barak's gun.
Lieutenant Provenza, are you eating chocolate in here ?
Sorry.
I thought we agreed to keep snacks with processed sugar out of the murder room.
If y'all have to have candy, please do so in the hallways in the electronics room.
Or you might try giving it up.
Since I stopped eating all that crap, I have more energy.
And I'm sleeping better, too.
What about nuts ?
Excuse me ?
Are my nuts allowed in here ?
Do they have sugar on them, lieutenant ?
No.
They're salty.
Well, there's your answer then.
What about the slug in detective... what about the slug that was taken out of
Detective Martin's head, Lieutenant Tao ?
Also from Barak's gun.
And the bullet that killed Barak was from Martin's weapon.
But then we start to have problems.
It seems like
Martin fired first from about 15 feet.
His bullet grazes the top of Barak's heart, shatters the spine, and Barak falls dead.
So...
Barak falls dead and his gun discharges ?
No.
Couldn't have.
Because Martin was shot from 4 feet away.
And the entry wound shows the bullet was fired from a crouching position.
Not from the ground.
So even if we supposed Martin fired and walked towards the body,
Barak would've been paralyzed.
He couldn't have fired at all.
But Barak's gun definitely killed Detective Martin ?
It did.
There was a third person in that warehouse.
I'm so sorry this is taking so long.
Detective Xavier, I think I have the basics now.
So Zeev Barak murdered two young men who were dealing x for him, and leaves their apartment, demanding his cousin,
Ari Cohen, drive him to the airport.
Ari says he had no idea Barak intended to kill anyone, and after the shooting, he offers his testimony in exchange for immunity.
But how do you know that your informant didn't kill those men and blame it on Barak ?
The kids fought back.
Barak got cut.
We got good DNA samples of the killer from the apartment where the boys were murdered.
Nothing matched Ari, so we paid him $25,000 to fly up to vancouver and get the routine two samples off his cousin.
But the DNA samples he brought back didn't match the guy who killed the kids ?
They didn't match each other.
Look in section 6 of your murder book there.
Mr. Informant submitted DNA from two different people.
Males.
Relatives.
Didn't hit anything from our crime scene or our database.
So, looks like Barak's death is good for Ari, doesn't have to testify, his cousin's partner won't know he's a snitch, and... he got $25,000.
In cash.
So, he met with the police regularly at the warehouse ?
Whose idea was that ?
Ari's.
One of his friends wanted to sell it, so he paid Ari to show it around
- to anybody who wanted to look at it.
- Did you have keys to the side door ?
- No.
- So why do you suppose
Martin went there on his day off ?
I don't know.
Any reason Martin might go to the warehouse and not want you around ?
Look... here's the thing.
I got on this case late.
Tim had been working with Detective Hubbard before me.
They'd been partners since, like the early 90s.
Then Hubbard takes family leave because his wife died, and his kid had cancer.
Me and tim, we'd only been partners two months.
And is it standard procedure for people from central division to meet with murder suspects on their own ?
- No.
- On their days off ?
- No.
- If I look at your qualifying test, who will I find is a better shot, you or Martin ?
Me.
Because Tim had problems... when Martin didn't show up for work on monday, you talked to your captain about it, why ?
Linda... his girlfriend,
Martin's girlfriend,
- she called me saturday night...
- you work... on saturday ?
Are these difficult questions, Detective, because I think they're fairly simple.
Were you at work on saturday, or should I look it up ?
I was home.
Linda called me because Tim had a date with her, and he stood her up.
So I tried to get in touch with him.
Left a few messages, and when he didn't get back to me,
I drove down there sunday morning, knocked, looked through the flap of the door and saw his mail from saturday.
And had you been there before ?
To his apartment ?
No.
No, I almost didn't go this time.
See, standing up girlfriends is Martin's way of usually letting them know he's about to wind things down.
And when I say that, I don't mean he's a bad cop.
Just a jerk when it came to women.
Anyway, when he didn't show up on monday,
I went to Captain Leahy.
Thank you, detective xavier.
That's all for now.
Ma'am.
By the way, have you been offered counseling ?
- Excuse me ?
- You seem to be holding back the natural grief one feels at losing a partner and fellow officer.
Perhaps you can get some help with that.
For the time being, the name Ari Cohen is our little secret, sergeant.
I'd like you to find him for me.
Please
But don't identify yourself to anyone you call as a police officer.
I'll be back in about an hour or two.
All right.
Okay.
I was gonna stop by Dupars and pick up a pie, too, but but with this diet you're on,
I didn't think you'd feel comfortable with
- more pastry in the house.
- Oh, I wouldn't.
And it-it's not a diet, it's a life change.
Either you control the sugar in your life, or the sugar controls you.
And it ages you.
I read this book, and I'm just,
I'm over it.
Okay.
I just-I just don't want sugar anymore.
- I'm just, I'm finished with it.
- OK
I really am.
I believe you.
By the way... the... escrow on my condo is about up.
I was wondering if you'd thought over what we talked about.
You know, cause otherwise, there's a position in behavioral sciences.
It's been suggested I put in for it.
It would mean me moving back east.
But it would give me a chance to move up the FBI's food chain.
Fritz, I don't want you to go.
And, of course, I've thought about... it, I just... see, moving in together...
I don't...
- there's...
- what ?
There's all these problems that would have to be worked out.
- Like what ?
- Well, like getting a new phone, for one thing.
Cause you couldn't answer mine when my parents call.
That's not really it.
And I, I can be, just impossible.
- Yeah.
I like it that you're impossible.
- Well, what if you stopped ?
Stopped liking me ?
If I was gonna stop liking you,
I would've done it already.
But... well... look, I haven't had a lot of success living with guys, and... it could just ruin everything.
But, you know, if, we're trying to sort of come closer, you know, more like full partners... living together would give us a chance to see what that would be like.
It's work.
I know we're having a serious...
Hello ?
What ?
How long ago ?
It's Lieutenant Provenza.
They found our informant.
Though how he knows... all right.
I'll be there in about 20 minutes.
Okay.
Bye.
I love this.
Trying to have lunch together more.
It's nice.
And, uh, we'll talk about this, all this...
- yeah, sure.
- Later.
This evening or something.
This reluctance of yours, it has nothing to do with what's going on with Pope, does it ?
What's going on with pope ?
His wife served him with divorce papers last friday.
You didn't know ?
No.
What do you do for a living again ?
If you're not going to talk to him...
Sir, we'd like to take him to central.
Yeah, well, I don't give a flying you-know-what where you'd like to take anybody.
- Is that right ?
- Yeah.
That's right.
Hey !
Hey !
I'm getting your captain on the other end of the line here, so you want to park your asses somewhere ?
Did I not say to keep quiet about our guy ?
He's not our guy.
He's the guy from the flyer.
The owner of the warehouse.
Michael deitz.
He's been roughed up, too.
I got Chief Pope down here as soon as I got back.
Back from where ?
From Ari Cohen's house.
He's not there.
Newspaper is stacked up over the fence.
Neighbor said they haven't seen him in over two weeks, so,
- I'm gonna have to try to find...
- my fault, I'm sorry.
Thank you, Sergeant Gabriel.
You were right.
We should've pulled in those other flyers.
Never mind, Will.
It's fine.
Look, this guy's a friend of ours.
- Maybe he can help me find him.
- No
Dietz cannot know Ari was an informant.
And besides, thanks to central division, we may have a civil suit on our hands.
I need to calm him down in an official kind of way.
I can manage this.
You look tired.
Why don't you head on home.
Please don't use the techniques you employ in there... on me.
Something you'd like to know, ask me.
I didn't think it was any of my business.
I just,
I heard you were getting a divorce.
That's all.
I'm not getting a divorce.
Estelle's getting a divorce.
You know, the job, the hours, she's seeing someone else.
They're getting married.
So no alimony.
She doesn't want our kids, because he doesn't want them.
So there's that, and you know, well, at some point, it'll stop hurting, and I'll just
- hate her and go on with my life.
- Oh, Will.
I'm sorry.
I really am.
You know what, let's discuss it later.
We have a murdered officer to deal with, and central division is going nuts.
All right.
Now, Will, I'm not complaining, but ballistics suggests that there was someone else in that warehouse when Martin and Barak were killed, and I really need to talk to this informant, Ari.
I really do.
Who was martin's partner
- before Xavier ?
- Hubbard.
He's on family leave.
His 10-year-old boy's got cancer.
He's at the hospital 24/7.
Well, you know where to find him then.
All right then.
Mr. Dietz.
My name's William Pope.
It's hard to believe Tim's gone.
I should've gone with him.
But my wife--please.
My wife died 4 years ago, and...
Charlie, that's my son...
I thought, charlie deserves to always have one parent around.
- When you said you thought about...
- So how's your son doing, is he ok ?
You know, bone cancer's tough.
First we tried an experimental therapy, didn't work.
Now we're looking for a bone marrow transplant, but you need an exact match.
Thank God my wife's parents have a lot of money.
Any luck ?
I tested, and, no.
I struck out, but, you know, lots of people have volunteered.
Charlie's got a website.
He has a diary of everything we're doing here.
People write in, and the website has a link.
Check it out if you'd like to.
Thank you.
- I will.
I will.
- Thank you...
- for that.
- I'm so sorry about your partner.
Yeah.
It's just unbelievable.
I can't think of why.
Why he would go down there alone.
You knew about it then ?
The meet ?
With Ari ?
Yeah.
Yeah, I helped set it up.
You called ari ?
After he brought back those screwed up DNA samples from vancouver.
No way.
No, he called me, uh...
last, wednesday.
Ari says he wants to meet, and I told him, call Tim, which I guess he did, cause Tim phoned me, said that Ari was coming back saturday morning and would I go with him,
cause... cause I handled Ari better.
Charlie had a transfusion that morning.
Did Ari say anything about bringing Barak ?
No.
I mean, if we'd known that Barak was coming, we would've had surveillance, we would've brought in sharp shooters, that's a dangerous man.
Any idea why Tim might not want Xavier to go with him ?
Well, may...
Oh, hey, partner.
Where are you going ?
Ultrasound.
- Don't worry.
It's nothing.
- Okay.
Are you working ?
No.
I'm just giving some background to these detectives on an old case.
Keep him busy for me.
I want you to work.
- Please
- Well, maybe I should go with you.
No.
You shouldn't.
You're driving me crazy.
- Bye.
- All right.
Good bye.
All right, when you get back, I'm gonna kick your butt in monopoly again.
- You wish.
- I wish ?
He never gets down.
Just...
I couldn't do that.
And we were talking about...
Tim, and why we might not want Xavier to go with him to the warehouse.
And I was just wondering if it had anything to do with Tim's girlfriend.
Why ?
Why would you think that ?
Well, she called Xavier at home to find out why tim stood her up, and I was wondering how she had Xavier's home phone number.
Well, there was some, uh... overlap there between Xavier and Tim.
You saying Tim moved in on Xavier's girlfriend while Xavier was still dating her ?
Maybe she didn't like Xavier as much as he thought.
That's... something a guy has to come to terms with sometimes.
Or not.
I can't believe Martin was still pulling that crap.
Look...
I don't want to get Xavier in trouble.
Yeah, well, I need to talk to this girlfriend.
And right away.
So, Detective Hubbard, what's her full name ?
Um, please ?
And to be dragged down here after everything that has gone on, and read my rights like I was some common criminal or something.
Miss Linda Salk.
I'm Deputy Chief Brenda Johnson, and I am very, very sorry to have kept you waiting on what must be a terrible day for you.
It is a terrible day.
This is a surveillance center.
Not a concession stand.
And I'm not your maid, okay ?
Why don't you calm down, buzz.
If you're going to treat me like a criminal, shouldn't I have an attorney ?
we'd get into such trouble if we gave legal advice.
I was trying to get you in and out, but if having a lawyer would make you feel more comfortable, you just call one, and we'll wait.
That's the nice thing about working for the government, you get paid for just being here.
That's how you're treating Tim's death ?
As an overtime opportunity ?
Well, I was going to ask you some questions.
What do you think I could know ?
I'm not sure, Ma'am.
But there was a third person in that warehouse.
And we're trying to figure out who that could've been.
I'm only bringing it up because you were the first person to report him missing, and you're licensed to carry a handgun.
And I carry a handgun because it is my constitutional right to do so, and I have an ex, who is also a cop and likes to drive by my house sometimes at night and flash his brights in my window.
He even knocked on the door at Tim's one night.
Drunk.
- Are you talking about Lawrence Xavier ?
- I am.
If he intimidated you, why didn't you report him ?
Because Tim talked me out of it.
He said he'd put a stop to it, and he did.
And I only got one more call from Lawrence complaining about how much money he had wasted... on our dates, and so...
I sent him a check for 1,000 dollars.
By messenger.
And you know what, he cashed it, too.
Asshole.
And you know what,
I paid for most of the stuff that Tim and I did together, and anyway, you know what, I don't really care about this stuff.
Detective Martin was hurting for money ?
He's a cop.
You know ?
He's not made of money, and I pull down enough for both of us.
I'm a top salesperson for suburbans in the Southland, 3 years going.
Excuse me.
Did Detective Martin ever mention his job ?
The Barak case ?
Because he and Detective Xavier were working it together.
Did he say he was meeting someone saturday morning ?
Did he mention a name ?
Yeah.
There was an informant that...
I wasn't supposed to know about Ari.
Ari Cohen ?
Maybe.
It was a jewish name.
And this Ari guy had gone to Vegas and Tim thought that he was coming back.
No one in here heard that name.
Damn.
And I broke it off with him.
That's really all I had to say.
Well, thank you, Detective Daniels, for sharing that information with me.
I asked lieutenant Tao to drag Ari's credit cards, and we found out where he's staying in Vegas.
He's racked up some pretty good cash advances, too, but we don't have any authority in Nevada.
Yeah.
I think that we can talk him into a quick trip home.
So, Sergeant, tell me, how did you know that Detective Martin had a thing about women who were seeing other guys ?
No answer ?
Because... you were awfully quick about that info about
Daniels having dated him.
And you were at central, too.
At the same time.
Could it be that you experienced some overlap with Martin as well ?
Hey, you know what ?
Martin couldn't have been less interested in Daniels until I asked her out for dinner.
Ok, we went out on two dates, and then suddenly, suddenly, he's all over her.
Which I don't care about anymore.
I mean, it was years ago.
But the experience Daniels had with Martin disqualified her from working on this case, and not you ?
Daniels had an intimate relationship with the man,
- I barely knew him.
- Well, that's a variation of what I said to her.
Because we have a team here, it's working, and I'd like to keep it that way.
However, to be perfectly clear, you held back information about the victim, and you shouldn't have.
What did you want me to say ?
Obviously, you could've spoken more on sexual pathology which, as you are aware, sergeant, is the most difficult aspect of our personality to change.
And which, as Xavier proves...
Martin couldn't change.
And that's relevant to this investigation ?
That Martin never changed.
Oh, Sergeant, it's key.
Any news, gentlemen ?
Ok, we got back the DNA results from the warehouse.
The elimination samples on Marak and martin.
And ?
Barak's blood matches what we found at the Brentwood crime scene.
So we take that along with his gun, and we can be pretty sure he did those two kids.
Good.
Case closed.
What's the problem ?
Well, the other elimination sample from the warehouse.
- Detective martin's, what about it ?
- It matches one of the samples we paid our informant 25,000 dollars to bring back from Vancouver.
Martin booked samples of his own DNA ?
And that of one of his relatives.
I don't know if he swapped out what he got from the informant, or if he ever even paid the guy.
I'm uncomfortable suggesting Martin had his hand in the till.
This is a guy who was killed while trying to arrest
- a murder suspect.
- We don't know that, commander.
In fact, all we know for sure is that someone else was there.
Our informant is in Vegas.
I'm not saying that bringing him back will make him safer, just the opposite maybe.
The name's already starting to come out in her interrogations.
Chief, I don't think he's going to remain anonymous much longer.
And we don't want to get into a race with central.
And there's stuff I have to ask him.
And now this DNA thing.
All right.
How long will it take you to find him ?
Lieutenant Flynn and Provenza can go to Vegas tonight and bring our informant back by tomorrow morning.
I can authorize that trip for you.
Thank you.
Gentlemen, you can get the informant packet from Sergeant Gabriel and when Ari gets here,
I want detective Xavier in the room with me.
All right, then.
I gotta run an errand, so thank you, very much.
- Chief Johnson.
- Yes.
I just want to make sure I understand why you're bringing detective Xavier back in.
I want to question him.
- Why ?
- Because I need more answers.
Did you ever ask him where he was last saturday morning when the murders were committed because...
I looked into it, and he was at home
- on the phone for two hours.
- Well, his line was busy.
That doesn't mean he was on it.
I'm trying to help you here, Chief.
Xavier has an excellent record, and... yes, Tim Martin, he might have been a womanizer, but if you can't tell how much people respected him around here,
- you're not looking.
- Trust me.
I see it.
If you end up smearing a man who gave his life to the badge--
I have factored your concerns into how I'm dealing with this case.
Anything else, commander ?
No, Ma'am.
I'm just trying to be of assistance.
And thanks for the message you left on my website, too.
I check it, like, 6 times a day.
You put that website together all by yourself ?
well... had a little help from my dad.
- Hey.
- Hey !
Hi.
Chief Johnson, what's up ?
Here you go.
I'm so sorry to intrude, but
I think I might be in a position where I might really, really need your help tomorrow.
You knew as well as I do how hard it is to get a homicide detective to confess.
The moment I mirandize him, a lawyer will appear, and I'll be dead in the water.
So I need to take him completely by surprise.
I heard Xavier had an alibi.
It'll fall apart in the dryer.
Look, I know you cared about Tim.
And you're the only person left who knows this case from front to back.
Somebody is lying.
And I think if I have you there, and if Xavier and Ari don't know about it, somebody's gonna trip up.
Ma'am... if I come downtown, and try and help you to arrest Xavier, and you don't have him cold, and I mean on ice, my whole division will turn against me.
You said you wish'd you'd been there for tim last saturday.
There's nothing we can do to change that, but you can be there for him tomorrow.
I'm putting you at odds with your entire division, and I'm so sorry about that, but
I won't get this confession without your help, Detective.
Tim Martin was your friend.
Please.
I certainly hope you know what you're doing.
For both our sakes.
Lieutenant Tao ?
Yes, thank you.
I need you to make me a favor.
It has to do with that sample of DNA that we haven't identified yet.
So, he's not in his room.
And I think we've pretty well determined he's not over here.
Where'd you get that shirt anyway ?
The 80s ?
Your ex wife loved it.
Said it was easier to unbutton than anything you ever wore.
Put your glasses on, old man.
Turn around and take a gander.
Ari's right over there playing blackjack.
And there's two open seats next to him.
Now, I say, that we put him under tight surveillance for an hour or so.
You're kidding me, right ?
That's a 25 dollar table.
There's an ATM next to the cashier.
And I am feeling lucky...
Sorry about that, Chief.
- Give me a hundred.
- I already gave you a hundred.
You're way up.
So what ?
You know where the ATM is.
Besides,
- I say we cash in.
- All right.
Fine, fine, fine.
We'll cash in.
Come on, Ari.
You're cashing in, too.
Don't touch me.
Who the hell are you anyway ?
LAPD.
We're here to give you a lift home.
Put that away, you stupid.
Look...
I'm not leaving.
And you can't do anything to me here anyway.
Oh, really ?
Hey everybody, listen up.
I want to tell you about my friend Ari.
Shut up, you idiot.
You're gonna get me killed.
Hey, moron, now imagine us doing that only on television.
And all of your cousin's friends find out that you're a snitch.
And don't forget to tip the dealer.
Let's go.
How do they always know ?
Hi, mama.
How are you ?
I'm good.
I'm at work, but I have a minute.
Is everything all right ?
Great aunt who ?
Mama, is this someone I've even met ?
No, no.
I just ran upstairs.
I'm out of breath.
I don't know where Santa Clarita is.
It's just north of here.
All right.
I'll send her a get well card or something.
Can you spell her last name ?
E
U
L
E
S
S
Mama,
I have never met this woman before in my life, I swear.
Well...what's wrong with her ?
for heaven's sake.
If she's been in a coma for 2 years, how much worse can she get ?
I can't talk about this right now because I'm about to interview a serial killer who just... stabbed 30 people to death.
All right.
All right then.
OK.
Bye.
You got time for some coffee before you head into work ?
I do.
I just, I have to get changed, and I want to look a little stern.
That shouldn't be a problem.
I forgot to ask you, did you ever talk to Pope ?
About how he's doing with the divorce and everything ?
In passing.
I haven't had time to get into details.
I'm trying to think through how Martin and Barak were murdered because I know who did it, and I'm pretty sure of the motive, but I'm just not sure how.
And I'm only gonna get one run at this, so Pope is not high on my radar right now.
You can bet you're on his.
You watch.
He's gonna ask you out again.
Just so you know.
And he's not gonna care that we're dating or
Whatever.
Yeah, some guys are like that.
Will's not like that.
I will.
You can think what you want.
I don't trust him.
What ?
Are you wearing your gun ?
- Yeah.
- Can I have it ?
What's wrong with yours ?
In case you hadn't noticed, I'm off duty.
So, would you...
let me borrow yours ?
For a minute, please ?
Could it really be that simple ?
Bang.
What are you doing ?
Trust me.
Trust me.
Now, walk towards me.
Like you're trying to find out what I'm doing.
I am trying to find out what you're doing.
Bang.
See ?
That's how I shoot Barak with Martin's gun.
And then I shoot Martin with Barak'S.
That's how.
Because he knew Barak was coming.
That's how.
That's how.
That's how,
That's how, what ?
That's how what ?
I'll call you about dinner, okay ?
Okay.
No, wait.
No, wait, wait.
Brenda ?
When are we gonna talk about... about everything.
Ari Cohen is here.
Daniels has him in an interview room with detective Xavier.
And central division has arrived en masse.
They think you're about to arrest Xavier for murder.
I mention that because having him sit next to an informant with a camera trained on him kind of makes the guy look guilty.
Maybe you have an idea where I can place detective Xavier where he wouldn't look guilty.
Or maybe you think that Tim Martin, who everyone says was such a good cop, went into that warehouse alone.
Where was our good cop's backup then ?
Why didn't his partner go with him ?
Those are excellent questions, but they're not evidence.
And if you don't get a confession, and you try to make an arrest... it's not gonna be a real crowd pleaser.
Not that I don't have confidence in you.
I'll get the confession, Will.
Never you mind.
I'll get it.
Ma'am, thank you very much.
Did you make the match ?
Any minute.
You don't have it ?
It's coming.
Lieutenant Tao,
I need to start this interview, and I you don't finish,
I could be up a nasty smelling creek with no paddle.
Just go slow.
As soon as the match comes through, I'll bring it directly to Gabriel.
Here.
For all our sakes.
Please.
Thank you.
Here's the earpiece.
There's a new battery.
Oh, thank you, Buzz.
Thank you very much.
I thought we were taking him by surprise.
Well, I'm moving on to plan B.
Ma'am, I want to note you've used your investigation to smear Tim Martin's reputation.
And in this department, that's just not the way we play ball.
Well, captain, if you don't like the way I'm doing things, you're free to take your balls and go straight home.
Okay.
So... when I flip the pages in my notebook, you give me a true or false, okay ?
All right then.
Detective Hubbard, I just want to thank you for volunteering under such extraordinary circumstances.
And I think that everyone who cared about detective Martin will truely appreciate what you do here today.
Good morning, Detective Xavier.
And the elusive mr.
Cohen.
Here you are.
So kind of you to join us.
I was dragged here against my will, and all I'm going to do is plead the fifth.
You can't plead the fifth.
I can't ?
It would be a violation of the agreement you made with the D.A.
To be a cooperating witness.
So, if you plead the fifth,
I'll arrest you as an accomplice in a double homicide, so please, mr.
Cohen, do take a seat.
I didn't understand what this was all about.
- No one explained it to me.
- I don't even know why I'm here.
Because.
Someone's lying.
And I thought if I got you and Mr Cohen together here,
I could figure out the truth.
Are you saying I've been dishonest ?
You told me you'd never been to detective Martin's house.
And I have a witness who contradicts you.
She's a lying bitch !
The kind of lying bitch who deserves to be stalked by a cop ?
Who should be harassed under the color of authority ?
That kind of bitch ?
Do I need an attorney ?
I don't know.
Do you ?
So, tell me, mr.
Cohen, how well do you know detective Xavier here ?
Were you in contact with him regularly ?
- No.
- I met him exactly one time.
That's probably true.
That's what Tim told me.
That seems to be right, Chief.
And you went to Vancouver to collect samples of DNA from your cousin.
Who did you give those samples to ?
Detective Hubbard.
Where is he anyway ?
That's true.
And then I gave them to Tim.
Okay.
Hubbard says that's true.
Ari handed him the samples, and then he gave them to Martin.
But those samples turned out not to be of Barak.
Yeah.
And we asked him to get more.
I done what they asked.
They messed up, not me.
What did they expect me to do, go back, ask him to spit in the cup ?
My cousin was a psycho, not an idiot.
You never did crap.
Probably never went to see Barak
- in the first place !
- Then why did i call you on wednesday and tell you he was coming to town ?
He never mentioned Barak was coming ?
Ok.
That's probably not true, Chief.
Bullshit.
You never called me at all !
- That's right.
- I called detective Hubbard.
I told him I had arranged to meet Zeev at the warehouse on saturday morning, but they said that you guys--
That is not true !
He asked to meet, and I told him to call Tim.
All right, okay.
Did you hear that, Chief ?
We never heard anything about a meeting.
- With you or anybody !
- Are you sure,
Detective Xavier ?
You're taking this lying scumbag's word over mine.
I already told you.
Martin never mentioned it.
And all this stuff about DNA happened before I was even on the case.
So what does this have to do with me ?
Chief, Tao's here with your papers.
I'll be back in one minute to answer that.
Ok, I have to hurry now.
Because I'm about 2 minutes from having to read someone their rights.
Thank you.
- Detective hubbard, please.
- Yes, Ma'am.
I need your help getting these DNA results in order.
Okay.
- See if this is right.
- Okay.
Barak's blood from the Brentwood crime scene.
Barak's blood from the warehouse.
- A match.
- That's right.
And then here...
Martin's blood from the warehouse, which just happens to match up with one of the samples that
Ari brought back from Vancouver.
What ?
the two DNA samples that we thought were obtained by your informant, one was actually that of Tim Martin, and the other was one of his male relatives, which lieutenant Tao has just identified... as your son.
Or I guess I should say, Martin's son, by your wife.
We matched it up against the online database where you posted Charlie's bone marrow looking for a donor.
My guess is, you didn't know you weren't Charlie's biological father until the doctors checked to see if you're a possible transplant candidate.
Isn't that right ?
And so you began to wonder who Charlie's father really was.
And you knew your partner, didn't you ?
You knew him very well.
And Martin never volunteered to have his own bone marrow tested, did he ?
See, we went on Charlie's website where he thanks everyone who's volunteered, and Martin's name isn't on it.
I guess he was afraid you'd find out the truth.
It's pretty awful, really.
That he cared more about that than saving his own son.
But then he knew you pretty well, too.
So, when Ari came back from Vancouver with Barak's DNA, you switched them out with samples that you took from your partner and Charlie just to make sure you were right.
And, I suppose, to see if Martin might be a possible match for a transplant, but he wasn't.
Also, on this blog your son keeps, he lists what happens to him every day in the hospital.
Last saturday morning when you said you went with him for a procedure, a transfusion of white blood cells, well, the specialist got called away and the procedure was cancelled.
And when Charlie finally came back to his room, you weren't there.
And didn't come back for an hour and a half.
Look, listen...
Tim shot Barak.
The bullet was fired from his gun.
But Martin didn't have his gun.
He'd given it to you.
- Oh, why would he do that ?
- Because you asked him for it.
Because you volunteered to go with him to the warehouse, and he agreed because you were the partner he trusted.
And you really needed that gun, didn't you ?
Because detective Xavier and Ari are both telling the truth.
And you were the only one who knew that it wasn't an informant who was about to walk through the doors at that warehouse, but an armed psychopath.
My guess is... that you shot Barak as soon as you were sure that he was close enough for it to be a clean kill, and while Martin was freaking out, demanding to know what you were doing,
you told him to trust you.
Didn't you ?
You walked over to Barak's body.
You knelt down beside him, took his gun, and while Martin followed you, demanding an explanation, you shot him dead between the eyes.
Isn't that right, detective ?
By the way, does Charlie know... that Tim's his real father ?
I mean...
I only ask because once you bring a lawyer into this,
Tim's son will have to be deposed.
Tim's son ?
I wonder what effect that will have on Charlie's health ?
Knowing you're not his real dad, I mean.
Tim's son ?
How do you suppose Charlie's gonna react knowing that you gunned down his father
- in cold.
- I'm his father !
Charlie's my son !
I taught him how to walk.
And I taught him how to read.
And I taught him...
I've been with him through 7 surgeries, and 38 procedures.
And where was the great Tim Martin when it mattered, huh ?
Where was he... when Charlie's life was on the line ?
Where was he ?
Where was Tim Martin ?
I don't know, detective Hubbard.
But I know where he is now.
I saw his brains splattered all over the floor of an abandoned warehouse while his body was being eaten by flies.
And I can't help but think... you may have overreacted.
You can't... you can't tell...
Charlie about Tim.
No, you won't do that.
I can.
And I will.
Write it all down.
And we'll get you a deal from the D.A.
You can wear a bracelet and stay with Charlie until his illness... resolves itself.
Even though, intellectually, people understand you did the right thing, emotionally, there is gonna be some fall out over all of this.
Between you and the department.
Between your squad and the department.
We can cope with that.
I know it's late, but...
I thought you might have time for a... drink.
Or dinner, if you're hungry.
And as I remember things, you're kind of always hungry, aren't you ?
I am.
But, well, dinner.
I already have plans.
Sort of a... celebration.
With Fritz.
I heard he might be leaving town.
Behavioral sciences, right ?
That's good for him.
No, no.
He's not taking that.
No, we're celebrating because he's... moving in.
Next week.
That's great.
Congratulations.
We'll see.
Big step.
But, lunch tomorrow.
I could do that.
I have to meet with my attorney at 1:00 tomorrow.
We'll find a moment somewhere.
All right then.
Thanks for supporting me.
- It meant a lot.
- Sure.
My pleasure.
My job, actually.
Well !
- Good night.
- Good night.
And, uh... good work.
Oh, thanks.
Thanks.
Synchro:
Csivore
captioning made possible by warner bros.
[insects buzzing]
[buzzing intensifies] [crowd murmuring] watch your backs.
watch your backs!
hey, guys, please, please.
hey, come on, guys.
you want to cut us some slack, huh?
guys, you're not helping, all right?
come on, huh?
guys, we're all wearing the same color, all right?
[indistinct talking] [indistinct radio chatter]
come on, can we get him out of there?
there's nothing i can do about it.
you're not helping at all, all right?
just a little cooperation-- that's all we need.
as soon as we can, i promise.
come on, guys, cut us some slack, huh?
we'll get him out.
guys, come on.
you know, it's time to get him out.
just chill out.
chief says that's it.
...knew about it.
[siren blaring] give us a little respect, too, ok?
move him out now!
[siren]
just calm down, ok?
calm down, just calm down!
you're not helping!
hey.
[all talking at once] thank you, lieutenant provenza.
thank you very much.
chief johnson.
commander.
where's chief pope?
he had an appointment with an attorney this morning.
i'm not even sure he knows we have an officer down.
but i spoke to the captain of central.
well, i'd like to speak to the captain as well, but i don't need his entire division here on the street.
one of their own is lying dead in that warehouse.
it's one of our own.
maybe if you let us clear detective martin's remains-- i haven't examined them yet.
i understand that, but when an l.a.p.d. officer dies in the line of duty, we never leave him lying next to the scumbag who killed him.
that's because when an officer is murdered on the job, you usually find them within minutes, not 2 days after the fact.
now, i have a lot of questions about what happened here, and i don't need this crowd trying to bully me.
they should be encouraged to leave the scene and go on about their business.
not meaning to be presumptuous, ma'am, but imagine that it's sergeant gabriel lying dead in this warehouse.
would you be out here waiting to pay tribute to their sacrifice, or would you be in your office going about your business?
you know what we're supposed to do!
i take your point, commander.
i'll get this out of the way as quickly as possible.
look, we're all on the same side.
let them do their job.
let them do their job!
uh, she might get mad at me for telling you this, but daniels probably shouldn't be here.
why?
when we both worked at central, she dated martin for a few months.
i'm only mentioning it 'cause down the road some lawyer might want to make-- got it.
so, who's the other dead guy?
the suspect detective martin killed?
ze'ev barak.
part of a drug distribution ring.
ecstasy.
about 6 months ago, he caught a couple of his teenage dealers overcharging and pocketing the change.
u.c.l.a. sophomores.
he shot them to death in their apartment.
and we know this because?
martin and his partner worked with an informant.
captain of central has his name vaulted.
still waiting for the murder book, too.
where was detective martin's partner?
martin was officially off duty.
so he met this guy here alone, without backup?
where did detective martin live?
long beach.
ok.
how'd they get in?
side door was unlocked, and we found a key in martin's pocket.
all right, then.
thank you, detective daniels.
now, if you wouldn't mind waiting outside-- actually, if it's all the same to you, chief-- i'm sorry, but it isn't all the same to me, daniels.
so if you wouldn't mind waiting outside, and you can make sure that central division stays a respectful distance.
i'd appreciate it.
thank you.
lieutenant tao, what do we think happened here?
it looks like they fired at the same time.
tim martin got it between the eyes.
as he fell back, his weapon discharged at barak.
just looking at him, the way he's lying, i bet his spinal cord is severed.
this drug dealer had awfully good aim.
detective martin's lips seem to be decomposing at the same rate as mr. barak's.
and you're looking at second instart maggots in his eyes.
same over here.
mm-hmm.
still eating en masse.
gathered around the wounds and soft tissue openings.
that's consistent with saying they both died saturday morning?
gabriel?
lieutenant flynn, when s.i.d. starts collecting d.n.a. in here, please walk the elimination samples from both of these men through our lab and have that done tonight.
detective sanchez, we'll be working with central division on this.
they'll be in the murder room as well.
i'd like you to keep an eye on them.
lieutenant tao, i want a ballistics trajectory report from the morgue a.s.a.p., please.
let's see how this gunfight played out.
so, lieutenant provenza, summing up what we know so far-- alone and on his day off, detective tim martin enters an abandoned warehouse in downtown los angeles, 30 miles from his home in long beach.
by coincidence, mr. barak, a murder suspect in a double homicide martin is working, happens to enter the same warehouse.
they both draw their weapons and fire at the exact same time.
fatally wounded, they instantly drop dead where they stand.
what would you say the chances are it happened like that?
apparently, 100%.
chief, you should see this.
lieutenant provenza, let's clear this place out as quickly and honorably as possible.
thank you.
yes, ma'am.
can you blow this out, please, and help us clean up martin?
yeah, the last thing we need is stuff flying out from under the sheet when we carry him out.
then the people will really hate our guts.
relax, flynn.
people hate your guts already.
thank you, officer.
you're welcome, chief.
tick tock.
chief johnson, this is captain leahy, central division, and martin's partner detective lawrence xavier.
i thought you might like to talk to them.
sir.
ma'am.
is there anything i can do to help?
yes, there is.
is this a picture of the informant that you and detective martin were working with?
no.
does he have anything to do with the barak case?
no, ma'am. he just owns the warehouse.
because it says here that he's wanted for questioning in connection with the murder of an l.a.p.d. officer.
and considering the mood of your division... circulating this man's photograph puts his life in danger.
so, what i need you to do, captain, is to find out who created this flyer, how many were distributed, and have every single one of them returned to me.
2 days!
let's go!
[crowd murmuring] and i need you to order your troops to stand down.
because while you have my sympathies, captain, a righteous call of an officer down is my job.
tim martin is not a job to me, ma'am.
he was my friend.
wait a second.
ok.
attention!
you could've told me about it in person, in advance. what-- yeah. i can't talk about this now.
becau-- yeah, well, i'm sorry you feel that way, but we just lost a 15-year veteran in a shootout, and that's actually more important than you are at the moment.
leahy, is it true your people were circulating 100 flyers of some guy who was not connected to the crime?
i got 98 of them back.
and where's detective martin's partner?
detective xavier is waiting in commander taylor's office with the murder book and the informant packet.
all right, so unless you'd like to start collecting your pension tomorrow, central had better back off and allow priority homicide to do its job.
you're dismissed.
sir.
oh, uh, captain, i'm so sorry, but i'm afraid we're really gonna need all these flyers.
because otherwise, we can't-- that's good enough for me.
98% is fine.
go on, captain.
you understand that this is not a picture of the informant that detective martin was working with, and as long-- i don't want to talk about this anymore.
[door slams] you left a police officer lying next to the man who shot him, and that is never done.
the reason i left detective martin lying there is that police officers are trained to fire in bursts, and martin only put one shot into barak. one.
and the bodies were lying close together, too close.
and what was martin doing there in the first place?
now, he and detective xavier were working with an undercover informant, and i need to question him.
you can't release the informant's name to law enforcement.
well, how i am supposed to talk to him, will?
what if he's not just--just waiting by the phone?
why is it that you can never do your job without constantly complaining about everything?
the informant was guaranteed anonymity.
you can release his name to one other member of your squad, and that's it.
now, i've upheld your authority with the entire department looking on.
but when a police officer is killed, we expect closure, quickly and completely.
is that clear?
yes, it is.
your attitude, however, is a complete mystery.
uh, chief...
yes.
uh, lieutenant tao's put together a preliminary ballistics report, and i think before we talk to xavier, you should, uh, see what he's put together.
how graphic is it?
no morgue shots.
all right, then.
all right, then, let's see what we've got.
so... why isn't this... wha--ugh... oh, first i should say, the bullets we pulled out of those college kids, the double homicide tim martin was working, they match barak's gun.
uh, lieutenant provenza, are you eating chocolate in here?
thorry.
i thought we agreed to keep snacks with processed sugar out of the murder room.
if y'all have to have candy, please do so in the hallways in the electronics room.
or you might try giving it up.
since i stopped eating all that crap, i have more energy.
and i'm sleeping better, too.
um, what about nuts?
excuse me?
are my nuts allowed in here?
do they have sugar on them, lieutenant?
no. they're salty.
well, there's your answer, then.
what about the slug in detective--
what about the slug that was taken out of detective martin's head, lieutenant tao?
also from barak's gun.
and the bullet that killed barak was from martin's weapon.
but then we start to have problems.
it seems like martin fired first from about 15 feet.
his bullet grazes the top of barak's heart, shatters the spine, and barak falls dead.
so... barak falls dead and his gun discharges?
no. couldn't have.
because martin was shot from 4 feet away, and the entry wound shows the bullet was fired from a crouching position, not from the ground.
so even if we supposed martin fired and walked towards the body, barak would've been paralyzed.
he couldn't have fired at all.
but barak's gun definitely killed detective martin?
it did.
there was a third person in that warehouse.
i'm so sorry this is taking so long, detective xavier.
i think i have the basics now.
so, ze'ev barak murdered 2 young men who were dealing x for him, and leaves their apartment, demanding his cousin ari cohen drive him to the airport.
ari says he had no idea barak intended to kill anyone, and after the shooting, he offers his testimony in exchange for immunity.
but how do you know that your informant didn't kill those men and blame it on barak?
the kids fought back.
barak got cut.
we got good d.n.a. samples of the killer from the apartment where the boys were murdered.
nothing matched ari, so we paid him $25,000 to fly up to vancouver and get the routine 2 samples off his cousin.
but the d.n.a. samples he brought back didn't match the guy who killed the kids?
they didn't match each other.
look in section 6 of your murder book there.
mr. informant submitted d.n.a.
from 2 different people-- males, relatives.
didn't hit anything from our crime scene or our database.
so, looks like barak's death is good for ari-- doesn't have to testify, his cousin's partners won't know he's a snitch, and... he got $25,000.
in cash.
so, he met with the police regularly at the warehouse?
whose idea was that?
ari's. one of his friends wanted to sell it, so he paid ari to show it around to anybody who wanted to look at it.
did you have keys to the side door?
no.
so why do you suppose martin went there on his day off?
i don't know.
any reason martin might go to the warehouse and not want you around?
look...here's the thing.
i got on this case late.
tim had been working with detective hubbard before me.
they'd been partners since, like, the early nineties.
then hubbard takes family leave because his wife died and his kid had cancer.
me and tim, we'd only been partners 2 months.
and is it standard procedure for people from central division to meet with murder suspects on their own?
no.
on their days off?
no.
if i look at your qualifying test, who will i find is a better shot, you or martin?
me. because tim had problems-- when martin didn't show up for work on monday, you talked to your captain about it. why?
linda... his girlfriend... martin's girlfriend, she called me saturday night to say that-- you work...on saturday?
are these difficult questions, detective?
because i think they're fairly simple.
were you at work on saturday, or should i look it up?
i was home.
linda called me because tim had a date with her and he stood her up.
so i tried to get in touch with him, left a few messages, and when he didn't get back to me, i drove down there sunday morning, knocked, looked through the flap of the door,
and saw his mail from saturday.
and had you been there before, to his apartment?
no. no, i almost didn't go this time.
see, standing up girlfriends is martin's way of usually letting them know he's about to wind things down.
and when i say that, i don't mean he's a bad cop.
just a jerk when it came to women.
anyway, when he didn't show up on monday, i went to captain leahy.
thank you, detective xavier.
that's all for now.
ma'am.
by the way, have you been offered counseling?
excuse me?
you seem to be holding back the natural grief one feels at losing a partner and fellow officer.
perhaps you can get some help with that.
for the time being, um, the name ari cohen is our little secret, sergeant.
i'd like you to find him for me, please.
but don't identify yourself to anyone you call as a police officer.
i'll be back in about an hour or two.
all right. ok.
i was gonna stop by du-pars and pick up a pie, too, but with this diet you're on, i didn't think you'd feel comfortable with more pastry in the house.
oh, i wouldn't.
and it's not a diet, it's a life change.
either you control the sugar in your life, or the sugar controls you.
and it ages you.
i--i read this book, and i'm just-- i'm--i'm over it.
ok.
i just--i just don't want sugar anymore.
um, i'm just-- i'm finished with it.
ok.
i really am.
i believe you.
by the way... the, uh, escrow on my condo is about up.
i was wondering if you'd thought over what we talked about.
you know, 'cause otherwise, there's a position in behavioral sciences.
it's been suggested i put in for it.
it would mean me moving back east.
but, uh, you know, it would give me a chance to move up the f.b.i.'s food chain.
fritz, i-- i don't want you to go.
a-and, of course, i've thought about... it--i just... see, m-moving in together... i don't... there's...
what?
there's all these problems that would have to be worked out.
what?
well, like what?
well, like getting a new phone, for one thing.
because you couldn't answer mine when my parents call.
that's not really a...problem.
and i--i can be just impossible.
yeah?
i like it that you're impossible sometimes.
well, what if you stopped?
s-stopped liking me?
if i was gonna stop liking you, i would've done it already.
but... well... look, i--i haven't had a lot of success living with guys, and... it could just ruin everything.
yeah, but, you know, if, uh... we're trying to sort of become closer, you know, more like full partners... living together would give us a chance to see what that would be like.
[telephone rings] [ring]
[ring]
[ring] it's work.
i know we're having a serious-- [ring] hello?
what?
how long ago?
it's lieutenant provenza.
they found our informant.
though how he knows... all right. i'll--i'll be there in about 20 minutes.
ok. bye.
i love this, trying to have lunch together more.
it's nice.
and, uh, we'll talk about this, all this... yeah, sure.
later. just-- this evening or something.
this reluctance of yours, it has nothing to do with what's going on with pope, does it?
what's going on with pope?
his wife served him with divorce papers last friday.
you didn't know?
no.
what do you do for a living, again?
if you're not going to talk to him...sir, we'd like to take him to central.
yeah, but i don't give a flying you-know-what where you'd like to take anybody.
is that right?
yeah, that's right.
hey!
hey!
i'm getting your captain on the other end of the line here, so you want to park your asses somewhere?
did i not say to keep quiet about our guy?
he's not "our guy."
he's the guy from the flyer, the owner of the warehouse.
michael dietz.
he's been roughed up, too.
i got chief pope down here as soon as i got back.
back from where?
from...
ari cohen's house.
he's not there.
newspaper is stacked up over the fence.
neighbors said they haven't seen him in over 2 weeks, so, i'm gonna have to try to find-- my fault, i'm sorry.
thank you, sergeant gabriel.
you were right.
we should've pulled in those other flyers.
never mind, will.
it's fine.
lookit, this guy's a friend of ari's.
maybe he can help me find him.
no, no, no. dietz cannot know that ari was an informant.
and besides, thanks to central division, we may have a civil suit on our hands.
i need to calm him down in an official kind of way.
i can manage this.
you look tired.
why don't you head on home?
please don't use the techniques you employ in there... on me.
something you'd like to know, ask me.
well, i--i didn't think it was any of my business.
i just...i heard you were getting a divorce.
that's all.
i'm not getting a divorce.
estelle's getting a divorce.
you know, the job, the hours-- she's seeing someone else.
they're getting married.
so no alimony.
she doesn't want our kids because he doesn't want them.
so there's that.
and you know, well, at some point, it'll stop hurting, and i'll just hate her and go on with my life.
oh, will, i'm sorry.
i really am.
you know what?
let's, uh, discuss it later.
we have a murdered officer to deal with, and central division is going nuts.
all right.
now, will, i'm not complaining, but ballistics suggests that there was someone else in that warehouse when martin and barak were killed, and i really need to talk to this informant, ari.
i really do.
who was martin's partner before xavier?
hubbard.
he's on family leave.
his 10-year-old boy's got cancer.
he's at the hospital 24/7.
well, you know where to find him, then.
all right, then.
all right.
yeah.
mr. dietz.
[door closes] my name's william pope... [muffled voices]
[machine beeping]
[telephone ringing] it's hard to believe tim's gone.
[indistinct p.a. announcement] i should've gone with him.
but my wife-- please.
my wife died 4 years ago, [clears throat] and, uh, charlie-- that's my son... i thought...
charlie deserves to always have one parent around.
when you said you thought about-- so how's, um, your son doing, is he ok?
uh, well, you know, bone cancer's tough.
first we, uh, tried an experimental therapy.
didn't work.
now we're looking for a bone marrow transplant, but you need an exact match.
thank god my wife's parents have a lot of money.
any luck?
uh, i tested, and, um, no.
i struck out.
but, you know, lots of people have volunteered.
charlie's got a website.
he, uh, keeps a diary of everything we're doing here.
people write in, and the website has a link.
thanks.
check it out if you'd like to.
thank you.
i will. i will.
thank you... for that.
i'm--i'm so sorry about your partner.
[sighs] yeah.
it's just unbelievable.
i can't think of why-- why he would go down there alone.
you knew about it, then?
the meeting?
with ari?
yeah.
yeah, i helped set it up.
you called ari?
after he brought back those screwed-up d.n.a. samples from vancouver?
no way.
no, he called me, uh, last... wednesday.
and ari says he wants to meet.
and i told him, call tim, which i guess he did, 'cause, you know, tim phoned me, said that ari was coming back saturday morning and would i go with him, 'cause--'cause i handled ari better.
charlie had a transfusion that morning, though.
did ari say anything about bringing barak?
no. i mean, if we had known that barak was coming, we would've had, you know, surveillance.
we would've brought in sharpshooters.
that's a dangerous man.
any idea why tim might not want xavier to go with him?
well, maybe-- oh, hey, partner.
where are you going?
ultrasound.
don't worry.
it's nothing.
ok.
are you working?
nah. i'm--i'm just giving some background to these detectives on an old case.
keep him busy for a minute.
i want you to work.
please work.
well, maybe i should go with you.
no. you shouldn't.
you're driving me crazy.
[chuckles] all right.
bye.
all right, good-bye.
all right, when you get back, i'm gonna kick your butt in monopoly again.
charlie:
you wish.
[chuckles] i wish?
[indistinct p.a. announcement] oh, god.
[chuckles] he never gets down.
i just...
i couldn't do that.
and--and we were talking about tim and why he might not want xavier to go with him to the warehouse.
and--and i was just wondering if it had anything to do with tim's girlfriend.
why--why would you think that?
well, she called xavier at home to find out why tim stood her up, and i was wondering how she had xavier's home phone number.
well, there was some, uh... overlap there between xavier and tim.
you saying tim moved in on xavier's girlfriend while xavier was still dating her?
maybe she didn't like xavier as much as he thought.
that's...
something a guy has to come to terms with sometimes.
or not.
i can't believe martin was still pulling that crap.
look... i don't want to get xavier in trouble.
yeah, well, i need to talk to this girlfriend, and right away.
so, detective hubbard, what's her full name?
um, please?
and to be dragged down here after everything that has gone on and read my rights like i was some common criminal or something-- miss linda salk.
i'm deputy chief brenda johnson, and i am very, very sorry to have kept you waiting on what must be a terrible day for you.
linda:
it is a terrible day.
guys, this is a surveillance center, not a concession stand.
my boyfriend is dead-- and i'm not your maid, ok?
why don't you calm down, buzz?
if you're going to treat me like a criminal, shouldn't i have an attorney?
oh, we'd get into such trouble if we gave legal advice.
i was trying to get you in and out, but if having a lawyer would make you feel more comfortable, you just call one, and we'll wait.
that's the nice thing about working for the government-- you get paid for just being here.
that's how you're treating tim's death, as an overtime opportunity?
well, i was going to ask you some questions, but-- what do you think i could know?
i'm not sure, ma'am.
but there was a third person in that warehouse, and we're trying to figure out who that could've been.
i'm only bringing it up because you were the first person to report him missing, and you're licensed to carry a handgun.
and i carry a handgun because it is my constitutional right to do so.
and i have an ex, who is also a cop and likes to drive by my house sometimes at night and flash his brights in my window.
he even knocked on the door at tim's one night, drunk.
are you talking about lawrence xavier?
i am.
if he intimidated you, why didn't you report him?
linda: because tim talked me out of it.
he said he'd put a stop to it, and he did.
and i only got one more call from lawrence, complaining about how much money he had wasted... [voice shakes] on our dates, and so i sent him a check for $1,000, by messenger.
and you know what, he cashed it, too... asshole.
and you know what?
i paid for most of the stuff that tim and i did together, and anyway, you know what, i don't really care about this stuff.
detective martin was hurting for money?
he's a cop. you know?
he's not made of money, and i pull down enough for both of us.
i'm a top salesperson for suburbans in the southland,
3 years going.
excuse me.
[blows nose] did detective martin ever mention his job?
the barak case?
because he and detective xavier were working it together.
did he say he was meeting someone saturday morning?
did he mention a name?
uh... yeah.
there was an informant that... i wasn't supposed to know about--ari.
ari cohen?
maybe. it was a jewish name.
and this ari guy had gone to vegas, and tim thought that he was coming back.
no one in here heard that name.
damn.
[indistinct chatter]
[telephone rings] and i broke it off with him.
that's really all i had to say.
well, thank you, detective daniels, for sharing that information with me.
i, uh... [sighs] i asked lieutenant tao to drag ari's credit cards, and, uh, we found out where he's staying in vegas.
he's racked up some pretty good cash advances, too, but, um, we don't have any authority in nevada.
well, i think that we can, uh, talk him into a quick trip home.
so, sergeant, tell me, um... how did you know that detective martin had a thing about women who were seeing other guys?
no answer?
because... you were awfully quick about that info about daniels having dated him.
and you were at central, too, at the same time.
could it be that you experienced some overlap with martin as well?
hey, you know what?
martin couldn't have been less interested in daniels until i asked her out for dinner.
ok, we went out on 2 dates, and then suddenly-- suddenly, he's all over her.
which i don't care about anymore.
i mean, it was years ago.
but the experience daniels had with martin disqualified her from working on this case, and not you?
daniels had an intimate relationship with the man.
i barely knew him.
well, that's a variation of what i said to her.
because we have a team here, it's working, and i'd like to keep it that way.
however, to be perfectly clear, you held back information about the victim, and you shouldn't have.
what did you want me to say?
well, obviously, you could've spoken more on sexual pathology, which, as you are aware, sergeant, is the most difficult aspect of our personality to change.
and which, as xavier proves... martin couldn't change.
and that's relevant to this investigation?
that martin never changed?
oh, sergeant, it's key.
any news, gentlemen?
ok, we got back the d.n.a. results from the warehouse, the elimination samples on barak and martin.
and?
barak's blood matches what we found at the brentwood crime scene.
so we take that along with his gun, and we can be pretty sure he did those two kids.
good. case closed.
what's the problem?
well, the other elimination sample from the warehouse.
uh, detective martin, what about it?
it matches one of the samples we paid our informant $25,000 to bring back from vancouver.
martin booked samples of his own d.n.a.?
and that of one of his relatives.
i don't know if he swapped out what he got from the informant or if he ever even paid the guy.
i'm uncomfortable suggesting martin had his hand in the till.
this is a guy who was killed while trying to arrest a murder suspect.
well, we don't know that, commander.
in fact, all we know for sure is that someone else was there.
our informant is in vegas.
i'm not saying that bringing him back will make him safer, just the opposite, maybe.
the name's already starting to come out in her interrogations.
chief, i don't think he's going to remain anonymous much longer.
and we don't want to get into a race with central.
and there's stuff i have to ask him-- and now this d.n.a. thing.
all right.
how long will it take you to find him?
lieutenant flynn and provenza could go to vegas tonight and bring our informant back by tomorrow morning.
i can authorize that trip for you.
thank you.
gentlemen, you can get the informant packet from sergeant gabriel and when ari gets here, i want detective xavier in the room with me.
all right, then.
i gotta run an errand, so thank you very much.
chief johnson.
yes.
i just want to make sure i understand why you're bringing detective xavier back in.
i want to question him.
why?
uh, because i need more answers.
did you ever ask him where he was last saturday morning when the murders were committed?
because... i looked into it, and he was at home, on the phone for 2 hours.
well, his line was busy.
that doesn't mean he was on it.
i'm trying to help you here, chief.
xavier has an excellent record, and...yes, tim martin, he might have been a womanizer.
but if you can't tell how much people respected him around here, you're not looking.
trust me, i see it.
if you end up smearing a man who gave his life to the badge-- i have factored your concerns into how i'm dealing with this case.
anything else, commander?
no, ma'am.
i'm, uh, just trying to be of assistance.
charlie:
and thanks for the message you left on my website, too.
i check it, like, 6 times a day.
oh, you put that website together all by yourself?
well, i had a little help from my dad.
hey.
hey.
hi.
chief johnson, what's up?
here you go.
i'm so sorry to intrude, but i--i think i might be in a position where i might really, really need your help tomorrow.
[indistinct chatter] you know as well as i do how hard it is to get a homicide detective to confess.
the moment i mirandize him, a lawyer will appear and i'll be dead in the water.
so i need to take him completely by surprise.
well, i--i heard xavier had an alibi.
oh, it'll fall apart in the dryer.
look, i know you cared about tim.
and you're the only person left who knows this case from front to back.
somebody is lying.
and i think if i have you there and if xavier and ari don't know about it, somebody's gonna trip up.
ma'am... if i come downtown and try and help you to arrest xavier and you don't have him cold-- and i mean on ice-- my whole division will turn against me.
[sighs] you said you wished you'd been there for tim last saturday.
there's nothing we can do to change that, but you can be there for him tomorrow.
i'm putting you at odds with your entire division, and i'm so sorry about that, but i won't get this confession without your help, detective.
tim martin was your friend.
please.
i certainly hope you know what you're doing, for both our sakes.
[dialing]
lieutenant tao?
yes, thank you.
um, i need you to do me a favor.
it has to do with that sample of d.n.a.
that we haven't identified yet.
[indistinct chatter]
so, he's not in his room.
and i think we've pretty well determined he's not over here.
and where did you get that shirt, anyway, the eighties?
your ex-wife loved it.
said it was easier to unbutton than anything you ever wore.
put your glasses on, old man.
turn around and take a gander.
ari's right over there playing blackjack.
and there's 2 open seats next to him.
now, i say that we put him under tight surveillance for an hour or so.
you're kidding me, right?
that's a $25 table.
there's an a.t.m. next to the cashier, and i am feeling lucky... sorry about that, chief.
give me $100.
i already gave you 100.
you're way up.
so what?
you know where the a.t.m. is.
besides, i say we cash in.
all right.
fine, fine, fine.
we'll cash in.
come on, ari.
you're cashing in, too.
hey, hey, hey.
don't touch me.
who the hell are you. anyway?
l.a.p.d. we're here to give you a lift home.
put that away, huh, you stupid-- ok.
oh.
look... i'm not leaving.
and--and you can't do anything to me here, anyway.
oh, really?
hey!
hey, everybody, listen up.
i want to tell you about my friend ari.
shut up, you idiot.
you're gonna get me killed.
hey, moron, now imagine us doing that only on television.
and all of your cousin's friends find out that you're a snitch.
and don't forget to tip the dealer.
let's go.
[cat purring]
[telephone rings] [telephone rings]
[sighs] how do they always know?
hi, mama. how are you?
uh, i'm good.
i'm at work, but i have a minute.
is everything all right?
great aunt who?
[door closes] uh... mama, is this someone i've even met?
no, no. i just ran upstairs.
i'm out of breath.
uh, i don't know where santa clarita is.
it's just north of here.
all right. i'll send her a get-well card or something.
uh, can you spell her last name?
e-u-l-e-s-s... mama, i have never met this woman before in my life, i swear.
well, what's wrong with her?
oh, for heaven's sake.
look, if she's been in a coma for 2 years, how much worse can she get?
[sighs] i can't talk about this right now because i'm about to interview a serial killer who just stabbed 30 people to death.
all right.
all right, then.
ok. bye.
you got time for some coffee before you head into work?
i do. i just-- i have to get changed, and i want to look a little stern.
well, that shouldn't be a problem.
hey, i forgot to ask you, did you ever talk to pope... about how he's doing with the divorce and everything?
in passing.
i haven't had time to get into details.
i'm trying to think through how martin and barak were murdered because i know who did it, and i'm pretty sure of the motive, but i'm just not sure how.
and i'm only gonna get one run at this, so pope is not high on my radar right now.
you can bet you're on his.
you watch.
he's gonna ask you out again.
oh... just so you know.
and he's not gonna care that we're dating or... whatever.
yeah. some guys are like that.
will's not like that.
yeah, well, you can think what you want.
i don't trust him.
what?
are you wearing your gun?
yeah.
can i have it?
well, what's wrong with yours?
in case you hadn't noticed, i'm off duty.
so, would you let me borrow yours, for a minute, please?
could it really be that simple?
bang.
what are you doing?
trust me.
trust me.
now, walk towards me, like you're trying to find out what i'm doing.
i am trying to find out what you're doing.
bang.
see?
that's how i shoot barak with martin's gun.
and then i shoot martin with barak's.
that's how.
because he knew barak was coming.
that's how.
that's how.
that's how, that's how, what?
that's how what?
i'll call you about dinner, ok?
ok. no, wait.
no, wait, wait. brenda-- when are we gonna talk about--
about everything?
[elevator bell dings] ari cohen is here.
oh!
daniels has him in an interview room with detective xavier.
and central division has arrived en masse.
they think you're about to arrest xavier for murder.
i mention that because having him sit next to an informant with a camera trained on him kind of makes the guy look guilty.
well, maybe you have an idea where i can place detective xavier where he wouldn't look guilty.
or maybe you think that tim martin, whom everyone says was such a good cop, went into that warehouse alone.
where was our good cop's backup then?
why didn't his partner go with him?
those are excellent questions, but they're not evidence.
and if you don't get a confession and you try to make an arrest... it's not gonna be a real crowd pleaser.
not that i don't have confidence in you.
i'll get the confession, will.
never you mind.
i'll get it.
ma'am, thank you very much.
thank you.
did you make the match?
any minute.
you don't have it?
it's coming.
um, lieutenant tao, i need to start this interview, and i you don't finish, i could be up a nasty-smelling creek with no paddle.
just go slow.
as soon as the match comes through, i'll bring it directly to gabriel.
hmm.
here.
for all our sakes.
please.
thank you.
mmm.
here's the earpiece.
there's a new battery.
oh, thank you, buzz.
thank you very much.
i thought we were taking him by surprise.
well, i'm moving on to plan b.
ma'am, i want to note you've used your investigation to smear tim martin's reputation.
and in this department, that's just not the way we play ball.
well, captain, if you don't like the way i'm doing things, you're free to take your balls and go straight home.
ok.
so...when i flip the pages in my notebook, you give me a true or false, ok?
yeah.
all right, then.
now, detective hubbard, i just want to thank you for volunteering under such extraordinary circumstances.
and i think that everyone who cared about detective martin will truly appreciate what you do here today.
good morning, detective xavier.
and the elusive mr. cohen.
here you are.
so kind of you to join us.
i was dragged here against my will, and all i'm going to do is plead the fifth.
you can't plead the fifth.
i can't?
it would be a violation of the agreement you made with the d.a. to be a cooperating witness.
so, if you plead the fifth, i'll arrest you as an accomplice in a double homicide, so please, mr. cohen, do take a seat.
oh.
well, i--i-- i didn't understand what this was all about.
no one explained it to me.
i don't even know why i'm here.
because... someone's lying.
and i thought if i got you and mr. cohen together here, i could figure out the truth.
are you saying i've been dishonest?
you told me you'd never been to detective martin's house, and i have a witness who contradicts you.
yeah, well, she's a lying bitch!
the kind of lying bitch who deserves to be stalked by a cop?
who should be harassed under the color of authority?
that kind of bitch?
do i need an attorney?
i don't know. do you?
so, tell me, mr. cohen, how well do you know detective xavier here?
were you in contact with him regularly?
no.
i met him exactly one time.
that's probably true.
that's what tim told me.
that seems to be right, chief.
and you went to vancouver to collect samples of d.n.a. from your cousin.
who did you give those samples to?
detective hubbard.
where is he, anyway?
that's true. and then i gave them to tim.
ok. hubbard says that's true.
ari handed him the samples, and then he gave them to martin.
but those samples turned out not to be of barak.
yeah. and we asked him to get more.
i done what they asked.
they messed up, not me.
what did they expect me to do, go back, ask him to spit in the cup?
my cousin was a psycho, not an idiot.
you never did crap.
probably never went to see barak in the first place!
then why did i call you on wednesday and tell you he was coming to town?
he never mentioned barak was coming.
ok. that's probably not true, chief.
xavier: that's bull...
you never called me at all!
that's right.
ari: i called detective hubbard.
i told him i had arranged to meet ze'ev at the warehouse on saturday morning, but they said that you guys-- that is not true!
he asked to meet, and i told him to call tim.
all right, ok. did you hear that, chief?
we never heard anything about a meeting, with you or anybody!
are you sure, detective xavier?
you're taking this lying scumbag's word over mine.
i already told you, martin never mentioned it.
and all this stuff about d.n.a.
happened before i was even on the case!
so what does this have to do with me?
!
gabriel:
chief, tao's here with your papers.
i'll be back in one minute to answer that.
[kicks chair] ok, i have to hurry now, because i'm about 2 minutes from having to read someone their rights.
thank you.
detective hubbard, please.
yes, ma'am.
i need your help getting these d.n.a. results in order. ok.
see if this is right.
ok.
barak's blood from the brentwood crime scene.
yeah.
barak's blood from the warehouse.
a match.
that's right.
and then here... martin's blood from the warehouse, which just happens to match up with one of the samples that ari brought back from vancouver.
what?
well, the two d.n.a. samples that we thought were obtained by your informant, one was actually that of tim martin, and the other was one of his male relatives, which lieutenant tao has just identified... as your... son.
or i guess i should say, martin's son, by your wife.
we matched it up against the online database where you posted charlie's bone marrow, looking for a donor.
my guess is, you didn't know you weren't charlie's biological father until the doctors checked to see if you're a possible transplant candidate.
isn't that right?
and so you began to wonder who charlie's father really was.
and you knew your partner, didn't you?
you knew him very well.
and martin never volunteered to have his own bone marrow tested, did he?
see, we went on charlie's website where he thanks everyone who's volunteered, and martin's name isn't on it.
i guess he was afraid you'd find out the truth.
it's pretty awful, really, that he cared more about that than saving his own son.
but then, he knew you pretty well, too.
so, when ari came back from vancouver with barak's d.n.a., you switched them out with samples that you took from your partner and charlie, just to make sure you were right.
and, i suppose, to see if martin might be a possible match for a transplant.
but he wasn't.
also, on this blog your son keeps, he lists what happens to him every day in the hospital.
last saturday morning when you said you went with him for a procedure, a transfusion of white blood cells, well, the specialist got called away and the procedure was canceled.
and when charlie finally came back to his room, you weren't there... and didn't come back for... an hour and a half.
look, listen... tim shot barak.
the bullet was fired from his gun.
but martin didn't have his gun.
he'd given it to you.
oh, why would he do that?
because you asked him for it.
because you volunteered to go with him to the warehouse, and he agreed because you were the partner he trusted.
and you really needed that gun, didn't you?
because detective xavier and ari are both telling the truth, and you were the only one who knew that it wasn't an informant who was about to walk through the doors at that warehouse, but an armed psychopath.
my guess is that you shot barak as soon as you were sure that he was close enough for it to be a clean kill, and while martin was freaking out, demanding to know what you were doing,
you told him to trust you.
didn't you?
you walked over to barak's body, you knelt down beside him, took his gun, and while martin followed you demanding an explanation, you shot him dead between the eyes.
isn't that right, detective?
by the way, does charlie know... that tim's his real father?
i mean... i only ask because once you bring a lawyer into this, tim's son will have to be deposed.
tim's son?
i wonder what effect that will have on charlie's health?
knowing you're not his real dad, i mean.
tim's son?
how do you suppose charlie's gonna react knowing that you gunned down his father in cold-- i'm his father!
charlie's my son!
i taught him how to walk!
and i taught him how to read!
and i taught him... [sobbing] i've been with him through 7 surgeries and 38 procedures.
and where was the great tim martin when it mattered, huh?
huh?
where was he... when charlie's life was on the line?
where was he?
where was tim martin?
i don't know, detective hubbard.
but i know where he is now.
i saw his brains splattered all over the floor of an abandoned warehouse while his body was being eaten by flies.
and i can't help but think... you may have overreacted.
you can't... you can't tell... charlie about tim.
you--you won't do that.
i can.
and i will.
hey, hey, hey.
write it all down... and we'll get you a deal from the d.a.
you can wear a bracelet and stay with charlie until his illness... resolves itself.
even though intellectually, people understand you did the right thing, emotionally, there is gonna be some fallout over all of this, between you and the department.
between your squad and the department.
we can cope with that.
[clears throat] i know it's late, but... i thought you might have time for a...drink.
or dinner, if you're hungry.
and as i remember things, you're kind of always hungry, aren't you?
well, i...i am.
but, um... well, dinner, um, i already have plans.
sort of a... celebration. with fritz.
oh... yeah, i heard he might be leaving town.
uh, behavioral sciences, right?
that's...good for him.
no, no.
he's not taking that.
no, um, we're celebrating because he's... moving in. next week.
well... uh, well, that's great.
congratulations.
yeah, well, we'll see.
big step.
but, uh, lunch tomorrow, i could do that.
i have to meet with my attorney at 1:00 tomorrow.
we'll find a moment somewhere.
all right, then.
uh, thanks for supporting me.
it meant a lot.
sure.
my pleasure.
my job, actually.
right. well... good night.
good night. and, uh... good work.
oh, thanks.
thanks.
[elevator bell dings]
captioning made possible by warner bros.
Oh, shit.
What happened?
What the fuck is this?
Damn.
This whole thing is too high.
Oh, Mr. George, help us.
Help us!
He doesn't understand what I'm saying.
Help us!
- Help us.
You fucking pig!
Don't go away.
You fucking pig!
- I wanna get out of here!
- Shut up!
I'm gonna tie your coat to this.
- Please, take it off.
- You take it off.
Okay.
I throw this end out and it will catch something, ok?
Hang on to this end so it won't won't fly off.
Fucking motherfucker!
Motherfucking shit!
- Okay.
Hold it tight!
- Okay.
Okay.
Shit!
Nadja, we are only short a little bit now.
Please!
Smoking is prohibited!
No.
I heard so much bad about this route that I'm not going in there.
No, I'm not going in there, no way!
Don't you understand what I'm saying?
You don't understand what I'm saying?
This is my last word:
No!
You are a total wacko!
Which part of "no" don't you understand?
I'm telling you for the last time, you faggot, I won't go in there!
Why do I have to be shouting all day?
Try to understand that I'm not going on that route, because I'm not!
Fucking hell, enough is enough.
It's very dangerous, and I'm not driving there, whatever happens.
There is absolutely no way that I'm going in there.
(screams)
(pants)
(screams)
(groans)
(speaks Hungarian)
(speaks Hungarian)
(pants)
Mr George, help us.
- (speaks frantically in Hungarian)
- Help us.
- I'm sorry.
- (screeches) You fucking pig!
(thud)
(coughs splutters)
(both speak Hungarian)
(screams)
(speaks Hungarian)
(speaks Hungarian) Fuck!
(groans)
(speaks Hungarian)
Nadia. (speaks Hungarian)
(speaks Hungarian)
(groans)
(squelch)
# Over bridge of sighs
# To rest my eyes in shades of green
# Under dreaming spires
# To ltchycoo Park that's where I've been
- # What did you do there?
- # I got high
- # What did you feel there?
- # Well, I cried
- # But why the tears there?
- # Tell you why
# It's all too beautiful
# It's all too beautiful
# It's all too beautiful
# It's all too beautiful
Hi.
My name's George Cinders and I'm the President of Palisade Defence.
We're hitting a home run for freedom and a time out for terror.
We work hard to bring you up-to-the-minute technology.
Memo. "Must congrat George on terrific performance."
Er, no, delete "terrific", make that "fabulous performance".
For 75 years we've been supplying the world's greatest nations with the world's latest weaponry.
So when you see this symbol, you know you're in safe hands.
We have offices in New York, London, Tokyo, all over the world.
Oh!
Whoo-hoo!
Jesus!
Go on, girl.
Go on.
Yep.
Yep.
- What are you doing?
- Ordering myself a birthday present.
Alright, team, can we have a little less talking, please?
Does nobody care about our marketing strategy?
I care.
Or what about our CRM- 114 landmine, the Platoon Buster?
"What Ordinance?" magazine calls it "The most exciting development in concealed termination in years."
Weapons you can trust.
Anti-personnel devices you can rely on.
That's trust.
That's reliability.
That's Palisade.
As I speak, our team of dedicated individuals are touring Eastern Europe, bringing the Palisade message to you.
- They couldn't be more excited.
- Richard, why are all the actors in this video white?
- They're not all white.
- Blonde, actually.
(Richard) It's just a coincidence, that's all.
(woman) If they were all black, that would be a coincidence, too?
Look...
Look, what is your problem exactly?
You've made a recruitment video for the Hitler Youth.
Ha!
- Richard, Richard.
- Oh, there!
There you go, you see?
What's he, an albino?
(laughs)
Here's the P40 version five.
Oh, yeah, OK, that's very sensitive.
- (laughs)
- It's not funny, Harris.
Freedom, democracy, justice.
With Palisade Defence, we'll win the war on terror.
- I bloody hope not.
- Thank you, Harris.
# What will we do there?
# We'll get high
- # What will we touch there?
- # We'll touch the sky
- # But why the tears there?
- # I'll tell you why
# It's all too beautiful
# It's all too beautiful
(smoke alarm beeps)
# It's all too beautiful
(shouts in Hungarian)
Something's wrong with the electrics in there.
There's a short circuit.
- Fire officer, coming through.
- Sit down.
Officer sitting.
- No smoking!
- Yes, I know.
(driver) No cigarettes!
Bob Marley!
Bob Marley!
Billy, what's the plan?
George should be at the lodge with the food.
- Good.
And the paintball gear?
- All in the brown bag.
- OK, good.
- (driver sings in Hungarian)
(noisy chomping)
I'll give you $50 if you stop eating.
I bought some mushrooms off a security guard at the road show.
I gave him 20 euros and look how much he's given me.
Look.
- They look horrible.
- That's cos they're magic mushrooms.
How do you know they're not off the side of the road?
No, they're proper.
You can tell by the stalks.
Look.
- Eat those, you're gonna go crazy.
- I think I've had these ones before.
They give you a nice chilled-out one.
And if you're wrong?
I'll be somewhere over the rainbow getting fucked by the Tin Man.
(tyres screech)
- Hey, what the fuck's going on?
- You alright?
- You alright, Jill?
- Yeah.
- (Billy) The road's blocked.
- Anybody need first aid?
I might do in 20 minutes.
(birds twitter)
We can go this way.
(speaks Hungarian)
I don't understand what you're saying.
The road is fine.
(speaks Hungarian)
Yeah, well, the two roads meet up again.
Look.
(speaks Hungarian angrily)
It's just a detour!
(shouts in Hungarian)
Go on, Richard.
Alright, that's quite enough.
I won't stand for this unprofessional behaviour.
You hear me?
Now, you are hired to drive, and drive you will, buddy.
Is that clear?
(door hisses open)
Great management skills, Dick.
Really, really world class.
I know it doesn't appear far on the map, but it all depends on the scale.
- Well, what is the scale?
- It's not on here.
Well, an inch is usually a mile, isn't it?
- No.
- Well, we'll assume that it is.
Well, we can assume, but it's probably safer not to.
Every map I've seen, an inch is a mile.
Are you saying I can't read maps?
No.
I'm sure you have an excellent knowledge of maps.
It's just that, well, an inch could be two miles or ten.
I'm saying goodbye.
I'm going back to the hotel.
- You're doing no such thing.
- Then show me the lodge.
The lodge is a mile down that road.
Hang on.
You're not listening to me.
I am not walking anywhere.
Don't squabble, gang.
It's supposed to be a team-building weekend.
Tell Richard.
He seems to think we're on a walking holiday.
Whoa.
Wait a sec.
Stop the coach!
Stop.
Hey, come on, let's talk about this.
Stop the bus.
Fucking hell!
Stop the...
Come on!
Fuck it!
(distant growling)
What was that?
(burps) Sorry.
Probably just a bear.
- Just a bear?
- There are no bears in Hungary.
- Are you sure?
- Yes.
Well, that's assuming we're still in Hungary.
If we've crossed the border into Romania, then there are bears.
If we're in Serbia, then I'm not sure.
Well, that's really interesting.
Are bears required to stop at borders?
Is there some sort of passport control for bears?
- You'd better watch your tone.
- Or what?
- (woman) Oh, please!
- No.
Or what?
(growling)
- That sounded further away.
- There.
If it was a bear, which it wasn't, it's moved on.
Come on.
I really think we should stick to the main road.
No, this way is much quicker.
Come on.
I'm with Richard.
Have I pissed myself?
- What?
- I feel damp.
Well, you look alright.
I'm not gonna touch you.
- Have I pissed my pants?
- I don't think so.
- What's wrong with you?
- I feel all damp.
You're fine.
You're fine.
OK, so, er, working on the assumption that an inch is not a mile, what's the worst-case scenario?
- An inch is a thousand miles.
- (screaming)
That's Steve.
If he's messing around, he's in big trouble.
Oh, no.
We should stay with the bags.
Steve, are you alright, mate?
(sighs) Jesus.
Steve?
I saw someone.
Who?
I don't know.
What happened?
The weirdest thing's just happened, yeah?
I needed a slash, so I've pulled me trousers down, cos I felt a little bit damp and I didn't want to get a rash.
I was about to have a piss and I saw a geezer with a balaclava and a suitcase.
No, more of a travel bag.
- So, you've come over...
- Steve.
- Yes?
- The mushrooms.
- What mushrooms?
- You ate them.
You're high.
- Look after him.
- OK, yeah.
Listen.
Now, I know we're mates, but, erm, if you look at my cock one more time, I'm gonna kick off.
What are you talking about?
I have not once looked at your winkie.
You turn around.
(urinates)
(growls)
OK, everybody, prepare to smile.
- Isn't it wonderful?
- It's a dump.
- What do you expect, the Hilton?
- The Hilton would be good.
- We're in the country.
- You're not gonna stay here?
- Right now, I'd sleep in a cave.
- That's the spirit.
There's someone in the woods.
Yeah, you already said that.
Come on.
Come on.
(gates creak open)
(birds chirp)
- This isn't the right place.
- This is the right place.
This obviously is not the right place.
It is the right place.
Billy?
Well, there's only one lodge on the map,
- so I suppose...
- Thank you.
This is... just the lobby.
This place is fantastic.
Steve.
It's just a rope.
It's just a rope.
"Dear team, as a big thank you for the last few weeks on the road,
George and I cordially invite you to join us on a team-building weekend in Palisade's newly acquired luxury lodge."
Luxury lodge.
(crash)
OK, OK, OK, now listen up, everyone.
This is not a holiday.
This is a business.
And team-building weekends, like it or not, are part of that business.
Hear hear!
This is our chance to find out about ourselves.
I mean, you know, sure, we'll have fun, doing, er, paintball, orienteering...
- Bridge building.
- Bridge building.
We need to take ownership of the weekend.
And that means working together.
- Richard, I have an idea.
- Shh, shh.
I can't spell success... without U.
And U...
And U...
U...
And...
U.
Success has only one U.
(Richard) Oh, well.
Daddy couldn't put us all through Cambridge, could he, Harris?
Now, George wants us to be the best team possible.
And if that means digging in a little, then I'm sorry.
Think this place is a dump?
Think about this.
Maybe it's supposed to be.
I've had tougher challenges.
Now let's make this our challenge.
(Harris) Explain to me how staying in this shithole is gonna help me sell mines.
Alright?
- Don't be so happy all the time.
- Only trying to be positive.
You're not.
You're like a dog tied to a radiator wagging its tail.
(laughs)
That's not a compliment.
Look for the generator in there, will you?
(birdsong)
(sighs)
(dusts himself off)
(door creaks and slams)
(clang)
(metallic grinding)
(squelching)
Have you got any light bulbs in your bag, Gordon?
Erm, yeah.
Give me two secs.
Hello?
Hello?
(footsteps)
Oh, no.
- I think you should get some sleep.
- I think you're right.
(growling)
(scuffling)
(banging)
(growling loud bang)
(sniffing growling)
(floorboards creak)
Maggie?
I've been waiting for you, Richard.
I want you to fuck me.
Really?
I mean, I'd like to.
Fuck me now and fuck me hard.
OK.
But, erm... what's going on?
Maggie?
Great management skills, Dick.
World class.
(screaming)
(coughs)
(door creaks and slams)
I can't believe it.
I had no idea Palisade were this involved in Eastern Europe.
You're joking, right?
- Where did you get this stuff?
- Found it next to the generator.
There's stacks of it out there.
It's all Soviet.
That doesn't mean it's one of the asylums.
- It doesn't rule it out either.
- What asylums?
Right, grub's up.
Put those cards away, please, Jill.
Feast your eyes... on this.
Mind yourselves, it is hot.
(Billy) It actually smells quite nice.
- (Gordon) Not eating?
- No, thanks.
Not hungry.
(Gordon) The rest of you, get stuck in.
There's plenty.
Do you want to get some spoons out, please, Jill?
- Alright?
(mockingly) Feeling OK?
- Yeah, alright, piss off.
- Are you still tripping?
- No.
Why are you naked?
- Harris, what about the asylums?
- What asylums?
Harris seems to think we're in an old lunatic asylum.
- Are we?
- No.
(Billy) Tell us about the asylums.
Are you sure you want me to tell you?
It's pretty scary.
- I'll take my chances.
- OK.
OK.
This story takes place a long time ago, way before the First World War.
(Jill) Oh, please.
When movies were silent and women were even quieter.
The government was getting complaints about the asylum, so they sent an inspector to check it out.
(eerie music camera whirrs)
He arrives late one night to see what's going on.
Everything seems fine, and the warders agree to show him around.
But everything isn't fine.
Everything's not fine at all.
All the inmates are going crazy, screaming at him to let them out.
Then he realises what's wrong.
The inmates had taken over and locked up all the doctors.
And then they turned on him.
He tried to reason with them, but there's no reasoning with the mentally insane.
Guess who they called to sort out the mess?
Us.
Palisade sent the boys in.
Sprayed the place with nerve agent.
Killed everyone.
It was a massacre.
But rumour has it...
that one inmate survived, hell-bent on killing any Palisade employee that should cross his path.
They say he's still on the loose.
- Is that supposed to be scary?
- Well, it was at the time.
Believe it or not, there is a tiny bit of truth in his story.
- Damn right!
- A tiny bit.
It occurred in the early '90s when the Soviet Union broke up.
Places like this were detention centres for war criminals.
Soldiers who liked the killing a little bit too much.
(gunshots)
They were lunatics who wiped out whole villages.
Burnt people alive.
Put heads on spikes.
They were savages.
Well-trained savages.
(screaming)
Their government locked them away, tried to cure them, but it was no good.
Some escaped.
Hid in some empty buildings nearby, but not for long.
Obviously it wasn't Palisade who killed them, it was their government.
But it was us who supplied the weapons.
Oh, and, Harris, if anyone did survive, revenge would be the last thing on their minds.
- What would be on their minds?
- Survival.
Evading capture.
These guys were war criminals, remember.
Excuse me for being the only sensible one here, but this place is a lodge.
It's not a mental home, it's not a prison, it's a lodge.
- It was a sex lodge.
- (laughter)
- Right.
- It was.
I'm telling you.
Back in the '60s, these places were hospitals for rich old men.
All the nurses were these naughty- looking birds with big shooters.
Anyway, being stuck all the way out here, they used to get really lonely, so they tried it on with the old boys.
These poor old fuckers was on death's door.
They couldn't get it up.
So they decided to just get hold of each other.
One day this fella turns up out of the blue.
Young geezer.
Bit of bollocks about him.
They chased him.
They caught him and, er, well, he was fucked.
(laughter)
Have you ever taken anything seriously in your life?
- Ecstasy and weed, I think.
- (footsteps)
- Hey, gang.
How are we doing?
- Brilliant.
Sweet dreams?
Er... yeah.
Harris.
Hi, Maggie.
Not eating?
Why are you all so obsessed with what I eat?
I am not too skinny.
No, no, no, no.
I don't mean...
Just that you'll need your energy for the team games.
I mean, you're perfect just the way you are.
And when I say perfect, I obviously don't mean that in a sexual way.
I mean perfect in a neutral way.
As if I were another woman saying that you were perfect, you know?
Just one woman to another.
Not that I'm implying anything like that.
Or that there's anything wrong with that... sort of thing.
Or... anything.
(Steve) Keep digging, we can still see you.
(crunches) What the?
(Harris) A bit young to be losing your teeth, aren't you?
It's not mine.
- It's not my tooth.
- Maybe it's just a clove.
Does it look like a fucking clove?
I'm gonna puke.
- Could it be the cow's tooth?
- A cow with gold fillings?
Who made the pie?
I didn't make it, I found it.
- You what?
- I found it.
You found a pie?
- It was wrapped in foil.
- Oh, well, that's a relief.
Jesus!
You dirty bastard.
- (retches)
- OK, everyone, calm down.
- (Jill continues to retch)
- Come on, Jill.
Jill, come with me.
Ohh!
I'm gonna be sick.
OK, I'm sorry.
I thought it was a welcome gift.
- From who?
- I don't know.
George.
George wouldn't bring a pie.
It could have been sitting here for months.
Look at this place.
I cooked it for the full hour!
- It had instructions on it?
- No, but it's a pie.
You don't cook every pie for an hour.
- Do you think I undercooked it?
- Fucking hell!
Yeah, OK.
Look, it's gone.
I'm throwing the pie in the bin.
Oh, right, that makes me feel better.
(crickets chirp)
- Night, sweetie.
- Good night.
(thunder rumbles)
(tap gurgles)
- (crash)
- Oh!
Shit!
(gasps)
(whispers) Hello.
Hello!
(trees rustle)
(screams)
Hey, hey, hey, hey.
What's the matter?
What's going on?
There was a man at my window.
- What happened?
- I saw someone.
Where's my inhaler?
- What's going on?
- Jill saw someone.
- Who?
- What did he look like?
- (wheezes) He had a mask.
- Have you been at my mushrooms?
- Is there anything to calm her down?
- I'll check my bag.
- Did you see anyone?
- No.
- What do you think?
- You're the boss, you think.
- Perhaps you were dreaming.
- I wasn't dreaming.
Look at me!
His face was covered in a mask!
I was not dreaming!
I found some Kalms.
They're herbal.
(thunder rumbles)
Come on.
There's no one here.
Come on!
It was probably just some locals messing around.
Looking through a window one storey up?
We need to get out of here.
- Yeah, I'm leaving.
- I'm going with her.
- No one is going anywhere.
- What did you find?
There are wooden structures, but they're not near the window.
- There.
See?
- This is what's gonna happen.
Tomorrow, we go to the top of the hill, try and get a signal.
Get somebody to pick us up, take us back.
- Go on, my son.
- (Maggie) Great idea.
That is not a great idea.
Leave, and you won't have a job to come back to.
- I don't care.
Count me in.
- Yeah, I'm with her.
- I'm sorry, but he's right.
- Should I make some tea?
Er, alright, listen.
Jill, I want you to sleep on it.
Then, in the morning, if you still feel the same way, well, then I'll come up with a plan.
I feel the same way.
OK, er, listen up, everyone.
Er, Billy, get over here.
Come on.
Er, I've made a decision.
We're going to sit tight.
We...
We sit tight while, Harris, I want you and Jill to go up the hill to go up the hill and, erm, see if you can get a phone signal.
Erm, get the coach driver to come and pick us up.
Oh, sweet.
I've made this decision purely because of the, er, food situation.
And...
And it is conditional.
While they're gone, the rest of us will do a little team building.
Yes!
Nice one.
Excuse me.
Hiya.
I just want to make it really clear, before we begin, that paintballing is about teamwork, right?
So no Rambos.
I repeat, absolutely no Rambos.
(shouts) OK!
(voice echoes)
- Hey, how's your project going?
- Pretty good, thanks.
What are these things?
Humane landmines, right?
They're not landmines.
They're immobilisation units.
Right.
And they do what, they sort of grab you, yeah?
They pin you to the floor.
They don't blow children's legs off.
- They're humane.
- They're a hard sell.
I don't understand why, in the 21 st century, we create such sick weapons.
The guillotine seems humane.
- There's nothing humane about it.
- At least it's instantaneous.
There's nothing instantaneous about it.
When your head's chopped off, your brain can think for three minutes.
You're saying you're aware that your head's cut off?
When Marie Antoinette had her head chopped off she felt it hit the basket.
She saw blood pumping out of her own stump.
- That's not true.
- It is 100 percent biological fact.
- (Jill) Think he crashed?
- (Harris) I don't know.
- Oh, my God!
- We've got to get the others.
We can't just leave him here!
Can we?
I'm not saying that I fancy anyone in particular.
But if I did like someone, I wouldn't know the best way to approach them.
- Dating's complicated in England.
- English birds ain't complicated.
Buy 'em a Bacardi Breezer and they'll ride you like Sea Biscuit.
Yeah?
But what if she's not English?
What if she's, erm...
French or Spanish or, erm American?
- Maggie?
- Yeah.
So what do you think?
I think you've got more chance of getting shit out of a rocking horse.
- Yeah, that's what I thought.
- (whistle)
Come on, I got you!
Get up, you cheating bastard.
See, all this Maggie stuff, it's cos your bird left you.
It's cos your plums are backing up.
It's driving you nuts.
It's confusing you, making you think you love her.
You're right.
Anyway, I think she likes you.
- What're you talking about?
- Go, go, go!
Hiya, sexy.
We won.
You're dead.
The bullet missed my vital organs.
I survived.
It's a miracle.
(gunshots whistle)
- Here we go.
- Safeties off.
Here comes the ref.
Right.
Oh, you really got into that.
It was brilliant.
We bent a few rules here and there.
Steve shot Richard and he didn't die.
- No one shot me.
- We shot someone.
Well, I think someone, and I'm not pointing any fingers, has been wiping off paint.
And it does clearly state in the rules...
This is total war.
There are no rules.
Ow!
Stop!
Stop!
Stop it!
Stop!
That is really dangerous!
Get one of those in your eye, it could pop like a ping-pong ball.
It's not funny.
That hurts.
I expect more from some of you.
(gasps)
(screams)
(Maggie) Gordon, you've got to be still.
Steve, get on the other side.
Quick!
- Be still.
- (screams) Get it off!
- You have to stop moving.
- (screams)
(screams)
Pull your leg out.
- Now!
Pull it now!
- Pull your leg out now!
(trap snaps shut)
(Maggie) Now!
- You fucking idiot!
- Alright, for fuck's sake!
(Maggie) We'll get you out.
(screams)
Pull it out!
Pull it out now!
(trap snaps shut)
Pull it!
(screams)
- (whimpers)
- God!
OK, Gordon...
Shit!
(screams hysterically)
We gotta stop the bleeding.
Billy, give me your belt.
You're gonna be OK.
You have to calm down, Gordon!
Calm down!
We're gonna stop the bleeding.
(Maggie) They're everywhere.
(Steve) What the fuck's going on here?
(Maggie) Billy, hold his hand!
- Can you help me?
- (screams) What are you doing?
- (screams)
- Richard, help me hold him!
Steve!
We're gonna be OK.
- Alright, people, get on the coach.
- Stop!
Don't move!
- What the fuck happened?
- Bear traps everywhere.
Someone killed the driver.
- The driver's dead?
- Just get on the coach.
- Somebody help us, please!
- What are we gonna do?
- He could be watching us.
- (Maggie) You're not helping!
- What do we do with his leg?
- We need to keep it cold.
- There's a fridge on the coach.
- That's great, thank you.
Oh, you're shitting me!
(groans)
Ohh!
Come on!
- Come on!
- Alright!
Alright!
For fuck's sake!
- Faster!
- It's going as fast as it can.
I need to cover his leg.
Harris, slow down.
I think you're going too fast.
Someone give me something to cover his leg, for fuck's sake!
Shit!
(engine continues to rev)
(groans)
Jill?
(groans)
(crunching)
Oh, shit!
(squelches)
(pants)
I think I've broken my arm.
(spits coughs)
(sighs) Billy.
Jill?
We've got to head back to the lodge.
We've got to find Jill.
Jill!
Jill!
(whispers) Keep your voice down.
Someone's killed Harris.
Who's to say he didn't kill Jill as well?
Now, we head back to the lodge and we lock ourselves in till morning and then we walk.
Where?
- I don't know.
- I'm glad we got that sorted!
Hey!
Unless you have a better idea, we go back to the lodge.
(muffled whimpers)
(speaks Hungarian)
Palisade.
(screams)
(laughs)
Let's put him down.
We need to lock ourselves in.
Lock everything.
- This is bollocks.
Fucking bollocks.
- We're safer in here.
I'm not waiting for him to turn up.
It's fucking madness.
What do you suggest we do with Gordon?
- I'll carry him myself.
- (Maggie) Keep your voices down.
- What if the stories were true?
- Well, mine wasn't.
What stories?
They were asylums.
Someone escaped, who knows we're Palisade.
- How would they know that?
- The bus.
It's not exactly subtle.
Those stories are nonsense.
Who told you?
Jill?
Harris?
Know how many conspiracies I hear regarding weapons companies?
- No, how many?
- I'll tell you how many I believe.
None.
We're a public company.
Members of both our governments are on the board.
They won't do anything immoral.
Arguing is not gonna help us out.
OK?
You said you wanted us to work as a team.
Well, now is the time to start.
Look, just help me get some wood.
We need to board ourselves in.
Alright?
- With what?
- I don't know.
Check Gordon's bag.
He's not gonna have a hammer and nails in there, is he?
(Steve) Oh, for fuck's sake!
Good boy.
I've got some pills.
What kind of pills?
Ecstasy.
- Great.
Have a party.
- No, not for me, for him.
What do you mean?
They're not gonna get him up tap dancing, but it'll take the edge off for a while.
(gasps)
OK.
Gordon.
- Take one.
It'll sort you out.
- I don't do drugs.
(Maggie) It's OK, sweetheart, these are painkillers.
- They're gonna make you feel better.
- Just take one.
Here.
Here you go.
Here you go.
You alright?
I'm sorry about earlier.
Flaring up and all that.
You were OK.
Listen, I wanna say something to you.
Sometimes I act like an idiot, you know?
I say things when I shouldn't and, er...
Shit, I've left Gordon's foot on the the coach.
Sorry, mate.
I love you, Maggie.
- Of course you do.
- No, seriously.
I mean it.
I really mean it.
- It's just the drugs, Gordon.
- No, it's not the drugs.
I really, really, really love you.
And I loved Jill.
I really, really, really, really loved Jill.
- Steve, have you got any downers?
- Not my thing.
Maggie.
Maggie, have I told you that I love you?
(thunder rumbles rain patters)
- Where are you going?
- Toilet.
Can't you hold on?
No.
Don't worry, I'll be right back.
(footsteps on stairs)
If we don't get him to a hospital, he's gonna die.
(trickling)
(toilet flushes)
I think maybe... we should leave him.
What are you saying?
I think our best chance for survival is if the four of us get to the main road and get help.
And I think it's Gordon's best shot as well.
(Steve) I think you're right.
I think we should go.
Go where?
(screams)
- What's happened?
- This door was locked.
Gordon?
- Gordon?
- Billy, be quiet!
(gasps)
(flies buzz)
(screams)
(screams)
Conspiracies?
(bang)
We should go back upstairs.
- (door slams)
- Maggie?
(gasps)
Richard?
(distant) Richard?
(door bangs)
(door rattles)
(heavy footsteps)
(pants)
- (clicks)
- Fuck!
(heavy footsteps)
(groans)
(floorboard creaks)
(crash)
(gun clicks)
(groans)
Jesus!
Ohh...
Yeah, well... (pants)
I'd hate to be accused of not killing him when I had the chance.
Well...
I think you'll be alright there.
Come, come.
(gun clicks)
- Don't you fucking move!
- (speaks Hungarian)
- We got a problem.
- Yeah, no shit!
No, we got another problem.
That was our last bullet.
Put your fucking guns down!
Put your guns down or I'll blow your motherfucking balls off!
(shouts in Hungarian)
(whispers in Hungarian)
(whispers) Let's go.
Stop.
Stop!
- What are you doing?
- Don't move.
The place is mined.
- How do you know?
- I'm standing on one.
CRM Platoon Buster.
One of ours.
- Oh, shit.
- Yeah.
(mimics explosion laughs)
(distant voices)
Where's Billy?
- (voices come closer)
- Richard, they're coming.
Alright, follow my footsteps, then jump to the trees.
Go.
Come on.
Hey, come on!
Come on!
Over here!
Come on!
(speaks Hungarian)
(they laugh)
You're laughing at me?
You won't be fucking laughing when I take my foot off this.
(both speak Hungarian)
# Yo, pretty ladies, around the world
# Got a weird thing to show you so tell all the boys and girls
# Tell your brother, your sister and your mama too
# Cos they're about to throw down and you'll know just what to do
# Wave your hands in the air like you don't care
# Glide by the people as they stop to look and stare
Hey!
Maggie, Steve.
Where the hell've you been?
Are you Mr Steve?
We are Nadia and Olga from the escort agency.
(pants)
(speaks urgently in Hungarian)
Yeah, come on, everybody.
Why not?
Be my fucking guest.
- Is this where we are?
- Whoa.
What are you doing?
- Have you been to the lake?
- Yes.
- Are there boats?
- Yes.
Leave your shit and follow us.
Ready?
- Yeah.
- (clicks)
Would someone please tell me what the fuck is going on?
George, there are about five seriously sick fuckers coming our way to kill us.
So you can either help us or fuck off.
When you say sick fuckers, what do you mean?
Terrorists?
- Call 'em what you want.
- Come on.
Let's go.
Hold it.
No one's going anywhere.
I've been waiting to demonstrate this for a while.
You stamp "terrorist" on it, and I'll kill it.
- Wait till they get a load of this.
- Sweet!
Are those the little bastards?
- Alright, get back.
- (gun beeps)
(explosion)
(speaks Hungarian)
(screams)
Steve?
(Maggie) Steve!
(cries out)
Steve!
- Where are you?
- (screeches) Steve!
- Maggie?
- I'm in some kind of trap!
(mutters)
Steve, he's coming!
Oh, my God.
No!
(roars)
(groans)
No!
God!
(screams) Steve!
Steve!
No!
(man screams)
Please!
(sobs) Please!
(screams)
Get off of me!
(crunch)
(screams)
(grunts)
(squelch)
(groans tooth crunches)
(roars)
(mutters)
(Maggie) Steve!
Steve!
This is gonna hurt.
(groans)
(shrieks) Steve!
Steve!
Steve!
(cries out)
(water trickles birds chirp)
(pants)
(thud)
(thud)
(dialling tone)
(gasps with relief)
(speaks Hungarian)
Hello.
Hello.
Do you speak English?
- English?
- Yes.
English.
I need you to send help.
- I need help.
- Yes.
Please hold.
(music plays)
(music stops)
(music restarts)
(groans)
(crunch groans)
(groans)
Come on, then, you fuck!
(gunshots)
(pants)
(laughs hysterically)
Foursome?
# We'll meet again
# Don't know where
# Don't know when
# But I know we'll meet again
# Some sunny day
# Keep smiling through
# Just like you always do
# Till the blue skies light the dark clouds far away
# So will you please say hello
# To the folks that I know?
# Tell them I won't be long
# You'll be happy to know
# That as you saw me go
# I was singing this song
# We'll meet again
# Don't know where
# Don't know when
# But I know we'll meet again
# Some sunny day
We'll meet again.
Don't know where, don't know when.
But I know we'll meet again some sunny day.
Keep smiling through, just like you always do till the blue skies light the dark clouds far away.
# So will you please say hello
# To the folks that I know
# And tell them I won't be long?
# You'll be happy to know
# That as you saw me go
# I was singing this song
# We'll meet again
# Don't know where
# Don't know when
# But I know we'll meet again
# Some sunny day
# The sun is shining
# I can feel the good times coming on
# Oh, there's no point trying to fight it
# We've been running away for way too long
# So there's a storm on the horizon
# Feels like there's trouble on the way
# But if you take my hand
# And I'll take your hand
# Then there'll be no need for us to stray
# At least not today
# We're summertimin'
# I can feel the good times coming on
# Coming on
Subtitles by IMS
Oh, shit.
What happened?
What the fuck is this?
Damn.
This whole thing is too high.
Oh, Mr. George, help us.
Help us!
He doesn't understand what I'm saying.
Help us!
- Help us.
- Sorry.
You fucking pig!
Don't go away.
You fucking pig!
- I wanna get out of here!
- Shut up!
I'm gonna tie your coat to this.
- Please, take it off.
- You take it off.
Okay.
I throw this end out and it will catch something, ok?
Hang on to this end so it won't won't fly off.
Fucking motherfucker!
Motherfucking shit!
- Okay.
Hold it tight!
- Okay.
Okay.
Shit!
Nadja, we are only short a little bit now.
Please!
Hi, my name's George Cinders, President of Palisade Defence.
We're hitting a home run for freedom and a time out for terror.
Memo.
Must congrat George on terrific performance.
No, delete "terrific", make that "fabulous".
For 75 years we've been supplying the world's greatest nations with the latest weaponry.
When you see this symbol, you know you're in safe hands.
We have offices in New York, London, Tokyo, all over the world.
- Go on, girls.
- What are you doing?
Ordering myself a little birthday present.
Can we have a little less talking?
You don't care about our marketing strategy.
I care.
What about our CRM114 landmine?
The platoon buster.
What Ordinance magazine calls it:
"The most exciting development in concealed termination".
Weapons you can trust, anti-personnel devices you can rely on.
That's trust.
That's reliability.
That's Palisade.
As I speak, our team of dedicated individuals are touring Eastern Europe bringing the Palisade message to you.
And they couldn't be more excited.
Richard, why are all the actors in this video white?
- They are not all white.
- Blonde, actually.
It's just a coincidence.
If they were all black, that would be a coincidence, too?
What is your problem exactly?
You've made a recruitment video for the Hitler youth.
Richard.
There you go, you see?
What's he, an albino?
Here's the P40, version 5.
Yeah, that's very sensitive.
It's not funny, Harris.
Freedom, democracy, justice.
With Palisade Defence we'll win the war on terror.
I bloody hope not.
Thank you, Harris.
There's a short circuit or something.
Smoking is prohibited!
- Fire officer coming!
- Sit down.
Officer sitting.
- No smoking!
- Yes, I know.
No smoking!
No cigarettes!
Bob Marley!
Bob Marley!
Billy, what's the plan?
George should be at the lodge waiting for us, along with the food.
- And the paintball gear?
- It's all in the brown bag.
I'll give you 50 dollars if you stop eating.
I bought some mushrooms off the security guard at the road show.
I gave him 20 euros and look how much he gave me.
- They look horrible!
- They are magic mushrooms.
How do you know he didn't just pick them off the side of the road?
They're proper.
You can tell by the stalks.
You eat those, you're gonna go crazy.
I think I've had these ones before.
- They give you a chilled out one.
- And if you're wrong?
I'll be somewhere over the rainbow getting fucked by the tin man.
What the fuck is going on?
Are you all right?
- You all right, Jill?
- Yeah.
- The road is blocked.
- Anybody need first aid?
I might do in 20 minutes.
We can go this way.
No.
I heard so much bad about this route that I'm not going in there.
No, I'm not going in there, no way!
I don't understand.
The road is fine.
Don't you understand what I'm saying?
You don't understand what I'm saying?
This is my last word:
No!
The two roads meet up again.
You are a total wacko!
Which part of "no" don't you understand?
I'm telling you for the last time, you faggot, I won't go in there!
Why do I have to be shouting all day?
Try to understand that I'm not going on that route, because I'm not!
It's just a detour!
Fucking hell, enough is enough.
It's very dangerous, and I'm not driving there, whatever happens.
There is absolutely no way that I'm going in there.
Go on, Richard!
All right.
That's quite enough.
I won't stand for this unprofessional behaviour.
You are hired to drive and drive you will, buddy.
Is that clear?
Great management skills.
Really world class.
It doesn't appear far on the map, but it all depends on the scale.
- What is the scale?
- It's not on here.
- An inch is usually a mile, isn't it?
- No.
- We'll assume that it is.
- But it's probably safer not to.
Every map I've ever seen, an inch is a mile.
Are you saying I can't read maps?
I'm sure you have an excellent knowledge of maps, but an inch could be two miles or ten.
Goodbye.
I'm going back to the hotel.
- You're doing no such thing.
- Then show me the lodge.
- It's a mile down that road.
- You're not listening to me.
- I'm not walking anywhere!
- Don't squabble.
It's supposed to be a team-building weekend.
Richard seems to think we're on a walking holiday.
Wait a sec.
Stop the coach!
Stop!
Stop the bus!
Fucking hell!
Come on!
Fuck it!
What was that?
Sorry.
Probably just a bear.
- Just a bear?
- There are no bears in Hungary.
- Are you sure?
- Yes.
That's assuming we're still in Hungary.
If we've crossed the border into Romania, then there are bears.
If we're in Serbia, I'm not sure.
That's really interesting.
Are bears required to stop at borders?
Is there some passport control for bears?
- Watch your tone.
- Or what?
- Please!
- No.
Or what?
- That sounded further away.
- There.
If it was a bear, which it wasn't, it's moved on.
Come on.
We should stick to the main road.
- This way is much quicker.
- I'm with Richard.
Have I pissed myself?
What?
I feel damp.
You look all right.
I'm not gonna touch you.
- Have I pissed my pants?
- I don't think so.
- What's wrong with you?
- I feel all damp.
You're fine.
Okey, so...
If an inch is not a mile, what's the worst case scenario?
An inch is 1,000 miles?
That's Steve.
If he's messing around, then he's in big trouble.
Oh, no...
We should stay with the bags.
Steve, are you all right, mate?
Jesus!
Steve?
I saw someone.
Who?
I don't know.
What happened?
The weirdest thing's just happened.
I needed to have a slash, so I pulled my trousers down, cause I felt a little damp.
I was about to have a piss and I saw a geezer with a balaclava and a suitcase.
No, more of a travel bag.
You've come over...
- Steve.
- Yes?
- The mushrooms.
- What mushrooms?
You ate them.
You're high.
- Look after him.
- Yeah.
Listen,
I know we're mates, but... if you look at my cock one more time, I'm gonna kick off.
What are you talking about?
I have not looked at your winkie.
You turn around.
Everybody, prepare to smile.
- Isn't it wonderful?
- It's a dump.
- What do you expect, the Hilton?
- The Hilton would be good.
- We're in the country.
- You're not gonna stay here?
- Now I'd sleep in a cave.
- That's the spirit!
There's someone in the woods.
Yeah.
You already said that.
Come on.
Come on.
- This isn't the right place.
- This is the right place.
- Obviously it is not.
- It is the right place.
Billy.
There's only one lodge on the map...
Thank you.
This is just the lobby.
This place is fantastic.
Steve, it's just a rope.
"Dear team, as a big thank you for the last few weeks on the road,
George and I invite you to join us on a team-building weekend in Palisade's newly acquired luxury lodge."
Luxury lodge.
Okey, now listen up, everyone.
This is not a holiday.
This is a business.
And team-building weekends are part of that business.
This is our chance to find out about ourselves.
Sure we'll have fun.
- Paintball, orienteering...
- Bridge building.
We need to take ownership of the weekend.
That means working together.
- I have an idea.
- No, shh!
I can't spell success without "u", and "you",
"you", "you"... and "you".
Success has only one "u".
Well, daddy couldn't put us all through Cambridge, could he, Harris?
George wants us to be the best team possible.
If that means digging in a little, I'm sorry.
Think this place is a dump?
Maybe it's supposed to be.
I've had tougher challenges.
Let's make this our challenge.
How staying in this shithole is gonna help me sell landmines?
All right?
- Don't be so happy all the time.
- I'm only trying to be positive.
You're like a dog tied to a radiator wagging its tail.
That's not a compliment.
Look for the generator in there.
Have you got any light bulbs in your bag, Gordon?
Yeah, give me two secs.
Hello?
Hello?
Oh, no!
- You should get some sleep.
- I think you're right.
Maggie?
I've been waiting for you.
I want you to fuck me.
Really?
I mean, I'd like to.
Fuck me now and fuck me hard.
Okay.
But...
What's going on?
Maggie?
Great management skills, Dick.
World class.
I had no idea Palisade were this involved in Eastern Europe.
You're joking?
- Where did you get this stuff?
- Next to the generator.
There's stacks of it.
It's all Soviet.
That doesn't mean it's one of the asylums.
- It doesn't rule it out either.
- What asylums?
Grub's up.
Put those cards away.
Feast your eyes on this.
Mind yourselves, it is hot.
It smells quite nice.
- Not eating, Maggie?
- No, thanks, not hungry.
Rest of you get stuck in, there's plenty to go round.
Do you wanna get some spoons out, Jill?
- All right, Steve?
Feeling okay?
- All right, piss off!
- Are you still tripping?
- No.
Why are you naked?
You were saying about the asylums?
What asylums?
Harris thinks we're staying in an old lunatic asylum.
- Are we?
- No.
- Tell us about the asylums.
- Are you sure?
It's pretty scary.
- I'll take my chances.
- Okay.
This story takes place before the First World War.
Please.
When movies were silent and women were even quieter.
The Government got strange complaints about the asylum, so they sent an inspector round to check it out.
He arrives late one night to see what's going on.
Everything seems fine and the warders agree to show him around.
But everything isn't fine.
Everything's not fine at all.
All the inmates are screaming at him to let them out.
Then he realises what's wrong.
The inmates had taken over and locked up all the doctors.
Then they turned on him.
He tried to reason with them, but there's no reasoning with the mentally insane.
Guess who they called to sort out the mess?
Us.
Palisade sent the boys in.
Sprayed the place with nerve agent.
It was a massacre.
But rumour has it that one inmate survived.
Hell bent on killing any Palisade employee that should cross his path.
They say he's still on the loose.
- Is that supposed to be scary?
- It was at the time.
There is a tiny bit of truth in his story.
- Damn right there is.
- Atiny bit.
It occurred in the early 90's when the Soviet Union broke up.
Places like this were detention centres for war criminals, soldiers who liked the killing a little bit too much.
They were lunatics who wiped out whole villages.
Burnt people alive.
Put heads on spikes.
They were well-trained savages.
Their Government locked them away, tried to cure them, but it was no good.
Some escaped.
Hid in some empty buildings, but not for long.
It wasn't Palisade who killed them, it was their Government.
But it was us who supplied the weapons.
Harris, if anyone did survive, revenge would be the last thing on their minds.
- What would be on their minds?
- Survival.
Evading capture.
They were war criminals.
Excuse me for being the only sensible one here, but this place is a lodge.
It's not a mental home, it's not a prison.
It's a lodge.
It was a sex lodge.
- Right.
- It was.
I'm telling you.
Backin the 60's, these places were hospitals for rich old men.
All the nurses were naughty looking birds with great big shooters.
Being stuck all the way out here, they used to get lonely, so they tried it on with the old boys.
But they were on death's door.
They couldn't get it up.
They decided to get hold of each other.
One day this fella turns up out of the blue.
Young geezer, bit of bollocks about him.
They chased him, they caught him and...
Well, he was fucked.
Have you ever taken anything seriously?
Ecstasy and weed.
- Hey, gang, how are we all doing?
- Brilliant.
Sweet dreams?
Yeah.
Harris.
Hi, Maggie.
Not eating?
Why are you all so obsessed with what I eat?
- I'm not too skinny.
- No, no, I don't mean...
Just that you'll need your energy for the team games.
You're perfect just the way you are.
And when I say perfect, I obviously don't mean that in a sexual way.
I mean perfecte in a neutral way.
As if I were another woman saying that you were perfect.
Just one woman to another.
Not that I'm implying anything like that.
Or that there's anything wrong with that... sort of thing.
Or... anything.
Keep digging, we can still see you.
Fuck that!
Bit young to be losing your teeth.
It's not mine!
It's not my tooth.
- Maybe it's just a clove.
- Does it look like a fucking clove?
- I'm gonna puke.
- Could it be the cow's tooth?
A cow with gold fillings?
Who made the pie?
- I didn't make it.
I found it.
- You what?
- I found it.
- You found a pie?
- It was wrapped in foil.
- That's a relief.
Jesus!
You dirty bastard!
Everyone calm down.
- Jill, come with me.
- I'm gonna be sick.
I'm sorry.
I thought it was a welcome gift.
- From who?
- I don't know.
George.
- George wouldn't bring a pie!
- It could have been here for months.
- Look at this place!
- I cooked it for the full hour!
- It had instructions on it?
- No, but it's a pie.
You don't cook every pie for an hour.
You don't think I undercooked it, do you?
Fucking hell!
Look, it's gone.
I'm throwing the pie in the bin.
Right, that makes me feel better.
- Good night, sweetie.
- Good night.
Shit.
Hello.
- What's the matter?
- There was a man at my window!
- What happened?
- I saw someone.
- Where's my inhaler?
- What's going on?
- Jill saw someone at her window.
- Who?
What did he look like?
He had a mask.
Have you been eating my mushrooms?
Shut up.
Gordon, do you have anything to calm her down?
I'll check my bag.
- Have you seen anyone?
- No.
- What do you think?
- You're the boss, you think.
- Perhaps you were dreaming.
- I saw someone!
I wasn't dreaming!
His face was covered in a mask, I was not dreaming!
I found some kalms, they're herbal.
Come on, there's no one here.
Come on.
It was probably just some locals messing around.
Looking through a window one storey up?
- We need to get out of here.
- Yeah, I'm leaving.
- I'm going with her.
- No one is going anywhere.
What did you find?
Some wooden structures in the trees, but they're far away.
You see?
Tomorrow morning we go to the top of the hill, see if we can get a signal.
Get somebody to take us back to the hotel.
Go on, my son!
- Great idea.
- That is not a great idea.
Anyone who leaves won't have a job to come back to.
- I don't care.
Count me in.
- I'm with her.
I'm sorry, but he's right.
Should I make some tea?
All right, listen.
Jill, I want you to sleep on it.
In the morning, if you still feel the same way,
I'll come up with a plan.
I feel the same way.
Okey, listen up, everyone.
Billy, get over here, come on.
I've made a decision.
We're gonna sit tight.
We sit tight while...
Harris, I want you and Jill to go up the hill... to go up the hill and see if you can get a phone signal.
Get the coach driver to come and pick us up.
Sweet!
I've made this decision because of the food situation.
And it is conditional.
While they're gone, the rest of us will do a little team-building.
Yes!
- Nice one.
- Excuse me.
I just wanna make it really clear, before we begin, that paintballing is about teamwork.
So no Rambos.
I repeat, absolutely no Rambos.
Okay!
- How's your project going?
- Pretty good, thanks.
- They're humane landmines, right?
- They're not landmines.
They're immobilisation units.
And they do what?
They sort of grab you, yeah?
They pin you to the floor, they don't blow children's legs off.
- They're humane.
- They're a hard sell.
I don't understand why in the 21st century we create such sick weapons.
- The guillotine seems humane.
- There's nothing humane about it.
At least it's instantaneous.
There's nothing instantaneous about it.
When your head's chopped off, your brain can think for 2 to 3 minutes.
You're aware that your head is cut off?
When Marie Antoinette had her head chopped off, she felt it hit the basket, she saw blood pumping out of her own stump.
Think he crashed?
I don't know.
- Oh, my God!
- We gotta get the others.
We can't just leave him here, can we?
I'm not saying that I fancy anyone in particular.
But if I did, I wouldn't know how to approach them.
- Dating's complicated in England.
- English birds ain't complicated.
Buy them a Bacardi Freezer and they'll ride you like Sea Biscuit.
Yeah?
But what if she's not English?
What if she's French or Spanish, or...
American?
- Maggie.
- Yeah.
What do you think?
You've got more chance of getting shit out of a rocking horse.
That's what I thought.
Come on, I got you!
Get up, you cheating bastard!
See all this Maggie stuff, it's cause your bird left you.
Your plums are backing up, it's driving you nuts, it's confusing you.
Making you think you love her.
You're right.
- Anyway, I think she likes you.
- What are you talking about?
Go, go, go!
Hiya, sexy.
We won.
You're dead.
The bullet missed my vital organs.
I've survived, it's a miracle!
- Safeties off.
- Here comes the ref.
Right.
You really got into that.
Brilliant.
I think we bent a few rules here and there.
Steve shot Richard and he didn't die.
- No one shot me.
- We shot someone.
I think that someone, and I'm not pointing any fingers, has been wiping off paint, and it states in the rules that...
This is total war.
There are no rules.
Stop!
Stop!
Stop it!
Stop!
That is really dangerous!
If you get one of those in your eye, it could pop like a ping-pong ball!
It's not funny!
That hurts!
I expect more from some of you.
Gordon, you gotta be still.
Steve, get on the other side.
Be still!
- Get it off!
- You have to stop moving.
Pull your leg out!
Now, pull it now!
Pull your leg out now!
Now!
- Steve, you fucking idiot!
- All right, for fuck's sake!
They'll get you out.
Pull it now!
God!
Okey.
Gordon!
We gotta stop the bleeding.
Billy, give me your belt.
You're gonna be okay.
You have to calm down for me.
We're gonna stop the bleeding.
They're everywhere.
What the fuck's going here?
Billy, hold his hand!
- Help me tighten this belt.
- What are you doing?
Richard, help me hold him!
Steve!
You're gonna be okay.
- Get on the coach.
- Be careful, don't move!
- What the fuck happened?
- There're bear traps everywhere.
Someone's trying to kill us like they killed the driver.
The driver's dead?
- Just get on the coach!
- Will somebody help us?
- He could be watching us right now.
- Jill, you're not helping!
- What are we gonna do with his leg?
- We need to keep it cold.
- There's a fridge on the coach.
- That's great, thank you.
You're shitting me?
- Come on!
- All right, for fuck's sake!
- Faster!
- It's going as fast as it can!
I need something to cover his leg.
Harris, slow down, you're going too fast!
Someone give me something to cover his leg!
Jill!
Oh, shit!
I think I've broken my arm.
Billy...
Jill?
We've got to head back to the lodge.
We've got to find Jill.
Jill!
Jill!
Keep your voice down.
Someone's killed Harris.
Who's to say he didn't kill Jill as well?
We head back to the lodge, we lock ourselves in till morning, and then we walk.
Where?
- I don't know.
- I'm glad we got that sorted.
Unless you have a better idea, we go back to the lodge.
Let's put him down.
We need to lock ourselves in.
Lock everything.
- This is fucking bollocks!
- We're safer in here.
I'm not waiting here.
It's fucking madness!
What do we do with Gordon?
- I'll carry him myself!
- Keep your voices down!
What if the stories were true?
- Mine wasn't.
- What stories?
They were asylums, someone escaped and he knows we're Palisade.
- How would they know it?
- The bus is not subtle.
Those stories are nonsense.
Who told you?
Jill?
Harris?
Do you know how many conspiracies I hear each year?
No, how many?
I'll tell you how many I believe:
None.
We're a public company.
Members of both our Governments are on the board.
They won't do anything immoral.
Arguing is not gonna help us out.
You said you wanted us to work as a team?
Well, now it's the time to start.
Help me get some wood.
We need to board ourselves in.
- With what?
- I don't know.
Check Gordon's bag.
He's not gonna have hammer and nails in there.
For fuck's sake!
Good boy.
I've got some pills.
What kind of pills?
Ecstasy.
Great.
Have a party.
- Not for me, for him.
- What do you mean?
They're not gonna get him up tap dancing, but they'll take the edge off for a while.
Okay.
Gordon.
Take one of these.
It'll sort you out.
I don't do drugs.
These are painkillers.
They're gonna make you feel better.
Just take one.
Here you go.
You all right?
I'm sorry about earlier.
Flaring up and all that.
You were okay.
I wanna say something to you.
Sometimes I act like an idiot.
I say thing when I shouldn't...
Shit, I've left Gordon's foot on the coach!
Sorry, mate.
I love you, Maggie.
- Of course you do.
- No, seriously, I mean it.
I really mean it.
- It's just the drugs.
- No, it's not the drugs.
I really, really love you.
And I loved Jill.
I really, really loved Jill.
- Steve, you got any downers?
- Not my thing.
Maggie, have I told you that I love you?
- Where are you going?
- Toilet.
Can't you hold on?
No.
Don't worry, I'll be right back.
If we don't get him to a hospital, he's gonna die.
I think maybe we should leave him.
What are you saying?
Our best chance for survival is if the four of us get to the main road.
Get help.
I think it's Gordon's best shot as well.
- You're right.
We should go.
- Go where?
What's happened?
This door was locked.
Gordon.
- Gordon!
- Billy, be quiet.
Conspiracies?
We should go back upstairs.
Maggie.
Richard!
Richard!
Fuck!
Jesus!
Yeah, well...
I'd hate to be accused of not killing him when I had the chance.
Well, I think you'll be all right there.
Don't you fucking move!
- We got a problem.
- Yeah, no shit!
No, another problem.
That was our last bullet.
Put your fucking guns down!
Put your guns down or I'll blow your balls off!
Go.
Stop.
Stop!
- What are you doing?
- Don't move.
- The place is mined.
- How do you know?
I'm standing on one.
CRM platoon buster.
One of ours.
- Shit!
- Yeah.
Where's Billy?
Richard, they're coming.
All right, follow my footsteps, then jump to the trees.
Go.
Come on.
Hey!
Come on!
Come on!
Over here!
Come on!
You're laughing at me?
You won't be fucking laughing when I take my foot off this!
Maggie!
Steve!
Where the hell you been?
Are you Mr. Steve?
We are Nadia and Olga from the escort agency.
Yeah, come on, everybody.
Why not be my fucking guest!
Is this where we are?
- What are you doing?
- Have you been to the lake?
- Yes.
- Are there boats there?
- Yes.
- Leave your shit and follow us.
Ready?
Yeah.
Would you tell me what the fuck is going on?
George, there are about five seriously sick fuckers coming our way to kill us.
You can either help us or fuck off.
When you say sick fuckers, do you mean terrorists?
- Call them what you want.
- Come on, let's go!
Hold it.
No one's going anywhere.
I've been waiting to demonstrate this for a while.
You stamp terrorist on it, and I'll kill it.
- Wait till they get a load of this.
- Sweet!
Are those the little bastards?
Get back.
Steve!
Steve!
Steve!
Where are you?
- Steve!
- Maggie!
I'm in some kind of trap!
Steve, he's got me!
Oh, my God!
No!
God!
Steve!
No!
Please!
Please...
Get off of me!
Get off!
Fucking thing!
Steve!
Steve!
This is gonna hurt!
Steve!
Steve!
Steve!
Hello.
Hello.
Do you speak English?
- English?
- Yes, English.
- I need you to send help.
- Please hold.
Come on then, you fuck!
Foursome?
I'm sorry.
Hi, my name's George Cinders, President of Palisade Defence.
We're hitting a home run for freedom and a time out forterror.
Memo.
Must congrat George on terrific performance.
No, delete "terrific", make that "fabulous".
For 75 years we've been supplying the world's greatest nations with the latest weaponry.
When you see this symbol, you know you're in safe hands.
We have offices in New York, London, Tokyo, all over the world.
- Go on, girls.
- What are you doing?
Ordering myself a little birthday present.
Can we have a little less talking?
You don't care about our marketing strategy.
I care.
What about our CRM114 landmine?
The platoon buster.
What Ordinance magazine calls it:
"The most exciting development in concealed termination".
Weapons you can trust, anti-personnel devices you can rely on.
That's trust.
That's reliability.
That's Palisade.
As I speak, our team of dedicated individuals are touring Eastern Europe bringing the Palisade message to you.
And they couldn't be more excited.
Richard, why are all the actors in this video white?
- They are not all white.
- Blonde, actually.
It's just a coincidence.
If they were all black, that would be a coincidence, too?
What is your problem exactly?
You've made a recruitment video for the Hitler youth.
Richard.
There you go, you see?
What's he, an albino?
Here's the P40, version 5.
Yeah, that's very sensitive.
It's not funny, Harris.
Freedom, democracy, justice.
With Palisade Defence we'll win the war on terror.
I bloody hope not.
Thank you, Harris.
There's a short circuit or something.
- Fire officer coming!
- Sit down.
Officer sitting.
- No smoking!
- Yes, I know.
No smoking!
No cigarettes!
Bob Marley!
Bob Marley!
Billy, what's the plan?
George should be at the lodge waiting for us, along with the food.
- And the paintball gear?
- It's all in the brown bag.
I'll give you 50 dollars if you stop eating.
I bought some mushrooms off the security guard at the road show.
I gave him 20 euros and look how much he gave me.
- They look horrible!
- They are magic mushrooms.
How do you know he didn't just pick them off the side of the road?
They're proper.
You can tell by the stalks.
You eat those, you're gonna go crazy.
I think I've had these ones before.
- They give you a chilled out one.
- And if you're wrong?
I'll be somewhere over the rainbow getting fucked by the tin man.
What the fuck is going on?
Are you all right?
- You all right, Jill?
- Yeah.
- The road is blocked.
- Anybody need first aid?
I might do in 20 minutes.
We can go this way.
I don't understand.
The road is fine.
The two roads meet up again.
I't's just a detour!
Go on, Richard!
All right.
That's quite enough.
I won't stand for this unprofessional behaviour.
You are hired to drive and drive you will, buddy.
Is that clear?
Great management skills.
Really world class.
It doesn't appear far on the map, but it all depends on the scale.
- What is the scale?
- It's not on here.
- An inch is usually a mile, isn't it?
- No.
- We'll assume that it is.
- But it's probably safer not to.
Every map I've ever seen, an inch is a mile.
Are you saying I can't read maps?
I'm sure you have an excellent knowledge of maps, but an inch could be two miles or ten.
Goodbye.
I'm going back to the hotel.
- You're doing no such thing.
- Then show me the lodge.
- It's a mile down that road.
- You're not listening to me.
- I'm not walking anywhere!
- Don't squabble.
It's supposed to be a team-building weekend.
Richard seems to think we're on a walking holiday.
Wait a sec.
Stop the coach!
Stop!
Stop the bus!
Fucking hell!
Come on!
Fuck it!
What was that?
Sorry.
Probably just a bear.
- Just a bear?
- There are no bears in Hungary.
- Are you sure?
- Yes.
That's assuming we're still in Hungary.
If we've crossed the border into Romania, then there are bears.
If we're in Serbia, I'm not sure.
That's really interesting.
Are bears required to stop at borders?
Is there some passport control for bears?
- Watch your tone.
- Or what?
- Please!
- No.
Or what?
- That sounded further away.
- There.
If it was a bear, which it wasn't, it's moved on.
Come on.
We should stick to the main road.
- This way is much quicker.
- I'm with Richard.
Have I pissed myself?
What?
I feel damp.
You look all right.
I'm not gonna touch you.
- Have I pissed my pants?
- I don't think so.
- What's wrong with you?
- I feel all damp.
You're fine.
Okey, so...
If an inch is not a mile, what's the worst case scenario?
An inch is 1,000 miles?
That's Steve.
If he's messing around, then he's in big trouble.
Oh, no...
We should stay with the bags.
Steve, are you all right, mate?
Jesus!
Steve?
I saw someone.
Who?
I don't know.
What happened?
The weirdest thing's just happened.
I needed to have a slash, so I pulled my trousers down, cause I felt a little damp.
I was about to have a piss and I saw a geezer with a balaclava and a suitcase.
No, more of a travel bag.
You've come over...
- Steve.
- Yes?
- The mushrooms.
- What mushrooms?
You ate them.
You're high.
- Look after him.
- Yeah.
Listen,
I know we're mates, but... if you look at my cock one more time, I'm gonna kick off.
What are you talking about?
I have not looked at your winkie.
You turn around.
Everybody, prepare to smile.
- Isn't it wonderful?
- It's a dump.
- What do you expect, the Hilton?
- The Hilton would be good.
- We're in the country.
- You're not gonna stay here?
- Now I'd sleep in a cave.
- That's the spirit!
There's someone in the woods.
Yeah.
You already said that.
Come on.
Come on.
- This isn't the right place.
- This is the right place.
- Obviously it is not.
- It is the right place.
Billy.
There's only one lodge on the map...
Thank you.
This is just the lobby.
This place is fantastic.
Steve, it's just a rope.
"Dear team, as a big thank you for the last few weeks on the road,
George and I invite you to join us on a team-building weekend in Palisade's newly acquired luxury lodge."
Luxury lodge.
Okey, now listen up, everyone.
This is not a holiday.
This is a business.
And team-building weekends are part of that business.
This is our chance to find out about ourselves.
Sure we'll have fun.
- Paintball, orienteering...
- Bridge building.
We need to take ownership of the weekend.
That means working together.
- I have an idea.
- No, shh!
I can't spell success without "u", and "you",
"you", "you"... and "you".
Success has only one "u".
Well, daddy couldn't put us all through Cambridge, could he, Harris?
George wants us to be the best team possible.
If that means digging in a little, I'm sorry.
Think this place is a dump?
Maybe it's supposed to be.
I've had tougher challenges.
Let's make this our challenge.
How staying in this shithole is gonna help me sell landmines?
All right?
- Don't be so happy all the time.
- I'm only trying to be positive.
You're like a dog tied to a radiator wagging its tail.
That's not a compliment.
Look for the generator in there.
Have you got any light bulbs in your bag, Gordon?
Yeah, give me two secs.
Hello?
Hello?
Oh, no!
- You should get some sleep.
- I think you're right.
Maggie?
I've been waiting for you.
I want you to fuck me.
Really?
I mean, I'd like to.
Fuck me now and fuck me hard.
Okay.
But...
What's going on?
Maggie?
Great management skills, Dick.
World class.
I had no idea Palisade were this involved in Eastern Europe.
You're joking?
- Where did you get this stuff?
- Next to the generator.
There's stacks of it.
It's all Soviet.
That doesn't mean it's one of the asylums.
- It doesn't rule it out either.
- What asylums?
Grub's up.
Put those cards away.
Feast your eyes on this.
Mind yourselves, it is hot.
It smells quite nice.
- Not eating, Maggie?
- No, thanks, not hungry.
Rest of you get stuck in, there's plenty to go round.
Do you wanna get some spoons out, Jill?
- All right, Steve?
Feeling okay?
- All right, piss off!
- Are you still tripping?
- No.
Why are you naked?
You were saying about the asylums?
What asylums?
Harris thinks we're staying in an old lunatic asylum.
- Are we?
- No.
- Tell us about the asylums.
- Are you sure?
It's pretty scary.
- I'll take my chances.
- Okay.
This story takes place before the First World War.
Please.
When movies were silent and women were even quieter.
The Government got strange complaints about the asylum, so they sent an inspector round to check it out.
He arrives late one night to see what's going on.
Everything seems fine and the warders agree to show him around.
But everything isn't fine.
Everything's not fine at all.
All the inmates are screaming at him to let them out.
Then he realises what's wrong.
The inmates had taken over and locked up all the doctors.
Then they turned on him.
He tried to reason with them, but there's no reasoning with the mentally insane.
Guess who they called to sort out the mess?
Us.
Palisade sent the boys in.
Sprayed the place with nerve agent.
It was a massacre.
But rumour has it that one inmate survived.
Hell bent on killing any Palisade employee that should cross his path.
They say he's still on the loose.
- Is that supposed to be scary?
- It was at the time.
There is a tiny bit of truth in his story.
- Damn right there is.
- Atiny bit.
It occurred in the early 90's when the Soviet Union broke up.
Places like this were detention centres for war criminals, soldiers who liked the killing a little bit too much.
They were lunatics who wiped out whole villages.
Burnt people alive.
Put heads on spikes.
They were well-trained savages.
Their Government locked them away, tried to cure them, but it was no good.
Some escaped.
Hid in some empty buildings, but not for long.
It wasn't Palisade who killed them, it was their Government.
But it was us who supplied the weapons.
Harris, if anyone did survive, revenge would be the last thing on their minds.
- What would be on their minds?
- Survival.
Evading capture.
They were war criminals.
Excuse me for being the only sensible one here, but this place is a lodge.
It's not a mental home, it's not a prison.
It's a lodge.
It was a sex lodge.
- Right.
- It was.
I'm telling you.
Backin the 60's, these places were hospitals for rich old men.
All the nurses were naughty looking birds with great big shooters.
Being stuck all the way out here, they used to get lonely, so they tried it on with the old boys.
But they were on death's door.
They couldn't get it up.
They decided to get hold of each other.
One day this fella turns up out of the blue.
Young geezer, bit of bollocks about him.
They chased him, they caught him and...
Well, he was fucked.
Have you ever taken anything seriously?
Ecstasy and weed.
- Hey, gang, how are we all doing?
- Brilliant.
Sweet dreams?
Yeah.
Harris.
Hi, Maggie.
Not eating?
Why are you all so obsessed with what I eat?
- I'm not too skinny.
- No, no, I don't mean...
Just that you'll need your energy for the team games.
You're perfect just the way you are.
And when I say perfect, I obviously don't mean that in a sexual way.
I mean perfecte in a neutral way.
As if I were another woman saying that you were perfect.
Just one woman to another.
Not that I'm implying anything like that.
Or that there's anything wrong with that... sort of thing.
Or... anything.
Keep digging, we can still see you.
Fuck that!
Bit young to be losing your teeth.
It's not mine!
It's not my tooth.
- Maybe it's just a clove.
- Does it look like a fucking clove?
- I'm gonna puke.
- Could it be the cow's tooth?
A cow with gold fillings?
Who made the pie?
- I didn't make it.
I found it.
- You what?
- I found it.
- You found a pie?
- It was wrapped in foil.
- That's a relief.
Jesus!
You dirty bastard!
Everyone calm down.
- Jill, come with me.
- I'm gonna be sick.
I'm sorry.
I thought it was a welcome gift.
- From who?
- I don't know.
George.
- George wouldn't bring a pie!
- It could have been here for months.
- Look at this place!
- I cooked it for the full hour!
- It had instructions on it?
- No, but it's a pie.
You don't cook every pie for an hour.
You don't think I undercooked it, do you?
Fucking hell!
Look, it's gone.
I'm throwing the pie in the bin.
Right, that makes me feel better.
- Good night, sweetie.
- Good night.
Shit.
Hello.
- What's the matter?
- There was a man at my window!
- What happened?
- I saw someone.
- Where's my inhaler?
- What's going on?
- Jill saw someone at her window.
- Who?
What did he look like?
He had a mask.
Have you been eating my mushrooms?
Shut up.
Gordon, do you have anything to calm her down?
I'll check my bag.
- Have you seen anyone?
- No.
- What do you think?
- You're the boss, you think.
- Perhaps you were dreaming.
- I saw someone!
I wasn't dreaming!
His face was covered in a mask, I was not dreaming!
I found some kalms, they're herbal.
Come on, there's no one here.
Come on.
It was probably just some locals messing around.
Looking through a window one storey up?
- We need to get out of here.
- Yeah, I'm leaving.
- I'm going with her.
- No one is going anywhere.
What did you find?
Some wooden structures in the trees, but they're far away.
You see?
Tomorrow morning we go to the top of the hill, see if we can get a signal.
Get somebody to take us back to the hotel.
Go on, my son!
- Great idea.
- That is not a great idea.
Anyone who leaves won't have a job to come back to.
- I don't care.
Count me in.
- I'm with her.
I'm sorry, but he's right.
Should I make some tea?
All right, listen.
Jill, I want you to sleep on it.
In the morning, if you still feel the same way,
I'll come up with a plan.
I feel the same way.
Okey, listen up, everyone.
Billy, get over here, come on.
I've made a decision.
We're gonna sit tight.
We sit tight while...
Harris, I want you and Jill to go up the hill... to go up the hill and see if you can get a phone signal.
Get the coach driver to come and pick us up.
Sweet!
I've made this decision because of the food situation.
And it is conditional.
While they're gone, the rest of us will do a little team-building.
Yes!
- Nice one.
- Excuse me.
I just wanna make it really clear, before we begin, that paintballing is about teamwork.
So no Rambos.
I repeat, absolutely no Rambos.
Okay!
- How's your project going?
- Pretty good, thanks.
- They're humane landmines, right?
- They're not landmines.
They're immobilisation units.
And they do what?
They sort of grab you, yeah?
They pin you to the floor, they don't blow children's legs off.
- They're humane.
- They're a hard sell.
I don't understand why in the 21st century we create such sick weapons.
- The guillotine seems humane.
- There's nothing humane about it.
At least it's instantaneous.
There's nothing instantaneous about it.
When your head's chopped off, your brain can think for 2 to 3 minutes.
You're aware that your head is cut off?
When Marie Antoinette had her head chopped off, she felt it hit the basket, she saw blood pumping out of her own stump.
Think he crashed?
I don't know.
- Oh, my God!
- We gotta get the others.
We can't just leave him here, can we?
I'm not saying that I fancy anyone in particular.
But if I did, I wouldn't know how to approach them.
- Dating's complicated in England.
- English birds ain't complicated.
Buy them a Bacardi Freezer and they'll ride you like Sea Biscuit.
Yeah?
But what if she's not English?
What if she's French or Spanish, or...
American?
- Maggie.
- Yeah.
What do you think?
You've got more chance of getting shit out of a rocking horse.
That's what I thought.
Come on, I got you!
Get up, you cheating bastard!
See all this Maggie stuff, it's cause your bird left you.
Your plums are backing up, it's driving you nuts, it's confusing you.
Making you think you love her.
You're right.
- Anyway, I think she likes you.
- What are you talking about?
Go, go, go!
Hiya, sexy.
We won.
You're dead.
The bullet missed my vital organs.
I've survived, it's a miracle!
- Safeties off.
- Here comes the ref.
Right.
You really got into that.
Brilliant.
I think we bent a few rules here and there.
Steve shot Richard and he didn't die.
- No one shot me.
- We shot someone.
I think that someone, and I'm not pointing any fingers, has been wiping off paint, and it states in the rules that...
This is total war.
There are no rules.
Stop!
Stop!
Stop it!
Stop!
That is really dangerous!
If you get one of those in your eye, it could pop like a ping-pong ball!
It's not funny!
That hurts!
I expect more from some of you.
Gordon, you gotta be still.
Steve, get on the other side.
Be still!
- Get it off!
- You have to stop moving.
Pull your leg out!
Now, pull it now!
Pull your leg out now!
Now!
- Steve, you fucking idiot!
- All right, for fuck's sake!
They'll get you out.
Pull it now!
God!
Okey.
Gordon!
We gotta stop the bleeding.
Billy, give me your belt.
You're gonna be okay.
You have to calm down for me.
We're gonna stop the bleeding.
They're everywhere.
What the fuck's going here?
Billy, hold his hand!
- Help me tighten this belt.
- What are you doing?
Richard, help me hold him!
Steve!
You're gonna be okay.
- Get on the coach.
- Be careful, don't move!
- What the fuck happened?
- There're bear traps everywhere.
Someone's trying to kill us like they killed the driver.
The driver's dead?
- Just get on the coach!
- Will somebody help us?
- He could be watching us right now.
- Jill, you're not helping!
- What are we gonna do with his leg?
- We need to keep it cold.
- There's a fridge on the coach.
- That's great, thank you.
You're shitting me?
- Come on!
- All right, for fuck's sake!
- Faster!
- It's going as fast as it can!
I need something to cover his leg.
Harris, slow down, you're going too fast!
Someone give me something to cover his leg!
Jill!
Oh, shit!
I think I've broken my arm.
Billy...
Jill?
We've got to head back to the lodge.
We've got to find Jill.
Jill!
Jill!
Keep your voice down.
Someone's killed Harris.
Who's to say he didn't kill Jill as well?
We head back to the lodge, we lock ourselves in till morning, and then we walk.
Where?
- I don't know.
- I'm glad we got that sorted.
Unless you have a better idea, we go back to the lodge.
Let's put him down.
We need to lock ourselves in.
Lock everything.
- This is fucking bollocks!
- We're safer in here.
I'm not waiting here.
It's fucking madness!
What do we do with Gordon?
- I'll carry him myself!
- Keep your voices down!
What if the stories were true?
- Mine wasn't.
- What stories?
They were asylums, someone escaped and he knows we're Palisade.
- How would they know it?
- The bus is not subtle.
Those stories are nonsense.
Who told you?
Jill?
Harris?
Do you know how many conspiracies I hear each year?
No, how many?
I'll tell you how many I believe:
None.
We're a public company.
Members of both our Governments are on the board.
They won't do anything immoral.
Arguing is not gonna help us out.
You said you wanted us to work as a team?
Well, now it's the time to start.
Help me get some wood.
We need to board ourselves in.
- With what?
- I don't know.
Check Gordon's bag.
He's not gonna have hammer and nails in there.
For fuck's sake!
Good boy.
I've got some pills.
What kind of pills?
Ecstasy.
Great.
Have a party.
- Not for me, for him.
- What do you mean?
They're not gonna get him up tap dancing, but they'll take the edge off for a while.
Okay.
Gordon.
Take one of these.
It'll sort you out.
I don't do drugs.
These are painkillers.
They're gonna make you feel better.
Just take one.
Here you go.
You all right?
I'm sorry about earlier.
Flaring up and all that.
You were okay.
I wanna say something to you.
Sometimes I act like an idiot.
I say thing when I shouldn't...
Shit, I've left Gordon's foot on the coach!
Sorry, mate.
I love you, Maggie.
- Of course you do.
- No, seriously, I mean it.
I really mean it.
- It's just the drugs.
- No, it's not the drugs.
I really, really love you.
And I loved Jill.
I really, really loved Jill.
- Steve, you got any downers?
- Not my thing.
Maggie, have I told you that I love you?
- Where are you going?
- Toilet.
Can't you hold on?
No.
Don't worry, I'll be right back.
If we don't get him to a hospital, he's gonna die.
I think maybe we should leave him.
What are you saying?
Our best chance for survival is if the four of us get to the main road.
Get help.
I think it's Gordon's best shot as well.
- You're right.
We should go.
- Go where?
What's happened?
This door was locked.
Gordon.
- Gordon!
- Billy, be quiet.
Conspiracies?
We should go back upstairs.
Maggie.
Richard!
Richard!
Fuck!
Jesus!
Yeah, well...
I'd hate to be accused of not killing him when I had the chance.
Well, I think you'll be all right there.
Don't you fucking move!
- We got a problem.
- Yeah, no shit!
No, another problem.
That was our last bullet.
Put your fucking guns down!
Put your guns down or I'll blow your balls off!
Go.
Stop.
Stop!
- What are you doing?
- Don't move.
- The place is mined.
- How do you know?
I'm standing on one.
CRM platoon buster.
One of ours.
- Shit!
- Yeah.
Where's Billy?
Richard, they're coming.
All right, follow my footsteps, then jump to the trees.
Go.
Come on.
Hey!
Come on!
Come on!
Over here!
Come on!
You're laughing at me?
You won't be fucking laughing when I take my foot off this!
Maggie!
Steve!
Where the hell you been?
Are you Mr. Steve?
We are Nadia and Olga from the escort agency.
Yeah, come on, everybody.
Why not be my fucking guest!
Is this where we are?
- What are you doing?
- Have you been to the lake?
- Yes.
- Are there boats there?
- Yes.
- Leave your shit and follow us.
Ready?
Yeah.
Would you tell me what the fuck is going on?
George, there are about five seriously sick fuckers coming our way to kill us.
You can either help us or fuck off.
When you say sick fuckers, do you mean terrorists?
- Call them what you want.
- Come on, let's go!
Hold it.
No one's going anywhere.
I've been waiting to demonstrate this for a while.
You stamp terrorist on it, and I'll kill it.
- Wait till they get a load of this.
- Sweet!
Are those the little bastards?
Get back.
Steve!
Steve!
Steve!
Where are you?
- Steve!
- Maggie!
I'm in some kind of trap!
Steve, he's got me!
Oh, my God!
No!
God!
Steve!
No!
Please!
Please...
Get off of me!
Get off!
Fucking thing!
Steve!
Steve!
This is gonna hurt!
Steve!
Steve!
Steve!
Hello.
Hello.
Do you speak English?
- English?
- Yes, English.
- I need you to send help.
- Please hold.
Come on then, you fuck!
Foursome?
Oh, shit.
What happened?
What the fuck is this?
Damn.
This whole thing is too high.
Oh, Mr. George, help us.
Help us!
He doesn't understand what I'm saying.
Help us!
- Help us.
- Sorry.
You fucking pig!
Don't go away.
You fucking pig!
- I wanna get out of here!
- Shut up!
I'm gonna tie your coat to this.
- Please, take it off.
- You take it off.
Okay.
I throw this end out and it will catch something, ok?
Hang on to this end so it won't won't fly off.
Fucking motherfucker!
Motherfucking shit!
- Okay.
Hold it tight!
- Okay.
Okay.
Shit!
Nadja, we are only short a little bit now.
Please!
Hi, my name's George Cinders, President of Palisade Defence.
We're hitting a home run for freedom and a time out for terror.
Memo.
Must congrat George on terrific performance.
No, delete "terrific", make that "fabulous".
For 75 years we've been supplying the world's greatest nations with the latest weaponry.
When you see this symbol, you know you're in safe hands.
We have offices in New York, London, Tokyo, all over the world.
- Go on, girls.
- What are you doing?
Ordering myself a little birthday present.
Can we have a little less talking?
You don't care about our marketing strategy.
I care.
What about our CRM114 landmine?
The platoon buster.
What Ordinance magazine calls it:
"The most exciting development in concealed termination".
Weapons you can trust, anti-personnel devices you can rely on.
That's trust.
That's reliability.
That's Palisade.
As I speak, our team of dedicated individuals are touring Eastern Europe bringing the Palisade message to you.
And they couldn't be more excited.
Richard, why are all the actors in this video white?
- They are not all white.
- Blonde, actually.
It's just a coincidence.
If they were all black, that would be a coincidence, too?
What is your problem exactly?
You've made a recruitment video for the Hitler youth.
Richard.
There you go, you see?
What's he, an albino?
Here's the P40, version 5.
Yeah, that's very sensitive.
It's not funny, Harris.
Freedom, democracy, justice.
With Palisade Defence we'll win the war on terror.
I bloody hope not.
Thank you, Harris.
There's a short circuit or something.
Smoking is prohibited!
- Fire officer coming!
- Sit down.
Officer sitting.
- No smoking!
- Yes, I know.
No smoking!
No cigarettes!
Bob Marley!
Bob Marley!
Billy, what's the plan?
George should be at the lodge waiting for us, along with the food.
- And the paintball gear?
- It's all in the brown bag.
I'll give you 50 dollars if you stop eating.
I bought some mushrooms off the security guard at the road show.
I gave him 20 euros and look how much he gave me.
- They look horrible!
- They are magic mushrooms.
How do you know he didn't just pick them off the side of the road?
They're proper.
You can tell by the stalks.
You eat those, you're gonna go crazy.
I think I've had these ones before.
- They give you a chilled out one.
- And if you're wrong?
I'll be somewhere over the rainbow getting fucked by the tin man.
What the fuck is going on?
Are you all right?
- You all right, Jill?
- Yeah.
- The road is blocked.
- Anybody need first aid?
I might do in 20 minutes.
We can go this way.
No.
I heard so much bad about this route that I'm not going in there.
No, I'm not going in there, no way!
I don't understand.
The road is fine.
Don't you understand what I'm saying?
You don't understand what I'm saying?
This is my last word:
No!
The two roads meet up again.
You are a total wacko!
Which part of "no" don't you understand?
I'm telling you for the last time, you faggot, I won't go in there!
Why do I have to be shouting all day?
Try to understand that I'm not going on that route, because I'm not!
It's just a detour!
Fucking hell, enough is enough.
It's very dangerous, and I'm not driving there, whatever happens.
There is absolutely no way that I'm going in there.
Go on, Richard!
All right.
That's quite enough.
I won't stand for this unprofessional behaviour.
You are hired to drive and drive you will, buddy.
Is that clear?
Great management skills.
Really world class.
It doesn't appear far on the map, but it all depends on the scale.
- What is the scale?
- It's not on here.
- An inch is usually a mile, isn't it?
- No.
- We'll assume that it is.
- But it's probably safer not to.
Every map I've ever seen, an inch is a mile.
Are you saying I can't read maps?
I'm sure you have an excellent knowledge of maps, but an inch could be two miles or ten.
Goodbye.
I'm going back to the hotel.
- You're doing no such thing.
- Then show me the lodge.
- It's a mile down that road.
- You're not listening to me.
- I'm not walking anywhere!
- Don't squabble.
It's supposed to be a team-building weekend.
Richard seems to think we're on a walking holiday.
Wait a sec.
Stop the coach!
Stop!
Stop the bus!
Fucking hell!
Come on!
Fuck it!
What was that?
Sorry.
Probably just a bear.
- Just a bear?
- There are no bears in Hungary.
- Are you sure?
- Yes.
That's assuming we're still in Hungary.
If we've crossed the border into Romania, then there are bears.
If we're in Serbia, I'm not sure.
That's really interesting.
Are bears required to stop at borders?
Is there some passport control for bears?
- Watch your tone.
- Or what?
- Please!
- No.
Or what?
- That sounded further away.
- There.
If it was a bear, which it wasn't, it's moved on.
Come on.
We should stick to the main road.
- This way is much quicker.
- I'm with Richard.
Have I pissed myself?
What?
I feel damp.
You look all right.
I'm not gonna touch you.
- Have I pissed my pants?
- I don't think so.
- What's wrong with you?
- I feel all damp.
You're fine.
Okey, so...
If an inch is not a mile, what's the worst case scenario?
An inch is 1,000 miles?
That's Steve.
If he's messing around, then he's in big trouble.
Oh, no...
We should stay with the bags.
Steve, are you all right, mate?
Jesus!
Steve?
I saw someone.
Who?
I don't know.
What happened?
The weirdest thing's just happened.
I needed to have a slash, so I pulled my trousers down, cause I felt a little damp.
I was about to have a piss and I saw a geezer with a balaclava and a suitcase.
No, more of a travel bag.
You've come over...
- Steve.
- Yes?
- The mushrooms.
- What mushrooms?
You ate them.
You're high.
- Look after him.
- Yeah.
Listen,
I know we're mates, but... if you look at my cock one more time, I'm gonna kick off.
What are you talking about?
I have not looked at your winkie.
You turn around.
Everybody, prepare to smile.
- Isn't it wonderful?
- It's a dump.
- What do you expect, the Hilton?
- The Hilton would be good.
- We're in the country.
- You're not gonna stay here?
- Now I'd sleep in a cave.
- That's the spirit!
There's someone in the woods.
Yeah.
You already said that.
Come on.
Come on.
- This isn't the right place.
- This is the right place.
- Obviously it is not.
- It is the right place.
Billy.
There's only one lodge on the map...
Thank you.
This is just the lobby.
This place is fantastic.
Steve, it's just a rope.
"Dear team, as a big thank you for the last few weeks on the road,
George and I invite you to join us on a team-building weekend in Palisade's newly acquired luxury lodge."
Luxury lodge.
Okey, now listen up, everyone.
This is not a holiday.
This is a business.
And team-building weekends are part of that business.
This is our chance to find out about ourselves.
Sure we'll have fun.
- Paintball, orienteering...
- Bridge building.
We need to take ownership of the weekend.
That means working together.
- I have an idea.
- No, shh!
I can't spell success without "u", and "you",
"you", "you"... and "you".
Success has only one "u".
Well, daddy couldn't put us all through Cambridge, could he, Harris?
George wants us to be the best team possible.
If that means digging in a little, I'm sorry.
Think this place is a dump?
Maybe it's supposed to be.
I've had tougher challenges.
Let's make this our challenge.
How staying in this shithole is gonna help me sell landmines?
All right?
- Don't be so happy all the time.
- I'm only trying to be positive.
You're like a dog tied to a radiator wagging its tail.
That's not a compliment.
Look for the generator in there.
Have you got any light bulbs in your bag, Gordon?
Yeah, give me two secs.
Hello?
Hello?
Oh, no!
- You should get some sleep.
- I think you're right.
Maggie?
I've been waiting for you.
I want you to fuck me.
Really?
I mean, I'd like to.
Fuck me now and fuck me hard.
Okay.
But...
What's going on?
Maggie?
Great management skills, Dick.
World class.
I had no idea Palisade were this involved in Eastern Europe.
You're joking?
- Where did you get this stuff?
- Next to the generator.
There's stacks of it.
It's all Soviet.
That doesn't mean it's one of the asylums.
- It doesn't rule it out either.
- What asylums?
Grub's up.
Put those cards away.
Feast your eyes on this.
Mind yourselves, it is hot.
It smells quite nice.
- Not eating, Maggie?
- No, thanks, not hungry.
Rest of you get stuck in, there's plenty to go round.
Do you wanna get some spoons out, Jill?
- All right, Steve?
Feeling okay?
- All right, piss off!
- Are you still tripping?
- No.
Why are you naked?
You were saying about the asylums?
What asylums?
Harris thinks we're staying in an old lunatic asylum.
- Are we?
- No.
- Tell us about the asylums.
- Are you sure?
It's pretty scary.
- I'll take my chances.
- Okay.
This story takes place before the First World War.
Please.
When movies were silent and women were even quieter.
The Government got strange complaints about the asylum, so they sent an inspector round to check it out.
He arrives late one night to see what's going on.
Everything seems fine and the warders agree to show him around.
But everything isn't fine.
Everything's not fine at all.
All the inmates are screaming at him to let them out.
Then he realises what's wrong.
The inmates had taken over and locked up all the doctors.
Then they turned on him.
He tried to reason with them, but there's no reasoning with the mentally insane.
Guess who they called to sort out the mess?
Us.
Palisade sent the boys in.
Sprayed the place with nerve agent.
It was a massacre.
But rumour has it that one inmate survived.
Hell bent on killing any Palisade employee that should cross his path.
They say he's still on the loose.
- Is that supposed to be scary?
- It was at the time.
There is a tiny bit of truth in his story.
- Damn right there is.
- Atiny bit.
It occurred in the early 90's when the Soviet Union broke up.
Places like this were detention centres for war criminals, soldiers who liked the killing a little bit too much.
They were lunatics who wiped out whole villages.
Burnt people alive.
Put heads on spikes.
They were well-trained savages.
Their Government locked them away, tried to cure them, but it was no good.
Some escaped.
Hid in some empty buildings, but not for long.
It wasn't Palisade who killed them, it was their Government.
But it was us who supplied the weapons.
Harris, if anyone did survive, revenge would be the last thing on their minds.
- What would be on their minds?
- Survival.
Evading capture.
They were war criminals.
Excuse me for being the only sensible one here, but this place is a lodge.
It's not a mental home, it's not a prison.
It's a lodge.
It was a sex lodge.
- Right.
- It was.
I'm telling you.
Backin the 60's, these places were hospitals for rich old men.
All the nurses were naughty looking birds with great big shooters.
Being stuck all the way out here, they used to get lonely, so they tried it on with the old boys.
But they were on death's door.
They couldn't get it up.
They decided to get hold of each other.
One day this fella turns up out of the blue.
Young geezer, bit of bollocks about him.
They chased him, they caught him and...
Well, he was fucked.
Have you ever taken anything seriously?
Ecstasy and weed.
- Hey, gang, how are we all doing?
- Brilliant.
Sweet dreams?
Yeah.
Harris.
Hi, Maggie.
Not eating?
Why are you all so obsessed with what I eat?
- I'm not too skinny.
- No, no, I don't mean...
Just that you'll need your energy for the team games.
You're perfect just the way you are.
And when I say perfect, I obviously don't mean that in a sexual way.
I mean perfecte in a neutral way.
As if I were another woman saying that you were perfect.
Just one woman to another.
Not that I'm implying anything like that.
Or that there's anything wrong with that... sort of thing.
Or... anything.
Keep digging, we can still see you.
Fuck that!
Bit young to be losing your teeth.
It's not mine!
It's not my tooth.
- Maybe it's just a clove.
- Does it look like a fucking clove?
- I'm gonna puke.
- Could it be the cow's tooth?
A cow with gold fillings?
Who made the pie?
- I didn't make it.
I found it.
- You what?
- I found it.
- You found a pie?
- It was wrapped in foil.
- That's a relief.
Jesus!
You dirty bastard!
Everyone calm down.
- Jill, come with me.
- I'm gonna be sick.
I'm sorry.
I thought it was a welcome gift.
- From who?
- I don't know.
George.
- George wouldn't bring a pie!
- It could have been here for months.
- Look at this place!
- I cooked it for the full hour!
- It had instructions on it?
- No, but it's a pie.
You don't cook every pie for an hour.
You don't think I undercooked it, do you?
Fucking hell!
Look, it's gone.
I'm throwing the pie in the bin.
Right, that makes me feel better.
- Good night, sweetie.
- Good night.
Shit.
Hello.
- What's the matter?
- There was a man at my window!
- What happened?
- I saw someone.
- Where's my inhaler?
- What's going on?
- Jill saw someone at her window.
- Who?
What did he look like?
He had a mask.
Have you been eating my mushrooms?
Shut up.
Gordon, do you have anything to calm her down?
I'll check my bag.
- Have you seen anyone?
- No.
- What do you think?
- You're the boss, you think.
- Perhaps you were dreaming.
- I saw someone!
I wasn't dreaming!
His face was covered in a mask, I was not dreaming!
I found some kalms, they're herbal.
Come on, there's no one here.
Come on.
It was probably just some locals messing around.
Looking through a window one storey up?
- We need to get out of here.
- Yeah, I'm leaving.
- I'm going with her.
- No one is going anywhere.
What did you find?
Some wooden structures in the trees, but they're far away.
You see?
Tomorrow morning we go to the top of the hill, see if we can get a signal.
Get somebody to take us back to the hotel.
Go on, my son!
- Great idea.
- That is not a great idea.
Anyone who leaves won't have a job to come back to.
- I don't care.
Count me in.
- I'm with her.
I'm sorry, but he's right.
Should I make some tea?
All right, listen.
Jill, I want you to sleep on it.
In the morning, if you still feel the same way,
I'll come up with a plan.
I feel the same way.
Okey, listen up, everyone.
Billy, get over here, come on.
I've made a decision.
We're gonna sit tight.
We sit tight while...
Harris, I want you and Jill to go up the hill... to go up the hill and see if you can get a phone signal.
Get the coach driver to come and pick us up.
Sweet!
I've made this decision because of the food situation.
And it is conditional.
While they're gone, the rest of us will do a little team-building.
Yes!
- Nice one.
- Excuse me.
I just wanna make it really clear, before we begin, that paintballing is about teamwork.
So no Rambos.
I repeat, absolutely no Rambos.
Okay!
- How's your project going?
- Pretty good, thanks.
- They're humane landmines, right?
- They're not landmines.
They're immobilisation units.
And they do what?
They sort of grab you, yeah?
They pin you to the floor, they don't blow children's legs off.
- They're humane.
- They're a hard sell.
I don't understand why in the 21st century we create such sick weapons.
- The guillotine seems humane.
- There's nothing humane about it.
At least it's instantaneous.
There's nothing instantaneous about it.
When your head's chopped off, your brain can think for 2 to 3 minutes.
You're aware that your head is cut off?
When Marie Antoinette had her head chopped off, she felt it hit the basket, she saw blood pumping out of her own stump.
Think he crashed?
I don't know.
- Oh, my God!
- We gotta get the others.
We can't just leave him here, can we?
I'm not saying that I fancy anyone in particular.
But if I did, I wouldn't know how to approach them.
- Dating's complicated in England.
- English birds ain't complicated.
Buy them a Bacardi Freezer and they'll ride you like Sea Biscuit.
Yeah?
But what if she's not English?
What if she's French or Spanish, or...
American?
- Maggie.
- Yeah.
What do you think?
You've got more chance of getting shit out of a rocking horse.
That's what I thought.
Come on, I got you!
Get up, you cheating bastard!
See all this Maggie stuff, it's cause your bird left you.
Your plums are backing up, it's driving you nuts, it's confusing you.
Making you think you love her.
You're right.
- Anyway, I think she likes you.
- What are you talking about?
Go, go, go!
Hiya, sexy.
We won.
You're dead.
The bullet missed my vital organs.
I've survived, it's a miracle!
- Safeties off.
- Here comes the ref.
Right.
You really got into that.
Brilliant.
I think we bent a few rules here and there.
Steve shot Richard and he didn't die.
- No one shot me.
- We shot someone.
I think that someone, and I'm not pointing any fingers, has been wiping off paint, and it states in the rules that...
This is total war.
There are no rules.
Stop!
Stop!
Stop it!
Stop!
That is really dangerous!
If you get one of those in your eye, it could pop like a ping-pong ball!
It's not funny!
That hurts!
I expect more from some of you.
Gordon, you gotta be still.
Steve, get on the other side.
Be still!
- Get it off!
- You have to stop moving.
Pull your leg out!
Now, pull it now!
Pull your leg out now!
Now!
- Steve, you fucking idiot!
- All right, for fuck's sake!
They'll get you out.
Pull it now!
God!
Okey.
Gordon!
We gotta stop the bleeding.
Billy, give me your belt.
You're gonna be okay.
You have to calm down for me.
We're gonna stop the bleeding.
They're everywhere.
What the fuck's going here?
Billy, hold his hand!
- Help me tighten this belt.
- What are you doing?
Richard, help me hold him!
Steve!
You're gonna be okay.
- Get on the coach.
- Be careful, don't move!
- What the fuck happened?
- There're bear traps everywhere.
Someone's trying to kill us like they killed the driver.
The driver's dead?
- Just get on the coach!
- Will somebody help us?
- He could be watching us right now.
- Jill, you're not helping!
- What are we gonna do with his leg?
- We need to keep it cold.
- There's a fridge on the coach.
- That's great, thank you.
You're shitting me?
- Come on!
- All right, for fuck's sake!
- Faster!
- It's going as fast as it can!
I need something to cover his leg.
Harris, slow down, you're going too fast!
Someone give me something to cover his leg!
Jill!
Oh, shit!
I think I've broken my arm.
Billy...
Jill?
We've got to head back to the lodge.
We've got to find Jill.
Jill!
Jill!
Keep your voice down.
Someone's killed Harris.
Who's to say he didn't kill Jill as well?
We head back to the lodge, we lock ourselves in till morning, and then we walk.
Where?
- I don't know.
- I'm glad we got that sorted.
Unless you have a better idea, we go back to the lodge.
Let's put him down.
We need to lock ourselves in.
Lock everything.
- This is fucking bollocks!
- We're safer in here.
I'm not waiting here.
It's fucking madness!
What do we do with Gordon?
- I'll carry him myself!
- Keep your voices down!
What if the stories were true?
- Mine wasn't.
- What stories?
They were asylums, someone escaped and he knows we're Palisade.
- How would they know it?
- The bus is not subtle.
Those stories are nonsense.
Who told you?
Jill?
Harris?
Do you know how many conspiracies I hear each year?
No, how many?
I'll tell you how many I believe:
None.
We're a public company.
Members of both our Governments are on the board.
They won't do anything immoral.
Arguing is not gonna help us out.
You said you wanted us to work as a team?
Well, now it's the time to start.
Help me get some wood.
We need to board ourselves in.
- With what?
- I don't know.
Check Gordon's bag.
He's not gonna have hammer and nails in there.
For fuck's sake!
Good boy.
I've got some pills.
What kind of pills?
Ecstasy.
Great.
Have a party.
- Not for me, for him.
- What do you mean?
They're not gonna get him up tap dancing, but they'll take the edge off for a while.
Okay.
Gordon.
Take one of these.
It'll sort you out.
I don't do drugs.
These are painkillers.
They're gonna make you feel better.
Just take one.
Here you go.
You all right?
I'm sorry about earlier.
Flaring up and all that.
You were okay.
I wanna say something to you.
Sometimes I act like an idiot.
I say thing when I shouldn't...
Shit, I've left Gordon's foot on the coach!
Sorry, mate.
I love you, Maggie.
- Of course you do.
- No, seriously, I mean it.
I really mean it.
- It's just the drugs.
- No, it's not the drugs.
I really, really love you.
And I loved Jill.
I really, really loved Jill.
- Steve, you got any downers?
- Not my thing.
Maggie, have I told you that I love you?
- Where are you going?
- Toilet.
Can't you hold on?
No.
Don't worry, I'll be right back.
If we don't get him to a hospital, he's gonna die.
I think maybe we should leave him.
What are you saying?
Our best chance for survival is if the four of us get to the main road.
Get help.
I think it's Gordon's best shot as well.
- You're right.
We should go.
- Go where?
What's happened?
This door was locked.
Gordon.
- Gordon!
- Billy, be quiet.
Conspiracies?
We should go back upstairs.
Maggie.
Richard!
Richard!
Fuck!
Jesus!
Yeah, well...
I'd hate to be accused of not killing him when I had the chance.
Well, I think you'll be all right there.
Don't you fucking move!
- We got a problem.
- Yeah, no shit!
No, another problem.
That was our last bullet.
Put your fucking guns down!
Put your guns down or I'll blow your balls off!
Go.
Stop.
Stop!
- What are you doing?
- Don't move.
- The place is mined.
- How do you know?
I'm standing on one.
CRM platoon buster.
One of ours.
- Shit!
- Yeah.
Where's Billy?
Richard, they're coming.
All right, follow my footsteps, then jump to the trees.
Go.
Come on.
Hey!
Come on!
Come on!
Over here!
Come on!
You're laughing at me?
You won't be fucking laughing when I take my foot off this!
Maggie!
Steve!
Where the hell you been?
Are you Mr. Steve?
We are Nadia and Olga from the escort agency.
Yeah, come on, everybody.
Why not be my fucking guest!
Is this where we are?
- What are you doing?
- Have you been to the lake?
- Yes.
- Are there boats there?
- Yes.
- Leave your shit and follow us.
Ready?
Yeah.
Would you tell me what the fuck is going on?
George, there are about five seriously sick fuckers coming our way to kill us.
You can either help us or fuck off.
When you say sick fuckers, do you mean terrorists?
- Call them what you want.
- Come on, let's go!
Hold it.
No one's going anywhere.
I've been waiting to demonstrate this for a while.
You stamp terrorist on it, and I'll kill it.
- Wait till they get a load of this.
- Sweet!
Are those the little bastards?
Get back.
Steve!
Steve!
Steve!
Where are you?
- Steve!
- Maggie!
I'm in some kind of trap!
Steve, he's got me!
Oh, my God!
No!
God!
Steve!
No!
Please!
Please...
Get off of me!
Get off!
Fucking thing!
Steve!
Steve!
This is gonna hurt!
Steve!
Steve!
Steve!
Hello.
Hello.
Do you speak English?
- English?
- Yes, English.
- I need you to send help.
- Please hold.
Come on then, you fuck!
Foursome?
Oh, shit.
What happened?
What the fuck is this?
Damn.
This whole thing is too high.
Oh, Mr. George, help us.
Help us!
He doesn't understand what I'm saying.
Help us!
- Help us.
- Sorry.
You fucking pig!
Don't go away.
You fucking pig!
- I wanna get out of here!
- Shut up!
I'm gonna tie your coat to this.
- Please, take it off.
- You take it off.
Okay.
I throw this end out and it will catch something, ok?
Hang on to this end so it won't won't fly off.
Fucking motherfucker!
Motherfucking shit!
- Okay.
Hold it tight!
- Okay.
Okay.
Shit!
Nadja, we are only short a little bit now.
Please!
Smoking is prohibited!
No.
I heard so much bad about this route that I'm not going in there.
No, I'm not going in there, no way!
Don't you understand what I'm saying?
You don't understand what I'm saying?
This is my last word:
No!
You are a total wacko!
Which part of "no" don't you understand?
I'm telling you for the last time, you faggot, I won't go in there!
Why do I have to be shouting all day?
Try to understand that I'm not going on that route, because I'm not!
Fucking hell, enough is enough.
It's very dangerous, and I'm not driving there, whatever happens.
There is absolutely no way that I'm going in there.
Oh, shit.
What happened?
What the fuck is this?
Damn.
This whole thing is too high.
Oh, Mr. George, help us.
Help us!
He doesn't understand what I'm saying.
Help us!
- Help us.
- Sorry.
You fucking pig!
Don't go away.
You fucking pig!
- I wanna get out of here!
- Shut up!
I'm gonna tie your coat to this.
- Please, take it off.
- You take it off.
Okay.
I throw this end out... and it will catch something, ok?
Hang on to this end so it won't... won't fly off.
Fucking motherfucker!
Motherfucking shit!
- Okay.
Hold it tight!
- Okay.
Okay.
Shit!
Nadja, we are only short a little bit now.
Please!
Smoking is prohibited!
No.
I heard so much bad about this route that I'm not going in there.
No, I'm not going in there, no way!
Don't you understand what I'm saying?
You don't understand what I'm saying?
This is my last word:
No!
You are a total wacko!
Which part of "no" don't you understand?
I'm telling you for the last time, you faggot, I won't go in there!
Why do I have to be shouting all day?
Try to understand that I'm not going on that route, because I'm not!
Fucking hell, enough is enough.
It's very dangerous, and I'm not driving there, whatever happens.
There is absolutely no way that I'm going in there.
Oh, shit.
What happened?
What the fuck is this?
Damn.
This whole thing is too high.
Oh, Mr. George, help us.
Help us!
He doesn't understand what I'm saying.
Help us!
- Help us.
- Sorry.
You fucking pig!
Don't go away.
You fucking pig!
- I wanna get out of here!
- Shut up!
I'm gonna tie your coat to this.
- Please, take it off.
- You take it off.
Okay.
I throw this end out and it will catch something, ok?
Hang on to this end so it won't won't fly off.
Fucking motherfucker!
Motherfucking shit!
- Okay.
Hold it tight!
- Okay.
Okay.
Shit!
Nadja, we are only short a little bit now.
Please!
Hi, my name's George Cinders.
And I'm the president of Palisade Defence.
We're hitting a home run for freedom.
And a time-out for terror.
We work hard to bring you up-to-the-minute technology.
Memo:
Must congrat George on terrific performance.
Oh, no, delete "terrific." Make that "fabulous" performance.
For 75 years, we've been supplying the world's greatest nations with the world's latest weaponry.
So when you see this symbol you know you're in safe hands.
We have offices in New York, London, Tokyo, all over the world.
Poor girls.
- Go on, yeah, yeah.
- What are you doing?
Ordering myself a little birthday present.
All right, team.
Can we have a little less talking, please?
Am I the only one who cares about our marketing strategy?
I care.
Or what about our CRM- 114 landmine?
The platoon buster.
- What?
- Ordnance Magazine calls it:
"The most exciting development in concealed termination in years."
Weapons you can trust.
Anti-personnel devices you can rely on.
That's trust.
That's reliability.
That's Palisade.
As I speak our team of dedicated individuals are touring Eastern Europe bringing the Palisade message to you.
And they couldn't be more excited.
Richard, why are all the actors in this video white?
They are not all white.
Blond actually.
It's just a coincidence, that's all.
So if they were black, that would be a coincidence too, would it?
What is your problem exactly?
You've made a recruitment video for the Hitler Youth.
Richard.
Richard.
Oh, there.
There you go.
See?
What's he?
An albino?
Here's the P-40 version 5.
Oh, yeah, okay, that's very sensitive.
It's not funny, Harris.
Freedom, democracy, justice.
Palisade Defence:
We'll win the war on terror.
I bloody hope not.
Thank you, Harris.
Something's wrong, it's a short circuit or something.
Smoking is prohibited!
- Fire officer, coming through.
- Gordon, sit down.
Officer sitting.
- No smoking.
No smoking.
- Yes, yes, I know.
Throw it out!
Hey, Billy.
What's the plan?
George should be at the lodge waiting for us, with the food.
Good.
Good.
And the paintball gear?
- It's all in the brown bag.
- Okay.
I'll give you $50 if you stop eating.
I bought some mushrooms off the security guard,
Gave him 20 euros.
Look how much he's given me.
Look.
They look horrible.
Yeah, that's because they're magic mushrooms.
How do you know he didn't pick them off the side of the road and sell them to you?
No, they're proper.
You can tell by the stalks, look.
You eat those, you're gonna go crazy.
I've had these ones before.
You know, they give you a really nice, like, chilled-out high.
And if you're wrong?
Then I'll be somewhere over the rainbow getting fucked by the Tin Man.
- What the fuck's going on?
- Everybody all right?
You all right?
- You all right, Jill?
- Yeah.
- The road's blocked.
- Anybody need first aid?
I might do in 20 minutes.
We can go this way.
No.
I heard so much bad about this route that I'm not going in there.
No, I'm not going in there, no way!
But I don't understand what you're saying.
The road is fine.
Don't you understand what I'm saying?
You don't understand what I'm saying?
This is my last word:
No!
The two roads meet up again.
You see?
Look.
You are a total wacko!
Which part of "no" don't you understand?
I'm telling you for the last time, you faggot, I won't go in there!
Why do I have to be shouting all day?
Try to understand that I'm not going on that route, because I'm not!
It's just a detour!
Fucking hell, enough is enough.
It's very dangerous, and I'm not driving there, whatever happens.
There is absolutely no way that I'm going in there.
Go on, Rich.
All right.
That's quite enough.
I won't stand for this unprofessional behavior.
You hear me?
Now, you're hired to drive.
And drive you will, buddy.
Is that clear?
Great management skills, Dick.
Really, really world-class.
I know it doesn't appear far on the map but it all depends on the scale.
Well, what is the scale?
It's not on here.
Well, an inch is usually a mile, isn't it?
No.
Well, we'll assume that it is.
Well, we can assume, but it's probably safer not to.
Every map I've ever seen, an inch is a mile.
You saying I don't know how to read maps?
No, no.
I'm sure you have an excellent knowledge of maps.
It's just that, well, an inch could be two miles or ten.
I'm just saying goodbye.
- I'm going back to the hotel.
- You're doing no such thing.
Then show me the lodge.
- The lodge is...
Is a mile down that road.
- No, no, no, hang on a minute.
You're not listening to me.
I'm not walking anywhere.
Hey, hey, come on, don't squabble, gang.
It's supposed to be a team-building weekend.
Maybe you can tell Richard because he seems to think we're on a walking holiday.
Wait a minute.
Stop the coach.
Stop.
Stop the bus.
Fucking hell.
Stop that.
Come on, now.
Fuck it.
What was that?
Sorry.
Probably just a bear.
- Just a bear?
- There are no bears in Hungary.
- Are you sure?
- Yes.
Well, that's assuming we're still in Hungary.
If we cross the border into Romania, then there are bears.
If we're in Serbia then I'm not sure.
Well, that's really interesting, Richard.
Are bears required to stop at borders?
I mean, is there some sort of passport control for bears?
Better watch your tone, young man.
- Or what?
- Oh, please.
No.
Or what?
- That sounded further away.
- There.
If it was a bear, which it wasn't it's moved on.
Come on.
Richard, I really think we should stick to the main road.
No, no.
This way's much quicker.
- Come on.
- I'm with Richard.
Have I pissed myself?
What?
I feel damp.
Well, you look all right.
I'm not gonna touch you.
- Have I pissed my pants?
- I'm just saying I don't think so.
- What's wrong with you?
- I feel all damp.
You're fine.
You're fine.
Okay, so working on the assumption that an inch is not a mile what's the worst-case scenario?
An inch is a thousand miles?
That's Steve.
If he's messing around then he's in big trouble.
Oh, no.
We should stay with the bags.
Steve, you're all right, mate?
Jesus.
Steve?
I saw someone.
Who?
I don't know.
What happened?
The weirdest thing's just happened.
Hear?
I needed to have a slash, so I pulled me trousers down you know, I felt a little bit damp and I didn't wanna get a rash.
I was about to have a piss and I saw a geezer with a balaclava and a suitcase.
No, more of a travel bag.
- So you've come over...
- Steve.
- Yes?
- The mushrooms.
- What mushrooms?
- You ate them.
You're high.
- Look after him, okay?
- Yeah, sure.
Listen...
Now, I know we're mates but if you look at my cock one more time, I'm gonna kick off.
What are you talking about?
I have not once looked at your winkie.
You turn around.
Okay, everybody.
Prepare to smile.
- Isn't it wonderful?
- It's a dump.
- What do you expect, the Hilton?
- The Hilton would be good.
We're in the country.
- You're not gonna stay here, are you?
- Right now, I'd sleep in a cave.
That's the spirit.
Someone in the woods.
Yeah, you already said that.
Come on.
Come on.
- This isn't the right place.
- This is the right place.
This obviously is not the right place.
It is the right place.
Billy.
Well, there's only one lodge on the map, so I suppose...
Thank you.
This is just the lobby.
This place is fantastic.
Steve, it's just a rope.
It's just a rope.
"Dear team:
As a big thank-you for the last few weeks on the road George and I cordially invite you to join us on a team-building weekend in Palisade's newly-acquired luxury lodge."
"Luxury lodge."
Okay, okay, okay.
Now listen up, everyone.
This is not a holiday.
This is a business.
And team-building weekends like it or not, are part of that business.
- Hear, hear.
This is our chance to find out about ourselves.
Oh, yeah.
Sure, we'll have fun paintball, orienteering...
- Bridge-building.
- Bridge-building.
We need to take ownership of the weekend.
And that means working together.
- Richard, I have an idea...
- Now...
Shh!
I can't spell "success" without "U."
And you.
You.
You.
And you.
"Success" has only one U.
Oh, well.
Daddy couldn't put us all through Cambridge, could he, Harris?
Now, George wants us to be the best team possible.
And if that means digging in a little, then I'm sorry.
You think this place is a dump?
Well, think about this.
Maybe it's supposed to be.
I've had tougher challenges.
Now, let's make this our challenge.
Explain to me how staying in this shithole is gonna help me sell landmines.
Oi.
Look, all I'm asking is don't be so happy all the time.
- I'm only trying to be positive.
- No, you're not.
You're like a dog tied to a radiator, wagging its tail.
That's not a compliment.
Look for the generator in there, will you?
You got any light bulbs in your bag, Gordon?
Yeah.
Give me two secs.
Hello?
Hello?
Oh, no.
You should go and get some sleep.
I think you're right.
Maggie?
I've been waiting for you, Richard.
I want you to fuck me.
Really?
I mean, I'd like to.
Fuck me now, and fuck me hard.
Okay.
But what's going on?
Maggie?
Great management skills, Dick.
World-class.
I can't believe it.
I had no idea Palisade were this involved in Eastern Europe.
You're joking, right?
Where did you get this stuff?
Found it next to the generator.
There's stacks of it out there.
It's all Soviet.
That doesn't mean it's one of the asylums.
Well, it doesn't rule it out either, does it?
What asylums?
Right, you lot.
Do you wanna put those cards away, please, Jill?
Feast your eyes on this.
Mind yourselves, it is hot.
It actually smells quite nice.
- Not eating, Maggie?
- No, thanks.
Not hungry.
Okay, rest of you then, get stuck in, there is plenty to go around.
Do you wanna get some spoons out, please, Jill?
- You're all right, Steve?
Feeling okay?
- You know what, piss off.
- Are you still tripping?
- No.
Why are you naked?
Harris, you were saying about the asylums.
What asylums?
Harris seems to think we're staying in an old lunatic asylum.
- Are we?
- No.
Go on, tell us about the asylums.
Are you sure you want me to?
Because, you know, it's pretty scary, mate.
I'll take my chances.
Okay, okay.
This story takes place a long time ago, way back before the first World War.
Oh, please.
When movies were silent and women were even quieter.
The government had been getting these strange complaints about the asylum.
So the sent an inspector around to check it out.
He arrives late one night to see what's going on.
Everything seems fine when the wardens agree to show him around.
But everything isn't fine.
Everything's not fine at all.
All the inmates are going crazy, screaming at him to let them out.
Then he realizes what's wrong.
The inmates have taken over and locked up all the doctors.
And then they turn on him.
He tried to reason with them but there's no reasoning with the mentally insane.
Guess who they called to sort out the mess?
Us.
Palisade sent the boys in spread the place with nerve agent, killed everyone.
It was a massacre.
But rumor has it one inmate survived.
Hell-bent on killing any Palisade employee that should cross his path.
They say he's still on the loose.
- So that's supposed to be scary?
- Well, it was at the time.
Believe it or not, there is a tiny bit of truth in his story.
- Damn right there is.
- A tiny bit.
It actually occurred in the early '90s when the Soviet Union broke up.
Places like this were detention centers for war criminals.
Soldiers who liked the killing a little bit too much.
They were lunatics.
They wiped out whole villages burnt people alive, put heads on spikes.
They were savages.
Well-trained savages.
Their government locked them away, tried to cure them, but it was no good.
Some escaped hid in some empty buildings nearby, but not for long.
Obviously, it wasn't Palisade who killed them.
It was their government.
But it was us who supplied the weapons.
Oh, and Harris if anyone did survive revenge would be the last thing on their minds.
What would be on their minds?
Survival.
Evading capture.
These guys were war criminals, remember?
- Yeah.
- Well, excuse me for being the only sensible one here, but this place is a lodge.
Okay?
It's not a mental home, it's not a prison, it's a lodge.
It was a sex lodge.
- Right.
- It was.
I'm telling you.
You see, back in the '60s these places were hospitals for rich old men.
And all the nurses were these naughty looking birds with great big shooters.
Anyway, being stuck all the way out here, they used to get really lonely.
So they tried it on with the old boys.
These poor old fuckers, they was on death's door.
They couldn't get it up.
So they decided to just get hold of each other.
One day this fellow turns up out of the blue.
Young geezer, bit of bollocks about him.
They chased him.
They caught him and well, he was fucked.
Have you ever taken anything seriously in your life?
Ecstasy and weed, I think.
Yeah.
- Hey, gang.
How are we all doing?
- Brilliant.
Sweet dreams?
Yeah.
Harris.
- Hi, Maggie.
- Hi.
Not eating?
Why are you all so obsessed with what I eat?
I am not too skinny.
No, no, no.
I don't mean...
Just that you'll need your energy for the team games, you know.
I mean, you're perfect just the way you are.
And, when I say perfect, I obviously don't mean that in a sexual way.
I mean perfect in a neutral way.
As if I were another woman saying that you were perfect.
You know?
Just one woman to another.
Not that I'm implying anything like that.
Or that there's anything wrong with that sort of thing.
Or anything...
Keep digging, we can still see you.
What the?
A bit young to be losing your teeth, aren't you?
It's not mine.
- It's not my tooth.
- Maybe it's just a clove.
Does it look like a fucking clove?
- I'm gonna puke.
- Could it be the cow's tooth?
A cow with gold fillings?
Who made the pie?
No, I didn't make it.
I found it.
You what?
- I found it.
- You found a pie?
It was wrapped in foil.
- Oh, well, that's a relief.
- Jesus.
You dirty bastard.
Okay, everyone calm down.
Come on, Jill.
Jill, come with me.
- I'm gonna be sick.
- No.
Okay, look, I'm sorry, everybody.
I thought it was a welcome gift.
- From who?
- I don't know.
George.
George wouldn't bring a pie.
- No.
- It could've been sitting here for months.
- Look at this place.
- I cooked it for the full hour.
- What, it had instructions on it?
- No, but it's a pie.
You don't cook every pie for an hour.
You don't think I undercooked it, do you?
Fucking hell.
Yeah.
Okay, fine.
Look, it's gone.
I'm throwing the pie in the bin.
It's gone.
All right.
That makes me feel better.
- Good night, sweetie.
- Good night.
Shit.
Hello.
Hello.
Hey, hey, hey.
- What's the matter?
What's going on?
- There was a man at my window.
- What happened?
- I saw someone.
- Where's...?
- What's going on?
Jill saw someone.
- Who?
- What did he look like?
He had a mask.
Nobody ate my mushrooms, did they?
Shut up.
Gordon, do you have anything to help calm her down?
I'll check my bag.
- Have you seen anything?
- No.
- What do you think?
- You're the boss, you think.
Perhaps you were dreaming.
I saw someone.
I wasn't dreaming, look at me.
His face was covered in a mask.
I was not dreaming.
I found some Calms.
They're herbal.
Come on, there's no one here.
Come on.
It was probably just some locals messing around.
Looking through a window one story up?
We need to get out of here.
Yeah, I'm leaving.
Fifty says I'm going with her.
- No one is going anywhere.
- What did you find?
There's some structures in the trees, but they're too far to reach the window.
- There, you see?
- Gang, this is what's gonna happen.
Tomorrow morning, we go to the top of the hill, see if we can get a signal.
Get somebody to pick us up, take us back to the hotel.
What, my son?
Great idea, Harris.
No, that is not a great idea.
Anyone who leaves won't have a job to come back to.
- I don't care.
Count me in.
- Yeah, I'm with her.
I'm sorry, but he's right.
Should I make some tea?
All right.
Listen.
Jill, I want you to sleep on it.
Then, in the morning, if you still feel the same way, well I'll come up with a plan.
I feel the same way.
Okay.
Listen up, everyone.
Billy.
Get over here.
Come on.
I've made a decision.
We're gonna sit tight.
We...
We sit tight, while...
Harris, I want you and Jill to go up the hill.
To go up the hill and see if you can get a phone signal.
Get the coach driver to come and pick us up.
- Oh, sweet.
I've made this decision purely because of the food situation.
And...
And it is conditional.
While they're gone, the rest of us will do a little team-building.
Yes.
Nice one.
Excuse me.
I just wanna make it really clear before we begin, that paintballing is about teamwork, all right?
So no Rambos.
I repeat, absolutely no Rambos.
Okay!
Hey, how is your project going?
Pretty good, thanks.
So what are these things?
They're humane landmines, right?
They're not landmines.
- They're mobilization units.
- Right.
And they do what?
They...
They sort of grab you, yeah?
They pin you to the floor.
They don't blow children's legs off.
- They're humane.
- They're a hard sell, that's what they are.
I'm sorry, I don't understand why in the 21st century we create such sick weapons.
The guillotine seems humane.
There's nothing humane about the guillotine.
Well, at least it's instantaneous.
There's nothing instantaneous about the guillotine.
When your head's chopped off, your brain can think for about 2 to 3 minutes.
What, you're saying that you're aware that your head is cut off?
I'm saying that when Marie-Antoinette had her head chopped off she felt it hit the basket.
She saw blood pumping out of her own stump.
That's not true.
It is a hundred percent biological fact.
Do you think he crashed?
I don't know.
Oh, my God.
We gotta get the others.
We can't just leave him here.
Can we?
I'm not saying that I fancy anyone in particular.
I'm just saying that if I did like someone I wouldn't know the best way to approach them.
- Dating is complicated in England.
- What are you talking about?
English birds ain't complicated.
You buy them a Bacardi Breezer and they'll ride you like Seabiscuit.
Yeah?
But what if she's not English?
What if she's French, or Spanish, or American?
Maggie.
Yeah.
So what do you think?
I don't wanna be unkind but I think you got more chance of getting shits out of a rocking horse.
Yeah, that's what I thought.
Come on, I got you.
Get up, you cheating bastard.
See, all this Maggie stuff it's because your bird left you.
It's because your plums are backing up.
It's driving you nuts.
It's confusing you making you think you love her.
You're right.
Anyway, I think she likes you.
- What are you talking about?
- Go, go, go.
Hey, sexy.
We won.
You're dead.
Oh, the bullet missed my vital organs.
I survived, it's a miracle.
- Here we go.
- Safeties off.
- Here comes the ref.
- Right.
Oh, you really got into that.
Brilliant.
I think we bent a few rules here and there.
Steve shot Richard and he didn't die.
- No one shot me.
- We shot someone and it wasn't Maggie.
All right, well, I think that someone, and I'm not pointing any fingers has been wiping off paint.
And it does clearly state in the rules...
- This is total war, there are no rules.
- Right, well, it do...
Stop.
Stop.
Stop it.
Stop!
That is really dangerous.
If you got one of those in your eye, it could pop like a Ping-Pong ball.
It's not funny.
That hurts.
I expect more from some of you.
Gordon, you gotta be still.
Steve, get on the other side.
Quick.
Be still.
- Get it off!
- You have to stop moving.
Pull out.
Pull your leg out.
Now, pull it now.
- Pull your leg out now.
- Stop!
You gotta fucking move it.
- Now!
- Pull your leg out.
- Steve, you fucking idiot.
- All right, for fuck's sake.
We'll get you out.
Pull it out, pull it out.
Pull it.
God!
- Okay, Gordon.
- Shit.
Okay.
Okay.
Okay, we gotta stop the bleeding.
Billy, give me your belt.
You're gonna be okay.
You have to calm down for me, Gordon.
Calm down.
- We're gonna stop the bleeding.
- Yeah, yeah.
They're everywhere.
What the fuck's going on here?
Billy, hold his hand.
Will you help me?
What are you doing?
What are you doing?
Steve, help me out here.
Steve!
You're gonna be okay.
- Get on the coach...
- Stop!
- We gotta go right now.
- Don't move.
- What the fuck happened?
- They're bear traps.
They're everywhere.
Someone's trying to kill us.
Like they killed the driver.
Driver's dead?
All right, just get on the coach.
- Will somebody help us, please?
- What are we gonna do?
- He could be watching us right now.
- Jill, you're not helping.
- What are we gonna do with his leg?
- We need to keep it cold.
- There's a refrigerator in the coach.
- Great, thank you.
Oh, you're shitting me.
God!
All right, all right, for fuck's sake.
- Don't stop.
- It's going as fast as it can.
Steve, I need something to cover his leg.
Harris, slow down.
I think you're going too fast.
Someone give me something to cover his leg, for fuck's sake!
Gonna...?
Jill.
Oh, shit.
I think I've broke me arm.
Billy.
Jill?
We've gotta head back to the lodge.
We've gotta find Jill.
Jill!
Jill!
Keep your voice down.
Someone's killed Harris, you understand?
Who's to say he didn't kill Jill as well?
Now, we head back to the lodge, and we lock ourselves in till morning.
- And then we walk.
- Where?
- I don't know.
- Well, glad we got that solid.
Hey, unless you have a better idea, we go back to the lodge.
You little bitch!
You gonna die!
You gonna burn like a witch!
Just put him down.
We need to lock off that thing.
Lock everything.
This is bollocks.
This is fucking bollocks.
It's safer in here.
Listen to me, I'm not waiting here for him to turn up.
It's madness.
What do you suggest we do with Gordon?
- I'll carry him myself if I have to.
- Just keep your voices down.
What if the stories about this place were true?
- Well, mine wasn't.
- What stories?
There were asylums, someone escaped.
Someone who knows we're Palisade.
- Yeah, but how would they know that?
- Well, the bus.
It's not exactly subtle.
Those stories are nonsense.
Who told you?
Jill?
Harris?
Do you know how many conspiracies I hear regarding weapons companies?
- No, Richard.
How many?
- I'll tell you how many I believe.
None.
We're a public company.
Members of both our governments are on the board.
They're not going to do anything immoral.
Arguing is not gonna help us out, okay?
You said you wanted us to work as a team.
Well, now is the time to start.
Look, just help me get some wood.
We need to board ourselves in, all right?
- With what?
- I don't know.
Check Gordon's bag or something.
Well, he's not gonna have hammer and nails in there, is he?
Oh, for fuck's sake.
Good boy.
I've got some pills.
What kind of pills?
Ecstasy.
Great.
Have a party.
No, not for me.
For him.
What do you mean?
Well, we're not gonna get him up tap-dancing but, you know, it'll take the edge off for a while.
Okay.
Gordon.
Take one of these, yeah?
It'll sort you out.
I don't do drugs.
It's okay, sweetheart.
These are painkillers.
They're gonna make you feel better.
Just take one.
Here.
Here you go.
Here you go.
You're all right?
I'm sorry about earlier, flaring up and all that.
You were okay.
Listen, I wanna say something to you.
Sometimes I act like an idiot, you know.
I say things when I shouldn't.
And...
Shit, I've left Gordon's foot on the coach.
Sorry, mate.
I love you, Maggie.
- Of course you do.
- No, seriously.
No, I mean it.
I really mean it.
- It's just the drugs, Gordon.
- No, it's not the drugs.
I'm really...
I'm really, really...
I love you.
And I loved Jill.
I really...
I really, really, really loved Jill.
Steve, you got any downers?
- Not in my things.
- Maggie, Maggie, I told you, I love you.
- Where are you going?
- Toilet.
Can't you hold on?
No.
Don't worry, I'll be right back.
If we don't get him to a hospital, he's gonna die.
I think maybe we should leave him.
What are you saying?
I think our best chance for survival is if the four of us get to the main road.
Get help.
And I think it's Gordon's best shot as well.
I think you're right.
I think we should go.
Go where?
What's happened?
This door was locked.
Gordon?
- Gordon.
- Billy, be quiet.
Conspiracies?
We should go back upstairs.
Maggie.
Richard!
Richard.
Fuck.
Jesus.
Yeah.
Well, I'd hate to be accused of not killing him when I had the chance.
Well I think he'll be all right there.
Don't you fucking move!
Don't shoot!
We got a problem.
Yeah, no shit.
No, we got another problem.
That was our last bullet.
Put your fucking guns down.
Put your guns down or I'll blow your motherfucking balls off!
Come on, guys, let's get them!
Go left!
Follow me!
On your left!
On your left!
Somewhere here!
Let's go!
Let's go.
Stop.
Stop!
- What are you doing?
- Don't move.
The place is mined, the whole place is mined.
How do you know?
I'm standing on one.
CR-1 platoon buster.
One of ours.
- Oh, shit.
- Yeah.
Where's Billy?
Richard, they're coming.
All right, follow my footsteps.
Then jump to the trees.
Go.
Come on.
Hey!
Come on.
Come on!
Over here.
Come on!
Hi!
I got your dumb ass!
Freeze!
Freeze!
He won't go anywhere now.
He's already a dead man.
Oh, you're laughing at me?
You won't be fucking laughing when I take my foot off this.
There was no use running around from us, it's all over now.
Step away, Borya.
Eat it, bitch!
Hey, Maggie.
Steve.
Where the hell you been?
Are you Mr. Steve?
We are Nadia and Olga from the escort agency.
No, no, there are mines.
Let's walk on the logs.
On the trunks.
Come on, guys, follow me!
Yeah, yeah.
Come on, everybody.
Why not be my fucking guests?
Is this where we are?
- What are...?
- Have you been to the lake?
- Yes.
- Are there boats there?
- Yes.
- Okay, leave your shit and follow us.
Ready?
Yeah.
Would someone please tell me what the fuck is going on?
George.
There are about five seriously sick fuckers coming our way to kill us.
So you can either help us or fuck off.
When you say "sick fuckers," what do you mean here?
Terrorists?
Call them what you want.
- Come on, let's go.
- Hold it.
No one's going anywhere.
I've been waiting to demonstrate this for a while.
You stamp "terrorist" on it, and I'll kill it.
- Wait till they get a load of this.
- Sweet.
Those the little bastards?
All right.
Get back.
Steve.
Steve!
Steve!
Where are you?
Steve!
- Maggie?
- I'm in some kind of trap.
Steve, he's coming!
Oh, my God.
No!
God!
Steve!
God!
No!
Please.
Please.
Get off of me!
Get off...
No!
Fucking...
Steve!
This is gonna hurt.
Steve!
Steve!
Steve!
Hello?
Hello.
Do you speak English?
- English?
- Yes, English.
I need you to send help.
I need help.
Yes, please hold.
Come on, then, you fuck!
You...!
Foursome?
Oh, shit.
What happened?
What the fuck is this?
Damn.
This whole thing is too high.
Oh, Mr. George, help us.
Help us!
He doesn't understand what I'm saying.
Help us!
- Help us.
- Sorry.
You fucking pig!
Don't go away.
You fucking pig!
- I wanna get out of here!
- Shut up!
I'm gonna tie your coat to this.
- Please, take it off.
- You take it off.
Okay.
I throw this end out and it will catch something, ok?
Hang on to this end so it won't won't fly off.
Fucking motherfucker!
Motherfucking shit!
- Okay.
Hold it tight!
- Okay.
Okay.
Shit!
Nadja, we are only short a little bit now.
Please!
Hi, my name's George Cinders.
And I'm the president of Palisade Defence.
We're hitting a home run for freedom.
And a time-out for terror.
We work hard to bring you up-to-the-minute technology.
Memo:
Must congrat George on terrific performance.
Oh, no, delete "terrific." Make that "fabulous" performance.
For 75 years, we've been supplying the world's greatest nations with the world's latest weaponry.
So when you see this symbol you know you're in safe hands.
We have offices in New York, London, Tokyo, all over the world.
Poor girls.
- Go on, yeah, yeah.
- What are you doing?
Ordering myself a little birthday present.
All right, team.
Can we have a little less talking, please?
Am I the only one who cares about our marketing strategy?
I care.
Or what about our CRM- 114 landmine?
The platoon buster.
- What?
- Ordnance Magazine calls it:
"The most exciting development in concealed termination in years."
Weapons you can trust.
Anti-personnel devices you can rely on.
That's trust.
That's reliability.
That's Palisade.
As I speak our team of dedicated individuals are touring Eastern Europe bringing the Palisade message to you.
And they couldn't be more excited.
Richard, why are all the actors in this video white?
They are not all white.
Blond actually.
It's just a coincidence, that's all.
So if they were black, that would be a coincidence too, would it?
What is your problem exactly?
You've made a recruitment video for the Hitler Youth.
Richard.
Richard.
Oh, there.
There you go.
See?
What's he?
An albino?
Here's the P-40 version 5.
Oh, yeah, okay, that's very sensitive.
It's not funny, Harris.
Freedom, democracy, justice.
Palisade Defence:
We'll win the war on terror.
I bloody hope not.
Thank you, Harris.
Something's wrong, it's a short circuit or something.
Smoking is prohibited!
- Fire officer, coming through.
- Gordon, sit down.
Officer sitting.
- No smoking.
No smoking.
- Yes, yes, I know.
Throw it out!
Hey, Billy.
What's the plan?
George should be at the lodge waiting for us, with the food.
Good.
Good.
And the paintball gear?
- It's all in the brown bag.
- Okay.
I'll give you $50 if you stop eating.
I bought some mushrooms off the security guard,
Gave him 20 euros.
Look how much he's given me.
Look.
They look horrible.
Yeah, that's because they're magic mushrooms.
How do you know he didn't pick them off the side of the road and sell them to you?
No, they're proper.
You can tell by the stalks, look.
You eat those, you're gonna go crazy.
I've had these ones before.
You know, they give you a really nice, like, chilled-out high.
And if you're wrong?
Then I'll be somewhere over the rainbow getting fucked by the Tin Man.
- What the fuck's going on?
- Everybody all right?
You all right?
- You all right, Jill?
- Yeah.
- The road's blocked.
- Anybody need first aid?
I might do in 20 minutes.
We can go this way.
No.
I heard so much bad about this route that I'm not going in there.
No, I'm not going in there, no way!
But I don't understand what you're saying.
The road is fine.
Don't you understand what I'm saying?
You don't understand what I'm saying?
This is my last word:
No!
The two roads meet up again.
You see?
Look.
You are a total wacko!
Which part of "no" don't you understand?
I'm telling you for the last time, you faggot, I won't go in there!
Why do I have to be shouting all day?
Try to understand that I'm not going on that route, because I'm not!
It's just a detour!
Fucking hell, enough is enough.
It's very dangerous, and I'm not driving there, whatever happens.
There is absolutely no way that I'm going in there.
Go on, Rich.
All right.
That's quite enough.
I won't stand for this unprofessional behavior.
You hear me?
Now, you're hired to drive.
And drive you will, buddy.
Is that clear?
Great management skills, Dick.
Really, really world-class.
I know it doesn't appear far on the map but it all depends on the scale.
Well, what is the scale?
It's not on here.
Well, an inch is usually a mile, isn't it?
No.
Well, we'll assume that it is.
Well, we can assume, but it's probably safer not to.
Every map I've ever seen, an inch is a mile.
You saying I don't know how to read maps?
No, no.
I'm sure you have an excellent knowledge of maps.
It's just that, well, an inch could be two miles or ten.
I'm just saying goodbye.
- I'm going back to the hotel.
- You're doing no such thing.
Then show me the lodge.
- The lodge is...
Is a mile down that road.
- No, no, no, hang on a minute.
You're not listening to me.
I'm not walking anywhere.
Hey, hey, come on, don't squabble, gang.
It's supposed to be a team-building weekend.
Maybe you can tell Richard because he seems to think we're on a walking holiday.
Wait a minute.
Stop the coach.
Stop.
Stop the bus.
Fucking hell.
Stop that.
Come on, now.
Fuck it.
What was that?
Sorry.
Probably just a bear.
- Just a bear?
- There are no bears in Hungary.
- Are you sure?
- Yes.
Well, that's assuming we're still in Hungary.
If we cross the border into Romania, then there are bears.
If we're in Serbia then I'm not sure.
Well, that's really interesting, Richard.
Are bears required to stop at borders?
I mean, is there some sort of passport control for bears?
Better watch your tone, young man.
- Or what?
- Oh, please.
No.
Or what?
- That sounded further away.
- There.
If it was a bear, which it wasn't it's moved on.
Come on.
Richard, I really think we should stick to the main road.
No, no.
This way's much quicker.
- Come on.
- I'm with Richard.
Have I pissed myself?
What?
I feel damp.
Well, you look all right.
I'm not gonna touch you.
- Have I pissed my pants?
- I'm just saying I don't think so.
- What's wrong with you?
- I feel all damp.
You're fine.
You're fine.
Okay, so working on the assumption that an inch is not a mile what's the worst-case scenario?
An inch is a thousand miles?
That's Steve.
If he's messing around then he's in big trouble.
Oh, no.
We should stay with the bags.
Steve, you're all right, mate?
Jesus.
Steve?
I saw someone.
Who?
I don't know.
What happened?
The weirdest thing's just happened.
Hear?
I needed to have a slash, so I pulled me trousers down you know, I felt a little bit damp and I didn't wanna get a rash.
I was about to have a piss and I saw a geezer with a balaclava and a suitcase.
No, more of a travel bag.
- So you've come over...
- Steve.
- Yes?
- The mushrooms.
- What mushrooms?
- You ate them.
You're high.
- Look after him, okay?
- Yeah, sure.
Listen...
Now, I know we're mates but if you look at my cock one more time, I'm gonna kick off.
What are you talking about?
I have not once looked at your winkie.
You turn around.
Okay, everybody.
Prepare to smile.
- Isn't it wonderful?
- It's a dump.
- What do you expect, the Hilton?
- The Hilton would be good.
We're in the country.
- You're not gonna stay here, are you?
- Right now, I'd sleep in a cave.
That's the spirit.
Someone in the woods.
Yeah, you already said that.
Come on.
Come on.
- This isn't the right place.
- This is the right place.
This obviously is not the right place.
It is the right place.
Billy.
Well, there's only one lodge on the map, so I suppose...
Thank you.
This is just the lobby.
This place is fantastic.
Steve, it's just a rope.
It's just a rope.
"Dear team:
As a big thank-you for the last few weeks on the road George and I cordially invite you to join us on a team-building weekend in Palisade's newly-acquired luxury lodge."
"Luxury lodge."
Okay, okay, okay.
Now listen up, everyone.
This is not a holiday.
This is a business.
And team-building weekends like it or not, are part of that business.
- Hear, hear.
This is our chance to find out about ourselves.
Oh, yeah.
Sure, we'll have fun paintball, orienteering...
- Bridge-building.
- Bridge-building.
We need to take ownership of the weekend.
And that means working together.
- Richard, I have an idea...
- Now...
Shh!
I can't spell "success" without "U."
And you.
You.
You.
And you.
"Success" has only one U.
Oh, well.
Daddy couldn't put us all through Cambridge, could he, Harris?
Now, George wants us to be the best team possible.
And if that means digging in a little, then I'm sorry.
You think this place is a dump?
Well, think about this.
Maybe it's supposed to be.
I've had tougher challenges.
Now, let's make this our challenge.
Explain to me how staying in this shithole is gonna help me sell landmines.
Oi.
Look, all I'm asking is don't be so happy all the time.
- I'm only trying to be positive.
- No, you're not.
You're like a dog tied to a radiator, wagging its tail.
That's not a compliment.
Look for the generator in there, will you?
You got any light bulbs in your bag, Gordon?
Yeah.
Give me two secs.
Hello?
Hello?
Oh, no.
You should go and get some sleep.
I think you're right.
Maggie?
I've been waiting for you, Richard.
I want you to fuck me.
Really?
I mean, I'd like to.
Fuck me now, and fuck me hard.
Okay.
But what's going on?
Maggie?
Great management skills, Dick.
World-class.
I can't believe it.
I had no idea Palisade were this involved in Eastern Europe.
You're joking, right?
Where did you get this stuff?
Found it next to the generator.
There's stacks of it out there.
It's all Soviet.
That doesn't mean it's one of the asylums.
Well, it doesn't rule it out either, does it?
What asylums?
Right, you lot.
Do you wanna put those cards away, please, Jill?
Feast your eyes on this.
Mind yourselves, it is hot.
It actually smells quite nice.
- Not eating, Maggie?
- No, thanks.
Not hungry.
Okay, rest of you then, get stuck in, there is plenty to go around.
Do you wanna get some spoons out, please, Jill?
- You're all right, Steve?
Feeling okay?
- You know what, piss off.
- Are you still tripping?
- No.
Why are you naked?
Harris, you were saying about the asylums.
What asylums?
Harris seems to think we're staying in an old lunatic asylum.
- Are we?
- No.
Go on, tell us about the asylums.
Are you sure you want me to?
Because, you know, it's pretty scary, mate.
I'll take my chances.
Okay, okay.
This story takes place a long time ago, way back before the first World War.
Oh, please.
When movies were silent and women were even quieter.
The government had been getting these strange complaints about the asylum.
So the sent an inspector around to check it out.
He arrives late one night to see what's going on.
Everything seems fine when the wardens agree to show him around.
But everything isn't fine.
Everything's not fine at all.
All the inmates are going crazy, screaming at him to let them out.
Then he realizes what's wrong.
The inmates have taken over and locked up all the doctors.
And then they turn on him.
He tried to reason with them but there's no reasoning with the mentally insane.
Guess who they called to sort out the mess?
Us.
Palisade sent the boys in spread the place with nerve agent, killed everyone.
It was a massacre.
But rumor has it one inmate survived.
Hell-bent on killing any Palisade employee that should cross his path.
They say he's still on the loose.
- So that's supposed to be scary?
- Well, it was at the time.
Believe it or not, there is a tiny bit of truth in his story.
- Damn right there is.
- A tiny bit.
It actually occurred in the early '90s when the Soviet Union broke up.
Places like this were detention centers for war criminals.
Soldiers who liked the killing a little bit too much.
They were lunatics.
They wiped out whole villages burnt people alive, put heads on spikes.
They were savages.
Well-trained savages.
Their government locked them away, tried to cure them, but it was no good.
Some escaped hid in some empty buildings nearby, but not for long.
Obviously, it wasn't Palisade who killed them.
It was their government.
But it was us who supplied the weapons.
Oh, and Harris if anyone did survive revenge would be the last thing on their minds.
What would be on their minds?
Survival.
Evading capture.
These guys were war criminals, remember?
- Yeah.
- Well, excuse me for being the only sensible one here, but this place is a lodge.
Okay?
It's not a mental home, it's not a prison, it's a lodge.
It was a sex lodge.
- Right.
- It was.
I'm telling you.
You see, back in the '60s these places were hospitals for rich old men.
And all the nurses were these naughty looking birds with great big shooters.
Anyway, being stuck all the way out here, they used to get really lonely.
So they tried it on with the old boys.
These poor old fuckers, they was on death's door.
They couldn't get it up.
So they decided to just get hold of each other.
One day this fellow turns up out of the blue.
Young geezer, bit of bollocks about him.
They chased him.
They caught him and well, he was fucked.
Have you ever taken anything seriously in your life?
Ecstasy and weed, I think.
Yeah.
- Hey, gang.
How are we all doing?
- Brilliant.
Sweet dreams?
Yeah.
Harris.
- Hi, Maggie.
- Hi.
Not eating?
Why are you all so obsessed with what I eat?
I am not too skinny.
No, no, no.
I don't mean...
Just that you'll need your energy for the team games, you know.
I mean, you're perfect just the way you are.
And, when I say perfect, I obviously don't mean that in a sexual way.
I mean perfect in a neutral way.
As if I were another woman saying that you were perfect.
You know?
Just one woman to another.
Not that I'm implying anything like that.
Or that there's anything wrong with that sort of thing.
Or anything...
Keep digging, we can still see you.
What the?
A bit young to be losing your teeth, aren't you?
It's not mine.
- It's not my tooth.
- Maybe it's just a clove.
Does it look like a fucking clove?
- I'm gonna puke.
- Could it be the cow's tooth?
A cow with gold fillings?
Who made the pie?
No, I didn't make it.
I found it.
You what?
- I found it.
- You found a pie?
It was wrapped in foil.
- Oh, well, that's a relief.
- Jesus.
You dirty bastard.
Okay, everyone calm down.
Come on, Jill.
Jill, come with me.
- I'm gonna be sick.
- No.
Okay, look, I'm sorry, everybody.
I thought it was a welcome gift.
- From who?
- I don't know.
George.
George wouldn't bring a pie.
- No.
- It could've been sitting here for months.
- Look at this place.
- I cooked it for the full hour.
- What, it had instructions on it?
- No, but it's a pie.
You don't cook every pie for an hour.
You don't think I undercooked it, do you?
Fucking hell.
Yeah.
Okay, fine.
Look, it's gone.
I'm throwing the pie in the bin.
It's gone.
All right.
That makes me feel better.
- Good night, sweetie.
- Good night.
Shit.
Hello.
Hello.
Hey, hey, hey.
- What's the matter?
What's going on?
- There was a man at my window.
- What happened?
- I saw someone.
- Where's...?
- What's going on?
Jill saw someone.
- Who?
- What did he look like?
He had a mask.
Nobody ate my mushrooms, did they?
Shut up.
Gordon, do you have anything to help calm her down?
I'll check my bag.
- Have you seen anything?
- No.
- What do you think?
- You're the boss, you think.
Perhaps you were dreaming.
I saw someone.
I wasn't dreaming, look at me.
His face was covered in a mask.
I was not dreaming.
I found some Calms.
They're herbal.
Come on, there's no one here.
Come on.
It was probably just some locals messing around.
Looking through a window one story up?
We need to get out of here.
Yeah, I'm leaving.
Fifty says I'm going with her.
- No one is going anywhere.
- What did you find?
There's some structures in the trees, but they're too far to reach the window.
- There, you see?
- Gang, this is what's gonna happen.
Tomorrow morning, we go to the top of the hill, see if we can get a signal.
Get somebody to pick us up, take us back to the hotel.
What, my son?
Great idea, Harris.
No, that is not a great idea.
Anyone who leaves won't have a job to come back to.
- I don't care.
Count me in.
- Yeah, I'm with her.
I'm sorry, but he's right.
Should I make some tea?
All right.
Listen.
Jill, I want you to sleep on it.
Then, in the morning, if you still feel the same way, well I'll come up with a plan.
I feel the same way.
Okay.
Listen up, everyone.
Billy.
Get over here.
Come on.
I've made a decision.
We're gonna sit tight.
We...
We sit tight, while...
Harris, I want you and Jill to go up the hill.
To go up the hill and see if you can get a phone signal.
Get the coach driver to come and pick us up.
- Oh, sweet.
I've made this decision purely because of the food situation.
And...
And it is conditional.
While they're gone, the rest of us will do a little team-building.
Yes.
Nice one.
Excuse me.
I just wanna make it really clear before we begin, that paintballing is about teamwork, all right?
So no Rambos.
I repeat, absolutely no Rambos.
Okay!
Hey, how is your project going?
Pretty good, thanks.
So what are these things?
They're humane landmines, right?
They're not landmines.
- They're mobilization units.
- Right.
And they do what?
They...
They sort of grab you, yeah?
They pin you to the floor.
They don't blow children's legs off.
- They're humane.
- They're a hard sell, that's what they are.
I'm sorry, I don't understand why in the 21st century we create such sick weapons.
The guillotine seems humane.
There's nothing humane about the guillotine.
Well, at least it's instantaneous.
There's nothing instantaneous about the guillotine.
When your head's chopped off, your brain can think for about 2 to 3 minutes.
What, you're saying that you're aware that your head is cut off?
I'm saying that when Marie-Antoinette had her head chopped off she felt it hit the basket.
She saw blood pumping out of her own stump.
That's not true.
It is a hundred percent biological fact.
Do you think he crashed?
I don't know.
Oh, my God.
We gotta get the others.
We can't just leave him here.
Can we?
I'm not saying that I fancy anyone in particular.
I'm just saying that if I did like someone I wouldn't know the best way to approach them.
- Dating is complicated in England.
- What are you talking about?
English birds ain't complicated.
You buy them a Bacardi Breezer and they'll ride you like Seabiscuit.
Yeah?
But what if she's not English?
What if she's French, or Spanish, or American?
Maggie.
Yeah.
So what do you think?
I don't wanna be unkind but I think you got more chance of getting shits out of a rocking horse.
Yeah, that's what I thought.
Come on, I got you.
Get up, you cheating bastard.
See, all this Maggie stuff it's because your bird left you.
It's because your plums are backing up.
It's driving you nuts.
It's confusing you making you think you love her.
You're right.
Anyway, I think she likes you.
- What are you talking about?
- Go, go, go.
Hey, sexy.
We won.
You're dead.
Oh, the bullet missed my vital organs.
I survived, it's a miracle.
- Here we go.
- Safeties off.
- Here comes the ref.
- Right.
Oh, you really got into that.
Brilliant.
I think we bent a few rules here and there.
Steve shot Richard and he didn't die.
- No one shot me.
- We shot someone and it wasn't Maggie.
All right, well, I think that someone, and I'm not pointing any fingers has been wiping off paint.
And it does clearly state in the rules...
- This is total war, there are no rules.
- Right, well, it do...
Stop.
Stop.
Stop it.
Stop!
That is really dangerous.
If you got one of those in your eye, it could pop like a Ping-Pong ball.
It's not funny.
That hurts.
I expect more from some of you.
Gordon, you gotta be still.
Steve, get on the other side.
Quick.
Be still.
- Get it off!
- You have to stop moving.
Pull out.
Pull your leg out.
Now, pull it now.
- Pull your leg out now.
- Stop!
You gotta fucking move it.
- Now!
- Pull your leg out.
- Steve, you fucking idiot.
- All right, for fuck's sake.
We'll get you out.
Pull it out, pull it out.
Pull it.
God!
- Okay, Gordon.
- Shit.
Okay.
Okay.
Okay, we gotta stop the bleeding.
Billy, give me your belt.
You're gonna be okay.
You have to calm down for me, Gordon.
Calm down.
- We're gonna stop the bleeding.
- Yeah, yeah.
They're everywhere.
What the fuck's going on here?
Billy, hold his hand.
Will you help me?
What are you doing?
What are you doing?
Steve, help me out here.
Steve!
You're gonna be okay.
- Get on the coach...
- Stop!
- We gotta go right now.
- Don't move.
- What the fuck happened?
- They're bear traps.
They're everywhere.
Someone's trying to kill us.
Like they killed the driver.
Driver's dead?
All right, just get on the coach.
- Will somebody help us, please?
- What are we gonna do?
- He could be watching us right now.
- Jill, you're not helping.
- What are we gonna do with his leg?
- We need to keep it cold.
- There's a refrigerator in the coach.
- Great, thank you.
Oh, you're shitting me.
God!
All right, all right, for fuck's sake.
- Don't stop.
- It's going as fast as it can.
Steve, I need something to cover his leg.
Harris, slow down.
I think you're going too fast.
Someone give me something to cover his leg, for fuck's sake!
Gonna...?
Jill.
Oh, shit.
I think I've broke me arm.
Billy.
Jill?
We've gotta head back to the lodge.
We've gotta find Jill.
Jill!
Jill!
Keep your voice down.
Someone's killed Harris, you understand?
Who's to say he didn't kill Jill as well?
Now, we head back to the lodge, and we lock ourselves in till morning.
- And then we walk.
- Where?
- I don't know.
- Well, glad we got that solid.
Hey, unless you have a better idea, we go back to the lodge.
You little bitch!
You gonna die!
You gonna burn like a witch!
Just put him down.
We need to lock off that thing.
Lock everything.
This is bollocks.
This is fucking bollocks.
It's safer in here.
Listen to me, I'm not waiting here for him to turn up.
It's madness.
What do you suggest we do with Gordon?
- I'll carry him myself if I have to.
- Just keep your voices down.
What if the stories about this place were true?
- Well, mine wasn't.
- What stories?
There were asylums, someone escaped.
Someone who knows we're Palisade.
- Yeah, but how would they know that?
- Well, the bus.
It's not exactly subtle.
Those stories are nonsense.
Who told you?
Jill?
Harris?
Do you know how many conspiracies I hear regarding weapons companies?
- No, Richard.
How many?
- I'll tell you how many I believe.
None.
We're a public company.
Members of both our governments are on the board.
They're not going to do anything immoral.
Arguing is not gonna help us out, okay?
You said you wanted us to work as a team.
Well, now is the time to start.
Look, just help me get some wood.
We need to board ourselves in, all right?
- With what?
- I don't know.
Check Gordon's bag or something.
Well, he's not gonna have hammer and nails in there, is he?
Oh, for fuck's sake.
Good boy.
I've got some pills.
What kind of pills?
Ecstasy.
Great.
Have a party.
No, not for me.
For him.
What do you mean?
Well, we're not gonna get him up tap-dancing but, you know, it'll take the edge off for a while.
Okay.
Gordon.
Take one of these, yeah?
It'll sort you out.
I don't do drugs.
It's okay, sweetheart.
These are painkillers.
They're gonna make you feel better.
Just take one.
Here.
Here you go.
Here you go.
You're all right?
I'm sorry about earlier, flaring up and all that.
You were okay.
Listen, I wanna say something to you.
Sometimes I act like an idiot, you know.
I say things when I shouldn't.
And...
Shit, I've left Gordon's foot on the coach.
Sorry, mate.
I love you, Maggie.
- Of course you do.
- No, seriously.
No, I mean it.
I really mean it.
- It's just the drugs, Gordon.
- No, it's not the drugs.
I'm really...
I'm really, really...
I love you.
And I loved Jill.
I really...
I really, really, really loved Jill.
Steve, you got any downers?
- Not in my things.
- Maggie, Maggie, I told you, I love you.
- Where are you going?
- Toilet.
Can't you hold on?
No.
Don't worry, I'll be right back.
If we don't get him to a hospital, he's gonna die.
I think maybe we should leave him.
What are you saying?
I think our best chance for survival is if the four of us get to the main road.
Get help.
And I think it's Gordon's best shot as well.
I think you're right.
I think we should go.
Go where?
What's happened?
This door was locked.
Gordon?
- Gordon.
- Billy, be quiet.
Conspiracies?
We should go back upstairs.
Maggie.
Richard!
Richard.
Fuck.
Jesus.
Yeah.
Well, I'd hate to be accused of not killing him when I had the chance.
Well I think he'll be all right there.
Don't you fucking move!
Don't shoot!
We got a problem.
Yeah, no shit.
No, we got another problem.
That was our last bullet.
Put your fucking guns down.
Put your guns down or I'll blow your motherfucking balls off!
Come on, guys, let's get them!
Go left!
Follow me!
On your left!
On your left!
Somewhere here!
Let's go!
Let's go.
Stop.
Stop!
- What are you doing?
- Don't move.
The place is mined, the whole place is mined.
How do you know?
I'm standing on one.
CR-1 platoon buster.
One of ours.
- Oh, shit.
- Yeah.
Where's Billy?
Richard, they're coming.
All right, follow my footsteps.
Then jump to the trees.
Go.
Come on.
Hey!
Come on.
Come on!
Over here.
Come on!
Hi!
I got your dumb ass!
Freeze!
Freeze!
He won't go anywhere now.
He's already a dead man.
Oh, you're laughing at me?
You won't be fucking laughing when I take my foot off this.
There was no use running around from us, it's all over now.
Step away, Borya.
Eat it, bitch!
Hey, Maggie.
Steve.
Where the hell you been?
Are you Mr. Steve?
We are Nadia and Olga from the escort agency.
No, no, there are mines.
Let's walk on the logs.
On the trunks.
Come on, guys, follow me!
Yeah, yeah.
Come on, everybody.
Why not be my fucking guests?
Is this where we are?
- What are...?
- Have you been to the lake?
- Yes.
- Are there boats there?
- Yes.
- Okay, leave your shit and follow us.
Ready?
Yeah.
Would someone please tell me what the fuck is going on?
George.
There are about five seriously sick fuckers coming our way to kill us.
So you can either help us or fuck off.
When you say "sick fuckers," what do you mean here?
Terrorists?
Call them what you want.
- Come on, let's go.
- Hold it.
No one's going anywhere.
I've been waiting to demonstrate this for a while.
You stamp "terrorist" on it, and I'll kill it.
- Wait till they get a load of this.
- Sweet.
Those the little bastards?
All right.
Get back.
Steve.
Steve!
Steve!
Where are you?
Steve!
- Maggie?
- I'm in some kind of trap.
Steve, he's coming!
Oh, my God.
No!
God!
Steve!
God!
No!
Please.
Please.
Get off of me!
Get off...
No!
Fucking...
Steve!
This is gonna hurt.
Steve!
Steve!
Steve!
Hello?
Hello.
Do you speak English?
- English?
- Yes, English.
I need you to send help.
I need help.
Yes, please hold.
Come on, then, you fuck!
You...!
Foursome?
Mr George, help us.
- Help us.
- I'm sorry.
- You fucking pig!
Fuck!
Nadia.
# Over bridge of sighs
# To rest my eyes in shades of green
# Under dreaming spires
# To ltchycoo Park that's where I've been
- # What did you do there?
- # I got high
- # What did you feel there?
- # Well, I cried
- # But why the tears there?
- # Tell you why
# It's all too beautiful
# It's all too beautiful
# It's all too beautiful
# It's all too beautiful
Hi.
My name's George Cinders and I'm the President of Palisade Defence.
We're hitting a home run for freedom and a time out for terror.
We work hard to bring you up-to-the-minute technology.
Memo. "Must congrat George on terrific performance."
Er, no, delete "terrific", make that "fabulous performance".
For 75 years we've been supplying the world's greatest nations with the world's latest weaponry.
So when you see this symbol, you know you're in safe hands.
We have offices in New York, London, Tokyo, all over the world.
Oh!
Whoo-hoo!
Jesus!
Go on, girl.
Go on.
Yep.
Yep.
- What are you doing?
- Ordering myself a birthday present.
Alright, team, can we have a little less talking, please?
Does nobody care about our marketing strategy?
I care.
Or what about our CRM- 114 landmine, the Platoon Buster?
"What Ordinance?" magazine calls it "The most exciting development in concealed termination in years."
Weapons you can trust.
Anti-personnel devices you can rely on.
That's trust.
That's reliability.
That's Palisade.
As I speak, our team of dedicated individuals are touring Eastern Europe, bringing the Palisade message to you.
- They couldn't be more excited.
- Richard, why are all the actors in this video white?
- They're not all white.
- Blonde, actually.
It's just a coincidence, that's all.
If they were all black, that would be a coincidence, too?
Look...
Look, what is your problem exactly?
You've made a recruitment video for the Hitler Youth.
Ha!
- Richard, Richard.
- Oh, there!
There you go, you see?
What's he, an albino?
Here's the P40 version five.
Oh, yeah, OK, that's very sensitive.
- It's not funny, Harris.
Freedom, democracy, justice.
With Palisade Defence, we'll win the war on terror.
- I bloody hope not.
- Thank you, Harris.
# What will we do there?
# We'll get high
- # What will we touch there?
- # We'll touch the sky
- # But why the tears there?
- # I'll tell you why
# It's all too beautiful
# It's all too beautiful
# It's all too beautiful
Something's wrong with the electrics in there.
There's a short circuit.
- Fire officer, coming through.
- Sit down.
Officer sitting.
- No smoking!
- Yes, I know.
No cigarettes!
Bob Marley!
Bob Marley!
Billy, what's the plan?
George should be at the lodge with the food.
- Good.
And the paintball gear?
- All in the brown bag.
- OK, good.
I'll give you $50 if you stop eating.
I bought some mushrooms off a security guard at the road show.
I gave him 20 euros and look how much he's given me.
Look.
- They look horrible.
- That's cos they're magic mushrooms.
How do you know they're not off the side of the road?
No, they're proper.
You can tell by the stalks.
Look.
- Eat those, you're gonna go crazy.
- I think I've had these ones before.
They give you a nice chilled-out one.
And if you're wrong?
I'll be somewhere over the rainbow getting fucked by the Tin Man.
- Hey, what the fuck's going on?
- You alright?
- You alright, Jill?
- Yeah.
- The road's blocked.
- Anybody need first aid?
I might do in 20 minutes.
We can go this way.
I don't understand what you're saying.
The road is fine.
Yeah, well, the two roads meet up again.
Look.
It's just a detour!
Go on, Richard.
Alright, that's quite enough.
I won't stand for this unprofessional behaviour.
You hear me?
Now, you are hired to drive, and drive you will, buddy.
Is that clear?
Great management skills, Dick.
Really, really world class.
I know it doesn't appear far on the map, but it all depends on the scale.
- Well, what is the scale?
- It's not on here.
Well, an inch is usually a mile, isn't it?
- No.
- Well, we'll assume that it is.
Well, we can assume, but it's probably safer not to.
Every map I've seen, an inch is a mile.
Are you saying I can't read maps?
No.
I'm sure you have an excellent knowledge of maps.
It's just that, well, an inch could be two miles or ten.
I'm saying goodbye.
I'm going back to the hotel.
- You're doing no such thing.
- Then show me the lodge.
The lodge is a mile down that road.
Hang on.
You're not listening to me.
I am not walking anywhere.
Don't squabble, gang.
It's supposed to be a team-building weekend.
Tell Richard.
He seems to think we're on a walking holiday.
Whoa.
Wait a sec.
Stop the coach!
Stop.
Hey, come on, let's talk about this.
Stop the bus.
Fucking hell!
Stop the...
Come on!
Fuck it!
What was that?
Sorry.
Probably just a bear.
- Just a bear?
- There are no bears in Hungary.
- Are you sure?
- Yes.
Well, that's assuming we're still in Hungary.
If we've crossed the border into Romania, then there are bears.
If we're in Serbia, then I'm not sure.
Well, that's really interesting.
Are bears required to stop at borders?
Is there some sort of passport control for bears?
- You'd better watch your tone.
- Or what?
- Oh, please!
- No.
Or what?
- That sounded further away.
- There.
If it was a bear, which it wasn't, it's moved on.
Come on.
I really think we should stick to the main road.
No, this way is much quicker.
Come on.
I'm with Richard.
Have I pissed myself?
- What?
- I feel damp.
Well, you look alright.
I'm not gonna touch you.
- Have I pissed my pants?
- I don't think so.
- What's wrong with you?
- I feel all damp.
You're fine.
You're fine.
OK, so, er, working on the assumption that an inch is not a mile, what's the worst-case scenario?
- An inch is a thousand miles.
That's Steve.
If he's messing around, he's in big trouble.
Oh, no.
We should stay with the bags.
Steve, are you alright, mate?
Jesus.
Steve?
I saw someone.
Who?
I don't know.
What happened?
The weirdest thing's just happened, yeah?
I needed a slash, so I've pulled me trousers down, cos I felt a little bit damp and I didn't want to get a rash.
I was about to have a piss and I saw a geezer with a balaclava and a suitcase.
No, more of a travel bag.
- So, you've come over...
- Steve.
- Yes?
- The mushrooms.
- What mushrooms?
- You ate them.
You're high.
- Look after him.
- OK, yeah.
Listen.
Now, I know we're mates, but, erm, if you look at my cock one more time, I'm gonna kick off.
What are you talking about?
I have not once looked at your winkie.
You turn around.
OK, everybody, prepare to smile.
- Isn't it wonderful?
- It's a dump.
- What do you expect, the Hilton?
- The Hilton would be good.
- We're in the country.
- You're not gonna stay here?
- Right now, I'd sleep in a cave.
- That's the spirit.
There's someone in the woods.
Yeah, you already said that.
Come on.
Come on.
- This isn't the right place.
- This is the right place.
This obviously is not the right place.
It is the right place.
Billy?
Well, there's only one lodge on the map,
- so I suppose...
- Thank you.
This is... just the lobby.
This place is fantastic.
Steve.
It's just a rope.
It's just a rope.
"Dear team, as a big thank you for the last few weeks on the road,
George and I cordially invite you to join us on a team-building weekend in Palisade's newly acquired luxury lodge."
Luxury lodge.
OK, OK, OK, now listen up, everyone.
This is not a holiday.
This is a business.
And team-building weekends, like it or not, are part of that business.
Hear hear!
This is our chance to find out about ourselves.
I mean, you know, sure, we'll have fun, doing, er, paintball, orienteering...
- Bridge building.
- Bridge building.
We need to take ownership of the weekend.
And that means working together.
- Richard, I have an idea.
- Shh, shh.
I can't spell success... without U.
And U...
And U...
U...
And...
U.
Success has only one U.
Oh, well.
Daddy couldn't put us all through Cambridge, could he, Harris?
Now, George wants us to be the best team possible.
And if that means digging in a little, then I'm sorry.
Think this place is a dump?
Think about this.
Maybe it's supposed to be.
I've had tougher challenges.
Now let's make this our challenge.
Explain to me how staying in this shithole is gonna help me sell mines.
Alright?
- Don't be so happy all the time.
- Only trying to be positive.
You're not.
You're like a dog tied to a radiator wagging its tail.
That's not a compliment.
Look for the generator in there, will you?
Have you got any light bulbs in your bag, Gordon?
Erm, yeah.
Give me two secs.
Hello?
Hello?
Oh, no.
- I think you should get some sleep.
- I think you're right.
Maggie?
I've been waiting for you, Richard.
I want you to fuck me.
Really?
I mean, I'd like to.
Fuck me now and fuck me hard.
OK.
But, erm... what's going on?
Maggie?
Great management skills, Dick.
World class.
I can't believe it.
I had no idea Palisade were this involved in Eastern Europe.
You're joking, right?
- Where did you get this stuff?
- Found it next to the generator.
There's stacks of it out there.
It's all Soviet.
That doesn't mean it's one of the asylums.
- It doesn't rule it out either.
- What asylums?
Right, grub's up.
Put those cards away, please, Jill.
Feast your eyes... on this.
Mind yourselves, it is hot.
It actually smells quite nice.
- Not eating?
- No, thanks.
Not hungry.
The rest of you, get stuck in.
There's plenty.
Do you want to get some spoons out, please, Jill?
- Alright?
Feeling OK?
- Yeah, alright, piss off.
- Are you still tripping?
- No.
Why are you naked?
- Harris, what about the asylums?
- What asylums?
Harris seems to think we're in an old lunatic asylum.
- Are we?
- No.
Tell us about the asylums.
Are you sure you want me to tell you?
It's pretty scary.
- I'll take my chances.
- OK.
OK.
This story takes place a long time ago, way before the First World War.
Oh, please.
When movies were silent and women were even quieter.
The government was getting complaints about the asylum, so they sent an inspector to check it out.
He arrives late one night to see what's going on.
Everything seems fine, and the warders agree to show him around.
But everything isn't fine.
Everything's not fine at all.
All the inmates are going crazy, screaming at him to let them out.
Then he realises what's wrong.
The inmates had taken over and locked up all the doctors.
And then they turned on him.
He tried to reason with them, but there's no reasoning with the mentally insane.
Guess who they called to sort out the mess?
Us.
Palisade sent the boys in.
Sprayed the place with nerve agent.
Killed everyone.
It was a massacre.
But rumour has it...
that one inmate survived, hell-bent on killing any Palisade employee that should cross his path.
They say he's still on the loose.
- Is that supposed to be scary?
- Well, it was at the time.
Believe it or not, there is a tiny bit of truth in his story.
- Damn right!
- A tiny bit.
It occurred in the early '90s when the Soviet Union broke up.
Places like this were detention centres for war criminals.
Soldiers who liked the killing a little bit too much.
They were lunatics who wiped out whole villages.
Burnt people alive.
Put heads on spikes.
They were savages.
Well-trained savages.
Their government locked them away, tried to cure them, but it was no good.
Some escaped.
Hid in some empty buildings nearby, but not for long.
Obviously it wasn't Palisade who killed them, it was their government.
But it was us who supplied the weapons.
Oh, and, Harris, if anyone did survive, revenge would be the last thing on their minds.
- What would be on their minds?
- Survival.
Evading capture.
These guys were war criminals, remember.
Excuse me for being the only sensible one here, but this place is a lodge.
It's not a mental home, it's not a prison, it's a lodge.
- It was a sex lodge.
- Right.
- It was.
I'm telling you.
Back in the '60s, these places were hospitals for rich old men.
All the nurses were these naughty- looking birds with big shooters.
Anyway, being stuck all the way out here, they used to get really lonely, so they tried it on with the old boys.
These poor old fuckers was on death's door.
They couldn't get it up.
So they decided to just get hold of each other.
One day this fella turns up out of the blue.
Young geezer.
Bit of bollocks about him.
They chased him.
They caught him and, er, well, he was fucked.
Have you ever taken anything seriously in your life?
- Ecstasy and weed, I think.
- Hey, gang.
How are we doing?
- Brilliant.
Sweet dreams?
Er... yeah.
Harris.
Hi, Maggie.
Not eating?
Why are you all so obsessed with what I eat?
I am not too skinny.
No, no, no, no.
I don't mean...
Just that you'll need your energy for the team games.
I mean, you're perfect just the way you are.
And when I say perfect, I obviously don't mean that in a sexual way.
I mean perfect in a neutral way.
As if I were another woman saying that you were perfect, you know?
Just one woman to another.
Not that I'm implying anything like that.
Or that there's anything wrong with that... sort of thing.
Or... anything.
Keep digging, we can still see you.
What the?
A bit young to be losing your teeth, aren't you?
It's not mine.
- It's not my tooth.
- Maybe it's just a clove.
Does it look like a fucking clove?
I'm gonna puke.
- Could it be the cow's tooth?
- A cow with gold fillings?
Who made the pie?
I didn't make it, I found it.
- You what?
- I found it.
You found a pie?
- It was wrapped in foil.
- Oh, well, that's a relief.
Jesus!
You dirty bastard.
- OK, everyone, calm down.
- Come on, Jill.
Jill, come with me.
Ohh!
I'm gonna be sick.
OK, I'm sorry.
I thought it was a welcome gift.
- From who?
- I don't know.
George.
George wouldn't bring a pie.
It could have been sitting here for months.
Look at this place.
I cooked it for the full hour!
- It had instructions on it?
- No, but it's a pie.
You don't cook every pie for an hour.
- Do you think I undercooked it?
- Fucking hell!
Yeah, OK.
Look, it's gone.
I'm throwing the pie in the bin.
Oh, right, that makes me feel better.
- Night, sweetie.
- Good night.
- Oh!
Shit!
Hello.
Hello!
Hey, hey, hey, hey.
What's the matter?
What's going on?
There was a man at my window.
- What happened?
- I saw someone.
Where's my inhaler?
- What's going on?
- Jill saw someone.
- Who?
- What did he look like?
- He had a mask.
- Have you been at my mushrooms?
- Is there anything to calm her down?
- I'll check my bag.
- Did you see anyone?
- No.
- What do you think?
- You're the boss, you think.
- Perhaps you were dreaming.
- I wasn't dreaming.
Look at me!
His face was covered in a mask!
I was not dreaming!
I found some Kalms.
They're herbal.
Come on.
There's no one here.
Come on!
It was probably just some locals messing around.
Looking through a window one storey up?
We need to get out of here.
- Yeah, I'm leaving.
- I'm going with her.
- No one is going anywhere.
- What did you find?
There are wooden structures, but they're not near the window.
- There.
See?
- This is what's gonna happen.
Tomorrow, we go to the top of the hill, try and get a signal.
Get somebody to pick us up, take us back.
- Go on, my son.
- Great idea.
That is not a great idea.
Leave, and you won't have a job to come back to.
- I don't care.
Count me in.
- Yeah, I'm with her.
- I'm sorry, but he's right.
- Should I make some tea?
Er, alright, listen.
Jill, I want you to sleep on it.
Then, in the morning, if you still feel the same way, well, then I'll come up with a plan.
I feel the same way.
OK, er, listen up, everyone.
Er, Billy, get over here.
Come on.
Er, I've made a decision.
We're going to sit tight.
We...
We sit tight while, Harris, I want you and Jill to go up the hill to go up the hill and, erm, see if you can get a phone signal.
Erm, get the coach driver to come and pick us up.
Oh, sweet.
I've made this decision purely because of the, er, food situation.
And...
And it is conditional.
While they're gone, the rest of us will do a little team building.
Yes!
Nice one.
Excuse me.
Hiya.
I just want to make it really clear, before we begin, that paintballing is about teamwork, right?
So no Rambos.
I repeat, absolutely no Rambos.
OK!
- Hey, how's your project going?
- Pretty good, thanks.
What are these things?
Humane landmines, right?
They're not landmines.
They're immobilisation units.
Right.
And they do what, they sort of grab you, yeah?
They pin you to the floor.
They don't blow children's legs off.
- They're humane.
- They're a hard sell.
I don't understand why, in the 21 st century, we create such sick weapons.
The guillotine seems humane.
- There's nothing humane about it.
- At least it's instantaneous.
There's nothing instantaneous about it.
When your head's chopped off, your brain can think for three minutes.
You're saying you're aware that your head's cut off?
When Marie Antoinette had her head chopped off she felt it hit the basket.
She saw blood pumping out of her own stump.
- That's not true.
- It is 100 percent biological fact.
- Think he crashed?
- I don't know.
- Oh, my God!
- We've got to get the others.
We can't just leave him here!
Can we?
I'm not saying that I fancy anyone in particular.
But if I did like someone, I wouldn't know the best way to approach them.
- Dating's complicated in England.
- English birds ain't complicated.
Buy 'em a Bacardi Breezer and they'll ride you like Sea Biscuit.
Yeah?
But what if she's not English?
What if she's, erm...
French or Spanish or, erm American?
- Maggie?
- Yeah.
So what do you think?
I think you've got more chance of getting shit out of a rocking horse.
- Yeah, that's what I thought.
Come on, I got you!
Get up, you cheating bastard.
See, all this Maggie stuff, it's cos your bird left you.
It's cos your plums are backing up.
It's driving you nuts.
It's confusing you, making you think you love her.
You're right.
Anyway, I think she likes you.
- What're you talking about?
- Go, go, go!
Hiya, sexy.
We won.
You're dead.
The bullet missed my vital organs.
I survived.
It's a miracle.
- Here we go.
- Safeties off.
Here comes the ref.
Right.
Oh, you really got into that.
It was brilliant.
We bent a few rules here and there.
Steve shot Richard and he didn't die.
- No one shot me.
- We shot someone.
Well, I think someone, and I'm not pointing any fingers, has been wiping off paint.
And it does clearly state in the rules...
This is total war.
There are no rules.
Ow!
Stop!
Stop!
Stop it!
Stop!
That is really dangerous!
Get one of those in your eye, it could pop like a ping-pong ball.
It's not funny.
That hurts.
I expect more from some of you.
Gordon, you've got to be still.
Steve, get on the other side.
Quick!
- Be still.
- Get it off!
- You have to stop moving.
Pull your leg out.
- Now!
Pull it now!
- Pull your leg out now!
Now!
- You fucking idiot!
- Alright, for fuck's sake!
We'll get you out.
Pull it out!
Pull it out now!
Pull it!
- God!
OK, Gordon...
Shit!
We gotta stop the bleeding.
Billy, give me your belt.
You're gonna be OK.
You have to calm down, Gordon!
Calm down!
We're gonna stop the bleeding.
They're everywhere.
What the fuck's going on here?
Billy, hold his hand!
- Can you help me?
- What are you doing?
- Richard, help me hold him!
Steve!
We're gonna be OK.
- Alright, people, get on the coach.
- Stop!
Don't move!
- What the fuck happened?
- Bear traps everywhere.
Someone killed the driver.
- The driver's dead?
- Just get on the coach.
- Somebody help us, please!
- What are we gonna do?
- He could be watching us.
- You're not helping!
- What do we do with his leg?
- We need to keep it cold.
- There's a fridge on the coach.
- That's great, thank you.
Oh, you're shitting me!
Ohh!
Come on!
- Come on!
- Alright!
Alright!
For fuck's sake!
- Faster!
- It's going as fast as it can.
I need to cover his leg.
Harris, slow down.
I think you're going too fast.
Someone give me something to cover his leg, for fuck's sake!
Shit!
Jill?
Oh, shit!
I think I've broken my arm.
Billy.
Jill?
We've got to head back to the lodge.
We've got to find Jill.
Jill!
Jill!
Keep your voice down.
Someone's killed Harris.
Who's to say he didn't kill Jill as well?
Now, we head back to the lodge and we lock ourselves in till morning and then we walk.
Where?
- I don't know.
- I'm glad we got that sorted!
Hey!
Unless you have a better idea, we go back to the lodge.
Palisade.
Let's put him down.
We need to lock ourselves in.
Lock everything.
- This is bollocks.
Fucking bollocks.
- We're safer in here.
I'm not waiting for him to turn up.
It's fucking madness.
What do you suggest we do with Gordon?
- I'll carry him myself.
- Keep your voices down.
- What if the stories were true?
- Well, mine wasn't.
What stories?
They were asylums.
Someone escaped, who knows we're Palisade.
- How would they know that?
- The bus.
It's not exactly subtle.
Those stories are nonsense.
Who told you?
Jill?
Harris?
Know how many conspiracies I hear regarding weapons companies?
- No, how many?
- I'll tell you how many I believe.
None.
We're a public company.
Members of both our governments are on the board.
They won't do anything immoral.
Arguing is not gonna help us out.
OK?
You said you wanted us to work as a team.
Well, now is the time to start.
Look, just help me get some wood.
We need to board ourselves in.
Alright?
- With what?
- I don't know.
Check Gordon's bag.
He's not gonna have a hammer and nails in there, is he?
Oh, for fuck's sake!
Good boy.
I've got some pills.
What kind of pills?
Ecstasy.
- Great.
Have a party.
- No, not for me, for him.
What do you mean?
They're not gonna get him up tap dancing, but it'll take the edge off for a while.
OK.
Gordon.
- Take one.
It'll sort you out.
- I don't do drugs.
It's OK, sweetheart, these are painkillers.
- They're gonna make you feel better.
- Just take one.
Here.
Here you go.
Here you go.
You alright?
I'm sorry about earlier.
Flaring up and all that.
You were OK.
Listen, I wanna say something to you.
Sometimes I act like an idiot, you know?
I say things when I shouldn't and, er...
Shit, I've left Gordon's foot on the the coach.
Sorry, mate.
I love you, Maggie.
- Of course you do.
- No, seriously.
I mean it.
I really mean it.
- It's just the drugs, Gordon.
- No, it's not the drugs.
I really, really, really love you.
And I loved Jill.
I really, really, really, really loved Jill.
- Steve, have you got any downers?
- Not my thing.
Maggie.
Maggie, have I told you that I love you?
- Where are you going?
- Toilet.
Can't you hold on?
No.
Don't worry, I'll be right back.
If we don't get him to a hospital, he's gonna die.
I think maybe... we should leave him.
What are you saying?
I think our best chance for survival is if the four of us get to the main road and get help.
And I think it's Gordon's best shot as well.
I think you're right.
I think we should go.
Go where?
- What's happened?
- This door was locked.
Gordon?
- Gordon?
- Billy, be quiet!
Conspiracies?
We should go back upstairs.
- Maggie?
Richard?
Richard?
- Fuck!
Jesus!
Ohh...
Yeah, well...
I'd hate to be accused of not killing him when I had the chance.
Well...
I think you'll be alright there.
Come, come.
- Don't you fucking move!
- We got a problem.
- Yeah, no shit!
No, we got another problem.
That was our last bullet.
Put your fucking guns down!
Put your guns down or I'll blow your motherfucking balls off!
Let's go.
Stop.
Stop!
- What are you doing?
- Don't move.
The place is mined.
- How do you know?
- I'm standing on one.
CRM Platoon Buster.
One of ours.
- Oh, shit.
- Yeah.
Where's Billy?
- Richard, they're coming.
Alright, follow my footsteps, then jump to the trees.
Go.
Come on.
Hey, come on!
Come on!
Over here!
Come on!
You're laughing at me?
You won't be fucking laughing when I take my foot off this.
# Yo, pretty ladies, around the world
# Got a weird thing to show you so tell all the boys and girls
# Tell your brother, your sister and your mama too
# Cos they're about to throw down and you'll know just what to do
# Wave your hands in the air like you don't care
# Glide by the people as they stop to look and stare
Hey!
Maggie, Steve.
Where the hell've you been?
Are you Mr Steve?
We are Nadia and Olga from the escort agency.
Yeah, come on, everybody.
Why not?
Be my fucking guest.
- Is this where we are?
- Whoa.
What are you doing?
- Have you been to the lake?
- Yes.
- Are there boats?
- Yes.
Leave your shit and follow us.
Ready?
- Yeah.
Would someone please tell me what the fuck is going on?
George, there are about five seriously sick fuckers coming our way to kill us.
So you can either help us or fuck off.
When you say sick fuckers, what do you mean?
Terrorists?
- Call 'em what you want.
- Come on.
Let's go.
Hold it.
No one's going anywhere.
I've been waiting to demonstrate this for a while.
You stamp "terrorist" on it, and I'll kill it.
- Wait till they get a load of this.
- Sweet!
Are those the little bastards?
- Alright, get back.
Steve?
Steve!
Steve!
- Where are you?
- Steve!
- Maggie?
- I'm in some kind of trap!
Steve, he's coming!
Oh, my God.
No!
No!
God!
Steve!
Steve!
No!
Please!
Please!
Get off of me!
Steve!
Steve!
This is gonna hurt.
Steve!
Steve!
Steve!
Hello.
Hello.
Do you speak English?
- English?
- Yes.
English.
I need you to send help.
- I need help.
- Yes.
Please hold.
Come on, then, you fuck!
Foursome?
# We'll meet again
# Don't know where
# Don't know when
# But I know we'll meet again
# Some sunny day
# Keep smiling through
# Just like you always do
# Till the blue skies light the dark clouds far away
# So will you please say hello
# To the folks that I know?
# Tell them I won't be long
# You'll be happy to know
# That as you saw me go
# I was singing this song
# We'll meet again
# Don't know where
# Don't know when
# But I know we'll meet again
# Some sunny day
We'll meet again.
Don't know where, don't know when.
But I know we'll meet again some sunny day.
Keep smiling through, just like you always do till the blue skies light the dark clouds far away.
# So will you please say hello
# To the folks that I know
# And tell them I won't be long?
# You'll be happy to know
# That as you saw me go
# I was singing this song
# We'll meet again
# Don't know where
# Don't know when
# But I know we'll meet again
# Some sunny day
# The sun is shining
# I can feel the good times coming on
# Oh, there's no point trying to fight it
# We've been running away for way too long
# So there's a storm on the horizon
# Feels like there's trouble on the way
# But if you take my hand
# And I'll take your hand
# Then there'll be no need for us to stray
# At least not today
# We're summertimin'
# I can feel the good times coming on
# Coming on
Oh, shit.
What happened?
What the fuck is this?
Damn.
This whole thing is too high.
Oh, Mr. George, help us.
Help us!
He doesn't understand what I'm saying.
Help us!
- Help us.
You fucking pig!
Don't go away.
You fucking pig!
- I wanna get out of here!
- Shut up!
I'm gonna tie your coat to this.
- Please, take it off.
- You take it off.
Okay.
I throw this end out and it will catch something, ok?
Hang on to this end so it won't won't fly off.
Fucking motherfucker!
Motherfucking shit!
- Okay.
Hold it tight!
- Okay.
Okay.
Shit!
Nadja, we are only short a little bit now.
Please!
No.
I heard so much bad about this route that I'm not going in there.
No, I'm not going in there, no way!
This is my last word:
No!
You are a total wacko!
Which part of "no" don't you understand?
I'm telling you for the last time, you faggot, I won't go in there!
Why do I have to be shouting all day?
Try to understand that I'm not going on that route, because I'm not!
Fucking hell, enough is enough.
It's very dangerous, and I'm not driving there, whatever happens.
There is absolutely no way that I'm going in there.
You little bitch!
You gonna die!
You gonna burn like a witch!
Don't shoot!
Come on, guys, let's get them!
Go left!
Follow me!
On your left!
On your left!
Somewhere here!
Let's go!
Hi!
I got your dumb ass!
Freeze!
Freeze!
He won't go anywhere now.
He's already a dead man.
There was no use running around from us, it's all over now.
Step away, Borya.
Eat it, bitch!
No, no, there are mines.
Let's walk on the logs.
On the trunks.
Come on, guys, follow me!
Oh, shit.
What happened?
What the fuck is this?
Damn.
This whole thing is too high.
Oh, Mr. George, help us.
Help us!
He doesn't understand what I'm saying.
Help us!
- Help us.
- Sorry.
You fucking pig!
Don't go away.
You fucking pig!
- I wanna get out of here!
- Shut up!
I'm gonna tie your coat to this.
- Please, take it off.
- You take it off.
Okay.
I throw this end out and it will catch something, ok?
Hang on to this end so it won't won't fly off.
Fucking motherfucker!
Motherfucking shit!
- Okay.
Hold it tight!
- Okay.
Okay.
Shit!
Nadja, we are only short a little bit now.
Please!
Hi, my name's George Cinders.
And I'm the president of Palisade Defence.
We're hitting a home run for freedom.
And a time-out for terror.
We work hard to bring you up-to-the-minute technology.
Memo:
Must congrat George on terrific performance.
Oh, no, delete "terrific." Make that "fabulous" performance.
For 75 years, we've been supplying the world's greatest nations with the world's latest weaponry.
So when you see this symbol you know you're in safe hands.
We have offices in New York, London, Tokyo, all over the world.
Poor girls.
- Go on, yeah, yeah.
- What are you doing?
Ordering myself a little birthday present.
All right, team.
Can we have a little less talking, please?
Am I the only one who cares about our marketing strategy?
I care.
Or what about our CRM- 114 landmine?
The platoon buster.
- What?
- Ordnance Magazine calls it:
"The most exciting development in concealed termination in years."
Weapons you can trust.
Anti-personnel devices you can rely on.
That's trust.
That's reliability.
That's Palisade.
As I speak our team of dedicated individuals are touring Eastern Europe bringing the Palisade message to you.
And they couldn't be more excited.
Richard, why are all the actors in this video white?
They are not all white.
Blond actually.
It's just a coincidence, that's all.
So if they were black, that would be a coincidence too, would it?
What is your problem exactly?
You've made a recruitment video for the Hitler Youth.
Richard.
Richard.
Oh, there.
There you go.
See?
What's he?
An albino?
Here's the P-40 version 5.
Oh, yeah, okay, that's very sensitive.
It's not funny, Harris.
Freedom, democracy, justice.
Palisade Defence:
We'll win the war on terror.
I bloody hope not.
Thank you, Harris.
Something's wrong, it's a short circuit or something.
Smoking is prohibited!
- Fire officer, coming through.
- Gordon, sit down.
Officer sitting.
- No smoking.
No smoking.
- Yes, yes, I know.
Throw it out!
Hey, Billy.
What's the plan?
George should be at the lodge waiting for us, with the food.
Good.
Good.
And the paintball gear?
- It's all in the brown bag.
- Okay.
I'll give you $50 if you stop eating.
I bought some mushrooms off the security guard,
Gave him 20 euros.
Look how much he's given me.
Look.
They look horrible.
Yeah, that's because they're magic mushrooms.
How do you know he didn't pick them off the side of the road and sell them to you?
No, they're proper.
You can tell by the stalks, look.
You eat those, you're gonna go crazy.
I've had these ones before.
You know, they give you a really nice, like, chilled-out high.
And if you're wrong?
Then I'll be somewhere over the rainbow getting fucked by the Tin Man.
- What the fuck's going on?
- Everybody all right?
You all right?
- You all right, Jill?
- Yeah.
- The road's blocked.
- Anybody need first aid?
I might do in 20 minutes.
We can go this way.
No.
I heard so much bad about this route that I'm not going in there.
No, I'm not going in there, no way!
But I don't understand what you're saying.
The road is fine.
Don't you understand what I'm saying?
You don't understand what I'm saying?
This is my last word:
No!
The two roads meet up again.
You see?
Look.
You are a total wacko!
Which part of "no" don't you understand?
I'm telling you for the last time, you faggot, I won't go in there!
Why do I have to be shouting all day?
Try to understand that I'm not going on that route, because I'm not!
It's just a detour!
Fucking hell, enough is enough.
It's very dangerous, and I'm not driving there, whatever happens.
There is absolutely no way that I'm going in there.
Go on, Rich.
All right.
That's quite enough.
I won't stand for this unprofessional behavior.
You hear me?
Now, you're hired to drive.
And drive you will, buddy.
Is that clear?
Great management skills, Dick.
Really, really world-class.
I know it doesn't appear far on the map but it all depends on the scale.
Well, what is the scale?
It's not on here.
Well, an inch is usually a mile, isn't it?
No.
Well, we'll assume that it is.
Well, we can assume, but it's probably safer not to.
Every map I've ever seen, an inch is a mile.
You saying I don't know how to read maps?
No, no.
I'm sure you have an excellent knowledge of maps.
It's just that, well, an inch could be two miles or ten.
I'm just saying goodbye.
- I'm going back to the hotel.
- You're doing no such thing.
Then show me the lodge.
- The lodge is...
Is a mile down that road.
- No, no, no, hang on a minute.
You're not listening to me.
I'm not walking anywhere.
Hey, hey, come on, don't squabble, gang.
It's supposed to be a team-building weekend.
Maybe you can tell Richard because he seems to think we're on a walking holiday.
Wait a minute.
Stop the coach.
Stop.
Stop the bus.
Fucking hell.
Stop that.
Come on, now.
Fuck it.
What was that?
Sorry.
Probably just a bear.
- Just a bear?
- There are no bears in Hungary.
- Are you sure?
- Yes.
Well, that's assuming we're still in Hungary.
If we cross the border into Romania, then there are bears.
If we're in Serbia then I'm not sure.
Well, that's really interesting, Richard.
Are bears required to stop at borders?
I mean, is there some sort of passport control for bears?
Better watch your tone, young man.
- Or what?
- Oh, please.
No.
Or what?
- That sounded further away.
- There.
If it was a bear, which it wasn't it's moved on.
Come on.
Richard, I really think we should stick to the main road.
No, no.
This way's much quicker.
- Come on.
- I'm with Richard.
Have I pissed myself?
What?
I feel damp.
Well, you look all right.
I'm not gonna touch you.
- Have I pissed my pants?
- I'm just saying I don't think so.
- What's wrong with you?
- I feel all damp.
You're fine.
You're fine.
Okay, so working on the assumption that an inch is not a mile what's the worst-case scenario?
An inch is a thousand miles?
That's Steve.
If he's messing around then he's in big trouble.
Oh, no.
We should stay with the bags.
Steve, you're all right, mate?
Jesus.
Steve?
I saw someone.
Who?
I don't know.
What happened?
The weirdest thing's just happened.
Hear?
I needed to have a slash, so I pulled me trousers down you know, I felt a little bit damp and I didn't wanna get a rash.
I was about to have a piss and I saw a geezer with a balaclava and a suitcase.
No, more of a travel bag.
- So you've come over...
- Steve.
- Yes?
- The mushrooms.
- What mushrooms?
- You ate them.
You're high.
- Look after him, okay?
- Yeah, sure.
Listen...
Now, I know we're mates but if you look at my cock one more time, I'm gonna kick off.
What are you talking about?
I have not once looked at your winkie.
You turn around.
Okay, everybody.
Prepare to smile.
- Isn't it wonderful?
- It's a dump.
- What do you expect, the Hilton?
- The Hilton would be good.
We're in the country.
- You're not gonna stay here, are you?
- Right now, I'd sleep in a cave.
That's the spirit.
Someone in the woods.
Yeah, you already said that.
Come on.
Come on.
- This isn't the right place.
- This is the right place.
This obviously is not the right place.
It is the right place.
Billy.
Well, there's only one lodge on the map, so I suppose...
Thank you.
This is just the lobby.
This place is fantastic.
Steve, it's just a rope.
It's just a rope.
"Dear team:
As a big thank-you for the last few weeks on the road George and I cordially invite you to join us on a team-building weekend in Palisade's newly-acquired luxury lodge."
"Luxury lodge."
Okay, okay, okay.
Now listen up, everyone.
This is not a holiday.
This is a business.
And team-building weekends like it or not, are part of that business.
- Hear, hear.
This is our chance to find out about ourselves.
Oh, yeah.
Sure, we'll have fun paintball, orienteering...
- Bridge-building.
- Bridge-building.
We need to take ownership of the weekend.
And that means working together.
- Richard, I have an idea...
- Now...
Shh!
I can't spell "success" without "U."
And you.
You.
You.
And you.
"Success" has only one U.
Oh, well.
Daddy couldn't put us all through Cambridge, could he, Harris?
Now, George wants us to be the best team possible.
And if that means digging in a little, then I'm sorry.
You think this place is a dump?
Well, think about this.
Maybe it's supposed to be.
I've had tougher challenges.
Now, let's make this our challenge.
Explain to me how staying in this shithole is gonna help me sell landmines.
Oi.
Look, all I'm asking is don't be so happy all the time.
- I'm only trying to be positive.
- No, you're not.
You're like a dog tied to a radiator, wagging its tail.
That's not a compliment.
Look for the generator in there, will you?
You got any light bulbs in your bag, Gordon?
Yeah.
Give me two secs.
Hello?
Hello?
Oh, no.
You should go and get some sleep.
I think you're right.
Maggie?
I've been waiting for you, Richard.
I want you to fuck me.
Really?
I mean, I'd like to.
Fuck me now, and fuck me hard.
Okay.
But what's going on?
Maggie?
Great management skills, Dick.
World-class.
I can't believe it.
I had no idea Palisade were this involved in Eastern Europe.
You're joking, right?
Where did you get this stuff?
Found it next to the generator.
There's stacks of it out there.
It's all Soviet.
That doesn't mean it's one of the asylums.
Well, it doesn't rule it out either, does it?
What asylums?
Right, you lot.
Do you wanna put those cards away, please, Jill?
Feast your eyes on this.
Mind yourselves, it is hot.
It actually smells quite nice.
- Not eating, Maggie?
- No, thanks.
Not hungry.
Okay, rest of you then, get stuck in, there is plenty to go around.
Do you wanna get some spoons out, please, Jill?
- You're all right, Steve?
Feeling okay?
- You know what, piss off.
- Are you still tripping?
- No.
Why are you naked?
Harris, you were saying about the asylums.
What asylums?
Harris seems to think we're staying in an old lunatic asylum.
- Are we?
- No.
Go on, tell us about the asylums.
Are you sure you want me to?
Because, you know, it's pretty scary, mate.
I'll take my chances.
Okay, okay.
This story takes place a long time ago, way back before the first World War.
Oh, please.
When movies were silent and women were even quieter.
The government had been getting these strange complaints about the asylum.
So the sent an inspector around to check it out.
He arrives late one night to see what's going on.
Everything seems fine when the wardens agree to show him around.
But everything isn't fine.
Everything's not fine at all.
All the inmates are going crazy, screaming at him to let them out.
Then he realizes what's wrong.
The inmates have taken over and locked up all the doctors.
And then they turn on him.
He tried to reason with them but there's no reasoning with the mentally insane.
Guess who they called to sort out the mess?
Us.
Palisade sent the boys in spread the place with nerve agent, killed everyone.
It was a massacre.
But rumor has it one inmate survived.
Hell-bent on killing any Palisade employee that should cross his path.
They say he's still on the loose.
- So that's supposed to be scary?
- Well, it was at the time.
Believe it or not, there is a tiny bit of truth in his story.
- Damn right there is.
- A tiny bit.
It actually occurred in the early '90s when the Soviet Union broke up.
Places like this were detention centers for war criminals.
Soldiers who liked the killing a little bit too much.
They were lunatics.
They wiped out whole villages burnt people alive, put heads on spikes.
They were savages.
Well-trained savages.
Their government locked them away, tried to cure them, but it was no good.
Some escaped hid in some empty buildings nearby, but not for long.
Obviously, it wasn't Palisade who killed them.
It was their government.
But it was us who supplied the weapons.
Oh, and Harris if anyone did survive revenge would be the last thing on their minds.
What would be on their minds?
Survival.
Evading capture.
These guys were war criminals, remember?
- Yeah.
- Well, excuse me for being the only sensible one here, but this place is a lodge.
Okay?
It's not a mental home, it's not a prison, it's a lodge.
It was a sex lodge.
- Right.
- It was.
I'm telling you.
You see, back in the '60s these places were hospitals for rich old men.
And all the nurses were these naughty looking birds with great big shooters.
Anyway, being stuck all the way out here, they used to get really lonely.
So they tried it on with the old boys.
These poor old fuckers, they was on death's door.
They couldn't get it up.
So they decided to just get hold of each other.
One day this fellow turns up out of the blue.
Young geezer, bit of bollocks about him.
They chased him.
They caught him and well, he was fucked.
Have you ever taken anything seriously in your life?
Ecstasy and weed, I think.
Yeah.
- Hey, gang.
How are we all doing?
- Brilliant.
Sweet dreams?
Yeah.
Harris.
- Hi, Maggie.
- Hi.
Not eating?
Why are you all so obsessed with what I eat?
I am not too skinny.
No, no, no.
I don't mean...
Just that you'll need your energy for the team games, you know.
I mean, you're perfect just the way you are.
And, when I say perfect, I obviously don't mean that in a sexual way.
I mean perfect in a neutral way.
As if I were another woman saying that you were perfect.
You know?
Just one woman to another.
Not that I'm implying anything like that.
Or that there's anything wrong with that sort of thing.
Or anything...
Keep digging, we can still see you.
What the?
A bit young to be losing your teeth, aren't you?
It's not mine.
- It's not my tooth.
- Maybe it's just a clove.
Does it look like a fucking clove?
- I'm gonna puke.
- Could it be the cow's tooth?
A cow with gold fillings?
Who made the pie?
No, I didn't make it.
I found it.
You what?
- I found it.
- You found a pie?
It was wrapped in foil.
- Oh, well, that's a relief.
- Jesus.
You dirty bastard.
Okay, everyone calm down.
Come on, Jill.
Jill, come with me.
- I'm gonna be sick.
- No.
Okay, look, I'm sorry, everybody.
I thought it was a welcome gift.
- From who?
- I don't know.
George.
George wouldn't bring a pie.
- No.
- It could've been sitting here for months.
- Look at this place.
- I cooked it for the full hour.
- What, it had instructions on it?
- No, but it's a pie.
You don't cook every pie for an hour.
You don't think I undercooked it, do you?
Fucking hell.
Yeah.
Okay, fine.
Look, it's gone.
I'm throwing the pie in the bin.
It's gone.
All right.
That makes me feel better.
- Good night, sweetie.
- Good night.
Shit.
Hello.
Hello.
Hey, hey, hey.
- What's the matter?
What's going on?
- There was a man at my window.
- What happened?
- I saw someone.
- Where's...?
- What's going on?
Jill saw someone.
- Who?
- What did he look like?
He had a mask.
Nobody ate my mushrooms, did they?
Shut up.
Gordon, do you have anything to help calm her down?
I'll check my bag.
- Have you seen anything?
- No.
- What do you think?
- You're the boss, you think.
Perhaps you were dreaming.
I saw someone.
I wasn't dreaming, look at me.
His face was covered in a mask.
I was not dreaming.
I found some Calms.
They're herbal.
Come on, there's no one here.
Come on.
It was probably just some locals messing around.
Looking through a window one story up?
We need to get out of here.
Yeah, I'm leaving.
Fifty says I'm going with her.
- No one is going anywhere.
- What did you find?
There's some structures in the trees, but they're too far to reach the window.
- There, you see?
- Gang, this is what's gonna happen.
Tomorrow morning, we go to the top of the hill, see if we can get a signal.
Get somebody to pick us up, take us back to the hotel.
What, my son?
Great idea, Harris.
No, that is not a great idea.
Anyone who leaves won't have a job to come back to.
- I don't care.
Count me in.
- Yeah, I'm with her.
I'm sorry, but he's right.
Should I make some tea?
All right.
Listen.
Jill, I want you to sleep on it.
Then, in the morning, if you still feel the same way, well I'll come up with a plan.
I feel the same way.
Okay.
Listen up, everyone.
Billy.
Get over here.
Come on.
I've made a decision.
We're gonna sit tight.
We...
We sit tight, while...
Harris, I want you and Jill to go up the hill.
To go up the hill and see if you can get a phone signal.
Get the coach driver to come and pick us up.
- Oh, sweet.
I've made this decision purely because of the food situation.
And...
And it is conditional.
While they're gone, the rest of us will do a little team-building.
Yes.
Nice one.
Excuse me.
I just wanna make it really clear before we begin, that paintballing is about teamwork, all right?
So no Rambos.
I repeat, absolutely no Rambos.
Okay!
Hey, how is your project going?
Pretty good, thanks.
So what are these things?
They're humane landmines, right?
They're not landmines.
- They're mobilization units.
- Right.
And they do what?
They...
They sort of grab you, yeah?
They pin you to the floor.
They don't blow children's legs off.
- They're humane.
- They're a hard sell, that's what they are.
I'm sorry, I don't understand why in the 21st century we create such sick weapons.
The guillotine seems humane.
There's nothing humane about the guillotine.
Well, at least it's instantaneous.
There's nothing instantaneous about the guillotine.
When your head's chopped off, your brain can think for about 2 to 3 minutes.
What, you're saying that you're aware that your head is cut off?
I'm saying that when Marie-Antoinette had her head chopped off she felt it hit the basket.
She saw blood pumping out of her own stump.
That's not true.
It is a hundred percent biological fact.
Do you think he crashed?
I don't know.
Oh, my God.
We gotta get the others.
We can't just leave him here.
Can we?
I'm not saying that I fancy anyone in particular.
I'm just saying that if I did like someone I wouldn't know the best way to approach them.
- Dating is complicated in England.
- What are you talking about?
English birds ain't complicated.
You buy them a Bacardi Breezer and they'll ride you like Seabiscuit.
Yeah?
But what if she's not English?
What if she's French, or Spanish, or American?
Maggie.
Yeah.
So what do you think?
I don't wanna be unkind but I think you got more chance of getting shits out of a rocking horse.
Yeah, that's what I thought.
Come on, I got you.
Get up, you cheating bastard.
See, all this Maggie stuff it's because your bird left you.
It's because your plums are backing up.
It's driving you nuts.
It's confusing you making you think you love her.
You're right.
Anyway, I think she likes you.
- What are you talking about?
- Go, go, go.
Hey, sexy.
We won.
You're dead.
Oh, the bullet missed my vital organs.
I survived, it's a miracle.
- Here we go.
- Safeties off.
- Here comes the ref.
- Right.
Oh, you really got into that.
Brilliant.
I think we bent a few rules here and there.
Steve shot Richard and he didn't die.
- No one shot me.
- We shot someone and it wasn't Maggie.
All right, well, I think that someone, and I'm not pointing any fingers has been wiping off paint.
And it does clearly state in the rules...
- This is total war, there are no rules.
- Right, well, it do...
Stop.
Stop.
Stop it.
Stop!
That is really dangerous.
If you got one of those in your eye, it could pop like a Ping-Pong ball.
It's not funny.
That hurts.
I expect more from some of you.
Gordon, you gotta be still.
Steve, get on the other side.
Quick.
Be still.
- Get it off!
- You have to stop moving.
Pull out.
Pull your leg out.
Now, pull it now.
- Pull your leg out now.
- Stop!
You gotta fucking move it.
- Now!
- Pull your leg out.
- Steve, you fucking idiot.
- All right, for fuck's sake.
We'll get you out.
Pull it out, pull it out.
Pull it.
God!
- Okay, Gordon.
- Shit.
Okay.
Okay.
Okay, we gotta stop the bleeding.
Billy, give me your belt.
You're gonna be okay.
You have to calm down for me, Gordon.
Calm down.
- We're gonna stop the bleeding.
- Yeah, yeah.
They're everywhere.
What the fuck's going on here?
Billy, hold his hand.
Will you help me?
What are you doing?
What are you doing?
Steve, help me out here.
Steve!
You're gonna be okay.
- Get on the coach...
- Stop!
- We gotta go right now.
- Don't move.
- What the fuck happened?
- They're bear traps.
They're everywhere.
Someone's trying to kill us.
Like they killed the driver.
Driver's dead?
All right, just get on the coach.
- Will somebody help us, please?
- What are we gonna do?
- He could be watching us right now.
- Jill, you're not helping.
- What are we gonna do with his leg?
- We need to keep it cold.
- There's a refrigerator in the coach.
- Great, thank you.
Oh, you're shitting me.
God!
All right, all right, for fuck's sake.
- Don't stop.
- It's going as fast as it can.
Steve, I need something to cover his leg.
Harris, slow down.
I think you're going too fast.
Someone give me something to cover his leg, for fuck's sake!
Gonna...?
Jill.
Oh, shit.
I think I've broke me arm.
Billy.
Jill?
We've gotta head back to the lodge.
We've gotta find Jill.
Jill!
Jill!
Keep your voice down.
Someone's killed Harris, you understand?
Who's to say he didn't kill Jill as well?
Now, we head back to the lodge, and we lock ourselves in till morning.
- And then we walk.
- Where?
- I don't know.
- Well, glad we got that solid.
Hey, unless you have a better idea, we go back to the lodge.
You little bitch!
You gonna die!
You gonna burn like a witch!
Just put him down.
We need to lock off that thing.
Lock everything.
This is bollocks.
This is fucking bollocks.
It's safer in here.
Listen to me, I'm not waiting here for him to turn up.
It's madness.
What do you suggest we do with Gordon?
- I'll carry him myself if I have to.
- Just keep your voices down.
What if the stories about this place were true?
- Well, mine wasn't.
- What stories?
There were asylums, someone escaped.
Someone who knows we're Palisade.
- Yeah, but how would they know that?
- Well, the bus.
It's not exactly subtle.
Those stories are nonsense.
Who told you?
Jill?
Harris?
Do you know how many conspiracies I hear regarding weapons companies?
- No, Richard.
How many?
- I'll tell you how many I believe.
None.
We're a public company.
Members of both our governments are on the board.
They're not going to do anything immoral.
Arguing is not gonna help us out, okay?
You said you wanted us to work as a team.
Well, now is the time to start.
Look, just help me get some wood.
We need to board ourselves in, all right?
- With what?
- I don't know.
Check Gordon's bag or something.
Well, he's not gonna have hammer and nails in there, is he?
Oh, for fuck's sake.
Good boy.
I've got some pills.
What kind of pills?
Ecstasy.
Great.
Have a party.
No, not for me.
For him.
What do you mean?
Well, we're not gonna get him up tap-dancing but, you know, it'll take the edge off for a while.
Okay.
Gordon.
Take one of these, yeah?
It'll sort you out.
I don't do drugs.
It's okay, sweetheart.
These are painkillers.
They're gonna make you feel better.
Just take one.
Here.
Here you go.
Here you go.
You're all right?
I'm sorry about earlier, flaring up and all that.
You were okay.
Listen, I wanna say something to you.
Sometimes I act like an idiot, you know.
I say things when I shouldn't.
And...
Shit, I've left Gordon's foot on the coach.
Sorry, mate.
I love you, Maggie.
- Of course you do.
- No, seriously.
No, I mean it.
I really mean it.
- It's just the drugs, Gordon.
- No, it's not the drugs.
I'm really...
I'm really, really...
I love you.
And I loved Jill.
I really...
I really, really, really loved Jill.
Steve, you got any downers?
- Not in my things.
- Maggie, Maggie, I told you, I love you.
- Where are you going?
- Toilet.
Can't you hold on?
No.
Don't worry, I'll be right back.
If we don't get him to a hospital, he's gonna die.
I think maybe we should leave him.
What are you saying?
I think our best chance for survival is if the four of us get to the main road.
Get help.
And I think it's Gordon's best shot as well.
I think you're right.
I think we should go.
Go where?
What's happened?
This door was locked.
Gordon?
- Gordon.
- Billy, be quiet.
Conspiracies?
We should go back upstairs.
Maggie.
Richard!
Richard.
Fuck.
Jesus.
Yeah.
Well, I'd hate to be accused of not killing him when I had the chance.
Well I think he'll be all right there.
Don't you fucking move!
Don't shoot!
We got a problem.
Yeah, no shit.
No, we got another problem.
That was our last bullet.
Put your fucking guns down.
Put your guns down or I'll blow your motherfucking balls off!
Come on, guys, let's get them!
Go left!
Follow me!
On your left!
On your left!
Somewhere here!
Let's go!
Let's go.
Stop.
Stop!
- What are you doing?
- Don't move.
The place is mined, the whole place is mined.
How do you know?
I'm standing on one.
CR-1 platoon buster.
One of ours.
- Oh, shit.
- Yeah.
Where's Billy?
Richard, they're coming.
All right, follow my footsteps.
Then jump to the trees.
Go.
Come on.
Hey!
Come on.
Come on!
Over here.
Come on!
Hi!
I got your dumb ass!
Freeze!
Freeze!
He won't go anywhere now.
He's already a dead man.
Oh, you're laughing at me?
You won't be fucking laughing when I take my foot off this.
There was no use running around from us, it's all over now.
Step away, Borya.
Eat it, bitch!
Hey, Maggie.
Steve.
Where the hell you been?
Are you Mr. Steve?
We are Nadia and Olga from the escort agency.
No, no, there are mines.
Let's walk on the logs.
On the trunks.
Come on, guys, follow me!
Yeah, yeah.
Come on, everybody.
Why not be my fucking guests?
Is this where we are?
- What are...?
- Have you been to the lake?
- Yes.
- Are there boats there?
- Yes.
- Okay, leave your shit and follow us.
Ready?
Yeah.
Would someone please tell me what the fuck is going on?
George.
There are about five seriously sick fuckers coming our way to kill us.
So you can either help us or fuck off.
When you say "sick fuckers," what do you mean here?
Terrorists?
Call them what you want.
- Come on, let's go.
- Hold it.
No one's going anywhere.
I've been waiting to demonstrate this for a while.
You stamp "terrorist" on it, and I'll kill it.
- Wait till they get a load of this.
- Sweet.
Those the little bastards?
All right.
Get back.
Steve.
Steve!
Steve!
Where are you?
Steve!
- Maggie?
- I'm in some kind of trap.
Steve, he's coming!
Oh, my God.
No!
God!
Steve!
God!
No!
Please.
Please.
Get off of me!
Get off...
No!
Fucking...
Steve!
This is gonna hurt.
Steve!
Steve!
Steve!
Hello?
Hello.
Do you speak English?
- English?
- Yes, English.
I need you to send help.
I need help.
Yes, please hold.
Come on, then, you fuck!
You...!
Foursome?
We're gonna miss you, Principal Fisher.
I can't believe you're retiring.
You don't look a day over eighty.
Lilly, he's only sixty-five.
Really?
Is he sick?
He will be after he sees this.
Let's see what farewell words Dandruff Danny has for Principal Fisher.
One second, let me fix my hair.
This is gonna take a while.
Uh, I was just kidding about before, sir.
It's not that you're old, it's that you remind me of my dead grandfather.
But he didn't die from old age.
He got hit by a school bus.
Ironic, isn't it?
Uh, Principal Fisher.
Now, Oken, I hope this is not some sort of video farewell for a beloved retiring principal.
Hey.
All right, you girls, hold it right there!
- I want to do mine over again.
- We'll clean it up in editing.
Miley.
Miley?
Miley.
Move over girls.
Listen, Jake, and listen good.
There's only one dame in the world that's right for a guy like you and you're looking at her.
What took you so long, baby?
Traffic.
Now plant one on me and make me remember why I waste my time with you.
Miley!
Miley!
What?
You were dreaming about Jake again, weren't you?
No, I wasn't.
Why would you say that?
I'm so over him.
- Hey, Miley.
- I'm over you, okay?
Move on with your life!
I was just gonna tell her her shoe's untied.
Whoa!
Comeon!
You get the limo out front
Hottest styles, every shoe, every color
Yeah, when you're famous it can be kind of fun
It's really you, but no one ever discovers
Who would have thought that a girl like me
Would double as a superstar?
You get the best of both worlds
Chill it out, take it slow
Then you rock out the show
You get the best of both worlds
Mix it all together
And you know that it's the best of both worlds
If we were a movie
You'd be the right guy
And I'd be the best friend
That you'd fall in love with
And I can't sing this anymore.
I mean, it's not like girls just stand around dreaming about boys all day.
You okay, darling?
Of course, I'm fine.
It's just there's other more important things in life, like world peace, and...
Whales.
Why can't we do a song about whales?
And not stupid boy whales.
Girl whales.
Happy, independent girl whales.
I'll get right on it, darling.
Girlwhales, doing their nails
Don't need no males
Practically writes itself.
Daddy, I'm not saying that's exactly the song.
I'm open to other fish, too.
- Can I take a break?
- I think that's a good idea.
Besides, there's somebody here who wants to see you.
Dad, I'm not in the mood to see anybody right now.
Well, fine.
If you don't wanna see me, I'll just turn the bus around
- and head on back to Nashville.
- Aunt Dolly!
Look at you.
My goodness.
You are sprouting like a rosebush after a month of rain, only not as wet and twice as pretty.
Whoa doggies, I like that.
I might use that in a song.
Well, fine.
First one's free, next one you share profits with me.
Come in here, sweet pea.
I got a story to tell you about this possum and a skunk that were sharing a pew at church.
Okay, what's his name?
What are you talking about?
I am talking about my goddaughter crushing over some boy harder than a monster truck driving over a little clown car.
Monster trucks, clown cars.
Oh, I've missed you, Aunt Dolly.
You're funny.
You know, we're thinking about getting a dog.
Really?
Well, you might want to think about naming him Zippy, because zip is what I'm getting from you.
Listen, sweet pea, when you decide you want to talk about this boy that don't exist, you know I'm here for you.
And I'm here, too, bud.
Robbie Ray, you nosy hillbilly!
Hey, I'm not listening.
I just wanted you to know I'm here.
And I'm not a nosy hillbilly.
I'm a concerned hillbilly father.
- Morning, Dolly.
- Hey.
Whoa!
Looks like my home's been invaded by aliens from the Planet Froufrou.
Robbie Stewart, you keep making fun of my decorating,
I'm gonna have to tell your kids how you used to run around in a diaper and little black boots saying, "Hello, I'm Johnny Cash. "
Come to think of it, I love what you've done with the place.
Hey, good.
Would you just say that to the folks back home?
And while you're at it, would you please tell Uncle Zeke to get rid of that awful mullet comb-over?
Lord knows how that man can take one hair, wrap it completely around his head and down his back.
It's called a skullet, and it ain't that bad.
Well, you ain't seen him floss with it.
- Ready?
- Hey, everybody.
Hey, Uncle Zeke.
You might want to treat yourself to a haircut, and get you a toothpick.
- I'm going for a jog.
- Okay.
Oh, man.
- This is not good.
- Oh, what's the matter with you?
Aunt Dolly, I smell like a petunia.
What did you wash this stuff in?
Well, just a little fabric softener and a whole lot of love.
You got anything to say to the folks back home?
Well, sure.
Hey, everybody.
When the guys get a whiff of me, I'm gonna get beat up today!
Bye.
Well, at least you got a look at him before that happens.
So, let's go check on Miley and see what she's up to.
Come on.
Ifwewereamovie You'd be the right guy
I'd be the best friend
That you'd fall in love with
In the end we'd be laughing
Watching the sunset fade to black
Show the names, play that happy song
Well, that was just beautiful, sweet pea.
I can't wait to hear you sing it, when there really is a boy.
His name is Jake.
Jake Ryan.
The zombie slayer?
"Dude, I slayed you once.
Don't make me slay you again. "
That boy is too cute!
I know.
He goes to my school.
And sometimes he can be really obnoxious, but then he gets really sweet and then he gets all obnoxious again.
That reminds me.
I gotta call my husband.
Aunt Dolly, puberty crisis here.
Darling, I am so sorry.
I just forget sometimes.
Being a teenage girl is harder than walking through a balloon shop with a porcupine purse.
I don't know what to do, Aunt Dolly.
Jake said he likes me 'cause I'm the only girl at school who's not falling all over him.
And if I tell him that I like him, then I am falling all over him.
I'm caught between a rock and a zombie slayer here.
Well, honey, nobody knows what's around the corner but I know one thing, if you keep yourself out of the game for fear of losing, there is no way on this Earth you're gonna win.
So you're saying that I should just walk up to Jake and say,
" Jake Ryan, I'm through pretending that I don't like you,
"when the truth is...
I'm totally in love with you. "
Wait a minute.
Is this thing on?
Oh, good golly, Miss Dolly.
You know what?
I am forever leaving this thing on.
Last Christmas, I got four hours of the dog chewing the head off the Little Drummer Boy.
Poor little old Rufus was chucking up body parts for a week.
Uh, Aunt Dolly, I think your hair's ringing.
Well, honey, when your pants are as tight as mine, you've got to have somewhere to put your phone.
Hey, sweetie, I was just talking about you.
Rufus ate what?
No.
I'll be right back.
He did?
The one out on the patio?
Miles, I gotta get this video in today and you're the only one who hasn't said goodbye to Principal Fisher.
So take your time, think of something really good.
- And, action!
- Okay.
Bye.
Perfect!
Muffins!
Bye.
Why didn't I do that?
"A day over eighty. " What was I thinking?
Oh, that's my mom.
I have to get to school early so I can turn this thing in to the editor.
Oliver, let's go!
I thought you said that was your mom.
It is.
When she's mad, she uses her man voice.
Move, move, move!
Wait a minute.
I thought he took his camera.
Oh, that's Aunt Dolly's.
Funny.
It looks a lot like Oliver's.
Yeah, but Aunt Dolly's has her initials on it.
See?
Where's the "D"?
Where's the rhinestone "D"?
Miley, it's just a camera.
What's the big deal?
That camera has a tape of me saying,
" Jake Ryan, I'm totally in love with you!"
- Whoa!
- I know.
- Hey, Jake.
- What's up?
Quick, Oliver, you took the wrong camera.
Give it back.
- Sorry.
Here.
- Thanks.
- Where's the tape?
- I gave it to the editor.
- Who's the editor?
- Jake.
Jake who?
Ow, ow, ow!
Thanks a lot.
You ripped out my only chest hair.
So I gave Jake the tape.
Just go ask for it back.
I can't believe I have to do this.
Jake, can we have our tape back?
Please.
I looked great.
She looked terrible.
- Better than you!
- Keep dreaming!
- Uh, Jake?
- One second.
Guys, if I let you redo your tape, then everyone's gonna want to do the same thing.
I'm sorry, but nobody gets their tapes back under any circumstances.
So, uh, Miley, what's going on?
I just wanted to tell you that
I know another guy named Jake Ryan.
So if you ever hear me talking about Jake Ryan,
I'm talking about the other Jake Ryan.
Not you, Jake.
Other Jake.
Bye-bye.
You're dead to me.
Dad, I don't know why, but I have this funny feeling that Aunt Dolly replaced my shampoo.
Whoa!
Well, join the club, Son.
Looks like we've been volumised and Dolly-sized.
I can't take this anymore, Dad.
Between the shampoo and the smelly tissues, and the potpourri, and all these flowers, I mean,
I'm losing my manly essence!
There's only one thing we can do, Son.
Let's go to the gym and fight back with the one thing she can't take from us.
Our man stink!
Uh, Dad, can we maybe do it tomorrow?
Aunt Dolly buffed my nails and I don't want to ruin them.
Do you hear yourself, Son?
Oh, no!
Get me to the gym, fast!
We've got to figure out something, Lilly.
Jake's probably laughing at that tape right now.
I know, this is awful!
This is horrible!
This is so cute!
Can I borrow it?
Put that away, Lilly,
I've got something else for you girls to wear.
Thanks, Aunt Dolly, but clothes aren't going to help me now.
Oh, these will.
I got you girls into this mess, and I'm gonna get you out.
If that boy won't give the tape back, we're going in after it, undercover.
Ooh, I like the way she thinks.
- And I love the way she accessorizes.
- These boots are made for sneaking.
Girls, I don't just rock, I roll.
Okay, let's just focus on the plan.
Aunt Dolly and I go into the edit room.
Lilly, you stand watch.
We get the tape and we're out of here.
Okay.
It's locked!
Not for long.
These nails ain't just for scratching.
Like a charm.
I haven't carried a house key in years.
Okay, people, let's get her done!
Lilly, less squeaky, more sneaky.
Sorry.
- Oh, no, he's in there.
What do we do?
I'm sorry, honey.
Mind if I clean up in here?
Well, it don't matter because I'm gonna clean up anyhow, so don't sass me, boy.
No problem.
Oh, one sec.
Since you're here, I might as well toss this.
Oh, wait!
Don't you want to finish that?
You're a growing boy.
Nah.
I eat too much of this junk anyway.
Uh, can't let you do that.
Union rules.
I'll take care of it.
I'll just toss it to the left of the trash can.
Whoa, what the heck is in there?
Well, I guess that dead lab frog still has a little hop left in him.
Sweet niblets, you are Jake Ryan!
- You are Jake, aren't you?
- Yes.
You're as cute as they said.
Can I have your autograph?
Sure.
It's really for my goddaughter.
I mean, she just loves you.
Really, she loves you.
That's that dang frog again.
Hey, what happened to all my tapes?
Hey, didn't you say that very line in the famous lost zombie tape episode?
Yeah.
Some of my finest work.
Well, I have heard about you.
I've heard you do some great stuff.
And you are as cute as they say.
Well, gotta go, while the getting's good.
Oh, uh, one more thing.
Shake in the hole!
Did you get it?
Oh, I got it.
I got it good.
- Strawberry.
- Oh, my favorite.
Breathe that in, Son.
That's the sweet stench of independence, freedom and manly pride.
I hear you, Daddy.
My eyes are burning, my eyes.
I'm so ranky, I taste my own stanky.
I can't stand it!
I'm taking a shower.
And I'm using Aunt Dolly's peach body wash with exfoliating loofah glove.
Well, you loofah all you want to,
I'm gonna take a bubble bath with one of her citrus fizzy balls.
Maybe two.
What are you so upset about?
You got your tape back.
I know I should be happy, but I'm not.
I mean, it makes sense.
You're right back where you started, secretly crushing on Jake.
If I were you, I would've listened to your Aunt Dolly and just tell him how you feel.
Why didn't you tell me that yesterday?
Because I wanted to wear the cool black outfit.
Okay, I'm just gonna do it.
I'm gonna tell him the truth.
You know, he might think I'm falling all over him,
- but at least he'll know how I feel.
- And maybe he'll feel the same way.
- Yeah, you're right.
It's worth the risk.
- Yeah.
- I'll never know unless I try.
- Yeah.
Here I go.
- Hey, Jake.
- Hey, Miley.
- Listen, I have something to tell you...
- Hi, Jakey.
Hey, Rach.
Oh, Miley, you know Rachel, right?
From Spanish class?
Oh, sure.
Hi, Rachel.
Yeah, we're kind of going out now.
Isn't that great?
Yeah.
Really great.
So, uh, what was it that you wanted to tell me?
Nothing.
It's not important anymore.
All right.
Well, see you around.
Yeah, see you around.
He loves me not.
Still not loving me.
Too busy loving Rachel.
And he still ain't loving me, and now he's not loving me anymore, and now I need more petals.
You got any ideas what we're gonna do about this?
Have you ever known me not to have an idea?
Just follow my lead.
So, Robbie, do you remember when you were trying to get up the courage to ask Miley's mom out and she just turned you down flat?
Yep.
She said she was already dating somebody else.
And do you remember what I told you?
Yep.
You said, "Next time you're gonna ask a girl out,
"don't wash your truck, wash your hair. "
I mean after that.
Yep.
You said, "The only way to not be in the game,
"is to take yourself out of the game. "
Guys, I know what you all are trying to do, but let's face it,
I waited too long.
I blew it.
Game over.
Robbie, is this the same girl that came to me and said, "I want to be a singer. "
And I said, "Sweet pea, the chances of that happening are one in a million. "
And she said, "I want to be that one. "
- Where's that girl?
- She's right here.
Well, if you hadn't taken that risk, you never would've become Hannah Montana, now would you?
No.
So...
So if I want something bad enough, I should get off my butt and fight for it.
That's right.
That reminds me of a song by my favorite teen pop star.
Who said, who said you can't be Superman?
I say, I say that I know you can
Who said, who said you can't be worldwide?
I say, I say time is on your side
Who said, who said Jakewon'tbe theguy ?
I say, I say give it another try
Who said, who said you can't be ten feet tall?
I say, I say that I can have it all
Who said?
- Oh, I love it.
Who said?
Have you been using my citrus fizzy balls?
No, ma'am.
But I did use your apricot scrub.
You know, Aunt Dolly,
I kind of modelled Hannah Montana's look after you.
Really?
I thought I was missing a wig!
Don't make me smile.
I'm cracking.
You know, this avocado mask tastes ten times better than the mango scrub.
You know, Rufus ate a whole bowl of that mango scrub once.
For a whole week, that little dog smelled like a tropical breeze coming and going.
Cool.
Can't wait.
Hannes!
Hannes!
Jochen!
Come back!
He's dead!
It's me...
Jochen.
Take my...
Aksel, faster!
We're going to die!
We're going to die!
Get a grip, Rauni!
You're not going to die!
No one else is going to die!
You never give up, do you?
You always have to be the hero.
The fucking hero!
Karl, how are we doing?
I can't see them anymore.
I think they are regrouping.
This could be our chance.
It'll get dark any moment.
If we can get to the forest, we can escape in the dark.
Always the optimist...
But we have no choice.
UKRAINE, 1944
The German Army Scandinavian Volunteer Division:
SS panzer Division Wiking.
Separated from their unit.
Lost and freezing.
The stove is still hot...
They must have fled when they saw us coming...
Schröder, clear the entrance of snow.
I thought we'd stand watch in twos, but I think we all need some sleep.
- I can take the first shift on my own.
- Gerhard, what happened before...
Isn't it time you started speaking German like everyone else?
Shut the fuck up!
Beckert?
- Beckert, are you awake?
- Elsie?
- I was thinking of something.
- What?
What is it?
If the door and windows were jammed with snow...
How did they get out?
The people who live here...
How did they get out?
Rauni!
If the door and windows were jammed with snow how did the people who live here get out?
- Through the chimney?
- Wake up Aksel!
Aksel?
Wake up!
Aksel?
Jesus Christ!
What the bloody hell was that?
- I think I got it!
- Did you hit it or didn't you?
- I don't know.
I think so.
- We'll just have to go and see.
No way I'm going in there again!
So what do we do?
freeze to death?
I'll have a look.
Cover me.
You're the hero, mate...
That thing had better be dead!
Are you OK?
Give me a light!
Karl, the lamp!
MARIA
I need help down here!
Get the spade!
Get the spade now!
We need something heavy!
FROSTBITE
Bloody morons!
Saga, when you get your license, promise you won't drive like that.
I fell, and I can't get up...
But, honey, I told you we would take that together.
I brought it up here, didn't I?
- What do you think?
- About what?
The apartment.
Everything will be fine, you'll see.
Once the furniture gets here.
Do we really need furniture?
We could just cover everything in plastic and eat from the floor.
So this is the reason we moved to this dump?
Yes, Gerhard Beckert.
He is a leading figure in genetic science.
He also happens to look like a moron.
Stop being so grumpy, please.
Well, I suppose maybe it won't look as bad in the daytime.
I told you they have polar night up here.
No daylight for a month.
I'll go and get more stuff from the car.
You're coming?
I should've moved in with dad instead...
Are you OK?
What?
I'm fine...
This isn't the first time.
Well, that's lucky.
Try and be more careful next time, OK?
- Asshole!
- I heard that.
It's 6.30, amd here'sthe local mews.
Ayoumg mam wasfoumd dead.
Accordimg to the police...
It was all renovated in 1984.
The mental institution was connected to the main building.
The old premises from the 50's are more or less intact.
We can visit the electric shock therapy room later.
After lunch maybe.
That corridor leads back to the foyer.
This way is the eye clinic.
We'll go this way and come back here later.
And here we keep...
Jesus Christ!
What the hell is going on here?
!
Creative anatomy studies?
We don't want to see any of that!
Is that clear?
Throw syringes again, and I'll give you creative anatomy studies, OK?
Start working on your haemophobia instead, if you want to be a doctor!
- It won't happen again, sorry.
- Good.
Wheelchair racing.
Anesthetic in the cocktails at our office party.
I don't even want to imagine...
Those blasted budget cuts.
Doctors are either wet behind the ears, or they've got one foot in the grave.
Never mind.
This way...
- What's the bullseye?
- The spleen.
Gerhard...
May I introduce our new colleague:
Annika Wallén.
It's a pleasure to meet you.
You are the main reason I applied for this job.
Oh, really?
I thought it was because of me.
So, you're interested in genetic research, then?
I'm still somewhat of an amateur in that area.
Good.
I don't trust experts.
Amateurs are passionate about their work.
I'm busy right now, but we should meet and talk some more on the subject.
I'm looking forward to that.
That's Gerhard's private patient.
His only patient, in fact.
Car accident.
She's been in a coma for over a year.
Déjà vu.
I had the weirdest dream last night.
I was washing the dishes.
But everything was so brittle, that it all just broke.
But I just went on until the water was colored with blood.
- What do you think of that?
- Of what?
The dream...
What does it mean?
- Do I know you?
- You have my old locker.
- Voila!
You got a light?
- You can't smoke in here, can you?
No worries, I've got one.
- You just have to come to the party.
- Thanks, but I'm not invited.
I'm inviting you now.
There, you're invited.
Officially.
Anyway, did you hear about the guy who got killed?
No.
I know a guy at the hospital.
We can go look at the corpse.
No, I have class now...
Besides, it sounds like a horribly bad idea.
You don't have to answer now.
Give it some time, think about it.
Bring a camera, so we can take photographs.
If you have to smoke, you'll have to do it over there!
Yes, yes, yes.
Rules, rules, rules.
Fascism, fascism, fascism.
I confess!
It was me.
Put me away.
I'm a danger to society!
I need a good talking to, and heavy medication!
You'd better handcuff me.
- Dress warmer and put that out.
- Do you think you'll catch him?
- Who?
- You know who.
The killer.
No one has said anything about murder.
And you should show more respect for the dead.
It's my parents.
It pains me to turn them in.
But justice must be served.
Lock them up and throw away the key.
Run along now, will you?
I'm sure you have a class now anyway.
- Yo, mama!
- WhaZZup, motherfucker?
- So what do you think about it?
- About what?
- Sander Carlsson is dead!
- You're bullshitting me!
- But we saw him yesterday!
- When did you see him?
The cops asked if I'd seen anything.
What was I supposed to say?
"I saw him driving down a foot path at 100 kph".
- Haven't you been questioned?
- No.
What happened to him?
They've been looking for you, you just haven't heard anything.
Because of your humongous headphones.
They'll give you neck injuries.
- Can anyone tell me what happened?
- He crashed, I suppose...
- Wasn't that just a question of time?
- How are the party preparations going?
This will be the most awesome party!
People will talk about it for weeks.
Just make sure that some of the house still stands when we get there.
- We're having dinner with my parents.
- Cornelia and her beloved Sebastian.
I invited this girl to the party.
You'll like her, such a nice girl!
When did you see Sander Carlsson?
12 HOURS EARLIER
Rick Allen isn't the drummer of Iron Maiden!
- So who is?
- Nicko McBrain plays in Maiden.
- You just made that name up.
- You're thinking of Def Leppard.
- And the difference is?
- He's only got one arm!
How could anyone play the drums with just one arm?
- Can you get something for the party?
- Sure.
I've got contacts.
- Isn't he doing community service?
- It's ironic, isn't it?
He gets community service for doing the community a service!
No worries, though, I've got a new contact.
We can't have that!
Overtake them!
Burn them off the road!
Wow!
Déjà vu.
If the cops see us, your license is history!
Wasn't that Sander?
Who else?
Christ, the way he drives!
It's a wonder he's survived this long!
Well...
To begin with, we have a penetrating skull trauma.
But that's not what's bothering me.
Any idiot can pick up one of those.
- What's really interesting is this.
- What's that?
Dermatic perforations at a 35mm distance of Arteria carotis communis.
Really?
Could you run that by me one more time, in normal language?
Two holes right into his main artery.
That alone would be the cause of death.
But how did he get them?
- So there is a crime involved?
- I don't know, I just got him in.
It could just be from his helmet strap.
But in my whole medical career, I've never seen anything like it.
But you can stay for the autopsy.
I'll give you answers as they come up.
Thanks, but no thanks.
Why don't you call me when you know?
I have a bit of a problem with dissected people.
You do, do you?
Well, I'll call you as soon as I find out more.
- You have my number, right?
- Oh yes.
Hello, darling, it's me...
No, your husband!
I have to work late today.
This thing just came in...
Well, a corpse, obviously.
And yes, I know how the microwave oven works.
And say hello to your choir leader.
Bye.
Gerhard!
Good Lord!
You've worked with dead people for too long.
Doctors don't have to work with living human beings, if they don't want to.
How can I help you?
- I will take over this autopsy.
- Take over?
- Yes, if you don't mind.
- I was a bit surprised, that's all.
I thought maybe I should get back to field work again.
And I overheard your conversation...
Lisbeth is going out tonight, and she's put something in the fridge for me to heat up.
But I've forgotten what it was.
And she said I absolutely shouldn't take the... whatever it was.
The little problems of everyday life.
Hurry on home then!
Thanks.
I owe you one.
Don't mention it.
That police officer, Jacob, was here.
He wanted to see the report.
I've got his number here somewhere.
- I'll take care of that.
- OK.
Thanks again, Beckert.
May the Lord have mercy on your soul!
- Déjà vu.
- Do you always stand there?
- So, you thought about it?
- The corpse?
No, thanks.
- No, the party.
You're going?
- Who are you?
- Vega.
- Saga.
You're joking?
Vega and Saga?
That's like Smith Jones, or Bonnie Clyde.
It must be an omen.
Something cosmic.
- Are you on medication?
- Not at the moment.
What about the party?
It'll be fun.
You'll get a chance to meet people.
What kind of people?
Patients from your ward?
No, sound people with healthy bodily fluids.
- I'll think about it.
- Good.
Don't be scared of strangers.
Well, now you've detained me long enough.
Ta-ta!
Hello?
Damn!
- Weren't you supposed to make soup?
- There are no spoons.
They must be in one of these boxes, somewhere.
Have you seen the mixer?
- What?
- The mixer, the blue one.
- I don't think we have a blue mixer.
- Oh, come on.
The blue mixer!
No, I haven't seen it.
Maybe it got lost?
What if someone took it?
One of the removal guys?
I'm sure it's at the bottom of a box somewhere, along with the spoons.
There's a film on tonight.
French, I think.
Want to watch?
Yes...
No, I'm going out tonight.
Really?
Well, I probably don't have the time either.
- But you must have seen it?
- The film?
The mixer!
You made milk shakes with it.
I haven't made milk shakes since junior high!
It's blue, anyway.
Do you know what I found?
The Soda Stream I got when I was in junior high!
What's that?
I don't know.
I took it from professor Beckert.
Can I have a look at it?
- Oh...
It's one of those!
- You know what it is?
I knew a guy who used to sell these at parties.
Great stuff.
- How do you mean?
- Great fun, will save any party.
Like ganja, but without the smoke.
You want to try it?
OK.
Give it here then.
- For fuck's sake!
I was just kidding.
- It tastes like shit!
Are you out of your mind?
You can't just swallow any pills...
And you shouldn't trick people like that.
Wait...
Something's happening.
- What?
- My head's swimming.
Sebastian?
Sebastian?
Fuck!
- You all right, Lukas?
- It's fun until someone gets hurt.
Have another pill, why don't you?
Saga?
Could you come over and help me, please?
- What is it?
- Are you going out?
Yes, I was invited to a party.
I told you.
Invited to a party already?
What's that, a personal record?
- What do you need my help for?
- This.
It's not working.
Move that card there.
I'm amazed I didn't see that.
Will you be out late?
I don't think so.
You're working the night shift anyway, aren't you?
The whole place seems to be full of mental head cases.
- Isn't that a tautology?
- What?
No, forget it.
It's great you got to know people already!
Yes, a few.
It's nice to have friends who aren't removal men.
Removal men may be useful, but you don't go and see a movie with them.
- Let's pick out clothes for you!
- I've chosen some already.
Don't be silly.
Come on, let's go!
How are the larvae?
You are eatimg larvae.
How do they taste?
A big boy like you have mothimg to worry about.
- Tell her I've gome out.
- Marit has beem dead for 20 years.
I'm aware ofthat.
I have a terrible headache.
Go get it!
I'm looking for a ball.
Have you seen my ball?
No.
Come on!
Come here, boy!
Talking dogs...
There's not a bloody thing written about talking dogs!
Hello?
Hello?
- Jesus Christ, you scared me!
- Sorry.
- What did you do?
You're all...
- It's just a bit of... ketchup.
- Shouldn't you get ready?
- For what?
- For dinner with my parents.
- Oh, bloody hell!
I just wanted to make sure you hadn't forgotten about it.
- No, don't worry.
- OK, see you at our place, then?
Yes, of course.
- Take a shower, for God's sake.
- Don't worry, Cornelia!
Where did Rufus go?
- Rufus!
- Hey!
You!
Mr. Smartypants!
- Look what I found!
- Rufus, don't touch it!
- Anything on the floor is mine!
- I need it, OK?
What are you screaming about?
What are you doing?
- Did he poo on the carpet?
- No, but he...
- Pull yourself together, Sebastian!
- But there's dog hair all over the...
Don't be late, please!
My parents like people who are on time.
Come on, Rufus!
- Get a grip!
- You're going to burn!
Burn!
OK then.
See you later!
Hello?
Mr. Dope Fiend?
Thank God!
I was completely sure I'd missed you!
- Were you able to get me anything?
- Get you what?
For the party.
I called a week ago.
Don't let me down now.
- I'm sorry, Vega, I forgot.
- You forgot?
I gave you money!
I'll give it back to you tomorrow.
The party's tonight!
What the hell am I supposed to do?
- I can get you some laughing gas.
- I want to party, not give birth.
- And why are you still at home?
- I live here.
Weren't you going to Cornelia's parents?
- Oh, shit!
She's going to kill me!
- Serves you right.
I have to run.
I have to take a shower.
You'll get your money tomorrow.
I just don't have time right now.
I'm sorry, Vega.
- Professor Beckert?
- Someone's been in my private lab!
She bit me!
Your patient, the comatose woman.
- She bit me!
- May I see that?
Here.
Press this against the wound.
Come on.
Ring the door bell.
You're just a little late.
- You must be Sebastian.
Welcome!
- Thank you.
Watch out, or Hampus will jump out through the door.
- My name is Eva.
- Nice to meet you.
Why don't you hang your clothes over there?
Dinner will be ready soon.
What's wrong with you?
- What?
- What's wrong with you?
Get lost, monkey-boy!
Hi, honey.
How are you doing?
I'm fine...
I have to... where's the bathroom?
- That door over there...
Are you OK?
- I feel great.
Get focused.
Hello?
Hello?
- Aloha, baby!
- What do you think?
- Kinky.
- Could you sort anything out?
Yes, but I don't know if we should.
I feel a bit bad about it.
I nicked them from Sebastian.
- Fuck him, if he can't take a joke.
- Where is everybody?
They're on their way.
Cornelia and Sebastian will show up later.
People should start arriving soon.
And here they are!
- Hi there!
- Wait till you see what I've got.
I'll take whatever's behind door number three!
That's awesome!
I want to try.
My precious!
Anyone there?
That wasn't funny!
Bad dog!
Don't you see you're scaring the girl?
Hello there.
We haven't met.
Hi...
Nice to meet you.
- Are you all right?
Yeah, sure.
My collar's too tight.
Can't really breathe.
I remember meeting Eva's parents for the first time.
Sweating like a pig.
Come on, let's go to the dining room.
- I can't.
I can't take one.
- What do you mean you can't?
I've taken medicine for my asthma, and I can't mix it with Ecstasy!
I can barely do alcohol as it is...
After all this hype you're just going to "say no"?
And this isn't even Ecstasy!
We don't know what it is.
Are you sure it's compatible with my medicine?
"Compatible with my asthma medicine!" Give me a break!
Here you go, Vega.
I'll see what happens to you first.
Then I might take one.
I don't want to end up in hospital.
What the fuck!
Can someone please do drugs properly here?
- Hello.
I took one.
- Oh, shut up.
We raise our eyes to you in hope, and you give us our food when it is due.
You open your hand and satisfy every living creature with your kindness.
- Gloryfied be Thy name.
Amen.
- Amen.
Dinner is served.
I hope you like sea trout braised in garlic.
Looks delicious.
Come in!
- We haven't met, but...
- I know, you're Vega's mystery date!
Glad to see you here.
My name is John.
And I'm not really Vega's "date".
Not a sound, Annika...
- Dance?
- Maybe later, but probably never.
- Cool!
- You seem a bit off.
No, I'm fine.
It's just that...
I have this weird feeling.
I have a feeling this is going to be a great party!
Just chill out a bit.
How are we doing?
Isn't it time we let loose the mad dogs of hell?
- Vega, your date's here.
Cute girl.
- I know.
- John, where can I smoke?
- Allow me to show you.
Come on, join the fun!
I'll go and get some more.
- Saga, darling!
You came!
- But of course.
You'll have the time of your life!
Have you had some punch?
Come on.
Is it too much to ask what the hell is going on here?
Answer me, for fuck's sake!
You demented bastard!
- ApologiZe.
- I am sorry.
Say it with more feeling, as if you really mean it.
I am really sorry.
- Where are the pills?
- What?
- Where are the pills?
- What pills?
You have no idea, do you?
You might feel a slight sting.
Who are you?
Who the hell are you, and what the hell is going on?
- Calm down, Annika.
- Explain!
You want me to explain.
Then I'll tell you.
On the Eastern front in 44, we took refuge in a cabin.
But we couldn't hide from what we found there.
Beckert...
Grab her arms and we'll drag her outside.
We'll get some firewood and burn it to hell!
That was my last night as a human being.
As a soldier I had to kill many times before.
But that night I killed and drank blood for the first time.
And the only one who left the cabin with me was of the same kind as I.
When the Third Reich fell, and the German army surrendered -
- I headed back to Sweden, with what I claimed to be my daughter.
We started a new life here.
You're joking, right?
You want me to believe that you're a vampire?
- You can believe whatever you want.
- I think you're completely...
You're suffering from schizophrenic...
My God!
- Don't move!
I swear, I'II...
- Kill me?
Can you do that?
Go ahead and try, Annika.
Stab me.
Straight through my heart!
I'm on to you, John.
I know what you are.
You're a lemon.
I always thought of myself as a mango.
OK, Freud, what do you mean?
People might be attracted to your nice round shape, and bright yellow colour.
But they run away, when they realize that you're bitter and sour inside.
You go well with drinks, though.
Sebastian?
Are you all right?
- Sebastian?
- Yes, I'm coming.
In a minute.
Sebastian, open this door!
I'm not feeling well, and I would like to go home now, thank you.
Where's my rabbit?
Good work, Sebastian.
I've always hated that bloody rabbit!
- How did you get to know Vega?
- Everyone knows Vega.
She's a nice girl, and not as mad as she seems.
She just wants to make a cool impression.
That guy definitely can't handle his drink!
Cornelia, darling!
Where's Sebastian?
I am now going to drink my brains out!
I don't fucking care where Sebastian is or what the hell he's doing.
Come on, Ceasar, do your business.
Well, hello there!
I think it's only fair for you to know I carry mace in my handbag.
Calm down, will you?
I'm not feeling well, I have to go home.
- Drink some water.
- No, I'm serious.
I think it's those pills.
There's something weird about them.
What pills have you taken?
Something is very wrong!
He's just had a bit too much to drink.
Joel, I'll take you to the bathroom.
Come on.
- I've got to go to the bathroom.
- OK, I'll keep your seat.
I wish we had met under different circumstances.
The comatose woman?
Is she one of you?
She's my guinea pig.
I've tried to find a treatment for this curse.
Being a vampire has many drawbacks.
But now I've changed my research.
Instead of trying to destroy my vampire genes, I've started to improve them.
So you're trying to cross humans with vampires?
You see.
You really understand me.
My little blood supply.
Thanks to her, I have access to vampire blood.
And human blood is always obtainable.
You're using her!
I tried to cure her, but she was too stubborn.
I'm the latest model.
She's stuck in the past.
I'm close to perfection.
She's just a stepping stone for the new species.
Just like you.
You're stuck in the past too.
You're her kind.
What do you mean by that?
Her kind?
Look at yourself!
Feel it!
You must realize what happened to you?
You overpowered me even though you should be physically inferior!
It's busy, OK?
Come on!
My eyes hurt!
Please turn out the light.
OK, I'll turn it out.
But we can't stay in here for ever.
How do you feel?
Joel?
I'm turning the light on.
Joel?
Joel!
Open the door!
Open the door!
This is Cemtral.
Callimg Umit D2.
Over.
D2 listening, on Main Street.
Over.
Could you please have a look atsomethimg?
Over.
- Is it importamt?
Over.
- It's very importamt, yes.
Over.
OK, we're on our way.
Over and out.
To think I moved here to wind down...
What happened?
- The blood isn't mine.
- So, whose is it?
A poodle's.
You won't believe this.
A hysterical old lady is being sedated in the staff room.
We have this guy in a cell who's beyond description.
The old lady was holding a leash that ended up in a pile of blood-soaked fur.
Next to her is this guy, apologizing.
He's saying: "I'm so sorry, I didn't mean to!"
The old lady is devastated, demanding we arrest him for killing her dog.
- Ceasar.
- Ceasar.
Seems like this guy did horrible things to Ceasar.
- What do we have to do with this?
- You have to check this guy out.
- Sebastian.
- His name is Sebastian.
Hello?
Hello?
Give me the keys.
- To what?
- The cell.
I'll check him out.
I don't think that's a good idea.
I think I have enough training to deal with a lapdog killer.
Give me the keys.
If you're going in there, you'll need some equipment.
- Ready?
- Ready.
What are you doing?
- Loading up with teargas.
- I can see that, but why?
- I might have to pull you out.
- You must be joking?
- You don't know what's in there.
- Yes I do:
A pet killer.
What do you use against hardened criminals?
Anti-aircraft guns?
Let me in.
OK.
Very funny.
Teenage werewolves, dead lapdogs...
Is this a typical Lapland joke?
Get on top of him!
Use the shield!
Incoming!
My eyes!
- I'm sorry.
I thought that...
- That shit really hurts!
You scared me!
- What are you doing?
!
- One more step and I'll do it again!
- Why?
- You're a demon!
- No, I'm not.
- You have red eyes and fangs!
It's the latest fashion.
Stay away!
If I'd known you'd get that mad, I wouldn't have done anything at all.
How are you doing?
You look a little pale.
Need anything?
A cup of blood, maybe?
Shut up!
You will feel the symptoms soon.
Your immune system won't know what hit it.
Surprisingly enough, the virus is in fact a rhabdovirus.
Similar to rabies, but a lot more aggressive.
Please, don't do this!
The virus is doing things to your DNA that you could never imagine.
Just the discovery of its effects on blood cells would give me a Nobel prize in medicine!
But sod the Medicine prize!
When I'm done, our kind will rule over all of you, like the cattle you are!
Don't worry, little one, it'll be OK.
Run!
I'm calling the police.
Hello, sorry for calling this late.
My name is Kajsa Falck.
Across the street there's a bunch of drunken teenagers making an awful racket so I can't sleep.
They're even climbing the walls.
They are junkies and dealers all of them, playing hip hop and hop hip and I've had quite enough of it!
Number 3, Park Street.
Thank you very much, bye.
Awoman called complaining about teenagers climbing the walls.
Do you remember any part of basic training preparing you for this?
Kids crawling on the ceiling, killing little dogs?
No.
But maybe I just cut that class.
What's going on here then?
What seems to be the problem?
Who lives in this house?
Hey.
You really have to...
Call for so much fucking backup!
- You've got the handcuff keys?
- No.
- I know what you are!
- You're holding them like an X.
Try something else.
Stop throwing gnomes at me!
What a totally uncool way to die...
Say something!
- Something...
- Are you OK?
Police!
Stop or we'll open fire!
Get her out of here!
This just isn't happening.
Don't worry.
It'll soon be over.
Dawn is just a month away.
What's your name?
My name is Saga.
What's yours?
My name's Maria.
Mother says we'll be sisters and we will always be together.
You'll never be alone.
Mother says you never liked it here anyway...
Hannes!
Hannes!
Jochen!
Come back!
He's dead!
It's me...
Jochen.
Take my...
Aksel, faster!
We're going to die!
We're going to die!
Get a grip, Rauni!
You're not going to die!
No one else is going to die!
You never give up, do you?
You always have to be the hero.
The fucking hero!
Karl, how are we doing?
I can't see them anymore.
I think they are regrouping.
This could be our chance.
It'll get dark any moment.
If we can get to the forest, we can escape in the dark.
Always the optimist...
But we have no choice.
UKRAINE, 1944
The German Army Scandinavian Volunteer Division:
SS panzer Division Wiking.
Separated from their unit.
Lost and freezing.
The stove is still hot...
They must have fled when they saw us coming...
Schröder, clear the entrance of snow.
I thought we'd stand watch in twos, but I think we all need some sleep.
- I can take the first shift on my own.
- Gerhard, what happened before...
Isn't it time you started speaking German like everyone else?
Shut the fuck up!
Beckert?
- Beckert, are you awake?
- Elsie?
- I was thinking of something.
- What?
What is it?
If the door and windows were jammed with snow...
How did they get out?
The people who live here...
How did they get out?
Rauni!
If the door and windows were jammed with snow how did the people who live here get out?
- Through the chimney?
- Wake up Aksel!
Aksel?
Wake up!
Aksel?
Jesus Christ!
What the bloody hell was that?
- I think I got it!
- Did you hit it or didn't you?
- I don't know.
I think so.
- We'll just have to go and see.
No way I'm going in there again!
So what do we do?
freeze to death?
I'll have a look.
Cover me.
You're the hero, mate...
That thing had better be dead!
Are you OK?
Give me a light!
Karl, the lamp!
MARIA
I need help down here!
Get the spade!
Get the spade now!
We need something heavy!
FROSTBITE
Bloody morons!
Saga, when you get your license, promise you won't drive like that.
I fell, and I can't get up...
But, honey, I told you we would take that together.
I brought it up here, didn't I?
- What do you think?
- About what?
The apartment.
Everything will be fine, you'll see.
Once the furniture gets here.
Do we really need furniture?
We could just cover everything in plastic and eat from the floor.
So this is the reason we moved to this dump?
Yes, Gerhard Beckert.
He is a leading figure in genetic science.
He also happens to look like a moron.
Stop being so grumpy, please.
Well, I suppose maybe it won't look as bad in the daytime.
I told you they have polar night up here.
No daylight for a month.
I'll go and get more stuff from the car.
You're coming?
I should've moved in with dad instead...
Are you OK?
What?
I'm fine...
This isn't the first time.
Well, that's lucky.
Try and be more careful next time, OK?
- Asshole!
- I heard that.
It's 6.30, amd here'sthe local mews.
Ayoumg mam wasfoumd dead.
Accordimg to the police...
It was all renovated in 1984.
The mental institution was connected to the main building.
The old premises from the 50's are more or less intact.
We can visit the electric shock therapy room later.
After lunch maybe.
That corridor leads back to the foyer.
This way is the eye clinic.
We'll go this way and come back here later.
And here we keep...
Jesus Christ!
What the hell is going on here?
!
Creative anatomy studies?
We don't want to see any of that!
Is that clear?
Throw syringes again, and I'll give you creative anatomy studies, OK?
Start working on your haemophobia instead, if you want to be a doctor!
- It won't happen again, sorry.
- Good.
Wheelchair racing.
Anesthetic in the cocktails at our office party.
I don't even want to imagine...
Those blasted budget cuts.
Doctors are either wet behind the ears, or they've got one foot in the grave.
Never mind.
This way...
- What's the bullseye?
- The spleen.
Gerhard...
May I introduce our new colleague:
Annika Wallén.
It's a pleasure to meet you.
You are the main reason I applied for this job.
Oh, really?
I thought it was because of me.
So, you're interested in genetic research, then?
I'm still somewhat of an amateur in that area.
Good.
I don't trust experts.
Amateurs are passionate about their work.
I'm busy right now, but we should meet and talk some more on the subject.
I'm looking forward to that.
That's Gerhard's private patient.
His only patient, in fact.
Car accident.
She's been in a coma for over a year.
Déjà vu.
I had the weirdest dream last night.
I was washing the dishes.
But everything was so brittle, that it all just broke.
But I just went on until the water was colored with blood.
- What do you think of that?
- Of what?
The dream...
What does it mean?
- Do I know you?
- You have my old locker.
- Voila!
You got a light?
- You can't smoke in here, can you?
No worries, I've got one.
- You just have to come to the party.
- Thanks, but I'm not invited.
I'm inviting you now.
There, you're invited.
Officially.
Anyway, did you hear about the guy who got killed?
No.
I know a guy at the hospital.
We can go look at the corpse.
No, I have class now...
Besides, it sounds like a horribly bad idea.
You don't have to answer now.
Give it some time, think about it.
Bring a camera, so we can take photographs.
If you have to smoke, you'll have to do it over there!
Yes, yes, yes.
Rules, rules, rules.
Fascism, fascism, fascism.
I confess!
It was me.
Put me away.
I'm a danger to society!
I need a good talking to, and heavy medication!
You'd better handcuff me.
- Dress warmer and put that out.
- Do you think you'll catch him?
- Who?
- You know who.
The killer.
No one has said anything about murder.
And you should show more respect for the dead.
It's my parents.
It pains me to turn them in.
But justice must be served.
Lock them up and throw away the key.
Run along now, will you?
I'm sure you have a class now anyway.
- Yo, mama!
- WhaZZup, motherfucker?
- So what do you think about it?
- About what?
- Sander Carlsson is dead!
- You're bullshitting me!
- But we saw him yesterday!
- When did you see him?
The cops asked if I'd seen anything.
What was I supposed to say?
"I saw him driving down a foot path at 100 kph".
- Haven't you been questioned?
- No.
What happened to him?
They've been looking for you, you just haven't heard anything.
Because of your humongous headphones.
They'll give you neck injuries.
- Can anyone tell me what happened?
- He crashed, I suppose...
- Wasn't that just a question of time?
- How are the party preparations going?
This will be the most awesome party!
People will talk about it for weeks.
Just make sure that some of the house still stands when we get there.
- We're having dinner with my parents.
- Cornelia and her beloved Sebastian.
I invited this girl to the party.
You'll like her, such a nice girl!
When did you see Sander Carlsson?
12 HOURS EARLIER
Rick Allen isn't the drummer of Iron Maiden!
- So who is?
- Nicko McBrain plays in Maiden.
- You just made that name up.
- You're thinking of Def Leppard.
- And the difference is?
- He's only got one arm!
How could anyone play the drums with just one arm?
- Can you get something for the party?
- Sure.
I've got contacts.
- Isn't he doing community service?
- It's ironic, isn't it?
He gets community service for doing the community a service!
No worries, though, I've got a new contact.
We can't have that!
Overtake them!
Burn them off the road!
Wow!
Déjà vu.
If the cops see us, your license is history!
Wasn't that Sander?
Who else?
Christ, the way he drives!
It's a wonder he's survived this long!
Well...
To begin with, we have a penetrating skull trauma.
But that's not what's bothering me.
Any idiot can pick up one of those.
- What's really interesting is this.
- What's that?
Dermatic perforations at a 35mm distance of Arteria carotis communis.
Really?
Could you run that by me one more time, in normal language?
Two holes right into his main artery.
That alone would be the cause of death.
But how did he get them?
- So there is a crime involved?
- I don't know, I just got him in.
It could just be from his helmet strap.
But in my whole medical career, I've never seen anything like it.
But you can stay for the autopsy.
I'll give you answers as they come up.
Thanks, but no thanks.
Why don't you call me when you know?
I have a bit of a problem with dissected people.
You do, do you?
Well, I'll call you as soon as I find out more.
- You have my number, right?
- Oh yes.
Hello, darling, it's me...
No, your husband!
I have to work late today.
This thing just came in...
Well, a corpse, obviously.
And yes, I know how the microwave oven works.
And say hello to your choir leader.
Bye.
Gerhard!
Good Lord!
You've worked with dead people for too long.
Doctors don't have to work with living human beings, if they don't want to.
How can I help you?
- I will take over this autopsy.
- Take over?
- Yes, if you don't mind.
- I was a bit surprised, that's all.
I thought maybe I should get back to field work again.
And I overheard your conversation...
Lisbeth is going out tonight, and she's put something in the fridge for me to heat up.
But I've forgotten what it was.
And she said I absolutely shouldn't take the... whatever it was.
The little problems of everyday life.
Hurry on home then!
Thanks.
I owe you one.
Don't mention it.
That police officer, Jacob, was here.
He wanted to see the report.
I've got his number here somewhere.
- I'll take care of that.
- OK.
Thanks again, Beckert.
May the Lord have mercy on your soul!
- Déjà vu.
- Do you always stand there?
- So, you thought about it?
- The corpse?
No, thanks.
- No, the party.
You're going?
- Who are you?
- Vega.
- Saga.
You're joking?
Vega and Saga?
That's like Smith Jones, or Bonnie Clyde.
It must be an omen.
Something cosmic.
- Are you on medication?
- Not at the moment.
What about the party?
It'll be fun.
You'll get a chance to meet people.
What kind of people?
Patients from your ward?
No, sound people with healthy bodily fluids.
- I'll think about it.
- Good.
Don't be scared of strangers.
Well, now you've detained me long enough.
Ta-ta!
Hello?
Damn!
- Weren't you supposed to make soup?
- There are no spoons.
They must be in one of these boxes, somewhere.
Have you seen the mixer?
- What?
- The mixer, the blue one.
- I don't think we have a blue mixer.
- Oh, come on.
The blue mixer!
No, I haven't seen it.
Maybe it got lost?
What if someone took it?
One of the removal guys?
I'm sure it's at the bottom of a box somewhere, along with the spoons.
There's a film on tonight.
French, I think.
Want to watch?
Yes...
No, I'm going out tonight.
Really?
Well, I probably don't have the time either.
- But you must have seen it?
- The film?
The mixer!
You made milk shakes with it.
I haven't made milk shakes since junior high!
It's blue, anyway.
Do you know what I found?
The Soda Stream I got when I was in junior high!
What's that?
I don't know.
I took it from professor Beckert.
Can I have a look at it?
- Oh...
It's one of those!
- You know what it is?
I knew a guy who used to sell these at parties.
Great stuff.
- How do you mean?
- Great fun, will save any party.
Like ganja, but without the smoke.
You want to try it?
OK.
Give it here then.
- For fuck's sake!
I was just kidding.
- It tastes like shit!
Are you out of your mind?
You can't just swallow any pills...
And you shouldn't trick people like that.
Wait...
Something's happening.
- What?
- My head's swimming.
Sebastian?
Sebastian?
Fuck!
- You all right, Lukas?
- It's fun until someone gets hurt.
Have another pill, why don't you?
Saga?
Could you come over and help me, please?
- What is it?
- Are you going out?
Yes, I was invited to a party.
I told you.
Invited to a party already?
What's that, a personal record?
- What do you need my help for?
- This.
It's not working.
Move that card there.
I'm amazed I didn't see that.
Will you be out late?
I don't think so.
You're working the night shift anyway, aren't you?
The whole place seems to be full of mental head cases.
- Isn't that a tautology?
- What?
No, forget it.
It's great you got to know people already!
Yes, a few.
It's nice to have friends who aren't removal men.
Removal men may be useful, but you don't go and see a movie with them.
- Let's pick out clothes for you!
- I've chosen some already.
Don't be silly.
Come on, let's go!
How are the larvae?
You are eatimg larvae.
How do they taste?
A big boy like you have mothimg to worry about.
- Tell her I've gome out.
- Marit has beem dead for 20 years.
I'm aware ofthat.
I have a terrible headache.
Go get it!
I'm looking for a ball.
Have you seen my ball?
No.
Come on!
Come here, boy!
Talking dogs...
There's not a bloody thing written about talking dogs!
Hello?
Hello?
- Jesus Christ, you scared me!
- Sorry.
- What did you do?
You're all...
- It's just a bit of... ketchup.
- Shouldn't you get ready?
- For what?
- For dinner with my parents.
- Oh, bloody hell!
I just wanted to make sure you hadn't forgotten about it.
- No, don't worry.
- OK, see you at our place, then?
Yes, of course.
- Take a shower, for God's sake.
- Don't worry, Cornelia!
Where did Rufus go?
- Rufus!
- Hey!
You!
Mr. Smartypants!
- Look what I found!
- Rufus, don't touch it!
- Anything on the floor is mine!
- I need it, OK?
What are you screaming about?
What are you doing?
- Did he poo on the carpet?
- No, but he...
- Pull yourself together, Sebastian!
- But there's dog hair all over the...
Don't be late, please!
My parents like people who are on time.
Come on, Rufus!
- Get a grip!
- You're going to burn!
Burn!
OK then.
See you later!
Hello?
Mr. Dope Fiend?
Thank God!
I was completely sure I'd missed you!
- Were you able to get me anything?
- Get you what?
For the party.
I called a week ago.
Don't let me down now.
- I'm sorry, Vega, I forgot.
- You forgot?
I gave you money!
I'll give it back to you tomorrow.
The party's tonight!
What the hell am I supposed to do?
- I can get you some laughing gas.
- I want to party, not give birth.
- And why are you still at home?
- I live here.
Weren't you going to Cornelia's parents?
- Oh, shit!
She's going to kill me!
- Serves you right.
I have to run.
I have to take a shower.
You'll get your money tomorrow.
I just don't have time right now.
I'm sorry, Vega.
- Professor Beckert?
- Someone's been in my private lab!
She bit me!
Your patient, the comatose woman.
- She bit me!
- May I see that?
Here.
Press this against the wound.
Come on.
Ring the door bell.
You're just a little late.
- You must be Sebastian.
Welcome!
- Thank you.
Watch out, or Hampus will jump out through the door.
- My name is Eva.
- Nice to meet you.
Why don't you hang your clothes over there?
Dinner will be ready soon.
What's wrong with you?
- What?
- What's wrong with you?
Get lost, monkey-boy!
Hi, honey.
How are you doing?
I'm fine...
I have to... where's the bathroom?
- That door over there...
Are you OK?
- I feel great.
Get focused.
Hello?
Hello?
- Aloha, baby!
- What do you think?
- Kinky.
- Could you sort anything out?
Yes, but I don't know if we should.
I feel a bit bad about it.
I nicked them from Sebastian.
- Fuck him, if he can't take a joke.
- Where is everybody?
They're on their way.
Cornelia and Sebastian will show up later.
People should start arriving soon.
And here they are!
- Hi there!
- Wait till you see what I've got.
I'll take whatever's behind door number three!
That's awesome!
I want to try.
My precious!
Anyone there?
That wasn't funny!
Bad dog!
Don't you see you're scaring the girl?
Hello there.
We haven't met.
Hi...
Nice to meet you.
- Are you all right?
Yeah, sure.
My collar's too tight.
Can't really breathe.
I remember meeting Eva's parents for the first time.
Sweating like a pig.
Come on, let's go to the dining room.
- I can't.
I can't take one.
- What do you mean you can't?
I've taken medicine for my asthma, and I can't mix it with Ecstasy!
I can barely do alcohol as it is...
After all this hype you're just going to "say no"?
And this isn't even Ecstasy!
We don't know what it is.
Are you sure it's compatible with my medicine?
"Compatible with my asthma medicine!" Give me a break!
Here you go, Vega.
I'll see what happens to you first.
Then I might take one.
I don't want to end up in hospital.
What the fuck!
Can someone please do drugs properly here?
- Hello.
I took one.
- Oh, shut up.
We raise our eyes to you in hope, and you give us our food when it is due.
You open your hand and satisfy every living creature with your kindness.
- Gloryfied be Thy name.
Amen.
- Amen.
Dinner is served.
I hope you like sea trout braised in garlic.
Looks delicious.
Come in!
- We haven't met, but...
- I know, you're Vega's mystery date!
Glad to see you here.
My name is John.
And I'm not really Vega's "date".
Not a sound, Annika...
- Dance?
- Maybe later, but probably never.
- Cool!
- You seem a bit off.
No, I'm fine.
It's just that...
I have this weird feeling.
I have a feeling this is going to be a great party!
Just chill out a bit.
How are we doing?
Isn't it time we let loose the mad dogs of hell?
- Vega, your date's here.
Cute girl.
- I know.
- John, where can I smoke?
- Allow me to show you.
Come on, join the fun!
I'll go and get some more.
- Saga, darling!
You came!
- But of course.
You'll have the time of your life!
Have you had some punch?
Come on.
Is it too much to ask what the hell is going on here?
Answer me, for fuck's sake!
You demented bastard!
- ApologiZe.
- I am sorry.
Say it with more feeling, as if you really mean it.
I am really sorry.
- Where are the pills?
- What?
- Where are the pills?
- What pills?
You have no idea, do you?
You might feel a slight sting.
Who are you?
Who the hell are you, and what the hell is going on?
- Calm down, Annika.
- Explain!
You want me to explain.
Then I'll tell you.
On the Eastern front in 44, we took refuge in a cabin.
But we couldn't hide from what we found there.
Beckert...
Grab her arms and we'll drag her outside.
We'll get some firewood and burn it to hell!
That was my last night as a human being.
As a soldier I had to kill many times before.
But that night I killed and drank blood for the first time.
And the only one who left the cabin with me was of the same kind as I.
When the Third Reich fell, and the German army surrendered -
- I headed back to Sweden, with what I claimed to be my daughter.
We started a new life here.
You're joking, right?
You want me to believe that you're a vampire?
- You can believe whatever you want.
- I think you're completely...
You're suffering from schizophrenic...
My God!
- Don't move!
I swear, I'II...
- Kill me?
Can you do that?
Go ahead and try, Annika.
Stab me.
Straight through my heart!
I'm on to you, John.
I know what you are.
You're a lemon.
I always thought of myself as a mango.
OK, Freud, what do you mean?
People might be attracted to your nice round shape, and bright yellow colour.
But they run away, when they realize that you're bitter and sour inside.
You go well with drinks, though.
Sebastian?
Are you all right?
- Sebastian?
- Yes, I'm coming.
In a minute.
Sebastian, open this door!
I'm not feeling well, and I would like to go home now, thank you.
Where's my rabbit?
Good work, Sebastian.
I've always hated that bloody rabbit!
- How did you get to know Vega?
- Everyone knows Vega.
She's a nice girl, and not as mad as she seems.
She just wants to make a cool impression.
That guy definitely can't handle his drink!
Cornelia, darling!
Where's Sebastian?
I am now going to drink my brains out!
I don't fucking care where Sebastian is or what the hell he's doing.
Come on, Ceasar, do your business.
Well, hello there!
I think it's only fair for you to know I carry mace in my handbag.
Calm down, will you?
I'm not feeling well, I have to go home.
- Drink some water.
- No, I'm serious.
I think it's those pills.
There's something weird about them.
What pills have you taken?
Something is very wrong!
He's just had a bit too much to drink.
Joel, I'll take you to the bathroom.
Come on.
- I've got to go to the bathroom.
- OK, I'll keep your seat.
I wish we had met under different circumstances.
The comatose woman?
Is she one of you?
She's my guinea pig.
I've tried to find a treatment for this curse.
Being a vampire has many drawbacks.
But now I've changed my research.
Instead of trying to destroy my vampire genes, I've started to improve them.
So you're trying to cross humans with vampires?
You see.
You really understand me.
My little blood supply.
Thanks to her, I have access to vampire blood.
And human blood is always obtainable.
You're using her!
I tried to cure her, but she was too stubborn.
I'm the latest model.
She's stuck in the past.
I'm close to perfection.
She's just a stepping stone for the new species.
Just like you.
You're stuck in the past too.
You're her kind.
What do you mean by that?
Her kind?
Look at yourself!
Feel it!
You must realize what happened to you?
You overpowered me even though you should be physically inferior!
It's busy, OK?
Come on!
My eyes hurt!
Please turn out the light.
OK, I'll turn it out.
But we can't stay in here for ever.
How do you feel?
Joel?
I'm turning the light on.
Joel?
Joel!
Open the door!
Open the door!
This is Cemtral.
Callimg Umit D2.
Over.
D2 listening, on Main Street.
Over.
Could you please have a look atsomethimg?
Over.
- Is it importamt?
Over.
- It's very importamt, yes.
Over.
OK, we're on our way.
Over and out.
To think I moved here to wind down...
What happened?
- The blood isn't mine.
- So, whose is it?
A poodle's.
You won't believe this.
A hysterical old lady is being sedated in the staff room.
We have this guy in a cell who's beyond description.
The old lady was holding a leash that ended up in a pile of blood-soaked fur.
Next to her is this guy, apologizing.
He's saying: "I'm so sorry, I didn't mean to!"
The old lady is devastated, demanding we arrest him for killing her dog.
- Ceasar.
- Ceasar.
Seems like this guy did horrible things to Ceasar.
- What do we have to do with this?
- You have to check this guy out.
- Sebastian.
- His name is Sebastian.
Hello?
Hello?
Give me the keys.
- To what?
- The cell.
I'll check him out.
I don't think that's a good idea.
I think I have enough training to deal with a lapdog killer.
Give me the keys.
If you're going in there, you'll need some equipment.
- Ready?
- Ready.
What are you doing?
- Loading up with teargas.
- I can see that, but why?
- I might have to pull you out.
- You must be joking?
- You don't know what's in there.
- Yes I do:
A pet killer.
What do you use against hardened criminals?
Anti-aircraft guns?
Let me in.
OK.
Very funny.
Teenage werewolves, dead lapdogs...
Is this a typical Lapland joke?
Get on top of him!
Use the shield!
Incoming!
My eyes!
- I'm sorry.
I thought that...
- That shit really hurts!
You scared me!
- What are you doing?
!
- One more step and I'll do it again!
- Why?
- You're a demon!
- No, I'm not.
- You have red eyes and fangs!
It's the latest fashion.
Stay away!
If I'd known you'd get that mad, I wouldn't have done anything at all.
How are you doing?
You look a little pale.
Need anything?
A cup of blood, maybe?
Shut up!
You will feel the symptoms soon.
Your immune system won't know what hit it.
Surprisingly enough, the virus is in fact a rhabdovirus.
Similar to rabies, but a lot more aggressive.
Please, don't do this!
The virus is doing things to your DNA that you could never imagine.
Just the discovery of its effects on blood cells would give me a Nobel prize in medicine!
But sod the Medicine prize!
When I'm done, our kind will rule over all of you, like the cattle you are!
Don't worry, little one, it'll be OK.
Run!
I'm calling the police.
Hello, sorry for calling this late.
My name is Kajsa Falck.
Across the street there's a bunch of drunken teenagers making an awful racket so I can't sleep.
They're even climbing the walls.
They are junkies and dealers all of them, playing hip hop and hop hip and I've had quite enough of it!
Number 3, Park Street.
Thank you very much, bye.
Awoman called complaining about teenagers climbing the walls.
Do you remember any part of basic training preparing you for this?
Kids crawling on the ceiling, killing little dogs?
No.
But maybe I just cut that class.
What's going on here then?
What seems to be the problem?
Who lives in this house?
Hey.
You really have to...
Call for so much fucking backup!
- You've got the handcuff keys?
- No.
- I know what you are!
- You're holding them like an X.
Try something else.
Stop throwing gnomes at me!
What a totally uncool way to die...
Say something!
- Something...
- Are you OK?
Police!
Stop or we'll open fire!
Get her out of here!
This just isn't happening.
Don't worry.
It'll soon be over.
Dawn is just a month away.
What's your name?
My name is Saga.
What's yours?
My name's Maria.
Mother says we'll be sisters and we will always be together.
You'll never be alone.
Mother says you never liked it here anyway...
Hannes!
Hannes!
Jochen!
Come back!
He's dead!
It's me...
Jochen.
Take my...
Aksel, faster!
We're going to die!
We're going to die!
Get a grip, Rauni!
You're not going to die!
No one else is going to die!
You never give up, do you?
You always have to be the hero.
The fucking hero!
Karl, how are we doing?
I can't see them anymore.
I think they are regrouping.
This could be our chance.
It'll get dark any moment.
If we can get to the forest, we can escape in the dark.
Always the optimist...
But we have no choice.
ukraine, 1944
The German Army Scandinavian Volunteer Division:
SS Panzer Division Wiking
Separated from their unit.
Lost and freezing.
The stove is still hot...
They must have fled when they saw us coming...
Schroder, clear the entrance of snow.
I thought we'd stand watch in twos, but I think we all need some sleep.
- I can take the first shift on my own.
- Gerhard, what happened before...
Isn't it time you started speaking German like everyone else?
Shut the fuck up!
Beckert?
- Beckert, are you awake?
- Elsie?
- I was thinking of something.
- What?
What is it?
If the door and windows were jammed with snow...
How did they get out?
The people who live here...
How did they get out?
Rauni!
If the door and windows were jammed with snow - how did the people who live here get out?
- Through the chimney?
- Wake up Aksel!
Aksel?
Wake up!
Aksel?
Jesus Christ!
What the bloody hell was that?
- I think I got it!
- Did you hit it or didn't you?
- I don't know.
I think so.
- We'll just have to go and see.
No way I'm going in there again!
So what do we do?
Freeze to death?
I'll have a look.
Cover me.
You're the hero, mate...
That thing had better be dead!
Are you OK?
Give me a light!
Karl, the lamp!
maria
I need help down here!
Get the spade!
Get the spade now!
We need something heavy!
Bloody morons!
Saga, when you get your license, promise you won't drive like that.
I fell, and I can't get up...
But, honey, I told you we would take that together.
I brought it up here, didn't I?
- What do you think?
- About what?
The apartment.
Everything will be fine, you'll see.
Once the furniture gets here.
Do we really need furniture?
We could just cover everything in plastic and eat off the floor.
So this is the reason we moved to this dump?
Yes, Gerhard Beckert.
He is a leading figure in genetic science.
He also happens to look like a moron.
Stop being so grumpy, please.
Well, I suppose maybe it won't look as bad in the daytime.
I told you they have polar night up here.
No daylight for a month.
I'll go and get more stuff from the car.
You're coming?
I should've moved in with dad instead...
Are you OK?
What?
I'm fine...
This isn't the first time.
Well, that's lucky.
Try and be more careful next time, OK?
- Asshole!
- I heard that.
It's 6.30, and here's the local news.
A young man was found dead.
According to the police...
It was all renovated in 1984.
The mental institution was connected to the main building.
The old premises from the 50's are more or less intact.
We can visit the electric shock therapy room later.
After lunch maybe.
That corridor leads back to the foyer.
This way is the eye clinic.
We'll go this way and come back here later.
And here we keep...
Jesus Christ!
What the hell is going on here?
Creative anatomy studies?
We don't want to see any of that!
Is that clear?
Throw syringes again, and I'll give you creative anatomy studies, OK?
Start working on your haemophobia instead, if you want to be a doctor!
- It won't happen again, sorry.
- Good.
Wheelchair racing.
Anaesthetic in the cocktails at our office party.
I don't even want to imagine...
Those blasted budget cuts.
Doctors are either wet behind the ears, or they've got one foot in the grave.
Never mind.
This way...
- What's the bulls eye?
- The spleen.
Gerhard...
May I introduce our new colleague, Annika Wallen.
It's a pleasure to meet you.
You are the main reason I applied for this job.
Oh, really?
I thought it was because of me.
So, you're interested in genetic research, then?
I'm still somewhat of an amateur in that area.
Good.
I don't trust experts.
Amateurs are passionate about their work.
I'm busy right now, but we should meet and talk some more on the subject.
I'm looking forward to that.
That's Gerhard's private patient.
His only patient, in fact.
Car accident.
She's been in a coma for over a year.
Deja vu.
I had the weirdest dream last night.
I was washing the dishes.
But everything was so brittle, that it all just broke.
But I just went on until the water was colored with blood.
- What do you think of that?
- Of what?
The dream...
What does it mean?
- Do I know you?
- You have my old locker.
- Voila!
You got a light?
- You can't smoke in here, can you?
No worries, I've got one.
- You just have to come to the party.
- Thanks, but I'm not invited.
I'm inviting you now.
There, you're invited.
Officially.
Anyway, did you hear about the guy who got killed?
No.
I know a guy at the hospital.
We can go look at the corpse.
No, I have class now...
Besides, it sounds like a horribly bad idea.
You don't have to answer now.
Give it some time, think about it.
Bring a camera, so we can take photographs.
If you have to smoke, you'll have to do it over there!
Yes, yes, yes.
Rules, rules, rules.
Fascism, fascism, fascism.
I confess!
It was me.
Put me away.
I'm a danger to society!
I need a good talking to, and heavy medication!
You'd better handcuff me.
- Dress warmer and put that out.
- Do you think you'll catch him?
- Who?
- You know who.
The killer.
No one has said anything about murder.
And you should show more respect for the dead.
It's my parents.
It pains me to turn them in.
But justice must be served.
Lock them up and throw away the key.
Run along now, will you?
I'm sure you have a class now anyway.
- What do you think about it?
- What?
Haven't you heard?
- Sander Carlsson is dead!
- You're bullshitting me!
- But we saw him yesterday!
- When did you see him?
The cops asked if I'd seen anything.
What was I supposed to say?
"l saw him driving down a foot path at 100 kph".
- Haven't you been questioned?
- No.
What happened to him?
They've been looking for you, you just haven't heard anything.
Because of your humongous headphones.
They'll give you neck injuries.
- Can anyone tell me what happened?
- He crashed, I suppose...
- Wasn't that just a question of time?
- How are the party preparations going?
This will be the most awesome party!
People will talk about it for weeks.
Make sure some of the house still stands when we get there.
- Why will you be late?
- We're having dinner with my parents.
Cornelia and her beloved Sebastian.
I invited this girl to the party.
You'll like her, such a nice girl!
When did you see Sander Carlsson?
1 2 HOURS earlier
Rick Allen isn't the drummer of lron Maiden!
- So who is?
- Nicko McBrain plays in Maiden.
- You just made that name up.
- You're thinking of Def Leppard.
- And the difference is...?
- He's only got one arm!
-You can't play drums with one arm!
-It's pointless talking to you.
- Can you get something for the party?
- Sure.
I've got contacts.
- lsn't he doing community service?
- It's ironic, isn't it?
He gets community service for doing the community a service!
No worries, though, I've got a new contact.
We can't have that!
Burn them off the road!
Deja vu.
If the cops see us, that's it.
Wasn't that Sander?
Who else?
Christ, the way he drives!
It's a wonder he's survived this long!
Well...
To begin with, we have a penetrating skull trauma.
But that's not what's bothering me.
Any idiot can pick up one of those.
- What's really interesting is this.
- What's that?
Dermatic perforations at a 35 mm distance of Arteria carotis communis.
Really?
Could you run that by me one more time, in plain language?
Two holes right into his main artery.
That alone would be the cause of death.
But how did he get them?
- So there is a crime involved?
- I don't know, I just got him in.
It could just be from his helmet strap.
But in my whole medical career, I've never seen anything like it.
But you can stay for the autopsy.
I'll give you answers as they come up.
Thanks, but no thanks.
Why don't you call me when you know?
I have a bit of a problem with dissected people.
You do, do you?
Well, I'll call you as soon as I find out more.
- You have my number, right?
- Oh yes.
Hello, darling, it's me...
No, your husband!
I have to work late today.
This thing just came in...
Well, a corpse, obviously.
And yes, I know how the microwave oven works.
And say hello to your choir leader.
Bye.
Gerhard!
Good Lord!
You've worked with dead people for too long.
Doctors don't have to work with living human beings, if they don't want to.
How can I help you?
- I will take over this autopsy.
- Take over?
- Yes, if you don't mind.
- It surprises me, that's all.
I thought maybe I should get back to field work again.
And I overheard your conversation...
Lisbeth is going out tonight, and she's put something in the fridge for me to heat up.
But I've forgotten what it was.
And she said I absolutely shouldn't take the...
Whatever it was.
The little problems of everyday life.
Hurry on home then!
Thanks.
I owe you one.
Don't mention it.
That police officer, Jacob, was here.
He wanted to see the report.
I've got his number here somewhere.
- I'll take care of that.
- OK.
Thanks again, Beckert.
May the Lord have mercy on your soul!
- Deja vu.
- Do you always stand there?
- So, you thought about it?
- The corpse?
No, thanks.
- No, the party.
You're going?
- Who are you?
- Vega.
- Saga.
You're joking?
Vega and Saga?
That's like Smith Jones, or Bonnie Clyde.
It must be an omen.
Something cosmic.
- Are you on medication?
- Not at the moment.
What about the party?
It'll be fun.
You'll get a chance to meet people.
What kind of people?
Patients from your ward?
No, just fit and healthy people.
- I'll think about it.
- Good.
Don't be scared of strangers.
Well, now you've detained me long enough.
Hello?
Damn!
- Weren't you supposed to make soup?
- There are no spoons.
They must be in one of these boxes, somewhere.
Have you seen the mixer?
- What?
- The mixer, the blue one.
- I don't think we have a blue mixer.
- Oh, come on.
The blue mixer!
No, I haven't seen it.
Maybe it got lost?
What if someone took it?
One of the removal guys?
I'm sure it's at the bottom of a box somewhere, along with the spoons.
There's a film on tonight.
French, I think.
Want to see it?
Yes...
No, I'm going out tonight.
Really?
Well, I probably don't have the time either.
- But you must have seen it?
- The film?
The mixer!
You made milk shakes with it.
I haven't made milk shakes since junior high!
It's blue, anyway.
Do you know what I found?
The Soda Stream I got when I was in junior high!
What's that?
I don't know.
I took it from professor Beckert.
Can I have a look at it?
- Oh...
It's one of those!
- You know what it is?
I knew a guy who used to sell these at parties.
Great stuff.
- How do you mean?
- Great fun, will save any party.
Like ganja, but without the smoke.
You want to try it?
OK.
Give it here then.
- For fuck's sake!
I was just kidding.
- It tastes like shit!
Are you out of your mind?
You can't just swallow any pills...
And you shouldn't trick people like that.
Wait...
Something's happening.
- What?
- My head's swimming.
Sebastian?
Fuck!
- You all right, Lukas?
- It's fun until someone gets hurt.
Have another pill, why don't you?
Saga?
Could you come over and help me, please?
- What is it?
- Are you going out?
Yes, I was invited to a party.
I told you.
Invited to a party already?
What's that, a personal record?
- What do you need my help for?
- This.
It's not working.
Move that card there.
I'm amazed I didn't see that.
Will you be out late?
I don't think so.
You're working the night shift anyway, aren't you?
The whole place seems to be full of mental head cases.
- lsn't that a tautology?
- What?
No, forget it.
It's great you got to know people already!
Yes, a few.
It's nice to have friends who aren't removal men.
Removal men may be useful, but you don't go and see a movie with them.
- Let's pick out clothes for you!
- I've chosen some already.
Don't be silly.
Come on, let's go!
How are the larvae?
You are eating larvae.
How do they taste?
- What have you been up to?
- Nothing.
What does that mean?
Explain yourself.
A big boy like you have nothing to worry about.
- Tell her I've gone out.
- Marit has been dead for 20 years.
I'm aware of that.
I have a terrible headache.
Go get it!
I'm looking for a ball.
Have you seen my ball?
No.
Come on!
Come here, boy!
Talking dogs...
There's not a bloody thing written about talking dogs!
Hello?
Hello?
- Jesus Christ, you scared me!
- Sorry.
- What did you do?
You're all...
- It's just a bit of...ketchup.
- Shouldn't you get ready?
- For what?
- For dinner with my parents.
- Oh, bloody hell!
I just wanted to make sure you hadn't forgotten about it.
- No, don't worry.
- OK, see you at my place, then?
Yes, of course.
- Take a shower, for God's sake.
- Don't worry, Cornelia!
Where did Rufus go?
- Rufus!
- Hey!
You!
Mr. Smartypants!
- Look what I found!
- Rufus, don't touch it!
- Anything on the floor is mine!
- I need it, OK?
What are you screaming about?
What are you doing?
- Did he poo on the carpet?
- No, but he...
- Pull yourself together, Sebastian!
- But there's dog hair all over the...
Don't be late, please!
My parents like people who are on time.
Come on, Rufus!
- Get a grip!
- You're going to burn!
Burn!
OK then.
See you later!
Hello?
Mr. Dope Fiend?
Thank God!
I was completely sure I'd missed you!
- Were you able to get me anything?
- Get you what?
For the party.
I called a week ago.
Don't let me down now.
- I'm sorry, Vega, I forgot.
- You forgot?
I gave you money!
I'll give it back to you tomorrow.
The party's tonight!
What the hell am I supposed to do?
- I can get you some laughing gas.
- I want to party, not give birth.
- And why are you still at home?
- I live here.
Weren't you going to Cornelia's parents?
- Oh, shit!
She's going to kill me!
- Serves you right.
I have to run.
I have to take a shower.
You'll get your money tomorrow.
I just don't have time right now.
I'm sorry, Vega.
- Professor Beckert?
- Someone's been in my private lab!
She bit me!
Your patient, the comatose woman.
- She bit me!
- May I see that?
Here.
Press this against the wound.
Come on.
Ring the door bell.
You're just a little late.
- You must be Sebastian.
Welcome!
- Thank you.
Watch out, or Hampus will jump out through the door.
- My name is Eva.
- Nice to meet you.
Why don't you hang your clothes over there?
Dinner will be ready soon.
What's wrong with you?
- What?
- What's wrong with you?
Get lost, monkey-boy!
Hi, honey.
How are you doing?
I'm fine...
I have to...
Where's the bathroom?
- That door over there.
Are you OK?
- I feel great.
Get focused.
Hello?
Hello?
- Aloha, baby!
- What do you think?
- Kinky.
- Could you sort anything out?
Yes, but I don't know if we should.
I feel a bit bad about it.
I nicked them from Sebastian.
- Fuck him, if he can't take a joke.
- Where is everybody?
They're on their way.
Cornelia and Sebastian will show up later.
People should start arriving soon.
And here they are!
- Hi there!
- Wait till you see what I've got.
I'll take whatever's behind door number three!
That's awesome!
I want to try.
Anyone there?
That wasn't funny!
Bad dog!
Don't you see you're scaring the girl?
Hello there.
We haven't met.
Hi...
Nice to...
- Meet you.
- Are you all right?
Yeah, sure.
My collar's too tight.
Can't really breathe.
I remember meeting Eva's parents for the first time.
Sweating like a pig.
Come on, let's go to the dining room.
- I can't.
I can't take one.
- What do you mean you can't?
I've taken medicine for my asthma, and I can't mix it with Ecstasy!
I can barely do alcohol as it is...
After all this hype you're just going to say no?
And this isn't even Ecstasy!
We don't know what it is.
Are you sure it's compatible with my medicine?
"Compatible with my asthma medicine!" Here you go, Vega.
I'll see what happens to you first.
Then I might take one.
I don't want to end up in hospital.
What the fuck!
Can someone please do drugs properly here?
- Hello.
I took one.
- Oh, shut up.
We raise our eyes to you in hope, and you give us our food when it is due.
You open your hand and satisfy every living creature with your kindness.
- Glorified be Thy name.
Amen.
- Amen.
Dinner is served.
I hope you like sea trout braised in garlic.
Looks delicious.
Come in!
- We haven't met, but...
- I know, you're Vega's mystery date!
Glad to see you here.
My name is John.
And I'm not really Vega's "date".
Not a sound, Annika...
- Dance?
- Maybe later, but probably never.
- Cool!
- You seem a bit off.
No, I'm fine.
It's just that...
I have this weird feeling.
I have a feeling this is going to be a great party!
Just chill out a bit.
How are we doing?
Isn't it time we let loose the mad dogs of hell?
- Vega, your date's here.
Cute girl.
- I know.
- John, where can I smoke?
- Allow me to show you.
Come on, join the fun!
I'll go and get some more.
- Saga, darling!
You came!
- But of course.
You'll have the time of your life!
Have you had some punch?
Come on.
Is it too much to ask what the hell is going on here?
Answer me, for fuck's sake!
You demented bastard!
- Apologize.
- I am sorry.
Say it with more feeling, as if you really mean it.
I am really sorry.
- Where are the pills?
- What?
- Where are the pills?
- What pills?
You have no idea, do you?
You might feel a slight sting.
Who are you?
Who the hell are you, and what the hell is going on?
- Calm down, Annika.
- Explain!
You want me to explain.
Then I'll tell you.
On the Eastern front in 44, we took refuge in a cabin.
But we couldn't hide from what we found there.
Beckert...
Grab her arms and we'll drag her outside.
We'll get some firewood and burn it to hell!
That was my last night as a human being.
As a soldier I had killed many times before.
But that night I killed and drank blood for the first time.
And the only one who left the cabin with me was of the same kind as I.
When the Third Reich fell, and the German army surrendered
I headed back to Sweden, with what I claimed to be my daughter.
We started a new life here.
You're joking, right?
You want me to believe that you're a vampire?
- You can believe whatever you want.
- I think you're completely...
You're suffering from schizophrenic...
My God!
- Don't move!
I swear, I'll...
- Kill me?
Can you do that?
Go ahead and try, Annika.
Stab me.
Straight through my heart!
I'm on to you, John.
I know what you are.
You're a lemon.
I always thought of myself as a mango.
OK, Freud, what do you mean?
People might be attracted to your nice round shape, and bright yellow colour.
But they run away, when they realize that you're bitter and sour inside.
You go well with drinks, though.
Sebastian?
Are you all right?
- Sebastian?
- Yes, I'm coming.
In a minute.
Sebastian, open this door!
I'm not feeling well, and I would like to go home now, thank you.
Where's my rabbit?
Good work, Sebastian.
I've always hated that bloody rabbit!
- How did you get to know Vega?
- Everyone knows Vega.
She's a nice girl, and not as mad as she seems.
She just wants to make a cool impression.
That guy definitely can't handle his drink!
Cornelia, darling!
Where's Sebastian?
I am now going to drink my brains out!
I don't fucking care where Sebastian is or what the hell he's doing.
Come on, Caesar, do your business.
Well, hello there!
I think it's only fair for you to know I carry mace in my handbag.
Calm down, will you?
I'm not feeling well, I have to go home.
- Drink some water.
- No, I'm serious.
I think it's those pills.
There's something weird about them.
What pills have you taken?
Something is very wrong!
He's just had a bit too much to drink.
Joel, I'll take you to the bathroom.
Come on.
- I've got to go to the bathroom.
- OK, I'll keep your seat.
I wish we had met under different circumstances.
The comatose woman?
Is she one of you?
She's my guinea pig.
I've tried to find a treatment for this curse.
Being a vampire has many drawbacks.
But now I've changed my research.
Instead of trying to destroy my vampire genes, I've started to improve them.
So you're trying to cross humans with vampires?
You see.
You really understand me.
My little blood supply.
Thanks to her, I have access to vampire blood.
And human blood is always obtainable.
You're using her!
I've tried to cure her, but she's too stubborn.
I'm the latest model.
She's stuck in the past.
I'm close to perfection.
She's just a stepping stone for the new species.
Just like you.
You're stuck in the past too.
You're her kind.
What do you mean by that?
Her kind?
Look at yourself!
Feel it!
You must realize what happened to you?
You overpowered me even though you should be physically inferior!
It's busy, OK?
Come on!
My eyes hurt!
Please turn off the light.
OK, I'll turn it off.
But we can't stay in here for ever.
How do you feel?
Joel?
I'm turning the light on.
Joel?
Joel!
Open the door!
Open the door!
This is Central.
Calling Unit D2.
Over.
D2 listening, on Main Street.
Over.
Could you please come back and have a look at something?
- Is it important?
Over.
- It's very important, yes.
Over.
OK, we're on our way.
Over and out.
To think I moved here to wind down...
What happened?
- The blood isn't mine.
- So, whose is it?
A poodle's.
You won't believe this.
A hysterical old lady is being sedated in the staff room.
We have this guy in a cell who's beyond description.
The old lady was holding a leash that ended up in a pile of blood-soaked fur.
Next to her is this guy, apologizing.
He's saying: "I'm so sorry, I didn't mean to!"
The old lady is devastated, demanding we arrest him for killing her dog.
- Caesar.
- Caesar.
Seems like this guy did horrible things to Caesar.
- What do we have to do with this?
- You have to check this guy out.
- Sebastian.
- His name is Sebastian.
Hello?
Hello?
Give me the keys.
- To what?
- The cell.
I'll check him out.
I don't think that's a good idea.
I think I have enough training to deal with a lapdog killer.
Give me the keys.
If you're going in there, you'll need some equipment.
- Ready?
- Ready.
What are you doing?
- Loading up with teargas.
- I can see that, but why?
- I might have to pull you out.
- You must be joking?
- You don't know what's in there.
- Yes I do: a pet killer.
What do you use against hardened criminals?
Anti-aircraft guns?
Let me in.
OK.
Very funny.
Teenage werewolves, dead lapdogs...
Is this a typical Lapland joke?
Get on top of him!
Use the shield!
Incoming!
My eyes!
- I'm sorry.
I thought that...
- That shit really hurts!
You scared me!
- What are you doing?
!
- One more step and I'll do it again!
- Why?
- You're a demon!
- No, I'm not.
- You have red eyes and fangs!
It's the latest fashion.
Stay away!
If I'd known you'd get that mad, I wouldn't have done anything at all.
How are you doing?
You look a little pale.
Need anything?
A cup of blood, maybe?
Shut up!
You will feel the symptoms soon.
Your immune system won't know what hit it.
Surprisingly enough, the virus is in fact a rhabdovirus.
Similar to rabies, but a lot more aggressive.
Please, don't do this!
The virus is doing things to your DNA that you could never imagine.
Just the discovery of its effects on blood cells would give me a Nobel Prize in medicine!
But sod the Medicine Prize!
When I'm done, our kind will rule over all of you, like the cattle you are!
Don't worry, little one, it'll be OK.
Run!
I'm calling the police.
Hello, sorry for calling this late.
My name is Kajsa Falck.
Across the street there's a bunch of drunken teenagers making an awful racket so I can't sleep.
They're even climbing the walls.
They are junkies and dealers all of them, playing hip hop and hop hip and I've had quite enough of it!
Number 3, Park Street.
Thank you very much, bye.
A woman called complaining about teenagers climbing the walls.
Do you remember any part of basic training preparing you for this?
Kids crawling on the ceiling, killing little dogs?
No.
But maybe I just cut that class.
What's going on here then?
What seems to be the problem?
Who lives in this house?
Hey.
You really have to...
Call for so much fucking backup!
- You've got the handcuff keys?
- No.
- I know what you are!
- You're holding them like an X.
Try something else.
Stop throwing gnomes at me!
What a totally uncool way to die...
Say something!
- Something...
- Are you OK?
Police!
Stop or we'll open fire!
Get her out of here!
This just isn't happening.
Don't worry.
It'll soon be over.
Dawn is just a month away.
What's your name?
My name is Saga.
What's yours?
My name's Maria.
Mother says we'll be sisters and we will always be together.
You'll never be alone.
Mother says you never liked it here anyway...
Are you injured, Sir?
Get away from me!
Witch!
What do you think of the master?
He's very changeable
You do not know what it is to feel jealousy, do you, Jane?
So you have no idea what it is to love.
I took a wrong path.
I must bear the blame for continuing on it.
Sir, Mr. Rochester, sir, wake up.
For heavensake, sir, wake up!
Jane, are you hurt
No, sir.
But you were nearly killed in your bed.
What happened here?
I donknow.
I heard a noise and I followed it here.
Shall I fetch Mrs. Fairfax?
No, what can she do?
I must fetch someone to help, sir.
No!
Sit, Jane quietly.
Wait here for me.
Can you do that?
Itsettled.
Itas I thought.
How, sir?
I forgot.
Did you say you saw anything?
Anyone?
No, I heard a laugh.
I think it was Grace Poole, sir.
Of course, you are right.
Shea singular sort of person.
Sheoften careless and accidents happen.
Well say no more about it.
Go back to you room.
The servants will be up in an hour or two.
What, are you going without saying goodnight?
Jane you just
You just saved my life.
You might at least shake hands.
I knew youd do me good the first time I met you.
I knew I wouldnmind being in you debt.
There is no debt, sir.
There is no debt, sir
Im glad I happened to be awake.
She saves me from an inferno, and sheglad she happened to be awake.
Still she tries to go.
Im cold, sir.
Of course,
Of course,
And we agreed that youd never be cold again.
Well, if you must leave me
You must.
Ita mystery how he wasnburnt in his bed.
He will read with a candle burning.
I told him how dangerous that is.
Morning, dear.
Morning
Morning miss.
Morning Grace.
What has happened here?
Master was reading in bed again.
Fortunenately, he woke up and no real harm was done.
Thatvery strange.
Did no one hear anything?
Mrs. Fairfax said she heard nothing.
She sleeps heavily.
Youre young, miss.
Maybe you heard a noise.
I did.
At first I thought it was pilot, .
but pilot can not laugh
Im certain I heard a laugh.
A strange one.
Hardly likely the master would laugh.
Not when he was in such danger.
I think you must have been dreaming, miss.I most certainly was not dreaming.
Did you open your door?
Did you see who or what it was you thought laughed?
On the contrary
I locked my door.
Very wise.
It would be wise to lock you door the moment you go to bed.
Who knows what might happen?
Youre not eating again.
You ate very little at lunch time, Miss Eyre.
I hope youre not sickening.
Youre very flushed.
Im very well, thank you.
Never better.
HmmOh, ita fine night.On the whole, a very good day for Mr. Rochesterjourney.
Journey?
I didnknow he was going out.
Oh, he set off right after breakfast.
Hegone to Mr.Eshtonplace over the other side of Millcote.
Hell likely stay a fortnight or more at the house party.
A fortnight?
Yes,I told you, hehardly ever here for more than a few days.
And you cansay he hasnbeen starved of company these last two months.
Oh, I mean, fine and proper company, of course, my dear.
When these fashionable, beautiful people get together, theyre in no hurry to separate.
Single gentlemen are especially sought after.
And Mr. Rochester is so talented in society.
The ladies are very fond of him.
Hea very fine singer.
He sings?
Oh, yes!
He and Miss Blanche Ingram sang at a Christmas party here some years ago.
This Miss Ingram, is she very beautiful?
Oh, good Lord, yes.d She has very fine features,brilliant eyes.
Very striking.Well, shethe belle of the county.
Shenot yet married?
No, the Ingramestate will pass to the son.
The daughters have only small fortunes.
But if sheso very beautiful, she must have wealthy suitors.
Mr. Rochester, for example.
Well, yes, but therea considerable difference in age.
What of it?
There are more unequal matches made every day.
Why, yes, dear but I scarcely think Mr. Rochester would think that a good idea.
Youve eaten nothing again.
Im sure youre sickening for something, and the masteraway.
I must decide whether to send for Dr Crawford.
Im perfectly well, as I said.
Never better.
Grace:
Are you sure you werenmistaken, Miss Eyre?
You were mistaken, Jane Eyre.
Mrs. Fairfax:
Miss Blanche Ingram is the most beautiful and accomplished young lady.
She is right and proper company for the master.
Miss J.E. accomplishes the teaching of general studies, music, art and French seeks a position of governess
Who are you writing to, Miss Eyre?
I thought you had no one to write to.
I dont.
We are your family now.
I wish Mr. Rochester would come back.
I am so bored.
I wouldnwish for long.
Sometimes he leaves us for many a month, especially in the cold winter season.
Once, he left us for a whole year and a quarter.
Oh, that was a very long winter.
I can remember it well.
Miss Eyre, are you sick?
Your cheeks are pink.
Itvery hot in here this morning, Adele.
Oh, from the master.
Oh, well,Well,
Mr. Rochester is not likely to return home soon?
Hereturning, all right.
Leah, come quickly!
Are you sure all this is necessary.
Oh, yes, I think so.
Well, were not sure how many houseguests hebringing, but we must be sure to have more than enough to feed them.
Oh, dear, Ive never done this before.
Well, the masternever been home long enough to have a party.
Goose eggs.
Mrs. Poole gets good wages, I suppose?
Yeah, about five times what I get.
The masternot stingy.
I wonder
Ill race you over to the river.
Oh, there they are at last.
I must go down and greet them.
That is Mademoiselle Ingram.
She has a French name, Blanche.
And that is her sister.
I think it must be.
And thatLady Ingram, her mother.
Master says you may join the ladies this evening.
Oh, I must start to prepare at once.
I must wear absolutely my best dress.
Adele, you think too much of your appearance.
Itthe person inside you that matters.
No one will love you for how pretty you are.
I do not think that can be right, Miss Eyre.
You must take her into the drawing room before the guests finish dinner.
Oh, no, surely I donhave to be there.
Adele can go with Sophie.
Masterorders.
He said you must be there, or he will come to your room and bring you down himself.
Adele, come on.
Adele, come on.
You look alike, you move alike, you sound alike.
You are, if I may say so, a particularly fine example of the split female embryo.
I hope youll permit me to ask you some questions.
Oh, of course, everybody is.
Yes, thatright, everyone is interested in us.
Lady Ingram, you donescape our argument so easily.
Oh, Rochester, I donunderstand you.
If some people are rich and some poor, then that is Godwill.
So be it, I am satisfied.
Sit, Adele.
Im sure you are, if youre one of the predetermined rich.
All this nonsensed Adele.
Sit down.
and revolutions, canwe talk about something else?
There are children and servants present.
Oh, good Lord.
What on earth is this?
It is Mr. Rochesterward, I suppose.
The little French girl.
Mr. Rochester, I thought you were not fond of children.
Im not.
Then what on earth made you take on that little doll?
Where did you pick her up?
I didnpick her up, she was left in my hands.
Well, you should send her to school, where she belongs.
Our schools are expensive.
But you have a governess, I see.
There, hiding behind the screen.
Now, that's expensive, we have to feed them both.
What are you talking about now, Rochester?
Oh, no, we donwant Mother getting started on governesses.
Were talking of governesses, Lady Ingram.
Oh, donmention them.
Im so glad that Blanche and Mary have no longer any need for them.
Governesses are a nuisance, all of them.
If theyre not eating you out of house and home, theyre carrying on with the tutor, or even worse, making eyes at the master of the house.
Really?
You surprise me.
Mary, do you remember Miss Twisk or Twitt, or whatever she was called?
We pretended she was harbouring a passion for Bradstock.
It was your idea.
Yes, we were very naughty.
She was so boring, poor thing.
Mother had her leave instantly, in case she should set us a bad moral example.
You cannot be too careful, Rochester, with a young, impressionable mind in the house.
How do you do, Jane.
I am very well, sir.
Why did you not come up and speak to me?
I did not wish to disturb you, you seemed engaged, sir.
It is a while since weve seen each other.
What have you been doing?
Nothing in particular.
Teaching Adele, of course.
You look a good deal paler.
Whatthe matter?
Nothing at all, sir.
Then return to the drawing room.
I am tired, sir.
Hmm.And a little depressed, I think.
What about?
Tell me.
I am not depressed.
I tell you that you are.
So depressed that youre almost
Let me look at you.
Youre about to cry.
Tell me, Jane.
Why are you crying?
I am not crying.
Tonight, you are excused.
But I expect you to appear in the drawing room every evening after dinner.
Every evening, mind.
It is my wish.
Miss Eyre, why are you not dressed for riding?
I do not ride, sir.
Well.
Then you must learn.
Come, join us by the fire.
We will not be able to hunt today, Im afraid, with the weather so changeable.
No, of go on a walk.
And my book has gone missing again.
My book, you know, The Beast Within.Oh, I wish you wouldnt, my dear.
How do you dare read those novels?
Oh, but itvery exciting.It is about a man who commits a crime.
He spends the dark hours raging about like an animal, and then, in the morning, he goes about his business and no one suspects a thing.
Nonsense!
You donthink it possible that someone who seems perfectly serene and unspectacular from the outside could be capable of committing horrific crimes?
Certainly not a Christian man.
Although Im sure that Mr.Eshton has all sorts of new ideas about that.
For once, I must admit ignorance.
The brain is a vast and wonderful landscape.
Weve not even begun to navigate its mysteries.
We do not know why it malfunctions.
We are in the very infancy of its science.
Science again.
You make it all sound so very grand.
God gives people good blood and bad blood, and therean end to it.
When Mary and I were in Paris, we went to see the savage boy.
The one who had lived all his life in the woods and could only talk a little gibberish.
If you could call it \ldblquote talked\rdblquote
Thatwhat Im talking about.
That child had bad blood.
You can clean it, dress it up, but you will never make it good.
You were born bad, Jane Eyre, and you will die bad.
Miss Eyre, is it your opinion that children are born the way God intended them to be, that bad blood will always be bad blood?
Or can you discipline such a child?
Excuse me?
d Of course you should.
Thatcommon sense.
I think it wise that
Since we must live with the adult,
I think it prudent to treat a child as if they had feelings.
Really?
Feelings?
A child has no more feelings than that dog over there.
I would have thought that if you
Please, Miss Eyre, continue.
Mr.Eshton wishes to hear your opinion.
I think that all children whether they are thought to be of good blood or bad blood deserve to be given the chance to love
and to be loved.
I do not see the use of punishing a child with beatings and harsh words.
Whatthe use of punishment from a governess?
You must send that child off to school immediately, Rochester.
All this talk of tainted blood is wearisome.
I know my bloodup.
Youre the best horsewoman in the county.
Shall we ride?
Oh, regarded.
Jane.
Where are you going?
I have to speak to Mrs. Fairfax.
She allows Adele to eat too many sugary things.
Afterwards, Ill join in the drawing room.
You might even enjoy yourself.
Well be playing games later.
Dontell me you donapprove of games, Jane.
What do you think of Miss Ingram, Jane?
I suppose I must choose a bride as all about me seem to wish it.
Is that what theyre saying?
To preserve this great estate of mine, I must have an heir.
Is that what the gossip requires?
I know nothing of gossip, sir.
Well, then, Jane, your honest opinion.
Do you think Miss Ingram a good choice?
Do you think Im in love with Miss Ingram, Jane?
I know nothing of love, sir.
Donbe late, Jane.
It wonbe long before the games begin.
Oh, now, there it is!
There is my book, The Beast Within.
It was sitting there all the time.
No, but Im sure I looked there this morning.
Maybe the ghost took it.
The ghost?
The ghost.
Sophie says it walks the corridors at night.
It eats the gateaux from the kitchen and it laughs in the dark.
A ghost at Thornfield?
How exciting.
You never mentioned it.
She walks in the corridor with the painting of the mad people.
Sophie says she goes cold and shivers when she
Sophie is from Marseilles, which means that she wears three or four outer garments even in July.
Our English weather feeds her overactive French imagination.
Oh, you disappoint me.
Maybe we could tell each other ghostly stories.
Im in need of a little danger.
Ghost stories are not of interest.
How do you know if theyre true?
But, my dear Blanche, if the ladies are interested, I know a game,
If you are not afraid of things that we might not be able to explain
The supernatural?
What are you up to, Edward?
Youre interested in experiments, arenyou?
Well, I hope you know what youre doing.
L
O
V
E
Love
Whonext?
Blanche, are you ready?
Of course I am.
H
E
A
R
T
H-E-A-R-T Heart
Oh, Blanche.
It means that you have given your heart to someone.
Do tell us.
As if we didnknow.
L
E
S
S
Less Less Heart What can that mean?
Less heart.
Heart less.Oh, heartless!
Oh, dear Blanche.No, Im sure itmade a mistake.
It must think youre someone else.
You were right, Mr.Eshton. This is a silly game.
Im rather tired.
I think I shall read in bed.
Be careful of your candle, my darling.
Morning.
Eshton: you donthink it possible that someone who seems perfectly serene and unspectacular from the outside could hide a beast within them?
Ill be away all day on business.
Im sure youll be able to amuse yourselves.
Donbe too late.
Ill be back by sundown.
Donmisbehave, now.
Pilot
I think that gown Miss Blanche Ingram has the blue.
I think it the most beautiful dress I have ever seen.
It is Monsieur Rochester, he is back.
You said we could finish.
He is early.
Oh, who is this?
He is tres beau, mademoiselle, nest-ce pas?
A foreigner, I think.
Although , quite a nice chap.
Masonthe name.Says he met Rochester in the West Indies.
And I think the twins have taken a bit of a shine to
Speak up, man.
Whatthe matter?
Itan old gypsy lady, madam.
Come to tell fortunes.
She refuses to leave, and with the master away
Oh, tell her to go or well set the dogs on her.
No, no, no. tell her to stay.
There are ladies present who wish to have their fortunes told.
But what would Rochester say?
Well, henot here, is he?
Im brave enough, if you arent.
Now, whereyour lover?
Blanche, what happened?
What did the gypsy lady say to you?
Rochester was right.She talked absolute nonsense, nothing in it.
You can amuse yourselves with her if you want.
Yes.
Im sorry, miss.
She said she wouldnleave until she had seen everyone, and youre the only one who hasnhad her fortune told.
She would not leave until I had brought you here.
Thatall right, George.
Donworry.
Ill wait outside in case theretrouble.
No, George, you may go.
Im not frightened.
Youre not afraid?
Of course not.
Do you wish me harm?
The others were afraid of my magic.
Of my dark arts.
Of what I knew of their worst thoughts and desires.
Surely you noticed that some who entered this room with confidence are now disappointed with what Ive revealed?
Do you not believe in hell and the supernatural, Miss Eyre?
I believe what I believe.
Youre a very confident young woman for someone who has never loved.
Who has only had one true friend.
Who was snatched away prematurely.
Where was it?
Lowood school.
There, now.
Ive impressed you.
These matters are not generally known, for sure, but they are facts.d owidctlpar\qj There are the truth.
You may have found them out by mortal means.
Well said, Miss Eyre.
I can see Im going to have to prove my powers.
To see into your soul to reveal a hidden secret that no one else could possibly know.
What were your thoughts, for instance, when you came to me this evening?
Itvery pleasant company, is it not?
Such as youve never known.
And after the long months here alone at Thornfield, with only the child and the housekeeper.
What do you think of them?
I do not think of them.
Of their opinions and their tastes?
I do not care for theirs any more than Im sure they care for mine.
Is there no one in the company who you share feelings with?
What about the master of the house?
He is not here today.
He is soon to be married, is he not, to the beautiful Blanche Ingram?
I donknow.
I thought it was you that could predict the future.
Anyway,
I have paid you for my future, not Mr. Rochesters.
Oh, Mr. Rochester is to be married.
I know that for sure, everyone does.
Oh, I see that this news affects you.
You talk nonsense, old lady.
I shall leave you now and send in the next foot.
It is over.
What do you wish me to do?
What is it?
Who is there?
Show yourself immediately, or Ill call a servant.
Sir.
Thank you.
Youve done well today.
Youve given me a deal to think about and amused me greatly.
Now, Jane, donbe too cross.
Im not angry, Im surprised.
Surely you donbegrudge me this little diversion.
The old lady provided me with an afternoonamusement, and our guests were given a mirror to hold up to themselves.
Not undeservedly, surely?
They are your guests, sir, not mine.
But I believe you got that woman in to talk nonsense to me so that I might talk nonsense back, and that was not fair, sir.
No.
No, it was not fair.
But how else am I to find out what you think, Jane?
But donworry, you didntalk nonsense, so, er, allwell, isnit?
And youre not angry with me?
I donknow.
I have to think about it.
But I expect Ill manage to forgive you, eventually.
Arenyou curious to find out what my gypsy predicted for Miss Ingram?
I bet the drawing roombuzzing with excitement.
They have plenty to discuss, sir.
Even the stranger who arrived this morning.
What stranger?
Oh, his name is Mason.
I believe hevisiting from overseas.
What is it, sir?
Oh, Jane.
I wish I were on a desert island somewhere with only you for company.
Tell me.
If all those people in the drawing room, if they cast me out and spat at me,
what would you do?
I should try to comfort you, sir.
Can I help you, sir?
Id do anything for you.
What if I asked you to do something for me that was wrong?
I know, I know.
I know the answer, Jane.
You could not.
Thank you.
Jane,
Do you believe in redemption?
If you have sinned, you can be redeemed.
Do you mind if I ask some questions about your habits?
How about your clothes?
Did you come down this morning and find that you had dressed the same?
Yes.
Mason, my dear fellow!
.
What a surprise.How good to see you again!
What was it?
Did you hear it?
Yes, I thought it was
Really, I only go away for a day on business, and you overexcite yourselves like children with you occult games and conversations.
But we all heard a cry.
Didnwe, Lady Lynn?
Yes.
Surely we all heard something.Someone had a bad dream.
Brought on by a combination of the visit from our gypsy friend and too much grouse at dinner.
Are you sure were all safe?
I am sure.
Anyway, my amazon, what have you to fear from the night hours?
Itbad enough having strange shrieking, never mind governesses creeping up on us.
Shepale as a ghost.
Well, my Lady.
I shall escort you back to your room personally.
Come, everyone, back to bed.
Im ready.
Are you hurt, sir?
Itnothing.
Come, we must be silent.
Are we going to the North Tower?
Do you want to go back?
No, sir.
I forgot to ask, do you faint at the sight of blood?
I donknow.
Wait here.
Here.
Richard.
Jane, come here.
You must press this hard on the wound.
Im going now to get the doctor.
Hell have you good as new by morning.
Richard, do not say anything of what has happened or I will not be responsible.
Jane, I have to leave you here while Im gone for an hour or so.
No conversation.
II could not stop her.
Shh.
Be calm.
She has killed me.
You will not die.
I will not let you die.
Sheshedone for me.
Nonsense, the doctorhere, youre in no danger.
There are teeth marks here.
She sucked my blood.
She said she would drain my heart.
I warned you.
I told you not to do anything until I could be with you.
Hurry up, Carter.
We need him out of here before sunrise.
Take care of him at your house.
Ill head over in a day or two to see how he does.
Edwar take care of her as tenderly as you can.
Ill do my best as I always have and always will.
Stay awhile outside with me.
This house is a dungeon.
Ita prison.
Ita lovely morning after such a turbulent night, hey, Jane.
Yes, sir.
Were you frightened?
I was afraid, sir.
Quietly, go in the back entrance.
Everything all right, miss.What do you want.
Mrs.Fairfax asked me to tell you, you have a visitor.
Oh, excuse me, miss.
It is you, miss Jane.
Donyou recognise me.
Bessie.
Oh, look at you.
Miss Eyre.
I always said Jane Eyre would grow up to be a fine, accomplished young lady.
Not quite a beauty, all told, but a credit to us.
Im glad not to be of discredit to you.
Bessie.
Oh, Bessie, whathappened.
And Im hoping youre not going to disappear once more on your travels.
I suppose you might like to travel yourself one day.
Does Miss Eyre need to speak to you.
Excuse, me.
Well, Jane.
Sir, I need to have a leave of absence for a week or two to see a sick lady whoasked for me.
What sick lady?
Her name is Reed.
Shemy unclewife.
Uncle?
You told me you had no family.
My aunt cast me off when I went to school.
Why?
Because I was poor.And she did not like me.
And she sent you to Lowood without so much as a word or a visit in nearly 10 years?
So why does she suddenly wish to see you now?
Her son John is dead.
He ruined himself.She is now struck down with this misfortune.
Ill only be gone two weeks, I hope.
Two weeks?
Thatnot possible.
And you have company, sir.
Very well.
But promise me that you will not stay with this undeserving aunt more than a week.
I cannot promise.
She is dying.
I cannot set a time on that.
Of course you will go.
How have I the power to stop you?
Well, you must have some money.
You cantravel without money.
I havengiven you any salary yet, remember?
How much have you, Jane?
In all the world?
Five shillings, sir.
Here.
Take.
No, sir.
You only owe me 15.
I have no change.
I donwant change, Jane, you know that.
Take you wages.
Youre right.
Better not give you all that.
You might stay away for three months.
Here, thereten.
Well, isnthat enough?
Yes, sir.
But you still owe me five.
Then come back for it.
Sir,
I have to ask you something else, a matter of business.
You have as good as said you intend to be married.Really?
Thatbeen settled, then, has it?
Youve decided Miss Ingram is to be my bride?
Now I see it.
Youre going to prevail upon this miserable family to find you a new situation.
Ungrateful girl.
Admit it.
No, sir.
I told you, they do not like me, sir.
To offer such a service
I shall advertise.
Devil you will.
Advertise.
I wish Id only offered you a sovereign, not 10 whole pounds.
Give me back nine.
Jane, I have need of it.
No, sir.
I do not trust you.
So, Jane
Etiquette.
How do we say goodbye?
Teach me.
ImIm not quite up to it.
We say Farewell or anything else we might prefer.
Farewell, Mr. Rochester, for the present.
And what must I say in return?
The same, if you like.
Then I will say
Dongo, Jane.
What will I do without your help?
Sir, you will not be in danger?
Rochester?
Edward?
Sir, please.
Get along.
You're the best horsewoman in the county.
Shall we ride?
What do you think of Miss Ingram, Jane?
Do you think I' m in love with Miss Ingram, Jane?
I forgot to ask, do you faint at the sight of blood?
She's done for me.
Nonsense, the doctor's here, you're in no danger.
You've got teeth marks here.
I need to leave for an absence to see a sick lady who's asked for me
What sick lady?
Her name is Reed.
She's my uncle's wife.
Don't go, Jane.
What will I do without your help?
No, not the red room, not the red room!
No, no, I don't be within.
No, no don't
Don't take me to the red room.
Jane Eyre?
She's not part of the family.
Miss Eyre, you have not grown tall.
How is Mrs Reed?
Mrs Reed?
Ah, you mean mama.
She's extremely unwell.
I doubt you can see her tonight.
If you would just step upstairs and tell her I've come, I'd be much obliged to you.
She's asked me to come, I would not like to keep her waiting.
Missis is awake, I've told her that you are here.
Who are you?
I'm Jane Eyre.
How are you aunt.
You are not Jane Eyre.
I've had such trouble with that child.
She was mad.
A fiend.
I sent her away to Lowood when the fever broke out and many died.
But she didn't die.
I wish she had.
Why do you hate Jane Eyre so?
I hated her mother.
She was my husband's favourite sister.
When she died, he cried like a baby.
And he insisted on sending for the child.
Sickly whining thing.
It wailed in its cradle all night long.
And Reed doated on it, the fool.
Even in his last illness, he called for it rather than his own children.
Where's John?
He always wants money.
He's a fine boy, and he loves me.
But he didn't wait to get the money.
Where's John?
Where's John?
She knows well enough he's gone.
That's why she'll never leave this bed.
Where's John?
She doesn't mean it, miss Jane, half of what she says.
It's alright, Bessie, I don't mind.
No, really I don't.
You used to get upset, more than upset.
But now you've grown in such a confident young woman.
Who could've known it.
I suppose you have friends now, to confide in, so your troubles don't plague you so much.
That must be it.
Yes, I do have a friend.
Someone who...
When I talk to them they understand everything I say.
They would laugh if I told them about Mrs Reed.
They're so in tune with me.
They know my thoughts before I even think them.
Before I put them into words.
I always said you'd do well.
I'm pleased that when you leave here you can go home to such people.
My friend is to be married soon, it's almost certain.
If she will not live far away, maybe you can visit.
Yes, of course.
That may be so.
Eshton here says that that swallow there sets South at the nearest shiver of winter.
It travels all the way to the most Southern tip of Africa, and then comes back here to this precise spot.
And I say, how do you know.
Because they all look exactly the same.
And why would they come back here and not stay where it is warm?
It is in their nature.
It is what they must do.
They must come home.
What do you think, Edward?
That's enough get along now.
Shouldn't you be in bed?
No, madame.
Oh, that necklace is so beautiful.
How wonderful that I say it, but it's a pity the governess isn't here.
I expect you're glad she stays away so long.
Oh, no, I wish she would come back.
I like her best of all.
Except for Mr Rochester, of course.
When Mr Rochester sees fit to make a certain announcement, that young lady will feel the benefits of a good English boarding school.
Is there a problem?
Not at all.
I was just taking a stroll through the hall before dinner.
And did you like what you saw?
Naturally.
It could of course do with a little management; a few new furnishings here and there.
And you think you'd like to take all this on?
What do you really want, Blanche?
If only aunt Gibson would invite me out to town.
It would be so much better.
If only I could get away for a month or two, until it was all over.
Georgiana, if there were ever a more vain absurd animal than you.
You are completely useless.
And in being useless you're going only to cling on to others, and if noone can be found to burden themselves with such a fat, weak, puffy, useless thing.
You complain you are ill treated and neglected.
You must be flattered, you must be admired, or you languish and die away.
Well, everyone knows you are the most selfish, heartless creature in existence.
I know very well your spite and your hatred.
You ruined my chances with Lord Vear.
You could not bear the thought that I would be raised into circles where you dare not show your face.
Let me give you this advice.
It is the first and last I shall offer you.
If you divide each day into sections, and perform some useful task to timetable the day would be over before you know it.
You'll be dependent upon your own senses and not have to be flattered and admired in order to know that you exist.
After my mother's death, the hour of her burial, I wash my hands of you.
It will be as if you and I had never know each other.
And if we were the only two human beings left alone on earth together...
I would not address one more word to you.
Who is that?
It is I, aunt Reed, Jane Eyre.
You asked to see me.
Yes, I did.
I'm very ill, you know.
I need to ease my mind before I die.
I've done you wrong twice, Jane Eyre.
One was to break the promise I made to my husband.
To bring you off as my own child.
You know that.
Go to my dressing table.
Open it.
Take out and read the letter you find there.
"Madam, would you have the goodness to send me address of my niece, Jane Eyre...
I wish her to join me in Madeira.
Fortune has blessed me, and as I'm unmarried and childless,
I wish to adopt her.
And bequeath to her all I have when I die.
I am, Madam, sincerely yours." John Eyre
This was written three years ago.
Why did you never tell me I had an uncle who was alive?
Because I hated you too much.
I could not forgive you.
Forgive me?
For your conduct.
I take you on and you treat me with contempt.
You talk to me like a vile wild animal.
Forgive me my passionate nature.
I was a child, aunt.
Let us forgive each other now.
I could not forget.
I took my revenge.
A wrote to your uncle, I told him Jane Eyre was dead.
That she died of a fever at Lowood school.
See?
I had my revenge.
Now you may have yours.
You can tell him of my falsehood.
I will be dead by morning so I don't care.
Water!
I forgive you, aunt Reed.
Whether you wish it or not, I do truly forgive you.
Take my trunk on up to Thornfield with you.
Won't you ride, miss?
You've had a very long journey?
No, I'm nearly home, it's my favourite walk.
There you are.
You're back.
Ungrateful thing!
I give you leave for a week and you go home a month!
I want my money back, since you've had me so little in your thoughts.
I said I would be gone for as long as I was needed.
And I was.
And you still owe me wages.
Come, let's get you home.
Adèle will scream and shout "Bienvenue".
Thank you ... for your great kindness.
I'm strangely glad to be back again to you...
Wherever you are, is my home.
It is my true home.
Are you going?
See, Ashton?
Our swallow's come home.
Ashton is using my coach to pursue some unusual twins.
Yes, one appears to have been in a sort of a deep sleep for eight months and he has been woken by a twin now living in Toulouse by the way, that he never even knew existed.
It's amazing!
Well, you don't think it possible that two minds are so in tune that they communicate across the country?
And call out to each other across space and time?
You're one of the world's most curious people, Ashton.
And you're one of the world's most cynical, Rochester.
Nonsense, I'm the most romantic person I know.
Be off with you.
Amazing minds await your magnifying glass.
Miss Eyre!
Jane!
You're back.
Hello!
At last, the governess has returned from her travels.
Can't you teach that child something so she won't be under our feet?
It's just such a pity we can't stay for longer.
But at the Boyles there will be a ball next week.
Blanche and I, we won't be there.
We will be occupied with a more important event, I'm certain.
Don't worry, you'll see her again soon.
Ingram Park is a short journey for an enthusiastic rider.
Indeed.
Safe journey.
Ah, there you are.
Is Adèle in bed?
We've got back to our routine very quickly.
And now that all the house guests are gone, it's like it has always been.
What's that?
It is a book I used to read as a child.
My escape book.
I used to image that one day I could go anywhere I wanted.
I took it with me to Lowood.
And now?
Now I think it can go here very well.
Now, Miss Eyre, if we are very lucky we could see some dragonflies.
Did I ever tell you of my travels in the Blue Mounts of Mongolia?
And you can tell me of your travels in the black and gloomy forests of your childhood memories.
So the vain, fastidious cousin, Georgiana find a mate within days of your aunt's funeral?
So it seems.
And what of the nun?
I believe Eliza will settle in her French convent, never to return to worldly pleasures.
I think that in very few years she'll become mother superior.
So you went to Gateshead half knowing that you wouldn't find the old lady repentent or forgiving, or in the least bit pleased to see Jane Eyre, and this is how things transpire?
And yet Jane Eyre doesn't seem to be troubled that she has no family.
Noone in the world outside of Thornfield who wishes her well.
No.
I have no family to speak of.
But I hear you have been making plans of your own.
I assume Miss Blanche's departure from Thornfield is only temporary.
I mean as Adèle's governess it's my duty to help you decide on a suitable school.
Yes.
Yes, indeed.
And we mustn't forget that when I do finally relinquish my bachelor ways we must find you a suitable position.
What do you think of Ireland?
We don't have to worry about that, now.
Oh, for good worried.
Oh, look!
Look!
See the emerald wings?
Come.
To define the half of anything we divide into two equal parts.
In English, please, Adèle.
I think it must be francais, Miss Eyre, surely it must be.
What do you think?
A beauty, isn't it?
Do you think it will do for Mrs Rochester?
Won't she look like queen Boadicea leaning back on those purple cushions?
You know, Jane.
I wish I were a little better suited in matching her in looks.
Tell me, magician that you are...
Are you absolutely sure you don't have a potion to make me more handsome?
I have told you before.
That would be past the power of magic, sir.
Come, Adèle.
Mr Rochester, I want you to tell me about the Caribbean islands again.
Sophie has taught me a song.
All right.
All right, incorrigible woman.
You must imagine a restaurant.
No, a day meeting place.
There are many respectable people who come here at night to socialize.
You must imagine brilliant reds.
Pinks, the most exotic perfumed flowers.
Delightful passionate music.
The women are of course very beautiful.
They wear bright silks.
Ambers, saphires, emeralds.
They are very seductive, but they are also mysterious.
Tantalizing, dangerous.
Stop that noise.
I'll send you to school in the morning, you're like a wild animal.
Caribbean is not as beautiful as it seems, Adèle.
I came back to escape.
Summer's been with us forever this year.
I can't remember one that stayed so long.
And Mr Rochester has stayed with it.
He has never been here in Thornfield for this length of time.
He's found something to keep him from his travels.
Mind you, I think there must have been a little disagreement.
Really?
Ingram Park is not very far away.
For a suitor...
And yet he has not saddled the horse for several weeks.
He spends his evenings out talking to you or prowling below in the gardens like a bear.
Of course he's got the household business to worry about.
What do you mean?
Well, he'll be wanting to find you suitable positions.
For after the wedding.
You know he will take care over that, I'm sure.
I've told you he's a good master.
Thornfield is pleasant in the summer, isn't it, Jane?
Yes, sir.
You've become attached to the place.
Yes, sir.
And you'll be sad to leave?
Yes.
Must I leave, sir?
Must I leave Thornfield?
Yes, I'm sorry, but I'm afraid you must.
You're to be married?
Exactly.
Precisely.
As you with your usual acuteness have already predicted, when I do marry Adèle must find a schoool and you must find a new situation.
Yes, sir, I'll advertise immediately.
No, you won't.
I've already found you a place.
Ireland is a long way away, sir.
From Thornfield.
It is a long way away from you, sir.
We've been good friends, haven't we, Jane?
It's difficult to part from a friend and know you'll never meet him again.
And you and I, it's like we were a pair of Ashton's twins.
Bound together in some unworldly way, sharing a spirit or so the like.
When we are parted, when you leave me, I believe that bond will snap, and I will bleed inwardly.
But you'll forget me after a while.
I would never forget you!
How can you imagine that?
What do you think I am?
I wish I'd never been born, I wish I'd never come here.
I wish I'd never grow to love Thornfield.
I love Thornfield.
I love it because I have lived a full life...
I've not been trampled on.
I've been treated as an equal.
You have treated me as an equal.
You are the best person I know and I cannot bear the thought of having to leave you.
Must you leave me, Jane?
Oh, of course I must, because you have a wife.
What do you mean?
Blanche Ingram, of course, you're as good as married to her.
You've promised, sir.
I have not promised Blanche anything.
It's a someone who is inferior to you.
Someone who you have no sympathy with.
Of course I must go.
Do you think that I'm a machine?
That I can bear it?
Do you think because I'm poor plain, obscure and little that I have no heart?
That I'm without soul?
I have as much heart as you and as much soul.
And if God had given me some beauty and wealth I would make it as hard for you to leave me as it is for me to leave you.
You'll not leave me, Jane.
Let me go.
Jane, don't struggle so.
I'm a free person, and I'll go and do as I please.
Yes, yes you will.
You will decide your own destiny.
Jane, I offer you my hand, my heart and all my possessions.
You laugh at me.
No, no.
Jane, I want you to live with me.
To pass through life as my second self.
My best earthly companion.
Jane, have you not faith in me?
None whatsoever.
You doubt me?
Absolutely!
Jane, you know I don't love Blanche.
I love you- as my own flesh.
Jane, say that you will marry me.
Say it quickly.
Jane, do you accept me?
Are you in earnest?
I can hardly believe you.
I swear.
Then, sir...
Call me by my name, call me Edward.
Then Edward, I will marry you.
God, forgive me.
And let no man meddle with me.
I am to keep her.
There is no one to meddle.
I have no family to interfere.
No.
Go on and take off these wet things.
Good night.
Good night, my darling.
I feel so astonished.
I hardly know what to say to you, Miss Eyre.
Mr Rochester came in here about five minutes ago to tell me that he had asked you to marry him.
Oh, this cannot be true.
But, why?
I'm sorry to offend you, Jane.
But you are so young, you know nothing of men.
Well, I've noticed that Mr Rochester seemed to make you a favourite...
But I thought...
That I was too monstrous to love?
No, I meant, I thought you too level-headed.
Too sensible a young woman to be so overwhelmed.
Overwhelmed?
Well, are you overwhelmed?
I believe the good woman thought I had forgotten my station.
And you yours.
Little does she know that I am the servant and you are the mistress...
I'm sorry, I know that look.
She thinks I do not know myself and that you are doing as all men must.
Jane, she doesn't know us.
All the same, sir.
Sir?
When did I become sir again?
Last night you stood before the heavens and pronounced yourself my equal.
That's the Jane I want to marry, to share my life.
Would you dine with me tonight?
No, sir.
Edward, you promised to call me Edward.
Until we marry, if we marry...
In one month, one short month...
You'll be Mrs Rochester or I'll be damned.
Then, until that morning I'll call you Mr Rochester.
It is halfway between Edward and sir.
I'll continue to teach Adèle, we'll go on as before.
And then we'll see if this idea, this...
Marriage... is a sensible proposition.
I'm not interested in pleasing Mrs Fairfax.
But for you...
For you I will obey.
Now hurry up and get your bonnet, or we'll be late.
For what?
We're going to town.
Ah, no, no.
You're not coming.
Out of there now.
Oh please let me come Miss Eyre!
No!
Absolutely non.
Jane and I...
Miss Eyre and I are going shopping by ourselves.
Shopping?
Were you listening to a word I said?
Just today!
To celebrate.
For come, you cannot get married in that!
I will not be married at all if you force me into that ridiculous carriage!
John, bring up the other carriage.
And Adèle shall come too.
No.
I'll send her to school yet!
But shall I go without mademoiselle?
Absolutely SANS mademoiselle.
I will take mademoiselle away.
To Europe first where I will take her to all the grand palaces.
I will present her to all the kings and queens.
You cannot do that, because she has no jewels.
Oh she will have.
In London there's a very special box.
Filled with jewels.
I will send for them immediately
And mademoiselle will be covered in them from head to toe while she teaches you mathematics.
And when Madame as she will be then when Madame...
Is tired of all those kings and queens...
I will take her to a villa white-washed and secluded...
On the edge of the emerald Mediterranean...
Yes, this will do very well.
We need at least six daydresses.
Choose the evening garments.
We'll need three at most.
And this for the veil.
Even Adèle would draw a line at that.
There.
This is much more suitable.
Now, evening dresses.
For mademoiselle.
What do you think?
No?
This is for mademoiselle.
The child knows you better than I do...
We take it.
Jane Eyre will not be overwhelmed.
Miss Eyre, you will really be going to Miniterre for the wedding?
Yes.
You'll stay the night at the Contlander Hotel and then take the steamboat to France?
Yes.
I wish I could go with you.
You must stay here.
But don't worry, Mr Rochester...
We will pick out a good school for you.
They will hit me and starve me?
No.
I promise that will never happen.
Go!
Who's there?
Who is it?
George, what time did the master say he'll be home?
Don't worry, miss.
He's been away one night already.
He will not stay away another.
So I'm only gone for twenty-four hours, and I return to this?
You can't do without me, clearly.
Is anything wrong?
It was not Sophie.
It was not Mrs Fairfax.
It was not even Grace Pool.
What, you were dreaming.
I had been dreaming, but then I awoke.
Thank God nothing worse happened.
Thank God you're safe.
It was not Grace Pool.
Who else could it have been?
I was not dreaming.
And the rest of your dream?
Thornfield a neglected ruin?
And I left you without so much as a word.
No.
I'm sorry.
Put it down to your anxieties.
Your natural anxieties about the new life you're about to enter.
Yesterday I was very busy and happy packing.
I was not worried about the future.
I think it a glorious thing to have the hope of living with you.
Because I love you...
It was a fine day, yesterday.
Look.
The storm is gone.
Here we are.
Miss.
Wait.
That's it.
Thank you, Sophie
Wait a minute Miss.Look at you.
You're so beautiful.
Madam
At last, there you are.
How could I have thought that that gaudy veil would have suited you better.
Is John getting the carriage ready?
Yes, sir.
Is the luggage brought down?
Yes, sir.
Good.
Have it strapped and ready on the carriage.
We're leaving the moment we return from the church.
Yes, sir.
I'm sorry, Jane.
Are you ready?
I require and charge you both, as you will answer on the dreadful day of judgement that the secrets of all hearts shall be discloses that if either of you know any impediment why you may not lawfully
be joined in matrimony, you do now confess it.
Are you well assured that so many as a couple together otherwise than God's word has allowed are not joined together by God, neither is their matrimony lawfull.
The marriage cannot go on.
I declare the existence of an impediment.
Proceed!
I said, proceed!
I cannot proceed without some investigation.
Perhaps it might be got over, explained away.
I hardly think so.
It is insuperable.
Mr Rochester has a wife now living.
Who are you?
My name's Briggs, a solicitor.
And you enthrust on me a wife.
I would remind you of her existence, sir.
Which the law recognizes, if you do not.
I have no wife.
Edward Fairfax Rochester of Thornfield Hall was married to Bertha Antoinetta Mason at St. Benedict's church in Spanishtown, Jamaica...
On the eighteenth day of March, 1825.
If that is a genuine document it doesn't prove that the woman mentioned there is still living.
She was living three months ago.
I have a witness to the fact.
What have you to say?
What have you to say?
Gentlemen, this is a place of God.
My sister is living at Thornfield Hall.
I saw here there last June.
Impossible.
I'm an old resident of this neighbourhood, sir.
I've never heard of a Mrs Rochester at Thornfield Hall.
No, by God!
I took care that none would.
Enough, that is enough.
Clear the church, there will be no wedding today.
Before you go, however I beg you to come up to the house I've someone I wish you to meet.
Take it back to the coach-house, John.
It won't be needed, today.
Very good, sir.
Away with your congratulations!
They're fifteen years too late.
Do you remember this room, Mason?
Where you almost lost your life?
Good morning, Mrs Pool.
How is your charge, this morning?
A little touchy, sir.
We were having some breakfast, but she's calm now.
Will you be very careful, sir?
Aren't I always, Grace?
We'd better leave.
Why, Richard?
Why, are you frightened?
Ladies and gentlemen, may I introduce you to my wife?
Just leave quickly, sir, and she will be calm again.
Lock the door.
That was my wife.
As some of you know, my father was a greedy man, who wanted to preserve his estate by marrying his younger son off, to a wife who would bring him a rich dowry.
I was sent to the Caribbean, where knowing my predilection for dark, handsome women...
I was tricked by Mason and his father into pursuing his sister, Bertha, who was as beautiful as the glittering stars, and just as tantalizing.
I was married before I knew it.
Before I had met the mother who was, I found out later at that time, and had been... for many years incarcerated in a mental asylum, and that insanity ran through the family like a black river of disease.
I didn't spend half a day before I realized what manner of wife I had been tricked into.
It was but a few weeks before the full extent of her illness was made clear to me.
An illness which has grown in violence and foulness at an ever increasing base.
Then, certainly right for his wickedness, my father died.
And my brother straight behind, so I...
I inherited everything anyway.
The Rochester fortune intact.
I brought her back with me to England intending to make Thornfield a comfortable prison for her and for me.
I've another house hidden away, I could have kept her there.
But the damp being inclement there might have ridden me of her burden.
I could've done that, noone could've blamed me.
But I left her here.
With Grace.
While I travelled the world trying to forget the horrors at home.
Until one day one day this girl appeared, who knew nothing of this...
This girl.
Who stands so quiet and grave at the mouth of hell.
This girl.
Who is all quietness, and sanity, and innocence.
Do you wonder why I wanted her?
Why I risked the oath to God to get her?
And now I must ask you to leave.
I must see to my wife.
Jane?
Jane.
Forgive me.
I couldn't tell you, I knew you'd never stay.
Jane, come away with me.
We'll go and live together, and quite pushed for ever away from everyone.
You have no family to care.
To interfere with us.
Jane.
Jane, can you hear me?
Jane.
Why didn't you never tell me that I have an uncle that still alive?
Because I hated you too much.
Jane, I offer you my hand, my heartand all my possessions.
As you say you would marry me.Say quickly.
The marriage cannot go on.
I declare that there is an impediment.
Edward Fairfax Rochester, Of Thornfield Hall ... was married to Bertha Antoinetta Mason ... on March 18, 1825.
Our Father ... which art in heaven hallowed be thy name
Thy kingdom come, thy will be done on Earth, as it is...
Wait, Helen, wait for me.
She must have been on the moors for days.
Weeks, even.
Poor creature.
She looks so pale.
St. John found her just in time.
Who do you think she is?
Where did she come from?
Jane!
Jane!
I'm sorry to be such trouble.
You cannot remember your name?
Or your family?
Why don't we try to help?
We can tell you what we know.
Oh, yes.
We think you must have wandered on the moors for many days, maybe weeks.
We do not know where you traveled from.With no money or support of any kind.
So, you see, you are a mystery.
We've made our own story.
We think you are a young, well-bred woman who has run away from home because of family disapproval, some romance...
Diana, not now.
All right then.We will not speculate yet.
But this is not the hand of a working woman, so you are a well-bred lady.
A governess.
A teacher of some kind.
- You speak French extremely well.
And you know geography.
- Or you've traveled widely.
You talked of foreign places as if you had felt their heat, smelt their smells.
I have not traveled beyond England.
How can you be sure if you can't remember anything?
Hannah has washed your dress.
See here.
so
J.E., "L" School?
Is that any help?
It might not have been her dress.
I do not know what this means, but I know that I am honest.
It seems she does not remember yet, but surely we have conscience enough not to play games with her identity.
Good Lord, Miss.
You look like a ghost.
Here, sit down.
Though I think you're so faded, you might melt away with the heat.
Careful.
I love the fire.
I think I must have been very cold at one time in my life.
The misses will be angry with me if I don't get you back to bed.
I have spent long enough in bed.
I must try to repay everyone's kindness.
Do the young ladies live here along?
Since their father died.
Mr. St. John lives in his parish over at Morton.
I don't know how long they'll last here.
They haven't a penny between them.
The girls will have to go for governesses soon.
You have book learning, I suppose?
So you could earn you own living if you chose?
I have done, and I will, just as soon as I can advertise.
Advertise?
Well.
You are a surprising little thing.
And how long have you been looking after the family?
Thirty year.
I saw all the children born.
Young St. John came out of the womb already a clergyman.
I'm glad you are up and about.
Miss Elliott.
I believe, in the absence of knowledge, that my sisters have christened you.
They think it suitable.
But is it your name?
No matter.
Jane Elliott it is.
My sisters would like to keep you, like a stray off the moor.
Do you intend to live off their charity?
For they have very little to spare.
Of course not.
I wish to be put to work.
I will do anything honest.
But surely, the cuckoos are too fat... to fly thousands of miles.
They go somewhere.
Maybe to the corners of Europe.
You are full of information.
Not only do you know all about European birds, but South American birds, Patagonian lizards.
Someone must have taught you.
Jane.
I have seen one like this in the West Indies, but never here.
You see there.Have you had an unpleasant memory?
No, it was not.
Not unpleasant.
Good evening.
Good evening.
This must be the mysterious Miss Elliott.
I'm Rosamond Oliver.I live with my father at Vale Hill.
Good evening, Mr. Rivers, and good evening, Carlo.
How Would I forget you?
You dog is quicker to recognise his friends than you are, sir.
A lovely evening, Miss Oliver, but a little late for you to be out alone.
Papa says you never come to see us now.
You are quite a stranger.
He is alone tonight and not very well.
Won't you come back with me?
It is not a reasonable hour to intrude on Mr. Oliver.
Reasonable hour?
But I declare it is.
It is just the hour when Papa most needs company, and you would not be intruding, because I have invited you.
Do come.
Poor Rosamond.
Honestly, St. John.
He's as inexorable as death.
She adores him.
And he adores her.
Is there some obstacle?
Her family?
No, her father adores him, too.
He doesn't mind that St. John is not wealthy?
No, it's St.John.
he's perverse.
He will not allow himself to have her.
Oh, if only I were so in love.
We should embrace it.
It is a crime against God to deny yourself love.
It should be the 11th Commandment.
that these two persons, present now come to be joined....
Therefore, if any man can show any just cause why they may not lawfully be joined together, let him now speak, or else hereafter forever hold his peace.
Miss Elliott?
Are you feeling unwell?
- I am quite well, thank you.
The church is well attended?
And we are lucky in our benefactor, Mr. Oliver.
You met his daughter, Miss Rosamond.
He owns a needle factory in the valley.
He's very generous.
Mr. Oliver, in fact, was the inspiration for the employment I have found for you.
If, of course, you should wish to take it.
When I first arrived in Morton, there was no school.
The children of the poor had no hope of progress.
I have established one for boys.
Now it is the turn of the girls.
There is a cottage available, simply furnished.
The mistress's salary will be 30 a year.
Will you take the job?
I could organize the studies as I wished?
No beatings.
And enough food for dinner.
As long as you taught God's word.
Then I accept, with all my heart.
You understand that this will be a village school?
Poor girls, to whom you will teach knitting, sewing, reading, writing... and maybe arithmetic at the very most.
What will you do with your accomplishments?
Save them, until they are wanted.
I do not think you will stay here long.
I am not ambitious.
- No, but you are impassioned.
Excuse the word.
I mean that... for you, human affections and sympathies have the most powerful hold.
You cannot hate me, Jane.
I didn't mean to deceive you.
Unlike you,
I cannot live alone without the warmth of human companionship.
I roamed the world... then, returning one night to this cold, dark place...
I saw this...
This magical thing.
You were in my path.
Do you remember?
And since that moment,
I have never wanted to leave the place that you were.
Though you left, I remained.
Waiting for my little bird to return.
We are one, you and I.
We have to be together.
We have to be together.
We are like those twins, so intertwined in their senses and feelings.... that they can cry out to one another across continents, so close are their thoughts.
Say that you don't love me.
I dare you.
You cannot.
I will not.
I will love you until I die.
And yet you will leave me?
You mean to go your way and for me to go mine?
Yes, sir.
Sir, again?
Not Edward?
By tomorrow, Mary and I will be blown to the ends of the earth.
Derbyshire and Nottingham are not so very far away.
We have to go and teach fat, little boys lessons they do not want to learn, and we will never see our cottage again
She fears she will never see St. John again.
Why not?
- Because he's so pig-headed.
He will be a missionary.
He will go to a really hot place and that will be the end of him.
It is his chosen path.
He thinks it's the only way to serve God.
But why can't he serve God here?
You know that's never been enough.
He needs to make a grand gesture.
Jane, you must keep him here.
Look after him and don't let him out of your sight.
I don't think I could ever change St. John's mind against anything he'd decided on.
Bye, miss.Don't forget, Jane.
We're relying on you.
Now, this is Morton.
Can anyone point out where we are?
Ow.Alice. Alice, the clock.The time.
It's home-time.
The bell.
Still getting used to the clock.
Never mind, we're coming along.
I am determined to make scholars of them all.
Hello, Miss Elliott.
I am so glad you decided to stay in Morton... to be mistress of our endeavour.
I have brought you a pretty little pair of doves.
The dovecote has been empty for some years.
I thought you might conduct nature classes.
Diana said you were an expert on birds.
She exaggerates.
And do you like your house?
Have I furnished it nicely?
Very much, thank you.
St. John.
Miss Elliott approved of my arrangements.
Why should she not?
Come along, girls, home.
I have just remembered that now Diana and Mary have left... you must be so lonely.
Please, come home with me and see Papa.
Mr. Rivers!
can I speak with you a moment?
That is a very graceful and correct drawing.
Correct?
That word is a little lacking in passion, isn't it?
I mean, for someone who loves Miss Oliver as you do.
Will it comfort you... when you're in Madagascar or the Cape?
Or would the sight of her distress you?
You are very direct, Miss Elliott.
You must know me well enough to know I mean no mischief or disrespect.
She likes you, I am sure, and so does her father.
She's a sweet girl.
A little lacking in reserve, but you have more than enough for both of you, surely.
Why do you not marry her?
Why...why do you resist her?
Does she like me?
She is always talking of you.
There is no other subject she's more interested in.
It's very pleasant to talk like this.
You may go on for another quarter of an hour.
Well, what's the use of that?
When you are only planning an even crueller way to resist her.
St. John, you tremble when she comes into the room.
You don't understand.
I love Rosamond Oliver wildly, more intensely than I will ever love anyone again.
So why not marry her?
Because I know she would not make me a good wife.
We would have a lifetime's regret.
Can you see Rosamond as a sufferer, a labourer, a missionary's wife?
No, you cannot.
You need not be a missionary.
You may do God's work here.
I will not give up my life's ambition.
Dearer to me than anything.
- And Miss Oliver?
Are her feelings nothing to you?
She is surrounded by suitors.
She will forget me and marry someone who can make her far happier than I could.
No, Jane.
You do not know me.
I do tremble at the sight of Rosamond, but it repulses me.It has nothing to do with me.
My skin may burn with fever, but in my heart I am a cold man.
Don't.
You have the chance to love someone who loves you with all her soul.
Not many people are that lucky.
You may never find that again.
You are an enterprising young woman, Miss Elliott.
An unusual specimen.
You've made a good start.
I look forward to your career with interest.
I must leave Thornfield, Mr. Rochester.
Now, now.
Do you mean that?
I do.
And now?
What do you say now?
You cannot leave me .
You cannot leave me.
Confess it.
I will leave you.
How can this flesh be so soft and yielding... and yet your heart be like an iron fist?
There is a place I know, a villa in the Mediterranean.
It is far from anywhere.
Come and live with me there.
No, Jane, Jane, listen to me.
Listen.
Listen to me.
We would live as brother and sister. for tea or to play bowls, something ... sedate and traditional.
I give you my word.I wouldn't touch you.
Maybe a chaste peck on the cheek on birthdays.
I wouldn't tempt you into a life of sin, Jane.
I wouldn't do that.
I must rest now.
.-Yes, yes, you must rest.
We'll talk in the morning.
Yes, in the morning.
You will think about the villa?
We will talk in the morning.
(One year later.)
Girls, this is a butterfly.
Now, pass that round.
Can any of you tell me... how a caterpillar turns into a beautiful butterfly?
Miss Elliott.
Miss Elliott.
Good afternoon, Miss Elliott.
Is everything all right?
- Yes, of course.
You look very well.
You have performed wonders in this colourful universe.
You have given it discipline and individuality.
I wish Diana or Mary could come home to live with you.
You're reckless with your health.
I'm well enough.
Oh, forgive me.
One of the girls saw Miss Oliver in her wedding dress and the others begged me to imagine a painting for them.
I told you she would forget about me.
You must allow me to be right sometimes.
Mr. Rivers, what are you doing here?
I have often wondered where you got that forthright quality.
I've come to have a little talk with you, or rather, I have a story to share with you.
Just over 20 years ago, a poor curate ... fell in love with a rich man's daughter.
They married, and she was cut off from her family entirely.
Within two years, they were both dead.
They left a daughter, and she was cast out onto the very cold charity of an aunt by marriage.
Now we come to details.
A Mrs. Reed of Gateshead, who kept the orphan 10 years and then sent her to one Lowood School.
I calculate she would have been approximately your age.
It seems she did very well there, with qualities very similar to your own, and another coincidence, she rose to be a teacher.
She left Lowood to become a governess to the ward of a Mr. Rochester...
Mr. Rivers.
- I know nothing of... this Mr. Rochester's character... but I do know that he offered marriage to this young woman, but at the altar she had discovered he had a wife still living, a lunatic.
For another quite different reason, one Mr. Briggs, a solicitor, was searching for this young lady, but by then she had disappeared, was never seen again.
Is that not a very strange?
Since you appear to know so much, tell me this....
Mr. Rochester.
How is he?
Where is he?
- I know nothing of him.
But you said they were looking for me.
Did they write to Thornfield?
Yes, of course, but received no reply.
He must have been a bad man.
You do not know him.
Very well.
But maybe you should ask me how I come to know your story.
What inspired our Mr. Briggs to look for you and to write to me?
As you know, I traveled to Derbyshire a few days ago.
I had dinner with a family ... who had a housekeeper who was related in some distant way to a Mrs. Alice Fairfax.
Now, she provided me with such an exact description of the mysterious Jane Eyre to relieve me of any doubt.
Did they tell you anything of Mr. Rochester?
I told you, Mr. Briggs was not interested in him.
Don't you want to know why he was interested in you?
What did he want?
Simply to tell you that your uncle had died and had left you all his property and fortune.
Oh, I am sorry.
- Sorry?
For 20,000?
I am sorry my uncle is dead.
I might have wished to have seen him one day.
Wait.
Wait.
Why would you ever know about this Mr. Briggs and his search for me?
Why would he write to you?
There is more, but I fear ... you've had too much surprise for one evening.I will tell you tomorrow.
You will tell me now.
He wrote to me because your uncle was also my uncle.
I am your cousin.
Your half-cousin, that is.
Your mother was my father's sister?
We are half-cousins?
You are a strange young woman.
I tell you you've inherited a fortune and you are very serious.
I tell you something of little importance and you dance with excitement.
- You have two sisters.
A mere half-cousin may be of no importance to you, but to me...
I have no-one.
I've never had anyone.
You must go.
Write to Diana and Mary and tell them to come home immediately.
But why?
- ¡PBecause we are rich.
You are rich, Jane.
We may do anything we like.
We may live as we choose.
Write to them tomorrow.
Hurry, Hannah.
We must light the fires before they arrive.
She wants fires in every room, in places where they never were.
What's the use of 5,000... if you can't light a few fires at Christmas?
20,000...
St. John!
I will not hear another word.
We have been over it again and again.
Our uncle left a nephew and three nieces.
We must all profit from his will equally.
- Jane, you have never had money.
You do not know what use you may put it to.
And you have never been without family.
I will have a brother and sisters, and a home.
I will be brother to you whether you share the money our uncle chose to leave you, you and only you, or not.
Leaving you with nothing, unable to realise your dreams, and me with a fortune?
I know enough about money to realise that will not make me happy.
What of the future?
If you should marry?
I will never marry.
They're coming.
You're enjoying your German lessons?
Yes, it is easier than French, but not so...
- I want you to start learning a new language.
We will begin tomorrow.
Go with you?
To the Cape?
To share my missionary work.
I've been watching you for over a year now ... and I am convinced you are equal to the task.
Have you never asked yourself why God led you here?
On that evening, at the very moment you were ready to die, he led me through all this wilderness to find you.
You have always felt you must travel the world.
Jane, it is your destiny.
He had asked you, hasn't he?
I knew it.
St. John has asked me to marry him.
Thank heavens.
Now he'll stay at home, safe with us.
He has asked me to marry... him that I might accompany him on his missionary work.
The two of you will shrivel up and die.
You are both too pale to go to Africa.
You did not agree to go, Jane?
Jane, you cannot.
We sail in six weeks.
We must make marriage preparations.
Why can we not travel as brother and sister?
As equals?
That would be impossible.
St. John, you do not love me.
Love is not an ingredient in this matter.
I fear you have not forgotten your old association, despite the harm he tried to do you.
I will never see any of them again, but I owe a debt to my friends at Thornfield Hall.
In many ways, I started my life there.
I became Jane Eyre.
- God made Jane Eyre.
You surely don't give this man Rochester any credit for that?
Of course not.
I have always known myself.
But he was the first to recognise me and to love what he saw.
I'll give you your answer, St. John, soon.
Don't worry.
And if I go with you, it will be my decision.
You'll have him to thank for that.
Jane!
Jane!
Jane!
Jane!
Jane!
Aye, it's a pity, all right.
Did you know Thornfield Hall?
Aye, miss, I used to work for the late Mr. Rochester in his stables.
He is dead.
I mean, the present Mr. Edward's father.
I'm guessing you're not from these parts, miss, so you don't know what happened a while or so back.
It were almost a year ago now.
Mr. Edward had sent away most of the servants, so nobody knows exactly what happened.
Bertha.
Bertha, come down.
Take my hand.
Bertha, it's not safe up here.
Will you take my hand?
Come, we'll go down together.
Will you take my hand?
Bertha, come down.
Bertha,
No!
Who's there?
Damn it.
Where are my candles?
Do you think because I'm blind I don't need them?
What's the matter now?
Has Pilot gone mad like the rest of us?
Well, man, what's the matter?
George?
That is you, isn't it?
George is in the kitchen, sir.
Who is that?
Pilot knows me, sir.
These are Jane Eyre's fingers.
I'd know them anywhere.
It's Jane..
- It is me, sir.
I'm come back.
You are real?
I dream of you often, and in the morning, you're gone.
You always were a witch.
Does that seem real?
- You always did torment me.
I'm very real, sir.
I'm an independent woman.
My uncle died and left me 20,000, but I gave most of it away.
No, I could never have dreamt such detail.
You will stay with me?
I will stay with you as long as I live.
Unless you would prefer I go.
No, no.
Stay.
You shall stay.
It's a ghastly sight, isn't it, Jane?
I knew if you ever saw me again, you would be revolted by me.
I am sorry for this.
And this.
And this.
The worst of it is, one's in danger of spoiling you too much.
When do you have supper?
I never take supper.
- Well, you shall tonight, for I am very hungry.
Have you a pocket comb about you, sir?
What for?
I need to comb out this shaggy black mane.
I find you quite alarming when you're this close, and you accuse me of being supernatural.
Am I hideous, Jane?
Very, sir.
You always were, you know.
You haven't lost your wickedness, wherever you've been.
Yet I have been staying with good people.
Far better than you.
A hundred times better.
Altogether more refined and exalted than you will ever be.
Who the devil have you been with?
There.
You are decent, at least.
I will tell you about them tomorrow.
I have been traveling for days and I'm tired.
Good night.
Jane...
Were there only ladies at the house where you were?
The grass is soft and mossy in that little patch, and the blackbird's wing is like coal with an emerald sheen.
So this St. John person you have been mentioning so often, what of him?
Well, he is tall, with blue eyes and a Grecian profile.
He's handsome then, compared to me.
Oh, he's much more handsome than you.
And he's a far better Christian, of course, than you ever were.
Well, I thanked God last night for your sudden reappearance.
The other night, I cried out to him in my despair.
I called your name, too.
What about his brain, this Rivers fellow?
Find yourself getting bored when he speaks?
He doesn't say very much, but what he says is to the point.
His brain is first-rate.
Did he study much?
Taught you things?
Oh, yes.
He taught me languages.
All right.
Why did he do that?
He wanted me to go with him to Africa.
He wanted you to marry him?
He asked me to marry him.
You're lying.
You've made this up to torment me.
- Aye, he asked me more than once.
Well, then, I think you might take yourself off and go elsewhere.
Why are you still here?
You've done your duty.You've assured yourself that I am still living.
Well, still living a tenth of a life.
You, heiress.
Well, if you want me to go...
- No.
I'll pack my bags.
- No, no.
Humour a foolish old ranter for a little bit longer before you go, hmm?
St. John does not love me.
I do not love him.
He's good.
Great, even, but... severe.
Cold as an iceberg.
He's heartless?
Oh, worse than that.
He has a heart.
I've seen it overflowing with passion, but... he just keeps it buried in stone with a tenacious willpower.
He is much more frightening than you.
It's turned chilly.
We've been sitting here too long.
No, I want to stay out here.
You can go on in if you wish.
The night I left...
The night I left you told me of a villa you own in the Mediterranean,
where we might go for refuge and live as brother and sister.
I remember.
Jane
Jane, are you still there?
I'm here, sir.
Jane, that villa I mentioned, the...
The separate bedrooms... the peck on the cheek on birthdays, that sort of thing?
Yes?
Well, that plan doesn't strike me as so attractive as it once did.
Do you not want to be friends?
Jane, would you be so good as to come back and sit beside me?
Jane, I want a wife.
Jane, I want a wife.
Not a nursemaid to look after me.
I want a wife... to share my bed every night.
All day, if we wish.
If I can't have that, I'd rather die.
We are not the platonic sort, Jane.
Can you see me?
Then hear this, Edward.
Your life is not yours to give up.
It is mine, all mine, and I forbid it.
No, George, I told you.
You're not to work today.
You are part of the enterprise.
Sit down and don't move.
What's he doing?
Moving chairs.
come on, everyone
What a pretty dress.
You must take your place.There.you must go directly right behind us.
Grace.
Pilot, not on the chairs.
Now, stand there.
Where's the baby?
Diana
Jane, take your place beside me.
Come, little one.
Without fossils, many of our land's ancient secrets would remain unknown.
Fossils unlock the mysteries of the past, and inspire the explorer in all of us.
For this free field guide, to help you to identify your fossil finds, and to learn more about Open University programmes on the BBC, call 0870 010 0878, or go to open2.net.
Subtitles by Red Bee Media Ltd
Email subtitling@bbc.co.uk
Where is the rat?
!
She's behind the curtain, where she always hides.
Mama!
Jane has knocked me down!
Take her up to the red room immediately.
That child has the devil in her.
I've always said.
No!
No!
Not the red room!
No!
No!
Not the red room!
No!
DOOR SLAMS
SHE SOBS
Don't come back, Uncle Reed.
Please don't come back.
Uncle Reed, please don't come back.
Please.
SHE PANTS
Let me out please!
Let me out!
Let me out.
Let me out!
Come along, John.
Yes, come on, John, we haven't got all day.
Don't worry.
I won't shoot you.
Unless we don't like the painting, that is.
Hello.
Well, shouldn't you be in the portrait?
There's still plenty of room.
Jane Eyre?
!
She's not part of the family.
It's no use looking at me like that, Jane.
I have tried my hardest but you made it impossible.
I tried to carry out my dear husband's wishes, but you have made it impossible.
You know you have.
You have deliberately made it impossible for me to love you.
Say something!
Unnatural child!
You have not tried very hard.
My uncle's dying wish was that you treat me as one of YOUR children.
You have not tried to.
You dare to tell me...
That is why he haunts the red room - because you disobeyed him.
And on the day you die, God will know who's telling the truth, whatever you or I say now.
Come on, Miss Jane.
You have a visitor.
You must look your best.
I have tried so very hard.
You cannot believe how hard I've tried, but... (..there is the devil in the child.)
What is your name, child?
Jane Eyre, sir.
Do you know, Jane Eyre, what happens to little children when they die?
They go to heaven.
And what happens to disobedient, deceitful girls when they die?
They go to hell.
So what must you do to avoid this terrible fate?
I must take care to keep in good health and not to fall ill, sir.
Your aunt tells me that you are a deceitful child.
Is that true, Jane Eyre?
I am not a liar.
So do you say your aunt is a liar?
CROWS CAW
BELL RINGS
Ah, Jane Eyre.
How could I forget?
Step out here, Jane.
Jane Eyre, I'm sorry to have to tell you... is a liar.
The lesson of the day will be that lying is a sin, that all liars deserve to be shunned by their fellows.
Stand on that stool, Jane.
You will stay there until midnight, and you will not eat or drink but bow to beg God's forgiveness for your sin.
I wish I could escape to one of these places, somewhere where it's warm.
I believe you will.
But you'll have to work hard.
We have to accept that we have been left here by our families to fend for ourselves.
If you take advantage of the education here, if you are not too rebellious, and if you are patient then you will find your way out.
We will both work our hardest and pray that God spares us until we are grown up.
And then what do we do?
I think when we grow up we have to be teachers.
How do we ever get out of here, Helen?
We advertise!
GIRLS COUGH
SOUND OF COUGHING
SOUND OF CRYING
SOUND OF COUGHING
There you are.
You're very cold, Jane.
Come on under my covers.
No!
No!
God can't have her!
He can't take her!
God has already taken her, Jane.
You must be brave.
Helen!
Helen!
Helen!
Helen!
SHE SOBS
CHURCH BELLS RING
Girls, look how the sun casts shadows in the flowers.
If you want to recreate that put down your charcoals and just smudge the edges where the dark shadows are.
Come on, girls, hurry up now.
Miss Eyre.
There appears to be a letter for you, Miss Eyre.
"If Miss JE is in a position to give satisfactory references
"as to character and competency, then we will be happy to engage
"her as a governess to Miss Adele Varens, ward of Mr Rochester of Thornfield Hall."
Ah, there's Thornfield Hall now, Miss.
There's always a light burning in the tower.
BIRDS TWITTER
CREAKING
BIRDS CALL
Are you taking me to Mrs Fairfax?
In there.
Why, it's Miss Eyre!
At last!
Oh, we've been waiting for you for so long!
I'm Mrs Fairfax.
Welcome to Thornfield.
My goodness, Miss Eyre, how hungry you are.
You must have been travelling all day.
How long is it since you have sat beside the fire and eaten a hearty meal?
Oh, approximately eight years.
Oh, my goodness.
SHE LAUGHS
Eight years!
Hasn't sat by the fire for eight years!
SHE LAUGHS Eight years!
I'll tell the master that when he gets back from abroad, that will amuse even him!
Oh, not that he's without humour, of course.
No, certainly not.
I remember he used to tell jokes as a child.
He keeps himself to himself, but you needn't worry.
He's hardly ever at home.
Always travelling.
BIRDS SING
Miss Eyre, you ARE up early.
I hope you slept well.
Yes, thank you.
I was anxious to meet Adele.
Ah yes, well, you won't have to wait long.
Does she play up there?
Oh, goodness me, no.
No-one lives up there.
Oh, I thought I saw someone at the window.
There's only Grace Poole there.
She does the laundry.
Mrs Fairfax...
Ah, I don't think Miss Adele can wait much longer.
SHE SINGS IN FRENCH:
Bonjour, Mademoiselle Jeanne.
I'm so very heureuse to faire votre acquaintance.
Enchantee, Adele.
Moi aussi j'etais impatiente de faire de connaissance.
Oh, thank goodness, you'll be able to understand her.
Now you can tell me what she is singing.
Well...
I believe it is a romance.
The woman is declaring her love for her sweetheart.
Merci, merci, merci, I will dance another one.
Later maybe, but first you will show me to our school room.
SOUND OF TRICKLING WATER
SHEEP BLEAT
DOG BARKS
HORSE WHINNIES
Damn it!
Christ!
DOG CONTINUES TO BARK
Quiet, Pilot.
Damn it!
Are you injured, sir?
Get away from me...witch.
You've done enough damage!
I cannot think of leaving you until I see you are fit to mount your horse.
You should be at home yourself.
Where do you live?
At Thornfield Hall.
I can fetch help, I'll be a little while.
HE GROANS IN PAIN, HORSE WHINNIES
Do you think you can bring him over to me?
Come over here.
Come.
Come here, come here.
Hold these.
HE GRUNTS
Thank you...
Miss?
Jane Eyre, sir.
Well, that's what happens when you bewitch a man's horse, Miss Eyre.
A lot of pain and cursing.
I did not bewitch your horse, sir.
I was waiting for you to go past.
You were hovering... casting spells.
Now get off back to Thornfield Hall, if that is indeed where you live.
I do, but I will post my letter first before I return.
Don't be late back... ..Miss Jane Eyre.
THUNDER RUMBLES
Ah, Miss Eyre, there you are.
What do you think?
The master is back.
Mr Rochester?
Not a word about his return, as usual, and he had an accident on the road.
The doctor is with him in the drawing room now.
Adele, come away!
Time for bed.
Mr Rochester will see you tomorrow.
KNOCKING
Miss Eyre, make yourself ready.
Master has finished his business for the day and wishes to see you.
Me?
Yes.
Oh, no, no, no, you must change.
This will have to do.
CLOCK CHIMES
This will have to do.
Ah, Miss Eyre.
Peut-etre vous avez une boite pour Mademoiselle Eyre, Monsieur Rochester?
A boite for Miss Eyre?
Does Miss Eyre require a present?
Excuse me, sir?
Does the governess expect me to have brought her a present back from my travels overseas?
No, sir.
What are you doing standing over there where I can't see you?
Where would you like me to stand, sir?
Here.
Sit.
Are you fond of presents, Miss Eyre?
I hardly know, sir.
I have little experience of them.
Never had a present?
I believe they are generally thought pleasant things, sir.
Hm.
But to this frivolous little doll, this true daughter of Paris, they are the stuff of life, aren't they, my little...?
The thought of presents makes her live and breathe.
Monsieur Rochester?
Ah, ma boite!
Merci!
Merci!
Merci!
Merci!
Merci!
Quiet, while I talk to Miss Eyre.
Where are you from?
Lowood Institution, sir.
How long were you there?
Eight years.
I'm amazed you survived, you're so small.
Didn't they feed you?
No...sir.
And how do you find yourself here and not still there?
I advertised, sir.
HE LAUGHS
Of course you did.
What of your family?
I have none, sir.
None whatsoever?
Friends?
None, sir.
None at all?
I had a friend once but she died a long time ago, sir.
You're lucky, Miss Eyre.
If you do not love another living soul then you'll never be disappointed.
Yes, sir.
Adele tells me you play the piano brilliantly.
I play a little, sir.
Of course, a little, that's what they all say.
Go over there and play.
SHE PLAYS AN UPBEAT TUNE ON THE PIANO
Enough!
Yes.
You're right.
You do play a little.
These yours?
Yes, sir.
These are...
These are interesting.
The ideas all yours?
Yes, sir.
Were you happy when you painted these?
I was fully occupied...
I was not unhappy.
What do you think of me, Monsieur?
Do you think I look beautiful?
Shall I dance for you?
Miss Eyre, what are you thinking of?
It's very late.
Adele should be in bed.
And my foot hurts like the blazes.
Good night, sir.
So, what did you think of Master?
He is very changeable.
Yes.
But he has... he has had disappointment in his life.
I hope you will forgive his rough and ready ways.
You will not leave?
I've grown used to you.
I hope he won't scare you away.
I'm not scared of rough manners.
He will be gone soon.
He never stays for more than a few days at a time.
Afternoon, Miss.
Miss Eyre!
Come here.
Sit.
Not you, Pilot.
Miss Eyre, excuse me, I'm... used to giving orders and having them obeyed.
Sit, if you please.
I beg your pardon, sir...
I did not ask your permission to read the books.
Permission!
To read the books?
You are a thinking, intelligent woman, aren't you?
Why ever would you need to ask permission?
Who else is to read them?
Adele?
The venerable Fairfax?
I'd more likely find Pilot pouring over the flora and fauna of the South American flatlands.
So, anyway, talk.
Talk, sir?
Yes, talk...if you please.
See how I'm learning to be polite.
I've had a tedious day of mortgages and share prices and I would like to be entertained.
Entertained, sir?
Miss Eyre, can we proceed?
When I'm... tired I tend to dwell on my darker thoughts.
I would like to entertain you, sir...
I am not sure what would interest you.
A smile!
A very small one.
The mere glimpse of a smile.
At last!
Tell me your thoughts.
I command you.
I was just thinking sir, it's... not many employers would ask the opinions of someone they pay £30 a year to.
I pay you a salary...do I?
Well, of course I do.
Well, I should have my money's worth then.
Oh...
I can see there's another problem.
Out with it.
You haven't actually paid me anything yet, sir.
Ah!
Mercenary girl!
Fetch me my keys now!
You want my money in your hand before you will amuse me?
No, sir.
That will not be necessary, sir.
Maybe you could ask me questions, sir?
Er, have you travelled, Miss Eyre?
No, sir.
All young people wish to travel, even if they find kindness and food and a fire, they wish to be gone.
I've travelled all over the world, Miss Eyre, and it's very over-rated.
Yes, sir.
When I was a young man I was your equal.
I had a clear conscience, unpolluted by sin.
I took the wrong path.
It wasn't my fault that I took it but... ..I must take the blame for continuing on it.
I think you may have a little of the witch about you.
You bewitched my horse.
You sit there patiently and would draw out secrets of my past.
I do not wish to pry, sir.
I know, Jane.
Do you think me handsome, Jane?
No, sir.
HE LAUGHS
Look carefully.
If I were to tell you that I'm worth £20,000, surely the light from the fire would soften my features.
Do I not seem to you now the very model of a fashionable man?
I do not think there's anything in science that will allow that, sir.
I spoke hastily, sir, I did not mean that I find you repellent.
What I meant is that it is the character inside that determines a person, not the outer shell.
Take care, Jane...
Don't look too closely inside of me.
You might not find anything within at all beautiful... ..and then where would we be?
THEY SPEAK QUIETLY
Is that Grace Poole?
Hm.
Does she live alone in the North Tower?
North Tower catches the wind.
I don't know why, it makes me shiver just to think of it.
Miss Eyre.
You're required!
This way, hurry up!
Oh, goodness, Miss Eyre.
The Master has taken it into his head to give Adele a biology lesson and we all have to hunt beetles.
Poor Sophie can't understand a word he says and neither can I really!
Monsieur Rochester, we are bored with looking at the English water beetles.
They are not beautiful like the ones in your study.
Can I go with you, Monsieur Rochester, when you set off on your travels once more?
I will always wear my best dress and everyone will think I am pretty.
Yes, but if they see you for the shallow little creature you are, no more substance than one of those meringues over there, well, they will find you disgusting, my little Parisienne.
They will find me disgusting!
You are mistaken, Adele, if you do not think to find interesting creatures here in England.
There's a bird.
It's a... it's a quite nondescript grey colour.
It's accustomed not to moving too quickly, not to draw attention to itself for fear of being beaten.
It wishes it could be in a cage... but sooner or later, slowly, day by day, its wings grow very strong and if you were to look very closely, you would see brilliant scarlet feathers hidden under its drab wings.
Until one day, it's grown so confident that it flaps its red wings and flies straight upwards into the sky and those lucky enough to catch it in flight think they have caught a glimpse of a firebird.
And then?
Well, then it flies away somewhere warm and never comes back.
I don't think I believe in this bird.
It's true.
There is one here at Thornfield in the gardens if you look very hard.
Madame Fare-Fax, Monsieur Rochester said the ladies will say I'm disgusting!
Oh, that's nice, dear.
Mmm, what is there to eat?
I would like a meringue, please.
Come, Miss Eyre...
You have something to say.
You should not tease, sir.
She's just a child.
She is.
She's also self-obsessed, thoughtless, vain.
You've made great headway with her even in the past few months, but look at her.
Just like her mother.
I saw what the mother became.
That is no reason to despise the child.
Do you really think?
If the blood is tainted won't I be failing in my duty to her to let her remain like this and not to try my best to correct her ways?
She does not deserve to be ridiculed or despised.
She's a child.
She deserves that you should trust her, that she'll grow and learn and...
Miss Eyre.
No, thank you, Adele.
We shall see, Miss Eyre.
Adele, don't run.
What's the matter with Sophie?
She doesn't like...
les malades...the mad people.
FOOTSTEPS RETREATING
BANGING
DISTANT BARKING
LOUD SCRATCHING
FOOTSTEPS APPROACHING
No, Pilot.
No, you don't belong here.
Go back to your master.
Jane, come and look at this fellow.
Come here.
Look at his wings.
I've seen one like this in the West Indies, but never here.
That will teach me to tease Adele.
Come, sit down with me for a while.
Sit.
As it is now your job as well as mine to bring Adele up correctly,
I'm going to tell you about her, about where she came from and who she belongs to.
Maybe you'll understand...
You do not need to tell me anything.
I know.
You understand too much without me saying anything.
It is the witch in you.
You have to imagine a young man...
Well, one who is still youngish and who has made a mistake.
Not his fault but... ..this mistake and the darkness that follows it has set him helter skelter around the world in search of beauty to help ease his soul.
And he does find beauty, or rather beauty finds him because, as you will guess this is a very rich youngish man.
That look.
No judgement, no pity.
That look could prise secrets from the blackest souls.
Where were we?
Beauty finding a youngish man.
Ah yes.
So, on our whirlwind tour, we alight in Paris.
Now, Jane, imagine, I know it's difficult, imagine... ..a suite of rooms in a particularly gorgeous Parisian hotel.
It is upholstered with velvets and furs.
Everything is sensuous to the touch, the best that this youngish man's money can buy.
It is a summer evening and there is perfume in the air.
The young man breathes in the scent of his lover... ..musk and amber.
Her name is Celine Varens.
She's very beautiful.
She is a dancer, an exotic bird.
She dotes on him, and he is passionately in love with her.
He's had a fortunate night gambling and he waits for her now in anticipation of the dark, intoxicating hours ahead.
Are you still with me, Jane?
I'm here, sir.
COQUETTISH LAUGHTER
'At last he hears the sound of her return.
'Only a few more seconds' wait until he sees her.
'An eternity passes.'
THEY SPEAK IN FRENCH
'At that very moment, as I stood in the shadows, 'the green snake of jealousy bit into my heart.'
Where is your beast of an Englishman tonight?
Gambling.
Someone else can look at his unpleasant face.
He is very...presentable... really, for an Englishman.
£20,000 make him very presentable.
'She wasn't as clear sighted as you are, Jane.'
You find me unattractive despite my wealth.
You do not know what it is to feel jealousy, do you, Jane?
Because you have no idea what it is to love.
You have no idea what it is to feel the very beat of someone's heart within one's breast.
No, sir.
Do you still love her, sir?
Who?
Celine.
I mean, Miss Varens.
Good God, no.
No, I threw her out of the hotel room and I shot him... ..in the shoulder or some insignificant place.
No, when I saw what a wretched fool she'd meddled with I knew that she could never love me.
That's obvious, surely.
And Adele?
She left her in the hotel when she ran off.
Celine claimed that I was the father, but a fairly elementary study of biology would prove that impossible.
Tell me, Jane, is there anything about myself that remotely resembles Adele?
Look at me carefully.
No, sir.
She left her in the hotel... a parcel with a label on with my name.
What was I to do?
Leave her there to starve?
I provided for her in France, then a few months ago it was necessary to bring her here.
She was not my responsibility but I took her on just the same.
So, as her guardian and your master, what do you think of my behaviour, Miss Eyre?
Did I do the right thing?
It was the right thing to do, wasn't it, Jane?
Yes, sir.
SCRATCHING AT DOOR
Go away, Pilot.
Pilot, go back to your master.
WIND HOWLS
FOOTSTEPS RUNNING
FOOTSTEPS IN DISTANCE
WAILING
Who is there?
FOOTSTEPS IN DISTANCE
FOOTSTEPS
POUNDING
DOOR SLAMS SHUT
Hello?
Hello?
Subtitles by Red Bee Media Ltd
Email subtitling@bbc.co.uk
HAUNTING ORCHESTRAL MUSIC
CRASH
Every Tuesday at 1030.
The best drama from BBC Four.
Are you injured, sir?
Get away from me, you witch.
What did you think of Master?
He is very changeable.
You do not know what it is to feel jealousy do you, Jane?
So you have no idea what it is to love.
I took the wrong path.
I must bear the blame for continuing on it.
Sir!
Mr Rochester, Sir.
Wake up!
For heaven's sake, sir, wake up!
Jane, are you hurt?
No, sir.
But you were nearly killed in your bed.
What happened here?
I don't know.
I heard a noise and I followed it here.
Shall I fetch Mrs Fairfax?
No.
What can she do?
I must fetch someone to help, sir.
No!
Sit, Jane, quietly.
Wait here for me.
Can you do that?
DISTANT DOOR CLOSES
It's settled.
It is as I thought.
How, sir?
I forgot.
Did you say you saw anything, anyone?
No, I heard a laugh.
I think it was Grace Poole, sir.
Of course, you're right.
She is a singular sort of person.
She is often careless, and accidents happen.
We will say no more about it.
Go back to your room.
Servants will be up in an hour or two.
Are you going without saying good night?
Jane, you just...
You just saved my life.
You might at least shake hands.
I knew you'd do me good, the first time I met you.
I knew I wouldn't mind being in your debt.
There is no debt, sir.
There is no debt, sir.
I am glad I happened to be awake.
She saves me from an inferno and she's glad she happened to be awake.
Still she tries to go.
I am cold, sir.
Of course.
Of course.
And we agreed that you'd never be cold again.
Well, if you must leave me...
..you must.
It's a mystery how he wasn't burnt in his bed.
He will read with a candle burning.
I've told him how dangerous that is.
Morning, dear.
Morning.
Morning, Miss.
Morning, Grace.
What has happened here?
Master was reading in bed again.
Fortunately, he woke up and no real harm was done.
That's very strange.
Did no-one hear anything?
Mrs Fairfax said she heard nothing.
She sleeps heavily.
You're young, Miss.
Maybe you heard a noise?
I did.
At first, I thought it was Pilot, but Pilot cannot laugh.
And I'm certain I heard a laugh.
A strange one.
Hardly likely the master would laugh, not when he was in such danger.
I think you must have been dreaming, Miss.
I most certainly was not dreaming.
Did you open your door?
Did you see who or what it was you thought laughed?
On the contrary.
I locked my door.
Very wise.
It would be wise to lock your door the moment you go to bed.
Who knows what might happen?
You're not eating again.
You ate very little at lunch time, Miss Eyre.
I hope you're not sickening.
You're very flushed.
Oh, I'm very well, thank you.
Never better.
Oh, it's a fine night.
On the whole, a very good day for Mr Rochester's journey.
Journey?
I didn't know he was going out.
Oh, he set off right after breakfast.
He's gone to Mr Eshton's place, over the other side of Millcote.
He'll likely stay a fortnight or more at the house party.
A fortnight?
Yes, I told you, he's hardly ever here for more than a few days.
And you can't say he hasn't been starved of company these last two months.
Oh, I mean fine and proper company of course, my dear.
When these fashionable, beautiful people get together they're in no hurry to separate.
Single gentlemen are especially sought after.
And Mr Rochester is so talented in society.
The ladies are very fond of him.
He's a very fine singer.
He sings?
Oh, yes.
He and Miss Blanche Ingram sang at a Christmas party here some years ago.
This Miss Ingram, is she very beautiful?
Oh, good Lord, yes.
She has very fine features.
Brilliant eyes, very striking.
Well, she's the belle of the county.
She's not yet married?
No.
The Ingram's estate will pass to the son.
The daughters have only small fortunes.
But if she is so very beautiful, she must have wealthy suitors.
Mr Rochester, for example.
Well, yes.
But there is a considerable difference in age.
What of it?
There are more unequal matches made every day.
Why yes, dear, but I scarcely think Mr Rochester would think that a good idea.
You've eaten nothing again.
I'm sure you're sickening for something and the master's away.
I must decide whether to send for Doctor Crawford.
I am perfectly well, as I said.
Never better.
GRACE: 'Are you sure you weren't mistaken, Miss Eyre?
'
You were mistaken, Jane Eyre.
'Miss Blanche Ingram is the most beautiful and accomplished young lady.
'She is right and proper company for the master.'
THEY LAUGH
Who are you writing to, Miss Eyre?
I thought you had no-one to write to.
I don't.
We are your family now.
I wish Mr Rochester would come back.
I am so bored.
I wouldn't wish for long.
Sometimes he leaves us for many a month, especially in the cold winter season.
Once, he left us for a whole year and a quarter.
Oh, that was a very long winter.
I can remember it well.
Miss Eyre, are you sick?
Your cheeks are pink.
It is very hot in here this morning, Adele.
Oh, it's from the master.
Well...
SHE CLEARS HER THROAT
Well.
Mr Rochester is not likely to return home soon?
He's returning all right.
Leah!
Come quickly.
BELL RINGS
Open all the rooms, all the windows.
Logs over here, please.
In the grate, not upstairs, thank you.
Mr Roberts, would you be so kind as to joint the meat for me, please?
Thank you.
The silver needs a thorough polishing, please.
Thank you, Polly, in the scullery.
A thorough polishing.
Good, more flowers.
The flowers are so pretty.
Nice display in the centre there, thank you.
Oh, thank goodness!
Now, I wanted an extra four pounds of baking apples and plums.
Can you check for me that they are here?
I would prefer for you to use goose eggs.
If you come with me, I'll show you where we keep them.
Are you sure all this is necessary?
Oh, yes, I think so.
We're not sure how many house guests he's bringing but we must be sure to have more than enough to feed them.
Oh, dear, I've never done this before.
But the master's never been home long enough to have a party.
Goose eggs.
Mrs Poole gets good wages, I suppose?
Yeah, about five times what I get, and Master's not stingy.
I wonder...
I'll race you over to the river.
Oh, there they are at last.
Oh, my dear, how lovely it is to meet you.
I must go down and greet them.
That is Mademoiselle Ingram.
She has a French name, Blanche.
And that is her sister.
I think it must be.
And that's Lady Ingram, her mother.
THEY LAUGH
Master says you may join the ladies this evening.
Oh, I must start to prepare at once.
I must wear absolutely my best dress.
Adele, you think too much of your appearance.
It's the person inside you that matters.
No-one will love you for how pretty you are.
I do not think that can be right, Miss Eyre.
You must take her into the drawing room before the guests finish dinner.
Oh, no, surely I don't have to be there.
Adele can go with Sophie.
Master's orders.
He says you must be there, or he will come to your room and bring you down himself.
BELL RINGS
Adele, come on.
Des amandes.
Adele, come on.
Ah, there's the pictures.
Beautiful, isn't it?
DISTANT CHATTER
You look alike, move alike, sound alike.
You are, if I may say so a particularly fine example of the split female embryo.
I hope you'll permit me to ask you some questions?
Of course.
Everybody is.
Yes, that's right, everyone is interested in us.
Lady Ingram, you don't escape our argument so easily.
Rochester, I don't understand you.
If some people are rich and some poor, then that is God's will.
So be it, I am satisfied.
I'm sure you are if you are one of the predetermined rich.
And it is a scientific fact that there are so many more who are poor.
Adele!
Adele.
Sit down, Adele.
Can't we talk about something else?
There are children and servants present.
Oh, good Lord!
What on earth is this?
It is Mr Rochester's ward, I suppose.
The little French girl.
Mr Rochester, I thought you were not fond of children.
I'm not.
Then what on earth made you take on that little doll?
Where did you pick her up?
I didn't pick her up.
She was left in my hands.
Well, you should send her to school where she belongs.
Well, schools are expensive.
But you have a governess, I see.
There, hiding behind the screen.
Now that's expensive, for you have to feed them both.
What are you talking about now, Rochester?
Oh, no.
We don't want Mother getting started on governesses.
We're talking of governesses, Lady Ingram.
Oh, don't mention them!
I'm so glad that Blanche and Mary have no longer any need for them.
Governesses are a nuisance, all of them.
If they're not eating you out of house and home, they're carrying on with the tutor or, even worse, making eyes at the master of the house.
Really?
You surprise me.
Mary, do you remember Miss Twisk or Twitt or whatever she was called?
We pretended she was harbouring a passion for Bradstock.
It was your idea.
Yes, we were very naughty.
She was so boring, poor thing.
Mother had her leave instantly, in case she should set us a bad moral example.
You cannot be too careful, Rochester, with a young, impressionable mind in the house.
How do you do, Jane?
I am very well, sir.
Why did you not come up and speak to me?
I did not wish to disturb you.
You seemed engaged, sir.
It is a while since we've seen each other.
What have you been doing?
Nothing in particular.
Teaching Adele, of course.
You look a good deal paler.
What's the matter?
Nothing at all, sir.
Then return to the drawing room.
I am tired, sir.
Mm, and a little depressed, I think.
What about?
Tell me.
I am not depressed.
I tell you that you are.
So depressed that you're almost...
Let me look at you.
You are about to cry.
Tell me, Jane, why are you crying?
I am not crying.
Tonight you are excused.
But I expect you to appear in the drawing room every evening after dinner.
Every evening, mind.
It is my wish.
Where did I put it?
I'm sure I left it somewhere here.
Miss Eyre.
Why are you not dressed for riding?
I do not ride, sir.
Well, then you must learn.
Come, join us by the fire.
We will not be able to hunt today, I'm afraid, with the weather so changeable.
No, or go on a walk.
My book has gone missing again.
My book, you know, The Beast Within.
Oh, I wish you wouldn't, my dear.
How do you dare read those novels?
Oh, but it's very exciting.
It is about a man who commits a crime.
He spends the dark hours raging about like an animal and then, in the morning, he goes about his business and no-one suspects a thing.
Nonsense!
You don't think it possible that someone who seems perfectly serene and unspectacular from the outside could be capable of committing horrific crimes?
Certainly not a Christian man.
Although I'm sure that Mr Eshton has all sorts of new ideas about that.
For once, I must admit ignorance.
The brain is a vast and wonderful landscape.
We have not even begun to navigate its mysteries.
We do not know why it malfunctions.
We are in the very infancy of its science.
Science again.
You make it all sound so very grand.
God gives people good blood and bad blood, and there is an end to it.
When Mary and I were in Paris we saw the savage boy, the one who lived in the woods and could only talk gibberish, if you could call it talked.
That's what I'm talking about.
That child had bad blood.
You can clean it, dress it up, but you will never make it good.
You were born bad, Jane Eyre, and you will die bad!
Miss Eyre, is it your opinion that children are born the way
God intended them to be, that bad blood will always be bad blood?
Or can you discipline such a child?
Excuse me?
Of course you should.
That's common sense.
I think it wise that since we must live with the adult,
I think it prudent to treat a child as if they had feelings.
Really?
Feelings!
A child has no more feelings than that dog over there.
I would have thought that if you...
Please, Miss Eyre, continue.
Mr Eshton wishes to hear your opinion.
I think that all children, whether they are thought to be of good blood or bad blood, deserve to be given the chance to love...
..and to be loved.
I do not see the use of punishing a child with beatings and harsh words.
"What's the use of punishment?"
From a governess!
You must send that child off to school immediately, Rochester.
All this talk of tainted blood is wearisome.
I know my blood's up!
You are the best horsewoman in the county.
Shall we ride?
Oh, regarde!
LAUGHTER
Jane.
Where are you going?
I have to speak to Mrs Fairfax.
She allows Adele to eat too many sugary things.
Afterwards, I'll join you in the drawing room.
You might even enjoy yourself.
We'll be playing games later.
Don't tell me you don't approve of games, Jane?
What do you think of Miss Ingram, Jane?
I suppose I must choose a bride, as all about me seem to wish it.
Is that what they're saying?
To preserve this great estate of mine, I must have an heir.
Is that what the gossip requires?
I know nothing of gossip, sir.
Well, then, Jane, your honest opinion.
Do you think Miss Ingram a good choice?
Do you think I am in love with Miss Ingram, Jane?
I know nothing of love, sir.
Don't be late, Jane.
It won't be long before the games begin.
Shall we go?
Oh, now, there it is!
There is my book, The Beast Within, sitting there all the time.
No, but I'm sure I looked there this morning.
Maybe the ghost took it.
The ghost?
The ghost.
Sophie says it walks the corridors at night.
It eats the gateaux from the kitchen and it laughs in the dark.
THUNDERCLAP, THEY SCREAM
A ghost at Thornfield.
How exciting!
You never mentioned it.
She walks in the corridor with the painting of the mad people.
Sophie says she goes cold and shivers when she...
Sophie is from Marseilles, which means that she wears three or four outer garments even in July.
Our English weather feeds her overactive French imagination.
Oh, you disappoint me.
Maybe we could tell each other ghostly stories.
I'm in need of a little danger.
Ghost stories are not of interest.
How do you know if they're true?
But, my dear Blanche, if the ladies are interested, I know a game, if you're not afraid of things that we might not be able to explain?
The supernatural!
What are you up to, Edward?
You're interested in experiments, aren't you?
Well, I hope you know what you're doing.
ALL:
L... ..O... ..V..
..E.
Love.
Who's next?
Blanche.
Are you ready?
Of course I am.
H... ..E..
..A... ..R... ..T...
H-E-A-R-T.
Heart.
Oh, Blanche.
It means that you have given your heart to someone.
Do tell us...
As if we didn't know!
THEY LAUGH
L... ..E...
..S... ..S. Less heart.
What can that mean?
Less Heart, Heart Less...
Heartless!
Oh, dear Blanche.
I'm sure it's made a mistake.
It must think you're someone else.
You were right, Mr Eshton.
This is a silly game.
I am rather tired.
I think I will read in bed.
Be careful of your candle, my darling.
GHOSTLY CRIES
Morning.
ESHTON: 'You don't think it possible that someone who seems perfectly serene 'and unspectacular from the outside could hide a beast within them?
'
I'll be away all day on business.
I'm sure you'll be able to amuse yourselves.
Don't be too late.
I'll be back by sundown.
Don't misbehave now.
I think that gown Miss Blanche Ingram has, the blue, I think it the most beautiful dress I have ever seen.
SOUND OF HORSES HOOVES It is Mr Rochester!
He is back.
You said we could finish.
He's early.
Oh!
Who is this?
He is tres beau, Mademoiselle, n'est-ce pas?
A foreigner, I think.
Although quite a nice chap.
Mason's the name.
Says he met Rochester in the West Indies.
I think the twins have taken a bit of a shine to him.
Speak up, man.
What's the matter?
It's an old gypsy lady, Madam.
Come to tell fortunes.
She refuses to leave and with the Master away...
Tell her to go or we'll set the dogs on her.
No, no, tell her to stay.
There are ladies present who wish to have their fortunes told.
But what would Rochester say?
Well, he's not here, is he?
I am brave enough, if you aren't.
Ah!
Bonjour!
Bonjour, mon cherie.
Blanche!
What happened?
What did the gypsy lady say to you?
Oh.
Rochester was right. she talked absolute nonsense.
Nothing in it!
You can amuse yourselves with her if you want.
I'm sorry, Miss. she said she wouldn't leave until she had seen everyone and you are the only person who hasn't had their fortune told.
She would not leave until I had brought you here.
That's all right, George.
Don't worry.
I'll wait outside in case there's trouble.
No, George.
You may go, I'm not frightened.
You're not afraid?
Of course not.
Do you wish me harm?
The others were afraid of my magic...
Of my dark arts.
Of what I knew of their worst thoughts and desires.
Surely you noticed that some who entered this room with confidence are now disappointed with what I revealed?
Do you not believe in hell and the supernatural, Miss Eyre?
I believe what I believe.
You are a very confident young woman for someone who has never loved... ..who has had only had one true friend... who was snatched away... prematurely.
Where was it?
Lowood School.
There now!
I've impressed you.
These matters are not generally known, for sure.
But they are facts.
They are the truth.
You might have found them out by mortal means.
Well said, Miss Eyre.
I can see I am going to have to prove my powers.
To see into your soul, to reveal a hidden secret that no-one else could possibly know.
What were your thoughts, for instance, when you came to me this evening?
It's very pleasant company is it not, such as you've never known, and after the long months here alone at Thornfield with only the child and the housekeeper.
What do you think of them?
I do not think of them.
Of their opinions and their tastes.
I do not care for theirs any more than I'm sure they care for mine.
Is there no-one in the company who you share feelings with?
What about the master of the house?
He is not here today.
He is soon to be married, is he not, to the beautiful Blanche Ingram?
I don't know.
I thought it was you who could predict the future.
Anyway, I have paid you for MY future, not Mr Rochester's.
Mr Rochester is to be married.
I know that for sure, everyone does.
Oh...
I see that this news affects you.
You talk nonsense, old lady.
I shall leave you and send in the next fool.
It is over.
What do you wish me to do?
What is it?
Who is there?
Show yourself immediately or I'll call a servant!
Sir!
Thank you.
You have done well today.
You've given me a deal to think about and amused me greatly.
Now Jane don't be too cross.
I am not angry.
I am surprised.
Surely you don't begrudge me this little diversion.
The old lady provided me with an afternoon's amusement and our guests were given a mirror to hold up to themselves.
Not undeservedly, surely?
They are your guests, sir, not mine.
But I believe you got that woman to talk nonsense to me so that I might talk nonsense back and that was not fair, sir.
No.
No, it was not fair but how else am I to find out what you think, Jane?
But don't worry, you did not talk nonsense so all's well, isn't it?
And you are not angry with me?
I don't know.
I'll have to think about it.
But I expect I'll manage to forgive you eventually.
Aren't you curious to find out what my gypsy predicted for Miss Ingram?
I bet the drawing room's buzzing with excitement?
They have plenty to discuss, sir.
Even the stranger who arrived this morning.
What stranger?
His name is Mason.
I believe he's visiting from overseas.
What is it, sir?
Oh, Jane!
I wish I were on a desert island somewhere... ..with only you for company.
Tell me.
If all those people in the drawing room...
If they... cast me out and spat at me...
..what would you do?
I should try to comfort you, sir.
Can I help you, sir?
I would do anything for you.
What if I asked you to do something for me that was wrong?
I know.
I know the answer, Jane.
You could not.
Thank you.
Jane.
Do you believe in redemption?
If you have sinned, you can be redeemed.
DOOR SHUTS
Do you mind if I ask you some questions about your habits?
How about your clothes - did you come down in the morning and find that you had dressed the same?
Yes.
Mason!
My dear fellow.
What a surprise!
How good to see you again.
SHE SCREAMS
What was it?
Did you hear it?
Really.
I only go away for a day on business and you over-excite yourselves like children with your occult games and conversations.
But we all heard a cry!
Didn't we, Lady Lynn?
Yes.
Surely we all heard something?
Someone had a bad dream, brought on by a combination of the visit from our gypsy friend and too much grouse at dinner.
Are you sure?
We are all safe?
I am sure.
Anyway, my Amazon, what have you to fear from the night hours?
It's bad enough to have strange shrieking, never mind governesses creeping up on us.
She's pale as a ghost!
Well, my lady.
I shall escort you back to your bedroom personally.
Come everyone, back to bed.
KNOCK ON DOOR
I'm ready.
Are you hurt, sir?
It is nothing.
Come, we must be silent.
Are we going to the North Tower?
Do you want to go back?
No, sir.
I forgot to ask.
Do you faint at the sight of blood?
I don't know.
Wait here.
Here.
UNLOCKS BOLTS
Richard.
Jane.
Come here.
You must press this hard on the wound.
I am going now to get the doctor.
He'll have you good as new by morning.
(Richard, do not say anything of what has happened or I will not be responsible.)
Jane.
I have to leave you here while I'm gone for an hour or so.
No conversation.
I could not stop her.
Ssh!
Be calm.
She has killed me.
RATTLING
You will not die.
I will not let you die.
KEYS JANGLE
She's, she's done for me!
Nonsense.
The doctor's here, you are in no danger.
There are teeth marks here?
She sucked my blood.
She said she would drain my heart.
I warned you.
I told you not to do anything until I could be with you.
Hurry up, Carter.
We need him out of here before sunrise.
Take care of him at your house.
I'll ride over in a day or two to see how he does.
Very well.
Edward, take care of her as tenderly as you can.
I'll do my best.
As I always have and always will.
Stay a while outside with me.
This house is a dungeon.
It's a prison.
It's a lovely morning... ..after such a turbulent night eh, Jane?
Yes, sir.
Were you frightened?
I was afraid, sir.
DISTANT CHATTER
Quietly go in the back entrance.
Everything all right, Miss?
What do you want?
Mrs Fairfax asked me to tell you that you have a visitor.
Oh, excuse me, Miss.
It is you, Miss Jane.
Don't you recognise me?
Bessie!
Oh, look at you!
Miss Eyre.
I always said Jane Eyre would grow up to be a fine, accomplished young lady.
Not quite a beauty, all told.
But... ..a credit to us.
I'm glad not to be of discredit to you, Bessie.
Oh, Bessie, what's happened?
And I'm hoping you are not going to disappear once more on your travels.
I suppose you might like to travel yourself one day.
Does Miss Eyre need to speak to you?
Excuse me.
Well, Jane?
Sir, I need to have a leave of absence for a week or two.
To see a sick lady who has asked for me.
What sick lady?
Her name is Reed.
She is my uncle's wife.
Uncle?
You told me you had no family.
My aunt cast me off when I went to school.
Why?
Because I was poor.
And she did not like me.
And she sent you to Lowood without so much as a word or a visit for nearly 10 years?
So why does she suddenly wish to see you now?
Her son John is dead.
He ruined himself.
She is now struck down with his misfortune.
I will only be gone two weeks, I hope.
Two weeks!
That's not possible.
And you have company, sir.
Very well.
But promise me you will not stay with this undeserving aunt more than a week.
I cannot promise, she is dying.
I cannot set a time on that.
Of course you will go.
How have I the power to stop you?
Well, you must have some money.
You can't travel without money.
I haven't given you any salary yet, remember?
How much have you, Jane?
In all the world?
Five shillings, sir.
Here.
Take £50.
No, sir.
You only owe me 15, I have no change.
I don't want change, Jane.
You know that.
Take your wages.
You're right.
Better not give you all that.
You might stay away for three months.
Here, there's 10.
Isn't that enough?
Yes, sir.
But you will still owe me five.
Then come back for it.
Sir!
I have to ask you something else.
A matter of business.
You have as good as said you intend to be married.
Really?
That's been settled then, has it?
You've decided Miss Ingram is to be my bride.
Now I see it!
You are going to prevail upon this miserable "family" to find you a new situation.
Ungrateful girl!
No, sir.
I told you.
They do not like me, sir.
To offer such a service...
I shall advertise.
Devil you will!
Advertise!
I wish I had only offered you a sovereign not ten whole pounds.
Give me back nine.
Jane.
I have need of it.
No, sir.
I do not trust you.
So Jane - etiquette.
How do we say goodbye?
Teach me.
I'm not quite up to it.
You say, farewell...
Or anything else we might prefer.
Farewell, Mr Rochester.
For the present.
And what must I say in return?
The same, if you like.
Then I will say...
.."Don't go, Jane."
What will I do without your help?
Sir, you will not be in danger.
Rochester!
Edward!
Sir, please!
STEADY BREATHING
Subtitles by Red Bee Media Ltd
Email subtitling@bbc.co.uk
Ben!
Ben!
Have you seen my keys?
Keys, keys, keys...
SHE SIGHS
God's sake.
Ben!
Karen!
No bin bag!
Brilliant.
CHILDREN SHOUT
Ben and Karen, are you getting ready?
We've missed the walking bus!
Again.
We'll have to take the car.
Shoes, teeth, and hair!
Why can't people just leave them...
What are you doing with Daddy's computer?
I'm taking it to Show And Tell.
No.
Show And Tell's on Friday and today's Tuesday, so...
They've changed it.
They haven't...have they?
Yeah.
Since when?
Last Wednesday.
Who changed it?
Problems on the District Line!
Let go, we're gonna put it back.
I want to take it.
You can't.
People take pets!
Come outside and put...
Ben, look, you'll be late.
Can I take this for History Week?
No, you can't take it!
Turn it off.
CRASH
Every Tuesday at 1030.
The best drama from BBC Four.
You're the best horsewoman in the country.
Shall we ride?
Do you think I'm in love with Miss Ingram?
SCREAM I forgot to ask.
Do you faint at the sight of blood?
She has done for me.
Nonsense, the doctor's here.
You are in no danger.
There are teeth marks here?
!
I need to have a leave of absence to see a sick lady who has asked for me.
What sick lady?
Her name is Reed, my uncle's wife.
Don't go, Jane.
What will I do without your help?
ECHOING VOICE:
'No!
No!
Not the red room!
'Not the red room!
I've not been wicked!
'No!
Not the red room!
'Don't take me to the red room!
'Jane Eyre!
She's not part of the family.'
Miss Eyre?
You have not grown tall.
How is Mrs Reed?
Mrs Reed?
Oh, you mean Mama!
She's extremely unwell.
I doubt you can see her tonight.
If you would just step upstairs and tell her I have come, I would be much obliged to you.
She has asked for me to come.
I would not like to keep her waiting.
Missus is awake.
I have told her that you're here.
Who are you?
I am Jane Eyre.
How are you, Aunt?
You are not Jane Eyre.
I have had such trouble with that child!
She was mad.
A fiend.
I sent her away to Lowood, where the fever broke out and many died.
But she didn't die!
I wish she had!
Why do you hate Jane Eyre so?
I hated her mother.
She was my husband's favourite sister.
When she died, he cried like a baby.
And he insisted on sending for the child.
Sickly, whining thing!
It wailed in its cradle all night long and Reed doted on it, the fool.
Even in his last illness, he called for "it" rather than his own children.
Where's John?
He always wants money.
He's a fine boy and he loves me, but I don't know where to get the money.
Where's John!
Where's John?
She knows he's gone.
That's why she'll never leave this bed.
Where's John?
Ssh, ssh.
She doesn't mean it, Miss Jane, half what she says.
It's all right, Bessie.
I don't mind.
No, really I don't.
You used to get upset.
More than upset.
But you've grown into such a confident young woman.
Who could have known it?
I suppose you have friends now to confide in.
So your troubles don't plague you so much.
That must be it?
Yes.
I do have a friend.
Someone who...when I talk to them, they understand everything I say.
They would laugh if I told them about Mrs Reed.
They are so in tune with me, they know my thoughts before I even think them.
Certainly before I put them into words.
I always said you'd do well.
I'm pleased that when you leave here you can go home to such people.
My friend is to be married soon, it's almost certain.
But she will not live far away, maybe you can visit?
Yes, of course.
That may be so.
LAUGHTER Eshton here says that that swallow there heads south at the merest shiver of winter.
Travels all the way to the most southern tip of Africa and then comes back here, to this precise spot.
And I say, how do you know?
As they all look exactly the same.
Why would they come back here and not stay where it is warm?
It is in their nature.
It is what they must do.
They must come home.
What do you think, Edward?
That's enough.
Get along now.
Shouldn't you be in bed?
No, Madame.
Oh, that necklace is so beautiful.
I wouldn't have thought I'd say it - it's a pity the governess isn't here.
I expect you are glad she stays away so long.
Oh, no, I wish she would come back.
I like her best of all, except for Monsieur Rochester of course.
When Monsieur Rochester sees fit to make a certain announcement, that young lady will feel the benefits of a good English boarding school.
LAUGHTER
Is there a problem?
Not at all.
I was just taking a stroll through the hall before dinner.
And did you like what you saw?
Naturally.
It could of course do with a little management, a few new furnishings here and there.
And you think you'd like to, er... take all this on?
What do you really want, Blanche?
If only Aunt Gibson would invite me up to town.
It would be so much better if only I could get away for a month or two until it was all over.
Georgiana, if there were ever a more vain, absurd animal than you.
You are completely useless.
And in being useless, seek only to cling onto others.
If no-one can be found to burden themselves with such a fat, weak, puffy, useless thing, you complain that you are ill-treated and neglected.
You must be flattered, you must be admired, or you languish and die away.
Well!
Everyone knows you are the most selfish, heartless creature in existence!
I know very well your spite and your hatred.
You ruined my chances with Lord Vere.
You could not bear the thought that I would be raised into circles where you dare not show your face.
Let me give you this advice.
It is the first and last I shall offer you.
If you divide each day into sections and perform some useful task to timetable, the day will be over before you know it.
You will be dependent upon your own senses and not have to be flattered and admired to know that you exist.
After my mother's death, the hour of her burial, I wash my hands of you.
It will be as if you and I had never known each other.
And if we were the only two human beings left alone on Earth together,
I would not address one more word to you.
Who is that?
It is I, Aunt Reed, Jane Eyre.
You asked to see me.
Yes.
I did.
I am very ill, you know.
I need to ease my mind before I die.
I have done you wrong twice, Jane Eyre.
One was to break the promise I made to my husband.
To bring you up as my own child.
You know that.
And...
Go to my dressing table.
Open it.
Take out and read the letter you find there.
"Madam.
"Will you have the goodness to send me the address of my...
niece, Jane Eyre.
"I wish her to join me in Madeira.
"Fortune has blessed me, and as I am unmarried and childless,
"I wish to adopt her and bequeath to her all I have when I die.
"I am, Madam, sincerely yours, John Eyre."
But this was written three years ago.
Why did you never tell me I had an uncle who was alive?
Because I hated you too much.
I could not forgive you.
Forgive me?
For your conduct.
I take you on and you treat me with contempt.
You talk to me like a vile, wild animal.
Forgive me my passionate nature.
I was a child, Aunt.
Let us forgive each other now.
I could not forget.
I took my revenge.
I wrote to your uncle.
I told him Jane Eyre was dead.
That she had died of a fever at Lowood School.
See?
I had my revenge.
Now you may have yours.
You can tell him of my falsehood.
I will be dead by morning so I don't care.
SHE COUGHS
Please.
Water.
Quick.
I forgive you, Aunt Reed.
Whether you wish it or not, I do truly forgive you.
Woah!
Take my trunk on up to Thornfield, would you?
Won't you ride, Miss?
You've had a very long journey.
No.
I'm nearly home.
It is my favourite walk.
There you are!
You're back!
Ungrateful thing!
I give you leave for a week and you're gone a whole month!
I want my money back, since you've had me so little in your thoughts.
I said I would be gone for as long as I was needed.
And I was.
And you still owe me wages.
Come, let's get you home.
Adele will scream and shout, "Bienvenue!"
Thank you.
For your great kindness.
I am...
I am strangely glad to get back again to you, and... wherever you are is my home.
Is my true home.
Are you going?
See, Eshton?
Our swallow has come home.
Eshton is using my coach to pursue some unusual twins.
Yes. one, a Belgian, has been in a sort of a deep sleep for some eight months and he has been woken by a twin, now living in Toulouse, that he never even knew existed.
It's amazing!
You don't think it possible that two minds can be so in tune that they communicate across the country?
And call out to each other across space and time?
You are one of the world's most curious people, Eshton.
And you are one of the most cynical, Rochester.
Nonsense.
I am the most romantic person I know.
Be off with you.
Miss Eyre, Miss Eyre!
Amazing minds await your magnifying glass.
Miss Eyre.
Oh, Jane.
You're back.
Miss Eyre!
Ah, at last the governess has returned from her travels.
Can't you teach that child something so she won't be under our feet?
It's a pity we can't stay for longer.
But it's the Warreners' summer ball next week.
Well, Blanche and I won't be there.
We'll be occupied with a more important event, I am certain.
Don't worry, you'll see her again soon.
Ingram Park is a short journey for an enthusiastic rider.
Indeed.
Safe journey.
Ah, there you are.
Is Adele in bed?
You're back to our routine very quickly.
Now that all our house guests are gone, it is like it has always been.
What's that?
It is a book I used to read as a child.
My "escape" book.
I used to imagine that one day I could go anywhere I wanted.
I took it with me to Lowood.
And now?
Now, I think it can go here very well.
Now, Miss Eyre.
If we're very lucky, we might see some dragonflies.
Did I ever tell you of my travels in the Blue Mountains of Mongolia?
And you can tell me of your travels in the black and gloomy forests of your childhood memories.
So the vain, facetious cousin, Georgiana, found a mate within days of your aunt's funeral?
So it seems.
And what of the nun?
I believe Eliza will settle in her French convent, never to return to worldly pleasures.
I give her but a few years to become Mother Superior.
So you returned to Gateshead half knowing you wouldn't find the old lady repentant or forgiving, or in the least bit pleased to see Jane Eyre, and this is how things transpired.
And yet Jane Eyre doesn't seem to be troubled that she has no family, no-one in the world outside of Thornfield, who wishes her well.
No.
I have no family to speak of.
But I hear you have been making plans of your own.
I assume Miss Blanche's departure from Thornfield is only temporary.
I mean, as Adele's governess, it is my duty to help you decide on a suitable school.
Yes.
Yes, indeed, and we mustn't forget that when I do, finally, relinquish my bachelor ways, we must find you a suitable position.
What do you think of Ireland?
We don't have to worry about that now.
Not for a good while yet.
Oh, look, look!
See the emerald wings!
Come.
So, to find half of anything, we divide it into two equal parts.
Elle est arrivee.
Elle est tres belle!
In English, please, Adele.
But I think it must be Francaise, Miss Eyre, surely it must be?
What do you think?
A beauty, isn't it?
Do you think it'll do for Mrs Rochester?
Won't she look like Queen Boadicea?
Yes, thank you.
Leaning back on those purple cushions?
You know, Jane...
I wish I were a little better suited to matching her in looks.
Tell me, magician that you are, are you absolutely sure you don't have a potion that can make me more handsome?
I have told you before.
That would be past the power of magic, sir.
Come, Adele.
Monsieur Rochester,
I want you to tell me about the Caribbean Islands again.
Sophie has taught me a song.
SHE SINGS
All right, incorrigible one.
You must imagine a restaurant.
No, let's say, a meeting place, where many respectable people come here at night to socialise.
You must imagine... brilliant reds and pinks, the most exotic perfumed flowers, delightful, passionate music.
The women are of course very beautiful.
They wear bright silks, ambers, sapphires, emeralds.
They are very seductive.
But they are also mysterious, tantalising.
Dangerous.
# La... #
Stop that noise or I'll send you to school in the morning!
You're like a wild animal!
The Caribbean is not as beautiful as it seems, Adele.
I came back to escape.
Summer's been with us forever this year.
I can't remember when it's stayed so long.
And Mr Rochester has stayed with it.
He has never been here at Thornfield for this length of time.
He found something to keep him from his travels.
Mind you,
I think there must have been a little disagreement.
Really?
Well, Ingram Park is not very far away, not for an ardent suitor.
Yet he has not saddled a horse for several weeks.
He spends his evenings either talking to you or prowling the lower gardens, like a bear, the gardener says.
Of course, he's got the household business to worry about.
What do you mean?
Well, he'll be wanting to find us suitable positions.
For after the wedding.
Oh, no, he will take care over that, I'm sure.
He's a good master.
Thornfield is pleasant in the summer, isn't it, Jane?
Yes, sir.
You have become attached to the place?
Yes, sir.
And you'd be sad to leave?
Yes.
Must I leave, sir?
Must I leave Thornfield?
Yes, I'm sorry, but I'm afraid you must.
You are to be married?
Exactly.
Precisely.
As you, with your usual acuteness, have already predicted, when I marry, Adele must go to school and you must find a new situation.
Yes, sir.
I will advertise immediately.
No, you won't.
I have already found you a place.
Ireland is a long way away, sir.
From Thornfield.
It is a long way away from you, sir.
We have been good friends, haven't we, Jane?
It is difficult to part from a friend... and know you will never meet them again.
And you and I... it's like we're a pair of Eshton's twins, bound together in some unworldly way.
Sharing a spirit, we're so alike.
When we are parted, when you...
leave me,
I believe that bond will snap and I will bleed inwardly.
But you will forget me after a while.
I would never forget you!
How can you imagine that?
What do you think I am?
Oh, I wish I'd never been born!
I wish I'd never come here.
I wish I'd never grown to love Thornfield.
I love Thornfield.
I love it because I have lived a full life.
I have not been trampled on.
I have been treated as an equal.
YOU have treated me as an equal.
You are the best person I know.
And I can't bear the thought of having to leave you.
Must you leave me, Jane?
Of course I must, because you have a wife.
What do you mean?
Blanche Ingram, of course.
You are as good as married.
You have promised her.
I have not promised Blanche anything.
To someone who is inferior to you.
Someone who you have no sympathy with.
Of course I must go!
Do you think that I am a machine?
That I can bear it?
Do you think, because I am poor, plain, obscure and little, that I have no heart, that I am without soul?
I have as much heart as you and as much soul!
And if God had given me some beauty and wealth
I would make it as hard for you to leave me as it is for me to leave you.
You will not leave me, Jane.
Let me go.
Jane, don't struggle so.
I am a free person and I will go and do as I please.
Yes, yes, yes, you will.
You will decide your own destiny.
Jane, I offer you my hand, my heart and all my possessions.
You laugh at me!
No, no.
Jane.
I want you to live with me, to pass through life as my second self, my best earthly companion.
Jane, have you no faith in me?
None whatsoever.
You doubt me?
Absolutely.
Jane, you know I don't love Blanche.
I love you, like my own flesh.
Jane, say that you will marry me!
Say it quickly.
Jane, do you accept me?
Are you in earnest?
I can hardly believe you.
I swear.
Then, sir...
Call me by my name.
Call me Edward.
Then, Edward,
I will marry you.
God forgive me!
And let no man meddle with me.
I aim to keep her.
There is no-one to meddle.
I have no family to interfere.
No.
THUNDER RUMBLES
Run and take off those wet things.
Good night!
Good night, my darling!
I feel so astonished.
I hardly know what to say to you, Miss Eyre.
Mr Rochester came in here about five minutes ago to tell me that he had asked you to marry him.
Oh, this cannot be true.
But why?
I am sorry to offend you, Jane, but you are so young.
You know nothing of men.
I have noticed that Mr Rochester seemed to make you a favourite.
But I thought...
That I was too monstrous to love?
No.
I meant, I thought you too level-headed.
Too sensible a young woman to be so overwhelmed.
Overwhelmed?
Well... are you overwhelmed?
I believe the good woman thought I'd forgotten my station.
And you yours.
Little does she know that I am the servant and you the mistress.
I am sorry.
I know that look.
She thinks I do not know myself.
And that you are doing as all men must.
Jane, she doesn't know us.
All the same, sir.
Sir!
When did I become sir again?
Last night, you stood before the heavens and pronounced yourself my equal.
That's the Jane I want to marry.
To share my life.
Will you dine with me tonight?
No, sir.
Edward.
You promised to call me Edward.
Until we marry...if we marry...
In one month, one short month, you'll be Mrs Rochester.
Or I'll be damned!
Then until that morning, I will call you Mr Rochester, halfway between Edward and Sir.
I will continue to teach Adele.
We will go on as before.
Then it will be seen that this idea, this...marriage, is a sensible proposition.
I'm not interested in pleasing Mrs Fairfax.
But for you... ..for you, I will obey.
Now, hurry up and get your bonnet or we'll be late.
For what?
We're going to town.
Oh, no!
No, no, no.
You're not coming.
Out of there, now.
Oh, please let me come, Miss Eyre.
No!
Absolutely "non"!
Jane and I...
Miss Eyre and I are going shopping by ourselves.
Shopping!
Were you listening to a word I said?
Just today, to celebrate.
Come, come, you can't get married in that.
I will not be married at all if you force me into that ridiculous carriage.
John, bring up the other carriage.
And Adele shall come too.
No.
I'll send her to school yet.
Will I go without Mademoiselle?
Absolutely sans Mademoiselle!
I am going to take Mademoiselle away.
To Europe first, where I will take her to all the grand palaces and present her to all the kings and queens.
You cannot do that, because she has no jewels.
She will have.
In London there is a very special box filled with jewels.
I shall send for them immediately and Mademoiselle will be covered in them from head to toe while she teaches you mathematics.
And when Madame, as she will be then, is tired of all these kings and queens,
I will take her to a villa, whitewashed and secluded, on the edge of the emerald Mediterranean.
Yes, yes, this will do very well.
We need at least six day dresses.
Are these the evening fabrics?
We need three at the most.
And this for the veil.
No, even Adele will draw a line at that.
There.
This is much more suitable.
Now, evening dresses.
For Mademoiselle, what do you think?
No?
This is for Mademoiselle.
Child knows you better than I do.
I'll take it.
Jane Eyre will not be overwhelmed.
Miss Eyre.
You will really be going the minute after the wedding?
Yes.
You will stay the night in the grand London hotel and then take the steam boat to France?
Yes.
I wish I could go with you.
You must stay here.
But don't worry, Mr Rochester...
WE will pick out a good school for you.
They will hit me and starve me.
No.
I promise I won't let that happen.
Go.
Who is there?
Who is it?
George, what time did your master say he would be home?
Don't worry, Miss.
He has been away one night already, he will not stay away another.
So!
I am only gone for 24 hours and I return to this!
You can't do without me, clearly!
Is anything wrong?
It was not Sophie, it was not Mrs Fairfax.
It was not even Grace Poole.
But you were dreaming.
I had been dreaming, but then I awoke.
Thank God nothing worse happened!
Thank God you're safe!
It was not Grace Poole.
Who else could it have been?
I was not dreaming.
And the rest of your dream?
Is Thornfield a neglected ruin.
Have I left you without so much as a word?
No.
So?
Put it down to your anxieties.
Your natural anxieties about the new life you are about to enter.
Yesterday I was very busy and happy packing.
I was not worried about the future.
I think it a glorious thing to have the hope of living with you.
Because I love you.
It was a fine day yesterday.
Look.
The storm has gone.
Voila.
C'est tres jolie ca!
Attendez.
Voila.
Merci, Sophie.
Attendez, mademoiselle.
Regardez vous!
Vous etes tres belle...
Madame.
At last!
There you are!
How could I have thought that gaudy veil would have suited you better?
Is John getting the carriage ready?
Yes, sir.
Is the luggage down?
Yes, sir.
Have it strapped and ready on the carriage.
We are leaving the moment we return from the church.
Yes, sir.
I'm sorry, Jane.
Are you ready?
I require and charge you both as ye will answer at the dreadful day of judgement when the secrets of all hearts shall be disclosed.
that if either of you know any impediment why ye may not lawfully be joined in matrimony, ye do now confess it.
Be ye well assured that so many as are coupled together otherwise than God's Word doth allow, are not joined together by God, neither is their matrimony lawful.
The marriage cannot go on.
I declare the existence of an impediment.
Proceed.
I said, proceed.
I cannot proceed without some investigation.
Perhaps it might be got over, explained away?
I hardly think so, it is insuperable.
Mr Rochester has a wife now living.
Who are you?
My name is Briggs, a solicitor.
You would thrust on me a wife?
I remind you of her existence, sir, which the law recognises, if you do not.
I have no wife.
"Edward Fairfax Rochester of Thornfield Hall
"was married to Bertha Antoinetta Mason
"at San Benedictus Church in Spanish Town, Jamaica
"on the 18th day of March, 1825."
If that is a genuine document, it doesn't prove the woman is still living.
She was living three months ago.
I have a witness to the fact.
What have you to say?
What have you to say?
!
Gentlemen, this is a place of God!
My sister is living at Thornfield Hall.
I saw her there last June.
Impossible.
I am an old resident of this neighbourhood, sir, and I have never heard of a Mrs Rochester at Thornfield Hall.
No, by God.
I took care that none would.
Enough.
When is enough?
Clear the church.
There will be no wedding today.
Before you go, however, I bid you come up to the house.
I have someone I wish you to meet.
Take it back to the coach house, John.
It won't be needed today.
Very good, sir.
Away with your congratulations!
You're 15 years too late.
Do you remember this room, Mason, where you almost lost your life?
Morning, Mrs Poole.
How is your charge this morning?
A little touchy, sir.
We are having some breakfast but she is calm now.
Be very careful, sir.
Aren't I always, Grace?
We'd better leave.
Why, Richard?
Why are you frightened?
Ladies and gentlemen, may I introduce you to my wife?
Puta!
Puta!
Puta!
Just leave, quickly, sir.
She will be calm again.
I will handle her, sir.
That was my wife.
As some of you know, my father was a greedy man, who wanted to preserve his estate by marrying his younger son off to a wife who would bring him a rich dowry.
I was sent to the Caribbean where, knowing my predilection for dark, handsome women,
I was tricked by Mason and his father into pursuing his sister Bertha... who was as beautiful as the glittering stars and just as tantalising.
I was married before I knew it, before I had met the mother, who was, I found out later, at that time, and had been for many years, incarcerated in a mental asylum.
And that insanity ran through the family like a black river of disease.
It was but half a day before I realised what manner of wife I had been tricked into.
It was but a few weeks before the full extent of her illness was made clear to me.
An illness which has grown in violence and foulness at an ever-increasing pace.
Then, serves him right for his wickedness, my father died.
And my brother straight behind.
So I...
So I inherited everything anyway.
The Rochester fortune intact.
I brought her back with me to England.
Intending to make Thornfield a comfortable prison for her.
And for me.
I have another house...hidden away.
I could have kept her there.
Where the damp inclement air might have rid me of her burden.
I could have done that and no-one would have blamed me.
But I left her here, with Grace...
..while I travelled the world, trying to forget the horrors at home.
Until one day... ..one day, this girl appeared who knew nothing of this.
This girl... ..who stands so quiet and grave at the mouth of hell.
This girl... ..who is all...quietness and sanity and innocence.
Do you wonder why I wanted her?
Why I risked the wrath of God to get her?
And now I must ask you to leave.
I must see to my wife.
Jane.
KNOCK ON DOOR Jane?
Forgive me.
I couldn't tell you.
I knew you'd never stay.
Jane, come away with me.
We'll go and live together in that whitewashed villa, away from everyone.
You have no family to care.
To interfere with us.
Jane?
Jane, can you hear me?
Jane?
Subtitles by Red Bee Media Ltd, 2006
E-mail subtitling@bbc.co.uk
Mother, I'll go, if that's what you want.
I will go and claim kin.
I'm Mr d'Urberville.
# You can come back
# When you want... #
Why didn't you tell me there was danger?
Why didn't you warn me?
Oh, Tess.
Thomas Hardy's most captivating heroine...
Why did you never tell me I had an uncle who was alive?
Because I hated you too much.
Jane, I offer you my hand, my heart and all my possessions...
Please, I beg you will marry me.
Say it quickly.
The marriage cannot go on.
I declare the existence of an impediment.
Edward Fairfax Rochester of Thornfield Hall was married to Bertha Antoinetta Mason on the 18th day of March 1825.
Puta!
SHE SCREAMS
WIND WHISTLES
Our Father... which art in heaven... hallowed be thy name, thy kingdom come... thy will be done on earth...
Wait!
Helen, wait for me!
She must have been on the moors for days, weeks even.
Poor creature.
She looks so pale.
St John found her just in time.
Who do you think she is?
Where did she come from?
Jane!
Jane!
SHE PANTS
I'm sorry to be such trouble.
You cannot remember your name?
Or your family?
Why don't we try to help?
We can tell you what we know...
Oh, yes!
We think you must have wandered on the moors for many days.
Maybe weeks.
We do not know where you travelled from.
With no money or support.
You are a mystery...
We've made up our own story.
We think you are a young, well-bred woman who has run away from home because of family disapproval.
Some romance.
Diana!
Not now!
All right, then.
We will not speculate yet.
But this is not the hand of a working woman.
So you are a well-bred lady.
A governess?
A teacher of some kind?
You speak French.
Extremely well.
You know geography.
Or you have travelled widely.
You talked of foreign places as if you had felt their heat, smelt their smells.
I have not travelled beyond England.
How can you be sure if you can't remember anything?
Hannah has washed your dress.
See here?
So... "JEL School."
Is that any help?
It might not have been her dress.
DIANA LAUGHS
I-I do not know what this means.
But I know that I am honest.
Diana!
It seems she does not remember yet.
But surely we have conscience enough not to play games with her identity.
DISTANT CHATTER AND LAUGHTER
Good Lord, miss!
You look like a ghost.
Here, sit down...
Though I think you're so faded you might melt away with the heat.
Careful!
I love the fire...
I think I must have been very cold at one time in my life.
The misses will be angry with me if I don't get you back to bed.
I have spent long enough in bed.
I must try to repay everyone's kindness.
Do the young ladies live here alone?
Since their father died.
Mr St John lives in his parish over at Morton.
I don't know how long they'll last here.
They haven't a penny between them.
The girls will have to go for governesses soon.
You have book learning, I suppose?
So you could earn your own living, if you chose.
I have done... and I will.
Just as soon as I can advertise.
Advertise!
Well, you are a surprising little thing!
And how long have you been looking after the family?
30 year.
I saw all the children born.
Young St John came out of the womb already a clergyman!
I'm glad you are up and about...
Miss...
Jane...
Elliot...
I believe, in the absence of knowledge, my sisters have christened you?
They think it suitable.
But is it your name?
No matter.
Jane Elliot it is.
My sisters would like to keep you, like a stray off the moor.
Do you intend to live off their charity?
For they have very little to spare.
Course not.
I wish to be put to work.
I will do anything honest.
But surely the cuckoos are too fat to fly thousands of miles...
They go somewhere.
Maybe to the corners of Europe.
You are full of information.
Not only do you know all about European birds, but South American birds, Patagonian lizards...
Someone must have taught you.
I've seen one like this in the West Indies but never here.
See there?
Have you had an unpleasant memory?
No, it was not...not unpleasant.
Good evening!
Good evening.
This must be the mysterious Miss Elliot.
I'm Rosamond Oliver.
I live with my father at Vale Hill.
Good evening, Mr Rivers.
And good evening, Carlo.
Would I forget you?
Your dog is quicker to recognise his friends than you are, sir.
A lovely evening, Miss Oliver.
But a little late for you to be out alone.
Papa says you never come to see us now.
You are quite a stranger.
He is alone tonight and not very well.
Won't you come back with me?
It is not a reasonable hour to intrude.
Reasonable hour?
!
But I declare it is!
It is just the hour when Papa most needs company.
And you would not be intruding because I have invited you.
Do come.
Poor Rosamond!
Honestly, St John...
He is as inexorable as death!
She adores him.
And he adores her!
Is there some obstacle?
Her family?
No, her father adores him too!
He doesn't mind that St John is not wealthy?
No.
It's St John.
He's perverse!
He will not allow himself to have her.
Oh...if only I were so in love...
We should embrace it.
It is a crime against God to deny yourself love.
It should be the 11th Commandment.
That these two persons present now come to be joined...
Therefore if any man can show any just cause why they may not lawfully be joined together let him now speak, or else hereafter forever hold his peace...
Miss Elliot!
Are you feeling unwell?
I am quite well, thank you.
The church is well attended?
And we are lucky in our benefactor.
Mr Oliver.
You met his daughter, Miss Rosamond.
He owns a needle factory in the valley.
He's very generous.
Mr Oliver, in fact, was the inspiration for the employment I have found for you, if, of course, you should wish to take it.
When I first arrived in Morton, there was no school.
The children of the poor had no hope of progress.
I have established one for boys.
Now it is the turn of the girls.
There is a cottage available, simply furnished.
The mistress's salary will be £30 a year.
Will you take the job?
I could organise the studies as I wished?
No beatings... and enough food for dinner?
As long as you taught God's word.
Then I accept.
With all my heart.
You understand that this will be a village school, poor girls to whom you will teach knitting, sewing, reading, writing, and maybe arithmetic, at the very most.
What will you do with your accomplishments?
Save them until they are wanted.
I do not think you will stay here long.
I am not ambitious.
No, but you are impassioned.
Excuse the word.
I mean that, for you, human affections and sympathies have the most powerful hold.
'You cannot hate me, Jane.
'I didn't mean to deceive you.
'Unlike you...
'I cannot live alone, without the warmth of human companionship.
'I roamed the world... '..then returning one night to this cold, dark place...'
..I saw this... ..this magical thing.
You were in my path.
Do you remember?
And since that moment... ..I have never wanted to leave the place that you were...
Though you left, I remained... ..waiting for my little bird to return.
We are one, you and I.
We have to be together.
We are like those twins... so intertwined in their senses and feelings that they can cry out to one another across continents, so close are their thoughts.
Say that you don't love me.
I dare you.
You cannot.
I will not.
I will love you until I die.
And yet you will leave me?
You mean to go your way and for me to go mine?
Yes, sir.
"Sir" again?
Not Edward?
By tomorrow, Mary, and I will be blown to the ends of the Earth.
Derbyshire and Nottingham are not so very far away.
We've teach fat little boys lessons they do not want to learn!
And we'll never see our cottage again!
She fears she will never see St John again.
Why not?
Because he's so pig-headed.
He WILL be a missionary.
He will go to a really hot place and that will be the end of him.
It is his chosen path.
He thinks it's the only way to serve God.
But why can't he serve God here?
You know that's never been enough.
He needs to make a grand gesture.
Jane...
You must keep him here.
Look after him and don't let him out of your sight.
I don't think I could ever change St John's mind against anything he'd decided on.
Don't forget, Jane.
We're relying on you.
Now, this is Morton.
Can anyone point out where we are?
Ow!
Alice?
Alice!
The clock.
The time?
It's home time.
The bell?
Still getting used to the clock.
Never mind.
You're coming along.
I am determined to make scholars of them all.
Hello, Miss Elliot.
I am so glad you decided to stay in Morton to be mistress of...our endeavour.
I have brought you a pretty pair of doves.
The dovecote has been empty for some years.
You might conduct nature classes.
Diana said you were an expert on birds.
She exaggerates.
And do you like your house?
Have I furnished it nicely?
Very much, thank you.
St John!
Miss Elliot approved of my arrangements.
Why should she not?
Come along, girls, home.
I have just remembered that now Diana and Mary have left... you must be so lonely.
Please, come home with me and see Papa.
Mr Rivers?
Can I speak with you a moment?
It is a very graceful and correct drawing.
Correct?
That word is a little lacking in passion, isn't it?
I mean, for someone who loves Miss Oliver as you do...
Would it comfort you, when you're in Madagascar or the Cape?
Or would the sight of her distress you?
You are very direct, Miss Elliot.
You must know me well enough to know I mean no mischief or disrespect.
She likes you, I am sure.
And so does her father.
She's a sweet girl, a little lacking in reserve, but you have more than enough for both of you, surely.
Why do you not marry her?
Why do you resist her?
DOES she like me?
She is always talking of you.
There is no other subject she is more interested in.
It's very pleasant to talk like this.
You may go on for another quarter of an hour.
Well, what's the use of that?
When you are only planning an even crueller way to resist her.
St John, you tremble when she comes into the room!
You don't understand!
I love Rosamond Oliver wildly.
More intensely than I will ever love anyone again.
So why not marry her?
Because I know she would not make me a good wife.
We would have a lifetime's regret.
Can you see Rosamond as a sufferer?
A missionary's wife?
No!
You cannot!
You need not be a missionary.
You may do God's work here.
I will not give up my life's ambition.
It's dearer to me than anything.
And Miss Oliver...
Are her feelings nothing to you?
She is surrounded by suitors.
She will forget me and marry someone who can make her far happier than I could.
No, Jane!
You do not know me.
I do tremble at the sight of Rosamond, but it repulses me.
It has nothing to do with me.
My skin may burn with fever but, in my heart, I am a cold man.
Don't!
You have the chance to love someone who loves you with all her soul.
Not many people are that lucky.
You may never find that again.
You are an enterprising young woman, Miss Elliot.
An unusual specimen.
You've made a good start.
I look forward to your career with interest.
I must leave Thornfield, Mr Rochester.
Now... ..do you mean that?
I do.
And now?
What do you say now?
You cannot leave me.
You cannot leave me, confess it.
I will...
I will leave you.
How can this flesh be so soft and yielding... ..and yet your heart be like an iron fist?
There is a place I know.
A villa in the Mediterranean.
It is far from anywhere.
Come and live with me there.
No, Jane...
Jane...
Jane...
Listen to me.
Listen to me.
We would live as brother and sister.
We would have our separate chambers, come together in the afternoons, for tea, or to play bowls...
Something sedate and traditional.
I give you my word... ..I wouldn't touch you.
Maybe a chaste peck on the cheek on birthdays... ..but I wouldn't tempt you into a life of sin, Jane.
I wouldn't do that.
I must rest now.
Yes.
Yes, you must rest.
'We will talk in the morning.
'Yes.
In the morning.
'You will think about the villa?
'We'll talk in the morning.'
Whoa, boys!
Whoa, whoa!
Walk on.
SHE SOBS
Girls, this is a butterfly.
Now pass that round.
Can you tell me how a caterpillar turns into a beautiful butterfly?
CHILDREN SHOUT OUT
SCHOOL BELL RINGS OUT
ALL:
Good afternoon, Miss Elliot.
Is everything all right?
Yes, of course.
You look very well.
You have performed wonders in this...
colourful universe.
You have given it discipline and individuality.
I wish Diana or Mary could come home to live with you.
You're reckless with your health.
I am well enough.
Oh, forgive me.
One of the girls saw Miss Oliver in her wedding dress and the others begged me to imagine a painting for them.
I told you she would forget about me.
You must allow me to be right sometimes.
Mr Rivers, what are you doing here?
I have often wondered where you got that forthright quality.
I've come to have a little talk with you.
Or rather, I have a story to share with you.
Just over 20 years ago, a poor curate fell in love with a rich man's daughter.
They married, and she was cut off from her family entirely.
Within two years they were both dead.
They left a daughter.
She was cast out onto the very cold charity of an aunt by marriage...
Now we come to details.
..a Mrs Reed of Gateshead, who kept the orphan ten years and then sent her to one Lowood School.
I calculate she would have been approximately your age.
It seems she did very well, with qualities very similar to your own.
And another coincidence - she rose to be a teacher.
She left Lowood to become a governess to the ward of a Mr Rochester.
Mr Rivers...
I know nothing of this Mr Rochester's character, but I do know that he offered marriage to this young woman, but, at the altar, she discovered he had a wife still living.
A lunatic.
For another quite different reason, one Mr Briggs, a solicitor, was searching for this young lady, but by then she had disappeared, was never seen again.
Is that not very strange?
Since you appear to know so much, tell me this.
Mr Rochester - how is he?
Where is he?
I know nothing of him.
But you said they were looking for me.
Did they write to Thornfield?
Yes, of course.
But received no reply.
He must have been a bad man.
You do not know him.
Very well.
But maybe you should ask me how I come to know your story.
What inspired our Mr Briggs to look for you and to write to me.
As you know, I travelled to Derbyshire a few days ago.
I had dinner with a family who had a housekeeper who was related in some distant way to a Mrs Alice Fairfax.
Now she provided me with such an exact description of the mysterious Jane Eyre to relieve me of any doubt.
Did they tell you anything of Mr Rochester?
Mr Briggs was not interested in him.
Don't you want to know why he was interested in you?
What did he want?
Simply to tell you that your uncle had died and had left you all his property and fortune.
Oh...
I am sorry.
Sorry?
For £20,000?
I am sorry my uncle is dead.
I might have wished to have seen him one day.
Wait.
Wait!
Why would you ever know about this Mr Briggs and his search for me?
Why would he write to you?
There is more, but you've had too much surprise.
I will tell you tomorrow.
You will tell me now.
He wrote to me because your uncle was also my uncle.
I am your cousin.
Your half-cousin, that is.
Y-Your mother was my father's sister?
We are half-cousins?
Oh!
You are a strange young woman.
I tell you you've inherited a fortune and you are very serious.
I tell you something of little importance and you dance with excitement!
You have two sisters!
A mere half-cousin may be of no importance to you, but to me...
I have no-one.
I have never had anyone.
You must go.
Write to Diana and Mary and tell them to come home immediately.
But why?
Because we are rich!
YOU are rich, Jane.
We may do anything we like.
We may live as we choose.
Write to them tomorrow!
Hurry, Hannah.
We must light the fires before they arrive.
She wants fires in every room!
In places where they never were!
What's the use of £5,000 if you can't light a few fires at Christmas?
£20,000.
St John, I will not hear another word.
We have been over it again and again.
Our uncle left a nephew and three nieces, we must all profit from his will equally.
Jane, you have never had money.
You do not know what use you may put it to.
And you have never been without family.
I will have a brother and sisters, and a home.
I will be brother to you whether you share the money our uncle left you - you and only you - or not.
Leaving you with nothing, unable to realise your dreams, and me with a fortune?
I know enough about money to realise that will not make me happy.
What of the future?
If you should marry?
I'll never marry.
They're coming!
Hello.
Oh, miss!
Oh...
Was ist das?
Das ist ein Schuh.
Sehr gut.
Was ist das?
Das ist ein Handschuh.
You are enjoying your German lessons?
Yes, it is easier than French.
I want you to start learning a new language.
We will begin tomorrow.
Go with you?
To the Cape?
To share my missionary work.
I've been watching you for over a year now, and I am convinced you are equal to the task.
Have you never asked yourself why God led you here?
On that evening, at the very moment you were ready to die, he led me through all this wilderness to find you.
You have always felt you must travel the world.
Jane, it is your destiny!
He HAS asked you, hasn't he?
I knew it!
St John has asked me to marry him.
Thank heavens!
Now he'll stay at home, safe with us.
He has asked me to marry him so that I might accompany him on his missionary work.
You will shrivel up and die.
You are both too pale to go to Africa!
You did not agree to go, Jane?
Jane, you cannot!
We sail in six weeks.
We must make marriage preparations.
Why can we not travel as brother and sister?
As equals?
That would be impossible.
St John, you do not love me.
Love is not an ingredient in this matter.
I fear you have not forgotten your old association, despite the harm he tried to do you.
I will never see any of them again.
But I owe a debt to my friends at Thornfield Hall.
In many ways, I started my life there.
I became Jane Eyre.
God made Jane Eyre!
You surely don't give this man Rochester any credit for that!
Of course not.
I have always known myself.
But he was the first to recognise me... ..and to love what he saw.
I will give you your answer, St John, soon.
Don't worry.
And if I go with you, it will be my decision.
You will have him to thank for that.
Jane...
Jane!
Jane!
Jane!
Jane...
Whoa-oa!
Walk on.
Aye, it's a pity, all right.
Did you know Thornfield Hall?
Aye, Miss.
I used to work for the late Mr Rochester in his stables.
He is dead?
I mean the present Mr Edward's father.
I'm guessing you're not from these parts, Miss, so you don't know what happened a while or so back.
It was almost a year ago now.
Mr Edwards had sent away most of the servants, so nobody knows exactly what happened.
Bertha!
Bertha, come down.
Take my hand.
Bertha, it's not safe up here.
Will you take my hand?
Come, we'll go down together.
Will you take my hand?
Bertha, come down!
Bertha!
No!
BIRD CRIES
TWIG BREAKS
Who's there?
Dammit.
Where are my candles?
Do you think because I'm blind I don't need them?
GLASS TINKLES
DOG BARKS
What's the matter now?
Has Pilot gone mad like the rest of us?
Well, man?
What's the matter?
George?
That is you, isn't it?
George is in the kitchen, sir.
Who is that?
Pilot knows me, sir.
These are Jane Eyre's fingers.
I'd know them anywhere.
It is Jane.
It is me, sir.
I'm come back.
You are real?
I dream of you often, and in the morning, you're gone.
You always were a witch.
Does that seem real?
You always did torment me.
I am very real, sir.
I am an independent woman.
My uncle died and left me £20,000, but I gave most of it away.
No, I could never have dreamt such detail.
You must stay with me?
I will stay with you as long as I live.
Unless you would prefer I go.
No, no.
Stay!
You shall stay.
It's a ghastly sight, isn't it, Jane?
I knew if you ever saw me again, you would be revolted by me.
I am sorry for this.
And this.
But the worst of it is... one's in danger of spoiling you too much.
When do you have supper?
I never take supper.
Well, you shall tonight, for I am very hungry.
Have you a pocket comb about you, sir?
What for?
I need to comb out this shaggy black mane.
I find you quite alarming, when this close.
And you accuse me of being supernatural.
Am I hideous, Jane?
Very, sir.
You always were, you know!
Ha-ha!
You haven't lost your wickedness, wherever you've been.
Yet I have been staying with good people, far better than you.
A hundred times better!
Altogether more refined and exalted than you will ever be!
Who the devil have you been with?
There.
You are decent, at least.
I will tell you about them tomorrow.
I have been travelling for days and I'm tired.
Goodnight.
Jane...
Were there only ladies at the house where you were?
The grass is soft and mossy in that little patch.
And the blackbird's wing is like coal with an emerald sheen.
So this St John person you have been mentioning so often... what of him?
Well...
He is tall... with blue eyes and a...
Grecian profile.
He's handsome, then.
Compared to me.
He's much more handsome than you!
And he's a far better Christian, of course, than you ever were...
I thanked God last night, for your sudden reappearance.
The other night, I cried out to him in my despair.
I called your name, too.
What about his brain, this Rivers fellow?
Find yourself getting bored when he speaks?
He doesn't say very much, but what he says is to the point.
His brain is first rate.
Did he study much?
Taught you things?
Oh, yes.
He taught me languages.
All right.
Why did he do that?
He wanted me to go with him to Africa.
He wanted you to marry him?
He asked me to marry him.
You're lying!
You've made this up to torment me.
He asked me more than once.
Well, then, I think you might take yourself off and go elsewhere!
Why are you still here?
You've assured yourself that I am still living.
Well, still living a tenth of a life.
You...heiress!
Well, if you want me to go.
No!
I'll pack my bags.
No...
No.
Humour a foolish old ranter for a little bit longer before you go.
St John does not love me.
I do not love him.
He's good.
Great, even.
But severe.
Cold as an iceberg.
He's heartless?
Oh, worse than that.
He has a heart.
I-I have seen it overflowing with passion, but he just keeps it buried in stone with a tenacious willpower.
He is much more frightening than you.
Hmm.
It's turned chilly.
We've been sitting here too long.
No, I want to stay out here.
You can go on in, if you wish.
The night I left...
The night I left, you told me of a villa you own in the Mediterranean... ..where we might go for refuge and live as brother and sister.
I remember.
Jane.
Jane, are you still there?
I am here, sir.
Jane, that villa I mentioned... the, uh...
..separate bedrooms... the peck on the cheek on birthdays, that sort of thing...
Yes?
Well, that plan doesn't strike me as so attractive as it once did.
You do not want to be friends?
Jane, would you be so good as to come back here and sit beside me?
Jane, I want a wife.
I want a wife.
Not a nursemaid to look after me.
I want a wife... ..to share my bed every night.
All day, if we wish.
If I can't have that, I'd rather die.
We are not the platonic sort, Jane.
Can you see me?
Then hear this, Edward.
Your life is not yours to give up.
It is mine, all mine, and I forbid it.
No, George.
I told you You're not to work today.
You are part of the enterprise.
Sit down and don't move.
What's he doing?
Moving chairs.
Come on, everyone.
You must take your place.
INAUDIBLE
You must go directly behind us.
Grace...
Pilot, not on the chairs!
Right...
Stand there.
Where's the baby?
Jane, we're all ready.
Take your place beside me.
Coming!
Subtitles by Red Bee Media Ltd 2006
E-mail subtitling@bbc.co.uk
What's all this about you being a racist?
I don't think he found it offensive.
Don't talk to journalists, under any circumstances.
You're just going to drop in and say, "hello, goodbye" and run away again as per usual.
I'm staying with Dad.
Angela!
Angela, where are you?
I can help him beat this thing.
There's no reason he'd be bullied.
There's no reason I was bullied.
You must not lie.
He told his teacher I died in Iraq.
Stranger!
Stranger!
Ben!
I'm not called Ben.
WHISTLE BLOWS That was a foul.
I didn't dive!
SHOUTS OF ENCOURAGEMENT
Come on Ben, get up.
He didn't even touch you.
Get up!
Come on - it's a team game.
Ben!
You're Ben's dad.
Hi, I'm Rory's dad, Steve.
Hi, Pete.
Ben was round our place on Sunday.
He's quite a kid, isn't he?
Yeah, he's...quite a kid.
Where is the rat?
!
She's behind the curtain, where she always hides.
Mama!
Jane has knocked me down!
Take her up to the red room immediately.
That child has the devil in her.
I've always said.
No!
No!
Not the red room!
No!
No!
Not the red room!
No!
DOOR SLAMS
SHE SOBS
Don't come back, Uncle Reed.
Please don't come back.
Uncle Reed, please don't come back.
Please.
SHE PANTS
Let me out please!
Let me out!
Let me out.
Let me out!
Come along, John.
Yes, come on, John, we haven't got all day.
Don't worry.
I won't shoot you.
Unless we don't like the painting, that is.
Hello.
Well, shouldn't you be in the portrait?
There's still plenty of room.
Jane Eyre?
!
She's not part of the family.
It's no use looking at me like that, Jane.
I have tried my hardest but you made it impossible.
I tried to carry out my dear husband's wishes, but you have made it impossible.
You know you have.
You have deliberately made it impossible for me to love you.
Say something!
Unnatural child!
You have not tried very hard.
My uncle's dying wish was that you treat me as one of YOUR children.
You have not tried to.
You dare to tell me...
That is why he haunts the red room - because you disobeyed him.
And on the day you die, God will know who's telling the truth, whatever you or I say now.
Come on, Miss Jane.
You have a visitor.
You must look your best.
I have tried so very hard.
You cannot believe how hard I've tried, but... (..there is the devil in the child.)
What is your name, child?
Jane Eyre, sir.
Do you know, Jane Eyre, what happens to little children when they die?
They go to heaven.
And what happens to disobedient, deceitful girls when they die?
They go to hell.
So what must you do to avoid this terrible fate?
I must take care to keep in good health and not to fall ill, sir.
Your aunt tells me that you are a deceitful child.
Is that true, Jane Eyre?
I am not a liar.
So do you say your aunt is a liar?
CROWS CAW
BELL RINGS
Ah, Jane Eyre.
How could I forget?
Step out here, Jane.
Jane Eyre, I'm sorry to have to tell you... is a liar.
The lesson of the day will be that lying is a sin, that all liars deserve to be shunned by their fellows.
Stand on that stool, Jane.
You will stay there until midnight, and you will not eat or drink but bow to beg God's forgiveness for your sin.
I wish I could escape to one of these places, somewhere where it's warm.
I believe you will.
But you'll have to work hard.
We have to accept that we have been left here by our families to fend for ourselves.
If you take advantage of the education here, if you are not too rebellious, and if you are patient then you will find your way out.
We will both work our hardest and pray that God spares us until we are grown up.
And then what do we do?
I think when we grow up we have to be teachers.
How do we ever get out of here, Helen?
We advertise!
GIRLS COUGH
SOUND OF COUGHING
SOUND OF CRYING
SOUND OF COUGHING
There you are.
You're very cold, Jane.
Come on under my covers.
No!
No!
God can't have her!
He can't take her!
God has already taken her, Jane.
You must be brave.
Helen!
Helen!
Helen!
Helen!
SHE SOBS
CHURCH BELLS RING
Girls, look how the sun casts shadows in the flowers.
If you want to recreate that put down your charcoals and just smudge the edges where the dark shadows are.
Come on, girls, hurry up now.
Miss Eyre.
There appears to be a letter for you, Miss Eyre.
"If Miss JE is in a position to give satisfactory references
"as to character and competency, then we will be happy to engage
"her as a governess to Miss Adele Varens, ward of Mr Rochester of Thornfield Hall."
Ah, there's Thornfield Hall now, Miss.
There's always a light burning in the tower.
BIRDS TWITTER
CREAKING
BIRDS CALL
Are you taking me to Mrs Fairfax?
In there.
Why, it's Miss Eyre!
At last!
Oh, we've been waiting for you for so long!
I'm Mrs Fairfax.
Welcome to Thornfield.
My goodness, Miss Eyre, how hungry you are.
You must have been travelling all day.
How long is it since you have sat beside the fire and eaten a hearty meal?
Oh, approximately eight years.
Oh, my goodness.
SHE LAUGHS
Eight years!
Hasn't sat by the fire for eight years!
SHE LAUGHS Eight years!
I'll tell the master that when he gets back from abroad, that will amuse even him!
Oh, not that he's without humour, of course.
No, certainly not.
I remember he used to tell jokes as a child.
He keeps himself to himself, but you needn't worry.
He's hardly ever at home.
Always travelling.
BIRDS SING
Miss Eyre, you ARE up early.
I hope you slept well.
Yes, thank you.
I was anxious to meet Adele.
Ah yes, well, you won't have to wait long.
Does she play up there?
Oh, goodness me, no.
No-one lives up there.
Oh, I thought I saw someone at the window.
There's only Grace Poole there.
She does the laundry.
Mrs Fairfax...
Ah, I don't think Miss Adele can wait much longer.
SHE SINGS IN FRENCH:
Bonjour, Mademoiselle Jeanne.
I'm so very heureuse to faire votre acquaintance.
Enchantee, Adele.
Moi aussi j'etais impatiente de faire de connaissance.
Oh, thank goodness, you'll be able to understand her.
Now you can tell me what she is singing.
Well...
I believe it is a romance.
The woman is declaring her love for her sweetheart.
Merci, merci, merci, I will dance another one.
Later maybe, but first you will show me to our school room.
SOUND OF TRICKLING WATER
SHEEP BLEAT
DOG BARKS
HORSE WHINNIES
Damn it!
Christ!
DOG CONTINUES TO BARK
Quiet, Pilot.
Damn it!
Are you injured, sir?
Get away from me...witch.
You've done enough damage!
I cannot think of leaving you until I see you are fit to mount your horse.
You should be at home yourself.
Where do you live?
At Thornfield Hall.
I can fetch help, I'll be a little while.
HE GROANS IN PAIN, HORSE WHINNIES
Do you think you can bring him over to me?
Come over here.
Come.
Come here, come here.
Hold these.
HE GRUNTS
Thank you...
Miss?
Jane Eyre, sir.
Well, that's what happens when you bewitch a man's horse, Miss Eyre.
A lot of pain and cursing.
I did not bewitch your horse, sir.
I was waiting for you to go past.
You were hovering... casting spells.
Now get off back to Thornfield Hall, if that is indeed where you live.
I do, but I will post my letter first before I return.
Don't be late back... ..Miss Jane Eyre.
THUNDER RUMBLES
Ah, Miss Eyre, there you are.
What do you think?
The master is back.
Mr Rochester?
Not a word about his return, as usual, and he had an accident on the road.
The doctor is with him in the drawing room now.
Adele, come away!
Time for bed.
Mr Rochester will see you tomorrow.
KNOCKING
Miss Eyre, make yourself ready.
Master has finished his business for the day and wishes to see you.
Me?
Yes.
Oh, no, no, no, you must change.
This will have to do.
CLOCK CHIMES
This will have to do.
Ah, Miss Eyre.
Peut-etre vous avez une boite pour Mademoiselle Eyre, Monsieur Rochester?
A boite for Miss Eyre?
Does Miss Eyre require a present?
Excuse me, sir?
Does the governess expect me to have brought her a present back from my travels overseas?
No, sir.
What are you doing standing over there where I can't see you?
Where would you like me to stand, sir?
Here.
Sit.
Are you fond of presents, Miss Eyre?
I hardly know, sir.
I have little experience of them.
Never had a present?
I believe they are generally thought pleasant things, sir.
Hm.
But to this frivolous little doll, this true daughter of Paris, they are the stuff of life, aren't they, my little...?
The thought of presents makes her live and breathe.
Monsieur Rochester?
Ah, ma boite!
Merci!
Merci!
Merci!
Merci!
Merci!
Quiet, while I talk to Miss Eyre.
Where are you from?
Lowood Institution, sir.
How long were you there?
Eight years.
I'm amazed you survived, you're so small.
Didn't they feed you?
No...sir.
And how do you find yourself here and not still there?
I advertised, sir.
HE LAUGHS
Of course you did.
What of your family?
I have none, sir.
None whatsoever?
Friends?
None, sir.
None at all?
I had a friend once but she died a long time ago, sir.
You're lucky, Miss Eyre.
If you do not love another living soul then you'll never be disappointed.
Yes, sir.
Adele tells me you play the piano brilliantly.
I play a little, sir.
Of course, a little, that's what they all say.
Go over there and play.
SHE PLAYS AN UPBEAT TUNE ON THE PIANO
Enough!
Yes.
You're right.
You do play a little.
These yours?
Yes, sir.
These are...
These are interesting.
The ideas all yours?
Yes, sir.
Were you happy when you painted these?
I was fully occupied...
I was not unhappy.
What do you think of me, Monsieur?
Do you think I look beautiful?
Shall I dance for you?
Miss Eyre, what are you thinking of?
It's very late.
Adele should be in bed.
And my foot hurts like the blazes.
Good night, sir.
So, what did you think of Master?
He is very changeable.
Yes.
But he has... he has had disappointment in his life.
I hope you will forgive his rough and ready ways.
You will not leave?
I've grown used to you.
I hope he won't scare you away.
I'm not scared of rough manners.
He will be gone soon.
He never stays for more than a few days at a time.
Afternoon, Miss.
Miss Eyre!
Come here.
Sit.
Not you, Pilot.
Miss Eyre, excuse me, I'm... used to giving orders and having them obeyed.
Sit, if you please.
I beg your pardon, sir...
I did not ask your permission to read the books.
Permission!
To read the books?
You are a thinking, intelligent woman, aren't you?
Why ever would you need to ask permission?
Who else is to read them?
Adele?
The venerable Fairfax?
I'd more likely find Pilot pouring over the flora and fauna of the South American flatlands.
So, anyway, talk.
Talk, sir?
Yes, talk...if you please.
See how I'm learning to be polite.
I've had a tedious day of mortgages and share prices and I would like to be entertained.
Entertained, sir?
Miss Eyre, can we proceed?
When I'm... tired I tend to dwell on my darker thoughts.
I would like to entertain you, sir...
I am not sure what would interest you.
A smile!
A very small one.
The mere glimpse of a smile.
At last!
Tell me your thoughts.
I command you.
I was just thinking sir, it's... not many employers would ask the opinions of someone they pay £30 a year to.
I pay you a salary...do I?
Well, of course I do.
Well, I should have my money's worth then.
Oh...
I can see there's another problem.
Out with it.
You haven't actually paid me anything yet, sir.
Ah!
Mercenary girl!
Fetch me my keys now!
You want my money in your hand before you will amuse me?
No, sir.
That will not be necessary, sir.
Maybe you could ask me questions, sir?
Er, have you travelled, Miss Eyre?
No, sir.
All young people wish to travel, even if they find kindness and food and a fire, they wish to be gone.
I've travelled all over the world, Miss Eyre, and it's very over-rated.
Yes, sir.
When I was a young man I was your equal.
I had a clear conscience, unpolluted by sin.
I took the wrong path.
It wasn't my fault that I took it but... ..I must take the blame for continuing on it.
I think you may have a little of the witch about you.
You bewitched my horse.
You sit there patiently and would draw out secrets of my past.
I do not wish to pry, sir.
I know, Jane.
Do you think me handsome, Jane?
No, sir.
HE LAUGHS
Look carefully.
If I were to tell you that I'm worth £20,000, surely the light from the fire would soften my features.
Do I not seem to you now the very model of a fashionable man?
I do not think there's anything in science that will allow that, sir.
I spoke hastily, sir, I did not mean that I find you repellent.
What I meant is that it is the character inside that determines a person, not the outer shell.
Take care, Jane...
Don't look too closely inside of me.
You might not find anything within at all beautiful... ..and then where would we be?
THEY SPEAK QUIETLY
Is that Grace Poole?
Hm.
Does she live alone in the North Tower?
North Tower catches the wind.
I don't know why, it makes me shiver just to think of it.
Miss Eyre.
You're required!
This way, hurry up!
Oh, goodness, Miss Eyre.
The Master has taken it into his head to give Adele a biology lesson and we all have to hunt beetles.
Poor Sophie can't understand a word he says and neither can I really!
Monsieur Rochester, we are bored with looking at the English water beetles.
They are not beautiful like the ones in your study.
Can I go with you, Monsieur Rochester, when you set off on your travels once more?
I will always wear my best dress and everyone will think I am pretty.
Yes, but if they see you for the shallow little creature you are, no more substance than one of those meringues over there, well, they will find you disgusting, my little Parisienne.
They will find me disgusting!
You are mistaken, Adele, if you do not think to find interesting creatures here in England.
There's a bird.
It's a... it's a quite nondescript grey colour.
It's accustomed not to moving too quickly, not to draw attention to itself for fear of being beaten.
It wishes it could be in a cage... but sooner or later, slowly, day by day, its wings grow very strong and if you were to look very closely, you would see brilliant scarlet feathers hidden under its drab wings.
Until one day, it's grown so confident that it flaps its red wings and flies straight upwards into the sky and those lucky enough to catch it in flight think they have caught a glimpse of a firebird.
And then?
Well, then it flies away somewhere warm and never comes back.
I don't think I believe in this bird.
It's true.
There is one here at Thornfield in the gardens if you look very hard.
Madame Fare-Fax, Monsieur Rochester said the ladies will say I'm disgusting!
Oh, that's nice, dear.
Mmm, what is there to eat?
I would like a meringue, please.
Come, Miss Eyre...
You have something to say.
You should not tease, sir.
She's just a child.
She is.
She's also self-obsessed, thoughtless, vain.
You've made great headway with her even in the past few months, but look at her.
Just like her mother.
I saw what the mother became.
That is no reason to despise the child.
Do you really think?
If the blood is tainted won't I be failing in my duty to her to let her remain like this and not to try my best to correct her ways?
She does not deserve to be ridiculed or despised.
She's a child.
She deserves that you should trust her, that she'll grow and learn and...
Miss Eyre.
No, thank you, Adele.
We shall see, Miss Eyre.
Adele, don't run.
What's the matter with Sophie?
She doesn't like...
les malades...the mad people.
FOOTSTEPS RETREATING
BANGING
DISTANT BARKING
LOUD SCRATCHING
FOOTSTEPS APPROACHING
No, Pilot.
No, you don't belong here.
Go back to your master.
Jane, come and look at this fellow.
Come here.
Look at his wings.
I've seen one like this in the West Indies, but never here.
That will teach me to tease Adele.
Come, sit down with me for a while.
Sit.
As it is now your job as well as mine to bring Adele up correctly,
I'm going to tell you about her, about where she came from and who she belongs to.
Maybe you'll understand...
You do not need to tell me anything.
I know.
You understand too much without me saying anything.
It is the witch in you.
You have to imagine a young man...
Well, one who is still youngish and who has made a mistake.
Not his fault but... ..this mistake and the darkness that follows it has set him helter skelter around the world in search of beauty to help ease his soul.
And he does find beauty, or rather beauty finds him because, as you will guess this is a very rich youngish man.
That look.
No judgement, no pity.
That look could prise secrets from the blackest souls.
Where were we?
Beauty finding a youngish man.
Ah yes.
So, on our whirlwind tour, we alight in Paris.
Now, Jane, imagine, I know it's difficult, imagine... ..a suite of rooms in a particularly gorgeous Parisian hotel.
It is upholstered with velvets and furs.
Everything is sensuous to the touch, the best that this youngish man's money can buy.
It is a summer evening and there is perfume in the air.
The young man breathes in the scent of his lover... ..musk and amber.
Her name is Celine Varens.
She's very beautiful.
She is a dancer, an exotic bird.
She dotes on him, and he is passionately in love with her.
He's had a fortunate night gambling and he waits for her now in anticipation of the dark, intoxicating hours ahead.
Are you still with me, Jane?
I'm here, sir.
COQUETTISH LAUGHTER
'At last he hears the sound of her return.
'Only a few more seconds' wait until he sees her.
'An eternity passes.'
THEY SPEAK IN FRENCH
'At that very moment, as I stood in the shadows, 'the green snake of jealousy bit into my heart.'
Where is your beast of an Englishman tonight?
Gambling.
Someone else can look at his unpleasant face.
He is very...presentable... really, for an Englishman.
£20,000 make him very presentable.
'She wasn't as clear sighted as you are, Jane.'
You find me unattractive despite my wealth.
You do not know what it is to feel jealousy, do you, Jane?
Because you have no idea what it is to love.
You have no idea what it is to feel the very beat of someone's heart within one's breast.
No, sir.
Do you still love her, sir?
Who?
Celine.
I mean, Miss Varens.
Good God, no.
No, I threw her out of the hotel room and I shot him... ..in the shoulder or some insignificant place.
No, when I saw what a wretched fool she'd meddled with I knew that she could never love me.
That's obvious, surely.
And Adele?
She left her in the hotel when she ran off.
Celine claimed that I was the father, but a fairly elementary study of biology would prove that impossible.
Tell me, Jane, is there anything about myself that remotely resembles Adele?
Look at me carefully.
No, sir.
She left her in the hotel... a parcel with a label on with my name.
What was I to do?
Leave her there to starve?
I provided for her in France, then a few months ago it was necessary to bring her here.
She was not my responsibility but I took her on just the same.
So, as her guardian and your master, what do you think of my behaviour, Miss Eyre?
Did I do the right thing?
It was the right thing to do, wasn't it, Jane?
Yes, sir.
SCRATCHING AT DOOR
Go away, Pilot.
Pilot, go back to your master.
WIND HOWLS
FOOTSTEPS RUNNING
FOOTSTEPS IN DISTANCE
WAILING
Who is there?
FOOTSTEPS IN DISTANCE
FOOTSTEPS
POUNDING
DOOR SLAMS SHUT
Hello?
Hello?
Subtitles by Red Bee Media Ltd
Email subtitling@bbc.co.uk
HAUNTING ORCHESTRAL MUSIC
CRASH
Are you injured, sir?
Get away from me, you witch.
What did you think of Master?
He is very changeable.
You do not know what it is to feel jealousy do you, Jane?
So you have no idea what it is to love.
I took the wrong path.
I must bear the blame for continuing on it.
Sir!
Mr Rochester, Sir.
Wake up!
For heaven's sake, sir, wake up!
Jane, are you hurt?
No, sir.
But you were nearly killed in your bed.
What happened here?
I don't know.
I heard a noise and I followed it here.
Shall I fetch Mrs Fairfax?
No.
What can she do?
I must fetch someone to help, sir.
No!
Sit, Jane, quietly.
Wait here for me.
Can you do that?
DISTANT DOOR CLOSES
It's settled.
It is as I thought.
How, sir?
I forgot.
Did you say you saw anything, anyone?
No, I heard a laugh.
I think it was Grace Poole, sir.
Of course, you're right.
She is a singular sort of person.
She is often careless, and accidents happen.
We will say no more about it.
Go back to your room.
Servants will be up in an hour or two.
Are you going without saying good night?
Jane, you just...
You just saved my life.
You might at least shake hands.
I knew you'd do me good, the first time I met you.
I knew I wouldn't mind being in your debt.
There is no debt, sir.
There is no debt, sir.
I am glad I happened to be awake.
She saves me from an inferno and she's glad she happened to be awake.
Still she tries to go.
I am cold, sir.
Of course.
Of course.
And we agreed that you'd never be cold again.
Well, if you must leave me...
..you must.
It's a mystery how he wasn't burnt in his bed.
He will read with a candle burning.
I've told him how dangerous that is.
Morning, dear.
Morning.
Morning, Miss.
Morning, Grace.
What has happened here?
Master was reading in bed again.
Fortunately, he woke up and no real harm was done.
That's very strange.
Did no-one hear anything?
Mrs Fairfax said she heard nothing.
She sleeps heavily.
You're young, Miss.
Maybe you heard a noise?
I did.
At first, I thought it was Pilot, but Pilot cannot laugh.
And I'm certain I heard a laugh.
A strange one.
Hardly likely the master would laugh, not when he was in such danger.
I think you must have been dreaming, Miss.
I most certainly was not dreaming.
Did you open your door?
Did you see who or what it was you thought laughed?
On the contrary.
I locked my door.
Very wise.
It would be wise to lock your door the moment you go to bed.
Who knows what might happen?
You're not eating again.
You ate very little at lunch time, Miss Eyre.
I hope you're not sickening.
You're very flushed.
Oh, I'm very well, thank you.
Never better.
Oh, it's a fine night.
On the whole, a very good day for Mr Rochester's journey.
Journey?
I didn't know he was going out.
Oh, he set off right after breakfast.
He's gone to Mr Eshton's place, over the other side of Millcote.
He'll likely stay a fortnight or more at the house party.
A fortnight?
Yes, I told you, he's hardly ever here for more than a few days.
And you can't say he hasn't been starved of company these last two months.
Oh, I mean fine and proper company of course, my dear.
When these fashionable, beautiful people get together they're in no hurry to separate.
Single gentlemen are especially sought after.
And Mr Rochester is so talented in society.
The ladies are very fond of him.
He's a very fine singer.
He sings?
Oh, yes.
He and Miss Blanche Ingram sang at a Christmas party here some years ago.
This Miss Ingram, is she very beautiful?
Oh, good Lord, yes.
She has very fine features.
Brilliant eyes, very striking.
Well, she's the belle of the county.
She's not yet married?
No.
The Ingram's estate will pass to the son.
The daughters have only small fortunes.
But if she is so very beautiful, she must have wealthy suitors.
Mr Rochester, for example.
Well, yes.
But there is a considerable difference in age.
What of it?
There are more unequal matches made every day.
Why yes, dear, but I scarcely think Mr Rochester would think that a good idea.
You've eaten nothing again.
I'm sure you're sickening for something and the master's away.
I must decide whether to send for Doctor Crawford.
I am perfectly well, as I said.
Never better.
GRACE: 'Are you sure you weren't mistaken, Miss Eyre?
'
You were mistaken, Jane Eyre.
'Miss Blanche Ingram is the most beautiful and accomplished young lady.
'She is right and proper company for the master.'
THEY LAUGH
Who are you writing to, Miss Eyre?
I thought you had no-one to write to.
I don't.
We are your family now.
I wish Mr Rochester would come back.
I am so bored.
I wouldn't wish for long.
Sometimes he leaves us for many a month, especially in the cold winter season.
Once, he left us for a whole year and a quarter.
Oh, that was a very long winter.
I can remember it well.
Miss Eyre, are you sick?
Your cheeks are pink.
It is very hot in here this morning, Adele.
Oh, it's from the master.
Well...
SHE CLEARS HER THROAT
Well.
Mr Rochester is not likely to return home soon?
He's returning all right.
Leah!
Come quickly.
BELL RINGS
Open all the rooms, all the windows.
Logs over here, please.
In the grate, not upstairs, thank you.
Mr Roberts, would you be so kind as to joint the meat for me, please?
Thank you.
The silver needs a thorough polishing, please.
Thank you, Polly, in the scullery.
A thorough polishing.
Good, more flowers.
The flowers are so pretty.
Nice display in the centre there, thank you.
Oh, thank goodness!
Now, I wanted an extra four pounds of baking apples and plums.
Can you check for me that they are here?
I would prefer for you to use goose eggs.
If you come with me, I'll show you where we keep them.
Are you sure all this is necessary?
Oh, yes, I think so.
We're not sure how many house guests he's bringing but we must be sure to have more than enough to feed them.
Oh, dear, I've never done this before.
But the master's never been home long enough to have a party.
Goose eggs.
Mrs Poole gets good wages, I suppose?
Yeah, about five times what I get, and Master's not stingy.
I wonder...
I'll race you over to the river.
Oh, there they are at last.
Oh, my dear, how lovely it is to meet you.
I must go down and greet them.
That is Mademoiselle Ingram.
She has a French name, Blanche.
And that is her sister.
I think it must be.
And that's Lady Ingram, her mother.
THEY LAUGH
Master says you may join the ladies this evening.
Oh, I must start to prepare at once.
I must wear absolutely my best dress.
Adele, you think too much of your appearance.
It's the person inside you that matters.
No-one will love you for how pretty you are.
I do not think that can be right, Miss Eyre.
You must take her into the drawing room before the guests finish dinner.
Oh, no, surely I don't have to be there.
Adele can go with Sophie.
Master's orders.
He says you must be there, or he will come to your room and bring you down himself.
BELL RINGS
Adele, come on.
Des amandes.
Adele, come on.
Ah, there's the pictures.
Beautiful, isn't it?
DISTANT CHATTER
You look alike, move alike, sound alike.
You are, if I may say so a particularly fine example of the split female embryo.
I hope you'll permit me to ask you some questions?
Of course.
Everybody is.
Yes, that's right, everyone is interested in us.
Lady Ingram, you don't escape our argument so easily.
Rochester, I don't understand you.
If some people are rich and some poor, then that is God's will.
So be it, I am satisfied.
I'm sure you are if you are one of the predetermined rich.
And it is a scientific fact that there are so many more who are poor.
Adele!
Adele.
Sit down, Adele.
Can't we talk about something else?
There are children and servants present.
Oh, good Lord!
What on earth is this?
It is Mr Rochester's ward, I suppose.
The little French girl.
Mr Rochester, I thought you were not fond of children.
I'm not.
Then what on earth made you take on that little doll?
Where did you pick her up?
I didn't pick her up.
She was left in my hands.
Well, you should send her to school where she belongs.
Well, schools are expensive.
But you have a governess, I see.
There, hiding behind the screen.
Now that's expensive, for you have to feed them both.
What are you talking about now, Rochester?
Oh, no.
We don't want Mother getting started on governesses.
We're talking of governesses, Lady Ingram.
Oh, don't mention them!
I'm so glad that Blanche and Mary have no longer any need for them.
Governesses are a nuisance, all of them.
If they're not eating you out of house and home, they're carrying on with the tutor or, even worse, making eyes at the master of the house.
Really?
You surprise me.
Mary, do you remember Miss Twisk or Twitt or whatever she was called?
We pretended she was harbouring a passion for Bradstock.
It was your idea.
Yes, we were very naughty.
She was so boring, poor thing.
Mother had her leave instantly, in case she should set us a bad moral example.
You cannot be too careful, Rochester, with a young, impressionable mind in the house.
How do you do, Jane?
I am very well, sir.
Why did you not come up and speak to me?
I did not wish to disturb you.
You seemed engaged, sir.
It is a while since we've seen each other.
What have you been doing?
Nothing in particular.
Teaching Adele, of course.
You look a good deal paler.
What's the matter?
Nothing at all, sir.
Then return to the drawing room.
I am tired, sir.
Mm, and a little depressed, I think.
What about?
Tell me.
I am not depressed.
I tell you that you are.
So depressed that you're almost...
Let me look at you.
You are about to cry.
Tell me, Jane, why are you crying?
I am not crying.
Tonight you are excused.
But I expect you to appear in the drawing room every evening after dinner.
Every evening, mind.
It is my wish.
Where did I put it?
I'm sure I left it somewhere here.
Miss Eyre.
Why are you not dressed for riding?
I do not ride, sir.
Well, then you must learn.
Come, join us by the fire.
We will not be able to hunt today, I'm afraid, with the weather so changeable.
No, or go on a walk.
My book has gone missing again.
My book, you know, The Beast Within.
Oh, I wish you wouldn't, my dear.
How do you dare read those novels?
Oh, but it's very exciting.
It is about a man who commits a crime.
He spends the dark hours raging about like an animal and then, in the morning, he goes about his business and no-one suspects a thing.
Nonsense!
You don't think it possible that someone who seems perfectly serene and unspectacular from the outside could be capable of committing horrific crimes?
Certainly not a Christian man.
Although I'm sure that Mr Eshton has all sorts of new ideas about that.
For once, I must admit ignorance.
The brain is a vast and wonderful landscape.
We have not even begun to navigate its mysteries.
We do not know why it malfunctions.
We are in the very infancy of its science.
Science again.
You make it all sound so very grand.
God gives people good blood and bad blood, and there is an end to it.
When Mary and I were in Paris we saw the savage boy, the one who lived in the woods and could only talk gibberish, if you could call it talked.
That's what I'm talking about.
That child had bad blood.
You can clean it, dress it up, but you will never make it good.
You were born bad, Jane Eyre, and you will die bad!
Miss Eyre, is it your opinion that children are born the way
God intended them to be, that bad blood will always be bad blood?
Or can you discipline such a child?
Excuse me?
Of course you should.
That's common sense.
I think it wise that since we must live with the adult,
I think it prudent to treat a child as if they had feelings.
Really?
Feelings!
A child has no more feelings than that dog over there.
I would have thought that if you...
Please, Miss Eyre, continue.
Mr Eshton wishes to hear your opinion.
I think that all children, whether they are thought to be of good blood or bad blood, deserve to be given the chance to love...
..and to be loved.
I do not see the use of punishing a child with beatings and harsh words.
"What's the use of punishment?"
From a governess!
You must send that child off to school immediately, Rochester.
All this talk of tainted blood is wearisome.
I know my blood's up!
You are the best horsewoman in the county.
Shall we ride?
Oh, regarde!
LAUGHTER
Jane.
Where are you going?
I have to speak to Mrs Fairfax.
She allows Adele to eat too many sugary things.
Afterwards, I'll join you in the drawing room.
You might even enjoy yourself.
We'll be playing games later.
Don't tell me you don't approve of games, Jane?
What do you think of Miss Ingram, Jane?
I suppose I must choose a bride, as all about me seem to wish it.
Is that what they're saying?
To preserve this great estate of mine, I must have an heir.
Is that what the gossip requires?
I know nothing of gossip, sir.
Well, then, Jane, your honest opinion.
Do you think Miss Ingram a good choice?
Do you think I am in love with Miss Ingram, Jane?
I know nothing of love, sir.
Don't be late, Jane.
It won't be long before the games begin.
Shall we go?
Oh, now, there it is!
There is my book, The Beast Within, sitting there all the time.
No, but I'm sure I looked there this morning.
Maybe the ghost took it.
The ghost?
The ghost.
Sophie says it walks the corridors at night.
It eats the gateaux from the kitchen and it laughs in the dark.
THUNDERCLAP, THEY SCREAM
A ghost at Thornfield.
How exciting!
You never mentioned it.
She walks in the corridor with the painting of the mad people.
Sophie says she goes cold and shivers when she...
Sophie is from Marseilles, which means that she wears three or four outer garments even in July.
Our English weather feeds her overactive French imagination.
Oh, you disappoint me.
Maybe we could tell each other ghostly stories.
I'm in need of a little danger.
Ghost stories are not of interest.
How do you know if they're true?
But, my dear Blanche, if the ladies are interested, I know a game, if you're not afraid of things that we might not be able to explain?
The supernatural!
What are you up to, Edward?
You're interested in experiments, aren't you?
Well, I hope you know what you're doing.
ALL:
L... ..O... ..V..
..E.
Love.
Who's next?
Blanche.
Are you ready?
Of course I am.
H... ..E..
..A... ..R... ..T...
H-E-A-R-T.
Heart.
Oh, Blanche.
It means that you have given your heart to someone.
Do tell us...
As if we didn't know!
THEY LAUGH
L... ..E...
..S... ..S. Less heart.
What can that mean?
Less Heart, Heart Less...
Heartless!
Oh, dear Blanche.
I'm sure it's made a mistake.
It must think you're someone else.
You were right, Mr Eshton.
This is a silly game.
I am rather tired.
I think I will read in bed.
Be careful of your candle, my darling.
GHOSTLY CRIES
Morning.
ESHTON: 'You don't think it possible that someone who seems perfectly serene 'and unspectacular from the outside could hide a beast within them?
'
I'll be away all day on business.
I'm sure you'll be able to amuse yourselves.
Don't be too late.
I'll be back by sundown.
Don't misbehave now.
I think that gown Miss Blanche Ingram has, the blue, I think it the most beautiful dress I have ever seen.
SOUND OF HORSES HOOVES It is Mr Rochester!
He is back.
You said we could finish.
He's early.
Oh!
Who is this?
He is tres beau, Mademoiselle, n'est-ce pas?
A foreigner, I think.
Although quite a nice chap.
Mason's the name.
Says he met Rochester in the West Indies.
I think the twins have taken a bit of a shine to him.
Speak up, man.
What's the matter?
It's an old gypsy lady, Madam.
Come to tell fortunes.
She refuses to leave and with the Master away...
Tell her to go or we'll set the dogs on her.
No, no, tell her to stay.
There are ladies present who wish to have their fortunes told.
But what would Rochester say?
Well, he's not here, is he?
I am brave enough, if you aren't.
Ah!
Bonjour!
Bonjour, mon cherie.
Blanche!
What happened?
What did the gypsy lady say to you?
Oh.
Rochester was right. she talked absolute nonsense.
Nothing in it!
You can amuse yourselves with her if you want.
I'm sorry, Miss. she said she wouldn't leave until she had seen everyone and you are the only person who hasn't had their fortune told.
She would not leave until I had brought you here.
That's all right, George.
Don't worry.
I'll wait outside in case there's trouble.
No, George.
You may go, I'm not frightened.
You're not afraid?
Of course not.
Do you wish me harm?
The others were afraid of my magic...
Of my dark arts.
Of what I knew of their worst thoughts and desires.
Surely you noticed that some who entered this room with confidence are now disappointed with what I revealed?
Do you not believe in hell and the supernatural, Miss Eyre?
I believe what I believe.
You are a very confident young woman for someone who has never loved... ..who has had only had one true friend... who was snatched away... prematurely.
Where was it?
Lowood School.
There now!
I've impressed you.
These matters are not generally known, for sure.
But they are facts.
They are the truth.
You might have found them out by mortal means.
Well said, Miss Eyre.
I can see I am going to have to prove my powers.
To see into your soul, to reveal a hidden secret that no-one else could possibly know.
What were your thoughts, for instance, when you came to me this evening?
It's very pleasant company is it not, such as you've never known, and after the long months here alone at Thornfield with only the child and the housekeeper.
What do you think of them?
I do not think of them.
Of their opinions and their tastes.
I do not care for theirs any more than I'm sure they care for mine.
Is there no-one in the company who you share feelings with?
What about the master of the house?
He is not here today.
He is soon to be married, is he not, to the beautiful Blanche Ingram?
I don't know.
I thought it was you who could predict the future.
Anyway, I have paid you for MY future, not Mr Rochester's.
Mr Rochester is to be married.
I know that for sure, everyone does.
Oh...
I see that this news affects you.
You talk nonsense, old lady.
I shall leave you and send in the next fool.
It is over.
What do you wish me to do?
What is it?
Who is there?
Show yourself immediately or I'll call a servant!
Sir!
Thank you.
You have done well today.
You've given me a deal to think about and amused me greatly.
Now Jane don't be too cross.
I am not angry.
I am surprised.
Surely you don't begrudge me this little diversion.
The old lady provided me with an afternoon's amusement and our guests were given a mirror to hold up to themselves.
Not undeservedly, surely?
They are your guests, sir, not mine.
But I believe you got that woman to talk nonsense to me so that I might talk nonsense back and that was not fair, sir.
No.
No, it was not fair but how else am I to find out what you think, Jane?
But don't worry, you did not talk nonsense so all's well, isn't it?
And you are not angry with me?
I don't know.
I'll have to think about it.
But I expect I'll manage to forgive you eventually.
Aren't you curious to find out what my gypsy predicted for Miss Ingram?
I bet the drawing room's buzzing with excitement?
They have plenty to discuss, sir.
Even the stranger who arrived this morning.
What stranger?
His name is Mason.
I believe he's visiting from overseas.
What is it, sir?
Oh, Jane!
I wish I were on a desert island somewhere... ..with only you for company.
Tell me.
If all those people in the drawing room...
If they... cast me out and spat at me...
..what would you do?
I should try to comfort you, sir.
Can I help you, sir?
I would do anything for you.
What if I asked you to do something for me that was wrong?
I know.
I know the answer, Jane.
You could not.
Thank you.
Jane.
Do you believe in redemption?
If you have sinned, you can be redeemed.
DOOR SHUTS
Do you mind if I ask you some questions about your habits?
How about your clothes - did you come down in the morning and find that you had dressed the same?
Yes.
Mason!
My dear fellow.
What a surprise!
How good to see you again.
SHE SCREAMS
What was it?
Did you hear it?
Really.
I only go away for a day on business and you over-excite yourselves like children with your occult games and conversations.
But we all heard a cry!
Didn't we, Lady Lynn?
Yes.
Surely we all heard something?
Someone had a bad dream, brought on by a combination of the visit from our gypsy friend and too much grouse at dinner.
Are you sure?
We are all safe?
I am sure.
Anyway, my Amazon, what have you to fear from the night hours?
It's bad enough to have strange shrieking, never mind governesses creeping up on us.
She's pale as a ghost!
Well, my lady.
I shall escort you back to your bedroom personally.
Come everyone, back to bed.
KNOCK ON DOOR
I'm ready.
Are you hurt, sir?
It is nothing.
Come, we must be silent.
Are we going to the North Tower?
Do you want to go back?
No, sir.
I forgot to ask.
Do you faint at the sight of blood?
I don't know.
Wait here.
Here.
UNLOCKS BOLTS
Richard.
Jane.
Come here.
You must press this hard on the wound.
I am going now to get the doctor.
He'll have you good as new by morning.
(Richard, do not say anything of what has happened or I will not be responsible.)
Jane.
I have to leave you here while I'm gone for an hour or so.
No conversation.
I could not stop her.
Ssh!
Be calm.
She has killed me.
RATTLING
You will not die.
I will not let you die.
KEYS JANGLE
She's, she's done for me!
Nonsense.
The doctor's here, you are in no danger.
There are teeth marks here?
She sucked my blood.
She said she would drain my heart.
I warned you.
I told you not to do anything until I could be with you.
Hurry up, Carter.
We need him out of here before sunrise.
Take care of him at your house.
I'll ride over in a day or two to see how he does.
Very well.
Edward, take care of her as tenderly as you can.
I'll do my best.
As I always have and always will.
Stay a while outside with me.
This house is a dungeon.
It's a prison.
It's a lovely morning... ..after such a turbulent night eh, Jane?
Yes, sir.
Were you frightened?
I was afraid, sir.
DISTANT CHATTER
Quietly go in the back entrance.
Everything all right, Miss?
What do you want?
Mrs Fairfax asked me to tell you that you have a visitor.
Oh, excuse me, Miss.
It is you, Miss Jane.
Don't you recognise me?
Bessie!
Oh, look at you!
Miss Eyre.
I always said Jane Eyre would grow up to be a fine, accomplished young lady.
Not quite a beauty, all told.
But... ..a credit to us.
I'm glad not to be of discredit to you, Bessie.
Oh, Bessie, what's happened?
And I'm hoping you are not going to disappear once more on your travels.
I suppose you might like to travel yourself one day.
Does Miss Eyre need to speak to you?
Excuse me.
Well, Jane?
Sir, I need to have a leave of absence for a week or two.
To see a sick lady who has asked for me.
What sick lady?
Her name is Reed.
She is my uncle's wife.
Uncle?
You told me you had no family.
My aunt cast me off when I went to school.
Why?
Because I was poor.
And she did not like me.
And she sent you to Lowood without so much as a word or a visit for nearly 10 years?
So why does she suddenly wish to see you now?
Her son John is dead.
He ruined himself.
She is now struck down with his misfortune.
I will only be gone two weeks, I hope.
Two weeks!
That's not possible.
And you have company, sir.
Very well.
But promise me you will not stay with this undeserving aunt more than a week.
I cannot promise, she is dying.
I cannot set a time on that.
Of course you will go.
How have I the power to stop you?
Well, you must have some money.
You can't travel without money.
I haven't given you any salary yet, remember?
How much have you, Jane?
In all the world?
Five shillings, sir.
Here.
Take £50.
No, sir.
You only owe me 15, I have no change.
I don't want change, Jane.
You know that.
Take your wages.
You're right.
Better not give you all that.
You might stay away for three months.
Here, there's 10.
Isn't that enough?
Yes, sir.
But you will still owe me five.
Then come back for it.
Sir!
I have to ask you something else.
A matter of business.
You have as good as said you intend to be married.
Really?
That's been settled then, has it?
You've decided Miss Ingram is to be my bride.
Now I see it!
You are going to prevail upon this miserable "family" to find you a new situation.
Ungrateful girl!
No, sir.
I told you.
They do not like me, sir.
To offer such a service...
I shall advertise.
Devil you will!
Advertise!
I wish I had only offered you a sovereign not ten whole pounds.
Give me back nine.
Jane.
I have need of it.
No, sir.
I do not trust you.
So Jane - etiquette.
How do we say goodbye?
Teach me.
I'm not quite up to it.
You say, farewell...
Or anything else we might prefer.
Farewell, Mr Rochester.
For the present.
And what must I say in return?
The same, if you like.
Then I will say...
.."Don't go, Jane."
What will I do without your help?
Sir, you will not be in danger.
Rochester!
Edward!
Sir, please!
STEADY BREATHING
Subtitles by Red Bee Media Ltd
Email subtitling@bbc.co.uk
Ben!
Ben!
Have you seen my keys?
Keys, keys, keys...
SHE SIGHS
God's sake.
Ben!
Karen!
No bin bag!
Brilliant.
CHILDREN SHOUT
Ben and Karen, are you getting ready?
We've missed the walking bus!
Again.
We'll have to take the car.
Shoes, teeth, and hair!
Why can't people just leave them...
What are you doing with Daddy's computer?
I'm taking it to Show And Tell.
No.
Show And Tell's on Friday and today's Tuesday, so...
They've changed it.
They haven't...have they?
Yeah.
Since when?
Last Wednesday.
Who changed it?
Problems on the District Line!
Let go, we're gonna put it back.
I want to take it.
You can't.
People take pets!
Come outside and put...
Ben, look, you'll be late.
Can I take this for History Week?
No, you can't take it!
Turn it off.
You're the best horsewoman in the country.
Shall we ride?
Do you think I'm in love with Miss Ingram?
SCREAM I forgot to ask.
Do you faint at the sight of blood?
She has done for me.
Nonsense, the doctor's here.
You are in no danger.
There are teeth marks here?
!
I need to have a leave of absence to see a sick lady who has asked for me.
What sick lady?
Her name is Reed, my uncle's wife.
Don't go, Jane.
What will I do without your help?
ECHOING VOICE:
'No!
No!
Not the red room!
'Not the red room!
I've not been wicked!
'No!
Not the red room!
'Don't take me to the red room!
'Jane Eyre!
She's not part of the family.'
Miss Eyre?
You have not grown tall.
How is Mrs Reed?
Mrs Reed?
Oh, you mean Mama!
She's extremely unwell.
I doubt you can see her tonight.
If you would just step upstairs and tell her I have come, I would be much obliged to you.
She has asked for me to come.
I would not like to keep her waiting.
Missus is awake.
I have told her that you're here.
Who are you?
I am Jane Eyre.
How are you, Aunt?
You are not Jane Eyre.
I have had such trouble with that child!
She was mad.
A fiend.
I sent her away to Lowood, where the fever broke out and many died.
But she didn't die!
I wish she had!
Why do you hate Jane Eyre so?
I hated her mother.
She was my husband's favourite sister.
When she died, he cried like a baby.
And he insisted on sending for the child.
Sickly, whining thing!
It wailed in its cradle all night long and Reed doted on it, the fool.
Even in his last illness, he called for "it" rather than his own children.
Where's John?
He always wants money.
He's a fine boy and he loves me, but I don't know where to get the money.
Where's John!
Where's John?
She knows he's gone.
That's why she'll never leave this bed.
Where's John?
Ssh, ssh.
She doesn't mean it, Miss Jane, half what she says.
It's all right, Bessie.
I don't mind.
No, really I don't.
You used to get upset.
More than upset.
But you've grown into such a confident young woman.
Who could have known it?
I suppose you have friends now to confide in.
So your troubles don't plague you so much.
That must be it?
Yes.
I do have a friend.
Someone who...when I talk to them, they understand everything I say.
They would laugh if I told them about Mrs Reed.
They are so in tune with me, they know my thoughts before I even think them.
Certainly before I put them into words.
I always said you'd do well.
I'm pleased that when you leave here you can go home to such people.
My friend is to be married soon, it's almost certain.
But she will not live far away, maybe you can visit?
Yes, of course.
That may be so.
LAUGHTER Eshton here says that that swallow there heads south at the merest shiver of winter.
Travels all the way to the most southern tip of Africa and then comes back here, to this precise spot.
And I say, how do you know?
As they all look exactly the same.
Why would they come back here and not stay where it is warm?
It is in their nature.
It is what they must do.
They must come home.
What do you think, Edward?
That's enough.
Get along now.
Shouldn't you be in bed?
No, Madame.
Oh, that necklace is so beautiful.
I wouldn't have thought I'd say it - it's a pity the governess isn't here.
I expect you are glad she stays away so long.
Oh, no, I wish she would come back.
I like her best of all, except for Monsieur Rochester of course.
When Monsieur Rochester sees fit to make a certain announcement, that young lady will feel the benefits of a good English boarding school.
LAUGHTER
Is there a problem?
Not at all.
I was just taking a stroll through the hall before dinner.
And did you like what you saw?
Naturally.
It could of course do with a little management, a few new furnishings here and there.
And you think you'd like to, er... take all this on?
What do you really want, Blanche?
If only Aunt Gibson would invite me up to town.
It would be so much better if only I could get away for a month or two until it was all over.
Georgiana, if there were ever a more vain, absurd animal than you.
You are completely useless.
And in being useless, seek only to cling onto others.
If no-one can be found to burden themselves with such a fat, weak, puffy, useless thing, you complain that you are ill-treated and neglected.
You must be flattered, you must be admired, or you languish and die away.
Well!
Everyone knows you are the most selfish, heartless creature in existence!
I know very well your spite and your hatred.
You ruined my chances with Lord Vere.
You could not bear the thought that I would be raised into circles where you dare not show your face.
Let me give you this advice.
It is the first and last I shall offer you.
If you divide each day into sections and perform some useful task to timetable, the day will be over before you know it.
You will be dependent upon your own senses and not have to be flattered and admired to know that you exist.
After my mother's death, the hour of her burial, I wash my hands of you.
It will be as if you and I had never known each other.
And if we were the only two human beings left alone on Earth together,
I would not address one more word to you.
Who is that?
It is I, Aunt Reed, Jane Eyre.
You asked to see me.
Yes.
I did.
I am very ill, you know.
I need to ease my mind before I die.
I have done you wrong twice, Jane Eyre.
One was to break the promise I made to my husband.
To bring you up as my own child.
You know that.
And...
Go to my dressing table.
Open it.
Take out and read the letter you find there.
"Madam.
"Will you have the goodness to send me the address of my...
niece, Jane Eyre.
"I wish her to join me in Madeira.
"Fortune has blessed me, and as I am unmarried and childless,
"I wish to adopt her and bequeath to her all I have when I die.
"I am, Madam, sincerely yours, John Eyre."
But this was written three years ago.
Why did you never tell me I had an uncle who was alive?
Because I hated you too much.
I could not forgive you.
Forgive me?
For your conduct.
I take you on and you treat me with contempt.
You talk to me like a vile, wild animal.
Forgive me my passionate nature.
I was a child, Aunt.
Let us forgive each other now.
I could not forget.
I took my revenge.
I wrote to your uncle.
I told him Jane Eyre was dead.
That she had died of a fever at Lowood School.
See?
I had my revenge.
Now you may have yours.
You can tell him of my falsehood.
I will be dead by morning so I don't care.
SHE COUGHS
Please.
Water.
Quick.
I forgive you, Aunt Reed.
Whether you wish it or not, I do truly forgive you.
Woah!
Take my trunk on up to Thornfield, would you?
Won't you ride, Miss?
You've had a very long journey.
No.
I'm nearly home.
It is my favourite walk.
There you are!
You're back!
Ungrateful thing!
I give you leave for a week and you're gone a whole month!
I want my money back, since you've had me so little in your thoughts.
I said I would be gone for as long as I was needed.
And I was.
And you still owe me wages.
Come, let's get you home.
Adele will scream and shout, "Bienvenue!"
Thank you.
For your great kindness.
I am...
I am strangely glad to get back again to you, and... wherever you are is my home.
Is my true home.
Are you going?
See, Eshton?
Our swallow has come home.
Eshton is using my coach to pursue some unusual twins.
Yes. one, a Belgian, has been in a sort of a deep sleep for some eight months and he has been woken by a twin, now living in Toulouse, that he never even knew existed.
It's amazing!
You don't think it possible that two minds can be so in tune that they communicate across the country?
And call out to each other across space and time?
You are one of the world's most curious people, Eshton.
And you are one of the most cynical, Rochester.
Nonsense.
I am the most romantic person I know.
Be off with you.
Miss Eyre, Miss Eyre!
Amazing minds await your magnifying glass.
Miss Eyre.
Oh, Jane.
You're back.
Miss Eyre!
Ah, at last the governess has returned from her travels.
Can't you teach that child something so she won't be under our feet?
It's a pity we can't stay for longer.
But it's the Warreners' summer ball next week.
Well, Blanche and I won't be there.
We'll be occupied with a more important event, I am certain.
Don't worry, you'll see her again soon.
Ingram Park is a short journey for an enthusiastic rider.
Indeed.
Safe journey.
Ah, there you are.
Is Adele in bed?
You're back to our routine very quickly.
Now that all our house guests are gone, it is like it has always been.
What's that?
It is a book I used to read as a child.
My "escape" book.
I used to imagine that one day I could go anywhere I wanted.
I took it with me to Lowood.
And now?
Now, I think it can go here very well.
Now, Miss Eyre.
If we're very lucky, we might see some dragonflies.
Did I ever tell you of my travels in the Blue Mountains of Mongolia?
And you can tell me of your travels in the black and gloomy forests of your childhood memories.
So the vain, facetious cousin, Georgiana, found a mate within days of your aunt's funeral?
So it seems.
And what of the nun?
I believe Eliza will settle in her French convent, never to return to worldly pleasures.
I give her but a few years to become Mother Superior.
So you returned to Gateshead half knowing you wouldn't find the old lady repentant or forgiving, or in the least bit pleased to see Jane Eyre, and this is how things transpired.
And yet Jane Eyre doesn't seem to be troubled that she has no family, no-one in the world outside of Thornfield, who wishes her well.
No.
I have no family to speak of.
But I hear you have been making plans of your own.
I assume Miss Blanche's departure from Thornfield is only temporary.
I mean, as Adele's governess, it is my duty to help you decide on a suitable school.
Yes.
Yes, indeed, and we mustn't forget that when I do, finally, relinquish my bachelor ways, we must find you a suitable position.
What do you think of Ireland?
We don't have to worry about that now.
Not for a good while yet.
Oh, look, look!
See the emerald wings!
Come.
So, to find half of anything, we divide it into two equal parts.
Elle est arrivee.
Elle est tres belle!
In English, please, Adele.
But I think it must be Francaise, Miss Eyre, surely it must be?
What do you think?
A beauty, isn't it?
Do you think it'll do for Mrs Rochester?
Won't she look like Queen Boadicea?
Yes, thank you.
Leaning back on those purple cushions?
You know, Jane...
I wish I were a little better suited to matching her in looks.
Tell me, magician that you are, are you absolutely sure you don't have a potion that can make me more handsome?
I have told you before.
That would be past the power of magic, sir.
Come, Adele.
Monsieur Rochester,
I want you to tell me about the Caribbean Islands again.
Sophie has taught me a song.
SHE SINGS
All right, incorrigible one.
You must imagine a restaurant.
No, let's say, a meeting place, where many respectable people come here at night to socialise.
You must imagine... brilliant reds and pinks, the most exotic perfumed flowers, delightful, passionate music.
The women are of course very beautiful.
They wear bright silks, ambers, sapphires, emeralds.
They are very seductive.
But they are also mysterious, tantalising.
Dangerous.
# La... #
Stop that noise or I'll send you to school in the morning!
You're like a wild animal!
The Caribbean is not as beautiful as it seems, Adele.
I came back to escape.
Summer's been with us forever this year.
I can't remember when it's stayed so long.
And Mr Rochester has stayed with it.
He has never been here at Thornfield for this length of time.
He found something to keep him from his travels.
Mind you,
I think there must have been a little disagreement.
Really?
Well, Ingram Park is not very far away, not for an ardent suitor.
Yet he has not saddled a horse for several weeks.
He spends his evenings either talking to you or prowling the lower gardens, like a bear, the gardener says.
Of course, he's got the household business to worry about.
What do you mean?
Well, he'll be wanting to find us suitable positions.
For after the wedding.
Oh, no, he will take care over that, I'm sure.
He's a good master.
Thornfield is pleasant in the summer, isn't it, Jane?
Yes, sir.
You have become attached to the place?
Yes, sir.
And you'd be sad to leave?
Yes.
Must I leave, sir?
Must I leave Thornfield?
Yes, I'm sorry, but I'm afraid you must.
You are to be married?
Exactly.
Precisely.
As you, with your usual acuteness, have already predicted, when I marry, Adele must go to school and you must find a new situation.
Yes, sir.
I will advertise immediately.
No, you won't.
I have already found you a place.
Ireland is a long way away, sir.
From Thornfield.
It is a long way away from you, sir.
We have been good friends, haven't we, Jane?
It is difficult to part from a friend... and know you will never meet them again.
And you and I... it's like we're a pair of Eshton's twins, bound together in some unworldly way.
Sharing a spirit, we're so alike.
When we are parted, when you...
leave me,
I believe that bond will snap and I will bleed inwardly.
But you will forget me after a while.
I would never forget you!
How can you imagine that?
What do you think I am?
Oh, I wish I'd never been born!
I wish I'd never come here.
I wish I'd never grown to love Thornfield.
I love Thornfield.
I love it because I have lived a full life.
I have not been trampled on.
I have been treated as an equal.
YOU have treated me as an equal.
You are the best person I know.
And I can't bear the thought of having to leave you.
Must you leave me, Jane?
Of course I must, because you have a wife.
What do you mean?
Blanche Ingram, of course.
You are as good as married.
You have promised her.
I have not promised Blanche anything.
To someone who is inferior to you.
Someone who you have no sympathy with.
Of course I must go!
Do you think that I am a machine?
That I can bear it?
Do you think, because I am poor, plain, obscure and little, that I have no heart, that I am without soul?
I have as much heart as you and as much soul!
And if God had given me some beauty and wealth
I would make it as hard for you to leave me as it is for me to leave you.
You will not leave me, Jane.
Let me go.
Jane, don't struggle so.
I am a free person and I will go and do as I please.
Yes, yes, yes, you will.
You will decide your own destiny.
Jane, I offer you my hand, my heart and all my possessions.
You laugh at me!
No, no.
Jane.
I want you to live with me, to pass through life as my second self, my best earthly companion.
Jane, have you no faith in me?
None whatsoever.
You doubt me?
Absolutely.
Jane, you know I don't love Blanche.
I love you, like my own flesh.
Jane, say that you will marry me!
Say it quickly.
Jane, do you accept me?
Are you in earnest?
I can hardly believe you.
I swear.
Then, sir...
Call me by my name.
Call me Edward.
Then, Edward,
I will marry you.
God forgive me!
And let no man meddle with me.
I aim to keep her.
There is no-one to meddle.
I have no family to interfere.
No.
THUNDER RUMBLES
Run and take off those wet things.
Good night!
Good night, my darling!
I feel so astonished.
I hardly know what to say to you, Miss Eyre.
Mr Rochester came in here about five minutes ago to tell me that he had asked you to marry him.
Oh, this cannot be true.
But why?
I am sorry to offend you, Jane, but you are so young.
You know nothing of men.
I have noticed that Mr Rochester seemed to make you a favourite.
But I thought...
That I was too monstrous to love?
No.
I meant, I thought you too level-headed.
Too sensible a young woman to be so overwhelmed.
Overwhelmed?
Well... are you overwhelmed?
I believe the good woman thought I'd forgotten my station.
And you yours.
Little does she know that I am the servant and you the mistress.
I am sorry.
I know that look.
She thinks I do not know myself.
And that you are doing as all men must.
Jane, she doesn't know us.
All the same, sir.
Sir!
When did I become sir again?
Last night, you stood before the heavens and pronounced yourself my equal.
That's the Jane I want to marry.
To share my life.
Will you dine with me tonight?
No, sir.
Edward.
You promised to call me Edward.
Until we marry...if we marry...
In one month, one short month, you'll be Mrs Rochester.
Or I'll be damned!
Then until that morning, I will call you Mr Rochester, halfway between Edward and Sir.
I will continue to teach Adele.
We will go on as before.
Then it will be seen that this idea, this...marriage, is a sensible proposition.
I'm not interested in pleasing Mrs Fairfax.
But for you... ..for you, I will obey.
Now, hurry up and get your bonnet or we'll be late.
For what?
We're going to town.
Oh, no!
No, no, no.
You're not coming.
Out of there, now.
Oh, please let me come, Miss Eyre.
No!
Absolutely "non"!
Jane and I...
Miss Eyre and I are going shopping by ourselves.
Shopping!
Were you listening to a word I said?
Just today, to celebrate.
Come, come, you can't get married in that.
I will not be married at all if you force me into that ridiculous carriage.
John, bring up the other carriage.
And Adele shall come too.
No.
I'll send her to school yet.
Will I go without Mademoiselle?
Absolutely sans Mademoiselle!
I am going to take Mademoiselle away.
To Europe first, where I will take her to all the grand palaces and present her to all the kings and queens.
You cannot do that, because she has no jewels.
She will have.
In London there is a very special box filled with jewels.
I shall send for them immediately and Mademoiselle will be covered in them from head to toe while she teaches you mathematics.
And when Madame, as she will be then, is tired of all these kings and queens,
I will take her to a villa, whitewashed and secluded, on the edge of the emerald Mediterranean.
Yes, yes, this will do very well.
We need at least six day dresses.
Are these the evening fabrics?
We need three at the most.
And this for the veil.
No, even Adele will draw a line at that.
There.
This is much more suitable.
Now, evening dresses.
For Mademoiselle, what do you think?
No?
This is for Mademoiselle.
Child knows you better than I do.
I'll take it.
Jane Eyre will not be overwhelmed.
Miss Eyre.
You will really be going the minute after the wedding?
Yes.
You will stay the night in the grand London hotel and then take the steam boat to France?
Yes.
I wish I could go with you.
You must stay here.
But don't worry, Mr Rochester...
WE will pick out a good school for you.
They will hit me and starve me.
No.
I promise I won't let that happen.
Go.
Who is there?
Who is it?
George, what time did your master say he would be home?
Don't worry, Miss.
He has been away one night already, he will not stay away another.
So!
I am only gone for 24 hours and I return to this!
You can't do without me, clearly!
Is anything wrong?
It was not Sophie, it was not Mrs Fairfax.
It was not even Grace Poole.
But you were dreaming.
I had been dreaming, but then I awoke.
Thank God nothing worse happened!
Thank God you're safe!
It was not Grace Poole.
Who else could it have been?
I was not dreaming.
And the rest of your dream?
Is Thornfield a neglected ruin.
Have I left you without so much as a word?
No.
So?
Put it down to your anxieties.
Your natural anxieties about the new life you are about to enter.
Yesterday I was very busy and happy packing.
I was not worried about the future.
I think it a glorious thing to have the hope of living with you.
Because I love you.
It was a fine day yesterday.
Look.
The storm has gone.
Voila.
C'est tres jolie ca!
Attendez.
Voila.
Merci, Sophie.
Attendez, mademoiselle.
Regardez vous!
Vous etes tres belle...
Madame.
At last!
There you are!
How could I have thought that gaudy veil would have suited you better?
Is John getting the carriage ready?
Yes, sir.
Is the luggage down?
Yes, sir.
Have it strapped and ready on the carriage.
We are leaving the moment we return from the church.
Yes, sir.
I'm sorry, Jane.
Are you ready?
I require and charge you both as ye will answer at the dreadful day of judgement when the secrets of all hearts shall be disclosed.
that if either of you know any impediment why ye may not lawfully be joined in matrimony, ye do now confess it.
Be ye well assured that so many as are coupled together otherwise than God's Word doth allow, are not joined together by God, neither is their matrimony lawful.
The marriage cannot go on.
I declare the existence of an impediment.
Proceed.
I said, proceed.
I cannot proceed without some investigation.
Perhaps it might be got over, explained away?
I hardly think so, it is insuperable.
Mr Rochester has a wife now living.
Who are you?
My name is Briggs, a solicitor.
You would thrust on me a wife?
I remind you of her existence, sir, which the law recognises, if you do not.
I have no wife.
"Edward Fairfax Rochester of Thornfield Hall
"was married to Bertha Antoinetta Mason
"at San Benedictus Church in Spanish Town, Jamaica
"on the 18th day of March, 1825."
If that is a genuine document, it doesn't prove the woman is still living.
She was living three months ago.
I have a witness to the fact.
What have you to say?
What have you to say?
!
Gentlemen, this is a place of God!
My sister is living at Thornfield Hall.
I saw her there last June.
Impossible.
I am an old resident of this neighbourhood, sir, and I have never heard of a Mrs Rochester at Thornfield Hall.
No, by God.
I took care that none would.
Enough.
When is enough?
Clear the church.
There will be no wedding today.
Before you go, however, I bid you come up to the house.
I have someone I wish you to meet.
Take it back to the coach house, John.
It won't be needed today.
Very good, sir.
Away with your congratulations!
You're 15 years too late.
Do you remember this room, Mason, where you almost lost your life?
Morning, Mrs Poole.
How is your charge this morning?
A little touchy, sir.
We are having some breakfast but she is calm now.
Be very careful, sir.
Aren't I always, Grace?
We'd better leave.
Why, Richard?
Why are you frightened?
Ladies and gentlemen, may I introduce you to my wife?
Puta!
Puta!
Puta!
Just leave, quickly, sir.
She will be calm again.
I will handle her, sir.
That was my wife.
As some of you know, my father was a greedy man, who wanted to preserve his estate by marrying his younger son off to a wife who would bring him a rich dowry.
I was sent to the Caribbean where, knowing my predilection for dark, handsome women,
I was tricked by Mason and his father into pursuing his sister Bertha... who was as beautiful as the glittering stars and just as tantalising.
I was married before I knew it, before I had met the mother, who was, I found out later, at that time, and had been for many years, incarcerated in a mental asylum.
And that insanity ran through the family like a black river of disease.
It was but half a day before I realised what manner of wife I had been tricked into.
It was but a few weeks before the full extent of her illness was made clear to me.
An illness which has grown in violence and foulness at an ever-increasing pace.
Then, serves him right for his wickedness, my father died.
And my brother straight behind.
So I...
So I inherited everything anyway.
The Rochester fortune intact.
I brought her back with me to England.
Intending to make Thornfield a comfortable prison for her.
And for me.
I have another house...hidden away.
I could have kept her there.
Where the damp inclement air might have rid me of her burden.
I could have done that and no-one would have blamed me.
But I left her here, with Grace...
..while I travelled the world, trying to forget the horrors at home.
Until one day... ..one day, this girl appeared who knew nothing of this.
This girl... ..who stands so quiet and grave at the mouth of hell.
This girl... ..who is all...quietness and sanity and innocence.
Do you wonder why I wanted her?
Why I risked the wrath of God to get her?
And now I must ask you to leave.
I must see to my wife.
Jane.
KNOCK ON DOOR Jane?
Forgive me.
I couldn't tell you.
I knew you'd never stay.
Jane, come away with me.
We'll go and live together in that whitewashed villa, away from everyone.
You have no family to care.
To interfere with us.
Jane?
Jane, can you hear me?
Jane?
Subtitles by Red Bee Media Ltd, 2006
E-mail subtitling@bbc.co.uk
Mother, I'll go, if that's what you want.
I will go and claim kin.
I'm Mr d'Urberville.
# You can come back
# When you want... #
Why didn't you tell me there was danger?
Why didn't you warn me?
Oh, Tess.
Thomas Hardy's most captivating heroine...
Why did you never tell me I had an uncle who was alive?
Because I hated you too much.
Jane, I offer you my hand, my heart and all my possessions...
Please, I beg you will marry me.
Say it quickly.
The marriage cannot go on.
I declare the existence of an impediment.
Edward Fairfax Rochester of Thornfield Hall was married to Bertha Antoinetta Mason on the 18th day of March 1825.
Puta!
SHE SCREAMS
WIND WHISTLES
Our Father... which art in heaven... hallowed be thy name, thy kingdom come... thy will be done on earth...
Wait!
Helen, wait for me!
She must have been on the moors for days, weeks even.
Poor creature.
She looks so pale.
St John found her just in time.
Who do you think she is?
Where did she come from?
Jane!
Jane!
SHE PANTS
I'm sorry to be such trouble.
You cannot remember your name?
Or your family?
Why don't we try to help?
We can tell you what we know...
Oh, yes!
We think you must have wandered on the moors for many days.
Maybe weeks.
We do not know where you travelled from.
With no money or support.
You are a mystery...
We've made up our own story.
We think you are a young, well-bred woman who has run away from home because of family disapproval.
Some romance.
Diana!
Not now!
All right, then.
We will not speculate yet.
But this is not the hand of a working woman.
So you are a well-bred lady.
A governess?
A teacher of some kind?
You speak French.
Extremely well.
You know geography.
Or you have travelled widely.
You talked of foreign places as if you had felt their heat, smelt their smells.
I have not travelled beyond England.
How can you be sure if you can't remember anything?
Hannah has washed your dress.
See here?
So... "JEL School."
Is that any help?
It might not have been her dress.
DIANA LAUGHS
I-I do not know what this means.
But I know that I am honest.
Diana!
It seems she does not remember yet.
But surely we have conscience enough not to play games with her identity.
DISTANT CHATTER AND LAUGHTER
Good Lord, miss!
You look like a ghost.
Here, sit down...
Though I think you're so faded you might melt away with the heat.
Careful!
I love the fire...
I think I must have been very cold at one time in my life.
The misses will be angry with me if I don't get you back to bed.
I have spent long enough in bed.
I must try to repay everyone's kindness.
Do the young ladies live here alone?
Since their father died.
Mr St John lives in his parish over at Morton.
I don't know how long they'll last here.
They haven't a penny between them.
The girls will have to go for governesses soon.
You have book learning, I suppose?
So you could earn your own living, if you chose.
I have done... and I will.
Just as soon as I can advertise.
Advertise!
Well, you are a surprising little thing!
And how long have you been looking after the family?
30 year.
I saw all the children born.
Young St John came out of the womb already a clergyman!
I'm glad you are up and about...
Miss...
Jane...
Elliot...
I believe, in the absence of knowledge, my sisters have christened you?
They think it suitable.
But is it your name?
No matter.
Jane Elliot it is.
My sisters would like to keep you, like a stray off the moor.
Do you intend to live off their charity?
For they have very little to spare.
Course not.
I wish to be put to work.
I will do anything honest.
But surely the cuckoos are too fat to fly thousands of miles...
They go somewhere.
Maybe to the corners of Europe.
You are full of information.
Not only do you know all about European birds, but South American birds, Patagonian lizards...
Someone must have taught you.
I've seen one like this in the West Indies but never here.
See there?
Have you had an unpleasant memory?
No, it was not...not unpleasant.
Good evening!
Good evening.
This must be the mysterious Miss Elliot.
I'm Rosamond Oliver.
I live with my father at Vale Hill.
Good evening, Mr Rivers.
And good evening, Carlo.
Would I forget you?
Your dog is quicker to recognise his friends than you are, sir.
A lovely evening, Miss Oliver.
But a little late for you to be out alone.
Papa says you never come to see us now.
You are quite a stranger.
He is alone tonight and not very well.
Won't you come back with me?
It is not a reasonable hour to intrude.
Reasonable hour?
!
But I declare it is!
It is just the hour when Papa most needs company.
And you would not be intruding because I have invited you.
Do come.
Poor Rosamond!
Honestly, St John...
He is as inexorable as death!
She adores him.
And he adores her!
Is there some obstacle?
Her family?
No, her father adores him too!
He doesn't mind that St John is not wealthy?
No.
It's St John.
He's perverse!
He will not allow himself to have her.
Oh...if only I were so in love...
We should embrace it.
It is a crime against God to deny yourself love.
It should be the 11th Commandment.
That these two persons present now come to be joined...
Therefore if any man can show any just cause why they may not lawfully be joined together let him now speak, or else hereafter forever hold his peace...
Miss Elliot!
Are you feeling unwell?
I am quite well, thank you.
The church is well attended?
And we are lucky in our benefactor.
Mr Oliver.
You met his daughter, Miss Rosamond.
He owns a needle factory in the valley.
He's very generous.
Mr Oliver, in fact, was the inspiration for the employment I have found for you, if, of course, you should wish to take it.
When I first arrived in Morton, there was no school.
The children of the poor had no hope of progress.
I have established one for boys.
Now it is the turn of the girls.
There is a cottage available, simply furnished.
The mistress's salary will be £30 a year.
Will you take the job?
I could organise the studies as I wished?
No beatings... and enough food for dinner?
As long as you taught God's word.
Then I accept.
With all my heart.
You understand that this will be a village school, poor girls to whom you will teach knitting, sewing, reading, writing, and maybe arithmetic, at the very most.
What will you do with your accomplishments?
Save them until they are wanted.
I do not think you will stay here long.
I am not ambitious.
No, but you are impassioned.
Excuse the word.
I mean that, for you, human affections and sympathies have the most powerful hold.
'You cannot hate me, Jane.
'I didn't mean to deceive you.
'Unlike you...
'I cannot live alone, without the warmth of human companionship.
'I roamed the world... '..then returning one night to this cold, dark place...'
..I saw this... ..this magical thing.
You were in my path.
Do you remember?
And since that moment... ..I have never wanted to leave the place that you were...
Though you left, I remained... ..waiting for my little bird to return.
We are one, you and I.
We have to be together.
We are like those twins... so intertwined in their senses and feelings that they can cry out to one another across continents, so close are their thoughts.
Say that you don't love me.
I dare you.
You cannot.
I will not.
I will love you until I die.
And yet you will leave me?
You mean to go your way and for me to go mine?
Yes, sir.
"Sir" again?
Not Edward?
By tomorrow, Mary, and I will be blown to the ends of the Earth.
Derbyshire and Nottingham are not so very far away.
We've teach fat little boys lessons they do not want to learn!
And we'll never see our cottage again!
She fears she will never see St John again.
Why not?
Because he's so pig-headed.
He WILL be a missionary.
He will go to a really hot place and that will be the end of him.
It is his chosen path.
He thinks it's the only way to serve God.
But why can't he serve God here?
You know that's never been enough.
He needs to make a grand gesture.
Jane...
You must keep him here.
Look after him and don't let him out of your sight.
I don't think I could ever change St John's mind against anything he'd decided on.
Don't forget, Jane.
We're relying on you.
Now, this is Morton.
Can anyone point out where we are?
Ow!
Alice?
Alice!
The clock.
The time?
It's home time.
The bell?
Still getting used to the clock.
Never mind.
You're coming along.
I am determined to make scholars of them all.
Hello, Miss Elliot.
I am so glad you decided to stay in Morton to be mistress of...our endeavour.
I have brought you a pretty pair of doves.
The dovecote has been empty for some years.
You might conduct nature classes.
Diana said you were an expert on birds.
She exaggerates.
And do you like your house?
Have I furnished it nicely?
Very much, thank you.
St John!
Miss Elliot approved of my arrangements.
Why should she not?
Come along, girls, home.
I have just remembered that now Diana and Mary have left... you must be so lonely.
Please, come home with me and see Papa.
Mr Rivers?
Can I speak with you a moment?
It is a very graceful and correct drawing.
Correct?
That word is a little lacking in passion, isn't it?
I mean, for someone who loves Miss Oliver as you do...
Would it comfort you, when you're in Madagascar or the Cape?
Or would the sight of her distress you?
You are very direct, Miss Elliot.
You must know me well enough to know I mean no mischief or disrespect.
She likes you, I am sure.
And so does her father.
She's a sweet girl, a little lacking in reserve, but you have more than enough for both of you, surely.
Why do you not marry her?
Why do you resist her?
DOES she like me?
She is always talking of you.
There is no other subject she is more interested in.
It's very pleasant to talk like this.
You may go on for another quarter of an hour.
Well, what's the use of that?
When you are only planning an even crueller way to resist her.
St John, you tremble when she comes into the room!
You don't understand!
I love Rosamond Oliver wildly.
More intensely than I will ever love anyone again.
So why not marry her?
Because I know she would not make me a good wife.
We would have a lifetime's regret.
Can you see Rosamond as a sufferer?
A missionary's wife?
No!
You cannot!
You need not be a missionary.
You may do God's work here.
I will not give up my life's ambition.
It's dearer to me than anything.
And Miss Oliver...
Are her feelings nothing to you?
She is surrounded by suitors.
She will forget me and marry someone who can make her far happier than I could.
No, Jane!
You do not know me.
I do tremble at the sight of Rosamond, but it repulses me.
It has nothing to do with me.
My skin may burn with fever but, in my heart, I am a cold man.
Don't!
You have the chance to love someone who loves you with all her soul.
Not many people are that lucky.
You may never find that again.
You are an enterprising young woman, Miss Elliot.
An unusual specimen.
You've made a good start.
I look forward to your career with interest.
I must leave Thornfield, Mr Rochester.
Now... ..do you mean that?
I do.
And now?
What do you say now?
You cannot leave me.
You cannot leave me, confess it.
I will...
I will leave you.
How can this flesh be so soft and yielding... ..and yet your heart be like an iron fist?
There is a place I know.
A villa in the Mediterranean.
It is far from anywhere.
Come and live with me there.
No, Jane...
Jane...
Jane...
Listen to me.
Listen to me.
We would live as brother and sister.
We would have our separate chambers, come together in the afternoons, for tea, or to play bowls...
Something sedate and traditional.
I give you my word... ..I wouldn't touch you.
Maybe a chaste peck on the cheek on birthdays... ..but I wouldn't tempt you into a life of sin, Jane.
I wouldn't do that.
I must rest now.
Yes.
Yes, you must rest.
'We will talk in the morning.
'Yes.
In the morning.
'You will think about the villa?
'We'll talk in the morning.'
Whoa, boys!
Whoa, whoa!
Walk on.
SHE SOBS
Girls, this is a butterfly.
Now pass that round.
Can you tell me how a caterpillar turns into a beautiful butterfly?
CHILDREN SHOUT OUT
SCHOOL BELL RINGS OUT
ALL:
Good afternoon, Miss Elliot.
Is everything all right?
Yes, of course.
You look very well.
You have performed wonders in this...
colourful universe.
You have given it discipline and individuality.
I wish Diana or Mary could come home to live with you.
You're reckless with your health.
I am well enough.
Oh, forgive me.
One of the girls saw Miss Oliver in her wedding dress and the others begged me to imagine a painting for them.
I told you she would forget about me.
You must allow me to be right sometimes.
Mr Rivers, what are you doing here?
I have often wondered where you got that forthright quality.
I've come to have a little talk with you.
Or rather, I have a story to share with you.
Just over 20 years ago, a poor curate fell in love with a rich man's daughter.
They married, and she was cut off from her family entirely.
Within two years they were both dead.
They left a daughter.
She was cast out onto the very cold charity of an aunt by marriage...
Now we come to details.
..a Mrs Reed of Gateshead, who kept the orphan ten years and then sent her to one Lowood School.
I calculate she would have been approximately your age.
It seems she did very well, with qualities very similar to your own.
And another coincidence - she rose to be a teacher.
She left Lowood to become a governess to the ward of a Mr Rochester.
Mr Rivers...
I know nothing of this Mr Rochester's character, but I do know that he offered marriage to this young woman, but, at the altar, she discovered he had a wife still living.
A lunatic.
For another quite different reason, one Mr Briggs, a solicitor, was searching for this young lady, but by then she had disappeared, was never seen again.
Is that not very strange?
Since you appear to know so much, tell me this.
Mr Rochester - how is he?
Where is he?
I know nothing of him.
But you said they were looking for me.
Did they write to Thornfield?
Yes, of course.
But received no reply.
He must have been a bad man.
You do not know him.
Very well.
But maybe you should ask me how I come to know your story.
What inspired our Mr Briggs to look for you and to write to me.
As you know, I travelled to Derbyshire a few days ago.
I had dinner with a family who had a housekeeper who was related in some distant way to a Mrs Alice Fairfax.
Now she provided me with such an exact description of the mysterious Jane Eyre to relieve me of any doubt.
Did they tell you anything of Mr Rochester?
Mr Briggs was not interested in him.
Don't you want to know why he was interested in you?
What did he want?
Simply to tell you that your uncle had died and had left you all his property and fortune.
Oh...
I am sorry.
Sorry?
For £20,000?
I am sorry my uncle is dead.
I might have wished to have seen him one day.
Wait.
Wait!
Why would you ever know about this Mr Briggs and his search for me?
Why would he write to you?
There is more, but you've had too much surprise.
I will tell you tomorrow.
You will tell me now.
He wrote to me because your uncle was also my uncle.
I am your cousin.
Your half-cousin, that is.
Y-Your mother was my father's sister?
We are half-cousins?
Oh!
You are a strange young woman.
I tell you you've inherited a fortune and you are very serious.
I tell you something of little importance and you dance with excitement!
You have two sisters!
A mere half-cousin may be of no importance to you, but to me...
I have no-one.
I have never had anyone.
You must go.
Write to Diana and Mary and tell them to come home immediately.
But why?
Because we are rich!
YOU are rich, Jane.
We may do anything we like.
We may live as we choose.
Write to them tomorrow!
Hurry, Hannah.
We must light the fires before they arrive.
She wants fires in every room!
In places where they never were!
What's the use of £5,000 if you can't light a few fires at Christmas?
£20,000.
St John, I will not hear another word.
We have been over it again and again.
Our uncle left a nephew and three nieces, we must all profit from his will equally.
Jane, you have never had money.
You do not know what use you may put it to.
And you have never been without family.
I will have a brother and sisters, and a home.
I will be brother to you whether you share the money our uncle left you - you and only you - or not.
Leaving you with nothing, unable to realise your dreams, and me with a fortune?
I know enough about money to realise that will not make me happy.
What of the future?
If you should marry?
I'll never marry.
They're coming!
Hello.
Oh, miss!
Oh...
Was ist das?
Das ist ein Schuh.
Sehr gut.
Was ist das?
Das ist ein Handschuh.
You are enjoying your German lessons?
Yes, it is easier than French.
I want you to start learning a new language.
We will begin tomorrow.
Go with you?
To the Cape?
To share my missionary work.
I've been watching you for over a year now, and I am convinced you are equal to the task.
Have you never asked yourself why God led you here?
On that evening, at the very moment you were ready to die, he led me through all this wilderness to find you.
You have always felt you must travel the world.
Jane, it is your destiny!
He HAS asked you, hasn't he?
I knew it!
St John has asked me to marry him.
Thank heavens!
Now he'll stay at home, safe with us.
He has asked me to marry him so that I might accompany him on his missionary work.
You will shrivel up and die.
You are both too pale to go to Africa!
You did not agree to go, Jane?
Jane, you cannot!
We sail in six weeks.
We must make marriage preparations.
Why can we not travel as brother and sister?
As equals?
That would be impossible.
St John, you do not love me.
Love is not an ingredient in this matter.
I fear you have not forgotten your old association, despite the harm he tried to do you.
I will never see any of them again.
But I owe a debt to my friends at Thornfield Hall.
In many ways, I started my life there.
I became Jane Eyre.
God made Jane Eyre!
You surely don't give this man Rochester any credit for that!
Of course not.
I have always known myself.
But he was the first to recognise me... ..and to love what he saw.
I will give you your answer, St John, soon.
Don't worry.
And if I go with you, it will be my decision.
You will have him to thank for that.
Jane...
Jane!
Jane!
Jane!
Jane...
Whoa-oa!
Walk on.
Aye, it's a pity, all right.
Did you know Thornfield Hall?
Aye, Miss.
I used to work for the late Mr Rochester in his stables.
He is dead?
I mean the present Mr Edward's father.
I'm guessing you're not from these parts, Miss, so you don't know what happened a while or so back.
It was almost a year ago now.
Mr Edwards had sent away most of the servants, so nobody knows exactly what happened.
Bertha!
Bertha, come down.
Take my hand.
Bertha, it's not safe up here.
Will you take my hand?
Come, we'll go down together.
Will you take my hand?
Bertha, come down!
Bertha!
No!
BIRD CRIES
TWIG BREAKS
Who's there?
Dammit.
Where are my candles?
Do you think because I'm blind I don't need them?
GLASS TINKLES
DOG BARKS
What's the matter now?
Has Pilot gone mad like the rest of us?
Well, man?
What's the matter?
George?
That is you, isn't it?
George is in the kitchen, sir.
Who is that?
Pilot knows me, sir.
These are Jane Eyre's fingers.
I'd know them anywhere.
It is Jane.
It is me, sir.
I'm come back.
You are real?
I dream of you often, and in the morning, you're gone.
You always were a witch.
Does that seem real?
You always did torment me.
I am very real, sir.
I am an independent woman.
My uncle died and left me £20,000, but I gave most of it away.
No, I could never have dreamt such detail.
You must stay with me?
I will stay with you as long as I live.
Unless you would prefer I go.
No, no.
Stay!
You shall stay.
It's a ghastly sight, isn't it, Jane?
I knew if you ever saw me again, you would be revolted by me.
I am sorry for this.
And this.
But the worst of it is... one's in danger of spoiling you too much.
When do you have supper?
I never take supper.
Well, you shall tonight, for I am very hungry.
Have you a pocket comb about you, sir?
What for?
I need to comb out this shaggy black mane.
I find you quite alarming, when this close.
And you accuse me of being supernatural.
Am I hideous, Jane?
Very, sir.
You always were, you know!
Ha-ha!
You haven't lost your wickedness, wherever you've been.
Yet I have been staying with good people, far better than you.
A hundred times better!
Altogether more refined and exalted than you will ever be!
Who the devil have you been with?
There.
You are decent, at least.
I will tell you about them tomorrow.
I have been travelling for days and I'm tired.
Goodnight.
Jane...
Were there only ladies at the house where you were?
The grass is soft and mossy in that little patch.
And the blackbird's wing is like coal with an emerald sheen.
So this St John person you have been mentioning so often... what of him?
Well...
He is tall... with blue eyes and a...
Grecian profile.
He's handsome, then.
Compared to me.
He's much more handsome than you!
And he's a far better Christian, of course, than you ever were...
I thanked God last night, for your sudden reappearance.
The other night, I cried out to him in my despair.
I called your name, too.
What about his brain, this Rivers fellow?
Find yourself getting bored when he speaks?
He doesn't say very much, but what he says is to the point.
His brain is first rate.
Did he study much?
Taught you things?
Oh, yes.
He taught me languages.
All right.
Why did he do that?
He wanted me to go with him to Africa.
He wanted you to marry him?
He asked me to marry him.
You're lying!
You've made this up to torment me.
He asked me more than once.
Well, then, I think you might take yourself off and go elsewhere!
Why are you still here?
You've assured yourself that I am still living.
Well, still living a tenth of a life.
You...heiress!
Well, if you want me to go.
No!
I'll pack my bags.
No...
No.
Humour a foolish old ranter for a little bit longer before you go.
St John does not love me.
I do not love him.
He's good.
Great, even.
But severe.
Cold as an iceberg.
He's heartless?
Oh, worse than that.
He has a heart.
I-I have seen it overflowing with passion, but he just keeps it buried in stone with a tenacious willpower.
He is much more frightening than you.
Hmm.
It's turned chilly.
We've been sitting here too long.
No, I want to stay out here.
You can go on in, if you wish.
The night I left...
The night I left, you told me of a villa you own in the Mediterranean... ..where we might go for refuge and live as brother and sister.
I remember.
Jane.
Jane, are you still there?
I am here, sir.
Jane, that villa I mentioned... the, uh...
..separate bedrooms... the peck on the cheek on birthdays, that sort of thing...
Yes?
Well, that plan doesn't strike me as so attractive as it once did.
You do not want to be friends?
Jane, would you be so good as to come back here and sit beside me?
Jane, I want a wife.
I want a wife.
Not a nursemaid to look after me.
I want a wife... ..to share my bed every night.
All day, if we wish.
If I can't have that, I'd rather die.
We are not the platonic sort, Jane.
Can you see me?
Then hear this, Edward.
Your life is not yours to give up.
It is mine, all mine, and I forbid it.
No, George.
I told you You're not to work today.
You are part of the enterprise.
Sit down and don't move.
What's he doing?
Moving chairs.
Come on, everyone.
You must take your place.
INAUDIBLE
You must go directly behind us.
Grace...
Pilot, not on the chairs!
Right...
Stand there.
Where's the baby?
Jane, we're all ready.
Take your place beside me.
Coming!
Subtitles by Red Bee Media Ltd 2006
E-mail subtitling@bbc.co.uk
What's all this about you being a racist?
I don't think he found it offensive.
Don't talk to journalists, under any circumstances.
You're just going to drop in and say, "hello, goodbye" and run away again as per usual.
I'm staying with Dad.
Angela!
Angela, where are you?
I can help him beat this thing.
There's no reason he'd be bullied.
There's no reason I was bullied.
You must not lie.
He told his teacher I died in Iraq.
Stranger!
Stranger!
Ben!
I'm not called Ben.
WHISTLE BLOWS That was a foul.
I didn't dive!
SHOUTS OF ENCOURAGEMENT
Come on Ben, get up.
He didn't even touch you.
Get up!
Come on - it's a team game.
Ben!
You're Ben's dad.
Hi, I'm Rory's dad, Steve.
Hi, Pete.
Ben was round our place on Sunday.
He's quite a kid, isn't he?
Yeah, he's...quite a kid.
masterpiece theatre is made possible by the corporation for public broadcasting and by contributions to your pbs station from:
( Masterpiece theatre theme playing ) captioning sponsored by the corporation for public broadcasting and viewers like you
(insects chirping)
(animals howling) boy:
Where is the rat?
Girl:
She's behind the curtain, where she always hides.
(Gasps)
(grunts)
(boy grunts)
(cries out)
(breathing heavily)
(yelling) boy:
Mama!
Jane has knocked me down!
Woman:
Take her up to the red room immediately.
That child has the devil in her.
I've always said.
Jane:
No!
Not the red room!
No!
No!
Not the red room!
No...!
(Door slams shut)
(sobbing) don't come back, uncle reed.
Please don't come back.
Uncle reed, please don't come back.
Please.
(Panting) let me out!
Let me out!
Let me out...!
Let me out...!
Come along, john.
Yes, come on, john.
We haven't got all day.
Don't worry.
I won't shoot you.
Unless we don't like the painting, that is.
(Woman chuckles) he llll, ouldn'youube ithe e rtrai?
There's still plenty of room.
Jane eyre?
She's not part of the family.
It's no use looking at me like that, jane.
I have tried my hardest, but you made it impossible.
I tried to carry out my dear husband's wishes, but you have made it impossible.
You know you have.
You have deliberately made it impossible for me to love you.
Say something, unnatural child!
You have not tried very hard.
My uncle's dying wish was that you treat me as one of your children.
You have not tried to.
You dare to tell me... that is why he haunts the red room.
Because you disobeyed him.
And on the day you die, god will know who is telling the truth, whatever you or I say now.
(Door opens) come on, miss jane, you have a visitor.
You must look your best.
I have tried so very hard.
You cannot believe how hard I have tried, but there is the devil in the child.
What is your name, child?
Jane eyre, sir.
You know, jane eyre, whatappens to little children when they die?
They go to heaven.
And what happens to disobedient, deceitful girls when they die?
They go to hell.
So what must you do to avoid this terrible fate?
(Sighs)
I must take care to keep in good health and not to fall ill, sir.
Your aunt tells me that you are a deceitful child.
Is that true, jane eyre?
I am not a liar.
So do you say your aunt is a liar?
(Distant coughing)
(water dripping)
(sighs)
(bell ringing, jane gasps)
(bell rings)
(bell rings) ah, jane eyre.
How could I forget?
Step out here, jane.
Jane eyre, I'm sorry to have to tell you, is a liar.
The lesson of the day will be that lying is a sin, that all liars deserve to be shunned by their fellows.
Stand on that stool, jane.
You will stay there until midnight and you will not eat or drink, but bow to beg god's forgiveness for your sin.
I wish I could escape to one of these places.
Somewhere where it's warm.
I believe you will.
But you'll have to work hard.
We have to accept that we've been left here by our families to fend for ourselves.
If you take advantage of the education here, if you are not too rebellious, and if you are patient, then you will find your way out.
We will both work our hardest and pray that god spares us until we are grown up.
And then what do we do?
I think when we grow up, we have to be teachers.
How do we ever get out of here, helen?
We advertise.
(Girls sniffling, coughing)
(girls coughing)
(girls coughing)
(coughing) there you are.
(Coughing) you're very cold, jane.
Come on under my covers.
(Birds chirping)
(clattering) no.
No!
God can't have her!
(Sobbing):
He can't take her!
God has already taken her, jane.
You must be brave.
Helen?
Helen.
Helen!
(Sobbing):
Helen!
Helen!
(Bells ringing) girls, look how the sun casts shadows in the flowers.
If you want to re-create that, put down your charcoals.
Smudge the edges where the dark shadows are... come on, girls.
Hurry up, now.
Miss eyre.
There appears to be a letter for you, miss eyre.
Woman:
"If miss J.E. Is in a position to give satisfactory references
"as to character and competency,
"then we will be happy to engage her
"as a governess to miss adle varens, ward of mr.
Rochester of thornfield hall."
(Birds chirping) ah, there's thornfield hall now, miss.
(Bat squeaking)
(wood creaking)
(door slams)
(birds cawing) are you taking me to mrs.
Fairfax?
In there.
(Door creaking) why... it's miss eyre!
(Chuckles) at last!
(Chuckles) oh, we've been waiting for you for so long!
(Sighs)
I'm mrs.
Fairfax.
Welcome to thornfield.
My goodness, miss eyre.
How hungry you are.
You must have been traveling all day.
How long is it since you have sat beside the fire and eaten a hearty meal?
Oh, approximately eight years.
Oh, my goodness.
(Laughing) eight years.
(Laughing) hasn't sat by the fire for eight years.
Fairfax (laughing):
Eight years.
I'll tell the master that when he gets back from abroad.
That will amuse even him.
Oh, not that he's without humor, of course.
No, certainly not.
I remember he used to tell jokes as a child.
He keeps himself to himself.
But you needn't worry.
He's hardly ever at home-- always traveling.
(Sighs)
(birds chirping) miss eyre.
(Sighs) you are up early.
I hope you slept well.
Yes, thank you.
I was anxious to meet adle.
Ah, yes, well, you won't have to wait long.
Does she play up there?
Oh, goodness me, no.
No one lives up there.
Oh, I thought I saw someone at the window.
There's only grace poole there.
She does the laundry.
Adele:
Mrs. Fairfax.
Ah, I don't think miss adle can wait any longer.
(Singing in french) ah bonjour, bonjour.
Bonjour, mademoiselle jeanne.
I am so very heureuse to faire votre acquaintance.
Enchantée, adle.
Moi aussi j'etais impatiente de faire ta connaissance.
Oh, thank goodness you will be able to understand her.
(Adle continues singing in french) now you can tell me what she is singing.
Well...
I believe it is a romance.
Mmm.
Jane:
The woman is... declaring her love for her sweetheart.
Ah.
Merci, merci, merci.
I will dance another one.
Later, maybe.
But first, you will show me to our schoolroom.
(Birds chirping)
(water running)
(sheep bleating)
(dog barking)
(horse whinnying) whoa!
Christ!
(Horse whinnying)
(dog continues barking) quiet, pilot.
Damn it!
Are you injured, sir?
Get away from me... witch.
You've done enough damage.
I cannot think of leaving you until I see you are fit to mount your horse.
You should be at home yourself.
Where do you live?
At thornfield hall.
I can fetch help.
I will be a little while.
(Sighs)
(groaning)
(whinnying) do you think you can bring him over to me?
(Snorting)
(whinnying) come over here.
Come.
(Groaning) come here.
Come here.
Whoa.
Hold this.
(Groaning) thank you, miss... jane eyre, sir.
Well, that's what happens when you bewitch a man's horse, miss eyre:
A lot of pain and cursing.
I did not bewitch your horse, sir.
I was waiting for you to go past.
You were hovering.
Casting spells.
Now get off back to thornfield hall if that is indeed where you live.
I do.
But I will post my letter first.
Before I return.
Don't be late back... miss jane eyre.
(Tongue clicking)
(dog barking)
(thundering) ah, miss eyre.
There you are.
What do you think?
The master is back.
Mr. Rochester?
Not a word about his return, as usual, and he had an accident on the road.
The doctor is with him in the drawing room now.
Adele:
Look!
Adle, come away.
Time for bed.
Mr. Rochester will see you tomorrow.
(Birds chirping)
(knocking) miss eyre.
Make yourself ready.
Master has finished his business for the day and wishes to see you.
Me?
Yes.
Oh, no, no, no, no.
You must change.
(Clearing throat):
Hmm.
This will have to do.
(Clock chiming) this will have to do.
Ah, miss eyre.
Peut-tre vous avez une bote pour mademoiselle eyre, monsieur rochester?
A bote for miss eyre?
Does miss eyre require a present?
Excuse me, sir?
Does the governess expect me to have brought her a present back from my travels overseas?
No, sir.
What are you doing standing over there where I can't see you?
Where would you like me to stand, sir?
Here.
Sit.
Are you fond of presents, miss eyre?
I hardly know, sir.
I have little experience of them.
Never had a present?
I believe they are generally thought pleasant things, sir.
Hmm.
But to this frivolous little... doll... this true daughter of paris, they are the stuff of life.
Aren't they, my little... the thought of presents makes her live and breathe.
Monsieur rochester?
Ah, ma bote!
Merci!
Merci!
Merci!
Merci!
Merci!
Quiet, while I talk to miss eyre.
Where are you from?
Lowood institution, sir.
How long were you there?
Jane:
Eight years.
I'm amazed you survived.
You're so small.
Didn't they feed you?
No... sir.
And how do you find yourself here and not still there?
I advertised, sir.
(Snickers) of course you did.
What of your family?
I have none, sir.
None whatsoever?
Friends?
None, sir.
None at all?
I had a friend once, but she died a long time ago, sir.
You're lucky, miss eyre.
If you do not love another living soul, then you'll never be disappointed.
Yes, sir.
Adle tells me that you play the piano brilliantly.
I play a little, sir.
Of course, a little... that's what they all say.
Go over there and play.
(Adle chatting to herself)
(jane playing lighthearted tune) enough!
Yes, you're right.
You do play a little.
These yours?
Yes, sir.
These are... these are interesting.
Are the ideas all yours?
Yes, sir.
Were you happy when you painted these?
I was fully occupied.
I was not unhappy.
What do you think of me, monsieur?
Do you think i look beautiful?
Shall I dance for you?
Miss eyre.
What are you thinking of?
It's very late.
Adle should be in bed.
And my foot hurts like the blazes.
Good night, sir.
So... what did you think of master?
He is very changeable.
Yes.
But he has... he has had disappointments in his life.
I hope you will forgive his rough and ready ways.
You will not leave?
I've grown used to you.
I hope he won't scare you away.
I'm not scared of rough manners.
He will be gone soon.
He never stays for more than a few days at a time.
Woman:
Afternoon, miss.
(Door opening) miss eyre.
Come here.
Sit.
Not you, pilot.
Miss eyre, excuse me, I'm, uh... used to giving orders and having them obeyed.
Sit, if you please.
I beg your pardon, sir.
I did not ask your permission to read the books.
Permission?
To read the books?
You're a thinking, intelligent woman, aren't you?
Why ever would you need to ask permission?
Who else is to read them?
Adle?
The venerable fairfax?
I'd more likely find pilot poring over the flora and fauna of the south american flatlands.
So, anyway.
Talk.
Talk, sir?
Yes, talk... if you please.
See how I'M...
I'm learning to be polite.
I had a tedious day of mortgages and share prices and I would like to be entertained.
Entertained, sir?
Miss eyre, can we proceed?
When I'M... tired i tend to dwell on my darker thoughts.
I would like to entertain you, sir.
I'm not sure what would interest you.
A smile?
A very small one.
The mere glimpse of a smile at last!
Tell me your thoughts,
I command you.
I was just thinking, sir, it'S... not many employers would ask the opinion of someone they pay
30 a year to.
I pay you a salary, do I?
Well, of course I do.
Well, then I should have my money's worth, then.
Oh...
I can see there's another problem.
Out with it.
You haven't actually paid me anything yet, sir.
Ah... mercenary girl!
Fetch me my keys now!
You want my money in your hand before you will amuse me?
Huh?
No, sir.
That will not be necessary, sir.
Maybe you could ask me questions, sir?
Uh, have you traveled, miss eyre?
No, sir.
All young people wish to travel.
Even if they find kindness and food and a fire, they wish to be gone.
I've traveled all over the world, miss eyre.
And it's very overrated.
Yes, sir.
When I was a young man,
I was your equal.
I had a clear conscience.
Unpolluted by sin.
I took the wrong path.
It wasn't my fault that I took it, but...
I must bear the blame for continuing on it.
I think you may have a little of the witch about you.
Well, you bewitched my horse.
You sit there patiently, and would draw out secrets of my past.
I do not wish to pry, sir.
I know, jane.
Do you think me handsome, jane?
No, sir.
(Laughing) look carefully.
If I were to tell you that I'm worth 20,000... surely the light from the fire would soften my features.
Do I not seem to you now the very model of a fashionable man?
I do not think there's anything in science that will allow that, sir.
I spoke hastily, sir.
I did not mean that I find you repellent.
What I meant is that it is the character inside that determines a person.
Not the outer shell.
Take care, jane.
Don't look too closely inside of me.
You might not find anything within at all beautiful.
And then where would we be?
(Talking indistinctly) is that grace poole?
Hmm.
Does she live alone in the north tower?
North tower catches the wind.
I don't know why.(Door opens an) it makes me shiver just to think of it.
(Birds chirping) rochester:
Miss eyre.
You're required.
This way.
Hurry up!
Mrs. Fairfax:
Oh, goodness, miss eyre.
The master has taken it into his head to give adle a biology lesson.
And we all have to hunt beetles.
Poor sophie can't understand a word he says, and neither can I, really.
Adele:
Monsieur rochester, we are bored with looking at the english water beetles.
They are not beautiful like the ones in your study.
Can I go with you, monsieur rochester, when you set off on your travels once more?
I will always wear my best dress and everyone will think I'm pretty.
Rochester:
Yes, but if they see you for the shallow little creature that you are, no more substance than one of those meringues over there, well... then they will find you "disgusting,"
my little parisienne.
They will find me disgusting.
You are mistaken, adle, if you do not think to find interesting creatures here in england.
There's a bird.
It's A... it's a quite nondescript grey color, and it's accustomed not to moving too quickly, not to draw attention to itself for fear of being beaten.
It wishes it could be in a cage.
But sooner or later, slowly... day by day, its wings grow very strong, and if you were to look very closely, you would see brilliant scarlet feathers hidden under its drab wings, until one day,
it has grown so confident that it flaps its red wings and flies straight upwards into the sky, and those lucky enough to catch it in flight think that they have caught a glimpse... of a firebird.
And then?
Well, then it flies away somewhere warm and never comes back.
I don't think I believe in this bird.
Well, it's true.
There's one here at thornfield in the gardens if you look very hard.
Madame fairfax, monsieur rochester said the ladies will say I'm disgusting.
Mrs. Fairfax:
Oh, that's nice, dear.
Mmm, what is there to eat?
I'd like a meringue, please.
Come, miss eyre.
You have something to say?
You should not tease her.
She's just a child.
She is.
But she's also self-obsessed, thoughtless, vain.
You've made great headway with her even in the past few months, but look at her.
Just like her mother.
I saw what the mother became.
That is no reason to despise the child.
Do you really think...?
If the blood is tainted, won't I be failing in my duty to her to let her remain like this?
And not to try my best to correct her ways?
She does not deserve to be ridiculed or despised.
She's a child.
She deserves that you should trust her.
(Adle humming) that she will grow and learn and... miss eyre?
No, thank you, adle.
We shall see, miss eyre.
Come on.
Jane:
Adle, don't run.
What's the matter with sophie?
She doesn't like les malades, the mad people.
(Knocking)
(scratching at door)
(scratching continues)
(door creaking) no, pilot.
No, you don't belong here.
Go back to your master.
Rochester (calling):
Pilot.
Come here.
Rochester:
Jane?
Come and look at this fellow.
There.
Look at his wings.
I've seen one like this in the west indies, but never here.
That will teach me to tease adle.
Come.
Sit down with me for a while.
Sit.
As it is now your job as well as mine to bring adle up correctly,
I'm going to tell you about her.
About where she came from and... who she belongs to.
Maybe you'll understand.
You do not need to tell me anything.
I know.
You understand too much without me saying anything.
It's the witch in you.
You have to imagine a young man-- well, one who is still... youngish and who has made a mistake.
Not his fault, but... this mistake and the darkness that follows it has set him helter-skelter around the world in search of beauty to help ease his soul.
And he does find beauty... or rather beauty finds him because... as you will guess, this is a very rich youngish man.
That look... no judgment... no pity.
That look could prise secrets from the blackest souls.
Where were we?
Beauty finding a youngish man.
Ah, yes.
So, on our whirlwind tour, we alight in paris.
Now, jane... imagine-
- I know it's difficult-- imagine a suite of rooms in a particularly gorgeous parisian hotel.
It is upholstered with velvets and furs.
Everything is... sensuous to the touch, the best that this youngish man's money can buy.
It is a summer evening... and there is perfume in the air.
The young man breathes in the scent of his lover... musk and amber.
Her name is céline varens.
She is very beautiful.
She is a dancer... an exotic bird.
She dotes on him... and he is passionately in love with her.
He has had a fortunate night gambling and he waits for her now, in anticipation of the dark, intoxicating hours ahead.
Are you still with me, jane?
Jane:
I am here, sir.
(Woman laughs lightly) at last he hears the sound of her return.
Only a few more seconds' wait until he sees her.
An eternity passes.
(Woman speaking french) at that very moment, as I stood in the shadows, the green snake of jealousy bit into my heart.
Officer:
Where is your beast of an englishman tonight?
Gambling.
Someone else can look at his unpleasant face.
He is very... presentable... really, for an englishman.
20,000 make him very presentable.
She wasn't as clear-sighted as you are, jane.
You find me unattractive despite my wealth.
You do not know what it is to feel jealousy, do you, jane?
You see, you have no idea what it is to love.
You have no idea what it is to feel the very beat of someone's heart within one's breast.
No, sir.
Do you still love her, sir?
Who?
Céline.
I mean, miss varens.
Good god, no.
No, I threw her out of the hotel room and I shot him.
In the shoulder or some insignificant place.
No, when I saw what a wretched fool she meddled with,
I knew she could never love me.
That's obvious, surely.
And adle?
She left her in the hotel when she ran off.
Céline claimed that I was the father but a fairly elementary study of biology would prove that impossible.
Tell me, jane... is there anything about me that remotely resembles adle?
Look at me carefully.
No, sir.
She left her in the hotel.
A parcel with a label on with my name.
What was I to do?
Leave her there to starve?
I provided for her in france.
Then a few months ago, it was necessary to bring her here.
She was not my responsibility... but I took her on just the same.
So... as her guardian and your master, what do you think of my behavior, miss eyre?
Did I do the right thing?
It was the right thing to do, wasn't it, jane?
Yes, sir.
(Rustling)
(softly):
Go away, pilot.
Pilot, go back to your master.
(Soft footsteps running)
(faint laughter) who is there?
(Footsteps falling)
(footsteps falling)
(door closes)
(knocks softly) hello?
Hello?
Sir!
Mr. Rochester!
Sir, wake up!
For heaven's sake, sir, wake up!
(Grunting)
(panting) jane, are you hurt?
No, sir.
But you were nearly killed in your bed.
What happened here?
I don't know.
I heard a noise and I followed it here.
Shall I fetch mrs.
Fairfax?
No, what can she do?
I must fetch someone to help, sir.
No!
Sit, jane, quietly.
Wait here for me.
Can you do that?
It's settled.
It's as I thought.
How so?
I forgot.
Did you say you saw anything?
Anyone?
No, I heard a laugh.
I think it was grace poole, sir.
Of course... you're right.
She is a singular sort of person.
She is often careless and accidents happen.
We will say no more about it.
Go back to your room.
Servants will be up in an hour or two.
What, are you going without saying good night?
Jane, you just... you just saved my life.
You might at least shake hands.
I knew you'd do me good, the first time I met you.
I knew I wouldn't mind being in your debt.
There is no debt, sir.
There is no debt, sir.
I'm glad I happened to be awake.
She saves me from an inferno oh.
And she's glad she
"happened" to be awake.
Still she tries to go.
I am cold, sir.
Of course.
Of course.
And we agreed that you'd never be cold again.
Well, if you must leave me.
You must.
(Sighs) it's a mystery how he wasn't burnt in his bed!
He will read with a candle burning.
I told him how dangerous that is.
Morning, dear.
Morning.
Morning, miss.
Morning, grace.
What has happened here?
Master was reading in bed again.
Fortunately, he woke up and no real harm was done.
That's very strange.
Did no one hear anything?
Mrs. Fairfax said she heard nothing.
She sleeps heavily.
You're young, miss.
Maybe you heard a noise?
I did.
At first I thought it was pilot, but pilot cannot laugh.
And I'm certain i heard a laugh.
A strange one.
Hardly likely the master would laugh, not when he was in such danger.
I think you must have been dreaming, miss.
I most certainly was not dreaming.
Did you open your door?
Did you see who or what it was you thought laughed?
On the contrary.
I locked my door.
Very wise.
It would be wise to lock your door the moment you go to bed.
Who knows what might happen?
Mrs. Fairfax:
You' not eating again.
You ate very little at lunchtime, miss eyre;
I hope you're not sickening.
You're very flushed.
I am very well, thank you.
Never better.
Oh, it's a fine night.
On the whole a very good day for mr.
Rochester's journey.
Journey?
I didn't know he was going out.
Oh, he set off right after breakfast.
He's gone to mr.
Eshton's place, over the other side of millcote.
He'll likely stay a fortnight or more at the house party.
A fortnight?
Yes, I told you, he's hardly ever here w days.
And you can't say he hasn't been starved of company these last two months.
Oh, I mean fine and proper company, of course, my dear.
When these fashionable, beautiful people get together, they're in no hurry to separate.
Single gentlemen are especially sought after.
And mr.
Rochester is so talented in society.
The ladies are very fond of him.
He's a very fine singer.
He sings?
Oh, yes.
He and miss blanche ingram sang at a christmas party here some years ago.
This miss ingram... is she very beautiful?
Oh, good lord, yes.
She has very fine features.
Brilliant eyes, very striking.
Well, she's the belle of the county.
She's not yet married?
No, the ingrams' estate will pass to the son.
The daughters have only small fortunes.
But if she is so very beautiful, she must have wealthy suitors.
Mr. Rochester, for example.
Well, yes, but there is a considerable difference in age.
What of it?
There are more unequal matches made every day.
Why, yes, dear, but I scarcely think mr.
Rochester would think that a good idea.
You've eaten nothing again.
I'm sure you're sickening for something and the master's away.
I must decide whether to send for dr.
Crawford.
I am perfectly well-- as I said... never better.
Grace:
Are you sure you weren't mistaken, miss eyre?
You were mistaken, jane eyre.
Mrs. Fairfax:
Miss blanche ingram is the most beautiful and accomplished young lady.
She is right and proper company for the master.
(Woman laughing)
(giggling):
Whoo!
Whoo.
Who are you writing to, miss eyre?
I thought you had no one to write to.
I don'T.
We are your family now.
I wish mr.
Rochester would come back.
I am so bored.
I wouldn't wish for long.
Sometimes he leaves us for many a month, especially in the cold winter season.
Once he left us for a whole year and a quarter.
Oh, that was a very long winter.
I can remember it well.
(Humming) adele:
Miss eyre, are you sick?
Your cheeks are pink.
It is very hot in here this morning, adle.
Ah.
Oh!
From the master.
Oh.
(Clears throat) mmm, well.
Well.
Mr. Rochester is not likely to return home soon?
Mmm.
He's returning, all right.
Leah!
Come quickly!
(Bell ringing) mrs.
Fairfax:
Can you open all the rooms?
All the windows, the rooms look a bit... logs over here, please.
In the grate, not upstairs, thank you.
Ah, mr.
Roberts.
Would you be so kind as to joint the meat for me?
Thank you.
The silver needs a thorough polishing, please.
Thank you, polly, in the scullery.
Thank you.
A thorough polishing.
Good, your flowers, good.
But the flowers are so pretty.
Let me help you.
Good.
Nice display in the center there.
Thank you.
Ah, thank goodness!
Now I wanted an extra four pounds of baking apples and plums.
Can you check for me that they are here?
I would prefer for you to use goose eggs.
If you come with me, I'll show you where we keep them.
Are you sure all this is necessary?
Oh, yes, I think so.
Well, we're not sure how many house guests he's bringing, but we must be sure to have more than enough to feed them.
Oh, dear, I've never done this before.
But the master's never been home long enough to have a party.
Goose eggs.
Um... servant:
Mrs. Poole gets good wages, I suppose?
Yeah, about five times what I get, and master's not stingy.
I wonder... (horse galloping)
I'll race you over to the river.
Oh, there they are at last.
(Adle gasps) oh, my dear, how lovely to see you.
I must go down and greet them.
Hmm.
That is mademoiselle ingram.
She has a french name-- blanche.
And that is her sister.
I think it must be.
And that's lady ingram, her mother.
(Both giggle)
(laughing) master says you may join the ladies this evening.
Oh, I must start to prepare at once.
I must wear absolutely my best dress.
Adle, you think too much of your appearance.
It's the person inside you that matters.
No one will love you for how pretty you are.
I do not think that can be right, miss eyre.
You must take her into the drawing room before the guests finish dinner.
Oh, no, surely I don't have to be there.
Adle can go with sophie.
Master's orders.
He said you must be there or he will come to your room and bring you down himself.
(Exhales)
(gasps)
(gasps, giggles) des bon-bons.
Adle.
Come on.
(Gasps) des amandes!
Adle, come on.
(Whispering)
(laughs)
(people talking in distance) man:
You look alike.
You move alike.
You sound alike.
You are, if i may say so, a particularly fine example of the split female embryo.
I hope you'll permit me to ask you some questions.
Of course.
Everybody is... yes, that's right.
Everyone is interested in us.
Rochester:
Lady ingram.
You don't escape our argument so easily.
Rochester, I don't understand you.
If some people are rich and some poor, then that is god's will.
(Laughing):
So be it.
I am satisfied.
Sit down!
S'il vous plait, s'il vous plait.
Shh.
Man:
And it's a scientific fact... adle.
Woman:
All this nonsense about... adle, sit down, adle.
Can't we talk about something else?
There are children and servants present.
Oh, good lord.
(Scoffs) what on earth is this?
It is mr.
Rochester's ward,
I suppose.
The little french girl.
Blanche:
Mr. Rochester,
I thought you were not fond of children.
I'm not.
Then what on earth made you take on that little doll?
Where did you pick her up?
I didn't pick her up.
She was left in my hands.
Well, you should send her to school where she belongs.
Our schools are expensive.
(Chuckles) but you have a governess, I see.
There, hiding behind the screen.
Now, that's expensive for you have to feed them both.
Woman:
What are you talking about now, rochester?
Oh, no.
We don't want mother getting started on governesses.
We're talking of governesses, lady ingram.
Oh, don't mention them.
I'm so glad that blanche and mary have no longer any need for them.
Governesses are a nuisance.
All of them.
If they're not eating you out of house and home, they're carrying on with the tutor or even worse-- making eyes at the master of the house.
Rochester:
Really?
You surprise me.
Blanche:
Mary, do you remember miss twisk or twitt or whatever she was called?
We pretended she was harboring a passion for bradstock.
It was your idea.
Yes, we were very naughty.
She was so boring, poor thing.
Mother had her leave instantly in case she should set us a bad moral example.
You cannot be too careful, rochester, with a young, impressionable mind in the house.
(Laughing)
(sighs) rochester:
How do you do, jane?
I am very well, sir.
Why did you not come up and speak to me?
I did not wish to disturb you.
You seemed engaged, sir.
It is a while since we've seen each other.
What have you been doing?
Nothing in particular.
Teaching adle, of course.
You look a good deal paler.
What's the matter?
Nothing at all, sir.
Then return to the drawing room.
I am tired, sir.
Mmm.
And a little depressed, I think.
What about?
Tell me.
I am not depressed.
I tell you that you are.
So depressed that you're almost... let me look at you.
You're about to cry.
Tell me, jane.
Why are you crying?
I am not crying.
Tonight you are excused, but I expect you to appear in the drawing room every evening after dinner.
Every evening, mind.
It is my wish.
Girl:
Where did I put it?
I'm sure I left it somewhere here.
Miss eyre.
Why are you not dressed for riding?
I do not ride, sir.
Well, then, you must learn.
Come, join us by the fire.
We will not be able to hunt today, I'm afraid, with the weather so changeable.
Or go on a walk.
And my book has gone missing again.
My book, you know, the beast within.
Oh, I wish you wouldn't, my dear.
How do you dare read those novels?
Oh, but it's very exciting.
It is about a man who commits a crime.
He spends the dark hours raging about like an animal, and then, in the morning, he goes about his business and no one suspects a thing.
Man:
Nonsense.
Man 2:
You don't think it possible that someone who seems perfectly serene and unspectacular from the outside could be capable of committing horrific crimes?
Certainly not a christian man.
Although I'm sure that mr.
Eshton has all sorts of new ideas about that.
For once,
I must admit ignorance.
The brain is a vast and wonderful landscape.
We've not even begun to navigate its mysteries.
We do not know why it malfunctions.
We are in the very infancy of its science.
Science again.
You make it all sound so very grand.
God gives people good blood and bad blood, and there is an end to it.
Blanche:
When mary and I were in paris, we went to see the savage boy-- the one who had lived all his life in the woods, who could only talk a little gibberish... if you could call it "talked."
That's what I'm talking about.
That child had bad blood.
You can clean it, dress it up, but you will never make it good.
You were born bad, jane eyre, and you will die bad.
Eshton:
Miss eyre, is it your opinion that children are born the way god intended them to be, that bad blood will always be bad blood, or can you discipline such a child?
Excuse me?
Lady ingram:
Of course you should.
That's common sense.
I think it wise that... (sighs) ...since we must live with the adult,
I think it prudent to treat a child as if they had feelings.
Really?
Feelings?
A child has no more feelings than... that dog over there.
I would have thought that if you... please, miss eyre... continue.
Mr. Eshton wishes to hear your opinion.
I think that all children, whether they are thought to be of good blood or bad blood, deserve to be given the chance to love... and to be loved.
I do not see the use of punishing a child with beatings and harsh words.
What's the use of punishment?
From a governess?
You must send that child off to school immediately, rochester.
All this talk of tainted blood is wearisome.
I know my blood's up.
You are the best horsewoman in the county.
Shall we ride?
Oh, regarde!
(Woman giggling) rochester:
Jane.
Where are you going?
I have to speak to mrs.
Fairfax.
She allows adle to eat too many sugary things.
Afterwards I'll join you in the drawing room.
You might even enjoy yourself.
We'll be playing games later.
Don't tell me you don't approve of games, jane.
What do you think of miss ingram, jane?
I suppose I must choose a bride, as all about me seem to wish it.
Is that what they're saying?
To preserve this great estate of mine, I must have an heir.
Is that what the gossip requires?
I know nothing of gossip, sir.
Well, then, jane, your honest opinion.
Do you think miss ingram a good choice?
Do you think I am in love with miss ingram, jane?
I know nothing of love, sir.
Don't be late, jane.
It won't be long before the games begin.
Shall we go?
Oh, now, there it is!
There is my book, the beast within.
Why, sitting there all the time.
No, but I'm sure i looked there this morning.
Maybe the ghost took it.
The ghost?
The ghost.
Sophie says it walks the corridors at night.
It eats the gateaux from the kitchen and it laughs in the dark.
(Thunder rumbling)
(twins scream) blanche:
A ghost at thornfield.
How exciting.
You never mentioned it.
She walks in the corridor with the painting of the mad people.
Sophie says she goes cold and shivers when... sophie is from marseilles, which means that she wears three or four outer garments, even in july.
Our english weather feeds her overactive french imagination.
Oh.
You disappoint me.
Maybe we could tell each other ghostly stories.
I'm in need of a little danger.
Ghost stories are not of interest.
How do you know if they're true?
But my dear blanche, if the ladies are interested,
I know a game, if you are not afraid of things that we might not be able to explain.
The supernatural.
The supernatural.
Eshton:
What are you up to, edward?
You're interested in experiments, aren't you?
Well, I hope you know what you're doing.
All:
L...
O...
V...
E.
Love.
Rochester:
Who's next?
Blanche... are you ready?
Of course I am.
All:
H...
E...
A...
R...
T.
Girl:
H-e-a-r-T.
Heart.
Oh, blanche, it means that you have given your heart to someone.
Do tell us, as if we didn't know.
All:
L...
E...
S...
S.
Girl:
Less heart.
What can that mean?
"Less heart."
"Heart less."
Oh, heartless!
Oh, dear blanche,
I'm sure it's made a mistake.
It must think you're someone else.
Blanche:
You were right, mr.
Eshton.
This is a silly game.
(Faint laughter)
I am rather tired.
Think I shall read in bed.
Be careful of your candle, my darling.
Morning.
Eshton:
You don't think it possible that someone who seems perfectly serene and unspectacular from the outside could hide a beast within them?
I'll be away all day on business.
I'm sure you'll be able to amuse yourselves.
Don't be too late.
I'll be back by sundown.
Don't misbehave now.
Pilot!
I think that gown miss blanche ingram has-- the bleu--
I think it the most beautiful dress I have ever seen.
(Galloping) it is mr.
Rochester!
He is back.
You said we could finish.
He's early.
Oh!
Who is this?
He is trs beau, mademoiselle, n'est-ce pas?
Sir george:
A foreigner, I think.
Although quite a nice chap.
Mason's the name.
Says he met rochester in the west indies.
I think the twins have taken a bit of a shine to him.
Speak up, man.
What's the matter?
It's an old gypsy lady, madam.
Come to tell fortunes.
She refuses to leave and with the master away... colonel dent:
Tell her to go or we'll set the dogs on her.
No, no, tell her to stay.
There are ladies present who wish to have their fortunes told.
But what would rochester say?
Well, he's not here, is he?
I am brave enough, if you aren'T.
Oh!
Oh!
Aw.
Oh.
Bonjour!
Oh.
Oh.
Now, where is your lover?
Bonjour, mon chéri.
Blanche.
What happened?
What did the gypsy lady say to you?
Rochester was right.
She talked absolute nonsense, nothing in it.
You can amuse yourselves with her if you want.
Yes!
George:
I'm sorry, miss.
Id she wouldn't leave until she had seen everyone and you are the only one who hasn't had her fortune told.
She would not leave until I had brought you here.
That's all right, george.
Don't worry.
I'll wait outside in case there's trouble.
No, george, you may go.
I am not frightened.
You're not afraid?
Of course not.
Do you wish me harm?
The others were afraid of my magic.
Of my dark arts.
Of what I knew of their worst thoughts and desires.
Surely you noticed that some who entered this room with confidence are now disappointed at what I revealed?
Do you not believe in hell and the supernatural, miss eyre?
I believe what I believe.
You are a very confident young woman for someone who has never loved, who has only had one true friend, who was snatched away... prematurely.
Where was it?
Lowood school.
There now!
I've impressed you.
These matters are not generally known, for sure.
But they are facts.
They are the truth.
You may have found them out by mortal means.
Well said, miss eyre.
I can see I am going to have to prove my powers... to see into your soul... to reveal a hidden secret that no one else could possibly know.
What were your thoughts, for instance, when you came to me this evening?
It is very pleasant company, is it not, such as you've never known, and after the long months here alone at thornfield with only the child and the housekeeper.
What do you think of them?
I do not think of them.
Of their opinions and their tastes.
I do not care for theirs any more than I'm sure they care for mine.
Is there no one in the company who you share feelings with?
What about the master of the house?
He is not here today.
He is soon to be married, is he not, to the beautiful blanche ingr?
I don't know.
I thought it was you that could predict the future.
Anyway...
I have paid you for my future, not mr.
Rochester'S.
Oh, mr.
Rochester is to be married.
I know that for sure.
Everyone does.
Oh...
I see that this news affects you.
You talk nonsense, old lady.
I shall leave you now and send in the next fool.
It is over.
What do you wish me to do?
What is it?
Who is there?
Show yourself immeately or I'll call a servant!
Jane:
(Giggling) thank you.
You have done welloday.You' givenene a al to .
(Snickering) now, jane, don't be too cross.
I am not angry.
I am surprised.
Surely you don't begrudge me this little diversion.
The old lady provided me with an afternoon's amusement, and our guests were given a mirror to hold up to themselves.
Not undeservedly, surely?
They are your guests, sir, not mine, but I believe you got that woman in to talk nonsense to me so that I might talk nonsense back.
And that was not fair, sir.
No, no, it was not fair.
But how else am I to find out what you think, jane?
But don't worry, you didn't talk nonsense, so all's well, isn't it?
And you are not angry with me?
I don't know.
I'll have to think about it.
But I expect I'll manage to forgive you eventually.
(Chuckles) aren't you curious to find out what my gypsy predicted for miss ingram?
I bet the drawing room's buzzing with excitement.
They have plenty to discuss, sir.
Even the stranger who arrived this morning.
What stranger?
His name is mason.
I believe he's visiting from overseas.
What is it, sir?
Oh, jane...
I wish I were on a desert island somewhere.
With only you for company.
Tell me.
If all those people in the drawing room, if they... cast me out and spat at me, what would you do?
Om y can I help you, sir?
I would do anything for you.
What if I asked you to do something for me that was wrong?
I know, I know.
I know the answer, jane.
You could not.
Thank you.
Jane... do you believe in redemption?
If you have sinned, you can be redeemed.
Eshton:
Do you mind if I ask some questions about your habits?
How about your clothes?
Did you come down this morning and find that you had dressed the same?
Yes.
Yes.
Mason!
My dear fellow, what a surprise!
How good to see you again.
(Laughter) woman:
Do they?
They do.
(Girl screaming)
(gasps)
(indistinct chatter) what was it?
Did you hear it?
Yes.
Really, I only go away for a day on business and you overexcite yourselves like children with your occult games and conversations.
But we all heard a cry.
Didn't we, lady lynn?
Yes.
Surely we all heard something?
Rochester:
Someone had a bad dream brought on by a combination of the visit from our gypsy friend and too much grouse at dinner.
Blanche:
Are you sure?
We are all safe?
I am sure.
Anyway, my amazon, what have you to fear from the night hours?
(Chuckling) it's bad enough having strange shrieking, never mind governesses creeping up on us.
She's pale as a ghost.
Well, my lady,
I shall escort you back to your room personally.
Come, everyone, back to bed.
(Chattering)
(knocking)
I'm ready.
Are you hurt, sir?
It's nothing.
Come.
We must be silent.
Are we going to the north tower?
Do you want to go back?
No, sir.
(Panting)
I forgot to ask:
Do you faint at the sight of blood?
I don't know.
Wait here.
Here.
(Door creaking open)
(door creaking) richard?
(Moans faintly) jane.
Come here.
You must press this hard on the wound.
(Gasps)
I am going now to get the doctor.
He'll have you good as new by morning.
(Whispering):
Richard... do not say anything of what has happened, or I will not be responsible.
Jane, I have to leave you here while I'm gone for an hour or so.
No conversation.
(Creaking)
(moans)
I could not stop... shh.
Be calm.
She has killed me.
(Thumping) you will not die.
I will not let you die.
(Birds chirping)
(labored breathing)
(footsteps approaching) sh-sh-she's done for me.
Rochester:
Nonsense, the doctor's here.
You're in no danger.
There are teeth marks here.
She sucked my blood.
She said she would drain my heart.
Rochester:
I warned you.
I told you not to do anything until I could be with you.
Hurry up, carter.
We need him out of here before sunrise.
Take care of him at your house.
I'll ride over in a day or two to see how he does.
Very well.
Edward... take care of her as tenderly as you can.
I'll do my best.
As I always have and always will.
Stay a while outside with me.
This house is a dungeon.
It's a prison.
It's a lovely morning.
After such a turbulent night, hey, jane?
Yes, sir.
Were you frightened?
I was afraid, sir.
(Men talking in distance) quietly, go in the back entrance.
Everything all right, miss?
What do you want?
Mrs. Fairfax asked me to tell you you have a visitor.
Oh, excuse me, miss.
It is you, miss jane.
Don't you recognize me?
Bessie!
Oh, look at you!
Miss eyre.
I always said jane eyre would grow up to be a fine, accomplished young lady.
Not quite a beauty, all told, but... a credit to us.
I'm glad not to be a discredit to you, bessie.
Oh, bessie, what's happened?
And I'm hoping you're not going to disappear once more on your travels.
I suppose you might like to travel yourself one day.
Does miss eyre need to speak to you?
Excuse me.
Well, jane?
Sir, I need to have a leave of absence for a week or two.
To see a sick lady who's asked for me.
What sick lady?
Her name is reed.
She is my uncle's wife.
Uncle?
You told me you had no family.
My aunt cast me off when I went to school.
Why?
Because I was poor.
And she did not like me.
And she sent you to lowood without so much as a word or a visit in nearly ten years?
So why does she suddenly wish to see you now?
Her son john is dead.
He ruined himself.
She is now struck down with this misfortune.
I'll only be gone two weeks, I hope.
Two weeks!
That's not possible.
And you have company, sir.
(Sighing) very well.
But promise me that you will not stay with this undeserving aunt more than a week.I cannot promi.
I cannot set a time on that.
Of course you will go.
How have I the power to stop you?
Well, you must have some money.
You can't travel without money.
I haven't given you any salary yet, remember?
How much have you, jane?
In all the world?
Five shillings, sir.
Here.
Take 50.
No, sir.
You only owe me 15.
I have no change.
I don't want change, jane.
You know that.
Take your wages.
You're right.
Better not give you all that.
You might stay away for three months.
Here.
There's ten.
Well, isn't that enough?
Yes, sir.
But you will still owe me five.
Then come back for it.
Sir...
I have to ask you something else, a matter of business.
You have as good as said you intend to be married.
Really?
That's been settled then, has it?
You've decided miss ingram is to be my bride.
Now I see it.
You're going to prevail upon this miserable family to find you a new situation.
Ungrateful girl, admit it!
No, sir.
I told you.
They do not like me, sir.
To offer such a service...
I shall advertise.
Devil you will!
(Quietly):
Advertise.
I wish I'd only offered you a sovereign, not ten whole pounds.
Give me back nine.
Jane, I have need of it.
No, sir.
I do not trust you.
Hmm.
So, jane... etiquette.
How do we say good-bye?
Teach me.
I'm, uh...
I'm not quite up to it.
You say, "farewell."
Or anything else we might prefer.
Farewell, mr.
Rochester, for the present.
And what must I say in return?
The same... if you like.
Then I will say...
"don't go, jane."
What will I do without your help?
Sir, you will not be in danger.
Blanche:
Rochester.
Edward.
Sir, please.
Go on.
(Sighing deeply) captioned by media access group at wgbh access.Wgbh.Org masterpiece theatre was made possible by the corporation for public broadcasting and by contributions to your pbs station from:
We are pbs.
Masterpiece theatre is made possible by the corporation for public broadcasting and by contributions to your pbs station from:
( Masterpiece theatre theme playing ) captioning sponsored by the corporation for public broadcasting and viewers like you
(frantic panting) girl:
No!
No!
Not the red room!
I've not been wicked!
(Hysterically ):
No!
Not the red room, no!
Don't take me to the red room!
John:
Jane eyre!
Eliza:
She's not part of the family.
Miss eyre!
You have not grown tall.
(Bell tinkling) how is mrs.
Reed?
Georgiana:
Mrs. Reed?
Oh, you mean mama.
She's extremely unwell.
I doubt you can see her tonight.
If you would just step upstairs and tell her I have come,
I would be much obliged to you.
She has asked for me to come.
I would not like to keep her waiting.
Who are you?
I'm jane eyre.
How are you, aunt?
You are not jane eyre.
I have had such trouble with that child.
She was mad-- a fiend.
I sent her away to lowood when the fever broke out and many died.
But she didn't die.
I wish she had.
(Labored breathing) why do you hate jane eyre so?
I hated her mother.
She was my husband's favorite sister.
When she died, he cried like a baby.
And he insisted on sending for the child-- sickly whining thing.
It wailed in its cradle all night long and reed doted on it, the fool.
Even in his last illness, he called for it rather than his own children.
(Labored breathing) where's john?
He always wants money.
He's a fine boy and he loves me, but I don't know where to get the money.
(Screaming):
Where's john?
Where's john?
(Sobbing) she knows well enough he's gone-- that's why she'll never leave this bed.
Where's john?
(Gasping)
(sobbing) bessie:
She doesn't mean it, miss jane, half of what she says.
It's all right, bessie,
I don't mind.
No, really I don'T.
You used to get upset.
More than upset.
But now you've grown into such a confident young woman.
Who could have known it?
I suppose you have friends now to confide in, so your troubles don't plague you so much.
That must be it.
Yes.
I do have a friend-- someone who, when I talk to them, they understand everything I say.
They would laugh if I told them about mrs.
Reed.
They are so in tune with me.
They know my thoughts before I even think them, certainly before I put them into words.
I always said you'd do well.
I'm pleased that, when you leave here, you can go home to such people.
My friend is to be married soon, it's almost certain.
But she will not live far away.
Maybe you can visit?
Yes, of course, that may be so.
(Laughter) lady ingram:
Eshton here says that that swallow there heads south at the merest shiver of winter travels all the way to the most southern tip of africa and then comes back here, to this precise spot.
And I say, how do you know?
(Chuckling) they all look exactly the same.
And why would they come back here and not stay where it is warm?
It is in their nature.
It is what they must do.
They must come home.
What do you think, edward?
(Girl humming) shouldn't you be in bed?
No, madame.
Oh, that necklace is so beautiful.
I wouldn't have thought i'd say it-- it's a pity the governess isn't here.
I expect you're glad she stays away so long.
Oh, no, I wish she would come back.
I like her best of all, except for monsieur rochester, of course.
When monsieur rochester sees fit to make a certain announcement, that young lady will feel the benefits of a good english boarding school.
(Laughter) is there a problem?
Not at all.
I was just taking a stroll through the hall before dinner.
And did you like what you saw?
Naturally.
It could, of course, do with a little management, a few new furnishings here and there.
And you think you'd like to, um... take all this on?
What do you really want, blanche?
If only aunt gibson would invite me up to town.
It would be so much better, if only I could get away for a month or two, until it was all over.
Georgiana, if there were ever a more vain, absurd animal than you.
You are completely useless, and in being useless, seek only to cling onto others.
If no one can be found to burden themselves with such a fat, weak, puffy, useless thing, you complain that you are ill-treated and neglected.
You must be flattered, you must be admired, or you languish and die away.
Well...!
Everyone knows you are the most selfish, heartless creature in existence.
I know very well your spite and your hatred.
You ruined my chances with lord vere.
You could not bear the thought that I would be raised into circles where you dare not show your face.
Let me give you this advice:
Tis the first and last i shall offer you.
If you divide each day into sections and perform some useful task to timetable, the day will be over before you know it.
You'll be dependent upon your own senses and not have to be flattered and admired in order to know that you exist.
(Crying) after my mother's death, the hour of her burial,
I wash my hands of you.
It will be as if you and i had never known each other.
And if we were the only two human beings left alone on earth together,
I would not address one more word to you.
(Breathing)
(pages rustling) who is that?
It is I, aunt reed, jane eyre.
You asked to see me.
Yes, I did.
I am very ill, you know.
I need to ease my mind before I die.
I have done you wrong twice, jane eyre.
One was to break the promise i made to my husband to bring you up as my own child.
You know that.
Go to my dressing table.
Open it.
Take out and read the letter you find there.
"Madam, will you have the goodness
"to send me the address of my...
"niece, jane eyre.
"I wish her to join me in madeira.
"Fortune has blessed me and, as I am unmarried and childless,
"I wish to adopt her
"and bequeath to her all I have when I die.
"I am, madam, sincerely yours, john eyre."
But this was written three years ago.
Why did you never tell me i had an uncle who was alive?
Because I hated you too much.
I could not forgive you.
Forgive me?
For your conduct.
I take you on and you treat me with contempt.
You talk to me like a vile wild animal.
Forgive me my passionate nature.
I was a child, aunt.
Let us forgive each other now.
I could not forget.
I took my revenge.
I wrote to your uncle.
I told him jane eyre was dead, that she had died of a fever at lowood school.
See, I had my revenge.
Now you may have yours.
You can tell him of my falsehood.
I will be dead by morning, so I don't care.
(Coughing weakly) please.
Water.
(Coughing) quick.
(Coughing subsides)
(wheezing)
(breathing very labored)
I forgive you, aunt reed.
Whether you wish it or not,
I do truly forgive you.
Driver:
Whoa!
Take my trunk on up to thornfield, would you?
Won't you ride, miss?
You've had a very long journey.
No, I'm nearly home.
It's my favorite walk.
There you are!
You're back.
Ungrateful thing.
I give you leave for a week and you're gone a whole month.
I want my money back, since you've had me so little in your thoughts.
I said I would be gone for as long as I was needed.
And I was.
And you still owe me wages.
Come, let's get you home.
Adle will scream and shout
"bienvenue."
Thank you... for your great kindness.
I am...
I am strangely glad to get back again to you, and wherever you are, is my home-- is my true home.
Are you going?
See, eshton?
Our swallow has come home.
Eshton is using my coach to pursue some unusual twins.
Yes, one, a belgian, has been in a sort of a deep sleep for some eight months and he has been woken by a twin now living in toulouse, by the way, that he never even knew existed.
It's amazing!
Well, you don't think it possible that two minds can be so in tune that they communicate across the country and call out to each other across space and time?
You're one of the world's most curious people, eshton.
And you're the most cynical.
Nonsense, I'm the most romantic person I know.
(Eshton laughs) be off with you.
Adele:
Miss eyre!
Amazing minds await your magnifying glass.
Miss eyre-- oh, jane.
You're back!
Ah, at last the governess has returned from her travels.
Can't you teach that child something so she won't be under our feet?
It's just such a pity we can't stay for longer.
But it's the warreners' summer ball next week.
Lady ingram:
Well, blanche and I, we won't be there.
We will be occupied with a more important event, I am certain.
Don't worry, you'll see her again soon.
Ingram park is a short journey for an enthusiastic rider.
Indeed.
Safe journey.
Ah, there you are.
Is adle in bed?
You're back to our routine very quickly.
Now that all our house guests are gone, it's like it has always been.
Att?
It is a book I used to read as a child-- my "escape" book.
I used to imagine that one day I could go anywhere I wanted.
I took it with me to lowood.
And now?
Now, I think it can go here very well.
Now miss eyre, if we're very lucky we might see some dragonflies.
Did I ever tell you of my travels in the blue mountains of mongolia?
And you can tell me of your travels in the black and gloomy forests of your childhood memories.
So the vain, facetious cousin, georgiana, found a mate within days of your aunt's funeral?
So it seems.
And what of the nun?
I believe eliza will settle in her french convent, never to return to worldly pleasures.
I give her but a few years to become mother superior.
So you returned to gateshead half knowing that you wouldn't find the old lady repentant or forgiving or in the least bit pleased to see jane eyre, and this is how things transpired.
And yet jane eyre doesn't seem to be troubled that she has no family, no one in the world outside of thornfield, who wishes her well.
No, I have no family to speak of, but I hear you have been making plans of your own.
I assume miss blanche's departure from thornfield is only temporary.
I mean, as adle's governess, it is my duty to help you decide on a suitable school.
Yes... yes, indeed.
And we mustn't forget that when I do finally relinquish my bachelor ways, we must find you a suitable position.
What do you think of ireland?
We don't have to worry about that now, not for a good while yet.
Oh look, look!
See the emerald wings?
Come!
So to find half of anything we divide it into two equal parts.
Adele:
Elle est arrivée, oh, elle est trs belle.
In english, please, adle.
But I think it must be française, miss eyre.
Surely it must be.
What do you think?
It's a beauty, isn't it?
Do you think it'll do for mrs.
Rochester?
Won't she look like queen boadicea... yes, thank you.
...Leaning back on those purple cushions?
Huh?
You know jane, I wish I were a little better suited to matching her in looks.
Tell me... magician that you are, are you absolutely sure you don't have a potion that can make me more handsome?
I have told you before that would be past the power of magic, sir.
Come on, adle.
Adele:
Monsieur rochester.
I want you to tell me about the caribbean islands again.
Sophie has taught me a song.
(Begins singing in french in an insinuating fashion) all right, all right, incorrigible one.
(Sighs deeply) you must imagine a restaurant.
Now, let's say, a meeting place where many respectable people come here at night to socialize.
You must imagine brilliant reds and pinks, the most exotic perfumed flowers, delightful, passionate music.
The women are of course very beautiful.
They wear bright silks, ambers, sapphires, emeralds.
They are very seductive, but they are also mysterious, tantalizing... dangerous.
(Humming song) stop that noise, or I'll send you to school in the morning!
You're like a wild animal!
The caribbean is not as beautiful as it seemsadle.
I came back to escape.
Mrs. Fairfax:
Summer's been with us forever this year.
I can't remember when it's stayed so long.
And mr.
Rochester has stayed with it.
He has never been here at thornfield for this length of time.
(She sighs) he's found something to keep him from his travels.
Mind you, I think there must have been a little disagreement.
Really?
Well, ingram park is not very far away-- well, for an ardent suitor, yet he has not saddled a horse for several weeks.
He spends his evenings either talking to you or prowling the lower gardens like a bear, the gardener says.
(She sighs again) of course, he's got the household business to worry about.
What do you mean?
Well, he'll be wanting to find us suitable positions, for after the wedding.
Oh, no, he will take care over that, I'm sure.
I told you, he's a good master.
Thornfield is pleasant in the summer, isn't it, jane?
Yes, sir.
You've become attached to the place?
Yes, sir.
And you'll be sad to leave?
Yes.
Must I leave, sir, must I leave thornfield?
Yes, I'm sorry, but I'm afraid you must.
You're to be married?
Exactly.
Precisely... as you, with your usual acuteness, have already predicted, when I do marry, adle must go to school and you must find a new situation.
I will advertise immedialy.
No, you won'T.
I already found you a place.
Ireland is a long way away, sir.
From thornfield.
It is a long way away from you, sir
(sighs) we've be friends, haven't we, jane?
It's difficult to part from a friend and know you will never meet them again.
And you and I, it's like we're a pair of eshton's twins... bound together in some unworldly way, sharing a spirit, we're so alike.
When we are parted, when you...
leave me,
I believe that bond will snap and I will bleed inwardly.
But you'll forget me after a while.
I would never forget you.
How can you imagine that?
What do you think i am?
Oh, I wish I'd never been born!
I wish I'd never come here.
I wish I'd never grown to love thornfield.
I love thornfield.
I love it because i have lived a full life.
I have not been trampled on.
I have been treated as an equal.
You have treated me as an equal.
You are the best person I know, and I cannot bear the thought of having to leave you.
Must you leave me, jane?
Why, of course I must because you have a wife.
What do you mean?
Blanche ingram, of course.
You're as good as married to her.
You promised her.
I have not promised blanche anything.
To someone who is inferior to you, someone who you have no sympathy with.
Of course I must go!
Do you think that I'm a machine?
That I can bear it?
Do you think because I'm poor, plain, obscure and little, that I have no heart?
That I am without soul?
I have as much heart as you and as much soul.
And if god had given me some beauty and wealth i would make it as hard for you to leave me as it is now for me to leave you.
You will not leave me, jane.
No, let me go.
Jane, jane don't struggle so.
I am a free person and i will go and do as I please.
Yes, yes, yes, you will.
You will decide your own destiny.
Jane, I offer you my hand, my heart, and all my possessions.
You laugh at me!
No, no.
Jane, I want you to live with me, to pthugh li asy cond s my by mpan janeha nothn netsoe u ubt ?
Luly jayou owdot lolahe i ve y my owfles ja y lle.
Sait qck jane, do you accept me?
Are you in earnest?
I can hardly believe you.
I swear!
Ensir.
Lle byname.
Call me edward.
Then, edward,
I will marry you.
God forgive me!
And let no man meddle with me.
I aim to keep her.
There is no one to meddle.
I have no family to interfere.
No.
Come, come.
(Thunder cracking) run and take off those wet things.
Good night.
Good night, my darling.
(Both laugh)
(laughing giddily)
I feel so astonished,
I hardly know what to say to you, miss eyre.
Mr. Rochester came in here about five minutes ago to tell me that he had asked you to marry him.
Oh, this cannot be true.
But why?
I am sorry to offend you, jane, but you are so young.
You know nothing of men.
And I have noticed that mr.
Rochester seemed to make you a favorite, but I thought... that I was too monstrous to love?
No.
I meant I thought you too level-headed... too sensible a young woman to be so overwhelmed.
Overwhelmed?
Well, are you overwhelmed?
(Chuckles)
I believe the good woman thought i'd forgotten my station and you yours.
Little does she know that I am the servant and you the mistress.
(Chuckles)
I'm sorry.
I know that look.
She thinks I do not know myself, and that you are doing as all men must.
Jane, she doesn't know us.
All the same, sir... sir?
When did i become "sir" again.
Last night you stood before the heavens and pronounced yourself my equal.
That's the jane i want to marry, to share my life.
Will you dine e tonight?
No, sir.
Edward-- you promised to call me edward.
Until we marry, if we marry?
In one month, one short month, you'll be mrs.
Rochester or I'll be damned!
Then until that morning i will call you mr.
Rochester.
That is halfway between
"edward" and "sir."
I will continue to teach adle.
(Groans) we will go on as before.
Then it will be seen that this idea, this marriage, is a sensible proposition.
I'm not interested in pleasing mrs.
Fairfax.
But for you... for you I will obey.
Now, hurry up and get your bonnet or we'll be late.
For what?
We're going to town.
Oh, no!
No, no, no, no, no.
You're not coming.
Out of there now.
Adele:
Oh, please let me come, miss eyre.
No!
Absolutely non!
Jane and I-- miss eyre and i are going shopping by ourselves.
Shopping?
Were you listening to a word I said?
Just today, to celebrate.
Now, come, come, you can't get married in that.
I will not be married at all if you force me into that ridiculous carriage.
John, bring up the other carriage.
And adle shall come, too.
No.
I'll send her to school yet.
Will I go without mademoiselle?
Absolutely, sans mademoiselle.
I'm going to take mademoiselle away.
To europe first, where I will take her to all the grand palaces and present her to all the kings and queens.
You cannot do that, because she has no jewels.
Well, she will have.
In london there's a very special box filled with jewels.
I will send for them immediately, and mademoiselle will be covered in them from head to toe while she teaches you mathematics.
And when madame, as she will be then, when madame is tired of all those kings and queens i will take her to a villa, whitewashed and secluded on the edge of the emerald mediterranean.
Rochester:
Yes, yes this will do very well.
We need at least six day dresses.
Are these the evening fabrics?
We'll need three at the most.
And this for the veil.
No-- even adle will draw a line at that.
There, this is much more suitable.
(Rochester grunts) now, evening dresses.
Rochester:
For mademoiselle-- what do you think?
No?
This is for mademoiselle.
Child knows you better than I do.
I'll take it.
Jane eyre will not be overwhelmed.
Adele:
Miss eyre.
You will really be going the minute after the wedding?
Yes.
You will stay the night at the grand london hotel and then take the steamboat to france?
Yes.
I wish I could go with you.
You must stay here, but don't worry.
Mr. Rochester... we will pick out a good school for you.
They will hit me and starve me.
No, I promise i won't let that happen.
(Baby crying) go!
(Rattling bars)
(no sound) jane (whispering):
Who's there?
Who is it?
George, what time did your master say he'd be home?
Don't worry, miss.
He has been away one night already.
He will not stay away another.
So I'm only gone for 24 hours and i return to this.
You can't do without me, clearly.
Is anything wrong?
Jane:
It was not sophie, it was not mrs.
Fairfax, it was not even grace poole.
Rochester:
But you were dreaming.
I had been dreaming, but then I awoke.
Thank god nothing worse happened.
Thank god you're safe.
It was not grace poole.
Who else could it have been?
I was not dreaming.
And the rest of your dream?
Is thornfield a neglected ruin?
Have I left you without so much as a word?
No.
So?
Put it down to your anxieties-- your natural anxieties about the new life you're about to enter.
Yesterday I was very busy and happy packing.
I was not worried about the future.
I think it a glorious thing to have the hope of living with you.
Because I love you.
It was a fine day yesterday.
Look... the storm has gone.
(Birds chirping) voil-- c'est trs jolie, ça.
Et c'est la voile-- attendez.
Voil.
Merci, sophie.
Attendez, mademoiselle.
Regardez-vous.
Vous tes trs belle... madame.
At last!
There you are!
How could I have thought that that gaudy veil would have suited you better?
Is john getting the carriage ready?
Yes, sir.
Is the luggage brought down?
Yes, sir.
Good.
Have it strapped and ready on the carriage.
We are leaving the moment we return from the church.
Yes, sir.
(Gasps)
I'm sorry, jane.
Are you ready?
Clergyman:
I require and charge you both as ye will answer at the dreadful day of judgment when the secrets of all hearts shall be disclosed, that if either of you know any impediment why ye may not lawfully be joined in matrimony,
ye do now confess it.Wellured to many as are coupled together otherwise than god are not joined together by god, neither is their matrimony lawful.
The marriage cannot go on.
I declare the existence of an impediment.
Proceed.
I said, proceed.
I cannot proceed without some investigation.
Man:
Perhaps it might be got over, explained away?
I hardly think so;
it is insuperable.
Mr. Rochester has a wife now living.
Rochester:
Who are you?
Man:
My name is briggs, a solicitor.
And you would thrust on me a wife?
I would remind you of her existence, sir, which the law recognizes, if you do not.
I have no wife.
"Edward fairfax rochester of thornfield hall was married to bertha antoinetta mason at san benedictus church in spanish town, jamaica, on the eighteenth day of march,
1825."
If that is a genuine document, it doesn't prove that the woman mentioned there is still living.
Briggs:
She was living three months ago.
I have a witness to the fact.
What have you to say?
Gentlemen, this is a place of god!
My sister is living at thornfield hall.
I saw her there last june.
Impossible!
I am an old resident of this neighborhood, sir, and I have never heard of a mrs.
Rochester at thornfield hall.
No, by god, I took care that none would.
(Sighs) enough!
When is enough?
Clear the church.
There will be no wedding today.
Before you go, however...
I bid you come up to the house.
I have someone i wish you to meet.
Take it back to the coach house, john.
It won't be needed today.
John:
Very good, sir.
(Applause) away with your congratulations!
You're 15 years too late.
Do you remember this room, mason... where you almost lost your life?
(Keys rattling) morning, mrs.
Poole.
How is your charge this morning?
A little touchy, sir.
We're having some breakfast but she's calm now.
Be very careful, sir.
Rochester:
Aren't I always, grace?
We... we'd better leave.
Rochester:
Why, richard?
Why, are you frightened?
Ladies and gentlemen, may I introduce you to my wife.
Puta!
Puta.
Puta!
(Growling and shrieking) just leave, quickly, sir.
She will be calm again.
I will handle her, sir.
(Grunting) there, shh.
(Door slams, keys jingle)
(panting) that was my wife.
As some of you know, my father was a greedy man, who wanted to preserve his estate by marrying his younger son off to a wife who would bring him a rich dowry.
I was sent to the caribbean where, knowing my predilection for dark, handsome women,
I was tricked by mason and his father into pursuing his sister, bertha... who was as beautiful as the glittering stars and just as tantalizing.
(Laughter)
I was married before I knew it, before I had met her mother, who was, I found out later, at that time and had been for many years, incarcerated in a mental asylum, and that insanity ran
through the family like a black river of disease.
It was but half a day before I realized what manner of wife
I had been tricked into.
It was but a few weeks before the full extent of her illness was made clear to me.
(Shrieks) bertha, calm down!
An illness which has grown in violence and foulness at an ever increasing pace.
(Grunts) then, serves him right for his wickedness, my father died and my brother straight behind, so I...
I inherited everything anyway, the rochester fortune intact.
I brought her back with me to england, intending to make thornfield a comfortable prison for her and for me.
I have another house, hidden away--
I could have kept her there, where the damp inclement air might have rid me of her burden,
I could have done that and no one would have blamed me.
(Bertha yelling and pounding in other room)
I left her here, with grace, while I traveled the world, trying to forget the horrors at home.
Until, one day... one day this girl appeared who knew nothing of this.
This girl, who stands so quiet and grave at the mouth of hell.
This girl, who is all quietness and sanity and innocence.
(Bertha thrashing in other room) do you wonder why I wanted her?
Why I risked the wrath of god to get her?
And now, I must ask you to leave.
I must see to my wife.
(Knocking on door) rochester:
Jane?
(Knocking on door) jane?
Forgive me.
I couldn't tell you;
I knew you'd never stay.
Jane, come away with me.
We'll go and live together in that whitewashed villa, away from everyone.
You have no family to care, to interfere with us.
(Knocking softly) jane?
(Knocking) jane, can you hear me?
Jane?
(Wind whistling)
(exhales sharply)
(wind howling)
(softly):
Our father, which art in heaven, hallowed be thy name, thy kingdom come, thy will be done, on earth as it is in heaven.
(Louder):
Wait!
Helen, wait for me!
Woman:
She must have been on the moors for days... weeks, even.
Woman:
Poor creature.
She looks so pale.
St. John found her just in time.
Who do you think she is?
Where did she come from?
(Wind rushing) rochester:
Jane!
Jane!
(Labored breathing)
(birds chirping)
(in a whisper):
I'm sorry to be so much trouble.
You cannot remember your name?
Or your family?
Why don't we try to help?
We can tell you what we know.
Oh, yes!
We think you must have wandered on the moors for many days, maybe weeks.
We do not know where you traveled from... with no money or support of any kind.
So you see, you are a mystery.
We've made up our own story.
We think you are a young, well-bred woman who has run away from home because of family disapproval-- some romance... diana!
Not now!
Diana:
All right, then.
We will not speculate yet.
But this is not the hand of a working woman.
So you are a well-bred lady-- a governess, a teacher of some kind?
You speak french.
Extremely well.
And you know geography.
Sister:
Or you have traveled widely.
You talked of foreign places as if you had felt their heat, smelt their smells.
I have not traveled beyond england.
How can you be sure if you can't remember anything?
Hannah has washed your dress.
See here?
So, J...
E... "l" school?
Is that any help?
Hannah:
It might not have been her dress.
I do not know what this means.
But I know that I am honest.
Diana!
It seems she does not remember yet, but surely we have conscience enough not to play games with her identity.
(Women laughing and chatting outside)
(conversing dramatically in german) good lord, miss!
You look like a ghost.
Here, sit down, though I think you so faded you might melt away with the heat.
Careful!
I love the fire.
I think I must have been very cold at one time in my life.
The misses will be angry with me if I don't get you back to bed.
I have spent long enough in bed.
I must try to repay everyone's kindness.
Do the young ladies live here alone?
Since their father died.
Mr. St. John lives in his parish over at morton.
I don't know how long they'll last here.
They haven't a penny between them.
The girls will have to go for governesses soon.
You have book learning,
I suppose?
So you could earn your own living, if you chose?
I have done... and I will, just as soon as I can advertise.
Advertise!
(Chuckles) well, you are a surprising little thing.
And how long have you been looking after the family?
Thirty year.
I saw all the children born.
Young st.
John came out of the womb already a clergyman.
(Footsteps) st.
John:
I'm glad you're up and about.
Miss jane... elliot?
I believe, in the absence of knowledge, that my sisters have christened you.
They think it suitable.
But is it your name?
No matter.
Jane elliot it is.
My sisters would like to keep you.
Like a stray off the moor.
Do you intend to live off their charity?
For they have very little to spare.
Of course not.
I wish to be put to work.
I will do anything honest.
But surely the cuckoos are too fat to fly thousands of miles.
They go somewhere.
Maybe to the corners of europe.
You are full of information.
Not only do you know all about european birds but south american birds, patagonian lizards... someone must have taught you.
Rochester:
Jane.
I've seen one like this in the west indies, but never here.
You see there?
Have you had an unpleasant memory?
No, it was not... not unpleasant.
Woman:
Good evening.
Good evening.
This must be the mysterious miss elliot.
I'm rosamond oliver.
I live with my father at vale hill.
Good evening, mr.
Rivers.
And good evening, carlo.
Would I forget you?
Your dog is quicker to recognize his friends than you are, sir.
A lovely evening, miss oliver, but a little late for you to be out alone.
Rosamond:
Papa says you never come see us now.
You are quite a stranger.
He is alone tonight and not very well.
Won't you come back with me?
It's not a reasonable hour to intrude on mr.
Oliver.
Reasonable hour?
But I declare it is.
It is just the hour when papa most needs company and you would not be intruding because I have invited you.
Do come.
Poor rosamond.
Honestly, st.
John-- he's as inexorable as death!
She adores him.
And he adores her.
Is there some obstacle?
Her family?
No, her father adores him, too.
He doesn't mind that st.
John is not wealthy?
No, it's st.
John-- he's perverse.
He will not allow himself to have her.
Oh, if only I were so in love... we should embrace it.
It is a crime against god to deny yourself love.
It should be the eleventh commandment.
Vicar (echoing):
That these two persons present now come to be joined... therefore if any man can show any just cause why they may not lawfully be joined together... let him now speak or else hereafter forever hold his peace.
Miss elliot.
Are you feeling unwell?
I am quite well, thank you.
The church is well attended?
And we are lucky in our benefactor.
Mr. Oliver.
You met his daughter, miss rosamond.
He owns a needle factory in the valley.
He's very generous.
Mr. Oliver, in fact, was the inspiration for the employment i have found for you, if, of course, you should wish to take it.
When I first arrived in morton, there was no school.
The children of the poor had no hope of progress.
I have established one for boys.
Now it is the turn of the girls.
There is a cottage available, simply furnished.
The mistress's salary will be 30 a year.
Will you take the job?
I could organize the studies as I wished?
No beatings... and enough food for dinner?
As long as you taught god's word.
Then I accept... with all my heart.
You understand that this will be a village school, poor girls to whom you will teach knitting, sewing, reading, writing and maybe arithmetic at the very most.
What will you do with your accomplishments?
Save them... until they are wanted.
I do not think you will stay here long.
I am not ambitious.
No, but you are impassioned.
Excuse the word.
I mean that... for you, human affections and sympathies have the most powerful hold.
Rochester:
You cannot hate me, jane.
I didn't mean to deceive you.
Unlike you, I cannot live alone without the warmth of human companionship.
I roamed the world... then, returning one night to this cold, dark place...
I saw this... this magical thing.
You were in my path.
Do you remember?
And since that moment i have never wanted to leave the place that you were.
Though you left, I remained, waiting for my little bird to return.
We are one, you and I.
We have to be together.
We are like those twins, so intertwined in their senses and feelings that they can cry out to one another across continents, so close are their thoughts.
Say that you don't love me.
I dare you.
You cannot.
I will not.
I will love you until I die.
And yet you will leave me?
You mean to go your way and for me to go mine?
Yes, sir.
"Sir" again?
Not edward?
(Jane sobbing) diana:
By tomorrow, mary and I will be blown to the ends of the earth.
Jane:
Derbyshire and nottingham are not so very far away.
Diana:
We have to go and teach fat little boys lessons they do not want to learn.
And we will never see our cottage again.
Mary:
She fears she will never see st.
John again.
Why not?
Because he's so pig-headed.
He will be a missionary.
He will go to a really hot place and that will be the end of him.
It's his chosen path.
He thinks it's the only way to serve god.
But why can't he serve god here?
You know that's never been enough.
He needs to make a grand gesture.
Jane, you must keep him here.
Look after him and don't let him out of your sight.
I don't think I could ever change st.
John's mind against anything he'd decided on.
Bye, miss.
(Sniffling) bye, miss.
Don't forget, jane.
We're relying on you.
(Lambs bleating) now, this is morton.
Can anyone point out where we are?
Ow!
(Children grunting and chattering) alice?
Alice!
The clock?
The time?
It's home time.
The bell?
(Bell ringing loudly) still getting used to the clock.
Never mind, we're coming along.
I'm determined to make scholars of them all.
(Horse nickers nearby) hello, miss elliot.
Rosamond:
I am so glad you decided to stay in morton to be mistress of our... endeavor.
I have brought you a pretty little pair of doves.
The dovecote has been empty for some years.
I thought you might conduct nature classes.
Diana said you were an expert on birds.
Jane:
She exaggerates.
And do you like your house?
Have I furnished it nicely?
Very much, thank you.
St. John!
(Girls imitating doves' cooing) miss elliot approved of my arrangements.
Why should she not?
Come along girls, home.
I have just remembered that now diana and mary have left, you must be so lonely.
Please, come home with me and see papa.
Mr. Rivers?
Can I speak with you a moment?
That is a very graceful and... correct drawing.
Correct?
That word is a little lacking in passion, isn't it?
I mean, for someone who loves miss oliver as you do.
Would it comfort you when you're in madagascar or the cape, or would the sight of her distress you?
You're very direct, miss elliot.
You must know me well enough to know i mean no mischief or disrespect.
She likes you, I am sure, and so does her father.
She's a sweet girl... a little lacking in reserve, but you have more than enough for both of you, surely.
Why do you not marry her?
Why do you resist her?
Does she like me?
She is always talking of you.
There is no other subject she is more interested in.
It's very pleasant to talk like this.
You may go on for another quarter of an hour.
Well, what's the use of that?
When you are only planning an even crueler way to resist her?
St. John, you tremble when she comes into the room!
You don't understand.
I love rosamond oliver wildly, more intensely than I will ever love anyone again.
So why not marry her?
Because I know she would not make me a good wife.
We would have a lifetime's regret.
Can you see rosamond as a sufferer, a laborer, a missionary's wife?
No, you cannot.
You need not be a missionary.
You may do god's work here.
I will not give up my life's ambition.
It's dearer to me than anything.
And miss oliver-- are her feelings nothing to you?
She is surrounded by suitors.
She will forget me and marry someone who can make her far happier than I could.
No, jane, you do not know me.
I do tremble at the sight of rosamond, but it repulses me.
It has nothing to do with me, my skin may burn with fever, but in my heart,
I am a cold man.
Don't!
You have the chance to love someone who loves you with all her soul.
Not many people are that lucky.
You may never find that again.
You are an enterprising young woman, miss elliot.
An unusual specimen.
You've made a good start.
I look forward to your career with interest.
I must leave thornfield, mr.
Rochester.
Now... do you mean that?
I do.
And now?
What do you say now?
You cannot leave me.
You cannot leave me-- confess it...
I will leave you.
How can this flesh be so soft and yielding... and yet your heart be like an iron fist?
There is a place I know... a villa in the mediterranean.
It's far from anywhere.
Come and live with me there.
No, jane.
Jane, jane, listen to me.
Lis...
listen to me.
We would live as brother and sister.
We'd have our separate chambers, come together in the afternoons for tea or to play bowls, something... sedate and traditional.
I give you my word.
I wouldn't touch you.
Maybe a chaste peck on the cheek on birthdays.
But I wouldn't tempt you into a life of sin, jane.
I wouldn't do that.
(Thunder) jane:
I must rest now.
Rochester:
Yes.
Yes, you must rest.
Jane:
We'll talk in the morning.
Rochester:
Yes, in the morning.
You will think about the villa?
Jane:
We'll talk in the morning.
(Loud thunder) whoa, boys.
Whoa, whoa.
Driver:
Walk on.
(Wind whistling)
(crying)
(sobs echoing) girls, this is a butterfly.
Now, pass that round.
Can any of you tell me how a caterpillar turns into a beautiful butterfly?
(Girls eagerly calling out)
(school bell rings) jane:
Good afternoon, girls.
Girls:
Good afternoon, miss elliot.
Is everything all right?
Yes, of course.
You look very well.
You have performed wonders in this... colorful universe.
You've given it discipline and individuality.
I wish diana or mary could come home to live with you.
You're reckless with your health.
I'm well enough.
Oh, forgive me.
One of the girls saw miss oliver in her wedding dress and the others begged me to imagine a painting for them.
I told you she would forget about me.
You must allow me to be right sometimes.
Mr. Rivers.
What are you doing here?
I've often wondered where you got that forthright quality.
I've come to have a little talk with you... or rather, I have a story to share with you.
Just over 20 years ago, a poor curate fell in love with a rich man's daughter.
They married, and she was cut off from her family entirely.
Within two years, they were both dead.
They left a daughter.
And she was cast out onto the very cold charity of an aunt by marriage.
Now we come to details-- a mrs.
Reed of gateshead, who kept the orphan ten years and then sent her to one lowood school.
I calculate she would have been approximately your age.
It seems she did very well there, with qualities very similar to your own.
And another coincidence-- she rose to be a teacher.
She left lowood to become a governess to the ward of a mr.
Rochester.
Mr. Rivers!
I know nothing of this mr.
Rochester's character, but I do know that he offered marriage to this young woman, but at the altar she had discovered he had a wife still living-- a lunatic.
For another quite different reason, one mr.
Briggs, a solicitor, was searching for this young lady, but by then she had disappeared, was never seen again.
Is that not a very strange...?
Since you appear to know so much, tell me this.
Mr. Rochester.
How is he?
Where is he?
I know nothing of him.
But you said they were looking for me.
Did they write to thornfield?
Yes, of course, but received no reply.
He must have been a bad man.
You do not know him.
Very well.
But maybe you should ask me how I come to know your story-- what inspired our mr.
Briggs to look for you and to write to me.
As you know, I traveled to derbyshire a few days ago.
I had dinner with a family who had a housekeeper who was related in some distant way to a mrs.
Alice fairfax.
Now, she provided me with such an exact description of the mysterious jane eyre to relieve me of any doubt.
Did they tell you anything of mr.
Rochester?
I told you, mr.
Briggs was not interested in him.
Don't you want to know why he was interested in you?
Well, what did he want?
Simply to tell you that your uncle had died and had left you all his property and fortune.
Oh, I am sorry.
Sorry?
For 20,000?
I am sorry my uncle is dead.
I might have wished to have seen him one day.
Wait... wait!
Why would you ever know about this mr.
Briggs and his search for me?
Why would he write to you?
There is more, but I fear you've had too much surprise for one evening.
I will tell you tomorrow.
You will tell me now.
He wrote to me because your uncle was also my uncle.
I am your cousin.
Your half cousin, that is.
Y-your mother was my father's sister?
We are half cousins.
(Laughing) you're a strange young woman.
I tell you you've inherited a fortune and you're very serious.
I tell you something of little importance and you dance with excitement!
You have two sisters.
A mere half cousin may be of no importance to you, but to me...
I have no one.
I-I have never had anyone.
You must go.
Write to diana and mary and tell them to come home immediately.
But why?
Because we are rich.
You are rich, jane.
We may do anything we like.
We may live as we choose.
Write to them tomorrow.
Jane:
Hurry, hannah.
We must light the fires before they arrive.
She wants fires in every room, in places where they never were.
What's the use of 5,000 if you can't light a few fires at christmas?
Twenty thousand.
St. John...
I'll not hear another word.
We have been over it again and again.
Our uncle left a nephew and three nieces.
We must all profit from his will equally.
Jane, you have never had money.
You do not know what use you may put it to.
And you have never been without family.
I will have a brother, and sisters, and a home.
I will be brother to you, whether you share the money our uncle chose to leave you-- you and only you-- or not.
Leaving you with nothing, unable to realize your dreams, and me with a fortune?
I know enough about money to realize that will not make me happy.
What of the future?
If you should marry?
I will never marry.
Hannah:
They're coming!
Oh!
Oh, miss!
Miss!
Hello.
Was ist das?
Das ist ein schuh.
Sehr gut.
Was ist das?
Das ist ein handschuh.
You're enjoying your german lessons?
Yes, it's easier than french, but not so...
I want you to start learning a new language.
We will begin tomorrow.
Go with you?
To the cape?
To share my missionary work.
I've been watching you for over a year now, and I'm convinced you are equal to the task.
Have you never asked yourself why god led you here?
On that evening, at the very moment you were ready to die, he led me through all this wilderness to find you.
You have always felt you must travel the world.
Jane, it is your destiny.
He has asked you, hasn't he?
I knew it!
St. John has asked me to marry him.
Thank heavens.
Now he'll stay at home, safe with us.
He has asked me to marry him so that I might accompany him on his missionary work.
The two of you will shrivel up and die.
You're both too pale to go to africa!
You did not agree to go, jane?
Jane, you cannot.
We sail in six weeks.
We must make marriage preparations.
Why can we not travel as brother and sister?
As equals?
That would be impossible.
St. John, you do not love me.
Love is not an ingredient in this matter.
I fear you have not forgotten your old association, despite the harm he tried to do you.
I will never see any of them again.
But I owe a debt to my friends at thornfield hall.
In many ways i started my life there.
I became jane eyre.
God made jane eyre!
You surely don't give this man rochester any credit for that!
Of course not.
I've always known myself.
But he was the first to recognize me and to love what he saw.
I will give you your answer, st.
John, soon.
Don't worry.
And if I go with you, it will be my decision.
You'll have him to thank for that.
(Birds calling)
(wind whistling) rochester:
Jane.
Jane!
Jane!
Jane!
Jane!
Driver:
Whoa!
Driver:
Walk on.
(Crows cawing)
(sheep bleating) aye, it's a pity, all right.
Did you know thornfield hall?
Aye, miss, I used to work for the late mr.
Rochester in his stables.
He is dead...
I mean the present mr.
Edward's father.
I'm guessing you're not from these parts, miss, so you don't know what happened a while or so back.
It were almost a year ago now.
Mr. Edwards had sent away most of the servants, so nobody knows exactly what happened.
(Door squeaks open)
(fire crackling)
(fire crackling) bertha!
Bertha, come down.
Take my hand.
Bertha, it's not safe up here.
Will you take my hand?
Come, we'll go down together.
Will you take my hand!
Bertha, come down!
Bertha, no...!
(Bird cries)
(door opens)
(twig snaps) who's there?
Dammit.
(Cane tapping door) where are my candles?
Do you think because I'm blind i don't need them?
(Glassware jangles)
(pilot barks)
(under his breath):
What's the matter now?
(Pilot continues barking) has pilot gone mad like the rest of us?
Well, man?
What's the matter?
George?
That is you, isn't it?
George is in the kitchen, sir.
Who is that?
Pilot knows me, sir... (breathing quickly) these are jane eyre's fingers.
I'd know them anywhere.
It is jane.
It is me, sir.
I'm come back.
You are real?
(Chuckles)
I...
I dream of you often, and in the morning you're gone.
You always were a witch.
Does that seem real?
You always did torment me.
(Laughing):
I am very real, sir.
I'm an independent woman.
My uncle died and left me 20,000, but I gave most of it away.
No, I could never have dreamt such detail.
You must stay with me.
I will stay with you as long as I live.
Well, unless you would prefer I go.
No, no... stay!
(Breathlessly):
You shall stay.
It's a ghastly sight, isn't it, jane?
I knew if you ever saw me again you'd be revolted by me.
I am sorry for this.
And this.
And this.
But the worst of it is, one's in danger of spoiling you too much.
When do you have supper?
I never take supper.
Well, you shall tonight, for I am very hungry.
Have you a pocket comb about you, sir?
What for?
I need to comb out this shaggy black mane.
I find you quite alarming, when this close.
And you accuse me of being supernatural.
Am I hideous, jane?
Very, sir.
You always were, you know.
(Both laughing) you haven't lost your wickedness, wherever you've been.
I've been staying with good people, far better than you-- a hundred times better.
Altogether more refined and exalted than you will ever be.
Who the devil have you been with?
(Laughs softly) there-- you are decent, at least.
I will tell you about them tomorrow.
I've been traveling for days and I'm tired.
Good night.
Jane... were there only ladies at the house where you were?
(Birds chirping) grass is soft and mossy in that little patch.
And the blackbird's wing is...
like coal with an emerald sheen.
So this st.
John person you've been mentioning so often.
What of him?
Well, he is tall, with blue eyes and A... grecian profile.
He's handsome, then, compared to me.
(Chuckling):
Oh, he's much more handsome than you.
And he's a far better christian, of course, than you ever were.
Well, I thanked god last night for your sudden reappearance.
The other night, I cried out to him in my despair.
Called your name, too.
What about his brain, this rivers fellow?
Find yourself getting bored when he speaks?
He doesn't say very much, but what he says is to the point.
His brain is first rate.
Did he study much?
Taught you things?
Oh, yes, he taught me languages.
All right, why did he do that?
He wanted me to go with him to africa.
He wanted you to marry him.
He asked me to marry him.
You're lying.
You've made this up to torment me.
He asked me more than once.
Well, then, I think you might take yourself off and go elsewhere.
Why are you still here?
You've done your duty.
You've assured yourself that I'm still living, well, still living a tenth of a life.
You... heiress.
Well, if you want me to go... no.
I'll pack my bags.
No, no!
(Sighs) humor a foolish old ranter for a little bit longer before you go.
St. John does not love me.
I do not love him.
He's good-- great, even-- but severe, cold as an iceberg.
He's heartless?
No, worse than that.
He has a heart.
I...
I have seen it overflowing with passion but he just keeps it buried in stone with a tenacious willpower.
He's much more frightening than you.
(Grunts) it's turned chilly.
We've been sitting here too long.
No, I want to stay out here.
You can go on in if you wish.
The night I left... the night I left, you told me of a villa you own in the mediterranean... where we might go for refuge and live as brother and sister.
I remember.
Jane.
Jane, are you still there?
I am here, sir.
Jane, that villa I mentioned, the, uh... separate bedrooms, the peck on the cheek on birthdays, that sort of thing?
Yes?
Well, that plan doesn't strike me as so attractive as it once did.
Do you not want to be friends?
Jane, would you be so good as to come back here and sit beside me?
Jane, I want a wife.
I want a wife.
Not a nursemaid to look after me.
I want a wife... to share my bed every night.
All day, if we wish.
If I can't have that,
I'd rather die.
We're not the platonic sort, jane.
Can you see me?
Then hear this, edward.
Your life is not yours to give up.
It is mine, all mine, and I forbid it.
(Laughing) no, george, I told you you're not to work today.
You are part of the enterprise.
Sit down and don't move.
What's he doing?
Moving chairs.
(Rochester chuckles) you're getting painted.
See the man over there?
Jane:
Come on, everyone.
What a pretty dress.
Jane:
Please take your place.
Yes, over there.
Jane:
You must go directly behind us.
Grace... pilot!
Not on the chairs.
Stand there, behind... rochester:
Where's the baby?
Jane:
Diana, you go that side and mary, you go there.
Is everybody all ready?
Rochester:
Jane, take your place beside me.
Captioned by media access group at wgbh access.Wgbh.Org masterpiece theatre was made possible by the corporation for public broadcasting and by contributions to your pbs station from:
We are pbs.
Why did you never tell me I had an uncle who was alive?
Because I hated you too much.
Jane, I offer you my hand, my heart and all my possessions...
Please, I beg you will marry me.
Say it quickly.
The marriage cannot go on.
I declare the existence of an impediment.
Edward Fairfax Rochester of Thornfield Hall was married to Bertha Antoinetta Mason on the 18th day of March 1825.
Puta!
SHE SCREAMS
WIND WHISTLES
Our Father... which art in heaven... hallowed be thy name, thy kingdom come... thy will be done on earth...
Wait!
Helen, wait for me!
She must have been on the moors for days, weeks even.
Poor creature.
She looks so pale.
St John found her just in time.
Who do you think she is?
Where did she come from?
Jane!
Jane!
SHE PANTS
I'm sorry to be such trouble.
You cannot remember your name?
Or your family?
Why don't we try to help?
We can tell you what we know...
Oh, yes!
We think you must have wandered on the moors for many days.
Maybe weeks.
We do not know where you travelled from.
With no money or support.
You are a mystery...
We've made up our own story.
We think you are a young, well-bred woman who has run away from home because of family disapproval.
Some romance.
Diana!
Not now!
All right, then.
We will not speculate yet.
But this is not the hand of a working woman.
So you are a well-bred lady.
A governess?
A teacher of some kind?
You speak French.
Extremely well.
You know geography.
Or you have travelled widely.
You talked of foreign places as if you had felt their heat, smelt their smells.
I have not travelled beyond England.
How can you be sure if you can't remember anything?
Hannah has washed your dress.
See here?
So... "JEL School."
Is that any help?
It might not have been her dress.
DIANA LAUGHS
I-I do not know what this means.
But I know that I am honest.
Diana!
It seems she does not remember yet.
But surely we have conscience enough not to play games with her identity.
DISTANT CHATTER AND LAUGHTER
Good Lord, miss!
You look like a ghost.
Here, sit down...
Though I think you're so faded you might melt away with the heat.
Careful!
I love the fire...
I think I must have been very cold at one time in my life.
The misses will be angry with me if I don't get you back to bed.
I have spent long enough in bed.
I must try to repay everyone's kindness.
Do the young ladies live here alone?
Since their father died.
Mr St John lives in his parish over at Morton.
I don't know how long they'll last here.
They haven't a penny between them.
The girls will have to go for governesses soon.
You have book learning, I suppose?
So you could earn your own living, if you chose.
I have done... and I will.
Just as soon as I can advertise.
Advertise!
Well, you are a surprising little thing!
And how long have you been looking after the family?
30 year.
I saw all the children born.
Young St John came out of the womb already a clergyman!
I'm glad you are up and about...
Miss...
Jane...
Elliot...
I believe, in the absence of knowledge, my sisters have christened you?
They think it suitable.
But is it your name?
No matter.
Jane Elliot it is.
My sisters would like to keep you, like a stray off the moor.
Do you intend to live off their charity?
For they have very little to spare.
Course not.
I wish to be put to work.
I will do anything honest.
But surely the cuckoos are too fat to fly thousands of miles...
They go somewhere.
Maybe to the corners of Europe.
You are full of information.
Not only do you know all about European birds, but South American birds, Patagonian lizards...
Someone must have taught you.
I've seen one like this in the West Indies but never here.
See there?
Have you had an unpleasant memory?
No, it was not...not unpleasant.
Good evening!
Good evening.
This must be the mysterious Miss Elliot.
I'm Rosamond Oliver.
I live with my father at Vale Hill.
Good evening, Mr Rivers.
And good evening, Carlo.
Would I forget you?
Your dog is quicker to recognise his friends than you are, sir.
A lovely evening, Miss Oliver.
But a little late for you to be out alone.
Papa says you never come to see us now.
You are quite a stranger.
He is alone tonight and not very well.
Won't you come back with me?
It is not a reasonable hour to intrude.
Reasonable hour?
!
But I declare it is!
It is just the hour when Papa most needs company.
And you would not be intruding because I have invited you.
Do come.
Poor Rosamond!
Honestly, St John...
He is as inexorable as death!
She adores him.
And he adores her!
Is there some obstacle?
Her family?
No, her father adores him too!
He doesn't mind that St John is not wealthy?
No.
It's St John.
He's perverse!
He will not allow himself to have her.
Oh...if only I were so in love...
We should embrace it.
It is a crime against God to deny yourself love.
It should be the 11th Commandment.
That these two persons present now come to be joined...
Therefore if any man can show any just cause why they may not lawfully be joined together let him now speak, or else hereafter forever hold his peace...
Miss Elliot!
Are you feeling unwell?
I am quite well, thank you.
The church is well attended?
And we are lucky in our benefactor.
Mr Oliver.
You met his daughter, Miss Rosamond.
He owns a needle factory in the valley.
He's very generous.
Mr Oliver, in fact, was the inspiration for the employment I have found for you, if, of course, you should wish to take it.
When I first arrived in Morton, there was no school.
The children of the poor had no hope of progress.
I have established one for boys.
Now it is the turn of the girls.
There is a cottage available, simply furnished.
The mistress's salary will be £30 a year.
Will you take the job?
I could organise the studies as I wished?
No beatings... and enough food for dinner?
As long as you taught God's word.
Then I accept.
With all my heart.
You understand that this will be a village school, poor girls to whom you will teach knitting, sewing, reading, writing, and maybe arithmetic, at the very most.
What will you do with your accomplishments?
Save them until they are wanted.
I do not think you will stay here long.
I am not ambitious.
No, but you are impassioned.
Excuse the word.
I mean that, for you, human affections and sympathies have the most powerful hold.
'You cannot hate me, Jane.
'I didn't mean to deceive you.
'Unlike you...
'I cannot live alone, without the warmth of human companionship.
'I roamed the world... '..then returning one night to this cold, dark place...'
..I saw this... ..this magical thing.
You were in my path.
Do you remember?
And since that moment... ..I have never wanted to leave the place that you were...
Though you left, I remained... ..waiting for my little bird to return.
We are one, you and I.
We have to be together.
We are like those twins... so intertwined in their senses and feelings that they can cry out to one another across continents, so close are their thoughts.
Say that you don't love me.
I dare you.
You cannot.
I will not.
I will love you until I die.
And yet you will leave me?
You mean to go your way and for me to go mine?
Yes, sir.
"Sir" again?
Not Edward?
By tomorrow, Mary, and I will be blown to the ends of the Earth.
Derbyshire and Nottingham are not so very far away.
We've teach fat little boys lessons they do not want to learn!
And we'll never see our cottage again!
She fears she will never see St John again.
Why not?
Because he's so pig-headed.
He WILL be a missionary.
He will go to a really hot place and that will be the end of him.
It is his chosen path.
He thinks it's the only way to serve God.
But why can't he serve God here?
You know that's never been enough.
He needs to make a grand gesture.
Jane...
You must keep him here.
Look after him and don't let him out of your sight.
I don't think I could ever change St John's mind against anything he'd decided on.
Don't forget, Jane.
We're relying on you.
Now, this is Morton.
Can anyone point out where we are?
Ow!
Alice?
Alice!
The clock.
The time?
It's home time.
The bell?
Still getting used to the clock.
Never mind.
You're coming along.
I am determined to make scholars of them all.
Hello, Miss Elliot.
I am so glad you decided to stay in Morton to be mistress of...our endeavour.
I have brought you a pretty pair of doves.
The dovecote has been empty for some years.
You might conduct nature classes.
Diana said you were an expert on birds.
She exaggerates.
And do you like your house?
Have I furnished it nicely?
Very much, thank you.
St John!
Miss Elliot approved of my arrangements.
Why should she not?
Come along, girls, home.
I have just remembered that now Diana and Mary have left... you must be so lonely.
Please, come home with me and see Papa.
Mr Rivers?
Can I speak with you a moment?
It is a very graceful and correct drawing.
Correct?
That word is a little lacking in passion, isn't it?
I mean, for someone who loves Miss Oliver as you do...
Would it comfort you, when you're in Madagascar or the Cape?
Or would the sight of her distress you?
You are very direct, Miss Elliot.
You must know me well enough to know I mean no mischief or disrespect.
She likes you, I am sure.
And so does her father.
She's a sweet girl, a little lacking in reserve, but you have more than enough for both of you, surely.
Why do you not marry her?
Why do you resist her?
DOES she like me?
She is always talking of you.
There is no other subject she is more interested in.
It's very pleasant to talk like this.
You may go on for another quarter of an hour.
Well, what's the use of that?
When you are only planning an even crueller way to resist her.
St John, you tremble when she comes into the room!
You don't understand!
I love Rosamond Oliver wildly.
More intensely than I will ever love anyone again.
So why not marry her?
Because I know she would not make me a good wife.
We would have a lifetime's regret.
Can you see Rosamond as a sufferer?
A missionary's wife?
No!
You cannot!
You need not be a missionary.
You may do God's work here.
I will not give up my life's ambition.
It's dearer to me than anything.
And Miss Oliver...
Are her feelings nothing to you?
She is surrounded by suitors.
She will forget me and marry someone who can make her far happier than I could.
No, Jane!
You do not know me.
I do tremble at the sight of Rosamond, but it repulses me.
It has nothing to do with me.
My skin may burn with fever but, in my heart, I am a cold man.
Don't!
You have the chance to love someone who loves you with all her soul.
Not many people are that lucky.
You may never find that again.
You are an enterprising young woman, Miss Elliot.
An unusual specimen.
You've made a good start.
I look forward to your career with interest.
I must leave Thornfield, Mr Rochester.
Now... ..do you mean that?
I do.
And now?
What do you say now?
You cannot leave me.
You cannot leave me, confess it.
I will...
I will leave you.
How can this flesh be so soft and yielding... ..and yet your heart be like an iron fist?
There is a place I know.
A villa in the Mediterranean.
It is far from anywhere.
Come and live with me there.
No, Jane...
Jane...
Jane...
Listen to me.
Listen to me.
We would live as brother and sister.
We would have our separate chambers, come together in the afternoons, for tea, or to play bowls...
Something sedate and traditional.
I give you my word... ..I wouldn't touch you.
Maybe a chaste peck on the cheek on birthdays... ..but I wouldn't tempt you into a life of sin, Jane.
I wouldn't do that.
I must rest now.
Yes.
Yes, you must rest.
'We will talk in the morning.
'Yes.
In the morning.
'You will think about the villa?
'We'll talk in the morning.'
Whoa, boys!
Whoa, whoa!
Walk on.
SHE SOBS
Girls, this is a butterfly.
Now pass that round.
Can you tell me how a caterpillar turns into a beautiful butterfly?
CHILDREN SHOUT OUT
SCHOOL BELL RINGS OUT
ALL:
Good afternoon, Miss Elliot.
Is everything all right?
Yes, of course.
You look very well.
You have performed wonders in this...
colourful universe.
You have given it discipline and individuality.
I wish Diana or Mary could come home to live with you.
You're reckless with your health.
I am well enough.
Oh, forgive me.
One of the girls saw Miss Oliver in her wedding dress and the others begged me to imagine a painting for them.
I told you she would forget about me.
You must allow me to be right sometimes.
Mr Rivers, what are you doing here?
I have often wondered where you got that forthright quality.
I've come to have a little talk with you.
Or rather, I have a story to share with you.
Just over 20 years ago, a poor curate fell in love with a rich man's daughter.
They married, and she was cut off from her family entirely.
Within two years they were both dead.
They left a daughter.
She was cast out onto the very cold charity of an aunt by marriage...
Now we come to details.
..a Mrs Reed of Gateshead, who kept the orphan ten years and then sent her to one Lowood School.
I calculate she would have been approximately your age.
It seems she did very well, with qualities very similar to your own.
And another coincidence - she rose to be a teacher.
She left Lowood to become a governess to the ward of a Mr Rochester.
Mr Rivers...
I know nothing of this Mr Rochester's character, but I do know that he offered marriage to this young woman, but, at the altar, she discovered he had a wife still living.
A lunatic.
For another quite different reason, one Mr Briggs, a solicitor, was searching for this young lady, but by then she had disappeared, was never seen again.
Is that not very strange?
Since you appear to know so much, tell me this.
Mr Rochester - how is he?
Where is he?
I know nothing of him.
But you said they were looking for me.
Did they write to Thornfield?
Yes, of course.
But received no reply.
He must have been a bad man.
You do not know him.
Very well.
But maybe you should ask me how I come to know your story.
What inspired our Mr Briggs to look for you and to write to me.
As you know, I travelled to Derbyshire a few days ago.
I had dinner with a family who had a housekeeper who was related in some distant way to a Mrs Alice Fairfax.
Now she provided me with such an exact description of the mysterious Jane Eyre to relieve me of any doubt.
Did they tell you anything of Mr Rochester?
Mr Briggs was not interested in him.
Don't you want to know why he was interested in you?
What did he want?
Simply to tell you that your uncle had died and had left you all his property and fortune.
Oh...
I am sorry.
Sorry?
For £20,000?
I am sorry my uncle is dead.
I might have wished to have seen him one day.
Wait.
Wait!
Why would you ever know about this Mr Briggs and his search for me?
Why would he write to you?
There is more, but you've had too much surprise.
I will tell you tomorrow.
You will tell me now.
He wrote to me because your uncle was also my uncle.
I am your cousin.
Your half-cousin, that is.
Y-Your mother was my father's sister?
We are half-cousins?
Oh!
You are a strange young woman.
I tell you you've inherited a fortune and you are very serious.
I tell you something of little importance and you dance with excitement!
You have two sisters!
A mere half-cousin may be of no importance to you, but to me...
I have no-one.
I have never had anyone.
You must go.
Write to Diana and Mary and tell them to come home immediately.
But why?
Because we are rich!
YOU are rich, Jane.
We may do anything we like.
We may live as we choose.
Write to them tomorrow!
Hurry, Hannah.
We must light the fires before they arrive.
She wants fires in every room!
In places where they never were!
What's the use of £5,000 if you can't light a few fires at Christmas?
£20,000.
St John, I will not hear another word.
We have been over it again and again.
Our uncle left a nephew and three nieces, we must all profit from his will equally.
Jane, you have never had money.
You do not know what use you may put it to.
And you have never been without family.
I will have a brother and sisters, and a home.
I will be brother to you whether you share the money our uncle left you - you and only you - or not.
Leaving you with nothing, unable to realise your dreams, and me with a fortune?
I know enough about money to realise that will not make me happy.
What of the future?
If you should marry?
I'll never marry.
They're coming!
Hello.
Oh, miss!
Oh...
Was ist das?
Das ist ein Schuh.
Sehr gut.
Was ist das?
Das ist ein Handschuh.
You are enjoying your German lessons?
Yes, it is easier than French.
I want you to start learning a new language.
We will begin tomorrow.
Go with you?
To the Cape?
To share my missionary work.
I've been watching you for over a year now, and I am convinced you are equal to the task.
Have you never asked yourself why God led you here?
On that evening, at the very moment you were ready to die, he led me through all this wilderness to find you.
You have always felt you must travel the world.
Jane, it is your destiny!
He HAS asked you, hasn't he?
I knew it!
St John has asked me to marry him.
Thank heavens!
Now he'll stay at home, safe with us.
He has asked me to marry him so that I might accompany him on his missionary work.
You will shrivel up and die.
You are both too pale to go to Africa!
You did not agree to go, Jane?
Jane, you cannot!
We sail in six weeks.
We must make marriage preparations.
Why can we not travel as brother and sister?
As equals?
That would be impossible.
St John, you do not love me.
Love is not an ingredient in this matter.
I fear you have not forgotten your old association, despite the harm he tried to do you.
I will never see any of them again.
But I owe a debt to my friends at Thornfield Hall.
In many ways, I started my life there.
I became Jane Eyre.
God made Jane Eyre!
You surely don't give this man Rochester any credit for that!
Of course not.
I have always known myself.
But he was the first to recognise me... ..and to love what he saw.
I will give you your answer, St John, soon.
Don't worry.
And if I go with you, it will be my decision.
You will have him to thank for that.
Jane...
Jane!
Jane!
Jane!
Jane...
Whoa-oa!
Walk on.
Aye, it's a pity, all right.
Did you know Thornfield Hall?
Aye, Miss.
I used to work for the late Mr Rochester in his stables.
He is dead?
I mean the present Mr Edward's father.
I'm guessing you're not from these parts, Miss, so you don't know what happened a while or so back.
It was almost a year ago now.
Mr Edwards had sent away most of the servants, so nobody knows exactly what happened.
Bertha!
Bertha, come down.
Take my hand.
Bertha, it's not safe up here.
Will you take my hand?
Come, we'll go down together.
Will you take my hand?
Bertha, come down!
Bertha!
No!
BIRD CRIES
TWIG BREAKS
Who's there?
Dammit.
Where are my candles?
Do you think because I'm blind I don't need them?
GLASS TINKLES
DOG BARKS
What's the matter now?
Has Pilot gone mad like the rest of us?
Well, man?
What's the matter?
George?
That is you, isn't it?
George is in the kitchen, sir.
Who is that?
Pilot knows me, sir.
These are Jane Eyre's fingers.
I'd know them anywhere.
It is Jane.
It is me, sir.
I'm come back.
You are real?
I dream of you often, and in the morning, you're gone.
You always were a witch.
Does that seem real?
You always did torment me.
I am very real, sir.
I am an independent woman.
My uncle died and left me £20,000, but I gave most of it away.
No, I could never have dreamt such detail.
You must stay with me?
I will stay with you as long as I live.
Unless you would prefer I go.
No, no.
Stay!
You shall stay.
It's a ghastly sight, isn't it, Jane?
I knew if you ever saw me again, you would be revolted by me.
I am sorry for this.
And this.
But the worst of it is... one's in danger of spoiling you too much.
When do you have supper?
I never take supper.
Well, you shall tonight, for I am very hungry.
Have you a pocket comb about you, sir?
What for?
I need to comb out this shaggy black mane.
I find you quite alarming, when this close.
And you accuse me of being supernatural.
Am I hideous, Jane?
Very, sir.
You always were, you know!
Ha-ha!
You haven't lost your wickedness, wherever you've been.
Yet I have been staying with good people, far better than you.
A hundred times better!
Altogether more refined and exalted than you will ever be!
Who the devil have you been with?
There.
You are decent, at least.
I will tell you about them tomorrow.
I have been travelling for days and I'm tired.
Goodnight.
Jane...
Were there only ladies at the house where you were?
The grass is soft and mossy in that little patch.
And the blackbird's wing is like coal with an emerald sheen.
So this St John person you have been mentioning so often... what of him?
Well...
He is tall... with blue eyes and a...
Grecian profile.
He's handsome, then.
Compared to me.
He's much more handsome than you!
And he's a far better Christian, of course, than you ever were...
I thanked God last night, for your sudden reappearance.
The other night, I cried out to him in my despair.
I called your name, too.
What about his brain, this Rivers fellow?
Find yourself getting bored when he speaks?
He doesn't say very much, but what he says is to the point.
His brain is first rate.
Did he study much?
Taught you things?
Oh, yes.
He taught me languages.
All right.
Why did he do that?
He wanted me to go with him to Africa.
He wanted you to marry him?
He asked me to marry him.
You're lying!
You've made this up to torment me.
He asked me more than once.
Well, then, I think you might take yourself off and go elsewhere!
Why are you still here?
You've assured yourself that I am still living.
Well, still living a tenth of a life.
You...heiress!
Well, if you want me to go.
No!
I'll pack my bags.
No...
No.
Humour a foolish old ranter for a little bit longer before you go.
St John does not love me.
I do not love him.
He's good.
Great, even.
But severe.
Cold as an iceberg.
He's heartless?
Oh, worse than that.
He has a heart.
I-I have seen it overflowing with passion, but he just keeps it buried in stone with a tenacious willpower.
He is much more frightening than you.
Hmm.
It's turned chilly.
We've been sitting here too long.
No, I want to stay out here.
You can go on in, if you wish.
The night I left...
The night I left, you told me of a villa you own in the Mediterranean... ..where we might go for refuge and live as brother and sister.
I remember.
Jane.
Jane, are you still there?
I am here, sir.
Jane, that villa I mentioned... the, uh...
..separate bedrooms... the peck on the cheek on birthdays, that sort of thing...
Yes?
Well, that plan doesn't strike me as so attractive as it once did.
You do not want to be friends?
Jane, would you be so good as to come back here and sit beside me?
Jane, I want a wife.
I want a wife.
Not a nursemaid to look after me.
I want a wife... ..to share my bed every night.
All day, if we wish.
If I can't have that, I'd rather die.
We are not the platonic sort, Jane.
Can you see me?
Then hear this, Edward.
Your life is not yours to give up.
It is mine, all mine, and I forbid it.
No, George.
I told you You're not to work today.
You are part of the enterprise.
Sit down and don't move.
What's he doing?
Moving chairs.
Come on, everyone.
You must take your place.
INAUDIBLE
You must go directly behind us.
Grace...
Pilot, not on the chairs!
Right...
Stand there.
Where's the baby?
Jane, we're all ready.
Take your place beside me.
Coming!
Subtitles by Red Bee Media Ltd 2006
E-mail subtitling@bbc.co.uk
What's all this about you being a racist?
I don't think he found it offensive.
Don't talk to journalists, under any circumstances.
You're just going to drop in and say, "hello, goodbye" and run away again as per usual.
I'm staying with Dad.
Angela!
Angela, where are you?
I can help him beat this thing.
There's no reason he'd be bullied.
There's no reason I was bullied.
You must not lie.
He told his teacher I died in Iraq.
Stranger!
Stranger!
Ben!
I'm not called Ben.
WHISTLE BLOWS That was a foul.
I didn't dive!
SHOUTS OF ENCOURAGEMENT
Come on Ben, get up.
He didn't even touch you.
Get up!
Come on - it's a team game.
Ben!
You're Ben's dad.
Hi, I'm Rory's dad, Steve.
Hi, Pete.
Ben was round our place on Sunday.
He's quite a kid, isn't he?
Yeah, he's...quite a kid.
VOYAGES AND GRAVELS
Where is the rat?
She's behind the curtaim. where she always hides.
Mama!
Jane has knocked me down!
Take her up to the redroom immediately.
The child has the devil in her.
I've always said.
No!
No!
Not the redroom!
No!
No!
Not the redroom!
No!
Don't come back, Uncle Reed.
Please don't come back.
Uncle Reed, please don't come back.
Please.
Let me out!
Please help me.
Just let me out!
let me out!
Come along, John Yes, come on, John, we haven't got all day.
Don't worry.
I won't shoot you.
Unless we don't like the painting, that is .
Hello.
Shouldn't you be in the portrait?
There's still plenty of room.
Jane Eyre?
She's not part of the family.
It's no use looking at me like that, Jane.
I have tried my hardest, but you made it impossible.
I tried to carry out my dear husband's wishes.
But you have made it impossible.
You know you have.
You have deliberately made it impossible for me to love you.
Say something, unnatural child!
You have not tried very hard.
My uncle's dying wish was that you treat me as one of your children.
You have not tried to.
You dare to tell me...
That is why he haunts the redroom.
Because you've disobeyed him.
And on the day you die, God will know who is telling the truth.
Whatever you or I say now.
Come on, Miss Jane.
You have a visitor.
You must look your best.
I have tried so very hard.
You cannot believe how hard I have tried but...
There is the devil in the child.
What is your name, child?
Jane Eyre, sir.
Do you know, Jane Eyre, what happens to little children when they die?
They go to heaven.
And what happens to disobedient deceitful girls when they die?
They go to hell...
So what must you do to avoid this terrible fate?
I must take care to keep in good health and not to fall ill, sir.
Your aunt tells me that you are a deceitful child.
Is that true, Jane Eyre?
I am not a liar.
So do you say your aunt is a liar?
Ah, Jane Eyre...
How could I forget?
Step out here, Jane.
Jane Eyre, I'm sorry to have to tell you, is a liar.
The lesson of the day will be that lying is a sin.
That all liars deserve to be shunned by their fellows.
LIAR
Stand on that stool, Jane.
You will stay there until midnight, and you will not eat or drink but bow to beg God's forgiveness for your sin.
I wish I could escape to one of these places.
Somewhere where it's warm.
I believe you will.
But you'll have to work hard.
You have to accept that we've been left here by our families to fend for ourselves.
If you take advantage of the education here, .
if you are not too rebellious, and if you are patient, then you will find your way out.
We will both work our hardest and pray that God spares us until we are grown up.
And then what do we do?
I think when we grow up, we have to be teachers.
How do we ever get out of here, Helen?
We advertise.
There you are.
You're very cold, Jane.
Come on under my covers.
No, no!
God can't have her!
He can't take her!
God has already taken her, Jane.
You must be brave.
Helen, Helen.
Helen, Helen.
Girls look how the sun casts shadows on the flowers.
Helen Burns 1817 - 1829
Come on, girls, hurry up now.
Miss Eyre.
There appears to be a letter for you, Miss Eyre.
If Miss J.E. is in a position to give satisfactory references as to character and competency,
"then we will be happy to engage her as a governess to Miss Adele Varens,
"ward of Mr. Rochester of Thornfield Hall."
Ah, there's Thornfield Hall now, miss.
There's always a light burning in the tower.
Are you taking me to Mrs Fairfax?
In there.
Why, it's Miss Eyre!
At last!
Oh, we've been waiting for you for so long!
Oh, I'm Mrs. Fairfax.
Welcome to Thornfield.
My goodness, Miss Eyre.
How hungry you are.
You must have been travelling all day.
How long is it since you have sat beside the fire and eaten a hearty meal?
Oh, approximately eight years.
Oh, my goodness.
Eight years?
Hasn't sat by the fire for eight years?
Eight years.
I'll tell the master that when he gets back from abroad.
That will amuse even him.
Oh, not that he's without humour, of course.
Certainly not.
I remember he used to tell jokes as a child.
He keeps himself to himself, but you needn't worry.
He's hardly ever at home.
Always travelling.
Miss Eyre.
You are up early.
I hope you slept well.
Yes, thank you.
I was anxious to meet Adele.
Ah, yes.
Well, you won't have to wait long.
Does she play up there?
Oh, goodness me, no.
no one lives up there.
Oh, I thought I saw someone at the window.
There's only Grace Poole there.She does the laundry.
Ah!
Mrs. Fairfax...
I don't think Miss Adele can wait any longer.
My lover gets jealous...
I'm such a flirt!
I love pretty dresses...
He loves his money
I'm always losing my temper!
He's so impossible
Bonjour Mademoiselle Jane, encantada de conocerla.
(French)
Oh, thank goodness you will be able to understand her.
Now you can tell me what she is singing.
Well,
I believe it is a romance.
The woman is declaring her love for her sweetheart.
Merci,merci,merci.
I will dance another one.
Later, maybe..
But first you will show me to our school room.
Damn it!
Christ!
Quiet, Pilot!
Damn it.
Are you injured, sir?
Get away from me.
Witch, you've done enough damage.
I cannot think of leaving you, until I see you are fit to mount your horse.
You should be at home yourself, where do you live?
At Thornfield Hall.
I can fetch help, I'll ve a little while.
Do you think you can bring him over to me?
Come over here, come.
Come here, come here.
Hold this.
Thank you, Miss...
Jane Eyre, sir.
Well, that's what happens when you bewitch a man's horse, Miss Eyre.
A lot of pain and cursing.
I did not bewitch your horse, sir.
I was waiting for you to go past.
You were hovering.
Casting spells.
Now get off back to Thornfield hall, if that is indeed where you live.
I do.
But I will post my letter first.
Before I return.
Don't be late back...
Miss Jane Eyre
Ah, Miss Eyre, there you are.
What do you think?
The master is back.
Mr. Rochester.?
Not a word about his return, as usual, and he had an accident on the road.
The doctor is with him in the drawing room now.
Adele, come away!
Time for bed.
Mr. Rochester will see you tomorrow.
Miss Eyre,
Make yourself ready.
Master has finished his business for the day and wishes to see you.
Me?
Yes.
Oh, no, no, no. you must change.
This will have to do.
This will have to do.
Ah, Miss Eyre.
(French)
Does Miss Eyre require a present?
Excuse me, sir?
Does the governess expect me to have brought her a present back from my travels overseas?
No, sir.
What are you doing standing over there where I can't see you?
Where would you like me to stand, sir?
Here, sit.
Are you fond of presents, Miss Eyre?
I haredly know, sir.
I have little experience of them.
Never had a present?
I believe they are generally thought pleasant things, sir.
But to this frivolous little doll, this true daughter of Paris, they are the stuff of life, aren't they, my little... the thought of presents makes her live and breathe.
Monsieur Rochester?
(French)
Quiet!
While I talk to Miss Eyre.
Where are you from?
Lowood Institution, sir.
How long were you there?
Eight years.
I'm amazed you survived.
You're so small.
Didn't they feed you?
No, sir.
And how do you find yourself here and not still there?
I advertised, sir.
Of course you did.
What of your family?
I have none, sir.
None whatsoever?
Friends?
None, sir.
None at all?
I had a friend once.
But she died a long time ago, sir.
You're lucky, Miss Eyre.
If you do not love another living soul, then you'll never be disappointed.
Yes, sir.
Adele tells me you play the piano brilliantly.
I play a little, sir.
Of course, a little, that's what they all say.
Go over there and play.
Enough!
Yes.
You're right.
You do play a little.
These yours?
Yes, sir.
These are...
These are interesting.
The ideas all yours?
Yes, sir.
Were you happy when you painted these?
I was fully occupied.
I was not unhappy.
What do you think of me, Monsieur?
Do you think I look beautiful?
Shall I dance for you?
Miss Eyre, what are you thinking of?
It's very late.
Adele should be in bed.
And my foot hurts like the blazes.
Good night, sir.
So,
What did you think of Master?
He is very changeable.
Yes.
But he has...
He has had disappointments in his life.
I hope you will forgive his rough and ready ways.
You will not leave.
I've grown used to you.
I hope he won't scare you away.
I am not scared of rough manners.
He will be gone soon.
He never stays for more than a few days at a time.
Afternoon,miss.
Miss Eyre, come here.
Sit.
Not you, Pilot.
Miss Eyre, excuse me.
I am used to giving orders and having them obeyed.
Sit, if you please.
I beg your pardon, sir, I did not ask your permission to read the books.
Permission?
To read the books?
You are a thinking, intelligent woman, aren't you?
Why ever would you need to ask permission?
Who else is to read them?
Adele?
The venerable Fairfax?
I'd more likely find Pilot poring over the flora and fauna of the South American flatlands.
So, anyway, talk.
Talk, sir?
Yes, talk, if you please.
See how I'm learning to be polite.
I had a tedious day of mortgages and share prices and I would like to be entertained.
Entertained, sir?
Miss Eyre, can we proceed?
When I am tired, I tend to dwell on my darker thoughts.
I would like to entertain you, sir.
I am not sure what would interest you, though.
A smile.
A very small one.
The mere glimpse of a smile.
At last!
Tell me your thoughts.
I command you.
I was just thinking, sir, it's...
Not many employers would ask the opinion of someone they pay 30 a year to.
I pay you a salary, do I?
Well, of course I do.
Well, I should have my money's worth, then.
I can see there is another problem.
Out with it.
You haven't actually paid me anything yet, sir.
mercenary girl!
Fetch me my keys now!
You want my money in your hand before you will amuse me?
No, sir.
That will not be necessary, sir.
Maybe you could ask questions, sir?
Have you travelled, Miss Eyre?
No,sir.
All young people wish to travel.
Even if they find kindness and food and a fire, they wish to be gone.
I have travelled all over the world,Miss Eyre.
And it's very overrated.
Yes,sir.
When I was a young man, I was your equal.
I had a clear conscience, unpolluted by sin.
I took the wrong path.
It wasn't my fault that I took it, but...
I must bear the blame for continuing on it.
I think you may have a little of the witch about you.
You bewitched my horse.
You sit there, patiently, and would draw out secrets of my past.
I do not wish to pry,sir.
I know,Jane.
Do you think me handsome, Jane?
No,sir.
Look carefully.
If I were to tell you that I'm worth 20,000 ,
Surely the light from the fire would soften my features.
Do I not now seem to you now the very model of a fashionable man?
I do not think there is anything in science that will allow that, sir.
I spoke hastily,sir, I did not mean that I find you repellent...
What I meant is that it is the character inside that determines a person not the outer shell.
Take care,Jane.
Don't look too closely inside of me.
You might not find anything within at all beautiful.
And then where would we be?
Not important, no.
Is that Grace Poole?
Does she live alone in the North Tower?
North Tower catches the wind.
I don't know why, it makes me shiver just to think of it.
Miss Eyre, you're required!
This way,hurry up.
Oh,goodness, Miss Eyre.
The master has taken it into his head to give Adele a biology lesson, and we all have to hunt beetles.
Monsieur Rochester,we are bored with looking at the English water beetles.
They are not beautiful like the ones in your study.
Can I go with you, Monsieur Rochester,when you set off on your travels once more?
I will always wear my best dress and everyone will think I am pretty.
yes but if they see you for the shallow little creature that you are, no more substance than one of those meringues over there, well, then they will find you disgusting,my little Parisienne.
They would find me disgusting!
You are mistaken, Adele, if you do not think to find interesting creatures here in England.
There's a bird. it's a...
It's a quite nondescript grey colour and it's accustomed not to moving too quickly, not to draw attention to itself for fear of being beaten.
It wishes it could be in a cage.
But, sooner or later, slowly, day by day, its wings grow very strong nd if you were to look very closely, you would see brilliant scarlet feathers hidden under its drab wings.
Until one day, it has grown so confident that it flaps its red wings and flies straight upwards into the sky and those lucky enough to catch it in flight think that they have caught a glimpse of a firebird.
And then?
Well, then it flies away somewhere warm and never comes back.
I don't think I believe in this bird.
It's true.
There is one here at Thornfield in the gardens if you look very hard.
Madame Fairfax,
Monsieur Rochester said the ladies will say I'm disgusting.
Oh, that's nice, dear.
Come, Miss Eyre, you have something to say?
You should not tease, sir.
She is just a child.
She is.
But she's also selfobsessed, thoughtless, vain.
You've made great headway with her even in the past few months, but look at her.
Just like her mother.
I saw what the mother became.
That is no reason to despise the child.
Do you really think?
If the blood is tainted, won't I be failing in my duty to her to let her remain like this and not to try my best to correct her ways?
She does not deserve to be ridiculed or despised.
She's a child,
She deserves that you should trust her.
That she'll grow and learn and...
Miss Eyre?
No, thank you, Adele.
We shall see, Miss Eyre.
Come on.
Adele, don't run!
What's the matter with Sophie?
She doesn't like les malades, the mad people.
No, Pilot.
No, you don't belong here.
Go back to your master.
Pilot, come here!
Jane, come and look at this fellow.
Look at his wings.
I have seen one like this in the West Indies, but never here.
That will teach me to tease Adele.
Come, sit down with me for a while.
Sit
As it is now your job as well as mine to bring Adele up correctly,
I am going to tell you about her.
About where she came from and who she belongs to.
Maybe you'll understand.
You do not need to tell me anything.
I know.
You understand too much without me saying anything.
It is the witch in you.
You have to imagine a young man.
Well, one who is still youngish and who has made a mistake, not his fault, but ... this mistake and the darkness that follows it
have set him helterskelter around the world in search of beauty to help ease his soul.
And he does find beauty, or rather, beauty finds him because, as you will guess, this is a very rich youngish man.
That look.
No judgement, no pity.
That look could prise secrets from the blackest souls.
Where were we?
Beauty finding a youngish man.
Ah, yes.
So, on our whirlwind tour, we alight in Paris.
Now, Jane, imagine, I know it's difficult.
Imagine a suite of rooms in a particularly gorgeous Parisian hotel.
It is upholstered with velvets and furs.
Everything is sensuous to the touch, the best that this youngish man's money can buy.
It is a summer evening and there is perfume in the air.
The young man breathes in the scent of his lover, musk and amber.
Her name is Celine Varens.
She is very beautiful.
She is a dancer.
An exotic bird.
She dotes on him and he is passionately in love with her.
He's had a fortunate night gambling, and he waits for her now in anticipation of the dark, intoxicating hours ahead.
Are you still with me, Jane?
I am here, sir.
At last, he hears the sound of her return.
Only a few more seconds' wait until he sees her.
An eternity passes.
At that very moment...as I stood in the shadows, the green snake of jealousy bit into my heart.
Where is your beast of an Englishman tonight?
Gambling.
Someone else can look at his unpleasant face.
He is very presentable, really, for an Englishman.
20,000 pounds make him very presentable.
She wasn't as clearsighted as you are, Jane.
You find me unattractive despite my wealth.
You do not know what it is to feel jealousy, do you, Jane?
Because you have no idea what it is to love.
You have no idea what it is to feel the very beat of someone's heart within one's breast.
No, sir.
Do you still love her, sir?
Who?
Celine?
I mean, Miss Varens?
Good God, no.
No, I threw her out of the hotel room and I shot him in the shoulder or some insignificant place.
No, when I saw what a wretched fool she had meddled with,
I knew that she could never love me.
That's obvious, surely.
And Adeld?
She left her in the hotel when she ran off.
Celine claimed that I was the father, but ... a fairly elementary study of biology would prove that impossible.
Tell me, Jane.
Is there anything about me that remotely resembles Adele?
Look at me carefully.
No, sir.
She left her in the hotel.l...
A parcel, a label on with my name.
What was I to do?
Leave her there to starve?
I provided for her in France.
Then, a few months ago, it was necessary to bring her here.
She was not my responsibility, but I took her on just the same.
So, ... as her guardian and your master, what do you think of my behaviour, Miss Eyre?
Did I do the right thing?
It was the right thing to do, wasn't it£¬Jane?
Yes, sir.
Go away, Pilot.
Pilot, go back to your master.
Who is there?
Hello?
Hello?
Kids, as you know, Christmas is a time you spend with your family.
So in December of 2006, I had three options.
Spend it with my mom and her new boyfriend Clint, spend it with my dad and his new girlfriend micro-brewing, or head down to Staten Island to spend it with my super religious cousin Stacy and her family.
So I opted for none of the above and decided to spend Christmas 2006 in Manhattan... celebrating with my other family.
Okay, I have one last paper due at 5:00 p.m. today, so until then, I will be at the law library at school, but I'm not to be disturbed for any reason.
Dude, open your eyes.
You're going to hurt yourself.
No, no.
Christmas Eve winter wonderland is my reward for finishing my paper.
Baby, do I smell your Sinfully Cinnamon Cookies?
Yes.
Damn me and my heightened other senses.
Must be strong.
Okay, I'll be back here at 5:00.
Save me at least 20 cookies and do not clean the bowl.
Was that a reindeer?
I don't want to know!
Hey, look.
Our old answering machine.
Oh, yeah.
After you left, we, uh, we unplugged it because it reminded Marshall of how you used to, you know, leave messages.
But hey, you guys are back together.
I say we're plugging it back in.
It's good to have you back.
Thanks.
Oh, hey, look, there's still some messages on here.
Hey Ted, it's Dad calling to check in.
I'm going fishing this weekend with my friend Clint, so if I don't hear from you beforehand, I'll talk to you next week.
Yes, same Clint.
Hey, Marshall.
Are you lying on the couch right now moping about Lily?
You are, aren't you?
Well, stop it.
She's not worth it.
You gotta get over that Grinch.
But I didn't say "Grinch."
I said a bad word.
A very, very bad word.
Oh, fudge.
But I didn't say fudge.
Sync by vNaru
I'm... a what?
I-
- That was Barney, that was Barney.
- That was you, Ted.
- That was Marshall.
Marshall left a message for Marshall?
You know, it may have been me, but it was so long ago.
Man, that machine, it really garbles your voice.
You know, it almost made it sound like I said...
Why would you call me that?
It was a fair question.
Marshall's breakup with Lily had sent him into a deep depression and nothing could get him out of it.
Until one day...
She was perfect.
I lost the perfect woman.
I should have knocked her up when I had the chance.
Okay.
That's it.
You're never going to get over her until you stop putting her on a pedestal.
So no more ice cream until you tell me one thing that's wrong with Lily.
There's only one of her?
Okay.
She called off your wedding and dumped you to be a painter in San Francisco.
What do you call that?
Fiercely independent?
Brave?
I guess it was a little selfish.
There you go.
And in almost no time, that spark turned into a roaring fire.
Yeah.
No, you're right.
Lily would laugh at anything.
She'd give it up for a bad pun.
I'm telling you, she's a laugh slut.
Remember that time we heard her laughing and we thought she was watching Weekend At Bernie's, but it turned out she was watching Weekend At Bernie's 2?
And her art?
"I'm Lily, I'm an artist."
She doesn't even own a beret.
Yeah, and if she's such a great "artist,"
why does she suck at Pictionary?
Who draws a ninja star like a Star of David?
Right, right?
Yeah!
- Another round!
- Yeah!
I was trying to help him.
I'm his best friend.
That's the best friend's job.
The best friend's job is to call me that word?
Yeah.
Oh, Ted.
Oh, Teddy boy.
Why is this such a big deal?
It's just a word.
We use lots of words, every day.
It shouldn't be any different than any other word.
Then why don't you say it now?
Grinch.
You timed that didn't you?
Perfectly.
Well, at least you apologized.
You apologized, didn't you?
Oh, yeah.
"I'm sorry" were the first words out of my mouth.
I'm sorry, but I am not apologizing.
I was just trying to put the guy back together.
You smashed him to pieces.
Are you seriously not going to apologize for leaving that message?
- No!
- Why not?
Because, Lily, this summer, you were kind of a Grinch.
- Oooh.
- Oooh.
Oh, you'll be sorry, Ted Mosby.
Ted Vivian Mosby!
That's not my middle name.
00:05:00,351 -- 00:05:02,015 You kiss your mother with that mouth?
Like you've never said that word.
I don't kiss your mother with my mouth.
Yet.
Are you sick?
Is it sick to find maturity and experience sexy?
No, I meant do you have a cold?
I'm fine.
I'm fine.
My nose is just overflowing with awesome and I had to get some of it out.
Now, if you'll excuse me, the holidays are a time when people are lonely and desperate.
It's the most wonderful time of the year.
I should go apologize.
It's Christmas Eve.
Yeah.
I mean, slamming doors and screaming curses?
If I wanted that, I would have gone home for the holidays.
I don't see any mistletoe, but...
Oh!
Oh, God!
Uh... "Bless you" would have been nice.
- You're sick.
- I'm not sick.
- You're sick.
- You know what?
I am sick.
Sick of you telling me I'm sick.
What up?
Ahh...
Three flights of stairs, not a drop spilled.
Hey, buddy.
You sure this is gonna work?
Yeah, this is our thing.
In college, whenever I wanted to make up with her, I'd buy her a beer.
- Cute, right?
- Totally.
Plus free mug.
Okay, come on.
Usually that would've done the trick, but it turned out this was a problem not even alcohol could solve.
Actually the beer helped a little.
She took the decorations.
She took the decorations!
What a Grinch!
That time I did say "Grinch."
All right.
I guess I have to call her, right?
Lily's cell phone.
She'll listen to reason-- right?
Oh, hey, Billy.
Actually, funny thing-- the voice dial got you.
I was trying to call...
Oh, I'm sorry to hear that.
Yeah, the holidays are a rough time for everyone, Billy.
Okay, yeah, dinner next Wednesday.
Okay.
Damn voice dial.
Barney!
What the hell are you doing?
Get in here, it's freezing outside.
Are you insane?
Hey, blame Lily and her oppressive "no cigars in the apartment rule."
God, it's like Marshall's marrying the Taliban.
High five.
Eww.
No.
You have to go home and get to bed.
Oh, Robin, my simple friend from the untamed north, let me tell you about a little thing I like to call mind over body.
You see, whenever I start feeling sick,
I just stop being sick and be awesome instead.
True story.
Yeah, in two minutes,
I'm going to pound a sixer of Red Bull, hop in a cab, play a couple of hours of laser tag, maybe get a spray-on tan.
It's gonna be legen...
Wait for it...
Lily!
Merry Christmas, assface.
Um, Lily?
Where are the Christmas decorations?
At my apartment.
You want to bring them back so we can celebrate Christmas together-- please?
Ted, do you know what I would do if one of my kindergartners used that kind of language?
I would be on the phone with their parents.
Yeah, I'm not a kindergartner.
Exactly.
You know what that word means.
You know that calling people names is mean and hurtful... assface.
Lily, if you don't bring that stuff back right now, we...
She hung up.
She's just mad.
She'll cool down.
Lily...
Don't forget to take the cookies out of the oven... assface!
Damn it!
I could be in Cleveland right now making peppermint lager with my dad.
Where are you going?
Marshall gets home in three hours.
He's gonna show up-- no Lily, no winter wonderland.
I gotta get up to the Bronx.
...dary.
Hey, dude, how's the paper going?
Screw the paper, how's the winter wonderland?
Is it magical?
Oh... so magical.
When you walk through the door, does it feel like you've been slapped in the face by Christmas?
Sure does.
Look, I gotta go.
Come on, man, describe it!
Tell me about the decorations.
Is Rudolph there?
He is, isn't he?
Hi, Rudolph!
Ah, yeah, but, you know... decorations, is that really what Christmas is about?
Hell, yeah!
What else would it be about?
Uh, try the birth of Christ.
You know, Christmas-- Christ Mas, which means "More Christ" to our Spanish friends.
Yeah, well, all I know is walking in that door and seeing the winter wonderland and seeing Lily and all you guys, just...
I can't wait.
Right.
I gotta go.
Right.
Okay.
Oh, wait.
Ted, Ted, Ted, Ted.
One more thing.
How about the cookies?
Are they delicious?
You know, honestly, they taste a little store-bought.
Oh!
I got another call.
Well, tell Lily I love her.
Right.
- Hello?
- Ted Evelyn Mosby!
Oh.
Uh, hey, Mom.
Merry Christmas.
I just got the most disturbing call from Lily.
How could you use such a horrible word?
Oh, God, she called you?
Are you acting out because of the divorce?
Is-is this all about Clint?
No, Mom, why would it be about Clint?
Hey, buddy, it's Clint.
How you doing, champ?
Hey, Clint.
Listen, um, I don't really have time to...
Hey, hey, no, no, no.
Ted, Ted.
You don't know this yet, but you and I are going to be great friends.
Now, the Native Americans have this ritual...
This is a low moment for the Barnacle.
I should be off playing laser tag right now, but instead...
Don't look at me.
I'm hideous.
You just look like a regular guy.
Exactly.
I'm a Ted.
I'm wearing elastic-waist fleece pants.
And isn't it more comfy?
Yes.
Come on, you need eat something.
Too weak... to hold... bowl.
Fine, I'll feed you.
Ouchie in my mouth!
I don't want it.
I want ice cream.
No, you're not having ice cream for dinner just 'cause you're sick.
- But my throat hurts.
- No.
I hate you!
Don't leave me.
Who is it?
Pizza delivery.
Whoa.
Hey, you tricked me.
You really thought I was the pizza delivery guy?
No, I knew it was you.
I just thought you'd at least bring a pizza.
Yeah, well,
I brought a beer, but I gave it to a homeless guy.
All right, he took it from me.
Now, will you please come home?
No, I'm not spending Christmas with you.
Okay, I'm sorry for calling you a... that word, over the summer, and for saying it again today.
And for thinking it a lot on the subway ride over.
I had no right to say that.
It was hurtful and immature and I'm sorry.
Oh, shut up.
You think I don't know your fake apologies by now, Ted Mosby?
Huh?
You're clearly still mad at me.
- I'm not mad at you.
- Yes, you are.
I am not mad at you, Lily.
Now, can we please just...
I've apologized to Marshall and he's forgiven me and we've moved passed it.
Why can't you?
Because you never apologized to me.
Marshall's not the only one you walked out on.
You leave for three months, you don't even call.
Come on, Lily, we're supposed to be friends!
Yeah, some friend, you called me a Grinch.
- You were a Grinch!
- How can you...
Grinchy, Grinch, Grinch, Grinch, Grinch, Grinch, Grinch.
Happy?
Now, you've pissed off the big guy upstairs.
Yeah, I'm sure God cares if I...
You use that language again and I'll turn off your water!
That's my super.
He lives above me.
Great.
Thanks to your filthy mouth, now I'm going to have Christmas alone in the dark.
Fine.
I don't want to ruin Christmas.
You can have the apartment.
Don't worry about seeing me there
I'll be in Staten Island with my cousin Stacy.
Just....
Ow.
Merry Christmas.
You're spending Christmas Eve with your family?
Baby, that sucks.
I'm so sorry.
Uh, they're fine.
They're just...
they're a little weird.
You know they don't believe in gifts or Christmas trees.
And they think Santa's how Satan spells his name when he wants to trick us.
Well, do you want me to go with you?
Was that a sincere offer?
First tell me your answer.
Stay there.
Save yourself.
We'll spend all day together tomorrow.
Okay.
Oh, how's Barney feeling?
You mean the whiney bottomless pit of neediness?
He was bugging me, so I spiked his echinacea tea with codeine.
You're gonna be a great mom.
Holy crap, the magical Christmas season is upon us.
And thank God we don't pay for utilities.
Merry Christmas!
What's in the box?
Only the best present for the best girl ever.
It took me all day to track it down.
I thought you were writing a paper.
Ah, naw, I blew that off.
I'll get an extension.
School's not important.
What is that pitter patter on the roof?
Could it be the sound of an awesome Christmas story about to come down the chimney?
Why, yes, it is.
'Twas the day before Christmas...
It was supposed to arrive, like, five days ago, but then it got lost and rerouted.
I checked two other branches, finally they told me it was here.
Yeah, all I needed to know was the tracking number.
Looks like it's headed out to our regional branch in Poughkeepsie.
What?
No, no, no, no, I need that package today.
Listen, the truck already left five minutes ago, so unless you want to run after it...
Stop!
Stop!
Stop, please, stop.
Stop.
Stop the truck.
I need a package on your truck.
Can I please take a look in back?
Sure.
But I gotta keep driving my route.
I'm running behind.
My bad.
I'm okay.
Hey, man, thanks for helping me make my fiancée's Christmas.
No problem.
Too bad I can't deliver all these packages by the end of the day.
Wait, so some people aren't going to get their gifts in time for Christmas?
Sadly, no.
♪ They call me back door Santa ♪
♪ I make my runs ♪ ♪ about the break of day ♪
♪ They call me back door Santa ♪
♪ I make my runs ♪ ♪ about the break of day ♪
♪ Oh, ho, ho ♪
♪ I make all ♪ ♪ the little girls happy... ♪
We delivered every single package on that truck.
But I still have one package left to give.
Yeah, I did.
Merry Christmas.
- Open it, Baby.
- Okay.
Oh, my God.
An Easy Bake Oven!
I've wanted one of these ever since I was a little girl.
In this exact model.
I never told you that.
How did you know?
It's our first Christmas since we got back together.
I want to get her something really special.
So I'm getting her a jukebox.
Wow, that's a great gift.
Not really.
It's this big and it dispenses gum.
Oh, man, I know something you could get her that would blow her mind.
Ready?
Eight years ago...
When I was a kid, all I wanted was an Easy Bake Oven.
I begged and I begged, but all I got was a stupid Lego set because my feminist mom didn't want me conforming to traditional gender roles.
Easy Bake Oven-- that's what I'm going to call my van.
Dude... how was the concert?
I couldn't find the outside.
I can't believe Ted remembered after all these years.
Yeah, and after all that weed.
Where is he anyway?
Staten Island.
Why?
Okay, don't tell your mom, but I got you guys some presents.
Like the gift of God's love?
No, dude, real presents.
Uncle Ted got us presents!
That's okay, Ted, we'll just give them to charity.
Yay!
Uh, not you, Charity.
I meant the less fortunate.
Ted, how would you like to say grace tonight?
Uh, you know what, why don't you say it.
I really wouldn't know what to say.
Why don't you recite your favorite passage of scripture.
That's a great idea, Charity.
But, really, I don't know.
I mean how do you choose your favorite passage?
It's the Bible; there's so many...
great ones...
That one from Pulp Fiction's pretty cool.
Ooh, I'll get it.
Charity, I'm tapping you in.
Dear, Father, thank you for this day, and thank you for bringing this family together.
Amen.
Who is it, Ted?
Uh, it's...
it's just, um, carolers.
♪ Silent night ♪
♪ Holy night... ♪
I came here to apologize.
I'm so sorry, Ted.
I accept.
Give me the beer.
Oh, oh, it is so good to see you guys.
Are you coming home?
Totally.
But first, Lily, I owe you an apology.
Oh, for the love of God, are you as sick of apologies as I am?
Yes!
Can we just skip the apology and go straight to the forgiving?
Yes.
And I promise, I will never ever call you a... you know, again.
That's okay.
I was kind of a Grinch.
What's a Grinch?
Nothing.
It's something you shouldn't say.
Mom, what's a Grinch?
Grinch, Grinch, Grinch...
Merry Christmas, everybody.
Run, run.
Merry Christmas, Marshall.
Fsx you spend with your family.
So in December of 2006, I had three options.
Spend it with my mom and her new boyfriend Clint, spend it with my dad and his new girlfriend micro-brewing, or head down to Staten Island to spend it with my super religious cousin Stacy in her family
So I opted for none of the above and decided to spend Christmas 2006 in Manhattan... celebrating with my other family.
Okay, I have one last paper due at 5:00 p.m. today, so until then, I will be at the law library at school, but I'm not to be disturbed for any reason.
Dude, open your eyes.
You're going to hurt yourself.
No, no.
Christmas Eve winter wonderland is my reward for finishing my paper.
Oh.
Baby, do I smell your Sinfully Cinnamon Cookies?
Yes.
Damn me and my heightened other senses.
Must be strong.
Okay, I'll be back here at 5:00.
Save me at least 20 cookies and do not clean the bowl.
Was that a reindeer?
I don't want to know!
Hey, look.
Our old answering machine.
Oh, yeah.
After you left, we, uh, we unplugged it because it reminded Marshall of how you used to, you know, leave messages.
But hey, you guys are back together.
I say we're plugging it back in.
It's good to have you back.
Thanks.
Oh, hey, look, there's still some messages on here.
MR. MOSBY:
Hey Ted, it's Dad calling to check in.
I'm going fishing this weekend with my friend Clint, so if I don't hear from you beforehand,
I'll talk to you next week.
Yes, same Clint.
TED (on machine):
Hey, Marshall.
Are you lying on the couch right now moping about Lily?
You are, aren't you?
Oh...
Well, stop it.
She's not worth it.
You gotta get over that Grinch.
But I didn't say "Grinch."
I said a bad word.
A very, very bad word.
Oh, fudge.
But I didn't say fudge.
a what?
I--
That was Barney, that was Barney.
That was you, Ted.
That was Marshall.
Marshall left a message for Marshall?
You know, it may have been me, but it was so long ago.
Man, that machine, it really garbles your voice.
You know, it almost made it sound like I said...
Why would you call me that?
It was a fair question.
Marshall's breakup with Lily had sent him into a deep depression and nothing could get him out of it.
(moans)
Until one day...
She was perfect.
I lost the perfect woman.
I should have knocked her up when I had the chance.
Okay.
That's it.
You're never going to get over her until you stop putting her on a pedestal.
So no more ice cream until you tell me one thing that's wrong with Lily.
There's only one of her?
Okay.
She called off your wedding and dumped you to be a painter in San Francisco.
What do you call that?
Fiercely independent?
Uh-uh.
Brave?
I guess it was a little selfish.
There you go.
And in almost no time, that spark turned into a roaring fire.
Yeah.
No, you're right.
Lily would laugh at anything.
She'd give it up for a bad pun.
I'm telling you, she's a laugh slut.
Remember that time we heard her laughing and we thought she was watching Weekend At Bernie's, but it turned out she was watching Weekend At Bernie's 2?
And her art?
"I'm Lily, I'm an artist."
She doesn't even own a beret.
Yeah, and if she's such a great "artist,"
why does she suck at Pictionary?
Who draws a ninja star like a Star of David?
Come on, come on.
Right, right?
Yeah!
Another round!
(laughing):
Yeah!
I was trying to help him.
I'm his best friend.
That's the best friend's job.
The best friend's job is to call me that word?
Yeah.
Oh, Ted.
Oh, Teddy boy.
Why is this such a big deal?
It's just a word.
We use lots of words, every day.
It shouldn't be any different than any other word.
Then why don't you say it now?
Grinch.
You timed that didn't you?
Perfectly.
Well, at least you apologized.
You apologized, didn't you?
Oh, yeah.
"I'm sorry" were the first words out of my mouth.
I'm sorry, but I am not apologizing.
I was just trying to put the guy back together.
You smashed him to pieces.
Are you seriously not going to apologize for leaving that...?
No!
Why not?
Because, Lily, this summer, you were kind of a Grinch.
BOTH:
Oooh.
Oh, you'll be sorry, Ted Mosby.
Ted Vivian Mosby!
That's not my middle name.
You kiss your mother with that mouth?
Like you've never said that word.
I don't kiss your mother with my mouth.
Yet.
Are you sick?
Is it sick to find maturity and experience sexy?
No, I meant do you have a cold?
I'm fine.
I'm fine.
My nose is just overflowing with awesome and I had to get some of it out.
Now, if you'll excuse me, the holidays are a time when people are lonely and desperate.
It's the most wonderful time of the year.
I should go apologize.
It's Christmas Eve.
Yeah.
I mean, slamming doors and screaming curses?
If I wanted that, I would have gone home for the holidays.
I don't see any mistletoe, but...
Oh!
Oh, God!
Uh... "Bless you" would have been nice.
You're sick.
I'm not sick.
You're sick.
You know what?
I am sick.
Sick of you telling me I'm sick.
What up?
Ahh...
Three flights of stairs, not a drop spilled.
Hey, buddy.
You sure this is gonna work?
Yeah, this is our thing.
In college, whenever I wanted to make up with her, I'd buy her a beer.
Cute, right?
Totally.
Plus free mug.
Usually that would've done the trick, but it turned out this was a problem not even alcohol could solve.
Actually the beer helped a little.
She took the decorations.
She took the decorations.
What a grinch.
That time i did say grinch.
All right,
I guess I have to call her, right?
Lily's cell phone.
She'll listen to reason, right?
Oh, hey Lilly,
Actually funny thing, the voice dial got you, I was trying to call...
Oh, I'm sorry to hear that.
Yeah, the holidays are a rough time for everyone, Billy.
Okay, yeah, dinner next Wednesday.
Okay.
Damn voice dial.
Barney!
What the hell are you doing?
Get in here, it's freezing outside.
Are you insane?
Hey, blame Lily and her oppressive "no cigars in the apartment rule."
God, it's like Marshall's marrying the Taliban.
(sneezes)
High five.
Eww.
No.
You have to go home and get to bed.
Oh, Robin, my simple friend from the untamed north, let me tell you about a little thing I like to call mind over body.
You see, whenever I start feeling sick,
I just stop being sick and be awesome instead.
True story.
Yeah, in two minutes,
I'm going to pound a sixer of Red Bull, hop in a cab, play a couple of hours of laser tag, maybe get a spray-on tan.
It's gonna be legen...
Wait for it... (snoring softly)
Lily!
Merry Christmas, assface.
Um, Lily?
Where are the Christmas decorations?
At my apartment.
You want to bring them back so we can celebrate Christmas together-- please?
Ted, do you know what I would do if one of my kindergartners used that kind of language?
I would be on the phone with their parents.
Yeah, I'm not a kindergartner.
Exactly.
You know what that word means.
You know that calling people names is mean and hurtful... assface.
Lily, if you don't bring that stuff back right now, we...
She hung up.
She's just mad.
She'll cool down.
Mm-hmm.
(phone ringing)
Aha.
Lily...
Don't forget to take the cookies out of the oven... assface!
Damn it!
I could be in Cleveland right now making peppermint lager with my dad.
Where are you going?
Marshall gets home in three hours.
He's gonna show up-- no Lily, no winter wonderland.
I gotta get up to the Bronx.
...dary.
(phone ringing)
Hey, dude, how's the paper going?
Screw the paper, how's the winter wonderland?
Is it magical?
Oh... so magical.
When you walk through the door, does it feel like you've been slapped in the face by Christmas?
Sure does.
Look, I gotta go.
Come on, man, describe it!
Tell me about the decorations.
Is Rudolph there?
He is, isn't he?
Hi, Rudolph!
Ah, yeah, but, you know...
Decorations, is that really what Christmas is about?
Hell, yeah!
What else would it be about?
Uh, try the birth of Christ.
You know, Christmas-- Christ Mas, which means "More Christ" to our Spanish friends.
Yeah, well, all I know is walking in that door and seeing the winter wonderland and seeing Lily and all you guys, just...
I can't wait.
Right.
I gotta go.
Right.
Okay.
Oh, wait.
Ted, Ted, Ted, Ted.
One more thing.
How about the cookies?
Are they delicious?
(shrieking)
You know, honestly, they taste a little store-bought.
Oh!
I got another call.
Well, tell Lily I love her.
Right.
Hello?
Ted Evelyn Mosby!
Oh.
Uh, hey, Mom.
Merry Christmas.
I just got the most disturbing call from Lily.
How could you use such a horrible word?
Oh, God, she called you?
Are you acting out because of the divorce?
Is-is this all about Clint?
No, Mom, why would it be about Clint?
Hey, buddy, it's Clint.
How you doing, champ?
Hey, Clint.
Listen, um,
Hey, hey, no, I don't really have time to... no, no.
Ted,Ted.
You don't know this yet, but you and I are going to be great friends.
Now, the Native Americans have this ritual...
(coughing)
(sighs)
This is a low moment for the Barnacle.
I should be off playing laser tag right now, but instead...
Don't look at me.
I'm hideous.
You just look like a regular guy.
Exactly.
I'm a Ted.
I'm wearing elastic-waist fleece pants.
And isn't it more comfy?
Yes.
Come on, you need eat something.
Too weak... to hold... bowl.
Fine, I'll feed you.
Mmm.
Ouchie in my mouth!
I don't want it.
I want ice cream.
No, you're not having ice cream for dinner just 'cause you're sick.
But my throat hurts.
No.
I hate you!
Oh.
Don't leave me.
(knock at door)
Who is it?
Pizza delivery.
Whoa.
Hey, you tricked me.
You really thought I was the pizza delivery guy?
No, I knew it was you.
I just thought you'd at least bring a pizza.
Yeah, well, I brought a beer, but I gave it to a homeless guy.
All right, he took it from me.
Now, will you please come home?
No, I'm not spending Christmas with you.
Okay, I'm sorry for calling you a... that word, over the summer, and for saying it again today.
And for thinking it a lot on the subway ride over.
I had no right to say that.
It was hurtful and immature and I'm sorry.
Oh, shut up.
You think I don't know your fake apologies by now, Ted Mosby?
Huh?
You're clearly still mad at me.
I'm not mad at you.
Yes, you are.
I am not mad at you, Lily.
Now, can we please just...
I've apologized to Marshall and he's forgiven me and we've moved passed it.
Why can't you?
Because you never apologized to me.
Marshall's not the only one you walked out on.
You leave for three months, you don't even call.
Come on, Lily, we're supposed to be friends!
Yeah, some friend, you called me a Grinch.
You were a Grinch!
How can you...
Grinchy, grinch, grinch, grinch grinch, grinch, grinch.
Happy?
Now, you've pissed off the big guy upstairs.
Yeah, I'm sure God cares if I...
BIG GUY UPSTAIRS:
You use that language again and I'll turn off your water!
That's my super.
He lives above me.
Great.
Thanks to your filthy mouth, now I'm going to have Christmas alone in the dark.
Fine.
I don't want to ruin Christmas.
You can have the apartment.
Don't worry about seeing me there
I'll be in Staten Island with my cousin Stacy.
Just....
Ow.
Merry Christmas.
You're spending Christmas Eve with your family?
Baby, that sucks.
I'm so sorry.
Uh, they're fine.
They're just... they're a little weird.
You know they don't believe in gifts or Christmas trees.
And they think Santa's how Satan spells his name when he wants to trick us.
Well, do you want me to go with you?
Was that a sincere offer?
First tell me your answer.
Stay there.
Save yourself.
We'll spend all day together tomorrow.
Okay.
Oh, how's Barney feeling?
You mean the whiney bottomless pit of neediness?
He was bugging me, so I spiked his echinacea tea with codeine.
You're gonna be a great mom.
Mm-hmm.
Holy crap, the magical Christmas season is upon us.
And thank God we don't pay for utilities.
Merry Christmas!
What's in the box?
Only the best Christmas present for the best girl ever.
It took me all day to track it down.
I thought you were writing a paper.
Ah, naw, I blew that off.
I'll get an extension.
School's not important.
What is that pitter patter on the roof?
Could it be the sound of an awesome Christmas story about to come down the chimney?
Why, yes, it is.
'Twas the day before Christmas...
It was supposed to arrive, like, five days ago, but then it got lost and rerouted.
I checked two other branches, finally they told me it was here.
Yeah, all I needed to know was the tracking number.
Looks like it's headed out to our regional branch in Poughkeepsie.
What?
No, no, no, no, I need that package today.
Listen, the truck already left five minutes ago, so unless you want to run after it...
Stop!
Stop!
Stop, please, stop.
Stop the truck.
(panting):
I need a package on your truck.
Can I please take a look in back?
Sure.
But I gotta keep driving my route.
I'm running behind.
(screeching)
Whoa.
WPD DRIVER:
My bad.
I'm okay.
Hey, man, thanks for helping me make my fiancée's Christmas.
No problem.
Too bad I can't deliver all these packages by the end of the day.
Wait, so some people aren't going to get their gifts in time for Christmas?
Sadly, no.
* They call me back door Santa *
* I make my runs about the break of day *
* They call me back door Santa *
* I make my runs about the break of day *
* Oh, ho, ho *
* I make all the little girls happy... *
We delivered every single package on that truck.
Oh.
But I still have one package left to give.
Mmm.
Yeah, I did.
(giggles)
Merry Christmas.
Open it, Baby.
Okay.
Ah.
Oh, my God.
An Easy Bake Oven!
I've wanted one of these ever since I was a little girl.
In this exact model.
I never told you that.
How did you know?
It's our first Christmas since we got back together.
I want to get her something really special.
So I'm getting her a jukebox.
Wow, that's a great gift.
Not really.
It's this big and it dispenses gum.
Oh, man, I know something you could get her that would blow her mind out.
Ready?
Eight years ago... (reggae playing)
When I was a kid, all I wanted was an Easy Bake Oven.
I begged and I begged, but all I got was a stupid Lego set because my feminist mom didn't want me conforming to traditional gender roles.
Easy Bake Oven-- that's what I'm going to call my van.
Dude... how was the concert?
I couldn't find the outside.
(laughing)
I can't believe Ted remembered after all these years.
Yeah, and after all that weed.
Where is he anyway?
Staten Island.
Why?
Okay, don't tell your mom, but I got you guys some presents.
Like the the gift of God's love?
No, dude, real presents.
Uncle Ted got us presents!
That's okay, Ted, we'll just give them to charity.
Yay!
Uh, not you, Charity.
I meant the less fortunate.
Ted, how would you like to say grace tonight?
Uh, you know what, why don't you say it.
I really wouldn't know what to say.
Why don't you recite your favorite passage of scripture.
That's a great idea, Charity.
But, really, I don't know.
I mean how do you choose your favorite passage?
It's the Bible;
there's so many...
great ones...
That one from Pulp Fiction's pretty cool.
(doorbell ringing) Ooh, I'll get it.
Charity, I'm tapping you in.
Dear, Father, thank you for this day, and thank you for bringing this family together.
Amen.
Who is it, Ted?
Uh, it's...
it's just, um, carolers.
* Silent night *
ALL:
* Holy night... *
I came here to apologize.
I'm so sorry, Ted.
I accept.
Give me the beer.
Mm, oh, it is so good to see you guys.
Are you coming home?
Totally.
But first, Lily, I owe you an apology.
Oh, for the love of God, are you as sick of apologies as I am?
Yes!
Can we just skip the apology and go straight to the forgiving?
Yes.
And I promise, I will never ever call you a... you know, again.
That's okay.
I was kind of a Grinch.
What's a Grinch?
Nothing.
It's something you shouldn't say.
Mom, what's a Grinch?
Grinch, Grinch, Grinch... (kids chanting):
Grinch, Grinch, Grinch Grinch, Grinch, Grinch Grinch, Grinch, Grinch Grinch, Grinch...
Merry Christmas, everybody.
Merry Christmas, Marshall.
Kids, as you know, Christmas is a time you spend with your family.
So in December of 2006, I had three options.
Spend it with my mom and her new boyfriend Clint, spend it with my dad and his new girlfriend micro-brewing, or head down to Staten Island to spend it with my super religious cousin Stacy and her family.
So I opted for none of the above and decided to spend Christmas 2006 in Manhattan... celebrating with my other family.
Okay, I have one last paper due at 5:00 p.m. today, so until then, I will be at the law library at school, but I'm not to be disturbed for any reason.
Dude, open your eyes.
You're going to hurt yourself.
No, no.
Christmas Eve winter wonderland is my reward for finishing my paper.
Baby, do I smell your Sinfully Cinnamon Cookies?
Yes.
Damn me and my heightened other senses.
Must be strong.
Okay, I'll be back here at 5:00.
Save me at least 20 cookies and do not clean the bowl.
Was that a reindeer?
I don't want to know!
Hey, look.
Our old answering machine.
Oh, yeah.
After you left, we, uh, we unplugged it because it reminded Marshall of how you used to, you know, leave messages.
But hey, you guys are back together.
I say we're plugging it back in.
It's good to have you back.
Thanks.
Oh, hey, look, there's still some messages on here.
Hey Ted, it's Dad calling to check in.
I'm going fishing this weekend with my friend Clint, so if I don't hear from you beforehand, I'll talk to you next week.
Yes, same Clint.
Hey, Marshall.
Are you lying on the couch right now moping about Lily?
You are, aren't you?
Well, stop it.
She's not worth it.
You gotta get over that Grinch.
But I didn't say "Grinch."
I said a bad word.
A very, very bad word.
Oh, fudge.
But I didn't say fudge.
I'm... a what?
I-
- That was Barney, that was Barney.
- That was you, Ted.
- That was Marshall.
Marshall left a message for Marshall?
You know, it may have been me, but it was so long ago.
Man, that machine, it really garbles your voice.
You know, it almost made it sound like I said...
Why would you call me that?
It was a fair question.
Marshall's breakup with Lily had sent him into a deep depression and nothing could get him out of it.
Until one day...
She was perfect.
I lost the perfect woman.
I should have knocked her up when I had the chance.
Okay.
That's it.
You're never going to get over her until you stop putting her on a pedestal.
So no more ice cream until you tell me one thing that's wrong with Lily.
There's only one of her?
Okay.
She called off your wedding and dumped you to be a painter in San Francisco.
What do you call that?
Fiercely independent?
Brave?
I guess it was a little selfish.
There you go.
And in almost no time, that spark turned into a roaring fire.
Yeah.
No, you're right.
Lily would laugh at anything.
She'd give it up for a bad pun.
I'm telling you, she's a laugh slut.
Remember that time we heard her laughing and we thought she was watching Weekend At Bernie's, but it turned out she was watching Weekend At Bernie's 2?
And her art?
"I'm Lily, I'm an artist."
She doesn't even own a beret.
Yeah, and if she's such a great "artist,"
why does she suck at Pictionary?
Who draws a ninja star like a Star of David?
Right, right?
Yeah!
- Another round!
- Yeah!
I was trying to help him.
I'm his best friend.
That's the best friend's job.
The best friend's job is to call me that word?
Yeah.
Oh, Ted.
Oh, Teddy boy.
Why is this such a big deal?
It's just a word.
We use lots of words, every day.
It shouldn't be any different than any other word.
Then why don't you say it now?
Grinch.
You timed that didn't you?
Perfectly.
Well, at least you apologized.
You apologized, didn't you?
Oh, yeah.
"I'm sorry" were the first words out of my mouth.
I'm sorry, but I am not apologizing.
I was just trying to put the guy back together.
You smashed him to pieces.
Are you seriously not going to apologize for leaving that message?
- No!
- Why not?
Because, Lily, this summer, you were kind of a Grinch.
- Oooh.
- Oooh.
Oh, you'll be sorry, Ted Mosby.
Ted Vivian Mosby!
That's not my middle name.
00:05:00,351 -- 00:05:02,015 You kiss your mother with that mouth?
Like you've never said that word.
I don't kiss your mother with my mouth.
Yet.
Are you sick?
Is it sick to find maturity and experience sexy?
No, I meant do you have a cold?
I'm fine.
I'm fine.
My nose is just overflowing with awesome and I had to get some of it out.
Now, if you'll excuse me, the holidays are a time when people are lonely and desperate.
It's the most wonderful time of the year.
I should go apologize.
It's Christmas Eve.
Yeah.
I mean, slamming doors and screaming curses?
If I wanted that, I would have gone home for the holidays.
I don't see any mistletoe, but...
Oh!
Oh, God!
Uh... "Bless you" would have been nice.
- You're sick.
- I'm not sick.
- You're sick.
- You know what?
I am sick.
Sick of you telling me I'm sick.
What up?
Ahh...
Three flights of stairs, not a drop spilled.
Hey, buddy.
You sure this is gonna work?
Yeah, this is our thing.
In college, whenever I wanted to make up with her, I'd buy her a beer.
- Cute, right?
- Totally.
Plus free mug.
Okay, come on.
Usually that would've done the trick, but it turned out this was a problem not even alcohol could solve.
Actually the beer helped a little.
She took the decorations.
She took the decorations!
What a Grinch!
That time I did say "Grinch."
All right.
I guess I have to call her, right?
Lily's cell phone.
She'll listen to reason-- right?
Oh, hey, Billy.
Actually, funny thing-- the voice dial got you.
I was trying to call...
Oh, I'm sorry to hear that.
Yeah, the holidays are a rough time for everyone, Billy.
Okay, yeah, dinner next Wednesday.
Okay.
Damn voice dial.
Barney!
What the hell are you doing?
Get in here, it's freezing outside.
Are you insane?
Hey, blame Lily and her oppressive "no cigars in the apartment rule."
God, it's like Marshall's marrying the Taliban.
High five.
Eww.
No.
You have to go home and get to bed.
Oh, Robin, my simple friend from the untamed north, let me tell you about a little thing I like to call mind over body.
You see, whenever I start feeling sick,
I just stop being sick and be awesome instead.
True story.
Yeah, in two minutes,
I'm going to pound a sixer of Red Bull, hop in a cab, play a couple of hours of laser tag, maybe get a spray-on tan.
It's gonna be legen...
Wait for it...
Lily!
Merry Christmas, assface.
Um, Lily?
Where are the Christmas decorations?
At my apartment.
You want to bring them back so we can celebrate Christmas together-- please?
Ted, do you know what I would do if one of my kindergartners used that kind of language?
I would be on the phone with their parents.
Yeah, I'm not a kindergartner.
Exactly.
You know what that word means.
You know that calling people names is mean and hurtful... assface.
Lily, if you don't bring that stuff back right now, we...
She hung up.
She's just mad.
She'll cool down.
Lily...
Don't forget to take the cookies out of the oven... assface!
Damn it!
I could be in Cleveland right now making peppermint lager with my dad.
Where are you going?
Marshall gets home in three hours.
He's gonna show up-- no Lily, no winter wonderland.
I gotta get up to the Bronx.
...dary.
Hey, dude, how's the paper going?
Screw the paper, how's the winter wonderland?
Is it magical?
Oh... so magical.
When you walk through the door, does it feel like you've been slapped in the face by Christmas?
Sure does.
Look, I gotta go.
Come on, man, describe it!
Tell me about the decorations.
Is Rudolph there?
He is, isn't he?
Hi, Rudolph!
Ah, yeah, but, you know... decorations, is that really what Christmas is about?
Hell, yeah!
What else would it be about?
Uh, try the birth of Christ.
You know, Christmas-- Christ Mas, which means "More Christ" to our Spanish friends.
Yeah, well, all I know is walking in that door and seeing the winter wonderland and seeing Lily and all you guys, just...
I can't wait.
Right.
I gotta go.
Right.
Okay.
Oh, wait.
Ted, Ted, Ted, Ted.
One more thing.
How about the cookies?
Are they delicious?
You know, honestly, they taste a little store-bought.
Oh!
I got another call.
Well, tell Lily I love her.
Right.
- Hello?
- Ted Evelyn Mosby!
Oh.
Uh, hey, Mom.
Merry Christmas.
I just got the most disturbing call from Lily.
How could you use such a horrible word?
Oh, God, she called you?
Are you acting out because of the divorce?
Is-is this all about Clint?
No, Mom, why would it be about Clint?
Hey, buddy, it's Clint.
How you doing, champ?
Hey, Clint.
Listen, um, I don't really have time to...
Hey, hey, no, no, no.
Ted, Ted.
You don't know this yet, but you and I are going to be great friends.
Now, the Native Americans have this ritual...
This is a low moment for the Barnacle.
I should be off playing laser tag right now, but instead...
Don't look at me.
I'm hideous.
You just look like a regular guy.
Exactly.
I'm a Ted.
I'm wearing elastic-waist fleece pants.
And isn't it more comfy?
Yes.
Come on, you need eat something.
Too weak... to hold... bowl.
Fine, I'll feed you.
Ouchie in my mouth!
I don't want it.
I want ice cream.
No, you're not having ice cream for dinner just 'cause you're sick.
- But my throat hurts.
- No.
I hate you!
Don't leave me.
Who is it?
Pizza delivery.
Whoa.
Hey, you tricked me.
You really thought I was the pizza delivery guy?
No, I knew it was you.
I just thought you'd at least bring a pizza.
Yeah, well,
I brought a beer, but I gave it to a homeless guy.
All right, he took it from me.
Now, will you please come home?
No, I'm not spending Christmas with you.
Okay, I'm sorry for calling you a... that word, over the summer, and for saying it again today.
And for thinking it a lot on the subway ride over.
I had no right to say that.
It was hurtful and immature and I'm sorry.
Oh, shut up.
You think I don't know your fake apologies by now, Ted Mosby?
Huh?
You're clearly still mad at me.
- I'm not mad at you.
- Yes, you are.
I am not mad at you, Lily.
Now, can we please just...
I've apologized to Marshall and he's forgiven me and we've moved passed it.
Why can't you?
Because you never apologized to me.
Marshall's not the only one you walked out on.
You leave for three months, you don't even call.
Come on, Lily, we're supposed to be friends!
Yeah, some friend, you called me a Grinch.
- You were a Grinch!
- How can you...
Grinchy, Grinch, Grinch, Grinch, Grinch, Grinch, Grinch.
Happy?
Now, you've pissed off the big guy upstairs.
Yeah, I'm sure God cares if I...
You use that language again and I'll turn off your water!
That's my super.
He lives above me.
Great.
Thanks to your filthy mouth, now I'm going to have Christmas alone in the dark.
Fine.
I don't want to ruin Christmas.
You can have the apartment.
Don't worry about seeing me there
I'll be in Staten Island with my cousin Stacy.
Just....
Ow.
Merry Christmas.
You're spending Christmas Eve with your family?
Baby, that sucks.
I'm so sorry.
Uh, they're fine.
They're just...
they're a little weird.
You know they don't believe in gifts or Christmas trees.
And they think Santa's how Satan spells his name when he wants to trick us.
Well, do you want me to go with you?
Was that a sincere offer?
First tell me your answer.
Stay there.
Save yourself.
We'll spend all day together tomorrow.
Okay.
Oh, how's Barney feeling?
You mean the whiney bottomless pit of neediness?
He was bugging me, so I spiked his echinacea tea with codeine.
You're gonna be a great mom.
Holy crap, the magical Christmas season is upon us.
And thank God we don't pay for utilities.
Merry Christmas!
What's in the box?
Only the best present for the best girl ever.
It took me all day to track it down.
I thought you were writing a paper.
Ah, naw, I blew that off.
I'll get an extension.
School's not important.
What is that pitter patter on the roof?
Could it be the sound of an awesome Christmas story about to come down the chimney?
Why, yes, it is.
'Twas the day before Christmas...
It was supposed to arrive, like, five days ago, but then it got lost and rerouted.
I checked two other branches, finally they told me it was here.
Yeah, all I needed to know was the tracking number.
Looks like it's headed out to our regional branch in Poughkeepsie.
What?
No, no, no, no, I need that package today.
Listen, the truck already left five minutes ago, so unless you want to run after it...
Stop!
Stop!
Stop, please, stop.
Stop.
Stop the truck.
I need a package on your truck.
Can I please take a look in back?
Sure.
But I gotta keep driving my route.
I'm running behind.
My bad.
I'm okay.
Hey, man, thanks for helping me make my fiancée's Christmas.
No problem.
Too bad I can't deliver all these packages by the end of the day.
Wait, so some people aren't going to get their gifts in time for Christmas?
Sadly, no.
# They call me back door Santa #
# I make my runs # # about the break of day #
# They call me back door Santa #
# I make my runs # # about the break of day #
# Oh, ho, ho #
# I make all # # the little girls happy... #
We delivered every single package on that truck.
But I still have one package left to give.
Yeah, I did.
Merry Christmas.
- Open it, Baby.
- Okay.
Oh, my God.
An Easy Bake Oven!
I've wanted one of these ever since I was a little girl.
In this exact model.
I never told you that.
How did you know?
It's our first Christmas since we got back together.
I want to get her something really special.
So I'm getting her a jukebox.
Wow, that's a great gift.
Not really.
It's this big and it dispenses gum.
Oh, man, I know something you could get her that would blow her mind.
Ready?
Eight years ago...
When I was a kid, all I wanted was an Easy Bake Oven.
I begged and I begged, but all I got was a stupid Lego set because my feminist mom didn't want me conforming to traditional gender roles.
Easy Bake Oven-- that's what I'm going to call my van.
Dude... how was the concert?
I couldn't find the outside.
I can't believe Ted remembered after all these years.
Yeah, and after all that weed.
Where is he anyway?
Staten Island.
Why?
Okay, don't tell your mom, but I got you guys some presents.
Like the gift of God's love?
No, dude, real presents.
Uncle Ted got us presents!
That's okay, Ted, we'll just give them to charity.
Yay!
Uh, not you, Charity.
I meant the less fortunate.
Ted, how would you like to say grace tonight?
Uh, you know what, why don't you say it.
I really wouldn't know what to say.
Why don't you recite your favorite passage of scripture.
That's a great idea, Charity.
But, really, I don't know.
I mean how do you choose your favorite passage?
It's the Bible; there's so many...
great ones...
That one from Pulp Fiction's pretty cool.
Ooh, I'll get it.
Charity, I'm tapping you in.
Dear, Father, thank you for this day, and thank you for bringing this family together.
Amen.
Who is it, Ted?
Uh, it's...
it's just, um, carolers.
# Silent night #
# Holy night... #
I came here to apologize.
I'm so sorry, Ted.
I accept.
Give me the beer.
Oh, oh, it is so good to see you guys.
Are you coming home?
Totally.
But first, Lily, I owe you an apology.
Oh, for the love of God, are you as sick of apologies as I am?
Yes!
Can we just skip the apology and go straight to the forgiving?
Yes.
And I promise, I will never ever call you a... you know, again.
That's okay.
I was kind of a Grinch.
What's a Grinch?
Nothing.
It's something you shouldn't say.
Mom, what's a Grinch?
Grinch, Grinch, Grinch...
Merry Christmas, everybody.
Run, run.
Merry Christmas, Marshall.
Ted:
Kids, as you know,
Christmas is a time you spend with your family.
So in December of 2006, I had three options.
Spend it with my mom and her new boyfriend clint,
Spend it with my dad and his new girlfriend micro-brewing,
Or head down to staten island to spend it
With my super religious cousin stacy and her family.
So I opted for none of the above
And decided to spend christmas 2006
In manhattan...
Celebrating with my other family.
Okay, I have one last paper due at 5:00 p.M. Today,
So until then, I will be at the law library at school,
But I'm not to be disturbed for any reason.
Dude, open your eyes.
You're going to hurt yourself.
No, no.
Christmas eve winter wonderland is my reward
For finishing my paper.
Oh.
Baby, do I smell your sinfully cinnamon cookies?
Yes.
Damn me and my heightened other senses.
Must be strong.
Okay, I'll be back here at 5:00.
Save me at least 20 cookies
And do not clean the bowl.
Is that a reindeer?
I don't want to know!
Hey, look.
Our old answering machine.
Oh, yeah.
After you left, we, uh, we unplugged it
Because it reminded marshall
Of how you used to, you know, leave messages.
But hey,
You guys are back together.
I say we're plugging it back in.
(grunts)
It's good to have you back.
Oh, hey, look, there's still some messages on here.
Mr. Mosby:
Hey ted, it's dad calling to check in.
I'm going fishing this weekend with my friend clint,
So if I don't hear from you beforehand,
I'll talk to you next week.
Yes, same clint.
Are you lying on the couch right now moping about lily?
You are, aren't you?
Oh...
Well, stop it.
She's not worth it.
You gotta get over that grinch.
But I didn't say "grinch."
I said a bad word.
A very, very bad word.
Oh, fudge.
But I didn't say fudge.
I'm...
A what?
I...
That was barney, that was barney.
That was you, ted.
That was marshall.
Marshall left a message for marshall?
You know, it may have been me, but it was so long ago.
Man, that machine, it really garbles your voice.
You know, it almost made it sound like I said...
Why would you call me that?
It was a fair question.
Marshall's breakup with lily had sent him
Into a deep depression
And nothing could get him out of it.
(moans)
Until one day...
She was perfect.
I lost the perfect woman.
I should have knocked her up when I had the chance.
Okay.
That's it.
You're never going to get over her
Until you stop putting her on a pedestal.
So no more ice cream until you tell me
One thing that's wrong with lily.
There's only one of her?
Okay.
She called off your wedding and dumped you
To be a painter in san francisco.
What do you call that?
Fiercely independent?
Uh-uh.
Brave?
I guess it was a little selfish.
There you go.
And in almost no time,
That spark turned into a roaring fire.
Yeah.
No, you're right.
Lily would laugh at anything.
She'd give it up for a bad pun.
I'm telling you, she's a laugh slut.
Remember that time we heard her laughing
And we thought she was watching weekend at bernie's,
But it turned out she was watching weekend at bernie's 2?
And her art?
"I'm lily, I'm an artist."
She doesn't even own a beret.
Yeah, and if she's such a great "artist,"
Why does she suck at pictionary?
Who draws a ninja star like a star of david?
Come on, come on.
Right, right?
Yeah!
Another round!
(laughing):
Yeah!
I was trying to help him.
I'm his best friend.
That's the best friend's job.
The best friend's job is to call me that word?
Yeah.
Oh, ted.
Oh, teddy boy.
Why is this such a big deal?
It's just a word.
We use lots of words, every day.
It shouldn't be any different than any other word.
Then why don't you say it now?
Grinch.
You timed that didn't you?
Perfectly.
Well, at least you apologized.
You apologized, didn't you?
Oh, yeah.
"I'm sorry" were the first words out of my mouth.
I'm sorry, but I am not apologizing.
I was just trying to put the guy back together.
You smashed him to pieces.
Are you seriously not going to apologize for leaving that...?
No!
Why not?
Because, lily, this summer,
You were kind of a grinch.
Both:
Oooh.
Oh, you'll be sorry, ted mosby.
Ted vivian mosby!
That's not my middle name.
You kiss your mother with that mouth?
Like you've never said that word.
I don't kiss your mother with my mouth.
Yet.
(sneezes)
Are you sick?
Is it sick to find maturity
And experience sexy?
No, I meant
Do you have a cold?
I'm fine.
(blowing nose)
I'm fine.
My nose is just overflowing with awesome
And I had to get some of it out.
Now, if you'll excuse me, the holidays are a time when people
Are lonely and desperate.
It's the most wonderful time of the year.
I should go apologize.
It's christmas eve.
Yeah.
I mean, slamming doors and screaming curses?
If I wanted that, I would have gone home for the holidays.
I don't see any mistletoe, but... (sneezes)
Oh!
Oh, god!
Uh... "bless you" would have been nice.
You're sick.
I'm not sick.
You're sick.
You know what?
I am sick.
Sick of you telling me I'm sick.
What up?
(coughing)
Ahh...
Three flights of stairs, not a drop spilled.
Hey, buddy.
You sure this is gonna work?
Yeah, this is our thing.
In college, whenever I wanted to make up
With her, I'd buy her a beer.
Cute, right?
Totally.
Plus free mug.
Come on.
Usually that would've done the trick,
But it turned out this was a problem
Not even alcohol could solve.
Actually the beer helped a little.
She took the decorations.
She took the decorations!
What a grinch!
That time I did say "grinch."
All right.
I guess I have to call her, right?
Lily's cell phone.
She'll listen to reason... right?
Oh, hey, billy.
Actually, funny thing...
The voice dial got you.
I was trying to call...
Oh, I'm sorry to hear that.
Yeah, the holidays are a rough time for everyone, billy.
Okay, yeah, dinner next Wednesday.
Okay.
Damn voice dial.
Barney!
What the hell are you doing?
!
Get in here, it's freezing outside.
Are you insane?
Hey, blame lily and her
Oppressive "no cigars in the apartment rule."
God, it's like marshall's marrying the taliban.
(sneezes)
High five.
Eww.
No.
You have to go home and get to bed.
Oh, robin, my simple friend from the untamed north,
Let me tell you
About a little thing I like to call mind over body.
You see,
Whenever I start feeling sick,
I just stop being sick and be awesome instead.
True story.
Yeah, in two minutes,
I'm going to pound a sixer of red bull, hop in a cab,
Play a couple of hours of laser tag,
Maybe get a spray-on tan.
It's gonna be legen...
Wait for it... (snoring softly)
Lily!
Merry christmas, assface.
Um, lily?
Where are the christmas decorations?
At my apartment.
So we can celebrate christmas together... please?
Ted, do you know what I would do
If one of my kindergartners used that kind of language?
I would be on the phone with their parents.
Yeah, I'm not a kindergartner.
Exactly.
You know what that word means.
You know that calling people names
Is mean and hurtful...
Assface.
Lily, if you don't
Bring that stuff back right now, we...
She hung up.
She's just mad.
She'll cool down.
Mm-hmm.
(phone ringing)
Aha.
Lily...
Don't forget to take the cookies
Out of the oven...
Assface!
Damn it!
I could be in cleveland right now
Making peppermint lager with my dad.
Where are you going?
Marshall gets home in three hours.
He's gonna show up...
No lily, no winter wonderland.
I gotta get up to the bronx.
Dary.
(phone ringing)
Hey, dude, how's the paper going?
Screw the paper, how's the winter wonderland?
Is it magical?
Oh...
So magical.
When you walk through the door, does it feel
Like you've been slapped in the face by christmas?
Sure does.
Look, I gotta go.
Come on, man, describe it!
Tell me about the decorations.
Is rudolph there?
He is, isn't he?
Hi, rudolph!
Ah, yeah, but, you know...
Decorations, is that really what christmas is about?
Hell, yeah!
What else would it be about?
Uh, try the birth of christ.
You know, christmas...
Christ mas,
Which means "more christ" to our spanish friends.
Yeah, well, all I know is walking through that door
And seeing the winter wonderland and seeing lily
And all you guys, just...
I can't wait.
Right.
I gotta go.
Right.
Okay.
Oh, wait.
Ted, ted, ted, ted.
One more thing.
How about the cookies?
Are they delicious?
(shrieking)
You know, honestly, they taste a little store-bought.
Oh!
I got another call.
Well, tell lily I love her.
Right.
Hello?
Ted evelyn mosby!
Oh.
Uh, hey, mom.
I just got the most disturbing call from lily.
How could you use such a horrible word?
Oh, god, she called you?
Are you acting out because of the divorce?
Is-is this all about clint?
No, mom, why would it be about clint?
Hey, buddy, it's clint.
How you doing, champ?
Hey, clint.
Listen, um,
Hey, hey, no, I don't really have time to...
No, no.
Ted, ted.
You don't know this yet,
But you and I are going to be great friends.
Now,
The native americans have this ritual... (coughing)
(sighs)
This is a low moment for the barnacle.
I should be off playing laser tag right now,
But instead...
Don't look at me.
I'm hideous.
You just look like a regular guy.
Exactly.
I'm a ted.
I'm wearing elastic-waist fleece pants.
And isn't it more comfy?
Yes.
Come on, you need eat something.
Too weak...
To hold...
Bowl.
Fine, I'll feed you.
Mmm.
Ouchie in my mouth!
I don't want it.
I want ice cream.
No, you're not having ice cream
For dinner just 'cause you're sick.
But my throat hurts.
No.
I hate you!
Oh.
Don't leave me.
(knock at door)
Who is it?
Pizza delivery.
Whoa.
Hey, you tricked me.
You really thought I was the pizza delivery guy?
No, I knew it was you.
I just thought you'd at least bring a pizza.
Yeah, well, I brought a beer,
But I gave it to a homeless guy.
All right, he took it from me.
Now, will you please come home?
No, I'm not spending christmas with you.
Okay, I'm sorry for calling you a...
That word,
Over the summer,
And for saying it again today.
And for thinking it a lot on the subway ride over.
I had no right to say that.
It was hurtful
And immature and I'm sorry.
Oh, shut up.
You think I don't know
Your fake apologies by now, ted mosby?
Huh?
You're clearly still mad at me.
I'm not mad at you.
Yes, you are.
I am not mad at you, lily.
Now, can we please just...
I've apologized to marshall and he's forgiven me
And we've moved passed it.
Why can't you?
Because you never apologized to me.
You leave for three months, you don't even call.
Come on, lily, we're supposed to be friends!
Yeah, some friend, you called me a grinch.
You were a grinch!
How can you...
Grinchy,
Grinch, grinch, grinch grinch, grinch, grinch.
Happy?
Now, you've pissed off the big guy upstairs.
Yeah, I'm sure god cares if I...
Big guy upstairs:
You use that language again and I'll turn off your water!
That's my super.
He lives above me.
Great.
Thanks to your filthy mouth,
Now I'm going to have christmas alone in the dark.
Fine.
I don't want to ruin christmas.
You can have the apartment.
Don't worry about seeing me there
I'll be in staten island with my cousin stacy.
Just...
Ow.
Merry christmas.
You're spending christmas eve with your family?
Baby, that sucks.
I'm so sorry.
Uh, they're fine.
They're just...
They're a little weird.
You know they don't believe in gifts or christmas trees.
And they think santa's how satan spells his name
When he wants to trick us.
Well, do you want me to go with you?
Was that a sincere offer?
First tell me your answer.
Stay there.
Save yourself.
We'll spend all day together tomorrow.
Okay.
You mean the whiney bottomless pit of neediness?
He was bugging me, so I spiked his echinacea tea with codeine.
You're gonna be a great mom.
Mm-hmm.
Holy crap, the magical christmas season is upon us.
And thank god we don't pay for utilities.
Merry christmas!
What's in the box?
Only the best christmas present for the best girl ever.
It took me all day to track it down.
I thought you were writing a paper.
Ah, naw, I blew that off.
I'll get an extension.
School's not important.
What is that pitter patter on the roof?
Could it be the sound of an awesome christmas story
About to come down the chimney?
Why, yes, it is.
'Twas the day before christmas...
It was supposed to arrive, like, five days ago,
But then it got lost and rerouted.
I checked two other branches,
Finally they told me it was here.
Yeah, all I needed to know was the tracking number.
Looks like it's headed out
To our regional branch in poughkeepsie.
What?
No, no, no, no, I need that package today.
Listen, the truck already left five minutes ago,
So unless you want to run after it...
Stop!
Stop!
Stop, please, stop.
Stop the truck.
(panting):
I need a package on your truck.
Can I please take a look in back?
Sure.
But I gotta keep driving my route.
I'm running behind.
(screeching)
Whoa.
Wpd driver:
My bad.
I'm okay.
Hey, man,
Thanks for helping me make my fiancée's christmas.
No problem.
Too bad I can't deliver all these packages
By the end of the day.
Wait, so some people aren't going to get their gifts
In time for christmas?
Sadly, no.
♪ They call me back door santa
♪ I make my runs about the break of day ♪
♪ They call me back door santa
♪ I make my runs about the break of day ♪
♪ Oh, ho, ho
♪ I make all the little girls happy... ♪
We delivered every single package on that truck.
Oh.
But I still have one package left to give.
Mmm.
Yeah, I did.
(giggles)
Merry christmas.
Open it, baby.
Okay.
Ah.
Oh, my god.
An easy bake oven!
I've wanted one of these ever since I was a little girl.
In this exact model.
I never told you that.
How did you know?
It's our first christmas since we got back together.
I want to get her something really special.
So I'm getting her a jukebox.
Wow, that's a great gift.
Not really.
It's this big and it dispenses gum.
Oh, man, I know something you could get her
That would blow her mind.
Ready?
Eight years ago...
When I was a kid, all I wanted was an easy bake oven.
I begged and I begged, but all I got
Was a stupid lego set
Because my feminist mom didn't want me conforming
To traditional gender roles.
Easy bake oven... that's what I'm going to call my van.
Dude...
How was the concert?
I couldn't find the outside.
(laughing)
I can't believe ted remembered after all these years.
Yeah, and after all that weed.
Where is he anyway?
Staten island.
Why?
All right, don't tell your mom,
But I got you guys some presents.
Like the the gift of god's love?
No, dude, real presents.
Uncle ted got us presents!
That's okay, ted, we'll just give them to charity.
Yay!
Uh, not you, charity.
I meant the less fortunate.
Ted, how would you like to say grace tonight?
Uh, you know what, why don't you say it.
I really wouldn't know what to say.
Why don't you recite your favorite passage of scripture.
That's a great idea, charity.
But, really, I don't know.
I mean how do you choose your favorite passage?
It's the bible;
There's so many...
Great ones... (doorbell ringing) ooh, I'll get it.
Charity, I'm tapping you in.
Dear, father, thank you for this day,
And thank you for bringing this family together.
Amen.
Who is it, ted?
Uh, it's...
It's just, um, carolers.
♪ Silent night
All:
♪ holy night...
I came here to apologize.
I'm so sorry, ted.
I accept.
Give me the beer.
Mmm...
Mm, oh, it is so good to see you guys.
Are you coming home?
Totally.
But first, lily, I owe you an apology.
Oh, for the love of god, are you as sick of apologies as I am?
Yes!
Can we just skip the apology and go straight to the forgiving?
Yes.
And I promise, I will never ever call you a...
You know, again.
That's okay.
I was kind of a grinch.
What's a grinch?
Nothing.
It's something you shouldn't say.
Mom, what's a grinch?
Grinch, grinch, grinch... (kids chanting):
Grinch, grinch, grinch...
Grinch, grinch, grinch...
Grinch, grinch, grinch...
Grinch, grinch...
Merry christmas, everybody.
Run, run.
Merry christmas, marshall.
Fsx you spend with your family.
So in December of 2006, I had three options.
Spend it with my mom and her new boyfriend Clint, spend it with my dad and his new girlfriend micro-brewing, or head down to Staten Island to spend it with my super religious cousin Stacy in her family
So I opted for none of the above and decided to spend Christmas 2006 in Manhattan... celebrating with my other family.
Okay, I have one last paper due at 5:00 p.m. today, so until then, I will be at the law library at school, but I'm not to be disturbed for any reason.
Dude, open your eyes.
You're going to hurt yourself.
No, no.
Christmas Eve winter wonderland is my reward for finishing my paper.
Oh.
Baby, do I smell your Sinfully Cinnamon Cookies?
Yes.
Damn me and my heightened other senses.
Must be strong.
Okay, I'll be back here at 5:00.
Save me at least 20 cookies and do not clean the bowl.
Was that a reindeer?
I don't want to know!
Hey, look.
Our old answering machine.
Oh, yeah.
After you left, we, uh, we unplugged it because it reminded Marshall of how you used to, you know, leave messages.
But hey, you guys are back together.
I say we're plugging it back in.
It's good to have you back.
Thanks.
Oh, hey, look, there's still some messages on here.
MR. MOSBY:
Hey Ted, it's Dad calling to check in.
I'm going fishing this weekend with my friend Clint, so if I don't hear from you beforehand,
I'll talk to you next week.
Yes, same Clint.
TED (on machine):
Hey, Marshall.
Are you lying on the couch right now moping about Lily?
You are, aren't you?
Oh...
Well, stop it.
She's not worth it.
You gotta get over that Grinch.
But I didn't say "Grinch."
I said a bad word.
A very, very bad word.
Oh, fudge.
But I didn't say fudge.
a what?
I--
That was Barney, that was Barney.
That was you, Ted.
That was Marshall.
Marshall left a message for Marshall?
You know, it may have been me, but it was so long ago.
Man, that machine, it really garbles your voice.
You know, it almost made it sound like I said...
Why would you call me that?
It was a fair question.
Marshall's breakup with Lily had sent him into a deep depression and nothing could get him out of it.
(moans)
Until one day...
She was perfect.
I lost the perfect woman.
I should have knocked her up when I had the chance.
Okay.
That's it.
You're never going to get over her until you stop putting her on a pedestal.
So no more ice cream until you tell me one thing that's wrong with Lily.
There's only one of her?
Okay.
She called off your wedding and dumped you to be a painter in San Francisco.
What do you call that?
Fiercely independent?
Uh-uh.
Brave?
I guess it was a little selfish.
There you go.
And in almost no time, that spark turned into a roaring fire.
Yeah.
No, you're right.
Lily would laugh at anything.
She'd give it up for a bad pun.
I'm telling you, she's a laugh slut.
Remember that time we heard her laughing and we thought she was watching Weekend At Bernie's, but it turned out she was watching Weekend At Bernie's 2?
And her art?
"I'm Lily, I'm an artist."
She doesn't even own a beret.
Yeah, and if she's such a great "artist,"
why does she suck at Pictionary?
Who draws a ninja star like a Star of David?
Come on, come on.
Right, right?
Yeah!
Another round!
(laughing):
Yeah!
I was trying to help him.
I'm his best friend.
That's the best friend's job.
The best friend's job is to call me that word?
Yeah.
Oh, Ted.
Oh, Teddy boy.
Why is this such a big deal?
It's just a word.
We use lots of words, every day.
It shouldn't be any different than any other word.
Then why don't you say it now?
Grinch.
You timed that didn't you?
Perfectly.
Well, at least you apologized.
You apologized, didn't you?
Oh, yeah.
"I'm sorry" were the first words out of my mouth.
I'm sorry, but I am not apologizing.
I was just trying to put the guy back together.
You smashed him to pieces.
Are you seriously not going to apologize for leaving that...?
No!
Why not?
Because, Lily, this summer, you were kind of a Grinch.
BOTH:
Oooh.
Oh, you'll be sorry, Ted Mosby.
Ted Vivian Mosby!
That's not my middle name.
You kiss your mother with that mouth?
Like you've never said that word.
I don't kiss your mother with my mouth.
Yet.
Are you sick?
Is it sick to find maturity and experience sexy?
No, I meant do you have a cold?
I'm fine.
I'm fine.
My nose is just overflowing with awesome and I had to get some of it out.
Now, if you'll excuse me, the holidays are a time when people are lonely and desperate.
It's the most wonderful time of the year.
I should go apologize.
It's Christmas Eve.
Yeah.
I mean, slamming doors and screaming curses?
If I wanted that, I would have gone home for the holidays.
I don't see any mistletoe, but...
Oh!
Oh, God!
Uh... "Bless you" would have been nice.
You're sick.
I'm not sick.
You're sick.
You know what?
I am sick.
Sick of you telling me I'm sick.
What up?
Ahh...
Three flights of stairs, not a drop spilled.
Hey, buddy.
You sure this is gonna work?
Yeah, this is our thing.
In college, whenever I wanted to make up with her, I'd buy her a beer.
Cute, right?
Totally.
Plus free mug.
Usually that would've done the trick, but it turned out this was a problem not even alcohol could solve.
Actually the beer helped a little.
She took the decorations.
She took the decorations.
What a grinch.
That time i did say grinch.
All right,
I guess I have to call her, right?
Lily's cell phone.
She'll listen to reason, right?
Oh, hey Lilly,
Actually funny thing, the voice dial got you, I was trying to call...
Oh, I'm sorry to hear that.
Yeah, the holidays are a rough time for everyone, Billy.
Okay, yeah, dinner next Wednesday.
Okay.
Damn voice dial.
Barney!
What the hell are you doing?
Get in here, it's freezing outside.
Are you insane?
Hey, blame Lily and her oppressive "no cigars in the apartment rule."
God, it's like Marshall's marrying the Taliban.
(sneezes)
High five.
Eww.
No.
You have to go home and get to bed.
Oh, Robin, my simple friend from the untamed north, let me tell you about a little thing I like to call mind over body.
You see, whenever I start feeling sick,
I just stop being sick and be awesome instead.
True story.
Yeah, in two minutes,
I'm going to pound a sixer of Red Bull, hop in a cab, play a couple of hours of laser tag, maybe get a spray-on tan.
It's gonna be legen...
Wait for it... (snoring softly)
Lily!
Merry Christmas, assface.
Um, Lily?
Where are the Christmas decorations?
At my apartment.
You want to bring them back so we can celebrate Christmas together-- please?
Ted, do you know what I would do if one of my kindergartners used that kind of language?
I would be on the phone with their parents.
Yeah, I'm not a kindergartner.
Exactly.
You know what that word means.
You know that calling people names is mean and hurtful... assface.
Lily, if you don't bring that stuff back right now, we...
She hung up.
She's just mad.
She'll cool down.
Mm-hmm.
(phone ringing)
Aha.
Lily...
Don't forget to take the cookies out of the oven... assface!
Damn it!
I could be in Cleveland right now making peppermint lager with my dad.
Where are you going?
Marshall gets home in three hours.
He's gonna show up-- no Lily, no winter wonderland.
I gotta get up to the Bronx.
...dary.
(phone ringing)
Hey, dude, how's the paper going?
Screw the paper, how's the winter wonderland?
Is it magical?
Oh... so magical.
When you walk through the door, does it feel like you've been slapped in the face by Christmas?
Sure does.
Look, I gotta go.
Come on, man, describe it!
Tell me about the decorations.
Is Rudolph there?
He is, isn't he?
Hi, Rudolph!
Ah, yeah, but, you know...
Decorations, is that really what Christmas is about?
Hell, yeah!
What else would it be about?
Uh, try the birth of Christ.
You know, Christmas-- Christ Mas, which means "More Christ" to our Spanish friends.
Yeah, well, all I know is walking in that door and seeing the winter wonderland and seeing Lily and all you guys, just...
I can't wait.
Right.
I gotta go.
Right.
Okay.
Oh, wait.
Ted, Ted, Ted, Ted.
One more thing.
How about the cookies?
Are they delicious?
(shrieking)
You know, honestly, they taste a little store-bought.
Oh!
I got another call.
Well, tell Lily I love her.
Right.
Hello?
Ted Evelyn Mosby!
Oh.
Uh, hey, Mom.
Merry Christmas.
I just got the most disturbing call from Lily.
How could you use such a horrible word?
Oh, God, she called you?
Are you acting out because of the divorce?
Is-is this all about Clint?
No, Mom, why would it be about Clint?
Hey, buddy, it's Clint.
How you doing, champ?
Hey, Clint.
Listen, um,
Hey, hey, no, I don't really have time to... no, no.
Ted,Ted.
You don't know this yet, but you and I are going to be great friends.
Now, the Native Americans have this ritual...
(coughing)
(sighs)
This is a low moment for the Barnacle.
I should be off playing laser tag right now, but instead...
Don't look at me.
I'm hideous.
You just look like a regular guy.
Exactly.
I'm a Ted.
I'm wearing elastic-waist fleece pants.
And isn't it more comfy?
Yes.
Come on, you need eat something.
Too weak... to hold... bowl.
Fine, I'll feed you.
Mmm.
Ouchie in my mouth!
I don't want it.
I want ice cream.
No, you're not having ice cream for dinner just 'cause you're sick.
But my throat hurts.
No.
I hate you!
Oh.
Don't leave me.
(knock at door)
Who is it?
Pizza delivery.
Whoa.
Hey, you tricked me.
You really thought I was the pizza delivery guy?
No, I knew it was you.
I just thought you'd at least bring a pizza.
Yeah, well, I brought a beer, but I gave it to a homeless guy.
All right, he took it from me.
Now, will you please come home?
No, I'm not spending Christmas with you.
Okay, I'm sorry for calling you a... that word, over the summer, and for saying it again today.
And for thinking it a lot on the subway ride over.
I had no right to say that.
It was hurtful and immature and I'm sorry.
Oh, shut up.
You think I don't know your fake apologies by now, Ted Mosby?
Huh?
You're clearly still mad at me.
I'm not mad at you.
Yes, you are.
I am not mad at you, Lily.
Now, can we please just...
I've apologized to Marshall and he's forgiven me and we've moved passed it.
Why can't you?
Because you never apologized to me.
Marshall's not the only one you walked out on.
You leave for three months, you don't even call.
Come on, Lily, we're supposed to be friends!
Yeah, some friend, you called me a Grinch.
You were a Grinch!
How can you...
Grinchy, grinch, grinch, grinch grinch, grinch, grinch.
Happy?
Now, you've pissed off the big guy upstairs.
Yeah, I'm sure God cares if I...
BIG GUY UPSTAIRS:
You use that language again and I'll turn off your water!
That's my super.
He lives above me.
Great.
Thanks to your filthy mouth, now I'm going to have Christmas alone in the dark.
Fine.
I don't want to ruin Christmas.
You can have the apartment.
Don't worry about seeing me there
I'll be in Staten Island with my cousin Stacy.
Just....
Ow.
Merry Christmas.
You're spending Christmas Eve with your family?
Baby, that sucks.
I'm so sorry.
Uh, they're fine.
They're just... they're a little weird.
You know they don't believe in gifts or Christmas trees.
And they think Santa's how Satan spells his name when he wants to trick us.
Well, do you want me to go with you?
Was that a sincere offer?
First tell me your answer.
Stay there.
Save yourself.
We'll spend all day together tomorrow.
Okay.
Oh, how's Barney feeling?
You mean the whiney bottomless pit of neediness?
He was bugging me, so I spiked his echinacea tea with codeine.
You're gonna be a great mom.
Mm-hmm.
Holy crap, the magical Christmas season is upon us.
And thank God we don't pay for utilities.
Merry Christmas!
What's in the box?
Only the best Christmas present for the best girl ever.
It took me all day to track it down.
I thought you were writing a paper.
Ah, naw, I blew that off.
I'll get an extension.
School's not important.
What is that pitter patter on the roof?
Could it be the sound of an awesome Christmas story about to come down the chimney?
Why, yes, it is.
'Twas the day before Christmas...
It was supposed to arrive, like, five days ago, but then it got lost and rerouted.
I checked two other branches, finally they told me it was here.
Yeah, all I needed to know was the tracking number.
Looks like it's headed out to our regional branch in Poughkeepsie.
What?
No, no, no, no, I need that package today.
Listen, the truck already left five minutes ago, so unless you want to run after it...
Stop!
Stop!
Stop, please, stop.
Stop the truck.
(panting):
I need a package on your truck.
Can I please take a look in back?
Sure.
But I gotta keep driving my route.
I'm running behind.
(screeching)
Whoa.
WPD DRIVER:
My bad.
I'm okay.
Hey, man, thanks for helping me make my fiancée's Christmas.
No problem.
Too bad I can't deliver all these packages by the end of the day.
Wait, so some people aren't going to get their gifts in time for Christmas?
Sadly, no.
* They call me back door Santa *
* I make my runs about the break of day *
* They call me back door Santa *
* I make my runs about the break of day *
* Oh, ho, ho *
* I make all the little girls happy... *
We delivered every single package on that truck.
Oh.
But I still have one package left to give.
Mmm.
Yeah, I did.
(giggles)
Merry Christmas.
Open it, Baby.
Okay.
Ah.
Oh, my God.
An Easy Bake Oven!
I've wanted one of these ever since I was a little girl.
In this exact model.
I never told you that.
How did you know?
It's our first Christmas since we got back together.
I want to get her something really special.
So I'm getting her a jukebox.
Wow, that's a great gift.
Not really.
It's this big and it dispenses gum.
Oh, man, I know something you could get her that would blow her mind out.
Ready?
Eight years ago... (reggae playing)
When I was a kid, all I wanted was an Easy Bake Oven.
I begged and I begged, but all I got was a stupid Lego set because my feminist mom didn't want me conforming to traditional gender roles.
Easy Bake Oven-- that's what I'm going to call my van.
Dude... how was the concert?
I couldn't find the outside.
(laughing)
I can't believe Ted remembered after all these years.
Yeah, and after all that weed.
Where is he anyway?
Staten Island.
Why?
Okay, don't tell your mom, but I got you guys some presents.
Like the the gift of God's love?
No, dude, real presents.
Uncle Ted got us presents!
That's okay, Ted, we'll just give them to charity.
Yay!
Uh, not you, Charity.
I meant the less fortunate.
Ted, how would you like to say grace tonight?
Uh, you know what, why don't you say it.
I really wouldn't know what to say.
Why don't you recite your favorite passage of scripture.
That's a great idea, Charity.
But, really, I don't know.
I mean how do you choose your favorite passage?
It's the Bible;
there's so many...
great ones...
That one from Pulp Fiction's pretty cool.
(doorbell ringing) Ooh, I'll get it.
Charity, I'm tapping you in.
Dear, Father, thank you for this day, and thank you for bringing this family together.
Amen.
Who is it, Ted?
Uh, it's...
it's just, um, carolers.
* Silent night *
ALL:
* Holy night... *
I came here to apologize.
I'm so sorry, Ted.
I accept.
Give me the beer.
Mm, oh, it is so good to see you guys.
Are you coming home?
Totally.
But first, Lily, I owe you an apology.
Oh, for the love of God, are you as sick of apologies as I am?
Yes!
Can we just skip the apology and go straight to the forgiving?
Yes.
And I promise, I will never ever call you a... you know, again.
That's okay.
I was kind of a Grinch.
What's a Grinch?
Nothing.
It's something you shouldn't say.
Mom, what's a Grinch?
Grinch, Grinch, Grinch... (kids chanting):
Grinch, Grinch, Grinch Grinch, Grinch, Grinch Grinch, Grinch, Grinch Grinch, Grinch...
Merry Christmas, everybody.
Merry Christmas, Marshall.
Kids, as you know, Christmas is a time you spend with your family.
So in December of 2006, I had three options.
Spend it with my mom and her new boyfriend Clint, spend it with my dad and his new girlfriend micro-brewing, or head down to Staten Island to spend it with my super religious cousin Stacy and her family.
So I opted for none of the above and decided to spend Christmas 2006 in Manhattan... celebrating with my other family.
Okay, I have one last paper due at 5:00 p.m. today, so until then, I will be at the law library at school, but I'm not to be disturbed for any reason.
Dude, open your eyes.
You're going to hurt yourself.
No, no.
Christmas Eve winter wonderland is my reward for finishing my paper.
Baby, do I smell your Sinfully Cinnamon Cookies?
Yes.
Damn me and my heightened other senses.
Must be strong.
Okay, I'll be back here at 5:00.
Save me at least 20 cookies and do not clean the bowl.
Was that a reindeer?
I don't want to know!
Hey, look.
Our old answering machine.
Oh, yeah.
After you left, we, uh, we unplugged it because it reminded Marshall of how you used to, you know, leave messages.
But hey, you guys are back together.
I say we're plugging it back in.
It's good to have you back.
Thanks.
Oh, hey, look, there's still some messages on here.
Hey Ted, it's Dad calling to check in.
I'm going fishing this weekend with my friend Clint, so if I don't hear from you beforehand, I'll talk to you next week.
Yes, same Clint.
Hey, Marshall.
Are you lying on the couch right now moping about Lily?
You are, aren't you?
Well, stop it.
She's not worth it.
You gotta get over that Grinch.
But I didn't say "Grinch."
I said a bad word.
A very, very bad word.
Oh, fudge.
But I didn't say fudge.
I'm... a what?
I-
- That was Barney, that was Barney.
- That was you, Ted.
- That was Marshall.
Marshall left a message for Marshall?
You know, it may have been me, but it was so long ago.
Man, that machine, it really garbles your voice.
You know, it almost made it sound like I said...
Why would you call me that?
It was a fair question.
Marshall's breakup with Lily had sent him into a deep depression and nothing could get him out of it.
Until one day...
She was perfect.
I lost the perfect woman.
I should have knocked her up when I had the chance.
Okay.
That's it.
You're never going to get over her until you stop putting her on a pedestal.
So no more ice cream until you tell me one thing that's wrong with Lily.
There's only one of her?
Okay.
She called off your wedding and dumped you to be a painter in San Francisco.
What do you call that?
Fiercely independent?
Brave?
I guess it was a little selfish.
There you go.
And in almost no time, that spark turned into a roaring fire.
Yeah.
No, you're right.
Lily would laugh at anything.
She'd give it up for a bad pun.
I'm telling you, she's a laugh slut.
Remember that time we heard her laughing and we thought she was watching Weekend At Bernie's, but it turned out she was watching Weekend At Bernie's 2?
And her art?
"I'm Lily, I'm an artist."
She doesn't even own a beret.
Yeah, and if she's such a great "artist,"
why does she suck at Pictionary?
Who draws a ninja star like a Star of David?
Right, right?
Yeah!
- Another round!
- Yeah!
I was trying to help him.
I'm his best friend.
That's the best friend's job.
The best friend's job is to call me that word?
Yeah.
Oh, Ted.
Oh, Teddy boy.
Why is this such a big deal?
It's just a word.
We use lots of words, every day.
It shouldn't be any different than any other word.
Then why don't you say it now?
Grinch.
You timed that didn't you?
Perfectly.
Well, at least you apologized.
You apologized, didn't you?
Oh, yeah.
"I'm sorry" were the first words out of my mouth.
I'm sorry, but I am not apologizing.
I was just trying to put the guy back together.
You smashed him to pieces.
Are you seriously not going to apologize for leaving that message?
- No!
- Why not?
Because, Lily, this summer, you were kind of a Grinch.
- Oooh.
- Oooh.
Oh, you'll be sorry, Ted Mosby.
Ted Vivian Mosby!
That's not my middle name.
00:05:00,351 -- 00:05:02,015 You kiss your mother with that mouth?
Like you've never said that word.
I don't kiss your mother with my mouth.
Yet.
Are you sick?
Is it sick to find maturity and experience sexy?
No, I meant do you have a cold?
I'm fine.
I'm fine.
My nose is just overflowing with awesome and I had to get some of it out.
Now, if you'll excuse me, the holidays are a time when people are lonely and desperate.
It's the most wonderful time of the year.
I should go apologize.
It's Christmas Eve.
Yeah.
I mean, slamming doors and screaming curses?
If I wanted that, I would have gone home for the holidays.
I don't see any mistletoe, but...
Oh!
Oh, God!
Uh... "Bless you" would have been nice.
- You're sick.
- I'm not sick.
- You're sick.
- You know what?
I am sick.
Sick of you telling me I'm sick.
What up?
Ahh...
Three flights of stairs, not a drop spilled.
Hey, buddy.
You sure this is gonna work?
Yeah, this is our thing.
In college, whenever I wanted to make up with her, I'd buy her a beer.
- Cute, right?
- Totally.
Plus free mug.
Okay, come on.
Usually that would've done the trick, but it turned out this was a problem not even alcohol could solve.
Actually the beer helped a little.
She took the decorations.
She took the decorations!
What a Grinch!
That time I did say "Grinch."
All right.
I guess I have to call her, right?
Lily's cell phone.
She'll listen to reason-- right?
Oh, hey, Billy.
Actually, funny thing-- the voice dial got you.
I was trying to call...
Oh, I'm sorry to hear that.
Yeah, the holidays are a rough time for everyone, Billy.
Okay, yeah, dinner next Wednesday.
Okay.
Damn voice dial.
Barney!
What the hell are you doing?
Get in here, it's freezing outside.
Are you insane?
Hey, blame Lily and her oppressive "no cigars in the apartment rule."
God, it's like Marshall's marrying the Taliban.
High five.
Eww.
No.
You have to go home and get to bed.
Oh, Robin, my simple friend from the untamed north, let me tell you about a little thing I like to call mind over body.
You see, whenever I start feeling sick,
I just stop being sick and be awesome instead.
True story.
Yeah, in two minutes,
I'm going to pound a sixer of Red Bull, hop in a cab, play a couple of hours of laser tag, maybe get a spray-on tan.
It's gonna be legen...
Wait for it...
Lily!
Merry Christmas, assface.
Um, Lily?
Where are the Christmas decorations?
At my apartment.
You want to bring them back so we can celebrate Christmas together-- please?
Ted, do you know what I would do if one of my kindergartners used that kind of language?
I would be on the phone with their parents.
Yeah, I'm not a kindergartner.
Exactly.
You know what that word means.
You know that calling people names is mean and hurtful... assface.
Lily, if you don't bring that stuff back right now, we...
She hung up.
She's just mad.
She'll cool down.
Lily...
Don't forget to take the cookies out of the oven... assface!
Damn it!
I could be in Cleveland right now making peppermint lager with my dad.
Where are you going?
Marshall gets home in three hours.
He's gonna show up-- no Lily, no winter wonderland.
I gotta get up to the Bronx.
...dary.
Hey, dude, how's the paper going?
Screw the paper, how's the winter wonderland?
Is it magical?
Oh... so magical.
When you walk through the door, does it feel like you've been slapped in the face by Christmas?
Sure does.
Look, I gotta go.
Come on, man, describe it!
Tell me about the decorations.
Is Rudolph there?
He is, isn't he?
Hi, Rudolph!
Ah, yeah, but, you know... decorations, is that really what Christmas is about?
Hell, yeah!
What else would it be about?
Uh, try the birth of Christ.
You know, Christmas-- Christ Mas, which means "More Christ" to our Spanish friends.
Yeah, well, all I know is walking in that door and seeing the winter wonderland and seeing Lily and all you guys, just...
I can't wait.
Right.
I gotta go.
Right.
Okay.
Oh, wait.
Ted, Ted, Ted, Ted.
One more thing.
How about the cookies?
Are they delicious?
You know, honestly, they taste a little store-bought.
Oh!
I got another call.
Well, tell Lily I love her.
Right.
- Hello?
- Ted Evelyn Mosby!
Oh.
Uh, hey, Mom.
Merry Christmas.
I just got the most disturbing call from Lily.
How could you use such a horrible word?
Oh, God, she called you?
Are you acting out because of the divorce?
Is-is this all about Clint?
No, Mom, why would it be about Clint?
Hey, buddy, it's Clint.
How you doing, champ?
Hey, Clint.
Listen, um, I don't really have time to...
Hey, hey, no, no, no.
Ted, Ted.
You don't know this yet, but you and I are going to be great friends.
Now, the Native Americans have this ritual...
This is a low moment for the Barnacle.
I should be off playing laser tag right now, but instead...
Don't look at me.
I'm hideous.
You just look like a regular guy.
Exactly.
I'm a Ted.
I'm wearing elastic-waist fleece pants.
And isn't it more comfy?
Yes.
Come on, you need eat something.
Too weak... to hold... bowl.
Fine, I'll feed you.
Ouchie in my mouth!
I don't want it.
I want ice cream.
No, you're not having ice cream for dinner just 'cause you're sick.
- But my throat hurts.
- No.
I hate you!
Don't leave me.
Who is it?
Pizza delivery.
Whoa.
Hey, you tricked me.
You really thought I was the pizza delivery guy?
No, I knew it was you.
I just thought you'd at least bring a pizza.
Yeah, well,
I brought a beer, but I gave it to a homeless guy.
All right, he took it from me.
Now, will you please come home?
No, I'm not spending Christmas with you.
Okay, I'm sorry for calling you a... that word, over the summer, and for saying it again today.
And for thinking it a lot on the subway ride over.
I had no right to say that.
It was hurtful and immature and I'm sorry.
Oh, shut up.
You think I don't know your fake apologies by now, Ted Mosby?
Huh?
You're clearly still mad at me.
- I'm not mad at you.
- Yes, you are.
I am not mad at you, Lily.
Now, can we please just...
I've apologized to Marshall and he's forgiven me and we've moved passed it.
Why can't you?
Because you never apologized to me.
Marshall's not the only one you walked out on.
You leave for three months, you don't even call.
Come on, Lily, we're supposed to be friends!
Yeah, some friend, you called me a Grinch.
- You were a Grinch!
- How can you...
Grinchy, Grinch, Grinch, Grinch, Grinch, Grinch, Grinch.
Happy?
Now, you've pissed off the big guy upstairs.
Yeah, I'm sure God cares if I...
You use that language again and I'll turn off your water!
That's my super.
He lives above me.
Great.
Thanks to your filthy mouth, now I'm going to have Christmas alone in the dark.
Fine.
I don't want to ruin Christmas.
You can have the apartment.
Don't worry about seeing me there
I'll be in Staten Island with my cousin Stacy.
Just....
Ow.
Merry Christmas.
You're spending Christmas Eve with your family?
Baby, that sucks.
I'm so sorry.
Uh, they're fine.
They're just...
they're a little weird.
You know they don't believe in gifts or Christmas trees.
And they think Santa's how Satan spells his name when he wants to trick us.
Well, do you want me to go with you?
Was that a sincere offer?
First tell me your answer.
Stay there.
Save yourself.
We'll spend all day together tomorrow.
Okay.
Oh, how's Barney feeling?
You mean the whiney bottomless pit of neediness?
He was bugging me, so I spiked his echinacea tea with codeine.
You're gonna be a great mom.
Holy crap, the magical Christmas season is upon us.
And thank God we don't pay for utilities.
Merry Christmas!
What's in the box?
Only the best present for the best girl ever.
It took me all day to track it down.
I thought you were writing a paper.
Ah, naw, I blew that off.
I'll get an extension.
School's not important.
What is that pitter patter on the roof?
Could it be the sound of an awesome Christmas story about to come down the chimney?
Why, yes, it is.
'Twas the day before Christmas...
It was supposed to arrive, like, five days ago, but then it got lost and rerouted.
I checked two other branches, finally they told me it was here.
Yeah, all I needed to know was the tracking number.
Looks like it's headed out to our regional branch in Poughkeepsie.
What?
No, no, no, no, I need that package today.
Listen, the truck already left five minutes ago, so unless you want to run after it...
Stop!
Stop!
Stop, please, stop.
Stop.
Stop the truck.
I need a package on your truck.
Can I please take a look in back?
Sure.
But I gotta keep driving my route.
I'm running behind.
My bad.
I'm okay.
Hey, man, thanks for helping me make my fiancée's Christmas.
No problem.
Too bad I can't deliver all these packages by the end of the day.
Wait, so some people aren't going to get their gifts in time for Christmas?
Sadly, no.
# They call me back door Santa #
# I make my runs # # about the break of day #
# They call me back door Santa #
# I make my runs # # about the break of day #
# Oh, ho, ho #
# I make all # # the little girls happy... #
We delivered every single package on that truck.
But I still have one package left to give.
Yeah, I did.
Merry Christmas.
- Open it, Baby.
- Okay.
Oh, my God.
An Easy Bake Oven!
I've wanted one of these ever since I was a little girl.
In this exact model.
I never told you that.
How did you know?
It's our first Christmas since we got back together.
I want to get her something really special.
So I'm getting her a jukebox.
Wow, that's a great gift.
Not really.
It's this big and it dispenses gum.
Oh, man, I know something you could get her that would blow her mind.
Ready?
Eight years ago...
When I was a kid, all I wanted was an Easy Bake Oven.
I begged and I begged, but all I got was a stupid Lego set because my feminist mom didn't want me conforming to traditional gender roles.
Easy Bake Oven-- that's what I'm going to call my van.
Dude... how was the concert?
I couldn't find the outside.
I can't believe Ted remembered after all these years.
Yeah, and after all that weed.
Where is he anyway?
Staten Island.
Why?
Okay, don't tell your mom, but I got you guys some presents.
Like the gift of God's love?
No, dude, real presents.
Uncle Ted got us presents!
That's okay, Ted, we'll just give them to charity.
Yay!
Uh, not you, Charity.
I meant the less fortunate.
Ted, how would you like to say grace tonight?
Uh, you know what, why don't you say it.
I really wouldn't know what to say.
Why don't you recite your favorite passage of scripture.
That's a great idea, Charity.
But, really, I don't know.
I mean how do you choose your favorite passage?
It's the Bible; there's so many...
great ones...
That one from Pulp Fiction's pretty cool.
Ooh, I'll get it.
Charity, I'm tapping you in.
Dear, Father, thank you for this day, and thank you for bringing this family together.
Amen.
Who is it, Ted?
Uh, it's...
it's just, um, carolers.
# Silent night #
# Holy night... #
I came here to apologize.
I'm so sorry, Ted.
I accept.
Give me the beer.
Oh, oh, it is so good to see you guys.
Are you coming home?
Totally.
But first, Lily, I owe you an apology.
Oh, for the love of God, are you as sick of apologies as I am?
Yes!
Can we just skip the apology and go straight to the forgiving?
Yes.
And I promise, I will never ever call you a... you know, again.
That's okay.
I was kind of a Grinch.
What's a Grinch?
Nothing.
It's something you shouldn't say.
Mom, what's a Grinch?
Grinch, Grinch, Grinch...
Merry Christmas, everybody.
Run, run.
Merry Christmas, Marshall.
Previously on 'Boston Legal'...
Jerry said you were worried you might have done this.
I experienced some kind of a blackout.
We need to change our plea.
No, no, no, no, no, no!
She's insane.
What do you think Mrs Wilkes loved most about you?
I made her laugh.
You made her laugh.
I'm funny.
Were you obsessed with Marcia Hooper?
I adored her.
Why'd she get a restraining order against you?
What do I have to do, kill somebody?
Oops.
I didn't see you there.
What are you doing, Lincoln?
Tonight's date is with me after all, Shirley Schmidt.
The latest report is that Ms Jane is conscious.
She will survive.
Police are not commenting on whether she was able to provide any information on her assailant...
Denny...
Can you believe it?
Somebody actually tried to take her out.
Have you seen Shirley?
Naked?
Lately.
She hasn't come in.
She's not answering her calls.
She's, uh, just disappeared.
♫ Christmas, Christmas time is near ♫
♫ Time for toys ♫
♫ And time for cheer ♫
♫ We've been good but we can't last ♫
♫ Hurry, Christmas, hurry fast ♫
Would you like to scream?
It's okay.
The room is completely soundproof.
It's my little safe room.
Listen, if I agreed not to press charges...
Do you think I'm stupid?
Certainly twisted.
The police would press charges regardless of your wishes, and besides, this is the room where the only relevant wishes are mine.
From the first moment I saw you, do you know what I wanted to do?
Pave my driveway?
I wanted to suck on your right earlobe.
I'm sure people tell you you have soft, supple lobes.
It gets old.
Is mocking me really an exercise of your most sound judgment, Shirley?
After all, I do have in my possession a loaded firearm.
Let alone a ukulele.
I might do you harm, Shirley Schmidt.
Do you not think I will?
Lincoln, suck my lobe.
I'm just saying, as circumstantial cases go, it's a strong one.
Erica, there's no evidence of anybody else being there but you.
What about her husband?
He was there.
The cameras clearly show him.
The video also shows him leaving the apartment building four minutes after entering.
Erica... it's not too late to amend our plea.
You think I'm insane, don't you?
Well, there's the 2-hour blackout...
Caused by trauma.
You hear voices.
No, no, no!
–You snap.
–Hey!
Case in point.
I see what you're doing.
You're deliberately antagonizing me to see how I'll respond on cross.
Actually, that wasn't it.
A little help, Jerry.
Erica, we really need to consider insanity.
The evidence, we feel, excludes suicide.
The only one there was you.
We need to at least consider a diminished capacity plea, if for no other reason than to give us some plea-bargaining leverage.
Let's hug for luck.
I know you two will take care of me.
–Any thoughts?
–None.
Ready?
I'm ready.
I actually feel... calm.
Of course, I'm medicated but...
Look at me.
This is a murder trial, Jerry, a particularly difficult one at that.
If at any time you feel...
–Why?
Sorry?
Why is it a particularly difficult one?
Well, surely you've considered our client may be guilty.
I don't believe that.
She's innocent, Alan.
I'm gonna win this trial.
Everything all right, Denny?
I'm depressed.
Okay.
Why?
My murder case went away.
You've still got yours.
It just doesn't seem fair.
Nutty Lincoln didn't whack the judge?
I need a case, Alan.
You'll get a case.
This country has the most homicides of any western industrialized nation.
Even so... 16,000 a year, Denny.
That's about five times the amount of American soldiers killed in Iraq.
Sooner or later, one of these slaughters is gonna end up in your lap.
Chin up!
What do you mean that she's missing?
Nobody's seen her since the night before last.
Did she cancel the dinner?
No, she just didn't show up.
Have we thought about calling her family?
I think it's time we started doing that.
Let's try not to alarm them.
Are we really sure she's missing?
Sometimes old people just slip off to have some work done.
It may be premature, but I'm gonna call the police.
–We feel this was a staged suicide.
–Why?
Well, there were rope burns on the victim's wrists indicating that she had been tied up.
There was an aborted 911 call from the apartment.
People don't generally call 911 before they hang themselves.
Who made this call?
Nobody spoke.
It was just a hang-up.
We know the call came from the victim's apartment.
Detective, what leads you to believe the defendant committed this crime?
She claims she walked in to discover the dead body.
Well, if so, then why did she wait two hours before calling anybody?
What else?
Her fingerprints were found all over the place.
The fibers of the rope used to tie the victim up were found on the defendant's clothing.
Would she have a motive?
She and the victim were lovers.
She had recently been dumped for another woman.
We accounted for every person entering that apartment building.
She's the only one who could have conceivably committed this murder.
Thank you, sir.
Jerry...
This would be your time.
The surveillance cameras indicate the husband went to the victim's apartment that morning, did they not?
There's no way he could have gone in, rigged a noose and hung her that quickly.
Your testimony is it's impossible?
Extremely unlikely.
You mentioned there were no other fingerprints at the scene to suggest the husband or anybody else being present.
In your experience, have you ever known killers to wear gloves?
–Yes, but...
–Thank you.
The building has a rear entrance, which is not monitored by cameras.
Am I correct?
–Yes, a service entrance.
–Thank you.
As far as the people who reside in the apartment building, you have no way of monitoring or accounting for their activity in the complex, do you?
–No, but we interviewed almost...
–Thank you.
You mentioned motive.
Did you consider a financial motive?
We did.
Mrs Wilkes left an estate valued at roughly $600,000.
Who gets that money upon her death, if you know?
I'm informed it's her girlfriend, Renée Winger.
Ah, yes, the new girlfriend, that... that... that woman sitting right there.
She inherits.
Can we be positive she did not go into the building through the service entrance...
If she had gone into the apartment, your client would have been there at the time.
Unless Ms Winger went in before my client returned from her hike.
Then why would your client wait two hours to call you, if...
'Cause she suffered a traumatic blackout which led her into a catatonic stupor and... –Objection!
–Sustained.
You connected fibers from the ropes used to tie the victim's hands to my client's clothes.
Any fibers from the robe used to hang the victim traceable to my client?
–No.
–Thank you.
Going back to motive, in addition to the will, is there a million-dollar life insurance policy in play here?
Yes, there is.
–Who is the beneficiary there?
–The husband.
So we have two people with financial motive, neither being my client.
It takes more than a stiff whack on the head to keep me down, folks.
Trust me, I get hit harder during sex.
I'm only sorry this creepo didn't have at me with a shovel during Sweeps.
I knew I should have plunked her a second time.
I just knew it.
Are you telling me you're the one who assaulted her?
I say that in confidence, of course.
Lincoln, why are you so determined to have people believe you're dangerous?
You're not dangerous, are you?
You don't think I can be violent?
What in God's name?
This room is my little Waco.
If somebody should try to break in here to rescue you while this lock is set, it triggers the spring bow to go off.
I bet now you're convinced I'm sinister.
Lincoln... what are you doing?
My apologies.
Renée, you're looking well.
I'm glad.
It's a goal.
Coping okay with your tragic loss?
I see you've put me on your witness list.
It has me flummoxed.
I just thought by that point in the trial, the jury could use a good laugh, and you're funny!
I certainly won't have anything to say that could help her.
You check local hospitals?
All of them, and we've called family.
And you're thinking she was abducted?
I don't know what to think.
I want the police to investigate.
It's too soon to officially declare her a missing person.
It is not like this woman to just fall off the earth.
Russell, something has happened.
Can I just throw one name out there?
Lincoln Meyer.
Well, who is that?
You investigated him in the murder of judge Potts.
We considered him a possible killer of Hooper.
He has a grudge against this law firm, and he's always talking about his "special relationship" with Shirley.
Remember what the shrink said when we were exploring Lincoln as Marcia Hooper's killer?
When somebody becomes addicted to being the object of entertainment, which clearly Lincoln is, they can develop pathological desires, and eventually, they act on them.
You need to eat.
I told you, I'm not hungry.
Here comes the airplane!
Yeah, right.
Instead of the plane, why don't you reach into my purse and get me my cell phone?
Zooming in, getting closer, closer.
Getting ready to land.
One little bite for daddy.
I'm not sure we can be friends after that.
When was the last time you spoke to your wife, sir?
The day before her death.
Would you describe her as suicidal?
Absolutely not.
Paula would never have taken her own life.
She's a devout Catholic.
Suicide went firmly against her religious convictions.
Wouldn't homosexuality go against her Catholic beliefs?
Well, yes.
Your wife was being treated for depression, was she not?
–That is true, but I...
–Thank you.
Did you know, Mr Wilkes, that Paula had recently superseded her will to leave everything to that...
Alan?
That woman?
I learned this, yes.
Lucky there was a life insurance policy naming you as sole beneficiary.
If you are suggesting that I could harm my wife...
Your business recently filed for chapter 11 bankruptcy.
Your wife's death relieves you of a dire financial situation, does it not?
Please answer the question, sir.
Whatever evil I may be capable of, Mr Espenson,
I could never harm another human being, especially one I spent the better part of 11 years loving.
Your response implied that you are indeed capable of evil.
Could you list six examples, please?
You have been truly, truly great, Jerry.
–Really?
–You pushed just the right amount.
You made your point without alienating the jury.
Brilliant!
My feeling is we need to have Erica testify.
It's risky, but I'm not sure we have any other choice.
Have you considered this aborted 911 call?
How do we account for that?
Erica, upon discovering the body, began to call 911, and that's when she went into the blackout.
That could work.
What about Renée?
Do we call her?
I think so.
To the extent we want the jury to see her as a potential killer, we should expose them to her odd demeanor.
Okay, first we'll call Erica, save Renée for last.
Is...
Jerry, what's wrong?
Nothing.
Jerry...
When I was in law school, my dream wasn't so much the big trial as... well, I guess this...
Having a drink at the end of the day with co-counsel, battle-weary, rehashing the day, discussing strategy, the whole socialization of lawyering that... well, until now, I've never experienced.
It's a rich feeling, whatever it is.
It's called friendship.
To friendship, my colleague.
Right on my balcony?
Denny... it's not what you think.
I saw you.
I heard you.
We were just talking.
Oh, dear.
Exchanging intimate thoughts?
On my own balcony.
I never saw it coming.
Things have been so good between us lately.
Well, Denny, it doesn't really sound like he was necessarily being unfaithful.
Of all the times.
I'm feeling vulnerable as it is over my law practice.
You mean not getting the big cases?
Yeah.
I would really encourage you, Denny, to fill this void with something deeper, more meaningful.
It's time to come home to Bella.
I don't know, Bella.
I'll let you crawl into my warm spot.
Come home to Bella.
If he does have her, her life could be in danger.
I realize that, but I can't get a warrant just with what you're telling me.
You could at least pay him a visit.
We could, but it might be better if you guys did.
Us?
Well, if he loves attention as much as you're saying, then he might invite you in.
And maybe you could hear or see something
I could take to a magistrate and get a search warrant.
Jeffrey?
He's not gonna let me in.
I'm Mr Dirty Mouth.
Well, he still likes me.
I'll go.
Oh, now we're safe.
What did you say?
All right!
Detective, we found something.
It's a little sordid.
What?
You gotta be kidding.
Claire!
Braddy boy!
What a surprise!
Hello, Lincoln.
Listen, evidently, the police are still asking questions about you on the judge Potts murder.
They want another statement, so we thought we'd best have a little conversation.
Uh, can we come in?
Why didn't you call and have me come into the office?
Well, we thought we'd just head right over.
I don't believe you.
Can we come in, Lincoln?
No.
I walked through the door.
I saw her hanging.
She was dead?
Her hands were tied behind her back.
I got on a chair and cut the rope off.
I couldn't reach the noose part.
That's the last thing I remember, actually, trying to reach up and cut the rope around her neck.
And then what happened?
The next thing, it was... two hours later.
That's when I called for help.
You have no memory of those two hours?
I've been treated for a psychiatric disorder.
I've had some blackouts on occasion.
When you say you called for help, you mean you called your lawyer?
Yes.
Why didn't you call the police?
I suppose I was afraid, especially since I had no memory of the previous two hours.
What were you afraid of?
That maybe you had killed Paula Wilkes?
She left you for that woman, Renée Winger.
Yes.
Did you go to confront Renée Winger two nights before Ms Wilkes' death?
I, I beg your pardon?
Ms Winger says you confronted her in a hotel lounge and started screaming at her.
Many people witnessed this.
You told her she'd regret it if she continued to see Paula Wilkes.
I have no memory of that.
You have no memory of that?
No.
I...
I swear.
I swear.
I hope they don't go running to the police.
I would hate to have the police barge in here while my spring bow is cocked.
I mean, somebody could get hurt.
Lincoln...
I have one question for you.
Why?
You've lived your whole life within the bounds of the law, Lincoln.
Now you display a desperation that...
What's happened in your life, Lincoln?
Well, this whole global warming thing...
Was it Marcia Hooper?
You were in love with her, weren't you?
I think it's hard for you to live without her.
I don't need Marcia Hooper.
I have you, Shirley.
She really did like me.
Her husband made her get that restraining order.
She was kind to me.
She liked me.
We... we all live our lives out on a ledge, Lincoln.
It takes surprisingly little to push us over.
This was a devastating tragedy for you, losing her.
Add to that, people denying your relationship...
I don't want to talk about it anymore.
Lincoln, how does this end?
I don't know.
I never meant to harm you when I took you, Shirley.
Of course I didn't.
But I suppose I've painted myself into a bit of a corner.
If this is a game, Lincoln, you win.
I'm afraid.
Maybe she doesn't remember doing it, but what other possible explanation could there be?
Maybe Renée somehow got in the building without being detected.
Maybe the husband did it inside of four minutes.
Maybe somebody else who lived in the building.
Alan, I'm like a human polygraph.
I can sense the truth.
Erica's telling the truth when she says it's not in her to commit murder.
Renée is not a truthful person.
And the husband, he is a truthful person, but there's something... well, I, I don't think he's being entirely truthful here.
You're a human polygraph?
I never knew this.
It's one of the reasons why I so implicitly and immediately trusted you.
I was drawn to your honesty.
Jerry, I think one of the reasons I'm drawn to you...
Oh, dear.
Don't talk to me.
It's not like I went fishing with him.
And don't make fun of me.
I don't know whether you know this, not many men take the time every day to... have a cigar, a glass of scotch, to talk to their best friend.
That's not something most men have.
No, it isn't.
What I give to you, what, what I share,
I do with no one else.
I like to think what you give to me, you do with nobody else.
Now that, that may sound silly to you, but here's what I think is silly... the idea that jealousy or fidelity is reserved for romance.
I always suspected that there was a connection between you and that man, that you got something you didn't get from me.
I probably do.
But, gosh... what I get from you, Denny...
People walk around today calling everyone their best friend.
The term doesn't have any real meaning anymore.
Mere acquaintances are lavished with hugs and kisses upon a second or at most third meeting.
Birthday cards get passed around offices so everybody can scribble a snippet of sentimentality for a colleague they've barely met.
And everyone just loves everyone.
As a result, when you tell somebody you love them today... it isn't much heard.
I love you, Denny.
You are my best friend.
I can't imagine going through life without you... as my best friend.
I'm not gonna kiss you, however.
I don't want you on my balcony, on any balcony... alone with that man.
Okay.
Déjà vu.
That's French.
All set for your testimony, Renée?
I'm nervous.
I'm not as funny when I'm nervous.
Let's cut to it, Ms Winger.
You and the decedent, Paula Wilkes were involved romantically?
Yes.
We'd met about a month prior to her death.
We began dating, and it quickly became exclusive.
Well, uh, by, when you say, "exclusive,"
that's understating it a bit, isn't it?
I don't know.
It certainly escalated quickly.
Whether it would have sustained is hard to say.
She died so early in the relationship.
Well, she must have thought it would sustain.
After all, she redid her will rather suddenly in her own handwriting, leaving everything to you.
Um, I'm a little embarrassed about that.
We were in Las Vegas.
We were, I guess, in the throes of new love where people can be prone to doing crazy things.
And a month later, she shockingly turns up dead, hanged.
Mr Shore, I'm very happy to answer your questions, but
I would appreciate it if you'd be a little less flippant about Paula's death.
Ms Winger, I'm so, I, it...
I, I can't help but notice your demeanor seems remarkably different today than in all my prior encounters with you.
Well, I...
I guess I'm...
I'm a little nervous to be in court.
I don't think she came off a killer.
I'm going to prison.
Blessed are the merciful for they are...
Erica, she didn't really hurt our case here.
She said nothing to incriminate you.
We just lost her as a red herring.
Do we even have anything else to offer?
Well, just one of my overwritten closing arguments, but they've been known to work in the past.
Was that helpful?
That was quite a performance, Renée.
Maybe that was the real me, and all this time I've been performing with you.
Any thoughts?
None.
He's got her.
I can feel it.
She's in that house.
Yeah, he practically baited us.
I say we just charge in there, police or no police.
I can do it.
Brad, the last time you did that, you chopped off a priest's fingers.
We are not trained to storm.
I was a marine!
I'm trained.
I'm practically a navy SEAL, and I saw that.
Did the detectives say what it would take to satisfy reasonable suspicion?
Something more than a hunch, which is, let's face it, all we have.
What's going on, a party?
This is not a time for your nonsense, okay, sport?
Typically, you're a fan of my nonsense, Brad.
What's the matter?
We think that Lincoln has kidnapped Shirley.
At least, we think it's possible.
–What?
–He may have her in his house.
Well, why don't the police just go get her?
Because we don't have anything to go on, and the police can't get a warrant.
Well, Lincoln told me in a phone call he did have Shirley.
I'll say as much in an affidavit.
You'll take it to the police and get your warrant.
I'll go have that phone call now.
You'll have my sworn statement in a minute.
He just told this Alan Shore he had Ms Schmidt?
Apparently.
Let's assume a mistake is going to be made here, Russell.
Which side do you want to err on?
Okay, let's go see the magistrate.
Jerry, what's wrong?
I was going through the life insurance policy in my typical meticulous fashion, and look what I found in the fine print.
I highlighted it.
Okay, Mr Beedle, we'll hear your summation.
Actually, your honor, the defense would like to call one last witness.
You said you rested.
We don't.
The defense would like to recall Sean Wilkes.
Mr Wilkes, you've met my colleague Jerry Espenson, have you not?
I have.
Jerry, it turns out, is a human polygraph.
He has a nose for who's telling the truth and for who's a truthful person in general.
And the thing is, you struck him as one of those generally truthful people who's not telling the truth here.
Objection.
Does counsel have a question?
My question is, have you been honest with this court, Mr Wilkes?
Yes.
Paula Wilkes' life insurance policy, for which you are the sole beneficiary, has a settlement value of $1 million.
Are there any exclusions under your late wife's policy, sir?
Uh, I think there are certain exclusions, yes.
One being suicide.
The policy doesn't cover suicide.
It says right here, uh, highlighted in yellow.
I am sure it must have been... an unimaginable shock when you entered Paula's apartment to see her hanging there.
And as you picked up the phone and dialed 911, another shocking reality hit you, one with crippling monetary consequences.
It was you who aborted the 911 call, and then you did something foolish.
You tried to make her tragic death look like a murder.
I'm sure charges of perjury are swirling around in your head about now.
Fortunately, by law, if a witness retakes the stand and corrects his false statements, he can avoid those charges.
So here's your chance, Mr Wilkes, to set the record straight.
Did you go into that apartment, discover that your ex-wife had committed suicide and proceed to tie her hands, move a chair, do whatever was necessary to make it look like somebody had killed her?
I was in shock.
I wasn't thinking clearly.
I'm so sorry.
Your honor, the defense rests.
Mr Wilkes, you may step down.
The bailiff will remand the witness into custody.
At this time I'm dismissing the charges against Ms Erica Dolenz.
The defendant is free to go.
Oh, my God!
Jerry, you realize what you've done?
You've secured the freedom of an innocent person.
Let's hope Denny doesn't walk in.
Hey, may I join?
I'm sorry, no.
Why don't you tell him you were practically a navy SEAL?
♫ Want a plane that loops the loop ♫
♫ Me, I want a hula hoop ♫
♫ We can hardly stand the wait ♫
♫ Please, Christmas, don't be late ♫
Aren't you going to answer it?
Your little friends called the police.
That was a mistake!
–Lincoln...
They've escalated the situation before I had a chance to work out my exit plan.
Lincoln, I can hear them.
They're going through the entire house.
From the outside, this room looks like a pantry.
It's a locked room in a basement!
You think they'll skip it?
–Lincoln...
–Shut up!
There's no way out of here.
They're right outside the door, Lincoln.
Wait a minute, this room isn't soundproof.
Help!
Help!
Hey, one more scream like that, and I will shoot you dead!
Someone's down!
Room secured!
There she is.
Before you all start hugging me, did any of you have the presence of mind to bring vodka?
A little antiseptic, a band-aid.
It's just a flesh wound.
So she's all right?
Completely.
She wouldn't even go to the hospital.
Oh, thank goodness.
Thank you for telling me, Denise.
Sure.
Denise... it's news worth celebrating, don't you think?
Don't you ever give up?
I do, actually.
It's just, you don't really want me to.
I must say, Denise, when I look at you,
I see one of those little catholic schoolgirls running around in her plaid skirt, always to class on time, the first to raise her hand, the neatest of penmanship.
And then when I look closer, I see...
Shirley.
Well, I'm glad to see things haven't changed here.
Shirley, are you okay?
I am.
Thank you.
Lincoln was actually a very charming host when he wasn't threatening to kill me.
Alan, it's been brought to my attention that you falsified an affidavit and committed a fraud on the magistrate.
Did I?
As senior partner, I cannot tolerate this kind of behavior, and if it happens again, you will be fired.
No doubt.
Thank you.
You very likely saved my life.
I must say, Shirley, when I look at you,
I see one of those little catholic schoolgirls...
Oh, get a life!
I'll sleep with her one day.
No, you won't.
You know, the brain supposedly confuses fear with passion.
She should be ripe with passion, for God's sake.
Denny, what ever happened to that doll?
The police took her in for questioning.
Shirley Schmidtho?
Yeah.
She'll be back.
Alan...
I'm sorry I doubted your feelings.
It was just seeing you on the balcony with that man.
Alan, what is it about out here?
We're out on a ledge, 14 floors to a spectacular death.
It probably gives us a sense of our mortality, which in turn... there's nothing so life-affirming, I suppose, as a little death tucked in the back of our mind.
When I die, I want my remains sprinkled off of here.
–You?
–The balcony?
Could there be any place more fitting?
I suppose not.
But since I don't want to be cremated, somebody should at least yell, "look out below. "
Ah, the simple pleasures.
A clear night, a scotch, a friend...
Even if he is high-maintenance.
To simple pleasures.
Previously on 'Boston legal'
Jerry said you were worried you might have done this.
I experienced some kind of a blackout.
We need to change our plea.
No, no, no, no, no, no!
She's insane.
What do you think Mrs. Wilkes loved most about you?
I made her laugh.
You made her laugh.
I'm funny.
Were you obsessed with Marcia Hooper?
I adored her.
Why'd she get a restraining order against you?
What do I have to do, kill somebody?
Oops.
I didn't see you there.
What are you doing, Lincoln?
Tonight's date is with me after all, Shirley Schmidt.
The latest report is that Ms. Jane is conscious.
She will survive.
Police are not commenting on whether she was able to provide any information on her assailant...
Denny...
Can you believe it?
Somebody actually tried to take her out.
Have you seen Shirley?
Naked?
Lately.
She hasn't come in.
She's not answering her calls.
She's, uh, just disappeared.
Christmas, Christmas time is near
Time for toys
And time for cheer
We've been good but we can't last
Hurry, Christmas, hurry fast
Would you like to scream?
It's okay.
The room is completely soundproof.
It's my little safe room.
Listen, if I agreed not to press charges...
Do you think I'm stupid?
Certainly twisted.
The police would press charges regardless of your wishes, and besides, this is the room where the only relevant wishes are mine.
From the first moment I saw you, do you know what I wanted to do?
Pave my driveway?
I wanted to suck on your right earlobe.
I'm sure people tell you you have soft, supple lobes.
It gets old.
Is mocking me really an exercise of your most sound judgment, Shirley?
After all, I do have in my possession a loaded firearm.
Let alone a ukulele.
I might do you harm, Shirley Schmidt.
Do you not think I will?
Lincoln, suck my lobe.
I'm just saying, as circumstantial cases go, it's a strong one.
Erica, there's no evidence of anybody else being there but you.
What about her husband?
He was there.
The cameras clearly show him.
The video also shows him leaving the apartment building four minutes after entering.
Erica... it's not too late to amend our plea.
You think I'm insane, don't you?
Well, there's the 2-hour blackout...
Caused by trauma.
You hear voices.
No, no, no!
- You snap.
- Hey!
Case in point.
I see what you're doing.
You're deliberately antagonizing me to see how I'll respond on cross.
Actually, that wasn't it.
A little help, Jerry.
Erica, we really need to consider insanity.
The evidence, we feel, excludes suicide.
The only one there was you.
We need to at least consider a diminished capacity plea, if for no other reason than to give us some plea-bargaining leverage.
Let's hug for luck.
I know you two will take care of me.
- Any thoughts?
- None.
Ready?
I'm ready.
I actually feel... calm.
Of course, I'm medicated but...
Look at me.
This is a murder trial, Jerry, a particularly difficult one at that.
- If at any time you feel...
- Why?
Sorry?
Why is it a particularly difficult one?
Well, surely you've considered our client may be guilty.
I don't believe that.
She's innocent, Alan.
I'm gonna win this trial.
Everything all right, Denny?
I'm depressed.
Okay.
Why?
My murder case went away.
You've still got yours.
It just doesn't seem fair.
Nutty Lincoln didn't whack the judge?
I need a case, Alan.
You'll get a case.
This country has the most homicides of any western industrialized nation.
Even so... 16,000 a year, Denny.
That's about five times the amount of American soldiers killed in Iraq.
Sooner or later, one of these slaughters is gonna end up in your lap.
Chin up!
What do you mean that she's missing?
Nobody's seen her since the night before last.
Did she cancel the dinner?
No, she just didn't show up.
Have we thought about calling her family?
I think it's time we started doing that.
Let's try not to alarm them.
Are we really sure she's missing?
Sometimes old people just slip off to have some work done.
It may be premature, but I'm gonna call the police.
- We feel this was a staged suicide.
- Why?
Well, there were rope burns on the victim's wrists indicating that she had been tied up.
There was an aborted 911 call from the apartment.
People don't generally call 911 before they hang themselves.
Who made this call?
Nobody spoke.
It was just a hang-up.
We know the call came from the victim's apartment.
Detective, what leads you to believe the defendant committed this crime?
She claims she walked in to discover the dead body.
Well, if so, then why did she wait two hours before calling anybody?
What else?
Her fingerprints were found all over the place.
The fibers of the rope used to tie the victim up were found on the defendant's clothing.
Would she have a motive?
She and the victim were lovers.
She had recently been dumped for another woman.
We accounted for every person entering that apartment building.
She's the only one who could have conceivably committed this murder.
Thank you, sir.
Jerry...
This would be your time.
The surveillance cameras indicate the husband went to the victim's apartment that morning, did they not?
There's no way he could have gone in, rigged a noose and hung her that quickly.
Your testimony is it's impossible?
Extremely unlikely.
You mentioned there were no other fingerprints at the scene to suggest the husband or anybody else being present.
In your experience, have you ever known killers to wear gloves?
- Yes, but...
- Thank you.
The building has a rear entrance, which is not monitored by cameras.
Am I correct?
- Yes, a service entrance.
- Thank you.
As far as the people who reside in the apartment building, you have no way of monitoring or accounting for their activity in the complex, do you?
- No, but we interviewed almost...
- Thank you.
You mentioned motive.
Did you consider a financial motive?
We did.
Mrs. Wilkes left an estate valued at roughly $600,000.
Who gets that money upon her death, if you know?
I'm informed it's her girlfriend Renee Winger.
Ah, yes, the new girlfriend, that... that... that woman sitting right there.
She inherits.
Can we be positive she did not go into the building through the service entrance...
If she had gone into the apartment, your client would have been there at the time.
Unless Ms. Winger went in before my client returned from her hike.
Then why would your client wait two hours to call you, if...
'Cause she suffered a traumatic blackout which led her into a catatonic stupor and...
- Objection!
- Sustained.
You connected fibers from the ropes used to tie the victim's hands to my client's clothes.
Any fibers from the robe used to hang the victim traceable to my client?
- No.
- Thank you.
Going back to motive, in addition to the will, is there a million-dollar life insurance policy in play here?
Yes, there is.
- Who is the beneficiary there?
- The husband.
So we have two people with financial motive, neither being my client.
It takes more than a stiff whack on the head to keep me down, folks.
Trust me, I get hit harder during sex.
I'm only sorry this creepo didn't have at me with a shovel during Sweeps.
I knew I should have plunked her a second time.
I just knew it.
Are you telling me you're the one who assaulted her?
I say that in confidence, of course.
Lincoln, why are you so determined to have people believe you're dangerous?
You're not dangerous, are you?
You don't think I can be violent?
What in god's name?
This room is my little Waco.
If somebody should try to break in here to rescue you while this lock is set, it triggers the spring bow to go off.
I bet now you're convinced I'm sinister.
Lincoln... what are you doing?
My apologies.
Renee, you're looking well.
I'm glad.
It's a goal.
Coping okay with your tragic loss?
I see you've put me on your witness list.
It has me flummoxed.
I just thought by that point in the trial, the jury could use a good laugh, and you're funny!
I certainly won't have anything to say that could help her.
You check local hospitals?
All of them, and we've called family.
And you're thinking she was abducted?
I don't know what to think.
I want the police to investigate.
It's too soon to officially declare her a missing person.
It is not like this woman to just fall off the earth.
Russell, something has happened.
Can I just throw one name out there?
Lincoln Meyer.
Well, who is that?
You investigated him in the murder of judge Potts.
We considered him a possible killer of Hooper.
He has a grudge against this law firm, and he's always talking about his "special relationship" with Shirley.
Remember what the shrink said when we were exploring Lincoln as Marcia Hooper's killer?
When somebody becomes addicted to being the object of entertainment, which clearly Lincoln is, they can develop pathological desires, and eventually, they act on them.
You need to eat.
I told you, I'm not hungry.
Here comes the airplane!
Yeah, right.
Instead of the plane, why don't you reach into my purse and get me my cell phone?
Zooming in, getting closer, closer.
Getting ready to land.
One little bite for daddy.
I'm not sure we can be friends after that.
When was the last time you spoke to your wife, sir?
The day before her death.
Would you describe her as suicidal?
Absolutely not.
Paula would never have taken her own life.
She's a devout Catholic.
Suicide went firmly against her religious convictions.
Wouldn't homosexuality go against her Catholic beliefs?
Well, yes.
Your wife was being treated for depression, was she not?
- That is true, but I...
- Thank you.
Did you know, Mr. Wilkes, that Paula had recently superseded her will to leave everything to that...
Alan?
That woman?
I learned this, yes.
Lucky there was a life insurance policy naming you as sole beneficiary.
If you are suggesting that I could harm my wife...
Your business recently filed for chapter 11 bankruptcy.
Your wife's death relieves you of a dire financial situation, does it not?
Please answer the question, sir.
Whatever evil I may be capable of, Mr. Espenson,
I could never harm another human being, especially one I spent the better part of 11 years loving.
Your response implied that you are indeed capable of evil.
Could you list six examples, please?
You have been truly, truly great, Jerry.
- Really?
- You pushed just the right amount.
You made your point without alienating the jury.
Brilliant!
My feeling is we need to have Erica testify.
It's risky, but I'm not sure we have any other choice.
Have you considered this aborted 911 call?
How do we account for that?
Erica, upon discovering the body, began to call 911, and that's when she went into the blackout.
That could work.
What about Renee?
Do we call her?
I think so.
To the extent we want the jury to see her as a potential killer, we should expose them to her odd demeanor.
Okay, first we'll call Erica, save Renee for last.
Is...
Jerry, what's wrong?
Nothing.
Jerry...
When I was in law school, my dream wasn't so much the big trial as... well, I guess this...
Having a drink at the end of the day with co-counsel, battle-weary, rehashing the day, discussing strategy, the whole socialization of lawyering that... well, until now, I've never experienced.
It's a rich feeling, whatever it is.
It's called friendship.
To friendship, my colleague.
Right on my balcony?
Denny... it's not what you think.
I saw you.
I heard you.
We were just talking.
Oh, dear.
Exchanging intimate thoughts?
On my own balcony.
I never saw it coming.
Things have been so good between us lately.
Well, Denny, it doesn't really sound like he was necessarily being unfaithful.
Of all the times.
I'm feeling vulnerable as it is over my law practice.
You mean not getting the big cases?
Yeah.
I would really encourage you, Denny, to fill this void with something deeper, more meaningful.
It's time to come home to Bella.
I don't know, Bella.
I'll let you crawl into my warm spot.
Come home to Bella.
If he does have her, her life could be in danger.
I realize that, but I can't get a warrant just with what you're telling me.
You could at least pay him a visit.
We could, but it might be better if you guys did.
Us?
Well, if he loves attention as much as you're saying, then he might invite you in.
And maybe you could hear or see something
I could take to a magistrate and get a search warrant.
Jeffrey?
He's not gonna let me in.
I'm Mr. Dirty mouth.
Well, he still likes me.
I'll go.
Oh, now we're safe.
What did you say?
All right!
Detective, we found something.
It's a little sordid.
What?
You gotta be kidding.
Claire!
Braddy boy!
What a surprise!
Hello, Lincoln.
Listen, evidently, the police are still asking questions about you on the judge Potts murder.
They want another statement, so we thought we'd best have a little conversation.
Uh, can we come in?
Why didn't you call and have me come into the office?
Well, we thought we'd just head right over.
I don't believe you.
Can we come in, Lincoln?
No.
I walked through the door.
I saw her hanging.
She was dead?
Her hands were tied behind her back.
I got on a chair and cut the rope off.
I couldn't reach the noose part.
That's the last thing I remember, actually, trying to reach up and cut the rope around her neck.
And then what happened?
The next thing, it was... two hours later.
That's when I called for help.
You have no memory of those two hours?
I've been treated for a psychiatric disorder.
I've had some blackouts on occasion.
When you say you called for help, you mean you called your lawyer?
Yes.
Why didn't you call the police?
I suppose I was afraid, especially since I had no memory of the previous two hours.
What were you afraid of?
That maybe you had killed Paula Wilkes?
She left you for that woman, Renee Winger.
Yes.
Did you go to confront Renee Winger two nights before Ms. Wilkes' death?
I, I beg your pardon?
Ms. Winger says you confronted her in a hotel lounge and started screaming at her.
Many people witnessed this.
You told her she'd regret it if she continued to see Paula Wilkes.
I have no memory of that.
You have no memory of that?
No.
I...
I swear.
I swear.
I hope they don't go running to the police.
I would hate to have the police barge in here while my spring bow is cocked.
I mean, somebody could get hurt.
Lincoln...
I have one question for you.
Why?
You've lived your whole life within the bounds of the law, Lincoln.
Now you display a desperation that...
What's happened in your life, Lincoln?
Well, this whole global warming thing...
Was it Marcia Hooper?
You were in love with her, weren't you?
I think it's hard for you to live without her.
I don't need Marcia Hooper.
I have you, Shirley.
She really did like me.
Her husband made her get that restraining order.
She was kind to me.
She liked me.
We... we all live our lives out on a ledge, Lincoln.
It takes surprisingly little to push us over.
This was a devastating tragedy for you, losing her.
Add to that, people denying your relationship...
I don't want to talk about it anymore.
Lincoln, how does this end?
I don't know.
I never meant to harm you when I took you, Shirley.
Of course I didn't.
But I suppose I've painted myself into a bit of a corner.
If this is a game, Lincoln, you win.
I'm afraid.
Maybe she doesn't remember doing it, but what other possible explanation could there be?
Maybe Renee somehow got in the building without being detected.
Maybe the husband did it inside of four minutes.
Maybe somebody else who lived in the building.
Alan, I'm like a human polygraph.
I can sense the truth.
Erica's telling the truth when she says it's not in her to commit murder.
Renee is not a truthful person.
And the husband, he is a truthful person, but there's something... well, I, I don't think he's being entirely truthful here.
You're a human polygraph?
I never knew this.
It's one of the reasons why I so implicitly and immediately trusted you.
I was drawn to your honesty.
Jerry, I think one of the reasons I'm drawn to you...
Oh, dear.
Don't talk to me.
It's not like I went fishing with him.
And don't make fun of me.
I don't know whether you know this, not many men take the time every day to... have a cigar, a glass of scotch, to talk to their best friend.
That's not something most men have.
No, it isn't.
What I give to you, what, what I share,
I do with no one else.
I like to think what you give to me, you do with nobody else.
Now that, that may sound silly to you, but here's what I think is silly... the idea that jealousy or fidelity is reserved for romance.
I always suspected that there was a connection between you and that man, that you got something you didn't get from me.
I probably do.
But, gosh...
What I get from you, Denny...
People walk around today calling everyone their best friend.
The term doesn't have any real meaning anymore.
Mere acquaintances are lavished with hugs and kisses upon a second or at most third meeting.
Birthday cards get passed around offices so everybody can scribble a snippet of sentimentality for a colleague they've barely met.
And everyone just loves everyone.
As a result, when you tell somebody you love them today... it isn't much heard.
I love you, Denny.
You are my best friend.
I can't imagine going through life without you... as my best friend.
I'm not gonna kiss you, however.
I don't want you on my balcony, on any balcony... alone with that man.
Okay.
Deja vu.
That's French.
All set for your testimony, Renee?
I'm nervous.
I'm not as funny when I nervous.
Let's cut to it, Ms. Winger.
You and the decedent, Paula Wilkes were involved romantically?
Yes.
We'd met about a month prior to her death.
We began dating, and it quickly became exclusive.
Well, uh, by, when you say, "exclusive,"
that's understating it a bit, isn't it?
I don't know.
It certainly escalated quickly.
Whether it would have sustained is hard to say.
She died so early in the relationship.
Well, she must have thought it would sustain.
After all, she redid her will rather suddenly in her own handwriting, leaving everything to you.
Um, I'm a little embarrassed about that.
We were in Las Vegas.
We were, I guess, in the throes of new love where people can be prone to doing crazy things.
And a month later, she shockingly turns up dead, hanged.
Mr. Shore, I'm very happy to answer your questions, but
I would appreciate it if you'd be a little less flippant about Paula's death.
Ms. Winger, I'm so, I, it...
I, I can't help but notice your demeanor seems remarkably different today than in all my prior encounters with you.
Well, I...
I guess I'm...
I'm a little nervous to be in court.
I don't think she came off a killer.
I'm going to prison.
Blessed are the merciful for they are...
Erica, she didn't really hurt our case here.
She said nothing to incriminate you.
We just lost her as a red herring.
Do we even have anything else to offer?
Well, just one of my overwritten closing arguments, but they've been known to work in the past.
Was that helpful?
That was quite a performance, Renee.
Maybe that was the real me, and all this time I've been performing with you.
Any thoughts?
None.
He's got her.
I can feel it.
She's in that house.
Yeah, he practically baited us.
I say we just charge in there, police or no police.
I can do it.
Brad, the last time you did that, you chopped off a priest's fingers.
We are not trained to storm.
I was a marine!
I'm trained.
I'm practically a navy SEAL, and I saw that.
Did the detectives say what it would take to satisfy reasonable suspicion?
Something more than a hunch, which is, let's face it, all we have.
What's going on, a party?
This is not a time for your nonsense, okay, sport?
Typically, you're a fan of my nonsense, Brad.
What's the matter?
We think that Lincoln has kidnapped Shirley.
At least, we think it's possible.
- What?
- He may have her in his house.
Well, why don't the police just go get her?
Because we don't have anything to go on, and the police can't get a warrant.
Well, Lincoln told me in a phone call he did have Shirley.
I'll say as much in an affidavit.
You'll take it to the police and get your warrant.
I'll go have that phone call now.
You'll have my sworn statement in a minute.
He just told this Alan Shore he had Ms. Schmidt?
Apparently.
Let's assume a mistake is going to be made here, Russell.
Which side do you want to err on?
Okay, let's go see the magistrate.
Jerry, what's wrong?
I was going through the life insurance policy in my typical meticulous fashion, and look what I found in the fine print.
I highlighted it.
Okay, Mr. Beedle, we'll hear your summation.
Actually, your honor, the defense would like to call one last witness.
You said you rested.
We don't.
The defense would like to recall Sean Wilkes.
Mr. Wilkes, you've met my colleague Jerry Espenson, have you not?
I have.
Jerry, it turns out, is a human polygraph.
He has a nose for who's telling the truth and for who's a truthful person in general.
And the thing is, you struck him as one of those generally truthful people who's not telling the truth here.
Objection.
Does counsel have a question?
My question is, have you been honest with this court, Mr. Wilkes?
Yes.
Paula Wilkes' life insurance policy, for which you are the sole beneficiary, has a settlement value of $1 million.
Are there any exclusions under your late wife's policy, sir?
Uh, I think there are certain exclusions, yes.
One being suicide.
The policy doesn't cover suicide.
It says right here, uh, highlighted in yellow.
I am sure it must have been... an unimaginable shock when you entered Paula's apartment to see her hanging there.
And as you picked up the phone and dialed 911, another shocking reality hit you, one with crippling monetary consequences.
It was you who aborted the 911 call, and then you did something foolish.
You tried to make her tragic death look like a murder.
I'm sure charges of perjury are swirling around in your head about now.
Fortunately, by law, if a witness retakes the stand and corrects his false statements, he can avoid those charges.
So here's your chance, Mr. Wilkes, to set the record straight.
Did you go into that apartment, discover that your ex-wife had committed suicide and proceed to tie her hands, move a chair, do whatever was necessary to make it look like somebody had killed her?
I was in shock.
I wasn't thinking clearly.
I'm so sorry.
Your honor, the defense rests.
Mr. Wilkes, you may step down.
The bailiff will remand the witness into custody.
At this time I'm dismissing the charges against Ms. Erica Dolenz.
The defendant is free to go.
Oh, my god!
Jerry, you realize what you've done?
You've secured the freedom of an innocent person.
Let's hope Denny doesn't walk in.
Hey, may I join?
I'm sorry, no.
Why don't you tell him you were practically a navy SEAL?
Want a plane that loops the loop
Me, I want a hula hoop
We can hardly stand the wait
Please, Christmas, don't be late
Aren't you going to answer it?
Your little friends called the police.
- That was a mistake!
- Lincoln...
They've escalated the situation before I had a chance to work out my exit plan.
Lincoln, I can hear them.
They're going through the entire house.
From the outside, this room looks like a pantry.
It's a locked room in a basement!
You think they'll skip it?
- Lincoln...
- Shut up!
There's no way out of here.
They're right outside the door, Lincoln.
Wait a minute, this room isn't soundproof.
Help!
Help!
Hey, one more scream like that, and I will shoot you dead!
Someone's down!
Room secured!
There she is.
Before you all start hugging me, did any of you have the presence of mind to bring vodka?
A little antiseptic, a band-aid.
It's just a flesh wound.
So she's all right?
Completely.
She wouldn't even go to the hospital.
Oh, thank goodness.
Thank you for telling me, Denise.
Sure.
Denise... it's news worth celebrating, don't you think?
Don't you ever give up?
I do, actually.
It's just, you don't really want me to.
I must say, Denise, when I look at you,
I see one of those little catholic schoolgirls running around in her plaid skirt, always to class on time, the first to raise her hand, the neatest of penmanship.
And then when I look closer, I see...
Shirley.
Well, I'm glad to see things haven't changed here.
Shirley, are you okay?
I am.
Thank you.
Lincoln was actually a very charming host when he wasn't threatening to kill me.
Alan, it's been brought to my attention that you falsified an affidavit and committed a fraud on the magistrate.
Did I?
As senior partner, I cannot tolerate this kind of behavior, and if it happens again, you will be fired.
No doubt.
Thank you.
You very likely saved my life.
I must say, Shirley, when I look at you,
I see one of those little catholic schoolgirls...
Oh, get a life!
I'll sleep with her one day.
No, you won't.
You know, the brain supposedly confuses fear with passion.
She should be ripe with passion, for god's sake.
Denny, what ever happened to that doll?
The police took her in for questioning.
Shirley Schmidtho?
Yeah.
She'll be back.
Alan...
I'm sorry I doubted your feelings.
It was just seeing you on the balcony with that man.
Alan, what is it about out here?
We're out on a ledge, 14 floors to a spectacular death.
It probably gives us a sense of our mortality, which in turn... there's nothing so life-affirming, I suppose, as a little death tucked in the back of our mind.
When I die, I want my remains sprinkled off of here.
- You?
- The balcony?
Could there be any place more fitting?
I suppose not.
But since I don't want to be cremated, somebody should at least yell, "look out below."
Ah, the simple pleasures.
A clear night, scotch, a friend...
Even if he is high-maintenance.
To simple pleasures.
Previously on Boston Legal.
Jerry said you were worried you might have done this.
I experienced some kind of blackout.
- We need to change our plea.
- No.
No.
- No, no, no, no!
- She's insane.
- What do you think Mrs. Wilkes loved most about you?
- I made her laugh.
- You made her laugh?
- I'm funny.
Were you obsessed with Marcia Hooper?
- I adored her.
- Why'd she get a restraining order against you?
What do I have to do, kill somebody?
Oops.
I didn't see you there.
- What are you doing, Lincoln?
- Tonight's date is with me after all...
Shirley Schmidt.
The latest report is that Ms. Jane is conscious.
She will survive.
Police are not commenting on whether... she was able to provide any information on her assailant.
- Denny.
- Can you believe it?
- Somebody actually tried to take her out.
- Have you seen Shirley?
- Naked?
- Lately.
She hasn't come in.
She's not answering her calls.
She's, uh, just disappeared.
Would you like to scream?
It's okay.
The room is completely soundproof.
It's my little safe room.
Listen.
If I agreed not to press charges-
Do you think I'm stupid?
Certainly twisted.
The police would press charges regardless of your wishes.
And besides, this is the room where the only relevant wishes are mine.
From the first moment I saw you, do you know what I wanted to do?
Pave my driveway?
I wanted to suck on your right earlobe.
I'm sure people tell you you have soft, supple lobes.
It gets old.
Is mocking me really an exercise of your most sound judgment, Shirley?
After all, I do have in my possession a loaded firearm.
- Let alone a ukulele.
- I might do you harm, Shirley Schmidt.
- Do you not think I will?
- Lincoln... suck my lobe.
I'm just saying, as circumstantial cases go, it's a strong one.
Erica, there's no evidence... of anybody else being there but you.
What about her husband?
He was there.
The cameras clearly show him.
The video also shows him... leaving the apartment building four minutes after entering.
Erica... it's not too late to amend our plea.
You think I'm insane, don't you?
Well, there's the two-hour blackout.
- Caused by trauma.
- You hear voices.
- No, no, no!
- You snap.
Hey!
Case in point.
I see what you're doing.
You're deliberately antagonizing me to see how I'll respond on cross.
Actually, that wasn't it.
A little help, Jerry.
Erica, we really need to consider insanity.
The evidence, we feel, excludes suicide.
The only one there was you.
We need to at least consider a diminished capacity plea... if for no other reason than to give us some plea bargaining leverage.
Let's hug for luck.
I know you two will take care of me.
Any thoughts?
None.
Ready?
I'm ready.
I actually feel... a calm.
Course, I'm medicated.
But-
Look at me.
This is a murder trial, Jerry- a particularly difficult one at that.
- If at any time you feel-
- Why?
Sorry?
Why is it a particularly difficult one?
Well, surely you've considered our client may be guilty?
I don't believe that.
She's innocent, Alan.
I'm gonna win this trial.
Everything all right, Denny?
I'm depressed.
Okay.
Why?
My murder case went away.
You've still got yours.
Just doesn't seem fair.
- Nutty Lincoln didn't whack the judge?
- I need a case, Alan.
You'll get a case.
This country has the most homicides... of any Western industrialized nation.
- Even so.
- 16,000 a year, Denny.
That's about five times the amount of American soldiers killed in Iraq.
Sooner or later, one of these slaughters is gonna end up in your lap.
Chin up.
What do you mean that she's missing?
Nobody's seen her since the night before last.
Did she cancel the dinner?
- No.
She just didn't show up.
- Have we thought about calling her family?
I think it's time we start doing that.
- Let's try not to alarm them.
- Are we really sure she's missing?
Sometimes old peoplejust slip off to have some work done.
It may be premature, but I'm gonna call the police.
- We feel this was a staged suicide.
- Why?
There were rope burns on the victim's wrists, indicating she had been tied up.
There was an aborted 911 call from the apartment.
People don't generally call 911 before they hang themselves.
- Who made this call?
- Nobody spoke.
There was just a hang-up.
We know the call came from the victim's apartment.
Detective, what leads you to believe the defendant committed this crime?
She claims she walked in to discover the dead body.
Well, if so, then why'd she wait two hours before calling anybody?
- What else?
- Fingerprints were found all over the place.
Fibers of the rope used to tie the victim up were found on the defendant's clothing.
- Would she have a motive?
- She and the victim were lovers.
She had recently been dumped for another woman.
We accounted for every person entering that apartment building.
She's the only one who could have conceivably committed this murder.
Thank you, sir.
Jerry.
This would be your time.
The surveillance cameras indicate the husband... went to the victim's apartment that morning, did they not?
There's no way he could've gone in, rigged a noose and hung her that quickly.
- Your testimony is it's impossible?
- Extremely unlikely.
You mentioned there were no other fingerprints at the scene... to suggest the husband or anybody else being present.
In your experience, have you ever known killers to wear gloves?
- Yes, but-
- Thank you.
The building has a rear entrance which is not monitored by cameras.
- Am I correct?
- Yes.
A service entrance.
Thank you.
As far as the people who reside in the apartment building... you have no way of monitoring or accounting for their activity in the complex, do you?
- No, but we interviewed almost-
- Thank you.
- You mentioned motive.
Did you consider a financial motive?
- We did.
Mrs. Wilkes left an estate valued at roughly $600,000.
Who gets that money upon her death, if you know?
I'm informed it's her girlfriend, Renee Winger.
Ah, yes.
The new girlfriend.
That-
That-
That-
That woman sitting right there.
She inherits.
Can we be positive she did not go into the building through the service entrance?
If she had gone in the apartment, your client would've been there.
Unless Ms. Winger went in before my client returned from her hike.
Then why would your client wait two hours to call you if-
'Cause she suffered a traumatic blackout which led her into a catatonic stupor-
- Objection.
- Sustained.
You connected fibers from the rope used to tie the victim's hands to my client's clothes.
Any fibers from the rope used to hang the victim traceable to my client?
- No.
- Thank you.
Going back to motive, in addition to the will...
- is there a million-dollar life insurance policy in play here?
- Yes, there is.
- Who's the beneficiary there?
- The husband.
So we have two people with financial motive, neither being my client.
It takes more than a stiff... whack on the head to keep me down, folks.
Trust me.
I get hit harder during sex.
I'm only sorry this creepo... didn't have at me with a shovel during sweeps.
I knew I should've plunked her a second time.
I just knew it.
Are you telling me you're the one who assaulted her?
I say that in confidence of course.
Lincoln, why are you so determined to have people believe you're dangerous?
You're not dangerous, are you?
You don't think I can be violent.
What in God's name?
This room is my little Waco.
If somebody should try to break in here to rescue you while this lock is set... it triggers the spring bow to go off.
I bet now you're convinced I'm sinister.
Lincoln... what are you doing?
- Ah.
Hmm.
- My apologies.
- Renee.
Looking well.
- I'm glad.
It's a goal.
Coping okay with your... tragic loss?
I see you've put me on your witness list.
It has me flummoxed.
I just thought by that point in the trial... the jury could use a good laugh.
And you're funny!
I certainly won't have anything to say that could help her.
- You check local hospitals?
- All of them.
- And we've called family.
- And you're thinking she was abducted?
I don't know what to think.
I want the police to investigate.
It's too soon to officially declare her a missing person.
It is not like this woman to just fall off the earth, Russell.
Something has happened.
Can I just throw one name out there?
Lincoln Meyer.
- Who is that?
- You investigated him in the murder ofJudge Potts.
We considered him a possible killer of Marcia Hooper.
He has a grudge against this law firm.
And he's always talking about his "special relationship" with Shirley.
Remember what the shrink said when we were exploring Lincoln as Marcia Hooper's killer?
When somebody becomes addicted to being the object of entertainment... which clearly Lincoln is... they can develop pathological desires, and eventually, they act on them.
You need to eat.
I told you.
I'm not hungry.
- Here comes the airplane.
- Yeah, right.
Instead of the plane...
- why don't you reach into my purse and get me my cell phone?
- Zooming in... getting closer, closer, getting ready to land.
One little bite for daddy.
I'm not sure we can be friends after that.
When was the last time you spoke to your wife, sir?
The day before her death.
Would you describe her as suicidal?
Absolutely not.
Paula would never have taken her own life.
She's a devout Catholic.
Suicide went firmly against her religious convictions.
Wouldn't homosexuality go against her Catholic beliefs?
Well, yes.
Your wife was being treated for depression, was she not?
- That is true, but I-
- Thank you.
Did you know, Mr. Wilkes... that Paula had recently superseded her will to leave everything to that-
Alan.
- That woman?
- I learned this, yes.
Lucky there was a life insurance policy naming you as sole benefiiciary.
If you are suggesting that I could harm my wife-
Your business recently filed for Chapter 11 bankruptcy.
Your wife's death relieves you of a dire financial situation, does it not?
Please answer the question, sir.
Whatever evil I may be capable of, Mr. Espenson...
I could never harm another human being- especially one I spent the better part of 11 years loving.
Your response implied that you are indeed capable of evil.
Could you list six examples, please?
You have been truly, truly great, Jerry.
- Really?
- You pushed just the right amount.
You made your point without alienating the jury.
Brilliant.
My feeling is we need to have Erica testify.
It's risky... but I'm not sure we have any other choice.
Have you considered this aborted 911 call?
How do we account for that?
Erica, upon discovering the body, began to call 911... and that's when she went into the blackout.
That could work.
- What about Renee?
Do we call her?
- I think so.
To the extent we want the jury to see her as a potential killer... we should expose them to her odd demeanor.
Okay.
First we'll call Erica.
Save Renee for last.
This-
Jerry.
What's wrong?
- Nothing.
- Jerry.
When I was in law school... my dream wasn't so much the big trial as- well...
I guess this.
Having a drink at the end of the day with cocounsel.
Battle-weary... rehashing the day... discussing strategy- the whole socialization of lawyering that... well, till now, I've never experienced.
It's a rich feeling... whatever it is.
It's called friendship.
To friendship, my colleague.
Right on my balcony?
Denny.
- It's not what you think.
- I saw you.
I heard you.
We were just talking.
Oh, dear.
Exchanging intimate thoughts?
On my own balcony.
I never saw it coming.
Things have been so good between us lately.
Well, Denny, it doesn't really sound like he was necessarily being unfaithful.
Of all the time.
I'm feeling vulnerable as it is over my law practice.
You mean not getting the big cases?
Yeah.
I would really encourage you, Denny... to fill this void with something... deeper, more meaningful.
It's time to come home to Bella.
I don't know, Bella.
I'll let you crawl into my warm spot.
Come home to Bella.
- If he does have her, her life could be in danger.
- I realize that... but I can't get a warrantjust with what you're telling me.
- You could at least pay him a visit.
- We could.
- But it might be better if you guys did.
- Us?
Well, ifhe loves attention as much as you're saying, then he might invite you in.
Maybe you could hear or see something...
I could take to a magistrate and get a search warrant.
- Jeffrey?
- He's not gonna let me in.
I'm Mr. Dirty Mouth.
- Well, he still likes me.
- I'll go.
- Now we're safe.
- What'd you say?
All right.
Detective, we found something.
- It's a little sordid.
- What?
You gotta be kidding.
Claire.
Braddy boy.
- What a surprise.
- Hello, Lincoln.
Listen.
Evidently the police are still asking questions about you on theJudge Potts murder.
They want another statement.
So we thought we'd best have a little conversation.
- Uh, can we come in?
- Why didn't you call... and have me come into the office?
Well, we thought we'd just head right over.
- I don't believe you.
- Can we come in, Lincoln?
No.
I walked through the door.
I saw her hanging.
She was dead?
Her hands were tied behind her back.
I got on a chair and cut the rope off.
I couldn't reach the noose part.
That's the last thing I remember, actually- trying to reach up and cut the rope around her neck.
Then what happened?
The next thing, it was... two hours later.
That's when I called for help.
You have no memory of those two hours?
I've been treated for a psychiatric disorder.
I've had some blackouts on occasion.
When you say you called for help, you mean you called your lawyer.
- Yes.
- Why didn't you call the police?
I suppose I was afraid... especially since I had no memory of the previous two hours.
What were you afraid of?
That maybe... you had killed Paula Wilkes?
She left you for that woman- Renee Winger.
- Yes.
- Did you go to confront Renee Winger... two nights before Ms. Wilkes's death?
I
- I beg your pardon?
Ms. Winger says you confronted her in a hotel lounge... and started screaming at her.
Many people witnessed this.
You told her... she'd regret it if she continued to see Paula Wilkes.
I have no memory of that.
You have no memory of that?
No.
I swear.
I swear.
I hope they don't go running to the police.
I would hate to have the police barge in here while my spring bow is cocked.
I mean, somebody could get hurt.
Lincoln...
I have one question for you.
Why?
You've lived your whole life within the bounds of the law, Lincoln.
Now you display a desperation that-
What's happened in your life, Lincoln?
- Well, this whole global warming thing.
- Was it Marcia Hooper?
You were in love with her, weren't you?
I think it's hard for you to live without her.
I don't need Marcia Hooper.
I have you, Shirley.
She really did like me.
Her husband made her get that restraining order.
She was kind to me.
She liked me.
We-
We all live our lives out on a ledge, Lincoln.
It takes surprisingly little to push us over.
This was a devastating tragedy for you-losing her.
Add to that people denying your relationship.
I don't want to talk about it anymore.
Lincoln, how does this end?
I don't know.
I never meant to harm you when I took you, Shirley.
Of course I didn't.
But I suppose I've painted myself into a bit of a corner.
If this is a game, Lincoln... you win.
I'm afraid.
Maybe she doesn't remember doing it.
But what other possible explanation could there be?
Maybe Renee somehow got in the building without being detected.
Maybe the husband did it inside of four minutes.
Maybe somebody else who lived in the building.
Alan, I'm like a human polygraph.
I can sense the truth.
Erica's telling the truth when she says it's not in her to commit murder.
Renee is not a truthful person.
And the husband
- He is a truthful person, but there's something-
Well, I don't think he's being entirely truthful here.
You're a human polygraph?
I never knew this.
It's one of the reasons why I so implicitly and immediately trusted you.
I was drawn to your honesty.
Jerry, I think one of the reasons I'm drawn to you-
Oh, dear.
- Don't talk to me.
- It's not like I went fishing with him.
And don't make fun of me.
I don't know whether you know this.
Not many men... take the time... every day, to... have a cigar, glass of scotch... to talk to their best friend.
That's not something most men have.
No, it isn't.
What I give to you, what-what I share...
I do with no one else.
I like to think what you give to me, you do with nobody else.
Now that- that may sound silly to you.
Here's what I think is silly.
The idea that jealousy or fidelity... is reserved for romance.
I always suspected that there was a connection between you and that man.
That you got something you didn't get from me.
I probably do.
But gosh... what I get from you, Denny-
People walk around today calling everyone their best friend.
The term doesn't have any real meaning anymore.
Mere acquaintances are lavished with hugs and kisses... upon a second or, at most, third meeting.
Birthday cards get passed around offices... so everybody can... scribble a snippet of sentimentality for a colleague they barely met.
And everyone just loves everyone.
As a result, when you tell somebody you love them today... it isn't much heard.
I love you, Denny.
You are my best friend.
I can't imagine... going through life without you... as my best friend.
I'm not gonna kiss you, however.
I don't want you on my balcony- on- on any balcony... alone with that man!
Okay.
- Ah.
- Déjà vu.
That's French.
- All set for your testimony, Renee?
- I'm nervous.
I'm not as funny when I'm nervous.
Let's cut to it, Ms. Winger.
You and the decedent, Paula Wilkes, were involved romantically.
Yes.
We'd met about a month prior to her death.
We began dating, and it quickly became exclusive.
Uh, by-When you say "exclusive"... that's understating it a bit, isn't it?
I don't know.
It certainly escalated quickly.
Whether it would have sustained is hard to say.
She died so early in the relationship.
Well, she must have thought it would sustain.
After all, she redid her will... rather suddenly, in her own handwriting... leaving everything to you.
Um, I'm a little embarrassed about that.
We were in Las Vegas.
We were, I guess... in the throes of new love, where people can be prone to doing crazy things.
And a month later, she shockingly turns up dead- hanged.
Mr. Shore, I'm very happy to answer your questions, but...
I would appreciate it if you'd be a little less flippant about Paula's death.
Ms. Winger, I'm s
- Uh, it-
I can't help but notice your demeanor... seems remarkably... different today than in all my prior encounters with you.
Well, I
- I guess I'm-
I'm a little nervous to be in court.
- I don't think she came off a killer.
- I'm going to prison.
- Blessed are the merciful, for-
- Erica, she didn't really hurt our case here.
She said nothing to incriminate you.
We just lost her as a red herring.
Do we even have anything else to offer?
Well, just one of my overwritten closing arguments... but they've been known to work in the past.
- Ah.
- Was that helpful?
That was quite a performance, Renee.
Maybe that was the real me... and all this time I've been performing with you.
- Any thoughts?
- None.
- He's got her.
I can feel it.
She's in that house.
- Yeah.
He practically baited us.
I say wejust charge in, police or no police.
I can do it.
The last time you did that, you chopped off a priest's fingers.
- We are not trained to storm-
- I was a marine!
I'm trained.
I'm practically a Navy SEAL.
And I saw that.
Did the detective say... what it would take to satisfy reasonable suspicion?
Something more than a hunch, which is, let's face it, all we have.
What's going on?
Party?
This is not a time for your nonsense, okay, sport?
Typically you're a fan of my nonsense, Brad.
- What's the matter?
- We think that Lincoln has kidnapped Shirley.
- At least we think it's possible.
- What?
- He may have her in his house.
- Why don't the police just go get her?
Because we don't have anything to go on, and the police can't get a warrant.
Well, Lincoln told me in a phone call he did have Shirley.
I'll say as much in an affidavit.
You'll take it to the police and get your warrant.
I'll go have that phone call now.
You'll have my sworn statement in a minute.
- He just told this Alan Shore he had Ms. Schmidt?
- Apparently.
Let's assume the mistake is going to be made here, Russell.
Which side do you want to err on?
Okay.
Let's go see the magistrate.
Jerry, what's wrong?
I was poring through... the life insurance policy in my typical meticulous fashion.
Look what I found in the fine print.
I highlighted it.
- Okay, Mr. Beedle.
We'll hear your summation.
- Actually, Your Honor... the defense would like to call one last witness.
- You said you rested.
- We don't.
- You said you rested.
- We don't.
The defense would like to re-call Sean Wilkes.
Mr. Wilkes, you've met my colleague, Jerry Espenson, have you not?
I have.
Jerry, it turns out, is... a human polygraph.
He has a nose for who's telling the truth... and for who's a truthful person in general.
And the thing is, you struck him... as one of those generally truthful people... who's not telling the truth here.
Objection.
Does counsel have a question?
My question is have you been honest with this court...
Mr. Wilkes?
Yes.
Paula Wilkes's life insurance policy... for which you are the sole beneficiary, has a settlement value of one million dollars.
Are there any exclusions under your late wife's policy, sir?
I
- I think there are certain exclusions.
Yes.
One being suicide.
The policy doesn't cover suicide.
It says right here... uh, highlighted in yellow.
I am sure it must have been... an unimaginable shock... when you entered Paula's apartment... to see her hanging there.
And as you picked up the phone and dialed 911... another shocking reality hit you- one with crippling monetary consequences.
It was you who aborted the 911 call.
And then you did something foolish.
You tried to make her tragic death look like a murder.
I'm sure charges of perjury are swirling around in your head about now.
Fortunately, by law, if a witness retakes the stand... and corrects his false statements, he can avoid those charges.
So, here's your chance, Mr. Wilkes, to set the record straight.
Did you go into that apartment... discover that your ex-wife had committed suicide... and proceed to tie her hands, move a chair... do whatever was necessary... to make it look like somebody had killed her?
I was in shock.
I wasn't thinking clearly.
I'm so sorry.
Your Honor, the defense rests.
Mr. Wilkes, you may step down.
The bailiff will remand the witness into custody.
At this time, I am dismissing the charges against Ms. Erica Dolenz.
Defendant is free to go.
Oh, my God!
Jerry, you realize what you've done?
You secured the freedom of an innocent person.
Let's hope Denny doesn't walk in.
Hey.
May I join?
- I'm sorry.
No.
- Why didn't you tell him you were practically a Navy SEAL?
Aren't you going to answer it?
Go!
Go, go, go!
Your little friend called the police.
That was a mistake!
- Lincoln-
- They've escalated the situation... before I had a chance to work out my exit plan.
Lincoln, I can hear them.
They're going through the entire house.
From the outside, this room looks like a pantry.
It's a locked room in a basement.
You think they'll skip it?
- Lincoln.
- Shut up.
There's no way out of here.
They're right outside the door, Lincoln.
Wait a minute.
This room isn't soundproof.
Help!
Help!
Hey!
One more scream like that, and I will shoot you dead!
Suspect's down!
Weapon secured!
There she is.
Before you all start hugging me... did any of you have the presence of mind to bring vodka?
Little antiseptic, a Band-Aid.
It's just a flesh wound.
So she's all right?
Completely.
She wouldn't even go to the hospital.
Oh, thank goodness.
Thank you for telling me, Denise.
Sure.
Denise.
It's news worth celebrating, don't you think?
Don't you ever give up?
I do, actually.
It's just you don't really want me to.
I must say, Denise.
When I look at you, I see one of those little Catholic schoolgirls... running around in her plaid skirt... always to class on time, the first to raise her hand... the neatest of... penmanship.
And then when I look closer, I see...
Shirley.
Well, I'm glad to see things haven't changed here.
- Shirley, are you okay?
- I am.
Thank you.
Lincoln was actually a very charming host when he wasn't threatening to kill me.
Alan, it's been brought to my attention... that you falsified an affidavit and committed a fraud on a magistrate.
- Did I?
- As senior partner...
I cannot tolerate this kind of behavior... and if it happens again, you will be fired.
No doubt.
Thank you.
You very likely saved my life.
I must say, Shirley.
When I look at you...
I see one of those little Catholic schoolgirls-
Oh, get a life!
I'll sleep with her one day.
No, you won't.
You know, the brain supposedly confuses fear with passion.
She should be ripe with passion, for God's sake.
Denny, whatever happened to that doll?
Police took her in for questioning.
- Shirley Schmidt-ho?
- Yeah.
She'll be back.
Alan.
I'm sorry I doubted your feelings.
It was just seeing you on the balcony with that man.
I don't know.
What is it about out here?
We're out on a ledge, 14 floors to a spectacular death.
Probably gives us a sense of our mortality... which, in turn-
There's nothing so life-affirming, I suppose... as a little death tucked in the back of our mind.
When I die, I want my remains... sprinkled down off of here.
You?
- The balcony?
- Could there be any place more fitting?
I suppose not.
But since I don't want to be cremated... somebody should at least yell "Look out below. "
Ah.
The simple pleasures.
A clear night, a scotch, a friend.
Even if he is high-maintenance.
Ah.
To simple pleasures.
You stinker!
Finding a good man is about as easy as finding a cab in a snowstorm... on new year's eve.
that's what my mother used to say.
You know what I say?
(All) stinkin' thinkin'!
(Chuckles) yes!
Hello, I'm marin frist.
I am a relationship coach.
I've got news for you.
There are plenty of guys out there.
They are not the problem, ladies.
We are.
We are.
We are.
A week ago, I thought I knew it all.
How many of you think that finding "the one"...
"the one" is gonna make you happy?
When did we decide that someone else was in charge of our happiness we don't even trust somebody else to order our soy lattes!
Women all over the country thought I knew the secret to finding their man.
I think I was just a good talker.
You wouldn't drive with a blindfold on.
so stop dating with one.
You've got to watch out for the signs.
Is he married?
A cheater?
Watches gay porn just for variety?
they're not changing, ladies.
Detours.
The 24-year-old kid who sells sandwiches in your office?
The very hot ex-boyfriend who's never going to commit?
Keep movin'!
Lose him!
You are never going to be able to... if he'S... you know what?
I was happy.
I was getting married.
I'd like you to take my dress as a gift.
We'll send it to you.
Thankso someone else's self-help book and the patch, I had quit smoking.
I was booked at speaking engagements from boston to bould.
(strange city of love in the morning) that was last week.
(Marin) oh, thank you.
Hi!
Annie!
You have got to stop crashing my book parties.
--I just wanted to be the first to have it in paperback...
--hey, I love your book!
So who do I make it out to?
Me.
Don't you want to stalk someone a little groovier, like bruce springsteen or something?
You... make me feel better.
"To annie, stop stalking.
Start dating.
Have hope."
Ah, finally.
welcome.
We're here to celebrate the paperback release of relationship coach marin frist's second book,
"I'm dating and so can you!"
and tonight, as her editor,
I am thrilled to announce that marin's third book has been optioned, called--fittingly--
"I'm getting married and so can you!"
Enjoy the free booze.
Congratulations.
Thank you.
It didn't hurt that a "new yorker" columnist gave me a great review.
You can thank me by letting me bum a cigarette.
Oh, I quit.
Graham hates it.
Now I channel my addiction into spinning class.
The things we do for love.
Aw, I wish I had someone to give up vices for.
This being single thing is getting very tired.
Most of the time I can forget it, but then it's the end of a book party, and I have to go and hail a cab... alone.
Graham, go hail kiki a cab.
--Gladly.
--Oh!
You're a lifesaver.
Oh, yes.
Thank you.
You have a 7:00 A.M. To alaska tomorrow, so ixnay on the third drink-ay.
Only you, jane, would book me a speaking engagement in alaska.
Oh, I had nothing to do with that one.
But the lecture the next day in seattle-- all me.
3:00-- "daily news" reporter eyeing you.
Hey, you know the rules-- no coaching the editor.
Shut-down gals deserve love, too.
I think we just found the title of your fourth book.
stavros kolidarkos.
Who?
--My old neighbor--for kiki.
--Mmm.
That could work.
Most people count sheep.
You count... singles.
Calms me down.
Jim friedman.
go to sleep.
oh.
(Woman) if we can have your attention, we'd like to point out our safety features... (continues delivering safety instructions)
oh, I'm an idiot!
--Oh, I took my fiance's computer by mistake.
--Oh.
I overslept.
Never mind.
Well, that's him--graham--and me.
Me again.
Kiki witting?
Ooh!
She'll have a whiskey.
Straight up.
(Man) keep your seatbelts fastened.
We're heading into some pretty heavy turbulence.
(man) hey!
Hey ho!
Oh, no, I don't mean you're a ho.
I meant like, uh, "hey ho!"
oh.
Welcome.
Who are you?
Oh, man, I'm so psyched, I forgot to introduce myself.
Patrick bachelor.
Yeah, and don't hold the name ainst me.
I got both your books.
Oh.
Getting my learner's permit to love, you know?
Marin frist!
Huge!
Patrick, have you got a cigarette?
No, I do not.
Chapter three, first book-- "who is gonna love your body if you don't?"
--Ah.
--Yeah.
Thought you had me, huh?
Got a lot of luggage.
--That's a great little bag.
--Thanks.
Yeah, I'm kind of a patrick-of-all-trades--radio personality, innkeeper, lover of women.
marin frist... this is huge.
This is huger than when tom selleck was up here shooting the cruise line commercial, and that was pretty darn huge.
Marin frist!
I've got marin frist here!
Whoo-hoo!
Whoo!
(Three dog night's "mama told me mama told me not to come that ain't the way to have fun, no
"chivalry isn't dead"-- chapter five.
oh, looks like somebody forgot their mukluks.
Here we are, the presidential suite.
Yeah.
Check it out--lincoln.
Right. (Chuckles) hey, would you maybe be a guest on my radio show tomorrow A.M.?
There's a radio station up here?
Well, 10 megahertz.
But when the skies are super clear, you can hear us in poland.
Not that they can, like, understand us or anything.
Yeah.
Okay, sure.
Oh, sweet!
You need anything, I'll be downstairs.
Catch some z'S.
You got a big lecture in three hours.
Bye.
are you having an affair with kiki witting?
Just say it.
I saw the pictures.
Nice slide show.
Very artistic.
Yes.
Yes... artistic, or yes, affair?
Don't you ever just feel like you need to breathe?
I thought we would do that after we were married.
Which--going out on a limb here-- isn't going to be happening.
Is she "it" for you?
I don't know.
I just thought she was gonna be a speed bump.
You're using my words to break up with me?
You ready to go?
She's there.
--In my apartment, there.
--Marin.
Marin.
yeah, we don't have minibars, but we have a fullized one down on front street.
It's the chieftain.
Ah.
(Steve earle's "poor boy" playing)
(I was born on the other side of town... )
(man) hey!
(I never thought about it much till the first time I saw you) uh-oh, what's a poor boy gonna do?
(It's bad enough to love you from afar...) (me down here and you up where you are )
(if you hadn't given me that look that's all it took, it's true )
(uh-oh, what's a poor boy gonna do?
)
Vodka negroni, please.
Refresh my memory.
You have bitters?
Nope.
--Triple sec?
--Out.
I'll take the vodka.
Coming up.
(Uh-oh, what's a poor boy gonna do?
)
Make it a double.
I know you.
yeah, I'm marin frist.
Yeah!
Yeah, yeah, you used to sell pelts at a stand out on route 11.
No.
Oh, yeah, I-I don't know you.
--Leave her alone, jerome.
--What?
!
--He's not bothering me.
--He will if you let him.
Hmm.
I thought you might be hungry.
--Mm-hmm, I am.
Thanks.
--Oh, that's nice.
It's nice that people still like each other.
Sorry.
Oh, that's original.
what?
The old pickup line.
Use a little sprucing up, if you know what I mean.
(Chuckles) yeah, I'm not trying to pick you up.
Oh, yeah, you are.
Trust me, I know men.
I'm a relationship coach.
What--coach?
What, did we get a ball team?
No, I do not have a ball team.
Well, you got balls.
Oh!
Ha ha ha.
--You're one of those.
--One of whats?
A lookee loo.
You put yourself on cruise control, and you flirt with women, but you never stop and get out of the car.
My name's jack, and I'm-- I'm not trying to pick you up.
I'm just trying to get a napkin.
You need one, coach?
No, I do not need one, and if I did need one, I could get one for myself.
I don't need a man to get a napkin for me.
in fact, I don't need a man, period.
Yeah.
It's nice meeting you, too.
One more for the road.
Hurry up!
We're late.
Yep, we got a full house.
Come on.
Where are the women?
We were hoping that you'd kind of help us with that part.
Everybody!
Marin frist!
Break an antler.
okay. (Laughs) okay. (Chuckles) okay.
Okay.
Okay!
How many of you guys think that... finding "the one"
is gonna make you happy?
When did we decide that someone else was in charge of our happiness?
We don't even let somebody else order our soy lattes!
Our what?
S oy... lattes.
It's a coffee drink, you know.
--Oh!
--Yeah.
--Yeah.
The point is... don't cheat.
Oh, and you gotta look out for the signs, which I didn't, even though it's my job.
uh... yes, you.
I don't have a question.
Well, that's good, 'cause I do.
Let's say... you're a guy.
Okay.
Okay, and you get engaged to this girl after dating her for a year.
During which time, she's laughed at all your jokes-- some of which not so funny.
She's gone to your... company picnics--snore-- your family dinners--scary.
She's pretty successful.
She's kind.
She's not half bad in the sack.
So why do you not want to marry her?
She's no selleck.
(the weepies' "world spins madly on" playing) here, happy!
here, happy!
Here, happy!
Come here, happy!
(I lay motionless in bed... ) good boy!
(I thought of you )
(and where you've gone )
great.
I missed my flight.
ah, yes!
yes!
This is jane.
Leave a message.
um... jane... you gotta call me.
I... graham... this is really bad.
call--
aah!
--Hi.
--Hi.
You may want to keep your side of the bathroom locked.
--My side?
--Yeah.
(Man) sara.
Only have a half an hour before my shift.
--I need a spinning class.
--Ah, spinning what?
Spinning bike.
A spinning bike class.
You sit on a stationary bike, and you bike to music.
--But you don't go anywhere.
--Right.
Yeah, we don't have 'em.
Why would you wanna go for a bike ride and not go anywhere?
What's the point?
I mean, that's like riding a legless horse,
--or like a pogo stick without a stick or-- --yeah, I get it.
Wowza.
I'm sorry, and...
I'm sorry...about last night.
I missed my flight, and I really need to get out of here.
Yeah, and you missed my radio show this morning.
Okay.
I'm sorry about that, too.
I had to interview my mom, again.
You really wouldn't want me on the air right now, trust me.
I think I got something for you.
Now the front brakes don't work, and you're gonna need this-- bear spray.
Actually, you spray it on the bear, but that'll work.
(Kt tunstall's "black horse and the cherry tree" playing) wow!
Whoa!
Ah!
Sorry.
Sorry.
(Whoo-hoo well, my heart knows me better than I know myself )
(so I'm gonna let it do all the talking)
(whoo-hoo whoo-hoo)
(I came across a place in the middle of nowhere with a big black horse and a cherry tree)
(whoo-hoo whoo-hoo)
(I fell in fear upon my back I said, "don't look back, just keep on walking" )
(whoo-hoo whoo-hoo... ) wow.
(Whoo-hoo whoo-hoo)
oh!
(No, no no, no, no, no,)
(I said no... ) sara!
So now you're out.
Patrick!
Hey!
(Groans) anybody?
Whoo-hoo
how you doing, coach?
Ahem.
I hear you got a 9-1-1.
So is it-- oh, what, you're a cop?
Uh, fish and game biologist.
The sheriff called me.
Is that what they're wearing in new york these days?
All my clothes are in there with the, uh... that's a pretty big, possibly rabid, raccoon.
You're gonna want to wait outside.
I'm not leaving that animal alone with my favorite purple faux croc flats.
Well, could be dangerous.
I'm fine.
They go for the neck.
Whatever.
Get all macho.
the deceased.
you can't leave food out, or whatever this bar thing is.
these are very tasty.
I only make one round-trip flight tomorrow-- to sitka.
Fine, I'll go to sitka.
Unh-unh, you don't want to go to sitka.
Wrong direction.
Anchorage will get you to hawaii.
What's, uh, what's in hawaii?
Oh, she wanted to go there for the honeymoon.
He chose turkey.
He got to choose because she made him take dancing lessons.
I told you all that last night?
Yeah, somewhere between the vodka shots and the schnapps.
what kind of a pansy man takes dance lessons?
buzz, I just want to get to hawaii and relax, and I'm desperate.
And apparently, you are the only pilot who can fly me tomorrow, so what's it gonna take?
How much you got?
On me?
You're paying for expertise.
Back in 1955, they only hired one black pilot to captain a commercial airliner.
That was you?
No, that was august martin.
So I had to come up here to start my own airline-- buzz airways-- and I'm not sure buzz is flying tomorrow.
I got 200 bucks.
Hmm.
Okay, I'll take you.
Noon sharp.
here, happy!
--here, happy!
--Good-bye, happy.
I'm going to hawaii.
That's right-- hawaii, whe it's warm, and where there are cigarettes.
What are you doing here?
That's my line.
You were supposed to be in seattle.
I missed my flight.
Well, that's why I'm here,
--to make sure you get on a flight tonight to chicago.
--Oh.
No flight to chicago tonight.
But you're welcome to come with me to anchorage and then to hawaii.
No flight to anchorage, either.
There isn't?
Nope.
There's a storm coming in.
Buzz airways is grounded.
Uh, you buying, little lady?
Kiki's best friend told my shrink.
Your shrink told you?
Yes.
She was upset.
She needed to talk about it.
Oh... is this a gay bar?
This is the only bar.
This town is filled with men.
They're all over like a bad rash.
They're even in the trees.
Ask me why we're going to chicago.
I booked you on "oprah."
This is the part where you jump for joy.
I can't do "oprah."
All you've done for a year is talk about going on "oprah."
I can't pretend that I know how to find a good man when I can't find one myself.
"Stinkin' thinkin'." Everyone has got to stop quoting me to me.
Vodka?
Yes.
And what'll it be?
Ah, ye I would like a "char-don-nay."
It's a white wine.
If you like white, I have a jolivet pouilly-fume 2001 that will knock your boots off.
Oh.
Look, you just have to get back on the horse.
You'll start writing a book again, and it'll be okay.
Oh, yeah?
And what's the name of the book gonna be--
"I'm not getting married in four weeks 'cause he cheated on me, and you can, too"?
Mmm, that's a little long.
Ah.
Apparently, I know nothing about men.
Well, maybe you just weren't listening.
Oh, men talk?
Oh, you have "dirty harry" syndrome.
What?
All I heard was "dirty."
Every woman thinks that she wants dirty harry-- the tough guy, you know, with a big gun, strong and silent.
But really, what's getting you ladies all hot and bothered is clint eastwood, the guy who played dirty harry.
A guy with a gun who'll watch "harry meets sally" with you and cook dinner.
Then you make too many dinners, and you're a pushover.
Cookin' dinner, watching girlie movies... what's wrong with you people?
women want it all.
We can't give it to you.
So you guys are kind of screwed?
--You got it.
--huh.
"Breakups--
"how to hammer the dents out and get back on the road.
"You can either lie in bed and mope or get back out there.
"I say, 'take a shower and go out and smile,'
"'cause the next guy's not gonna notice you unless you have your brights on."
I'm totally full of crap.
Well, it's official-- no one in alaska reads.
How you doing, coach?
Sir, perhaps you'd like to add marin frist's best seller to that stack?
--Jane, it's fine.
--She is a world-renowned dating expert.
Yeah, I know.
I was at her, uh, lecture.
Oh.
You know how amazing she is.
Well, I know she can't hold her liquor.
Here.
You know what?
I'll take one.
Don't buy my book 'cause you pity me.
Okay.
I am officially pathetic.
No, you're not.
You're going on "oprah."
Hmm, if I get reception on this thing and get them to push a day.
It's four minutes after the cardinal.
They should be in by now.
Hold down the fort.
marin?
Annie?
!
What are you doing here?
I heard about what happened with your fiance.
Of course you did.
I had to take a bus from vancouver.
There's a bus to vancouver?
!
Once a week.
You just missed it.
"have hope."
What?
That--that's what you wrote in my book, "have hope."
You... you have given me hope, and now I want to give you some.
Annie, that is really sweet and really extreme of you.
You deserve a great guy.
He'll show up, right?
I-I mean, I'm still getting my learner's permit to love, and I'm ignoring a lot of the road signs, and there's been a few detours along, but-- annie, come on.
Uh, yes.
Come on.
--I'm coming.
--Bye!
(man) hey!
Sorry.
Hold on.
Oh, you've gotta be kidding me.
Sorry.
Um... oh!
Hello?
Hello?
Yeah, can you-- can you hear me?
Uh, hold on.
Is that--is that better?
Okay, so I-I think I can get her out tomorrow, so if you can rebook on thursday that would be great.
I'll just have my assistant fax you.
no, no, no.
So do we have a deal?
lady!
Yeah, I am-- I am on the phone here!
Yeah, well, you gotta move, 'cause I gotta plow!
I am not giving up the one corner where I can communicate with the outside world.
Yeah--no, no, no.
No, no, no--fine, I just-- you're being very rude!
Hey, I'm just doing my job.
So am I, buster.
Name's dave.
What's yours?
Not moving.
Suit yourself.
patrick... annie.
Annie, patrick.
Hey ho.
Hi. (Chuckles) oh, hey, uh, something came for you today in ben's lemon shipment.
--Yeah, I put it in your room.
--Thanks.
No, doc...(whispers) thank you.
Hey, she's a crackpot, but I dig her.
I'd listen to her read a chinese menu.
(Chuckles) I wrote that.
Yeah, in her chat room.
"Alaska dude 123"?
Yeah.
"City fannnn."
Four n'S.
(Gasps) my dress!
Oh, no, mister.
Not this time.
(The violent femmes' "gone daddy gone" playing)
(beautiful girl, lovely dress high school smiles,)
(oh, yes beautiful girl, lovely dress... ) yeah, that's right.
Let's take it outside.
('Cause it's gone, daddy, gone, your love is gone)
(yeah, it's gone, daddy, gone, your love is gone)
(yeah, it's gone, daddy, gone, your love is gone away)
yeah, that's pretty much what it looks like.
The door was open.
What at looks like?
Marriage.
It's full of a lot more dirt and holes than the fairy tale dress they sell you.
Sara, can I tell you something I've never told anyone?
Pretty much got dirt on everyone in this town, so shoot.
All these years, I've sold myself as "the single girl"... total lie.
I've never tually been alone since I was 16.
I've always had a guy.
Well, I've never been able to be with someone.
So you're not married anymore?
Divorced.
I have a kid.
His dad went A.W.O.L. To the lower 48, so I try and make ends meet however I can.
Right.
Go ahead, judge me.
I'm not gonna judge you.
I judge me.
I really wanna leave the hospitality... business.
It's hard to find a guy who just likes me for me.
Yeah, dating was impossible for me once a guy found out I was a relationship coach, so I would lie and say that I was a computer technician.
how'd that work?
Well, pretty good, until he asked me to fix his hard drive.
(love stinks... ) you have any cigarettes?
Cigarettes come in the first of the month on the ferry.
By the end of the month, we're down to chaw.
I'm not that desperate yet.
The guys love it.
I can't stand guys.
You came to the wrong town.
The ratio's like 10 to 1 here.
So men run the place.
Are you kidding?
No, we're the ones with the power.
They're lonely.
We're the prize.
It's like shooting fish in aarrel.
Here I've been telling single women to go to sports bars.
I should've been telling them to go to alaska.
Yeah, well, the odds are good, but the goods are odd.
Ben seems nice...
--and very into you.
--He better be.
He married me.
Well, we're separated.
Ben wants to get back together, but I want to see what else is out there.
So up here, women get to be men.
Everyone gets to be who they want to be.
(Love stinks)
(man) where you headed?
Anywhere that can sell me a cigarette.
Get in.
What are you running away from?
Everything.
When you are lost, you must look to the skies for answers.
Our ancestors are there, in the stars, clouds... what if there are no answers?
If you don't believe, you'll end up like the frozen girl.
She kept walking, never looked up.
They found her body frozen to death on naknek mountain.
300 years old.
Alone, no teeth... fat.
She was still fat after 300 years?
That's how fat she was.
Here we go.
Thank you.
(Jack) hey!
What-- stop!
Stop!
Stop!
Trust me, I'm trying!
aah!
didn't you see the "thin ice" signs?
no.
And P.S.--Seeing signs, not my strong suit.
--What is this?
--Observation hut.
What are you observing?
I was looking for a nocturnal bear, but instead I found a relationship coach
.
Almost as dangerous.
Oh, m-man, I'm cold.
Yeah, we're getting hypothermic.
But it's too dark to walk across the ice safely.
There's only one way we're gonna make it to morning.
Light a fire?
your elbow's in my... thank you.
This getting naked for warmth thing better not be some sad attempt to get sex.
(Scoffs) I don't want to have sex with you.
--I know all about you lonely alaska guys.
--Oh, yeah.
Well, maybe you should stop thinking in stereotypes.
It's not you.
It's all men.
I just don't want to be around them right now.
Well, that's working out for you.
--Shut up --gladly.
Everything in the right place, coach?
(jack) wolves.
they're beautiful.
They're mating.
Actually, she's just, uh, rubbing her crap into his fur.
--But then after, you know, maybe they'll...
they'll get busy.
--Oh.
(The lemonheads' "the outdoor type" playing)
you're gonna have to drive, coach.
I screwed up my shifting wrist.
I can't.
You have to.
No, I... can't drive.
Up, up.
I'm supposed to be teaching people how to drive to happiness, and I don't even have a license.
I know, it's totally lame.
Up until now, a total secret.
Down.
Well, this is a good place to learn-- plenty of open space, just a few stoplights, no one around to see you when you hit a tree.
(Laughs) ye, third.
--Yeah, up.
--ah!
There you go.
It's okay.
So what's your secret?
What you see is what you get.
Can you drop me at the dock?
(Can't grow a beard or even fight I lied about being the outdoor type) what happened to you?
You know what?
Don't worry about it.
You can shower in chicago.
(Man) here, happy!
Happy!
Come on, happy!
Hey, sit, sit.
I'm not going.
What?
What do you mean, you're not going to chicago?
I'm not going, period.
Oh, marin, honey... you can't stay here.
They don't have a nail place or a--or a spinning class.
I need to breathe and start my book.
About marriage?
About men.
But you said you didn't know anything about them.
It's about time I learned.
What do you say we go, ladies?
I'm on the clock here.
Oh, marin.
Please be okay.
If you change editors, I'll hunt you down and kill you.
(Bob schneider's "the world exploded into love" playing) --buzz, can I get a hand here?
Thank you.
(A feeling, if you know what I mean )
(delectable dimension undetectable by sight )
(it'll fill up your heart in the dead of the night)
(some say that it's an astral plane )
(can't be described, can't be explained... ) what'd you put for question four?
"E."
Same here.
The truest thing I know about relationships is that sometimes we don't know anything at all.
(Separation exists on in your lo-filled heart...
but only in your mind the real story's all around you)
(even now, it surrounds you even now, I feel power... )
And sometimes the one you get may not be the right one at all.
But if you have hope, the universe has a funny way of showing you exactly what you need.
The challenge is to let yourself be alone until the right one shows up.
But you can't hide either.
Heartbreak sucks... but not having heartbreak sucks more.
The answers aren't in a lecture or a book.
But maybe if you get yourself happy, you'll find the right one.
I believe this because against all odds,
I am still an optimist.
(The world exploded into love all around me )
(every time I take a look around me... ) that's the thing about love...
(I have to smile)
(the world exploded into love all around me... ) if it were that easy, everyone would have it.
(The world exploded into love all around me... ) (man) so you're saying I should be more optimistic?
I'm saying you should ask her out.
Oh!
All right!
Thanks, man!
That was A.J. From ketchikan.
Thanks for the call, A.J.
Hold on, you have another caller on line 2 through... 20?
We haven't had this many callers since I raffled off my mom's salmon smoker.
Oh, okay.
Let's start with line two.
Finding a good man is about as easy as finding a cab in a snowstorm... on new year's eve.
that's what my mother used to say.
You know what I say?
(All) stinkin' thinkin'!
(Chuckles) yes!
Hello, I'm marin frist.
I am a relationship coach.
I've got news for you.
There are plenty of guys out there.
They are not the problem, ladies.
We are.
We are.
We are.
A week ago, I thought I knew it all.
How many of you think that finding "the one"...
"the one" is gonna make you happy?
When did we decide that someone else was in charge of our happiness we don't even trust somebody else to order our soy lattes!
Women all over the country thought I knew the secret to finding their man.
I think I was just a good talker.
You wouldn't drive with a blindfold on.
so stop dating with one.
You've got to watch out for the signs.
Is he married?
A cheater?
Watches gay porn just for variety?
they're not changing, ladies.
Detours.
The 24-year-old kid who sells sandwiches in your office?
The very hot ex-boyfriend who's never going to commit?
Keep movin'!
Lose him!
You are never going to be able to... if he'S... you know what?
I was happy.
I was getting married.
I'd like you to take my dress as a gift.
We'll send it to you.
Thankso someone else's self-help book and the patch, I had quit smoking.
I was booked at speaking engagements from boston to bould.
(strange city of love in the morning) that was last week.
(Marin) oh, thank you.
Hi!
Annie!
You have got to stop crashing my book parties.
--I just wanted to be the first to have it in paperback...
--hey, I love your book!
So who do I make it out to?
Me.
Don't you want to stalk someone a little groovier, like bruce springsteen or something?
You... make me feel better.
"To annie, stop stalking.
Start dating.
Have hope."
Ah, finally.
welcome.
We're here to celebrate the paperback release of relationship coach marin frist's second book,
"I'm dating and so can you!"
and tonight, as her editor,
I am thrilled to announce that marin's third book has been optioned, called--fittingly--
"I'm getting married and so can you!"
Enjoy the free booze.
Congratulations.
Thank you.
It didn't hurt that a "new yorker" columnist gave me a great review.
You can thank me by letting me bum a cigarette.
Oh, I quit.
Graham hates it.
Now I channel my addiction into spinning class.
The things we do for love.
Aw, I wish I had someone to give up vices for.
This being single thing is getting very tired.
Most of the time I can forget it, but then it's the end of a book party, and I have to go and hail a cab... alone.
Graham, go hail kiki a cab.
--Gladly.
--Oh!
You're a lifesaver.
Oh, yes.
Thank you.
You have a 7:00 A.M. To alaska tomorrow, so ixnay on the third drink-ay.
Only you, jane, would book me a speaking engagement in alaska.
Oh, I had nothing to do with that one.
But the lecture the next day in seattle-- all me.
3:00-- "daily news" reporter eyeing you.
Hey, you know the rules-- no coaching the editor.
Shut-down gals deserve love, too.
I think we just found the title of your fourth book.
stavros kolidarkos.
Who?
--My old neighbor--for kiki.
--Mmm.
That could work.
Most people count sheep.
You count... singles.
Calms me down.
Jim friedman.
go to sleep.
oh.
(Woman) if we can have your attention, we'd like to point out our safety features... (continues delivering safety instructions)
oh, I'm an idiot!
--Oh, I took my fiance's computer by mistake.
--Oh.
I overslept.
Never mind.
Well, that's him--graham--and me.
Me again.
Kiki witting?
Ooh!
She'll have a whiskey.
Straight up.
(Man) keep your seatbelts fastened.
We're heading into some pretty heavy turbulence.
(man) hey!
Hey ho!
Oh, no, I don't mean you're a ho.
I meant like, uh, "hey ho!"
oh.
Welcome.
Who are you?
Oh, man, I'm so psyched, I forgot to introduce myself.
Patrick bachelor.
Yeah, and don't hold the name ainst me.
I got both your books.
Oh.
Getting my learner's permit to love, you know?
Marin frist!
Huge!
Patrick, have you got a cigarette?
No, I do not.
Chapter three, first book-- "who is gonna love your body if you don't?"
--Ah.
--Yeah.
Thought you had me, huh?
Got a lot of luggage.
--That's a great little bag.
--Thanks.
Yeah, I'm kind of a patrick-of-all-trades--radio personality, innkeeper, lover of women.
marin frist... this is huge.
This is huger than when tom selleck was up here shooting the cruise line commercial, and that was pretty darn huge.
Marin frist!
I've got marin frist here!
Whoo-hoo!
Whoo!
(Three dog night's "mama told me mama told me not to come that ain't the way to have fun, no
"chivalry isn't dead"-- chapter five.
oh, looks like somebody forgot their mukluks.
Here we are, the presidential suite.
Yeah.
Check it out--lincoln.
Right. (Chuckles) hey, would you maybe be a guest on my radio show tomorrow A.M.?
There's a radio station up here?
Well, 10 megahertz.
But when the skies are super clear, you can hear us in poland.
Not that they can, like, understand us or anything.
Yeah.
Okay, sure.
Oh, sweet!
You need anything, I'll be downstairs.
Catch some z'S.
You got a big lecture in three hours.
Bye.
are you having an affair with kiki witting?
Just say it.
I saw the pictures.
Nice slide show.
Very artistic.
Yes.
Yes... artistic, or yes, affair?
Don't you ever just feel like you need to breathe?
I thought we would do that after we were married.
Which--going out on a limb here-- isn't going to be happening.
Is she "it" for you?
I don't know.
I just thought she was gonna be a speed bump.
You're using my words to break up with me?
You ready to go?
She's there.
--In my apartment, there.
--Marin.
Marin.
yeah, we don't have minibars, but we have a fullized one down on front street.
It's the chieftain.
Ah.
(Steve earle's "poor boy" playing)
(I was born on the other side of town... )
(man) hey!
(I never thought about it much till the first time I saw you) uh-oh, what's a poor boy gonna do?
(It's bad enough to love you from afar...) (me down here and you up where you are )
(if you hadn't given me that look that's all it took, it's true )
(uh-oh, what's a poor boy gonna do?
)
Vodka negroni, please.
Refresh my memory.
You have bitters?
Nope.
--Triple sec?
--Out.
I'll take the vodka.
Coming up.
(Uh-oh, what's a poor boy gonna do?
)
Make it a double.
I know you.
yeah, I'm marin frist.
Yeah!
Yeah, yeah, you used to sell pelts at a stand out on route 11.
No.
Oh, yeah, I-I don't know you.
--Leave her alone, jerome.
--What?
!
--He's not bothering me.
--He will if you let him.
Hmm.
I thought you might be hungry.
--Mm-hmm, I am.
Thanks.
--Oh, that's nice.
It's nice that people still like each other.
Sorry.
Oh, that's original.
what?
The old pickup line.
Use a little sprucing up, if you know what I mean.
(Chuckles) yeah, I'm not trying to pick you up.
Oh, yeah, you are.
Trust me, I know men.
I'm a relationship coach.
What--coach?
What, did we get a ball team?
No, I do not have a ball team.
Well, you got balls.
Oh!
Ha ha ha.
--You're one of those.
--One of whats?
A lookee loo.
You put yourself on cruise control, and you flirt with women, but you never stop and get out of the car.
My name's jack, and I'm-- I'm not trying to pick you up.
I'm just trying to get a napkin.
You need one, coach?
No, I do not need one, and if I did need one, I could get one for myself.
I don't need a man to get a napkin for me.
in fact, I don't need a man, period.
Yeah.
It's nice meeting you, too.
One more for the road.
Hurry up!
We're late.
Yep, we got a full house.
Come on.
Where are the women?
We were hoping that you'd kind of help us with that part.
Everybody!
Marin frist!
Break an antler.
okay. (Laughs) okay. (Chuckles) okay.
Okay.
Okay!
How many of you guys think that... finding "the one"
is gonna make you happy?
When did we decide that someone else was in charge of our happiness?
We don't even let somebody else order our soy lattes!
Our what?
Soy... lattes.
It's a coffee drink, you know.
--Oh!
--Yeah.
--Yeah.
The point is... don't cheat.
Oh, and you gotta look out for the signs, which I didn't, even though it's my job.
uh... yes, you.
I don't have a question.
Well, that's good, 'cause I do.
Let's say... you're a guy.
Okay.
Okay, and you get engaged to this girl after dating her for a year.
During which time, she's laughed at all your jokes-- some of which not so funny.
She's gone to your... company picnics--snore-- your family dinners--scary.
She's pretty successful.
She's kind.
She's not half bad in the sack.
So why do you not want to marry her?
She's no selleck.
(the weepies' "world spins madly on" playing) here, happy!
here, happy!
Here, happy!
Come here, happy!
(I lay motionless in bed... ) good boy!
(I thought of you )
(and where you've gone )
great.
I missed my flight.
ah, yes!
yes!
This is jane.
Leave a message.
um... jane... you gotta call me.
I... graham... this is really bad.
call--
aah!
--Hi.
--Hi.
You may want to keep your side of the bathroom locked.
--My side?
--Yeah.
(Man) sara.
Only have a half an hour before my shift.
--I need a spinning class.
--Ah, spinning what?
Spinning bike.
A spinning bike class.
You sit on a stationary bike, and you bike to music.
--But you don't go anywhere.
--Right.
Yeah, we don't have 'em.
Why would you wanna go for a bike ride and not go anywhere?
What's the point?
I mean, that's like riding a legless horse,
--or like a pogo stick without a stick or-- --yeah, I get it.
Wowza.
I'm sorry, and...
I'm sorry...about last night.
I missed my flight, and I really need to get out of here.
Yeah, and you missed my radio show this morning.
Okay.
I'm sorry about that, too.
I had to interview my mom, again.
You really wouldn't want me on the air right now, trust me.
I think I got something for you.
Now the front brakes don't work, and you're gonna need this-- bear spray.
Actually, you spray it on the bear, but that'll work.
(Kt tunstall's "black horse and the cherry tree" playing) wow!
Whoa!
Ah!
Sorry.
Sorry.
(Whoo-hoo well, my heart knows me better than I know myself )
(so I'm gonna let it do all the talking)
(whoo-hoo whoo-hoo)
(I came across a place in the middle of nowhere with a big black horse and a cherry tree)
(whoo-hoo whoo-hoo)
(I fell in fear upon my back I said, "don't look back, just keep on walking" )
(whoo-hoo whoo-hoo... ) wow.
(Whoo-hoo whoo-hoo)
oh!
(No, no no, no, no, no,)
(I said no... ) sara!
So now you're out.
Patrick!
Hey!
(Groans) anybody?
Whoo-hoo
how you doing, coach?
Ahem.
I hear you got a 9-1-1.
So is it-- oh, what, you're a cop?
Uh, fish and game biologist.
The sheriff called me.
Is that what they're wearing in new york these days?
All my clothes are in there with the, uh... that's a pretty big, possibly rabid, raccoon.
You're gonna want to wait outside.
I'm not leaving that animal alone with my favorite purple faux croc flats.
Well, could be dangerous.
I'm fine.
They go for the neck.
Whatever.
Get all macho.
the deceased.
you can't leave food out, or whatever this bar thing is.
these are very tasty.
I only make one round-trip flight tomorrow-- to sitka.
Fine, I'll go to sitka.
Unh-unh, you don't want to go to sitka.
Wrong direction.
Anchorage will get you to hawaii.
What's, uh, what's in hawaii?
Oh, she wanted to go there for the honeymoon.
He chose turkey.
He got to choose because she made him take dancing lessons.
I told you all that last night?
Yeah, somewhere between the vodka shots and the schnapps.
what kind of a pansy man takes dance lessons?
buzz, I just want to get to hawaii and relax, and I'm desperate.
And apparently, you are the only pilot who can fly me tomorrow, so what's it gonna take?
How much you got?
On me?
You're paying for expertise.
Back in 1955, they only hired one black pilot to captain a commercial airliner.
That was you?
No, that was august martin.
So I had to come up here to start my own airline-- buzz airways-- and I'm not sure buzz is flying tomorrow.
I got 200 bucks.
Hmm.
Okay, I'll take you.
Noon sharp.
here, happy!
--here, happy!
--Good-bye, happy.
I'm going to hawaii.
That's right-- hawaii, whe it's warm, and where there are cigarettes.
What are you doing here?
That's my line.
You were supposed to be in seattle.
I missed my flight.
Well, that's why I'm here,
--to make sure you get on a flight tonight to chicago.
--Oh.
No flight to chicago tonight.
But you're welcome to come with me to anchorage and then to hawaii.
No flight to anchorage, either.
There isn't?
Nope.
There's a storm coming in.
Buzz airways is grounded.
Uh, you buying, little lady?
Kiki's best friend told my shrink.
Your shrink told you?
Yes.
She was upset.
She needed to talk about it.
Oh... is this a gay bar?
This is the only bar.
This town is filled with men.
They're all over like a bad rash.
They're even in the trees.
Ask me why we're going to chicago.
I booked you on "oprah."
This is the part where you jump for joy.
I can't do "oprah."
All you've done for a year is talk about going on "oprah."
I can't pretend that I know how to find a good man when I can't find one myself.
"Stinkin' thinkin'." Everyone has got to stop quoting me to me.
Vodka?
Yes.
And what'll it be?
Ah, ye I would like a "char-don-nay."
It's a white wine.
If you like white, I have a jolivet pouilly-fume 2001 that will knock your boots off.
Oh.
Look, you just have to get back on the horse.
You'll start writing a book again, and it'll be okay.
Oh, yeah?
And what's the name of the book gonna be--
"I'm not getting married in four weeks 'cause he cheated on me, and you can, too"?
Mmm, that's a little long.
Ah.
Apparently, I know nothing about men.
Well, maybe you just weren't listening.
Oh, men talk?
Oh, you have "dirty harry" syndrome.
What?
All I heard was "dirty."
Every woman thinks that she wants dirty harry-- the tough guy, you know, with a big gun, strong and silent.
But really, what's getting you ladies all hot and bothered is clint eastwood, the guy who played dirty harry.
A guy with a gun who'll watch "harry meets sally" with you and cook dinner.
Then you make too many dinners, and you're a pushover.
Cookin' dinner, watching girlie movies... what's wrong with you people?
women want it all.
We can't give it to you.
So you guys are kind of screwed?
--You got it.
--huh.
"Breakups--
"how to hammer the dents out and get back on the road.
"You can either lie in bed and mope or get back out there.
"I say, 'take a shower and go out and smile,'
"'cause the next guy's not gonna notice you unless you have your brights on."
I'm totally full of crap.
Well, it's official-- no one in alaska reads.
How you doing, coach?
Sir, perhaps you'd like to add marin frist's best seller to that stack?
--Jane, it's fine.
--She is a world-renowned dating expert.
Yeah, I know.
I was at her, uh, lecture.
Oh.
You know how amazing she is.
Well, I know she can't hold her liquor.
Here.
You know what?
I'll take one.
Don't buy my book 'cause you pity me.
Okay.
I am officially pathetic.
No, you're not.
You're going on "oprah."
Hmm, if I get reception on this thing and get them to push a day.
It's four minutes after the cardinal.
They should be in by now.
Hold down the fort.
marin?
Annie?
!
What are you doing here?
I heard about what happened with your fiance.
Of course you did.
I had to take a bus from vancouver.
There's a bus to vancouver?
!
Once a week.
You just missed it.
"have hope."
What?
That--that's what you wrote in my book, "have hope."
You... you have given me hope, and now I want to give you some.
Annie, that is really sweet and really extreme of you.
You deserve a great guy.
He'll show up, right?
I-I mean, I'm still getting my learner's permit to love, and I'm ignoring a lot of the road signs, and there's been a few detours along, but-- annie, come on.
Uh, yes.
Come on.
--I'm coming.
--Bye!
(man) hey!
Sorry.
Hold on.
Oh, you've gotta be kidding me.
Sorry.
Um... oh!
Hello?
Hello?
Yeah, can you-- can you hear me?
Uh, hold on.
Is that--is that better?
Okay, so I-I think I can get her out tomorrow, so if you can rebook on thursday that would be great.
I'll just have my assistant fax you.
no, no, no.
So do we have a deal?
lady!
Yeah, I am-- I am on the phone here!
Yeah, well, you gotta move, 'cause I gotta plow!
I am not giving up the one corner where I can communicate with the outside world.
Yeah--no, no, no.
No, no, no--fine, I just-- you're being very rude!
Hey, I'm just doing my job.
So am I, buster.
Name's dave.
What's yours?
Not moving.
Suit yourself.
patrick... annie.
Annie, patrick.
Hey ho.
Hi. (Chuckles) oh, hey, uh, something came for you today in ben's lemon shipment.
--Yeah, I put it in your room.
--Thanks.
No, doc...(whispers) thank you.
Hey, she's a crackpot, but I dig her.
I'd listen to her read a chinese menu.
(Chuckles) I wrote that.
Yeah, in her chat room.
"Alaska dude 123"?
Yeah.
"City fannnn."
Four n'S.
(Gasps) my dress!
Oh, no, mister.
Not this time.
(The violent femmes' "gone daddy gone" playing)
(beautiful girl, lovely dress high school smiles,)
(oh, yes beautiful girl, lovely dress... ) yeah, that's right.
Let's take it outside.
('Cause it's gone, daddy, gone, your love is gone)
(yeah, it's gone, daddy, gone, your love is gone)
(yeah, it's gone, daddy, gone, your love is gone away)
yeah, that's pretty much what it looks like.
The door was open.
What at looks like?
Marriage.
It's full of a lot more dirt and holes than the fairy tale dress they sell you.
Sara, can I tell you something I've never told anyone?
Pretty much got dirt on everyone in this town, so shoot.
All these years, I've sold myself as "the single girl"... total lie.
I've never tually been alone since I was 16.
I've always had a guy.
Well, I've never been able to be with someone.
So you're not married anymore?
Divorced.
I have a kid.
His dad went A.W.O.L. To the lower 48, so I try and make ends meet however I can.
Right.
Go ahead, judge me.
I'm not gonna judge you.
I judge me.
I really wanna leave the hospitality... business.
It's hard to find a guy who just likes me for me.
Yeah, dating was impossible for me once a guy found out I was a relationship coach, so I would lie and say that I was a computer technician.
how'd that work?
Well, pretty good, until he asked me to fix his hard drive.
(love stinks... ) you have any cigarettes?
Cigarettes come in the first of the month on the ferry.
By the end of the month, we're down to chaw.
I'm not that desperate yet.
The guys love it.
I can't stand guys.
You came to the wrong town.
The ratio's like 10 to 1 here.
So men run the place.
Are you kidding?
No, we're the ones with the power.
They're lonely.
We're the prize.
It's like shooting fish in aarrel.
Here I've been telling single women to go to sports bars.
I should've been telling them to go to alaska.
Yeah, well, the odds are good, but the goods are odd.
Ben seems nice...
--and very into you.
--He better be.
He married me.
Well, we're separated.
Ben wants to get back together, but I want to see what else is out there.
So up here, women get to be men.
Everyone gets to be who they want to be.
(Love stinks)
(man) where you headed?
Anywhere that can sell me a cigarette.
Get in.
What are you running away from?
Everything.
When you are lost, you must look to the skies for answers.
Our ancestors are there, in the stars, clouds... what if there are no answers?
If you don't believe, you'll end up like the frozen girl.
She kept walking, never looked up.
They found her body frozen to death on naknek mountain.
300 years old.
Alone, no teeth... fat.
She was still fat after 300 years?
That's how fat she was.
Here we go.
Thank you.
(Jack) hey!
What-- stop!
Stop!
Stop!
Trust me, I'm trying!
aah!
didn't you see the "thin ice" signs?
no.
And P.S.--Seeing signs, not my strong suit.
--What is this?
--Observation hut.
What are you observing?
I was looking for a nocturnal bear, but instead I found a relationship coach
.
Almost as dangerous.
Oh, m-man, I'm cold.
Yeah, we're getting hypothermic.
But it's too dark to walk across the ice safely.
There's only one way we're gonna make it to morning.
Light a fire?
your elbow's in my... thank you.
This getting naked for warmth thing better not be some sad attempt to get sex.
(Scoffs) I don't want to have sex with you.
--I know all about you lonely alaska guys.
--Oh, yeah.
Well, maybe you should stop thinking in stereotypes.
It's not you.
It's all men.
I just don't want to be around them right now.
Well, that's working out for you.
--Shut up --gladly.
Everything in the right place, coach?
(jack) wolves.
they're beautiful.
They're mating.
Actually, she's just, uh, rubbing her crap into his fur.
--But then after, you know, maybe they'll...
they'll get busy.
--Oh.
(The lemonheads' "the outdoor type" playing)
you're gonna have to drive, coach.
I screwed up my shifting wrist.
I can't.
You have to.
No, I... can't drive.
Up, up.
I'm supposed to be teaching people how to drive to happiness, and I don't even have a license.
I know, it's totally lame.
Up until now, a total secret.
Down.
Well, this is a good place to learn-- plenty of open space, just a few stoplights, no one around to see you when you hit a tree.
(Laughs) ye, third.
--Yeah, up.
--ah!
There you go.
It's okay.
So what's your secret?
What you see is what you get.
Can you drop me at the dock?
(Can't grow a beard or even fight I lied about being the outdoor type) what happened to you?
You know what?
Don't worry about it.
You can shower in chicago.
(Man) here, happy!
Happy!
Come on, happy!
Hey, sit, sit.
I'm not going.
What?
What do you mean, you're not going to chicago?
I'm not going, period.
Oh, marin, honey... you can't stay here.
They don't have a nail place or a--or a spinning class.
I need to breathe and start my book.
About marriage?
About men.
But you said you didn't know anything about them.
It's about time I learned.
What do you say we go, ladies?
I'm on the clock here.
Oh, marin.
Please be okay.
If you change editors, I'll hunt you down and kill you.
(Bob schneider's "the world exploded into love" playing) --buzz, can I get a hand here?
Thank you.
(A feeling, if you know what I mean )
(delectable dimension undetectable by sight )
(it'll fill up your heart in the dead of the night)
(some say that it's an astral plane )
(can't be described, can't be explained... ) what'd you put for question four?
"E."
Same here.
The truest thing I know about relationships is that sometimes we don't know anything at all.
(Separation exists on in your lo-filled heart...
but only in your mind the real story's all around you)
(even now, it surrounds you even now, I feel power... )
And sometimes the one you get may not be the right one at all.
But if you have hope, the universe has a funny way of showing you exactly what you need.
The challenge is to let yourself be alone until the right one shows up.
But you can't hide either.
Heartbreak sucks... but not having heartbreak sucks more.
The answers aren't in a lecture or a book.
But maybe if you get yourself happy, you'll find the right one.
I believe this because against all odds,
I am still an optimist.
(The world exploded into love all around me )
(every time I take a look around me... ) that's the thing about love...
(I have to smile)
(the world exploded into love all around me... ) if it were that easy, everyone would have it.
(The world exploded into love all around me... ) (man) so you're saying I should be more optimistic?
I'm saying you should ask her out.
Oh!
All right!
Thanks, man!
That was A.J. From ketchikan.
Thanks for the call, A.J.
Hold on, you have another caller on line 2 through... 20?
We haven't had this many callers since I raffled off my mom's salmon smoker.
Oh, okay.
Let's start with line two.
Previously on Nip / Tuck...
The worst thing you can do for your son is tip-toe around his condition.
Luckily, it looks like we're gonna be able to reconstruct his hands with a series of surgeries.
We feel it's his best chance to live a normal life.
Mrs. Grubman, you have a plastic surgery addiction problem.
Holy shit, she's in V-fib.
Come on.
You're not gonna die on me, you crazy bitch.
Fix my face.
This time I can't.
I'm sorry.
Just for old time's sake, tell me what you don't like about yourself.
Dr. Troy...
Can I answer that one?
'Cause there are a few things I don't like about Driving Miss Crazy here.
No, you can't answer that, Evetta.
If I wanted someone with an opinion, I'd have hired Star Jones.
Well, let's see Star Jones wipe your ass and change your Depends for $12 an hour.
Well, maybe if you learned to cook, I wouldn't have diarrhea all the time.
I see the speech therapy's coming along quite well, Mrs. G.
It had to, it's my only defense against the verbal onslaught.
But it has been a long recovery, Dr. Troy.
A long recovery.
I couldn't stand that convalescent home another day, so I moved home and hired Evetta for around-the-clock assistance.
I've been in seclusion for almost two years.
I know.
I tried to stop by and they said you didn't wanna see me.
Now, don't take it personally, doll, I haven't seen anyone.
I was so depressed about how I looked,
I wouldn't even let my own daughter visit me.
You see, Dr. Troy, I was preparing for my triumphant return.
Now, the goal was to re-emerge at a gala affair attended by everybody who's anybody in Miami.
And the final step before my coming out was a visit here for a few refresher operations.
Was?
Why the past tense?
Well, there may not be time for a party any longer, Dr. Troy.
You see, a few days ago,
I found out that I have stage 4 lung cancer.
It has metastasized to my bones and my liver.
There's nothing they can do.
The Grim Reaper could ask me for a final samba at any moment.
Mrs. Grubman,
I'm very sorry.
Oh, don't be.
I've accepted it.
But time is of the essence.
So, I'll need the surgeries right away.
You must be insane, Mrs. Grubman.
The stress of an invasive procedure would be too much for you right now.
Yeah, I thought you might say that.
So we'll move on to Plan B.
You'll perform the operations after I die.
We'll make my coming out party my funeral.
I'll be the best looking corpse since Zsa Zsa Gabor.
Although she'd never fit into the size two I'll be wearing in my casket.
Zsa Zsa's dead?
Not officially.
That was a good one, shitpants.
I'll need to suck 60 pounds out of you to get you into a size 2 dress.
What do I care?
I'll be dead.
Mrs. Grubman,
I'm your plastic surgeon.
I won't be your undertaker.
There is not an undertaker in Miami who has an ounce of your artistic talent, Dr. Troy.
My body is your canvas.
And I want you to be the last man to touch it.
Hey.
I don't want to interrupt, I just...
Never mind.
Have a great weekend.
What did you wanna say?
Well, I was just thinking, how far you've come.
It's impressive.
Motherhood becomes you, Julia.
See you guys on Monday.
Have a lovely weekend.
You okay?
You got in so late last night.
I was over at the anatomy lab practicing digital nerve dissections.
I haven't done one since med school.
You've been dissecting fingers?
Do you use baby body parts?
See, this is why we shouldn't get into it.
I can't deal with you overreacting to fetal cadavers.
You're the one who's overreacting, Sean.
You know, I mean, really, if it were any other surgeon,
I would have a chance to ask questions.
As it is, everything I say just seems to stress you out.
I'm just focused.
I'm trying to anticipate any and every possible complication for our son.
That's a good thing, isn't it?
Yeah, of course.
And I'm proud of you.
We're very lucky.
I mean, think of all the families who don't have the talent or the money to do what we're doing.
There is no money for it, Kathleen.
It's a vanity operation and we can't afford it.
He's just going to have to toughen up.
We've got $5,000 saved, Tom.
Oh, that's brilliant, Kathleen.
Brilliant.
It's his college fund.
You'd rather be the picture-perfect pretty boy stocking shelves at the Tru Value?
No education, no prospects.
That's what she wants.
Is that what you want?
That's you in a nutshell.
Teach him to take the easy road.
No goddamn priorities.
This isn't about me!
He's being taunted and humiliated, and he is suffering!
I love him too much to stand by and do nothing.
And I don't love my son?
Is that where you're taking this?
Did I do this right, Dad?
I don't want you to think that I'm not supportive.
No, you're right, Jules.
We're all incredibly lucky.
And I promise, I'll schedule a sit-down at the office and you can ask all the questions you want.
Take the morning for yourself, you deserve it.
I'll take the kids out for pancakes.
Thank you.
Sit here with your brother, honey, while I put our name down.
You should try holding up a little fish and see if he'll grab it.
- What?
- Leave him alone, Morgan.
He looks like a crab, Dad.
Here, baby, want a sardine?
Please don't make fun of my son's hands.
How would you like it if I teased you about your pig nose, huh?
Or those chubby cheeks?
How would you like that?
Hey, take it easy, buddy.
He's just a kid.
He's making fun of a handicap.
Maybe if you got your nose out of that newspaper and paid him some attention, he wouldn't be such a little asshole.
Don't call my son an asshole, or your kids are gonna see their old man get his ass kicked.
Daddy!
Your son's an asshole.
But not half as big an asshole as his father.
Let's go, honey, come on.
- Thanks for coming, Dr. Troy.
- How is she?
I told you, she stopped eating.
You gotta do something.
I gave her an IV and she pulled it out of her arm.
That bitch has a death wish.
I know they're gonna claim elder abuse when she finally kicks it.
- Why would they do that?
- Two priors, honey.
I got caught lifting a Gucci handbag and slapped a cop when he tried to fondle my sexy booty.
Nobody's going to blame you for negligence, Evetta.
You're probably the only reason she's still alive.
Just don't let her die, okay?
Slightly different circumstances from when you were last here, Dr. Troy.
Though it doesn't have to be.
How about sending me out of this world with a smile on my face?
- Why aren't you eating, Mrs. Grubman?
- I don't have time to eat.
There's too much work to do on this funeral.
And the seating chart alone has taken me four hours.
Blaine Trump's gonna need a shoulder to cry on.
I'll just sit her right up front, next to you.
You're giving up, Mrs. Grubman.
That isn't like you.
I told you, I've had a wonderful life, with only two regrets.
That I didn't sleep with you when I had the chance, and that I never got to sing at the Rainbow Room.
The Rainbow Room?
Don't you have to be able to sing for that?
Listen to my demo on your way home, you'll see.
I was gonna be Burt Bacharach's girl before he picked Dionne Warwick.
And then I met my Marvin and everything changed.
But you'll hear all the stories at the funeral.
If you don't start eating, I won't be there.
You have to.
You're slated to speak right after Dominick Dunne.
I won't be a part of this.
If you wanna starve yourself to death just to be a better-looking corpse, find someone else to do your dirty work.
These last two years have been so lonely, you know?
Oh, I know it's my own fault, I pushed everyone away.
Evetta does a great job, she really tries hard to cheer me up.
I like having her around.
She fights back.
Like you.
Shit, my Maybelline's running.
Hand me a tissue, would you?
Thank you.
I'm sorry I didn't come visit you more often.
Oh, please.
You should be out there playing the field, Dr. Troy, finding yourself the first in a series of 24-year-old trophy wives.
Tell you what, I'll make you a deal.
For a spoonful of soup today, I'll give you a Botox shot tomorrow.
I am kind of hungry.
I love you, you know.
You know what?
Let him sue me.
It was worth it.
Sick asshole.
Just say it, you think I should go back to anger management.
What?
What really concerns me, Sean, is what all this intensity is about.
You didn't hear him being mocked in front of a dozen strangers, in front of Annie.
All I knew in that moment was that people like them would be tormenting my son for the rest of his life.
I had to do something.
You are doing something.
You're doing his surgery.
For now, just promise me you'll talk to this Mr. Thompson.
Apologize to him, so that we don't have to deal with the headache of a lawsuit.
Will you do that?
I'm also gonna call Dr. Mugavi and move up the surgery.
There's no reason to wait.
I'll be ready to go in two weeks.
But he's still so little.
The sooner I do this surgery, the sooner he can begin developing the coordination and function in his hands.
It's all he's gonna have.
Who are you doing this for, Sean?
You or Conor?
You stay right there.
Holy cow.
This one looks like it's out of here!
He's rounding third, it's a race for the plate.
It's a home run!
When can I sign up for Little League, Dad?
Gee, thanks, buddy.
I come out here, play ball with you and that's what you've got to say?
No,
I really like playing with you, it's just...
I just wanna play a real game.
You and your mother.
The kids'll laugh at you and the coach'll keep you on the bench, then stick you out in right field for the last inning.
Oh, and they'll shove you in the back for the team photo.
Is that what you want?
What are you doing here?
I called your house, your wife told me you'd be here.
You have a moment to talk, Mr. Thompson?
- I'm sorry I hit you.
- Yeah, I bet you are.
'Cause it's gonna cost you, McNamara.
I got 20 witnesses that will swear to what they saw.
I never should have erupted like I did.
I just...
My son...
He's about to have an operation on his hands.
You humiliated me in front of my boy.
Looks like you two are working through it.
Yeah.
I had to explain to him that what I did was wrong, what he did was wrong, and what you did was really, really wrong.
I think...
I think he gets it now.
- What position does he play?
- Shortstop.
I mean, he's a little slower than the other kids, but he did turn a double-play last night.
It won them the game.
Every kid should have a moment like that.
A walk-off home run, a buzzer beater.
It's all I want for Conor.
He may never get that chance, but all I want is for him to be normal.
Look, do what you gotta do with the lawsuit.
I just wanted to apologize for what I did and what I said.
These webbed fingers are known as syndactyly.
There are actually two fingers inside here.
We do a syndactyly release on the index and middle finger, and another one between the ring and the pinky.
And what kind of complications could arise?
Oh, I'm so sorry I'm late.
There was this accident on the Causeway.
Marlowe's going to be involved in Conor's care, so I asked him to join us.
Please, I'm sorry, don't mind me.
Please continue.
Let me get you a chair.
The main complication that could arise is that the vessel or the nerve could be damaged in the process.
Will you have to do a skin graft?
The short answer is yes, Julia, but...
Is that a very invasive procedure?
Will there be a lot of pain?
He'll be under anesthesia.
I was talking about his recovery.
We're pretty good with pain management.
Which brings us to the thumb distraction.
Now, we plan to turn this small suggestion of a digit into a real thumb.
We make an incision in the thumb, dissect the bone and apply a distraction osteogenesis device.
It has little pins and screws that go into the bone.
We sew the thumb back up and over the next weeks, we slowly turn the screws and they basically stretch the bone.
Who turns these screws over the next few weeks?
You do.
We've found that the pain level is minimal to next to nothing when the parents are the ones to turn them.
How do you measure those pain levels, if I may ask?
Oh, we doctors, we've got all kinds of tricks up our sleeves.
That was a reasonable question, Christian.
Well, I'm only asking because according to the research I've been reading, the traditional ways of measuring infant pain, tears and brain activity, it's just not as conclusive as we wish it was.
Are you aware of the expertise, mastery and professional status that's gathered in this room?
With all due respect, Julia asked me to be here today to bring up some of these issues.
In other words, I'm doing my job.
I'm sorry if that knocks anyone's nose out of joint.
So, what is this research, Marlowe?
Some well-respected developmental psychologists have done hypnoses on a pretty large group of adults who had surgery at an early age.
They all tend to have similar symptoms, nervous system disorders, digestive problems, debilitating phobia and panic attacks.
Are you aware of this, Sean?
I scheduled this meeting so you could meet Dr. Mugavi and ask specific questions about the surgery.
I think the whole New Age healing modality type of conversation is better suited to the dinner table.
Well, in that case, I'm gonna go home and make dinner so that I can have that conversation.
Dr. Mugavi, Christian, feel free to join us.
Well, look at you two!
Burberry never looked so good on Kate Moss.
Oh, you like it?
I had Evetta pick it up for me at Neiman's.
And she's lucky I made her wear a bib at breakfast.
Otherwise, it'd have been covered in strawberry crepe shit.
I also wore a huge hat, so no one would recognize me.
But you were right, Dr. Troy, not eating was a silly thing to do.
Oh, we had the most wonderful brunch this morning at Restaurant St. Michel.
Eating out in public?
That's fantastic.
Baby, it was like opening the gates to hell.
Anything on the menu with cheese, beef, or cream in it,
Fatty Belt-Buckles had to have two.
Well, look who's talking.
I never saw anyone order lobster and a chocolate milkshake for breakfast before.
I figured if the old goat's gonna be spending my inheritance,
I'm gonna enjoy it.
Though maybe I should've stopped with the milkshake.
We can get you some liposuction, Evetta, if you're worried about your weight.
I was talking about my heartburn, dummy.
I don't need no Hoover vacuum stealing my ass.
Where I come from, I don't get lipo to attract a man,
I eat another cherry pie and put more junk in my trunk, know what I'm saying?
I'm sorry, I didn't mean to offend you.
Drum up your work with some pitiful, self-hating creature, Dr. Troy.
Not me, okay?
I love myself.
Every pound of it.
Go read a magazine in the lobby, Evetta.
I hear the new issue of Essence is here.
Yeah, I'll go read my Essence.
I was tired of talking to the two of you, anyway.
And stop shutting me up.
Always trying to get sucked and tucked, that's what's wrong with your crazy ass now.
I should go talk to her.
Oh, she'll be all right.
She's a spitfire though, huh?
Oh, breakfast was fun.
And thank God no one recognized me.
Well, after a few shots of Botox, the old Mrs. Grubman will reappear.
A shot of Botox is the elixir of life, Dr. Troy.
It's getting out in public and seeing people again that makes you feel good, Mrs. Grubman.
Oh, Mrs. Grubman.
- Julia...
- Listen to this.
"I saw these masked giants hovering over me,
"the cold harsh light was in my eyes.
"Someone came toward me with a black mask
"that had this smell and it made me sick.
"When I woke up, I started to vomit.
"A stranger shoved a huge teddy bear at me, the eyes were terrifying. "
This memory is from when he was seven months old.
It's the book you gave me.
Julia, I'm sorry.
I should've thought more carefully about what I was doing.
But I'm so grateful to you.
You know, I knew these things instinctively, I just hadn't articulated it.
A baby responds to surgery as if he's dying, because he has no understanding of what's happening to him.
Julia, listen to me...
We have to convince Sean to postpone the surgery.
You know, at least until Conor's older, you know?
So we can prepare him for it.
I'm not gonna sign the surgery consent form.
Okay, but before you make any decisions, let me tell you what I've decided.
I'm leaving.
You're what?
I don't...
I don't know how it ended up like this, but it's clear that I've become a disruptive influence in this household.
And that's not good for anyone, especially not Conor.
Do you know the difference between a surgeon and God?
God doesn't think he's a surgeon.
Now, I need you to stay, to help me through this.
You're my rock.
I can't go through this alone.
You underestimate how powerful you are, Julia.
And these books, they have concrete suggestions on how to help Conor through this.
It won't be the end of the world.
I can't...
I just...
The thought of waking up tomorrow and not seeing you...
You'll...
You'll get through this.
You're a really good mother.
That's why I have to leave.
Thought I'd give you a hand today.
She's dead, Christian.
She's not gonna catch anything.
It's her last time in the saddle, Sean.
Might as well give her the full treatment.
Okay.
Linda told me you're doing the eulogy at her funeral.
Yeah, but I'm struggling with what I'm gonna say.
All Miami's gonna be there.
She sent out engraved invitations.
All I can think of is,
"Here lies a woman who was so busy looking in the mirror
"and feeling she wasn't good enough that she missed her life. "
She could have had a singing career, did you know that?
I didn't know much about her besides her desperate, overbearing personality.
Yeah, she wasn't such a bad egg.
But I'd certainly feel more comfortable if I could stand up there knowing that my contribution to her life was a little more positive.
I feel like her drug-dealer.
You can't think like that.
I seem to recall a diatribe by you only a few months ago about how we were contributing to a society that was obsessed with physical perfection.
At the moment, I'm grateful for every single surgery that's given me the skill to make my son whole.
What if you couldn't fix Conor?
What if you couldn't make him as close to perfect as possible?
How would that make you feel?
Have you been talking to my wife?
All I'm getting from the people around me lately is this touchy-feely negative psychobabble.
Whoa, killer, it's not me you're mad at.
Maybe you should take the afternoon off.
Go home, make peace with your wife.
Besides, I could use the alone time with Grubman to work out my eulogy.
Would you mind changing the music, Linda?
Gangsta rap just doesn't seem like the right choice for Mrs. Grubman.
I brought something.
It's over there.
Ladies and gentlemen, Mrs. Grubman.
Thanks, Burt.
Don't forget your glove, Sean.
Go on, it's after 4:00, you're gonna miss it.
What'll I do if they laugh at me?
They're fools if they laugh, and who cares what fools think?
- Dad's gonna be mad.
- I'll handle Dad, honey.
Now go on.
What're you doing home so early?
- Are you all right?
- I'm fine.
- We need to talk.
- Yes, Sean, we do.
I'm not ready to sign the consent form.
I know.
I know I've been kind of a madman lately, I've been so obsessed with making things perfect for Conor's surgery and I see how counterproductive that's been and unfair to you.
There are things that...
That I've never told you.
- About the surgery?
- No.
About me.
What's he doing here?
- Am I too late?
- No.
No, your timing's perfect.
Did you bring a signed consent form?
One of these?
Yeah, right here.
Great.
Okay, next.
All right, stand on the line.
I'm gonna give you a count, give me a good home run.
Boom, pow.
All right?
Home run, one, two.
Okay, get the next one in.
You wanna lower your arm a little bit?
Let me see some more face.
How about it?
When did you have the surgery?
Who paid for it?
I was 8.
My mother used the college money, we did it behind my dad's back.
Lucky for everyone I was a good student and qualified for financial aid.
But he never forgave her.
He left a few months later.
That's why he left you guys?
It always seemed such a mystery to me.
I think he felt like he lost control of the family.
I guess we pushed him out.
My mom worked two jobs to support us.
I just don't understand why you didn't tell me.
'Cause I put that pathetic kid behind me.
No, you didn't.
That kid is why you're a plastic surgeon.
Why did you have to keep it a secret?
I couldn't let you see me as that pathetic, ugly kid.
I was afraid that's all you'd ever see.
And in so many ways that little kid is who I fell in love with.
Only because you never saw him.
Where is everyone, Evetta?
I guess they had better things to do.
Didn't you send out all the invitations for her?
Every single one.
Maybe her address book was out of date or something.
Her daughter, Claire?
She couldn't find the time to come to her mother's funeral?
Claire called the house, said that her mother died for her almost two years ago, when she stopped seeing her after she had the stroke.
Said that when she chose vanity over family, it was too much for her to handle.
Did you hear what she put on her headstone?
"I came, I saw, I conga'd. "
Oh, Grubby, we did have some fun times together.
Too bad you screwed me in your will.
Yeah, all I got was a few old-lady muumuus.
I guess she thought I meant it when I told her I liked them.
Either that or her last joke's on me.
Which I guess it is anyway.
Okay, well, I gotta go find a new job.
I'll see you next week, Dr. Troy.
Next week.
What...
What's next week?
Oh, I made an appointment at McNamara/Troy.
Since she left you everything, I'm at least gonna get some free lipo out of it.
She left me all her money?
You didn't hear?
It's in her will.
She put it all in the Hedda Grubman Plastic Surgery Fund.
For people that need a little work but don't wanna pay for it.
I'm here to pay respects to Hedda Grubman.
Her life was like that of any other, filled with accomplishments that should be exalted, and regrets that should be learned from.
Her wit and candor...
This is bullshit.
The truth is, Mrs. Grubman, you were a huge pain in the ass.
Pretty much everybody hated you.
It's no wonder they boycotted your funeral.
You were obsessed with your looks and plastic surgery and in the end it cost you every relationship you ever had.
But I know somewhere inside,
you meant well.
And you were funny, and honest, and you stuck up for yourself.
I loved the fact that you never let me off the hook.
Life was more interesting with you in it, and...
And I'm gonna miss you.
And I love you, too.
Goodbye, Mrs. Grubman.
Marker.
Scissors and pickups.
Marlowe, my God, you have no idea how glad I am to see you.
Saw.
Screwdriver.
English
Previously on Nip/Tuck...
The worst thing you can do for your son is tip-toe around his condition.
Luckily it looks like we'll be able to reconstruct his hands with a series of surgeries.
We feel it's his best chance to live a normal life.
Mrs. Grubman, you have a plastic surgery addiction problem.
Holy shit, she's in V-fib.
Come on.
You're not gonna die on me, you crazy bitch.
Fix my face.
This time I can't.
I'm sorry.
This is for old times' sake.
Tell me what you don't like about yourself.
Ha ha.
Dr. Troy.
Can I answer that one cause there are a few things I don't like about driving Miss Crazy here.
No, you can't answer that, Evetta.
If I wanted someone with an opinion, I'd have hired Star Jones.
Well, let's see star jones wipe your ass and change your depends for $12 an hour.
Hmm.
Well, maybe if you learned to cook,
I wouldn't have diarrhea all the time.
I see the speech therapy is coming along quite well, Mrs. G.
It had to.
It's my only defense against the verbal onslaught.
But it has been a long recovery, Dr. Troy.
A long recovery.
I couldn't stand that convalescent home another day.
So I moved home and hired Evetta for around-the-clock assistance.
I've been in seclusion for almost 2 years.
I know.
I tried to stop by, and they said, uh, you didn't want to see me.
Oh, now, don't take it personally, doll.
I haven't seen anyone.
I was so depressed about how I looked,
I wouldn't even let my own daughter visit me.
You see, Dr. Troy,
I was preparing for my triumphant return.
Now, the goal was to reemerge at a gala affair attended by everybody who's anybody in Miami.
And the final step, before my coming out was a visit here for a few refresher operations.
"Was"?
Why the past tense?
Well, there may not be time for a party any longer, Dr. Troy.
You see, uh, a few days ago,
I found out that I have stage 4 lung cancer.
It has metastasized to my bones and my liver.
There's nothing they can do.
The grim reaper could ask me for a final samba at any moment.
Mrs. Grubman.
- I'm very sorry.
- Ah, don't be.
I've accepted it.
But time is of the essence.
So I'll need the surgeries right away.
You must be insane, Mrs. Grubman.
The stress of an invasive procedure would be too much for you right now.
Yeah, I thought you might say that.
So we'll move on to plan "B".
You'll perform the operations after I die.
We'll make my coming-out party my funeral.
I'll be the best looking corpse since Zsa Zsa Gabor.
Although she'd never fit into the size 2 I'll be wearing in my casket.
- Zsa Zsa is dead?
- Not officially.
Ha ha!
That was a good one, shit pants.
I'll need to suck 60 pounds out of you to get you into a size 2 dress.
What do I care?
I'll be dead.
Mrs. Grubman, I'm your plastic surgeon.
I won't be your undertaker.
There is not an undertaker in Miami who has an ounce of your artistic talent, dr.
Troy.
My body is your canvas.
And I want you to be the last man to touch it.
Hey.
I don't want to interrupt.
I just...
Never mind.
Have a great weekend.
What did you want to say?
I was just thinking how far you've come.
It's impressive.
Motherhood becomes you, Julia.
See you guys on monday.
Have a lovely weekend.
You ok?
You got in so late last night.
I was over at the anatomy lab practicing visual nerve dissections.
I haven't done one since med school.
You've been dissecting fingers?
Do you use baby body parts?
Mm-hmm.
See, this is why we shouldn't get into it.
I can't deal with you overreacting to fetal cadavers.
You're the one who's overreacting, Sean.
I mean, really, if it were any other surgeon,
I would have a chance to ask questions.
As it is,everything I say just seems to stress you out.
I'm just focused.
I'm trying to anticipate any and every possible complication for our son.
That's a good thing, isn't it?
Yeah, of course.
And I'm proud of you.
We're very lucky.
I mean, think of all the families who don't have the talent or the money to do what we're doing.
There's no money for it, Kathleen.
It's a vanity operation and we can't afford it.
He's just gonna have to toughen up.
We've got 5,000 saved, Tom.
Oh, that's brilliant, Kathleen.
Brilliant.
It's his college fund.
You'd rather be the picture-perfect pretty boy stocking shelves at the true value?
No education.
No prospects.
That's what she wants.
Is that what you want?
That's you in a nutshell.
Teach him to take the easy road, no goddamn priorities.
This isn't about me.
He's being taunted and humiliated, and he is suffering.
I love him too much to stand by and do nothing.
And I don't love my son?
Is that where you're taking this?
Did I do this right, dad?
I don't want you to think that I'm not supportive.
No.
You're right, Jule.
We're all incredibly lucky.
And I promise I'll schedule a sit-down at the office.
You can ask all the questions you want.
Take the morning for yourself.
You deserve it.
I'll take the kids out for pancakes.
Sit here with your brother, honey, while I put our namedown.
Ok?
You should try holding up a little fish and see if he'll grab it.
- What?
- Leave him alone, Morgan.
He looks like a crab, dad.
Here, baby, want a sardine?
Please don't make fun of my son's hands.
How would you like it if I teased you about your pig nose, huh?
Or those chubby cheeks?
How would you like that?
Man, take it easy, buddy.
He's just a kid.
He's making fun of a handicap.
Maybe if you got your nose out of that newspaper and paid him some attention, he wouldn't be such a little asshole.
Don't call my son an asshole.
Or your kids are going to see their old man get his ass kicked.
Daddy!
Your son's an asshole, but not half as big an asshole as his father.
Let's go, honey, come on.
Thanks for coming, Dr. Troy.
How is she?
I told you, she stopped eating.
You gotta do something.
I gave her an I.V. she pulled it out of her arm.
That bitch has a death wish.
I know they gonna claim elder abuse when she finally kicks it.
- Why would they do that?
- 2 priors, honey.
I got caught lifting a gucci handbag and slapped a cop when he tried to fondle my sexy booty.
Nobody's gonna blame you for negligence, Evetta.
You're probably the only reason she's still alive.
Just don't let her die, ok?
Slightly different circumstances from when you were last here, Dr. Troy, though it doesn't have to be.
How about sending me out of this world with a smile on my face?
Why aren't you eating, Mrs. Grubman?
I don't have time to eat.
It's too much work to do on this funeral.
And the seating chart alone is talking me 4 hours.
Blaine Trump is gonna need a shoulder to cry on.
Well, I'll just sit her right up front next to you.
You're giving up, Mrs. Grubman.
That isn't like you.
I told you,
I've had a wonderful life with only 2 regrets.
That I didn't sleep with you when I had the chance, and that I never got to sing at the rainbow room.
The rainbow room.
Don't you have to be able to sing for that?
Listen to my demo on your way home.
You'll see.
I was gonna be Burt Bacharach's girl before he picked Dionne Warwick.
And then I met my Marvin, and, aw, everything changed.
But you'll hear all the stories at the funeral.
If you don't start eating, I won't be there.
You have to.
You're slated to speak after Dominick Dunne.
I won't be a part of this.
If you want to starve yourself to death just to be a better looking corpse, find someone else to do your dirty work.
These last 2 years have been so lonely.
You know.
Oh, I know it's my own fault.
I pushed everyone away.
Evetta does a great job.
She really tries hard to cheer me up.
I like having her around.
She fights back.
Like you.
Oh, shit, my maybelline's running.
Hand me a tissue, would you?
Thank you.
I'm sorry I didn't come visit you more often.
Oh, please.
You should be out out there playing the field, Dr. Troy.
Finding yourself the first in a series of 24-year-old trophy wives.
Tell you what.
I'll make you a deal.
For a spoonful of soup today,
I'll give you a botox shot tomorrow.
Well, I am kind of hungry.
I love you, you know.
You know what?
Let him sue me.
It's worth it.
Sick asshole.
Just say it.
You think I should go back to anger management.
What?
What really concerns me, Sean, is what all this intensity is about.
You didn't hear him being mocked in front of a dozen strangers, in front of Annie.
All I knew in that moment, was that people like them would be tormenting my son for the rest of his life.
- I had to do something.
- You are doing something.
You're doing his surgery.
For now, just promise me you'll talk to this Mr. Thompson.
Apologize to him so that we don't have to deal with the headache of a lawsuit.
Will you do that?
I'm also going to call Dr. Mogaby and move up the surgery.
There's no reason to wait.
I'll be ready to go in weeks.
He's just so little.
The sooner I do this surgery, the sooner he can begin developing the coordination and function in his hands.
It's all he's going to have.
Who are you doing this for, Sean, you or Conor?
Holy cow!
This one looks like it's outta here!
He's rounding third.
It's a race for the plate.
It's a home run.
Whoo!
When can I sign up for little league, dad?
Gee, thanks, buddy.
I come out here and play ball with you, and that's what you got to say?
No.
I really like playing dates.
I just wanna play a real game.
You and your mother.
The kids will laugh at you.
And the coach will keep you on the bench and then stick you out in right field for the last inning.
Oh, and they'll shove you in the back for the team photo.
Is that what you want?
What are you doing here?
I called your house.
Your wife told me you'd be here.
You have a moment to talk, Mr. Thompson?
- I'm sorry I hit you.
- Ha ha.
I bet you are.
This is going to cost you, McNamara.
I got 20 witnesses that'll swear to what they saw.
I never should have erupted like I did.
I just-- my son is about to have an operation on his hands.
You humiliated me in front of my boy.
Looks like you two are working through it.
Yeah.
I had to explain to him that what I did was wrong, and what he did was wrong and what you did was really, really wrong.
And I think he gets it now.
What position does he play?
Shortstop.
I mean, he's a little slower than the other kids, but he did turn a double play last night.
It won them the game.
Every kid should have a moment like that.
Walk-off home run.
That's all I want for Conor.
He may never get that chance.
But all I want is for him to be normal.
Look, do what you gotta do with the lawsuit.
I just want to apologize for what I did and what I said.
These web fingers are known as syndactyly.
There're actually 2 fingers inside here.
We do a syndactyly release on the index and middle finger
and another one between the ring and the pinky.
What kind of complications could arise?
Oh, I'm so sorry I'm late.
There was this accident on the causeway.
Marlo's gonna be involved in Conor's care, so
I asked him to join us.
I'm sorry.
Don't mind me.
Please continue.
Um, let me get you a chair.
Well, the main complication that could arise is that the vessel of the nerve could be damaged in the process.
- Will you have to do a skin graft?
- The short answer is yes, Juli--
Is that a very invasive procedure, will there be a lot of pain?
He'll be under anesthesia.
I was talking about his recovery.
Um, we're pretty good with pain management.
Which brings us to the thumb distraction.
We plan to turn this small suggestion of a digit into a real thumb.
We make an incision in the thumb, dissect the bone, and apply distraction osteogenesis device.
It has little pins and screws that go into the bone.
We sew the thumb back up and over the next weeks, we slowly turn the screws, and they basically stretch the bone.
Who turns these screws over the next few weeks?
You do.
We find that the pain level is minimal to next to nothing when the parents are the ones that turn them.
How do you measure those pain levels if I may ask?
Oh, we doctors, we've got all kinds of tricks up our sleeves.
That was a reasonable question, Christian.
I'm only asking, because according to the research I've been reading, the traditional ways of measuring infant pain, tears, and brain activity, it's just not as conclusive as we wish it was.
Are you aware of the expertise, mastering, and professional status that's gathered in this room?
With all due respect, julia asked me to be here today to bring up some of these issues.
In other words, I'm doing my job.
I'm sorry if that knocks anyone's nose out of joint.
So, what is this research, Marlo?
Some well-respected developmental psychologists have done hypnosis on a pretty large group of adults who had surgery at an early age.
They all tend to have similar symptoms.
Nervous system disorders, digestive problems, debilitating phobia, and panic attacks.
Are you aware of this, Sean?
I scheduled this meeting so you could meet Dr. McGaubey and ask specific questions about the surgery.
I think the whole new age-healing modality type of conversation is better suited to the dinner table.
Well, in that case, I'm gonna go home and make dinner so that I can have that conversation.
Dr. Mcgaubey, Christian, feel free to join us.
Well, look at you two.
Burberry never looked so good on Kate Moss.
Oh, you like it?
I had Evetta pick it up for me at Neiman's.
And she's lucky I made her wear a bib at breakfast.
Otherwise, it'd been covered in strawberry crepe shit.
I also wore a huge hat so no one would recognize me, but you were right, Dr. Troy.
Not eating was a silly thing to do.
Oh, we had the most wonderful brunch this morning at restaurant San Michelle.
Eating out in public.
That's fantastic.
Baby, it was like opening the gates to hell.
Anything on the menu with cheese, beef, or cream in it,
- Fatty Beltbuckles had to have 2.
- Well, look who's talking.
I never saw anyone order lobster and a chocolate milkshake for breakfast before.
Well, I figured if the old goat's going to be spending my inheritance,
I'm gonna enjoy it.
Though maybe I should have stopped with the milkshake.
We can get you some liposuction, Evetta, if you're worried about your weight.
I was talking about my heartburn, dummy.
I don't need no hoover vacuum stealing my ass.
Where I come from, I don't get lipo to attract a man.
I eat another cherry pie and put more junk in my trunk.
Know what I'm saying?
I'm sorry.
I didn't mean to offend you.
Drum up your work with some pitiful, self-hating creature, Dr. Troy.
Not me, ok?
I love myself, every pound of it.
Go read a magazine in the lobby, Evetta.
I hear the new issue of Essence is here.
yeah, I'll go read my Essence.
I was tired of talking to the two of you, anyway.
And stop shutting me up.
Always trying to get sucked and tucked, that's what's wrong with your crazy ass now.
- I should go talk to her.
- No.
She'll be all right.
She's a spitfire, though, huh?
Oh, breakfast was fun.
And thank god no one recognized me.
Well, after a few shots of botox, the old Mrs. Grubman will reappear.
A shot of botox is the elixir of life, Dr. Troy.
It's getting out in public and seeing people again that makes you feel good, Mrs. Grubman.
Ahem.
Oh, Mrs. Grubman.
Julia.
Listen to this.
"I saw these masked giants hovering over me.
The cold, harsh light was in my eyes.
Someone came toward me with a black mask that had this smell, and it made me sick.
I woke up, I started to vomit.
Stranger shoved a huge teddy bear at me.
The eyes were terrifying."
This memory is from when he was 7 months old.
It's the book you gave me.
Julia, I'm sorry.
I should have thought more carefully about what I was doing.
But I'm so grateful to you.
You know, I knew these things instinctively,
I just hadn't articulated it.
A baby responds to surgery as if he's dying because he has no understanding of what's happening to him.
Julia, listen to me.
We have to convince Sean to postpone this surgery.
You know,at least until Conor is older, you know.
So we can prepare him for it.
I'm not gonna sign the surgery consent form.
Ok.
But before you make any decisions, let me tell you what I've decided.
- I'm leaving.
- You're...
You're what?
I don't know how it ended up like this, but it's clear that I've become a disruptive influence in this household.
And that's not good for anyone, especially not Conor.
Do you know the difference between a surgeon and god?
God doesn't think he's a surgeon.
Now, I need you to stay to help me through this.
You're my rock.
I can't go through this alone.
See, you underestimate how powerful you are, Julia.
And these books, they have concrete suggestions on how to help Conor through this.
It won't be the end of the world.
I can't.
I just...
The thought of waking up tomorrow and not seeing you.
You'll get through this.
You're a really good mother.
That's why I have to leave.
Thought I'd give you a hand today.
She's dead, Christian.
She's not going to catch anything.
It's her last time in saddle, Sean.
Might as well give her the full treatment.
Ok.
Linda told me you're doing the eulogy at her funeral.
Yeah.
But I'm struggling with what I'm gonna say.
All Miami is gonna be there.
She sent out engraved invitations.
All I can think of is here lies a woman who was so busy looking in the mirror and feeling like she wasn't good enough that...
She missed her life.
Had a singing career, did you know that?
I didn't know much about her besides her desperate, overbearing personality.
Ah, she wasn't such a bad egg.
But I'd certainly feel more comfortable if I could stand up there knowing my contribution to her life was a little more positive.
I feel like her drug dealer.
You can't think like that.
I seem to recall a diatribe by you only a few months ago, about how we were contributing to a society that was obsessed with physical perfection.
At the moment, I'm grateful for every single surgery that's given me the skill to make my son whole.
What if you couldn't fix Conor?
What if you couldn't make him as close to perfect as possible?
How would that make you feel?
Ave you been talking to my wife?
All I'm getting from the people around me lately is this touchy, feely, negative psycho-babble.
Whoa, killer.
It's not me you're mad at.
Maybe you should take the afternoon off.
Go home.
Make peace with your wife.
Besides, I could use the alone time with Grubman to work out my eulogy.
Would you mind changing the music, Linda?
Gangsta rap just doesn't seem like the right choice for Mrs. Grubman.
I brought something.
It's over there.
Ladies and gentlemen, Mrs. Grubman.
Thanks, Burt.
Don't forget your glove, Sean.
Go on.
It's after 4:00.
You're gonna miss it.
Why do they have to laugh at me?
They're fools if they laugh.
And who cares what fools think?
- Dad's gonna be mad.
- I'll handle dad, honey.
Go on.
What are you doing home so early?
- Are you all right?
- I'm fine.
- We need to talk.
- Yes, Sean, we do.
I'm not ready to sign the consent form.
I know.
I know I've been kind of a mad man lately.
I've been so obsessed with making things perfect for Conor's surgery.
And I see how counterproductive that's been and unfair to you.
There are things that, uh...
That I've never told you.
- About the surgery?
- No.
About me.
What's he doing here?
Am I too late?
No.
No, your timing is perfect.
Did you bring a signed consent form, one of these?
Great.
Ok, next.
All right, look right at the lens, stay on.
I'll give you a count.
Boom, kapow!
Right?
Home run look... one, 2.
All right, let's get the next one.
All right, you want to lower your arm a little bit?
Let me see some more face, how about it?
When did you have the surgery?
Who paid for it?
I was 8.
My mother used the college money.
We did it behind my dad's back.
Luckily for everyone,
I was a good student and qualified for financial aid, but he never forgave her.
He left a few months later.
That's why he left you guys.
It always seemed such a mystery to me.
I think he felt like he lost control of the family.
I guess we, uh, pushed him out.
My mom worked 2 jobs to support us.
I just, uh, don't understand why you didn't tell me.
Because I put that pathetic kid behind me.
Oh, no, you didn't.
That kid is why you're a plastic surgeon.
Why did you have to keep it a secret?
I couldn't let you see me as that pathetic, ugly kid.
I was afraid that's all you'd ever see.
In so many ways, that little kid...
That's who I fell in love with.
Only because you never saw him.
Where is everyone, Evetta?
I guess they had better things to do.
Didn't you send all the invitations for her?
Every single one.
Maybe her address book was out of date or something.
Her daughter Claire, she couldn't find the time to come to her mother's funeral?
Claire called the house, said that her mother died for her almost 2 years ago when she stopped seeing her after she had the stroke.
Said that when she chose vanity over family, it was too much for her to handle.
Did you hear what she put on her headstone?
"I came, I saw, I conquered."
Oh, grubby, we did have some fun times together.
Too bad you screwed me in your will.
Yeah.
All I got was a few old-lady muu-muus.
I guess she thought I meant it when I told her I liked them.
Either that, or her last joke's on me.
Which I guess it is anyway.
Ok.
Well, I gotta go find a new job.
I'll see you next week, Dr. Troy.
Next week.
What's next week?
Oh, I made an appointment at McNamara-Troy.
Since she left you everything,
I at least want to get some free lipo out of it.
She left me all her money?
You didn't hear?
It's in her will.
She put it all in the Hedda Grubman plastic surgery fund for people that need a little work, but don't want to pay for it.
I'm here to pay respects to Hedda Grubman.
Her life was like that of any other, filled with accomplishments that should be exalted and regrets that should be learned from.
Her wit and candor...
This is bullshit.
Truth is, Mrs. Grubman, you were a huge pain in the ass.
Pretty much everybody hated you.
It's no wonder they boycotted your funeral.
You're obsessed with your looks and plastic surgery.
And in the end, it cost you every relationship you ever had.
But I know somewhere inside,
you meant well.
And you were funny and honest, and you stuck up for yourself.
And I loved the fact that you never let me off the hook.
Life was more interesting with you in it.
And...
And I'm gonna miss you.
And I love you, too.
Goodbye, Mrs. Grubman.
Marker.
Scissors and pickups.
Marlo.
My god.
You have no idea how glad I am to see you.
Saw.
Screw driver.
OLDER TED;
Kids, something you might not know about your Uncle Marshall is that he's always been good at games,
I mean unbeatable,
Gin!
Yahtzee!
Poker!
You don't have to shout out "poker" when you win.
I know.
It's just fun to say.
OLDER TED;
We all finally agreed,
Marshall should be running our game nights, instead of playing in them,
Which he took to mean, "Invent your own game,"
It's called "Marshgammon."
It combines all the best features of all the best games,
Candyland, I Never, Pictionary.
- Backgammon, obviously.
- No.
Backgammon sucks.
I took the only good part of "backgammon," the "gammon,"
and I left the rest of it in the trash where it belongs.
I'm so excited Victoria's coming.
I'm gonna go get another round.
Okay.
I wanna lay down some ground rules for tonight, Barney.
I actually like Victoria a lot.
So, don't say anything...
Don't say anything.
And, guys, I haven't exactly told Victoria that I used to have a kind of thing for Robin,
- so if we could just avoid the...
- Well, well, well, how rich.
You make me promise to be on my best behavior around your girlfriend, yet you have been lying to her since day one.
Excuse me.
Hi, Leg Warehouse?
Yeah, my friend Ted needs something to stand on.
So, nothing for him to stand on?
Okay, thanks so much.
Ted, doesn't Victoria deserve to know that you once had the hots for Robin?
I have half a mind to tell the story of the re-return.
(WHISPERING) No, I swore you to secrecy on that.
I am smelling dirt.
What is the story of the re-return?
Nothing.
It's nothing.
And, speaking of digging up dirt, can I count on you two to behave around Victoria?
Us?
What would we do?
Look, you guys have always been like the parents that I still have, and, in fact, moved here to get away from.
However, could we skip the traditional interrogation of the new girlfriend tonight?
- Fine.
- Fine.
Thank you.
- I should go help Robin.
- Okay.
- Hey.
- Hey.
So, you gonna be okay hanging out with Victoria tonight?
Oh, sure.
She's great.
Oh, what?
Because of the whole thing where I said I liked Ted?
No.
Victoria is great.
She's fun, she's free-spirited.
She's great.
I said "She's great" too many times, didn't I?
You must really hate the bitch.
But if you roll an even number while adjacent to the Peppermint Forest, then you "Marshall Out," and all your chips go into the pot.
And remember, if you ever ask the question, "What,"
then you gotta drink.
Got it?
- No idea what you're talking about.
- No idea what you're talking about.
Okay, okay.
All right, no, no.
We'll just start.
You guys will pick it up.
Newbie goes first.
- MARSHALL:
Roll.
- Okay.
Three!
You got "Autobiography."
Now, that's where you have to answer a personal question about your dating life, truthfully, in order to move on.
- Marshall, come on.
- Hey.
She's the one who rolled a three.
Victoria.
"Have you ever cheated while in a relationship?"
Wow, good question.
- You don't have to answer that.
- It's okay.
Well, I was in a really crappy relationship in college, and I wound up kissing this guy at a party one night and I felt terrible about it, so I came clean and we broke up.
Victoria, that was an honest and mature answer.
You may advance to the Gumdrop Mountains.
So, Victoria, did you ever re-return to this guy?
- What?
- You said what.
You gotta drink.
Oh, Barney, by the way, I went to a party in that new building on 82nd, and the host said she knew you.
- What is her name?
Sharon?
Shannon?
- Shannon?
Shannon, Shannon.
No.
Don't remember any Shannon.
Really?
Well, 'cause she gave me a videotape to give you.
Where's the tape?
I'll get it.
Cool.
Okay.
You know, whenever.
Okay, Robin.
Your roll.
Five!
Another "Autobiography."
For the player to your left which...
Victoria!
Of course.
Victoria.
"How many boyfriends did you have before you started dating Ted?"
Wait, the card actually says Ted?
Okay.
Well, boyfriends, I guess I've only had two.
Prude-alert.
Well, that...
That's serious boyfriends.
I've dated other guys in between.
Oh, slut-alert!
Oh, great, there it is.
Thanks, Lily, you're a peach.
(BARNEY YELLING)
(SLAPPING)
Well, wow, look at that.
Robin landed on the Chocolate Swamp.
That's five chips for me.
Thank you.
Finally, somebody understands Marshgammon.
Barney, what was on that tape?
- Too bad you'll never find out.
- Damn it!
If only I'd given you a fake tape and hidden the real tape in my purse.
Oh, wait.
That's exactly what I did.
- What?
- Drink.
Yeah, you were acting so weird about it I gave you Ted's graduation tape instead.
- So, should we pop it in?
- Give it to me.
- Hey, hey!
- Ted!
- Play it.
Play it!
- Fine, fine.
I cannot believe...
Shannon!
I love you,
I love you so much,
What about us changing the world together?
Don't tell me you've forgotten, I know I haven't,
(SINGING)
- Did you try his cell phone?
- Yeah, I left two messages.
I checked the cigar club, the Lusty Leopard.
He's off the grid.
Hey, guys.
What up?
- Barney, where have you been?
- Yeah, we're really sorry about that.
Yeah, so sorry.
But seriously, what was up with the tape?
- No.
Stay.
- Come on.
Come on.
- Stay.
Come on.
- I'm sorry.
I don't wanna talk about it.
It was the most embarrassing and humiliating thing that ever happened to me.
Well, we all have embarrassing stories.
Sometimes it's good to talk about it.
Oh, really?
Then why don't you tell us your most humiliating moment, Marshall?
Show me how good it is.
All right.
MARSHALL;
I was stopping by Lily's kindergarten class to say hi, but they were all at recess,
I really had to pee, so I went into the class's restroom,
It was a smaller target than I'm used to, so I figured I should sit down,
What I didn't realize was it was a shared bathroom,
(BOTH SCREAMING)
I wish I'd pulled up my pants,
(CHILDREN LAUGHING MOCKINGLY)
The kids still call him Funny Butt.
Okay.
I'll tell you my story.
Believe it or not, I was not always as awesome as I am today.
BARNEY;
It was 1998, I was just out of college, and I was working at a coffeehouse with my girlfriend,
My girlfriend, Shannon,
Thank you,
All right.
- I love your singing, Barney.
- And I love you, Shannon.
(GIGGLING)
Joining the Peace Corps with you is gonna be legendary.
I know.
Only five short weeks, till we're down in Nicaragua.
Hey, nonfat latte to go.
Mellow order, bro, mellow order.
Dude.
That's your G-friend?
All right, high-five.
Sorry, I only give high-twos.
Whatevs.
As long as you're nailing that.
Listen to you. "That"?
You know, women aren't objects.
They're human beings.
And FYI, Shannon and I have decided to wait till we're married.
You can read about it in my zine.
Hey, Haircut, right here.
Open up your knowledge basket 'cause here it comes.
Forget all that touchy-feely crap.
You get money, you get laid.
End of discussion.
I feel sorry for you, man.
Peace out, hombre,
(SCOFFS)
Suits.
BARNEY;
Five weeks later, we were all set to leave for the Peace Corps,
Only problem was she never showed up,
- She never showed?
- So what happened next?
You know what?
This was a mistake.
Wait, what if somebody else told their most humiliating story?
Oh, I know just how to decide who.
You brought the game to the bar?
We're not quitting just 'cause Ted's so far ahead.
I was winning?
(EX CLAIMS)
(CLEARS THROAT)
Fine.
I'll go next.
ROBIN;
I was doing a report on live TV about a hansom cab driver,
- The slipping-in-horse-poop story?
- Yeah, we all know that one.
VICTORIA:
Okay, how about this?
I will tell you my most humiliating story.
Yeah, Victoria.
Way to step up.
It involves a game of Truth or Dare, a squeeze bottle of marshmallow ice cream topping, and the hot tub at my grandparents' retirement community.
OLDER TED;
Kids, I tell you a lot of inappropriate stories, but there's no way in hell I'm telling you this one,
Don't worry, though, it wasn't that great,
That is the greatest story ever!
- Oh, my God!
- Wow, wow, wow!
Victoria, I deem your offering worthy.
My saga continues.
BARNEY;
I went back to the coffeehouse to find Shannon,
- Barney!
- Sugar bear, where were you?
I'm sorry.
My dad won't let me go.
But the Nicaraguans need us.
It's just he's still supporting me.
And, look, he's coming by soon to talk about it, but I think you should go on without me.
- Shannon, there is no...
- Barney.
It's your dream.
It's only two years.
I know we can make it.
As I walked away, I realized Shannon was an adult,
Her father couldn't control her life,
I had to go back and confront him,
She was in the middle of a heated argument with her dad,
(BAG THUDDING)
ALL:
What?
(BUZZING)
Now we all gotta drink.
Oh, my God.
What happened next?
- Oh, I don't know, guys.
- Okay, okay.
- Marshall's mom sent us cookies.
- Lily, no!
No, Lily!
For the team, Marshall, for the team.
Hey, Mrs. Eriksen, it's Lily.
Thank you so much for the delicious cookies.
Mayonnaise.
Really?
Never would have guessed.
Yes, well I will definitely give Marshall a kiss for you.
Okay, take care.
- Hi, baby.
- Oh, crap!
My mom sent cookies?
Yeah.
I wish we had a dog, so they wouldn't go to waste.
Yeah.
So, we've got the whole place to ourselves.
- I'm thinking floor sex.
- Sounds reasonable.
LILY:
Oh, floor's cold.
Grab that afghan your mom made.
The whole time?
The whole time.
Barney, that was really embarrassing for both of us.
We just earned a huge chunk of story.
Right.
So where was I?
Oh, yeah.
Shannon was sucking face with her dad.
How could...
With your dad?
I mean, I know, judge not lest ye be judged, but gross!
Barney, that's not my dad.
His name's Greg.
I've been seeing him for a few weeks.
I was hoping you'd just leave and we could avoid all this.
We're breaking up?
But what about the Peace Corps?
Yeah, all this granola business, it was just a phase.
Greg's older.
He's successful.
He buys me all this cool stuff.
- But I love you.
- But he has a boat.
You should go to the Peace Corps.
And forget about me.
BARNEY;
I didn't go,
That night, I recorded my video and mailed it to Shannon,
I didn't see her until a week later,
There's sugar in the basket.
Shannon!
Shannon, you came back!
I'm just picking up my last paycheck.
Did you...
Did you get my tape?
Oh, she got the tape.
You?
You...
It was you?
(SINGING MOCKINGLY)
(LAUGHING)
(LAUGHING)
Oh, man!
(SHANNON AND GREG LAUGHING)
(CRYING)
(OMINOUS MUSIC PLAYING)
Oh, you poor thing.
The story's not over.
I did see Shannon one more time.
- When?
- Sorry.
Sorry.
Oh, you've gotta tell us.
I don't know.
I think I might need one last story to get me through it.
Fine.
Oh, the Green Testicles story.
So, I was playing Ultimate Frisbee in college, and there was this barefoot dude with a weirdly sharp toenail...
Oh, come on, Ted!
You know what story I wanna hear.
Everyone else here has manned-up tonight and told the truth.
Why can't you?
You're right.
Victoria, I'm sorry I haven't told you this yet, but a while back,
I was kind of into Robin.
In fact, on our first date, I might've said, "I love you."
Understandably, she freaked out, and I left, but unfortunately, the night did not end there.
TED;
We all ended up at the bar with our cabdriver, Ranjit,
To one hell of a night!
(ALL LAUGHING)
TED;
And I drank,
A lot,
(MUSIC PLA YING ON STEREO)
So, you guys think I should have kissed her?
Well, I'll tell you what.
I'm gonna go kiss her.
Right now.
Yes!
Do it!
To the car.
(LAUGHING)
(VOMITING)
ROBIN:
Hello?
Is someone out there?
(GASPING)
You ralphed and ran?
I thought you were vomit-free since '93.
So, that was a lie?
You re-returned for me.
That's really sweet.
Though you kind of ruined my customized Scherbatsky doormat.
- Sorry.
- It's okay.
- Victoria, I know this must be...
- Yeah.
It kind of is.
Wow, Ted, you were right.
You shouldn't have told that story.
But you did earn yourself the right to the end of mine.
We fast-forward eight years into the future.
Wait, eight years.
That's this year.
Marshall, not only is it this year, it's tonight.
Hi.
- Barney?
- Hi, Shannon.
- What are you doing here?
- Just listen.
When you left me for that guy Greg, it changed me.
Now, I'm this.
I know this is crazy, it's just, you were once such a big part of my life, and it just seemed insane that you didn't know who I am now.
So, here I am.
BARNEY;
And then she told me about her life,
She and Greg dated for a while, and then split up.
But here's the real kicker.
Shannon's a mom.
She has a little kid named Max.
That's crazy.
That could've been my kid.
But instead, what do I have?
My whole life's some money in the bank, some suits in my closet, and a string of one-night stands.
Hey, come on.
I mean, just because her life went one way, and yours went another, doesn't make your life any worse.
My life rocks!
Money, suits and sex.
These are tears of joy.
I could be cooped up in some tiny apartment, changing some brat's poopy diapers, but instead, I'm out in the world being awesome 24/7, 365.
You let me dodge a bullet, Big Guy.
Plus, here's the mini-cherry, on top of the regular cherry, on top of the sundae of awesomeness that is my life.
After Shannon and I talked, I nailed her.
- No.
- Yeah.
- No.
- Yeah.
Sorry, don't buy it.
You're making it up.
You're just trying to cover the fact that you actually had a profound moment of doubt about yourself and... (SHANNON MOANING)
- Oh, my God.
- SHANNON;
Oh, Barney, oh,
Video's pretty good on this phone, huh?
SHANNON;
Is your phone on?
BARNEY;
Oh, no, it just takes a while to power down,
Oh, gross.
Just stop it.
(CHUCKLING)
Ladies, gentlemen, Ted.
This has been a wonderful evening.
I got great dirt on all you guys.
I got Ted to tell the re-return.
I finally nailed Shannon!
Told her I'd call her tomorrow.
Yeah, right.
And I rediscovered just how awesomely awesome my life is.
Peace out, hombres,
I think Barney just won game night.
OLDER TED;
We spend so much effort trying to keep parts of our lives hidden, even from our closest friends that those rare times when we do open up, it's amazing how minor those secrets all end up seeming,
$100 says when you turn around...
Of course, not every secret was told that night,
But that's getting ahead of the story,
Kids, something you might not know about your Uncle Marshall is that he's always been good at games.
I mean, unbeatable.
Gin!
Yahtzee!
Poker!
You don't have to shout out "poker" when you win.
I know.
It's just fun to say.
We all finally agreed Marshall should be running our game nights instead of playing in them.
Which he took to mean, "invent your own game."
It's called "Marsh-gammon."
It combines all the best features of all the best games--
Candy Land, I Never, Pictionary.
Backgammon, obviously.
No.
Backgammon sucks.
I took the only good part of backgammon, the "gammon,"
and I left the rest of it in the trash where it belongs.
I'm so excited Victoria's coming.
I'm going to go get another round.
Okay, I want to lay down some ground rules for tonight.
Barney, I actually like Victoria... a lot, so don't say anything embarrass...
Don't say anything.
And guys, I haven't exactly told Victoria that I used to have a kind of thing for Robin,
- so we you could just avoid the...
- Well, well, well.
How rich.
You make me promise to be on my best behavior around your girlfriend, yet, you have been lying to her since day one.
Excuse me.
Hi.
Leg Warehouse?
Yeah, my friend Ted needs something to stand on.
So, nothing for him to stand on?
Okay, and thanks so much.
Ted, doesn't Victoria deserve to know that you once had the hots for Robin?
I have half a mind to tell the story of the re-return.
No.
I-I swore you to secrecy on that.
Ooh, I am smelling dirt.
What is the story of the re-return?
Nothing.
It's nothing.
And speaking of digging up dirt, can I count on you two to behave around Victoria?
Us?
What would we do?
Look, um, you guys have always been like the parents that I still have and, in fact, moved here to get away from.
However, could we skip the traditional interrogation of the new girlfriend tonight?
- Fine.
- Fine.
Thank you.
I should go help Robin.
- Hey.
- Hey.
So, are you going to be okay hanging out with Victoria tonight?
Oh, sure.
She's great.
Oh, what?
Because of the whole thing where I said I liked Ted?
No.
Victoria's great.
She's fun, she's free-spirited, she's great.
I said, "She's great" too many times, didn't I?
You must really hate the bitch.
But if you roll an even number while adjacent to the Peppermint Forest, then you "Marshall out," and all your chips go into the pot, and remember, if you ever ask the question "What?", then... you got to drink.
Got it?
Okay, okay, no, no, we'll just start, you guys'll pick it up.
Newbie goes first.
Roll.
Okay.
Three!
You got Autobiography.
Now, that's where you have to answer a personal question about your dating life truthfully in order to move on.
Marshall, come on.
Hey, she's the one who rolled a three.
Victoria, "Have you ever cheated while in a relationship?"
Wow, good question.
- You don't have to answer that.
- It's okay.
Um, well, I was in a really crappy relationship in college, and I wound up kissing this guy at a party one night, and I felt terrible about it, so, I came clean, and we broke up.
Victoria, that was an honest and mature answer.
You may advance to The Gumdrop Mountains.
So Victoria, did you ever re-return to this guy?
What?
You said what, you got to drink!
Oh, Barney, by the way, I went to a party in that new building on 82nd, and the host said she knew you.
What is her name?
Sharon?
Shannon?
Shannon?
!
Shannon, Shannon...
No, don't remember any Shannon.
Really?
Well, 'cause she gave me a videotape to give...
Where's the tape?
Fine.
I'll go get it.
Cool, okay.
You know, whenever.
Okay, Robin, your roll.
Five!
Another Autobiography... for the player to your left, which...
Victoria!
Of course.
Victoria, "How many boyfriends did you have before you started dating Ted?"
Wait, the card actually says "Ted?"
Okay, uh, well, boyfriends--I guess I've only had... two.
Prude alert.
Well... that's serious boyfriends.
I've dated other guys in between.
Oh, slut alert!
Oh, great, there it is.
Thanks, Lily.
You're a peach.
Oh, wow, look at that.
Robin landed on the Chocolate Swamp.
That's five chips for me.
Thank you!
Finally somebody understands Marsh-gammon.
Barney, what was on that tape?
Too bad you'll never find out.
Oh, damn it!
If only I'd given you a fake tape and hidden the real tape in my purse.
Oh, wait.
That's exactly what I did.
What?
!
Drink!
Yeah, you were acting so weird about it, I gave you Ted's graduation tape instead.
So, should we pop it in?
- Give it to me, give it, give me...
- Play the tape, play it, play it!
- Ted!
- Fine, fine.
You cannot play it.
Shannon!
I love you!
I love you so much.
What about us changing the world together?
Don't tell me you've forgotten.
I know I haven't.
Will I ever see another rainbow?
Will an eagle ever soar through this tempest of woe?
Baby, please
Don't go
There's a thief in the palace, she's stolen all my love
There's a thief in the palace and she's...
Did you try his cell phone?
Yeah, I left two messages.
I checked the cigar club, the Lusty Leopard.
He's off the grid.
Hey, guys, what up?
Barney, where have you been?
Yeah, we're-we're really sorry about that.
Yeah, so sorry.
But seriously, what was up with the tape?
- No, no, stay.
- Come on, Barney.
- Come on.
- Stay!
I'm sorry.
I don't want to talk about it.
It was the most embarrassing, and humiliating thing that ever happened to me.
Well, we all have embarrassing stories.
Sometimes it's good to-to talk about it.
Oh, really?
Then why don't you tell us your most humiliating moment, Marshall?
Show me how good it is.
All right.
I was stopping by Lily's kindergarten class to say hi, but they were all at recess.
I really had to pee, so I went into the class's restroom.
It was a-a smaller target than I'm used to, so I figured I should sit down.
What I didn't realize was, it was a shared bathroom.
I wish I'd pulled up my pants.
The kids still call him Funny Butt.
Okay.
I'll tell you my story.
Believe it or not, I was not always as awesome as I am today.
It was 1998.
I was just out of college, and I was working at a coffeehouse with my girlfriend.
My girlfriend...
Shannon.
Yeah, you were meant for me
And I was meant for you
Ooh, ooh, ooh-ooh-ooh.
Thank you.
All right.
I love your singing, Barney.
And I love you, Shannon.
Joining the Peace Corps with you is gonna be legendary.
I know.
Only five short weeks till we're down in Nicaragua.
Hey, nonfat latte to go.
Mellow order, bro, mellow order.
Dude, that your g-friend?
All right, high five!
Sorry, I only give high twos.
Whatevs.
As long as you're nailing that.
Listen to you.
That?
You know, women aren't objects.
They're human beings.
And FYI, Shannon and I have decided to wait till we're married.
You can read about it in my zine.
Hey, haircut, right here.
Open up your knowledge basket, 'cause here it comes.
Forget that touchy-feely crap.
You get money, you get laid.
End of discussion.
I feel sorry for you, man.
Peace out, hombre.
Suits.
Five weeks later, we were all set to leave for the Peace Corps.
Only problem was... she never showed up.
She never showed?
So, what happened next?
You know what?
This was a mistake.
Wait...
What if somebody else told their most humiliating story?
Oh, I know just how to decide who.
You brought the game to the bar?
Well, we're not quitting just 'cause Ted's so far ahead.
I was winning?
Fine.
I'll go next.
I was doing a report on live TV about a hansom cab driver.
Not the slipping-in-horse-poop story!
Yeah, we all know that one.
Okay, how about this?
I will tell you my most humiliating story.
Yeah, Victoria, way to step up!
Okay, it involves a game of truth or dare, a squeeze-bottle of marshmallow ice cream topping, and the hot tub at my grandparents' retirement community.
Kids, I tell you a lot of inappropriate stories, but there's no way in hell I'm telling you this one.
Don't worry, though, it wasn't that great.
That is the greatest story ever!
- Oh my God!
- Wow, wow!
Victoria, I deem your offering... worthy.
My saga... continues.
I went back to the coffeehouse to find Shannon.
Barney.
Sugar Bear, where were you?
Oh, I'm sorry.
My dad won't let me go.
But the Nicaraguans need us!
It's just, he's still supporting me, and...
Look, he's coming by soon to talk about it, but
I think you should go on without me.
Shannon, there is no...
Barney, it's your dream.
It's only two years.
I know we can make it.
As I walked away, I realized Shannon was an adult.
Her father couldn't control her life.
I had to go back and confront him.
She was in the middle of a heated argument with her dad.
What?
!
Now we all got to drink.
Oh, my God.
What happened next?
I don't know, guys.
Okay, okay.
- Marshall's mom sent us cookies...
- Lily, no!
For the team, Marshall, for the team.
Hey, Mrs. Eriksen, it's Lily.
Thank you so much for the delicious cookies.
Mayonnaise.
Really?
Never would have guessed.
Well, I will definitely give Marshall a kiss for you.
Okay.
Take care.
Oh, crap.
My mom sent cookies?
Yeah.
I wish we had a dog, so they wouldn't go to waste.
So we've got the whole place to ourselves.
I'm thinking floor sex.
Sounds reasonable.
Ooh, floor's cold.
Grab that afghan your mom made.
The whole time?
The... whole... time.
Barney, that was really embarrassing for both of us.
We just earned a huge chunk of story.
Right.
So where was I?
Oh, yeah.
Shannon was sucking face with her dad.
How can...
With your dad?
I mean, I know judge not lest ye be judged, but gross!
Barney, that's not my dad.
His name's Greg.
I've been seeing him for a few weeks.
I was hoping you'd just leave, and we could avoid all this.
We're breaking up?
But what about the Peace Corps?
Yeah, all this granola business, it was just a phase.
Greg's older.
He's successful.
He buys me all this cool stuff.
But I love you.
But he has a boat.
You should go to the Peace Corps and forget about me.
I didn't go.
That night, I recorded my video and mailed it to Shannon.
I didn't see her until a week later.
There's sugar in the basket.
Shannon!
Shannon, you came back!
I'm just picking up my last paycheck.
Oh.
Did you... did you get my tape?
Oh, she got the tape.
You?
It was you?
Will I ever see another rainbow
Oh, man.
Oh, you poor thing.
The story's not over.
I did see Shannon one more time.
When?
Sorry.
Sorry.
You've got to tell us.
I don't know, I think I might need one last story to get me through it.
Fine.
Um... oh!
The green testicle story.
So I was playing ultimate frisbee in college and there was this barefoot dude with weirdly sharp toenails...
Oh, come on, Ted!
You know what story I want to hear.
Everyone else here has manned up tonight and told the truth.
Why can't you?
You're right.
Victoria, I'm sorry I haven't told you this yet, but a while back, I was kind of into Robin.
In fact, on our first date, I might have said, "I love you."
Understandably, she freaked out and I left.
But unfortunately, the night did not end there.
We all ended up at the bar with our cab driver Ranjit.
To one hell of a night!
And I drank... a lot.
So you guys think I should have kissed her?
Well, I'll tell you what, I'm gonna go kiss her right... now.
Yes!
Do it!
To the cab.
Hello?
Is someone out there?
You ralphed and ran?
I thought you were vomit-free since '93.
So that was a lie?
You re-returned for me.
That's really sweet.
Though you kind of ruined my customized Scherbotsky doormat.
Sorry.
It's okay.
Victoria, I know this must be...
Yeah.
It kind of is.
Wow, Ted, you were right.
You shouldn't have told that story.
But you did earn yourself the right to the end of mine.
We fast-forward eight years into the future.
Wait, eight years, that's, that's this year.
Marshall, not only is it this year, it's tonight.
Hi.
Barney?
Hi, Shannon.
- What are you doing here?
- Just listen.
When you left me for that guy Greg, it changed me.
Now I'm this.
I-I know this is crazy.
It's just, you were once such a big part of my life.
And it just seemed insane that you didn't know who I am now.
So here I am.
And then she told me about her life.
She and Greg dated for a while and then split up.
But here's the real kicker:
Shannon's a mom.
She has a little kid named Max.
That's crazy.
That could have been my kid.
But instead, what do I have?
My whole life's some money in the bank, some suits in my closet and a string of one-night stands.
Hey.
Come on.
I mean, just because her life went one way and yours went another, it doesn't make your life any worse.
My life rocks!
Money, suits and sex.
These are tears of joy!
I could be cooped up in some tiny apartment changing some brat's poopy diapers.
But instead, I'm out in the world being awesome 24-7, 365!
You let me dodge a bullet, Big Guy.
Plus, here's the mini-cherry on top of the regular cherry on top of the sundae of awesomeness that is my life.
After Shannon and I talked, I nailed her.
- Nope.
- Yeah.
- Nope.
- Yeah.
Sorry.
Don't buy it.
You're making it up.
You're just trying to cover the fact that you actually had a profound moment of doubt about yourself and...
- Oh, my God.
- Oh, Barney!
Video's pretty good on this phone, huh?
Is your phone on?
Oh, no.
It just takes a while to power down.
Ew, gross.
Just stop it.
Ladies, gentlemen...
Ted.
This has been a wonderful evening.
I got great dirt on all you guys.
I got Ted to tell the re-return.
I finally nailed Shannon!
Told her I'd call her tomorrow.
Yeah, right.
And I rediscovered just how awesomely awesome my life is.
Peace out, hombres!
I think Barney just won game night.
We spend so much effort trying to keep parts of our lives hidden, even from our closest friends.
But those rare times when we do open up, it's amazing how minor those secrets all end up seeming.
Of course, not every secret was told that night.
But that's getting ahead of the story.
Kids, something you might not know about your Uncle Marshall is that he's always been good at games.
I mean, unbeatable.
Gin!
Yahtzee!
Poker!
You don't have to shout out "poker" when you win.
I know.
It's just fun to say.
We all finally agreed Marshall should be running our game nights instead of playing in them.
Which he took to mean, "invent your own game."
It's called "Marsh-gammon."
It combines all the best features of all the best games--
Candy Land, I Never, Pictionary.
Backgammon, obviously.
No.
Backgammon sucks.
I took the only good part of backgammon, the "gammon,"
and I left the rest of it in the trash where it belongs.
I'm so excited Victoria's coming.
I'm going to go get another round.
Okay, I want to lay down some ground rules for tonight.
Barney, I actually like Victoria... a lot, so don't say anything embarrass...
Don't say anything.
And guys, I haven't exactly told Victoria that I used to have a kind of thing for Robin,
- so we you could just avoid the...
- Well, well, well.
How rich.
You make me promise to be on my best behavior around your girlfriend, yet, you have been lying to her since day one.
Excuse me.
Hi.
Leg Warehouse?
Yeah, my friend Ted needs something to stand on.
So, nothing for him to stand on?
Okay, and thanks so much.
Ted, doesn't Victoria deserve to know that you once had the hots for Robin?
I have half a mind to tell the story of the re-return.
No.
I-I swore you to secrecy on that.
Ooh, I am smelling dirt.
What is the story of the re-return?
Nothing.
It's nothing.
And speaking of digging up dirt, can I count on you two to behave around Victoria?
Us?
What would we do?
Look, um, you guys have always been like the parents that I still have and, in fact, moved here to get away from.
However, could we skip the traditional interrogation of the new girlfriend tonight?
- Fine.
- Fine.
Thank you.
I should go help Robin.
- Hey.
- Hey.
So, are you going to be okay hanging out with Victoria tonight?
Oh, sure.
She's great.
Oh, what?
Because of the whole thing where I said I liked Ted?
No.
Victoria's great.
She's fun, she's free-spirited, she's great.
I said, "She's great" too many times, didn't I?
You must really hate the bitch.
But if you roll an even number while adjacent to the Peppermint Forest, then you "Marshall out," and all your chips go into the pot, and remember, if you ever ask the question "What?", then... you got to drink.
Got it?
Okay, okay, no, no, we'll just start, you guys'll pick it up.
Newbie goes first.
Roll.
Okay.
Three!
You got Autobiography.
Now, that's where you have to answer a personal question about your dating life truthfully in order to move on.
Marshall, come on.
Hey, she's the one who rolled a three.
Victoria, "Have you ever cheated while in a relationship?"
Wow, good question.
- You don't have to answer that.
- It's okay.
Um, well, I was in a really crappy relationship in college, and I wound up kissing this guy at a party one night, and I felt terrible about it, so, I came clean, and we broke up.
Victoria, that was an honest and mature answer.
You may advance to The Gumdrop Mountains.
So Victoria, did you ever re-return to this guy?
What?
You said what, you got to drink!
Oh, Barney, by the way, I went to a party in that new building on 82nd, and the host said she knew you.
What is her name?
Sharon?
Shannon?
Shannon?
!
Shannon, Shannon...
No, don't remember any Shannon.
Really?
Well, 'cause she gave me a videotape to give...
Where's the tape?
Fine.
I'll go get it.
Cool, okay.
You know, whenever.
Okay, Robin, your roll.
Five!
Another Autobiography... for the player to your left, which...
Victoria!
Of course.
Victoria, "How many boyfriends did you have before you started dating Ted?"
Wait, the card actually says "Ted?"
Okay, uh, well, boyfriends--I guess I've only had... two.
Prude alert.
Well... that's serious boyfriends.
I've dated other guys in between.
Oh, slut alert!
Oh, great, there it is.
Thanks, Lily.
You're a peach.
Oh, wow, look at that.
Robin landed on the Chocolate Swamp.
That's five chips for me.
Thank you!
Finally somebody understands Marsh-gammon.
Barney, what was on that tape?
Too bad you'll never find out.
Oh, damn it!
If only I'd given you a fake tape and hidden the real tape in my purse.
Oh, wait.
That's exactly what I did.
What?
!
Drink!
Yeah, you were acting so weird about it, I gave you Ted's graduation tape instead.
So, should we pop it in?
- Give it to me, give it, give me...
- Play the tape, play it, play it!
- Ted!
- Fine, fine.
You cannot play it.
Shannon!
I love you!
I love you so much.
What about us changing the world together?
Don't tell me you've forgotten.
I know I haven't.
Will I ever see another rainbow?
Will an eagle ever soar through this tempest of woe?
Baby, please
Don't go
There's a thief in the palace, she's stolen all my love
There's a thief in the palace and she's...
Did you try his cell phone?
Yeah, I left two messages.
I checked the cigar club, the Lusty Leopard.
He's off the grid.
Hey, guys, what up?
Barney, where have you been?
Yeah, we're-we're really sorry about that.
Yeah, so sorry.
But seriously, what was up with the tape?
- No, no, stay.
- Come on, Barney.
- Come on.
- Stay!
I'm sorry.
I don't want to talk about it.
It was the most embarrassing, and humiliating thing that ever happened to me.
Well, we all have embarrassing stories.
Sometimes it's good to-to talk about it.
Oh, really?
Then why don't you tell us your most humiliating moment, Marshall?
Show me how good it is.
All right.
I was stopping by Lily's kindergarten class to say hi, but they were all at recess.
I really had to pee, so I went into the class's restroom.
It was a-a smaller target than I'm used to, so I figured I should sit down.
What I didn't realize was, it was a shared bathroom.
I wish I'd pulled up my pants.
The kids still call him Funny Butt.
Okay.
I'll tell you my story.
Believe it or not, I was not always as awesome as I am today.
It was 1998.
I was just out of college, and I was working at a coffeehouse with my girlfriend.
My girlfriend...
Shannon.
Yeah, you were meant for me
And I was meant for you
Ooh, ooh, ooh-ooh-ooh.
Thank you.
All right.
I love your singing, Barney.
And I love you, Shannon.
Joining the Peace Corps with you is gonna be legendary.
I know.
Only five short weeks till we're down in Nicaragua.
Hey, nonfat latte to go.
Mellow order, bro, mellow order.
Dude, that your g-friend?
All right, high five!
Sorry, I only give high twos.
Whatevs.
As long as you're nailing that.
Listen to you.
That?
You know, women aren't objects.
They're human beings.
And FYI, Shannon and I have decided to wait till we're married.
You can read about it in my zine.
Hey, haircut, right here.
Open up your knowledge basket, 'cause here it comes.
Forget that touchy-feely crap.
You get money, you get laid.
End of discussion.
I feel sorry for you, man.
Peace out, hombre.
Suits.
Five weeks later, we were all set to leave for the Peace Corps.
Only problem was... she never showed up.
She never showed?
So, what happened next?
You know what?
This was a mistake.
Wait...
What if somebody else told their most humiliating story?
Oh, I know just how to decide who.
You brought the game to the bar?
Well, we're not quitting just 'cause Ted's so far ahead.
I was winning?
Fine.
I'll go next.
I was doing a report on live TV about a hansom cab driver.
Not the slipping-in-horse-poop story!
Yeah, we all know that one.
Okay, how about this?
I will tell you my most humiliating story.
Yeah, Victoria, way to step up!
Okay, it involves a game of truth or dare, a squeeze-bottle of marshmallow ice cream topping, and the hot tub at my grandparents' retirement community.
Kids, I tell you a lot of inappropriate stories, but there's no way in hell I'm telling you this one.
Don't worry, though, it wasn't that great.
That is the greatest story ever!
- Oh my God!
- Wow, wow!
Victoria, I deem your offering... worthy.
My saga... continues.
I went back to the coffeehouse to find Shannon.
Barney.
Sugar Bear, where were you?
Oh, I'm sorry.
My dad won't let me go.
But the Nicaraguans need us!
It's just, he's still supporting me, and...
Look, he's coming by soon to talk about it, but
I think you should go on without me.
Shannon, there is no...
Barney, it's your dream.
It's only two years.
I know we can make it.
As I walked away, I realized Shannon was an adult.
Her father couldn't control her life.
I had to go back and confront him.
She was in the middle of a heated argument with her dad.
What?
!
Now we all got to drink.
Oh, my God.
What happened next?
I don't know, guys.
Okay, okay.
- Marshall's mom sent us cookies...
- Lily, no!
For the team, Marshall, for the team.
Hey, Mrs. Eriksen, it's Lily.
Thank you so much for the delicious cookies.
Mayonnaise.
Really?
Never would have guessed.
Well, I will definitely give Marshall a kiss for you.
Okay.
Take care.
Oh, crap.
My mom sent cookies?
Yeah.
I wish we had a dog, so they wouldn't go to waste.
So we've got the whole place to ourselves.
I'm thinking floor sex.
Sounds reasonable.
Ooh, floor's cold.
Grab that afghan your mom made.
The whole time?
The... whole... time.
Barney, that was really embarrassing for both of us.
We just earned a huge chunk of story.
Right.
So where was I?
Oh, yeah.
Shannon was sucking face with her dad.
How can...
With your dad?
I mean, I know judge not lest ye be judged, but gross!
Barney, that's not my dad.
His name's Greg.
I've been seeing him for a few weeks.
I was hoping you'd just leave, and we could avoid all this.
We're breaking up?
But what about the Peace Corps?
Yeah, all this granola business, it was just a phase.
Greg's older.
He's successful.
He buys me all this cool stuff.
But I love you.
But he has a boat.
You should go to the Peace Corps and forget about me.
I didn't go.
That night, I recorded my video and mailed it to Shannon.
I didn't see her until a week later.
There's sugar in the basket.
Shannon!
Shannon, you came back!
I'm just picking up my last paycheck.
Oh.
Did you... did you get my tape?
Oh, she got the tape.
You?
It was you?
Will I ever see another rainbow
Oh, man.
Oh, you poor thing.
The story's not over.
I did see Shannon one more time.
When?
Sorry.
Sorry.
You've got to tell us.
I don't know, I think I might need one last story to get me through it.
Fine.
Um... oh!
The green testicle story.
So I was playing ultimate frisbee in college and there was this barefoot dude with weirdly sharp toenails...
Oh, come on, Ted!
You know what story I want to hear.
Everyone else here has manned up tonight and told the truth.
Why can't you?
You're right.
Victoria, I'm sorry I haven't told you this yet, but a while back, I was kind of into Robin.
In fact, on our first date, I might have said, "I love you."
Understandably, she freaked out and I left.
But unfortunately, the night did not end there.
We all ended up at the bar with our cab driver Ranjit.
To one hell of a night!
And I drank... a lot.
So you guys think I should have kissed her?
Well, I'll tell you what, I'm gonna go kiss her right... now.
Yes!
Do it!
To the cab.
Hello?
Is someone out there?
You ralphed and ran?
I thought you were vomit-free since '93.
So that was a lie?
You re-returned for me.
That's really sweet.
Though you kind of ruined my customized Scherbotsky doormat.
Sorry.
It's okay.
Victoria, I know this must be...
Yeah.
It kind of is.
Wow, Ted, you were right.
You shouldn't have told that story.
But you did earn yourself the right to the end of mine.
We fast-forward eight years into the future.
Wait, eight years, that's, that's this year.
Marshall, not only is it this year, it's tonight.
Hi.
Barney?
Hi, Shannon.
- What are you doing here?
- Just listen.
When you left me for that guy Greg, it changed me.
Now I'm this.
I-I know this is crazy.
It's just, you were once such a big part of my life.
And it just seemed insane that you didn't know who I am now.
So here I am.
And then she told me about her life.
She and Greg dated for a while and then split up.
But here's the real kicker:
Shannon's a mom.
She has a little kid named Max.
That's crazy.
That could have been my kid.
But instead, what do I have?
My whole life's some money in the bank, some suits in my closet and a string of one-night stands.
Hey.
Come on.
I mean, just because her life went one way and yours went another, it doesn't make your life any worse.
My life rocks!
Money, suits and sex.
These are tears of joy!
I could be cooped up in some tiny apartment changing some brat's poopy diapers.
But instead, I'm out in the world being awesome 24-7, 365!
You let me dodge a bullet, Big Guy.
Plus, here's the mini-cherry on top of the regular cherry on top of the sundae of awesomeness that is my life.
After Shannon and I talked, I nailed her.
- Nope.
- Yeah.
- Nope.
- Yeah.
Sorry.
Don't buy it.
You're making it up.
You're just trying to cover the fact that you actually had a profound moment of doubt about yourself and...
- Oh, my God.
- Oh, Barney!
Video's pretty good on this phone, huh?
Is your phone on?
Oh, no.
It just takes a while to power down.
Ew, gross.
Just stop it.
Ladies, gentlemen...
Ted.
This has been a wonderful evening.
I got great dirt on all you guys.
I got Ted to tell the re-return.
I finally nailed Shannon!
Told her I'd call her tomorrow.
Yeah, right.
And I rediscovered just how awesomely awesome my life is.
Peace out, hombres!
I think Barney just won game night.
We spend so much effort trying to keep parts of our lives hidden, even from our closest friends.
But those rare times when we do open up, it's amazing how minor those secrets all end up seeming.
Of course, not every secret was told that night.
But that's getting ahead of the story.
I'm thinking floor sex.
Sounds reasonable.
Ooh, floor's cold.
Grab that afghan your mom made.
The whole time?
The... whole... time.
Barney, that was really embarrassing for both of us.
We just earned a huge chunk of story.
Right.
So where was I?
Oh, yeah.
Shannon was sucking face with her dad.
How can...
With your dad?
I mean, I know judge not lest ye be judged, but gross!
Barney, that's not my dad.
His name's Greg.
I've been seeing him for a few weeks.
I was hoping you'd just leave, and we could avoid all this.
We're breaking up?
But what about the Peace Corps?
Yeah, all this granola business, it was just a phase.
Greg's older.
He's successful.
He buys me all this cool stuff.
But I love you.
But he has a boat.
You should go to the Peace Corps and forget about me.
I didn't go.
That night, I recorded my video and mailed it to Shannon.
I didn't see her until a week later.
OLDER TED;
Kids, something you might not know about your Uncle Marshall is that he's always been good at games,
I mean unbeatable,
Gin!
Yahtzee!
Poker!
You don't have to shout out "poker" when you win.
I know.
It's just fun to say.
OLDER TED;
We all finally agreed,
Marshall should be running our game nights, instead of playing in them,
Which he took to mean, "Invent your own game,"
It's called "Marshgammon."
It combines all the best features of all the best games,
Candyland, I Never, Pictionary.
- Backgammon, obviously.
- No.
Backgammon sucks.
I took the only good part of "backgammon," the "gammon,"
and I left the rest of it in the trash where it belongs.
I'm so excited Victoria's coming.
I'm gonna go get another round.
Okay.
I wanna lay down some ground rules for tonight, Barney.
I actually like Victoria a lot.
So, don't say anything...
Don't say anything.
And, guys, I haven't exactly told Victoria that I used to have a kind of thing for Robin,
- so if we could just avoid the...
- Well, well, well, how rich.
You make me promise to be on my best behavior around your girlfriend, yet you have been lying to her since day one.
Excuse me.
Hi, Leg Warehouse?
Yeah, my friend Ted needs something to stand on.
So, nothing for him to stand on?
Okay, thanks so much.
Ted, doesn't Victoria deserve to know that you once had the hots for Robin?
I have half a mind to tell the story of the re-return.
(WHISPERING) No, I swore you to secrecy on that.
I am smelling dirt.
What is the story of the re-return?
Nothing.
It's nothing.
And, speaking of digging up dirt, can I count on you two to behave around Victoria?
Us?
What would we do?
Look, you guys have always been like the parents that I still have, and, in fact, moved here to get away from.
However, could we skip the traditional interrogation of the new girlfriend tonight?
- Fine.
- Fine.
Thank you.
- I should go help Robin.
- Okay.
- Hey.
- Hey.
So, you gonna be okay hanging out with Victoria tonight?
Oh, sure.
She's great.
Oh, what?
Because of the whole thing where I said I liked Ted?
No.
Victoria is great.
She's fun, she's free-spirited.
She's great.
I said "She's great" too many times, didn't I?
You must really hate the bitch.
But if you roll an even number while adjacent to the Peppermint Forest, then you "Marshall Out," and all your chips go into the pot.
And remember, if you ever ask the question, "What,"
then you gotta drink.
Got it?
- No idea what you're talking about.
- No idea what you're talking about.
Okay, okay.
All right, no, no.
We'll just start.
You guys will pick it up.
Newbie goes first.
- MARSHALL:
Roll.
- Okay.
Three!
You got "Autobiography."
Now, that's where you have to answer a personal question about your dating life, truthfully, in order to move on.
- Marshall, come on.
- Hey.
She's the one who rolled a three.
Victoria.
"Have you ever cheated while in a relationship?"
Wow, good question.
- You don't have to answer that.
- It's okay.
Well, I was in a really crappy relationship in college, and I wound up kissing this guy at a party one night and I felt terrible about it, so I came clean and we broke up.
Victoria, that was an honest and mature answer.
You may advance to the Gumdrop Mountains.
So, Victoria, did you ever re-return to this guy?
- What?
- You said what.
You gotta drink.
Oh, Barney, by the way, I went to a party in that new building on 82nd, and the host said she knew you.
- What is her name?
Sharon?
Shannon?
- Shannon?
Shannon, Shannon.
No.
Don't remember any Shannon.
Really?
Well, 'cause she gave me a videotape to give you.
Where's the tape?
I'll get it.
Cool.
Okay.
You know, whenever.
Okay, Robin.
Your roll.
Five!
Another "Autobiography."
For the player to your left which...
Victoria!
Of course.
Victoria.
"How many boyfriends did you have before you started dating Ted?"
Wait, the card actually says Ted?
Okay.
Well, boyfriends, I guess I've only had two.
Prude-alert.
Well, that...
That's serious boyfriends.
I've dated other guys in between.
Oh, slut-alert!
Oh, great, there it is.
Thanks, Lily, you're a peach.
(BARNEY YELLING)
(SLAPPING)
Well, wow, look at that.
Robin landed on the Chocolate Swamp.
That's five chips for me.
Thank you.
Finally, somebody understands Marshgammon.
Barney, what was on that tape?
- Too bad you'll never find out.
- Damn it!
If only I'd given you a fake tape and hidden the real tape in my purse.
Oh, wait.
That's exactly what I did.
- What?
- Drink.
Yeah, you were acting so weird about it I gave you Ted's graduation tape instead.
- So, should we pop it in?
- Give it to me.
- Hey, hey!
- Ted!
- Play it.
Play it!
- Fine, fine.
I cannot believe...
Shannon!
I love you,
I love you so much,
What about us changing the world together?
Don't tell me you've forgotten, I know I haven't,
(SINGING)
- Did you try his cell phone?
- Yeah, I left two messages.
I checked the cigar club, the Lusty Leopard.
He's off the grid.
Hey, guys.
What up?
- Barney, where have you been?
- Yeah, we're really sorry about that.
Yeah, so sorry.
But seriously, what was up with the tape?
- No.
Stay.
- Come on.
Come on.
- Stay.
Come on.
- I'm sorry.
I don't wanna talk about it.
It was the most embarrassing and humiliating thing that ever happened to me.
Well, we all have embarrassing stories.
Sometimes it's good to talk about it.
Oh, really?
Then why don't you tell us your most humiliating moment, Marshall?
Show me how good it is.
All right.
MARSHALL;
I was stopping by Lily's kindergarten class to say hi, but they were all at recess,
I really had to pee, so I went into the class's restroom,
It was a smaller target than I'm used to, so I figured I should sit down,
What I didn't realize was it was a shared bathroom,
(BOTH SCREAMING)
I wish I'd pulled up my pants,
(CHILDREN LAUGHING MOCKINGLY)
The kids still call him Funny Butt.
Okay.
I'll tell you my story.
Believe it or not, I was not always as awesome as I am today.
BARNEY;
It was 1998, I was just out of college, and I was working at a coffeehouse with my girlfriend,
My girlfriend, Shannon,
Thank you,
All right.
- I love your singing, Barney.
- And I love you, Shannon.
(GIGGLING)
Joining the Peace Corps with you is gonna be legendary.
I know.
Only five short weeks, till we're down in Nicaragua.
Hey, nonfat latte to go.
Mellow order, bro, mellow order.
Dude.
That's your G-friend?
All right, high-five.
Sorry, I only give high-twos.
Whatevs.
As long as you're nailing that.
Listen to you. "That"?
You know, women aren't objects.
They're human beings.
And FYI, Shannon and I have decided to wait till we're married.
You can read about it in my zine.
Hey, Haircut, right here.
Open up your knowledge basket 'cause here it comes.
Forget all that touchy-feely crap.
You get money, you get laid.
End of discussion.
I feel sorry for you, man.
Peace out, hombre,
(SCOFFS)
Suits.
BARNEY;
Five weeks later, we were all set to leave for the Peace Corps,
Only problem was she never showed up,
- She never showed?
- So what happened next?
You know what?
This was a mistake.
Wait, what if somebody else told their most humiliating story?
Oh, I know just how to decide who.
You brought the game to the bar?
We're not quitting just 'cause Ted's so far ahead.
I was winning?
(EX CLAIMS)
(CLEARS THROAT)
Fine.
I'll go next.
ROBIN;
I was doing a report on live TV about a hansom cab driver,
- The slipping-in-horse-poop story?
- Yeah, we all know that one.
VICTORIA:
Okay, how about this?
I will tell you my most humiliating story.
Yeah, Victoria.
Way to step up.
It involves a game of Truth or Dare, a squeeze bottle of marshmallow ice cream topping, and the hot tub at my grandparents' retirement community.
OLDER TED;
Kids, I tell you a lot of inappropriate stories, but there's no way in hell I'm telling you this one,
Don't worry, though, it wasn't that great,
That is the greatest story ever!
- Oh, my God!
- Wow, wow, wow!
Victoria, I deem your offering worthy.
My saga continues.
BARNEY;
I went back to the coffeehouse to find Shannon,
- Barney!
- Sugar bear, where were you?
I'm sorry.
My dad won't let me go.
But the Nicaraguans need us.
It's just he's still supporting me.
And, look, he's coming by soon to talk about it, but I think you should go on without me.
- Shannon, there is no...
- Barney.
It's your dream.
It's only two years.
I know we can make it.
As I walked away, I realized Shannon was an adult,
Her father couldn't control her life,
I had to go back and confront him,
She was in the middle of a heated argument with her dad,
(BAG THUDDING)
ALL:
What?
(BUZZING)
Now we all gotta drink.
Oh, my God.
What happened next?
- Oh, I don't know, guys.
- Okay, okay.
- Marshall's mom sent us cookies.
- Lily, no!
No, Lily!
For the team, Marshall, for the team.
Hey, Mrs. Eriksen, it's Lily.
Thank you so much for the delicious cookies.
Mayonnaise.
Really?
Never would have guessed.
Yes, well I will definitely give Marshall a kiss for you.
Okay, take care.
- Hi, baby.
- Oh, crap!
My mom sent cookies?
Yeah.
I wish we had a dog, so they wouldn't go to waste.
Yeah.
So, we've got the whole place to ourselves.
- I'm thinking floor sex.
- Sounds reasonable.
LILY:
Oh, floor's cold.
Grab that afghan your mom made.
The whole time?
The whole time.
Barney, that was really embarrassing for both of us.
We just earned a huge chunk of story.
Right.
So where was I?
Oh, yeah.
Shannon was sucking face with her dad.
How could...
With your dad?
I mean, I know, judge not lest ye be judged, but gross!
Barney, that's not my dad.
His name's Greg.
I've been seeing him for a few weeks.
I was hoping you'd just leave and we could avoid all this.
We're breaking up?
But what about the Peace Corps?
Yeah, all this granola business, it was just a phase.
Greg's older.
He's successful.
He buys me all this cool stuff.
- But I love you.
- But he has a boat.
You should go to the Peace Corps.
And forget about me.
BARNEY;
I didn't go,
That night, I recorded my video and mailed it to Shannon,
I didn't see her until a week later,
There's sugar in the basket.
